{'en': 'English-Arabic Cross-language Plagiarism Detection', 'ar': 'كشف الانتحال عبر اللغة الإنجليزية والعربية', 'fr': 'Détection du plagiat interlinguistique anglais-arabe', 'es': 'Detección de plagio en varios idiomas inglés-árabe', 'pt': 'Detecção de plágio entre idiomas inglês-árabe', 'ja': '英語-アラビア語クロスランゲージ剽窃検知', 'zh': '英语-阿拉伯语跨语抄检', 'ru': 'Обнаружение плагиата на английском и арабском языках', 'hi': 'अंग्रेजी-अरबी क्रॉस-भाषा साहित्यिक चोरी का पता लगाना', 'ga': 'Brath bradaíl Trastheangacha Béarla-Araibis', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση λογοκλοπής μεταξύ Αγγλικών και Αραβικών γλωσσών', 'hu': 'Angol-arab Plágium felismerése', 'it': 'Rilevazione di plagio multilingue inglese-arabo', 'mk': 'Детектирање на англиско-арапски крстојазик', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Plagiarisme Bahasa Salib Bahasa Inggeris-Arab', 'ka': 'ინგლისური- აპაბიური კრესენზომის პლაგიარიზმის განსახულება', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്- അറബി ക്രോസ്സ്- ഭാഷ പ്ലാജിറ്റരിസം ഡിറ്റീഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Sejbien tal-Plaġjariżmu bejn l-Ingliż u l-Għarab', 'mn': 'Англи-Араб хэл давхар хэл Plagiarism Detection', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie plagiatu w języku angielskim i arabskim', 'lt': 'Anglų ir arabų tarpkalbinis plagiarizmo nustatymas', 'no': 'Engelsk- arabisk krysspråk- plasseringsoppdaging', 'ro': 'Limba engleză-arabă Detectarea plagiatului în limba engleză-arabă', 'sr': 'Engleski-arapski križarski detektiv plagijarizma', 'si': 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසි- අරාබික් ක්\u200dරොස් භාෂාව ප්ලාජියාරිස්ම් හොයාගන්න', 'so': 'English-Arabic Cross-language Plagiarism Detection', 'sv': 'Engelska-arabiska Upptäckt av plagiat på flera språk', 'ta': 'ஆங்கிலம்- அரபி கிராஸ்- மொழி பிளாஜிரிஸ் கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'ur': 'انگلیسی-عربی کروس-زبان پلاژیاریسم اچانک', 'kk': 'Ағылшын- Араб тілдерінің көпшілік плагитаризмін анықтау', 'uz': 'Inglizcha (AQSH) xoss- tili plagiarism aniqlashName', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'hr': 'Engleski-arapski križarski otkrivanje plagijarizma', 'bg': 'Откриване на плагиатство между английски и арабски език', 'da': 'Engelsk-arabisk Afsløring af plagiater på tværs af sprog', 'nl': 'Engels-Arabisch Kruistalige plagiaatdetectie', 'ko': '영어-아랍어 다국어 표절 검출', 'id': 'Deteksi Plagiarisme Selasa Bahasa Inggris-Arab', 'de': 'Englisch-Arabisch Sprachübergreifende Plagiatserkennung', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Kiingereza wa Kiarabu kwa lugha ya Cross', 'tr': 'Iňlisçe-Arapça Çap Dili', 'sq': 'Gjetja e plagiarismit në gjuhën anglo-arabe', 'am': 'English-Arabic Cross-language Plagiarism Detection', 'hy': 'Անգլերեն-արաբական խաչը գտնվող պլագարիզմի հայտնաբերումը', 'bn': 'ইংরেজী আরবী ক্রস-ভাষা প্লাজিরিজম সন্ধান', 'fa': 'شناسایی پلاژیاریسم انگلیسی-عربی', 'bs': 'Engleski-arapski križarski detektiv plagijarizma', 'ca': 'English-Arabic Cross-language Plagiarism Detection', 'cs': 'Anglicko-arabská detekce plagiátů v různých jazycích', 'et': 'Inglise - araabia keeleülene plagiaadi tuvastamine', 'fi': 'Englannin ja arabian kielirajat ylittävän plagioinnin havaitseminen', 'af': 'Engels- Arabiese Kruistaal Plagiarism Opdekking', 'az': 'ńįngiliz…ô-…ôr…ôb √á…ôrz Dili Plagiarism KeŇüfeti', 'jv': 'Perkakas-Perkakas Perkakas-Perkakas Slagi', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'גילוי צלב בשפה אנגלית-ערבית', 'sk': 'Angleško-arabsko Medjezikovno odkrivanje plagiata', 'bo': 'དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་ཨ་རིབ་ཁ་བྱང་ཀྱི་འཐབ་ལམ་ལུགས་བཙལ་བ'}
{'en': 'The advancement of the web and information technology has contributed to the rapid growth of digital libraries and automatic machine translation tools which easily translate texts from one language into another. These have increased the content accessible in different languages, which results in easily performing translated plagiarism, which are referred to as cross-language plagiarism. Recognition of plagiarism among texts in different languages is more challenging than identifying plagiarism within a corpus written in the same language. This paper proposes a new technique for enhancing English-Arabic cross-language plagiarism detection at the sentence level. This technique is based on semantic and syntactic feature extraction using word order, word embedding and word alignment with multilingual encoders. Those features, and their combination with different machine learning (ML) algorithms, are then used in order to aid the task of classifying sentences as either plagiarized or non-plagiarized. The proposed approach has been deployed and assessed using datasets presented at SemEval-2017. Analysis of experimental data demonstrates that utilizing extracted features and their combinations with various ML classifiers achieves promising results.', 'ar': 'ساهم تقدم الويب وتكنولوجيا المعلومات في النمو السريع للمكتبات الرقمية وأدوات الترجمة الآلية التي تترجم النصوص بسهولة من لغة إلى أخرى. لقد أدى ذلك إلى زيادة المحتوى الذي يمكن الوصول إليه بلغات مختلفة ، مما يؤدي إلى سهولة أداء الانتحال المترجم ، والذي يشار إليه باسم "الانتحال عبر اللغات". يعتبر التعرف على الانتحال بين النصوص بلغات مختلفة أكثر صعوبة من تحديد الانتحال داخل مجموعة مكتوبة بنفس اللغة. تقترح هذه الورقة تقنية جديدة لتعزيز كشف السرقة الأدبية عبر اللغة الإنجليزية والعربية على مستوى الجملة. تعتمد هذه التقنية على استخراج الميزات الدلالية والنحوية باستخدام ترتيب الكلمات ، وتضمين الكلمات ومحاذاة الكلمات باستخدام برامج التشفير متعددة اللغات. ثم تُستخدم هذه الميزات ، مع دمجها مع خوارزميات مختلفة للتعلم الآلي (ML) ، للمساعدة في مهمة تصنيف الجمل إما مسروقة أو غير مسروقة. تم نشر النهج المقترح وتقييمه باستخدام مجموعات البيانات المقدمة في SemEval-2017. يوضح تحليل البيانات التجريبية أن استخدام الميزات المستخرجة ومجموعاتها مع مصنفات ML المختلفة يحقق نتائج واعدة.', 'fr': "Les progrès du Web et des technologies de l'information ont contribué à la croissance rapide des bibliothèques numériques et des outils de traduction automatique qui traduisent facilement des textes d'une langue vers une autre. Cela a permis d'augmenter l'accessibilité du contenu dans différentes langues, ce qui permet de réaliser facilement un plagiat traduit, appelé «\xa0plagiat interlinguistique\xa0». La reconnaissance du plagiat parmi des textes rédigés dans différentes langues est plus difficile que l'identification du plagiat dans un corpus écrit dans la même langue. Cet article propose une nouvelle technique pour améliorer la détection du plagiat interlinguistique anglais-arabe au niveau de la phrase. Cette technique est basée sur l'extraction de caractéristiques sémantiques et syntaxiques à l'aide de l'ordre des mots, de l'incorporation de mots et de l'alignement des mots avec des encodeurs multiling Ces fonctionnalités, et leur combinaison avec différents algorithmes d'apprentissage automatique (ML), sont ensuite utilisées afin de faciliter la classification des phrases comme plagiées ou non plagiées. L'approche proposée a été déployée et évaluée à l'aide d'ensembles de données présentés au SEMEval-2017. L'analyse des données expérimentales montre que l'utilisation de caractéristiques extraites et de leurs combinaisons avec divers classificateurs ML donne des résultats prometteurs.", 'pt': 'O avanço da web e da tecnologia da informação contribuiu para o rápido crescimento de bibliotecas digitais e ferramentas de tradução automática automática que traduzem facilmente textos de um idioma para outro. Isso aumentou o conteúdo acessível em diferentes idiomas, o que resulta em plágio traduzido de fácil execução, conhecido como “plágio entre idiomas”. O reconhecimento de plágio entre textos em diferentes idiomas é mais desafiador do que identificar o plágio dentro de um corpus escrito no mesmo idioma. Este artigo propõe uma nova técnica para melhorar a detecção de plágio entre idiomas inglês-árabe no nível da sentença. Essa técnica é baseada na extração de recursos semânticos e sintáticos usando ordem de palavras, incorporação de palavras e alinhamento de palavras com codificadores multilíngues. Esses recursos e sua combinação com diferentes algoritmos de aprendizado de máquina (ML) são usados para auxiliar na tarefa de classificar frases como plagiadas ou não plagiadas. A abordagem proposta foi implantada e avaliada usando conjuntos de dados apresentados no SemEval-2017. A análise de dados experimentais demonstra que a utilização de recursos extraídos e suas combinações com vários classificadores de ML alcança resultados promissores.', 'es': 'El avance de la tecnología web y de la información ha contribuido al rápido crecimiento de las bibliotecas digitales y las herramientas de traducción automática que traducen fácilmente textos de un idioma a otro. Estos han aumentado el contenido accesible en diferentes idiomas, lo que resulta en la realización fácil de plagio traducido, que se conoce como «plagio entre idiomas». El reconocimiento del plagio entre textos en diferentes idiomas es más difícil que identificar el plagio dentro de un corpus escrito en el mismo idioma. Este artículo propone una nueva técnica para mejorar la detección de plagio entre idiomas inglés-árabe a nivel de oración. Esta técnica se basa en la extracción de características semánticas y sintácticas mediante el orden de las palabras, la incrustación de palabras y la alineación de palabras con codificadores multilingües. Esas funciones, y su combinación con diferentes algoritmos de aprendizaje automático (ML), se utilizan para ayudar en la tarea de clasificar las oraciones como plagiadas o no plagiadas. El enfoque propuesto se ha implementado y evaluado mediante conjuntos de datos presentados en SemEval-2017. El análisis de los datos experimentales demuestra que la utilización de características extraídas y sus combinaciones con varios clasificadores de ML logra resultados prometedores.', 'ja': 'ウェブと情報技術の進歩は、テキストをある言語から別の言語に簡単に翻訳するデジタルライブラリと自動機械翻訳ツールの急速な成長に貢献しました。 これらにより、さまざまな言語でアクセス可能なコンテンツが増加し、翻訳された剽窃が容易に実行されるようになりました。これは「クロスランゲージ剽窃」と呼ばれます。 異なる言語のテキスト間の剽窃の認識は、同じ言語で書かれたコーパス内の剽窃を特定するよりも困難です。 文章レベルでの英語とアラビア語のクロスランゲージ剽窃検出を強化するための新たな手法を提案した。 このテクニックは、単語の順序、単語の埋め込み、および多言語エンコーダを使用した単語の整列を使用したセマンティックおよび構文機能の抽出に基づいています。 次いで、これらの特徴、および異なる機械学習（ ML ）アルゴリズムとの組み合わせは、文章を剽窃または非剽窃のいずれかとして分類する作業を支援するために使用される。 提案されたアプローチは、SemEval -2017で提示されたデータセットを使用して展開および評価されている。 実験データの分析は、抽出された特徴とそれらと様々なML分類子との組み合わせを利用することで、有望な結果を達成することを実証している。', 'zh': '网络信息技术进数图书馆自机器翻译之快速增长,可以轻言翻译成语。 此增异语可访问性,译者易行,谓之"跨语言抄袭"。 别语言文本间抄袭比同语编语料库中抄更具挑战性。 本文出句增英语-阿拉伯语跨语抄检之术。 其术基于用词序,词嵌多言编码器者单词取取于齐语义句法。 然后机器学(ML)算法者,将以句为抄、非抄之事。 拟议之法已用SemEval-2017上展数集为部署及评估。 实验数之分析表明,因其特征,与其ML之分器可得而望也。', 'ru': 'Развитие Интернета и информационных технологий способствовало быстрому росту цифровых библиотек и автоматических средств машинного перевода, которые легко переводят тексты с одного языка на другой. Они увеличили контент, доступный на разных языках, что приводит к легкому выполнению переведенного плагиата, который называют «межъязыковым плагиатом». Признание плагиата среди текстов на разных языках сложнее, чем выявление плагиата в корпусе, написанном на одном языке. В этой статье предлагается новая методика для улучшения обнаружения англо-арабского кросс-языкового плагиата на уровне предложений. Этот метод основан на извлечении семантических и синтаксических признаков с использованием порядка слов, встраивания слов и выравнивания слов с многоязычными кодировщиками. Эти особенности и их сочетание с различными алгоритмами машинного обучения (ML) затем используются для того, чтобы помочь в выполнении задачи классификации предложений как плагиата или неплагиата. Предлагаемый подход был развернут и оценен с использованием наборов данных, представленных на SemEval-2017. Анализ экспериментальных данных показывает, что использование выделенных признаков и их комбинаций с различными классификаторами ML дает многообещающие результаты.', 'hi': 'वेब और सूचना प्रौद्योगिकी की प्रगति ने डिजिटल पुस्तकालयों और स्वचालित मशीन अनुवाद उपकरणों के तेजी से विकास में योगदान दिया है जो आसानी से एक भाषा से दूसरी भाषा में ग्रंथों का अनुवाद करते हैं। इनसे विभिन्न भाषाओं में सुलभ सामग्री में वृद्धि हुई है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप आसानी से अनुवादित साहित्यिक चोरी का प्रदर्शन होता है, जिसे "क्रॉस-लैंग्वेज साहित्यिक चोरी" के रूप में जाना जाता है। विभिन्न भाषाओं में ग्रंथों के बीच साहित्यिक चोरी की मान्यता एक ही भाषा में लिखे गए कॉर्पस के भीतर साहित्यिक चोरी की पहचान करने की तुलना में अधिक चुनौतीपूर्ण है। यह पेपर वाक्य स्तर पर अंग्रेजी-अरबी क्रॉस-लैंग्वेज साहित्यिक चोरी का पता लगाने को बढ़ाने के लिए एक नई तकनीक का प्रस्ताव करता है। यह तकनीक शब्द क्रम, शब्द एम्बेडिंग और बहुभाषी एनकोडर के साथ शब्द संरेखण का उपयोग करके शब्दार्थ और वाक्यात्मक सुविधा निष्कर्षण पर आधारित है। उन विशेषताओं, और विभिन्न मशीन लर्निंग (एमएल) एल्गोरिदम के साथ उनके संयोजन, फिर वाक्यों को या तो चोरी या गैर-चोरी के रूप में वर्गीकृत करने के कार्य में सहायता करने के लिए उपयोग किया जाता है। प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण को सेमइवल-2017 में प्रस्तुत डेटासेट का उपयोग करके तैनात और मूल्यांकन किया गया है। प्रयोगात्मक डेटा का विश्लेषण दर्शाता है कि विभिन्न एमएल क्लासिफायरके साथ निकाली गई सुविधाओं और उनके संयोजनों का उपयोग करने से आशाजनक परिणाम प्राप्त होते हैं।', 'ga': 'Chuir dul chun cinn an ghréasáin agus na teicneolaíochta faisnéise leis an bhfás tapa atá tagtha ar leabharlanna digiteacha agus ar uirlisí uathoibríocha aistriúcháin a aistríonn téacsanna go héasca ó theanga amháin go teanga eile. Mhéadaigh siad seo an t-ábhar atá ar fáil i dteangacha éagsúla, rud a fhágann go bhfeidhmítear bradaíl aistrithe go héasca, ar a dtugtar “bradaí tras-teanga”. Is dúshlánaí é bradaíl a aithint i dtéacsanna i dteangacha éagsúla ná bradaíl a aithint laistigh de chorpas atá scríofa sa teanga chéanna. Molann an páipéar seo teicníocht nua chun feabhas a chur ar bhrath bradaíl tras-teanga Béarla-Araibis ag leibhéal na pianbhreithe. Tá an teicníocht seo bunaithe ar eastóscadh gné shéimeantach agus chomhréire ag baint úsáide as ord focal, leabú focal agus ailíniú focal le hionchódóirí ilteangacha. Úsáidtear na gnéithe sin, agus a gcomhcheangal le halgartaim mheaisínfhoghlama (ML) éagsúla ansin chun cabhrú leis an tasc a bhaineann le habairtí a rangú mar abairtí bradaíl nó neamhbhradaí. Baineadh úsáid as an gcur chuige atá beartaithe agus rinneadh é a mheasúnú trí úsáid a bhaint as tacair sonraí a cuireadh i láthair ag SemEval-2017. Léiríonn anailís ar shonraí turgnamhacha go mbaintear torthaí dóchais amach trí ghnéithe asbhainte agus a dteaglaim le haicmitheoirí ML éagsúla a úsáid.', 'ka': 'ვებ და ინფორმაციის ტექნოლოგიის წინასწარმატება დიზიტალური ლიბერიკების და ავტომატური მაქსინის გადაწყვეტილების წინასწარმატებით დამატებულია, რომელიც ერთი ენაზე ტექსტის ისინი განსხვავებული ენებით შესაძლებელი შესაძლებელი შესაძლებელი შესახებ, რომელიც მართლად გავაკეთება პლაგიარიზმის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც სახებ "კრისი ენის პლაგიარიზმი". პარამეტრების ტექსტის პარამეტრების პლაგიარიზმის მოცნობა უფრო შესაძლებელია, ვიდრე პლაგიარიზმის განცნობა იგივე ენაში დაწერული კორპუსში. ამ დოკუნტის ახალი ტექნექცია, რომელიც ინგლისურ-აპაბიურ კრესენტური პლაგიარიზმის განახლების განახლების განახლებაში. ეს ტექნექტიკა სენმანტიკური და სინტაქტიკური ფუნქციების გამოყენება სიტყვების წესებით, სიტყვების დაყენება და სიტყვების დაყენება მრავალური კოდერებით. ეს ფუნქციები და მათი კომბიზაცია განსხვავებული მანქანის სწავლების ალგორიტებით გამოყენება, რომლებიც გამოყენება მანქანის კლასიფიკაციის დასახმარებისთვის, როგორც პლაგიარიზებული ან არ პროგრამეტული პროგრამა გამოყენებულია და განსაზღვრებულია, რომელიც SemEval-2017-ში გამოყენებულია. ექსპერიმენტიური მონაცემების ანალიზია, რომ გამოყენება ექსპერიმენტიური ფუნქციები და მათი კომბინციაციები განსხვავებული ML კლასიფიკაციერებით მიი', 'hu': 'A web és az információs technológia fejlődése hozzájárult a digitális könyvtárak és az automatikus gépi fordítóeszközök gyors növekedéséhez, amelyek könnyen lefordítják a szövegeket egyik nyelvről a másikra. Ezek növelték a különböző nyelveken elérhető tartalom számát, ami könnyen végrehajtható fordított plagizációt eredményez, amelyet "nyelvközi plagizmusnak" neveznek. A plágium felismerése a különböző nyelvű szövegek között nagyobb kihívást jelent, mint a plágium azonosítása az azonos nyelven írt korpuszon belül. Ez a tanulmány egy új technikát javasol az angol-arab nyelvű plagiázs felismerésének javítására mondatszinten. Ez a technika a szemantikai és szintaktikus funkciók kivonásán alapul, szósorrend, szóbeágyazás és szóigazítás többnyelvű kódolókkal. Ezeket a funkciókat, valamint azok kombinációját különböző gépi tanulási (ML) algoritmusokkal használják, hogy segítsék a mondatok plagizált vagy nem plagizált kategóriáját. A javasolt megközelítést a SemEval-2017-en bemutatott adatkészletek alapján alkalmazták és értékelték. A kísérleti adatok elemzése azt mutatja, hogy a kivont funkciók és azok kombinációja különböző ML osztályozókkal ígéretes eredményeket ér el.', 'el': 'Η εξέλιξη του διαδικτύου και της τεχνολογίας της πληροφορίας συνέβαλε στην ταχεία ανάπτυξη των ψηφιακών βιβλιοθηκών και των εργαλείων αυτόματης μηχανικής μετάφρασης που μεταφράζουν εύκολα κείμενα από τη μία γλώσσα στην άλλη. Αυτές έχουν αυξήσει το περιεχόμενο που είναι προσβάσιμο σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες, γεγονός που έχει ως αποτέλεσμα την εύκολη εκτέλεση μεταφρασμένης λογοκλοπής, η οποία αναφέρεται ως "πολυγλωσσική λογοκλοπή". Η αναγνώριση της λογοκλοπής μεταξύ κειμένων σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες είναι πιο δύσκολη από τον εντοπισμό της λογοκλοπής μέσα σε ένα σώμα γραμμένο στην ίδια γλώσσα. Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια νέα τεχνική για την ενίσχυση της ανίχνευσης αγγλο-αραβικής λογοκλοπής σε επίπεδο ποινής. Αυτή η τεχνική βασίζεται στην εξαγωγή σημασιολογικών και συντακτικών χαρακτηριστικών χρησιμοποιώντας σειρά λέξεων, ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και ευθυγράμμιση λέξεων με πολύγλωσσους κωδικοποιητές. Αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά, και ο συνδυασμός τους με διαφορετικούς αλγόριθμους μηχανικής μάθησης, χρησιμοποιούνται στη συνέχεια για να βοηθήσουν στην ταξινόμηση των προτάσεων είτε ως λογοκλογικές είτε ως μη-λογοκλογικές. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση έχει αναπτυχθεί και αξιολογηθεί χρησιμοποιώντας σύνολα δεδομένων που παρουσιάστηκαν στο SemEval-2017. Η ανάλυση των πειραματικών δεδομένων αποδεικνύει ότι η χρησιμοποίηση των εξαγόμενων χαρακτηριστικών και των συνδυασμών τους με διάφορους ταξινομητές επιτυγχάνει πολλά υποσχόμενα αποτελέσματα.', 'it': 'Il progresso del web e della tecnologia dell\'informazione ha contribuito alla rapida crescita delle biblioteche digitali e degli strumenti automatici di traduzione automatica che traducono facilmente i testi da una lingua all\'altra. Questi hanno aumentato i contenuti accessibili in diverse lingue, il che si traduce in un plagio tradotto facilmente, che viene definito "plagio multilingue". Il riconoscimento del plagio tra testi in lingue diverse è più impegnativo che identificare il plagio all\'interno di un corpus scritto nella stessa lingua. Questo articolo propone una nuova tecnica per migliorare la rilevazione del plagio cross-language inglese-arabo a livello di frase. Questa tecnica si basa sull\'estrazione semantica e sintattica di funzionalità utilizzando ordine di parole, incorporazione di parole e allineamento di parole con encoder multilingue. Queste caratteristiche, e la loro combinazione con diversi algoritmi di machine learning (ML), vengono poi utilizzate per aiutare il compito di classificare le frasi come plagiate o non plagiate. L\'approccio proposto è stato implementato e valutato utilizzando set di dati presentati a SemEval-2017. L\'analisi dei dati sperimentali dimostra che utilizzando le caratteristiche estratte e le loro combinazioni con vari classificatori ML ottiene risultati promettenti.', 'kk': 'Веб және мәлімет технологиясының жағдайы дижиталық кітапханалардың және машиналардың аудару құралдарының тез өсіміне көмектеседі. Бұл мәтіндерді бір тілден басқа тілін Бұл мазмұның әртүрлі тілдерде қол жеткізетін мазмұнын көтерді. Бұл аударылған плагигитаризмі оңай орындайды. Бұл "бірнеше тіл плагитаризмі" деп аталады. Басқа тілдерде жазылған мәтіндердің плагитаризмін анықтау - бір тілде жазылған корпус ішінде плагитаризмді анықтау көбірек. Бұл қағаз сөйлеу деңгейінде ағылшын- араб тілдерді көбейткен плагитаризмді анықтау үшін жаңа техникалық таңдайды. Бұл техника бірнеше тілді кодерлерден сөз ретін, сөздерді ендіру және сөздерді түзетуге негізделген синтактикалық қасиеттерді тарқатуға негізделген. Бұл мүмкіндіктер мен олардың басқа машиналық оқыту алгоритмдерімен біріктірілген, содан кейін сөздерді плагигизацияланған немесе плагизацияланбаған деп классификациялау тапсырмасын көмектесу үшін қолданыла Келтірілген тәсілі semiEval-2017 дегенде көрсетілген деректер жинақтарымен жұмыс істеді. Тәжірибелі деректердің анализациясы келтірілген мүмкіндіктерді және олардың көптеген ML классификацияларымен біріктірілген түрлі нәтижелерін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Напредокот на веб и информатичката технологија придонесе за брзиот раст на дигиталните библиотеки и автоматски машински преведувачки алатки кои лесно преведуваат тексти од еден јазик во друг. Тие ја зголемија содржината достапна на различни јазици, што резултира со лесно спроведување на преведен плагијаризам, кој се нарекува „крстојазичен плагијаризам“. Recognition of plagiarism among texts in different languages is more challenging than identifying plagiarism within a corpus written in the same language.  Овој весник предложува нова техника за подобрување на англиско-арапското крстојачно детекција на плагијаризмот на ниво на речениците. Оваа техника се базира на семантична и синтактичка екстракција на карактеристики користејќи редослед на зборови, вградување на зборови и израмнување на зборови со мултијазични кодери. Овие карактеристики, и нивната комбинација со различни алгоритми за машинско учење (ML), потоа се користат за да се помогне задачата за класификување на речениците како плагијаризирани или неплагијаризирани. Предложениот пристап е распореден и проценет со користење на податочните сети презентирани на SemEval-2017 година. Анализата на експерименталните податоци покажува дека употребата на извадени карактеристики и нивните комбинации со различни класификатори на МЛ постигнува ветувачки резултати.', 'lt': 'Interneto ir informacinių technologijų pažanga prisidėjo prie spartaus skaitmeninių bibliotekų ir automatinių vertimo įrankių, kurie lengvai verta tekstus iš vienos kalbos į kitą, augimo. Tai padidino įvairiomis kalbomis prieinamą turinį, dėl kurio lengvai vyksta vertimas plagiarizmu, vadinamu "tarpkalbiniu plagiarizmu". Įvairių kalbų tekstų plagiarizmo pripažinimas yra sudėtingesnis nei vienoje pačioje kalboje rašyto korpuso plagiarizmo identifikavimas. Šiame dokumente siūloma sukurti naują metodą, kaip pagerinti anglų ir arabų tarpkalbinį plagiarizmo nustatymą bausmės lygiu. Šis metodas grindžiamas semantinių ir sintaktinių savybių ekstrakcija naudojant žodžių tvarką, žodžių įterpimą ir žodžių suderinimą su daugiakalbiais kodatoriais. Tuomet šios savybės ir jų derinys su skirtingais mašininio mokymosi (ML) algoritmais naudojami siekiant padėti klasifikuoti sakinius kaip plagiarizuotus arba neplagiarizuotus. Siūlomas metodas buvo įgyvendintas ir įvertintas naudojant SemEval-2017 metu pateiktus duomenų rinkinius. Eksperimentinių duomenų analizė rodo, kad panaudojant išgautas savybes ir jų derinius su įvairiais ML klasifikatoriais pasiekti perspektyvūs rezultatai.', 'ml': "വെബ് വിവരങ്ങളുടെയും വിവരങ്ങളുടെയും മുന്\u200dഗണന സാങ്കേതികവും ഡിജിറ്റല്\u200d ലൈബ്രറികളുടെ വേഗത്തിലേക്ക് വളര്\u200dന്നതിനും സ്വയം മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ These have increased the content accessible in different languages, which results in easily performing translated plagiarism, which are referred to as 'cross-language plagiarism'.  വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷയിലുള്ള പദാവലികളുടെ ഇടയില്\u200d പ്ലാജിജിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് ഒരേ ഭാഷയില്\u200d എഴുതിയ പ്ലാജിജിറ്റിയിസം കണ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-അറബി-ക്രിസ്റ്റ് ഭാഷ പ്ലാജിജിറ്റിയിസ് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d പുതിയ സാങ്കേതികവി ഈ ടെക്നിക്ക് സെമാന്റിക്കും സിന്റാക്റ്റിക്കും പ്രത്യേക പുറത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ്. വാക്കിന്റെ കല്\u200dപന, വാക്കുകള്\u200d അ വ്യത്യസ്ത യന്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളുമായി അവരുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d വ്യക്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതോ പ്ലാജിജ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2017-ല്\u200d കാണിച്ച ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പ്രാ പരീക്ഷണവിവരങ്ങളുടെ അന്വേഷണം കാണിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d എംഎല്\u200d വിഭാഗങ്ങളുമായി അവയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതും വാഗ്", 'ms': "Kemajuan teknologi web dan maklumat telah berkontribusi kepada pertumbuhan cepat perpustakaan digital dan alat terjemahan mesin automatik yang mudah menerjemahkan teks dari satu bahasa ke bahasa lain. Ini telah meningkatkan kandungan yang boleh diakses dalam bahasa berbeza, yang menyebabkan plagiarisme terjemahan mudah dilakukan, yang disebut sebagai 'plagiarisme salib bahasa'. Pengenalan plagiarisme diantara teks dalam bahasa yang berbeza adalah lebih mencabar daripada mengenali plagiarisme dalam korpus ditulis dalam bahasa yang sama. Kertas ini mencadangkan teknik baru untuk meningkatkan pengesan plagiarisme bahasa salib bahasa Inggeris-Arab pada tahap kalimat. Teknik ini berdasarkan ekstraksi ciri semantik dan sintaktik menggunakan perintah perkataan, penyambungan perkataan dan penyesuaian perkataan dengan pengekod berbilang bahasa. Ciri-ciri tersebut, dan kombinasi mereka dengan algoritma pembelajaran mesin yang berbeza (ML), kemudian digunakan untuk membantu tugas untuk mengklasifikasi kalimat sebagai sama ada plagiarized atau tidak plagiarized. pendekatan yang direncanakan telah disebarkan dan diuji menggunakan set data yang dihantar di SemEval-2017. Analysis of experimental data demonstrates that utilizing extracted features and their combinations with various ML classifiers achieves promising results.", 'pl': 'Rozwój technologii internetowych i informatycznych przyczynił się do szybkiego rozwoju bibliotek cyfrowych i narzędzi automatycznego tłumaczenia maszynowego, które łatwo tłumaczą teksty z jednego języka na drugi. Zwiększyły one ilość treści dostępnych w różnych językach, co skutkuje łatwym przeprowadzeniem tłumaczonego plagiatu, zwanego "plagiatem wielojęzycznym". Rozpoznanie plagiatu wśród tekstów w różnych językach jest trudniejsze niż identyfikacja plagiatu w korpusie napisanym w tym samym języku. Niniejszy artykuł proponuje nową technikę poprawy wykrywania plagiatu angielsko-arabskiego na poziomie zdania. Technika ta opiera się na ekstrakcji cech semantycznych i składniowych przy użyciu kolejności słów, osadzania słów i wyrównania słów za pomocą wielojęzycznych koderów. Funkcje te oraz ich połączenie z różnymi algorytmami uczenia maszynowego (ML) są następnie wykorzystywane w celu pomocy w klasyfikacji zdań jako plagiatowanych lub nieplagiatowanych. Proponowane podejście zostało wdrożone i ocenione przy użyciu zbiorów danych prezentowanych na SemEval-2017. Analiza danych eksperymentalnych pokazuje, że wykorzystanie wyodrębnionych cech i ich kombinacji z różnymi klasyfikatorami ML osiąga obiecujące rezultaty.', 'mt': 'L-avvanz tat-teknoloġija tal-internet u tal-informazzjoni kkontribwixxa għat-tkabbir rapidu tal-libreriji diġitali u l-għodod awtomatiċi tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni li jittraduċu t-testi faċilment minn lingwa għal oħra. Dawn żiedu l-kontenut aċċessibbli f’lingwi differenti, li jirriżulta fi plaġjariżmu tradott faċilment, li jissejħu “plaġjariżmu bejn il-lingwi”. Ir-rikonoxximent tal-plaġjariżmu fost it-testi f’lingwi differenti huwa aktar sfida milli l-identifikazzjoni tal-plaġjariżmu fi ħdan korpus miktub fl-istess lingwa. Dan id-dokument jipproponi teknika ġdida għat-titjib tad-detezzjoni tal-plaġjariżmu translingwistiku Ingliż-Għarbi fil-livell tas-sentenza. Din it-teknika hija bbażata fuq estrazzjoni semantika u sinrattika ta’ karatteristiċi bl-użu ta’ ordni tal-kliem, inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem u allinjament tal-kliem ma’ kodifikaturi multilingwi. Dawk il-karatteristiċi, u l-kombinazzjoni tagħhom ma’ algoritmi differenti tat-tagħlim bil-magna (ML), imbagħad jintużaw sabiex jgħinu fil-kompitu tal-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentenzi bħala plaġjarizzati jew mhux plaġjarizzati. The proposed approach has been deployed and assessed using datasets presented at SemEval-2017.  L-analiżi tad-dejta sperimentali turi li l-użu tal-karatteristiċi estratti u l-kombinazzjonijiet tagħhom ma’ diversi klassifikaturi ML jikseb riżultati promettenti.', 'mn': 'Веб болон мэдээллийн технологи хөгжүүлэх нь дижитал номын сан болон автоматжуулалтын хөгжүүлэх хэрэгслүүдийн хурдан хөгжүүлэхэд тусалдаг. Эдгээр нь өөр хэл дээр ашиглаж чадах бүтээгдэхүүнийг нэмэгдүүлсэн бөгөөд үүнийг хялбар хэлний плагиаризм гэж нэрлэдэг. Өөр хэл дээр бичигдсэн корпус доторх plagiarism гэдгийг мэдэхээс илүү хэцүү. Энэ цаас хэллэг дээр Англи-Араб хэл давхар хэлний плагитаризмын нээлтийг нэмэгдүүлэх шинэ техник санал болгодог. Энэ техник нь олон хэлний кодчуудтай тэмдэглэгддэг үгний дарааллаар, үгний солилцоог ашиглан семантик болон синтактикийн шинжлэх ухаан дээр суурилсан. Тэдгээр өөр машины суралцах алгоритмын холбоотой зүйлсийг ашиглаж өгүүлбэрийг хуваалцах, эсвэл хуваалцаагүй хэлбэрээр хичээлд туслахын тулд ашигладаг. Сайн санал болгосон арга зам нь SemEval-2017 онд өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглан дүгнэсэн. Туурал өгөгдлийн шинжилгээ нь олон ML классификациудтай хамтдаа хамтдаа ашиглаж байгааг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Utviklinga av nett og informasjonsteknologien har bidra til raskt vekst av digitale biblioteker og automatisk maskineomsetjingsverktøya som enkelt oversetter tekstar frå ein språk til ein annan. Desse har auka innhaldet tilgjengeleg i ulike språk, som fører til å utføra enkelt omsett plagiarism, som vert kalla « krysspråk plagiarism ». Kjenning av plagiarism blant tekstar i ulike språk er meir vanskeleg enn identifisering av plagiarism i ein korpus skriven i same språk. Denne papiret foreslår eit ny teknikk for å forbetra engelsk- arabisk krysspråk- oppdaging av plagiarism på setningsnivået. Denne teknikken er basert på ekstrahering av semantiske og syntaktiske funksjonar ved hjelp av ordrekkefølgje, ordinnbygging og ordjustering med fleirspråkskodar. Desse funksjonane, og dei kombinasjonane med ulike maskinelæringsalgoritme (ML), vert derfor brukte for å hjelpa oppgåva for å klassifisera setningar som anten plagiarisert eller ikkje-plagiarisert. Den foreslåde tilnærminga er utført og vurdert ved hjelp av datasett presentert på semiEval-2017. Analyser av eksperimentelle data viser at bruk av ekstraherte funksjonar og kombinasjonane sine med forskjellige ML-klassifikatorar når det gjelder alvorleg resultat.', 'ro': 'Avansarea tehnologiei web și a informației a contribuit la creșterea rapidă a bibliotecilor digitale și a instrumentelor automate de traducere automată care traduc cu ușurință textele dintr-o limbă în alta. Acestea au sporit conținutul accesibil în diferite limbi, ceea ce duce la efectuarea ușoară a plagiatului tradus, denumit "plagiat translingvistic". Recunoașterea plagiatului în rândul textelor în limbi diferite este mai dificilă decât identificarea plagiatului într-un corpus scris în aceeași limbă. Această lucrare propune o nouă tehnică de îmbunătățire a detectării plagiatului în limba engleză-arabă la nivelul propoziției. Această tehnică se bazează pe extragerea caracteristicilor semantice și sintactice utilizând ordinea de cuvinte, încorporarea cuvintelor și alinierea cuvintelor cu codificatoare multilingve. Aceste caracteristici, precum și combinația lor cu diferiți algoritmi de învățare automată (ML), sunt apoi utilizate pentru a ajuta sarcina de a clasifica propozițiile ca fiind fie plagiate sau neplagiate. Abordarea propusă a fost implementată și evaluată folosind seturi de date prezentate la SemEval-2017. Analiza datelor experimentale demonstreaza ca utilizarea caracteristicilor extrase si a combinatiilor lor cu diferite clasificatoare ML obtine rezultate promitatoare.', 'sr': 'Napredak mreže i informacione tehnologije doprinosio je brzom rastu digitalnih biblioteka i automatskih alata za prevod mašina koji su lako prevodili tekste iz jednog jezika na drugo. Oni su povećali sadržaj koji je dostupan na različitim jezicima, koji rezultira lako izvršavajući prevedeni plagijazam, koji se naziva "transjezički plagijazam". Prepoznavanje plagijarizma među tekstima na različitim jezicima je mnogo izazovnije nego identifikacija plagijarizma unutar korpusa napisanog na istom jeziku. Ovaj papir predlaže novu tehniku za unapređenje engleskog-arapskog krstojezičkog detektiva plagijarizma na nivou rečenice. Ova tehnika je bazirana na semantičkoj i sintaktičkoj ekstrakciji koristeći red riječi, ugrađenje riječi i poravnanje riječi sa mnogijezičkim koderima. Te karakteristike, i njihova kombinacija sa različitim algoritmima za učenje mašine (ML), onda se koristi kako bi pomogli zadatku klasifikacije rečenica kao plagizirano ili ne-plagizirano. Predloženi pristup je raspoređen i procijenjen korištenjem podataka predstavljenih na semiEval-2017. Analiza eksperimentalnih podataka pokazuje da korištenje izvlačenih karakteristika i njihovih kombinacija sa različitim klasifikatorima ML postiže obećavajući rezultati.', 'so': "Horumarinta internetka iyo teknolojiga macluumaadka waxaa ka hormariyey koritaanka dhaqso ee maktabadaha digital iyo qalabka turjumidda machine oo si fudud u tarjumaya qoraal ka soo baxa luqad oo kale. These have increased the content accessible in different languages, which results in easily performing translated plagiarism, which are referred to as 'cross-language plagiarism'.  Aqoonsashada farshaxanka ee ku qoran luuqado kala duduwan waa ka qallafsan tahay aqoonsashada farshaxanka ku qoran luqada isku mid ah. Kanu wuxuu soo jeedaa tekniko cusub si uu u kordhiyo aqoonsiga luqada Ingiriis-Carabi-ku-qoran qoraalka qoraalka. Teknonikadan waxay ku saleysan xarunta semantic iyo syntactic oo lagu isticmaalayo amar eray, word embedding iyo word isbedelin oo ku qoran qoraal luuqad kala duduwan. Waxyaabahaas waxaa lagu isticmaalaa qoraalka waxbarashada machadka kala duduwan (ML) si ay u caawiyaan shaqada fasaxa oo loo qoro qoraalka sida loo qoray ama aan la qorin. Dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeeday waxaa la soo dejiyey oo lagu qiimeeyay isticmaalka sawirada ee SemEval-2017. Baaritaanka data imtixaanka waxay muujiyaan in isticmaalka alaabta la soo saaray iyo xiriirkooda la xiriira fasalka ML oo kala duduwan ay helaan resulto ballan ah.", 'ta': "இணைய மற்றும் தகவல் தொழில்நுட்பத்தின் முன்னேற்றம் இலக்கல் நூலகங்களின் வேகமான வளர்ச்சி மற்றும் தானாகவே இயந்திரம் மொழிமாற்றும் கருவி இது வேறு மொழிகளில் அணுகக்கூடிய உள்ளடக்கங்களை அதிகரித்துள்ளது, இது மொழிபெயர்த்தப்பட்ட பிளாஜிரியலை சுலபமாக செய்யும், இது 'கிரிஸ் ம வேறு மொழிகளில் எழுதப்பட்ட உரைகளில் உள்ள பிளாஜிரியல் அறிவிப்பது ஒரே மொழியில் எழுதப்பட்ட பிளாஜிரியலை கண்டுபிடிப்பதை விட ச இந்த தாள் ஒரு புதிய தொழில்நுட்பத்தை மேம்படுத்துவதற்காக ஆங்கிலத்தில்- அரபி மொழி குறுக்கு மொழியில் கண்டுப இந்த தொழில்நுட்பம் பல மொழிக்குறியீடுகளுடன் ஒத்திசைவு மற்றும் ஒத்திசைவு குணங்கள் வெளியீட்டை பயன்படுத்தி சொல்லும்,  அந்த குணங்கள், மற்றும் அவற்றின் இணைப்பு வேறு இயந்திரம் கற்றல் முறைமைகளுடன், பின்னர் வகைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட வாக்கியங்களை பிளாஜிரியமிட்ட அல்லது பிளாஜிர The proposed approach has been released and assessed using data sets in SemEval- 2017. ஆராய்ச்சி தரவுகளின் ஆராய்ச்சி காண்பிக்கிறது வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட பண்புகளையும் அவற்றின் இணைப்புகளையும் ML வகுப்பாளர்கள", 'si': 'Name මෙයාලා වෙනස් භාෂාවට පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩි කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒකෙන් ලේසියෙන් පරිවර්තනය කරන්න පුළුවන්  වෙනස් භාෂාවලේ ප්ලැජියාරිස්ම් එක්ක භාෂාවට ලියපු කොර්පුස් වල ලියපු ප්\u200dලැජියාරිස්ම් අඳුන්න වඩා ප්\u200dරශ මේ පැත්තේ අළුත් තාක්ෂණයක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය- අරාබික් ක්\u200dරිස් භාෂාවක් ප්ලැජියාරිස්ම් පරීක්ෂණය සැ මේ තාක්ෂණය සෙමැන්ටික් සහ සංකේතික විශේෂය පිළිබඳින්නේ වචන පද්ධතිය, වචන පද්ධතිය සහ වචන පද්ධතිය සඳහා වි ඒ විශේෂතාවන්, ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධය වෙනස් යන්ත්\u200dරය ඉගෙනගන්න (ML) ඇල්ගෝරිධම් සමඟ, පස්සේ ප්\u200dලේජියාර්ජියාර්ජිය සෙම්වෙල්-2017 දී තියෙන්න තොරතුරු සටහන් භාවිත කරන්න සහ පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙනවා. පරීක්ෂණ දත්තේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම ඔවු', 'ur': 'ویب اور اطلاعات تکنولوژی کی پیشرفت دیجیٹل لئبریوں اور ماشین ترجمہ تولید تولید کے سریع تغییر میں غلبہ کیا گیا ہے جو ایک زبان سے پیغام آسان ترجمہ کرتی ہے۔ یہ مختلف زبانوں میں دسترسی حاصل کرنے والی موتوں کو اضافہ کردیا گیا ہے، جس کا نتیجہ آسانی سے ترجمہ پیغام کرتا ہے، جسے "cross-language plagiarism" نام لیا جاتا ہے. مختلف زبانوں میں پیغام کا پتہ پہچان جانا اس سے زیادہ مشکل ہے کہ ایک زبان میں لکھی ہوئی جسم کی پیغام پہچان جانے سے زیادہ مشکل ہے This paper proposes a new technique for enhancing English-Arabic cross-language plagiarism detection at the sentence level. یہ ٹیکنیک سیمنٹی اور سینٹاکتیک فوجیٹ اضافہ پر بنیاد ہے لفظ اوردر کے مطابق، لفظ اضافہ کرنے اور لفظ تضافہ کے مطابق multilingual encoders کے ساتھ. اور ان کی مختلف ماشین تعلیم (ML) الگوریتموں کے ساتھ ان کی ترکیب، اس کے بعد کلیزوں کی تعلیم کی مدد کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں کہ ان کا کلیزوں کو پھیلایا جائے یا نہ پھیلایا جائے۔ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ استعمال کی گئی ہے اور مطالب 2017 میں پیشنهاد کیا گیا ہے. آزمائش ڈیٹا کی تحلیل دکھاتی ہے کہ اخراج ہوئی فرصت اور ان کی مختلف ML کلاسیفوں کے ساتھ ان کی تعلقات کا فائدہ پہنچاتا ہے۔', 'sv': 'Utvecklingen av webben och informationstekniken har bidragit till den snabba tillväxten av digitala bibliotek och automatiska maskinöversättningsverktyg som enkelt översätter texter från ett språk till ett annat. Dessa har ökat det innehåll som är tillgängligt på olika språk, vilket leder till att översatt plagiat lätt utförs, som kallas "flerspråkig plagiat". Att erkänna plagiat bland texter på olika språk är svårare än att identifiera plagiat i en korpus skriven på samma språk. Denna uppsats föreslår en ny teknik för att förbättra engelsk-arabisk cross-language plagiatdetektion på meningsnivå. Denna teknik bygger på semantisk och syntaktisk funktionsutvinning med ordordning, ordinbäddning och ordjustering med flerspråkiga kodare. Dessa funktioner, och deras kombination med olika maskininlärningsalgoritmer (ML), används sedan för att underlätta uppgiften att klassificera meningar som antingen plagierade eller icke-plagierade. Det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet har implementerats och utvärderats med hjälp av datauppsättningar som presenterades på SemEval-2017. Analys av experimentella data visar att användningen av extraherade funktioner och deras kombinationer med olika ML-klassificerare ger lovande resultat.', 'uz': "Name Bu tarkibi boshqa tillarda qoʻllaniladi. Bu tarjima plagiarisiga yordam beradi. Bu 'cross-language plagiarism' deb ataladi. Har xil tildagi matnlarning plagiarisini tasdiqlash, bitta tilda yozilgan plagiarisiga aniqlashdan ham murakkab bo'ladi. Bu hujjat gapir darajada ingliz-arab tillarini ko'paytirish uchun yangi teknologiya rivojlanadi. Name Bu xususiyatlar va ularning boshqa mashinalar o'rganish algoritlari (ML) bilan birlashtirish uchun ularni plagiariz yoki plagiariy emas boʻlmagan so'zlarni tasdiqlash uchun ishlatiladi. Name Taʼminlovchi maʼlumot taʼminotlarini koʻrsatish imkoniyatlaridan foydalanish va ularning boshqa ML turlari bilan birlashtirish imkoniyatlarini hosil qiladi.", 'vi': 'Sự phát triển của trang web và công nghệ thông tin đã góp phần cho sự phát triển nhanh chóng của các thư viện kỹ thuật số và các công cụ dịch thuật tự động mà dễ dàng chuyển văn bản từ ngôn ngữ này sang ngôn ngữ khác. Chúng đã làm tăng nội dung có thể phát triển bằng các ngôn ngữ khác nhau, dẫn đến biểu hiện một cách dễ dàng, được gọi là "giả lập ngôn ngữ khác nhau". Nhận biết chữ cái trong văn bản bằng ngôn ngữ khác nhau khó hơn việc xác định chữ cái trong một tập thể được viết bằng cùng một ngôn ngữ. Tờ giấy này đề xuất một kỹ thuật mới để phát hiện tiếng Anh-Ả Rập qua ngôn ngữ rộng ở mức án. Phương pháp này dựa trên tính năng ngữ pháp và cấu trúc theo ngữ pháp, sử dụng lệnh, sự nhúng vào từ và cấu hình các bộ mã hóa đa dạng. Những tính năng này, và kết hợp với các thuật to án học máy khác nhau (ML) được dùng để giúp việc phân loại các câu chữ như là chữ gian quảng cáo hoặc không quảng cáo. Cách tiếp cận đã được áp dụng và đánh giá bằng các tập tin được trình bày tại SemEvil-thẩm 7. Phân tích các dữ liệu thử nghiệm cho thấy rằng nhờ dịch hóa các tính năng và kết hợp với các phân loại ML đạt được kết quả hứa hẹn.', 'nl': "De vooruitgang van de web- en informatietechnologie heeft bijgedragen aan de snelle groei van digitale bibliotheken en automatische machinevertaaltools die gemakkelijk teksten van de ene naar de andere taal vertalen. Hierdoor is de inhoud in verschillende talen toegankelijker geworden, wat resulteert in het gemakkelijk uitvoeren van vertaald plagiaat, dat 'taaloverschrijdend plagiaat' wordt genoemd. Het herkennen van plagiaat bij teksten in verschillende talen is uitdagender dan het identificeren van plagiaat binnen een corpus dat in dezelfde taal is geschreven. Deze paper stelt een nieuwe techniek voor om Engels-Arabisch plagiaat detectie op zinsniveau te verbeteren. Deze techniek is gebaseerd op semantische en syntactische feature extractie met behulp van woordvolgorde, woord embedding en woord alignment met meertalige encoders. Deze functies, en hun combinatie met verschillende machine learning (ML) algoritmes, worden vervolgens gebruikt om de taak te helpen om zinnen te classificeren als geplagiaat of niet-geplagiaat. De voorgestelde aanpak is ingezet en beoordeeld met behulp van datasets gepresenteerd op SemEval-2017. Analyse van experimentele gegevens toont aan dat het gebruik van geëxtraheerde kenmerken en hun combinaties met verschillende ML classificatoren veelbelovende resultaten oplevert.", 'hr': 'Napredak mreže i informacione tehnologije doprinosio je brzom rastu digitalnih biblioteka i automatskih alata za prevod strojeva koji su lako prevodili tekste iz jednog jezika na drugi. Oni su povećali sadržaj dostupnog na različitim jezicima, što rezultira lako provesti prevedeni plagijazam, koji se naziva "transjezični plagijazam". Prepoznavanje plagijarizma među tekstima na različitim jezicima je izazovnije od identifikacije plagijarizma unutar korpusa napisanog na istom jeziku. Ovaj papir predlaže novu tehniku za poboljšanje otkrivanja engleskog-arapskog prejezika plagijarizma na razini rečenice. Ova tehnika je temeljena na ekstrakciji semantičkih i sintaktičkih funkcija koristeći riječni red, ugrađenje riječi i poravnanje riječi s višejezičkim koderima. Te karakteristike i njihova kombinacija s različitim algoritmima za učenje strojeva (ML), onda se koriste kako bi se pomoći zadatku klasifikacije rečenica kao plagizirane ili ne plagizirane. Predloženi pristup je raspoređen i procijenjen korištenjem podataka predstavljenih na semiEval-2017. Analiza eksperimentalnih podataka pokazuje da korištenje izvlačenih karakteristika i kombinacija s različitim klasifikatorima ML postiže obećavajući rezultati.', 'bg': 'Напредъкът на уеб и информационните технологии допринесе за бързия растеж на дигиталните библиотеки и инструментите за автоматичен машинен превод, които лесно превеждат текстове от един език на друг. Те увеличиха съдържанието, достъпно на различни езици, което води до лесно извършване на преведено плагиатство, което се нарича "междуезично плагиатство". Разпознаването на плагиатството сред текстовете на различни езици е по-трудно от идентифицирането на плагиатството в корпус, написан на един и същ език. Настоящата статия предлага нова техника за подобряване на откриването на плагиатство между английски и арабски език на ниво изречение. Тази техника се основава на семантично и синтактично извличане на функции чрез реда на думите, вграждане на думи и подравняване на думите с многоезични кодери. Тези функции и тяхната комбинация с различни алгоритми за машинно обучение (МЛ) се използват, за да се подпомогне задачата за класифициране на изреченията като плагиатизирани или неплагиатизирани. Предложеният подход е внедрен и оценен с помощта на набори от данни, представени на СемЕвал-2017. Анализът на експерименталните данни показва, че използването на извлечени характеристики и техните комбинации с различни класификатори постига обещаващи резултати.', 'da': 'Udviklingen af internettet og informationsteknologien har bidraget til den hurtige vækst af digitale biblioteker og automatiske maskinoversættelsesværktøjer, der nemt oversætter tekster fra et sprog til et andet. Disse har øget det indhold, der er tilgængeligt på forskellige sprog, hvilket resulterer i let udførelse af oversat plagiat, som kaldes "tværsprogsplogisk plagiat". Anerkendelse af plagiat blandt tekster på forskellige sprog er mere udfordrende end at identificere plagiat i et korpus skrevet på samme sprog. Denne artikel foreslår en ny teknik til at forbedre engelsk-arabisk tværsproget plagiatdetektion på sætningsniveau. Denne teknik er baseret på semantisk og syntaktisk funktionsudvinding ved hjælp af ordrækkefølge, ordindlejring og ordjustering med flersprogede kodere. Disse funktioner, og deres kombination med forskellige machine learning (ML) algoritmer, bruges derefter til at hjælpe med at klassificere sætninger som enten plagierede eller ikke-plagierede. Den foreslåede tilgang er blevet implementeret og vurderet ved hjælp af datasæt præsenteret på SemEval-2017. Analyse af eksperimentelle data viser, at udnyttelse af ekstraherede funktioner og deres kombinationer med forskellige ML klassificeringer opnår lovende resultater.', 'ko': "인터넷과 정보 기술의 발전은 디지털 도서관과 자동 기계 번역 도구의 신속한 발전을 추진했다. 이런 도구들은 텍스트를 한 언어에서 다른 언어로 쉽게 번역할 수 있다.이러한 것들은 서로 다른 언어의 내용 접근성을 증가시켜 번역 표절이 쉽게 발생하게 하여'다국어 표절'이라고 불린다.서로 다른 언어의 텍스트에서 표절을 식별하는 것은 같은 언어로 작성된 어료 라이브러리에서 표절을 식별하는 것보다 더욱 도전적이다.본고는 문장 차원에서 영어-아랍어의 다중 언어 표절 검측을 강화하는 신기술을 제시했다.이 기술은 어순, 단어 삽입과 다중 언어 인코더의 단어가 일치하는 의미와 문법 특징을 바탕으로 추출한다.이러한 특징과 서로 다른 기계학습(ML) 알고리즘과의 결합은 문장을 표절 또는 비표절로 분류하는 데 도움을 준다.제안된 방법은 SemEval-2017에서 제공한 데이터 세트를 사용하여 배포 및 평가되었습니다.실험 데이터에 대한 분석에 따르면 추출된 특징과 각종 ML분류기와의 조합을 이용하여 만족스러운 결과를 얻을 수 있다.", 'id': "Kemajuan teknologi web dan informasi telah berkontribusi kepada pertumbuhan cepat perpustakaan digital dan alat terjemahan mesin otomatis yang mudah menerjemahkan teks dari satu bahasa ke bahasa lain. Ini telah meningkatkan isi yang dapat diakses dalam bahasa yang berbeda, yang menyebabkan dengan mudah melakukan plagiarisme terjemahan, yang disebut sebagai 'plagiarisme salib bahasa'. Pengenalan plagiarisme diantara teks dalam bahasa yang berbeda adalah lebih menantang daripada mengidentifikasi plagiarisme dalam tubuh yang ditulis dalam bahasa yang sama. This paper proposes a new technique for enhancing English-Arabic cross-language plagiarism detection at the sentence level.  This technique is based on semantic and syntactic feature extraction using word order, word embedding and word alignment with multilingual encoders.  Those features, and their combination with different machine learning (ML) algorithms, are then used in order to aid the task of classifying sentences as either plagiarized or non-plagiarized.  The proposed approach has been deployed and assessed using datasets presented at SemEval-2017.  Analisi data percobaan menunjukkan bahwa menggunakan fitur ekstraksi dan kombinasi mereka dengan berbagai klasifikasi ML mencapai hasil yang berjanji.", 'sw': 'Maendeleo ya mtandao na teknolojia ya taarifa yamesababisha ukuaji wa haraka wa maktaba za kidijitali na zana za kutafsiri mashine za kibinafsiri ambazo kwa urahisi utafsiri ujumbe kutoka lugha moja hadi nyingine. Hizi imeongezeka maudhui yanayopatikana kwa lugha tofauti, ambayo yanasababisha kufanya vifaa vya kutafsiriwa kirahisi, ambavyo vinaelekezwa kama ‘mpango wa lugha za cross’…. Kutambua uanahabari kati ya maandishi katika lugha mbalimbali ni changamoto zaidi ya kutambua utaalam ndani ya makazi yaliyoandikwa kwa kwa lugha moja. Makala hii inapendekeza teknolojia mpya ya kuongeza uchunguzi wa ujasiri wa lugha za Kiingereza na Kiarabu katika kiwango cha hukumu. Kiteknolojia hiki kina msingi wa utekelezaji wa tamaduni na ushirikiano kwa kutumia amri ya maneno, maneno yanayotengenezwa na maneno yanayotengenezwa kwa lugha mbalimbali. Tamko hizo, na mchanganyiko wao na algorithi tofauti za kujifunza mashine (ML) hutumiwa ili kusaidia kazi ya kutangaza hukumu kama vile vinavyofanya vibaya au vinavyowekwa. Hatua hiyo ya pendekezo imetumiwa na kuchunguzwa kwa kutumia seti za data zilizowekwa kwenye SemEval-2017. Uchambuzi wa taarifa za majaribio unaonyesha kwamba kwa kutumia vipengele vilivyotolewa na miungano yao na wataalamu mbalimbali wa ML hufanikiwa matokeo yanayoahidi.', 'de': 'Die Weiterentwicklung der Web- und Informationstechnologie hat zum rasanten Wachstum digitaler Bibliotheken und automatischer maschineller Übersetzungswerkzeuge beigetragen, mit denen Texte leicht von einer Sprache in eine andere übersetzt werden können. Diese haben den Zugang zu Inhalten in verschiedenen Sprachen erhöht, was zu leicht übersetzten Plagiaten führt, die als "sprachübergreifendes Plagiat" bezeichnet werden. Die Erkennung von Plagiaten bei Texten in verschiedenen Sprachen ist schwieriger als die Identifizierung von Plagiaten innerhalb eines Korpus in derselben Sprache. In diesem Beitrag wird eine neue Technik zur Verbesserung der englisch-arabischen Plagiatserkennung auf Satzebene vorgeschlagen. Diese Technik basiert auf semantischer und syntaktischer Merkmalsextraktion mittels Wortreihenfolge, Worteinbettung und Wortausrichtung mit mehrsprachigen Encodern. Diese Funktionen und ihre Kombination mit verschiedenen Machine Learning (ML)-Algorithmen werden dann verwendet, um die Aufgabe zu unterstützen, Sätze entweder als plagiiert oder nicht plagiiert zu klassifizieren. Der vorgeschlagene Ansatz wurde unter Verwendung von Datensätzen, die auf der SemEval-2017 vorgestellt wurden, implementiert und bewertet. Die Analyse experimenteller Daten zeigt, dass die Verwendung extrahierter Merkmale und deren Kombinationen mit verschiedenen ML-Klassifikatoren vielversprechende Ergebnisse erzielt.', 'fa': 'پیشرفت تکنولوژی وب و اطلاعات به سرعت رشد کتابخانه\u200cهای دیجیتال و ابزارهای ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین خودکار کمک کرده است که به آسانی متن\u200cها از یک زبان به دیگر ترجمه می\u200cکند. اینها محتوای دسترسی به زبانهای مختلف افزایش داده اند، که به آسانی انجام دادن پیغام ترجمه را انجام می دهد، که به عنوان «پیغام\u200cپردازی\u200cهای مختلف زبان» نامیده می\u200cشوند. شناسایی plagiarism بین متن\u200cها در زبان\u200cهای مختلف سخت\u200cتر از شناسایی plagiarism در یک کورپوس نوشته شده در یک زبان است. این کاغذ یک تکنیک جدید برای افزایش شناسایی پراژیریسم انگلیسی-عربی در سطح جمله پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. این تکنیک بر اساس استخراج ویژه\u200cهای سیمانتیک و سنتاکتیک با استفاده از دستور کلمات، استخراج کردن کلمات و تنظیم کردن کلمات با رمزهای زیادی زبان است. این ویژگی ها، و ترکیب آنها با الگوریتم های یادگیری ماشین مختلف (ML) استفاده می\u200cکنند تا به کار کلاس کردن جمله\u200cها به عنوان پلژیاریز یا غیر پلژیاریز کمک کند. این روش پیشنهاد با استفاده از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها در نیم\u200cاول-۲۰۱۷ استفاده شده و ارزیابی شده است. تحلیل داده\u200cهای آزمایشی نشان می\u200cدهد که استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای خارج شده و ترکیب\u200cهایشان با مختلف راهنمایی ML به نتیجه\u200cهای قول می\u200cرسد.', 'sq': "Përparimi i internetit dhe teknologjisë së informacionit ka kontribuar në rritjen e shpejtë të bibliotekave dixhitale dhe mjeteve automatike të përkthimit të makinave që lehtësisht përkthyen tekstet nga një gjuhë në tjetrën. Këto kanë rritur përmbajtjen e mundshme në gjuhë të ndryshme, e cila rezulton në kryerjen e lehtë të plagiarisë të përkthyer, të cilat quhen 'plagiarisë ndërgjuhësore'. Njohja e plagiarismit midis teksteve në gjuhë të ndryshme është më e vështirë se identifikimi i plagiarismit brenda një trupi të shkruar në të njëjtën gjuhë. Ky dokument propozon një teknikë të re për përmirësimin e zbulimit të plagiarismit ndërgjuhësor anglo-arab në nivelin e dënimit. This technique is based on semantic and syntactic feature extraction using word order, word embedding and word alignment with multilingual encoders.  Those features, and their combination with different machine learning (ML) algorithms, are then used in order to aid the task of classifying sentences as either plagiarized or non-plagiarized.  Përqasja e propozuar është vendosur dhe vlerësuar duke përdorur të dhënat e paraqitura në SemEval-2017. Analiza e të dhënave eksperimentale tregon se përdorimi i karakteristikave të nxjerra dhe kombinimet e tyre me klasifikuesit e ndryshëm ML arrin rezultate premtuese.", 'tr': 'Web we maglumat tehnologiýasynyň gelişmegi digital kitaphaneleriň ýokarylygyna we awtomatik taýýarlama aletlerine kömekleyär. Bular başga dillerde elýeterli maksadyny artdyrdylar. Bu sebäbi olaryň terjime edilen plagiýarismi aňsatlyk bilen täzelikleýär. Farklı dillerde metinler arasynda plagiýarismini tanamak bir köpüde ýazylan plagiýarisini tanamakdan daha täsirli. Bu kagyz Iňlisçe-arabça çarp dillerden plagiýarism tanyşyny täze tekniki saýlaýar. Bu teknik semantik ve sintaktik özelliklere söz sıralamak, söz girişi ve multi dilli ködlemeler bilen tabanlıdır. Şu özellikler we olaryň farklı maşynyň öwrenmesi (ML) algoritmalary bilen birleşigi, sözleriň ýa plagiýaly ýa-da plagiýaly däldirilmegi üçin kömek etmek üçin ullanılýar. Taryh edilen ýagdaý çykyldy we çykyldy SemEval-2017-nji ýylda görkezilýän datasetlerden ullanýar. Deneysel maglumatlaryň analysi çykyş edilen çykyş özelliklerini we olaryň ML klasifikatçylary bilen birleşişmeleriniň söz berýän netijelerini ýeterleýär.', 'hy': 'Վեբ-ի և տեղեկատվական տեխնոլոգիաների զարգացումը նշանակում է թվային գրադարանների և ավտոմատիկ մեքենային թարգմանման գործիքների արագ աճը, որոնք հեշտությամբ թարգմանում են հաղորդագրությունները մեկ լեզվից մյու Սրանք բարձրացրել են տարբեր լեզուներում հասանելի պարունակությունը, ինչը հանգեցնում է հեշտությամբ թարգմանված պլագարիզմի արտահայտությանը, որը կոչվում է «լեզվի փոխանցող պլագարիզմ»: Տարբեր լեզվով գրված տեքստների միջև պլագարիզմի ճանաչելը ավելի դժվար է, քան պլագարիզմի ճանաչելը նույն լեզվով գրված մարմնի մեջ: Այս հոդվածը առաջարկում է նոր տեխնիկա անգլերեն-արաբական խաչլեզվի պլագարիզմի հայտնաբերման բարելավման համար նախադասության մակարդակում: Այս տեխնիկան հիմնված է սեմանտիկ և սինտակտիկ առանձնահատկությունների վերացման վրա՝ օգտագործելով բառերի կարգ, բառերի ներառումը և բառերի հավասարումը բազլեզու կոդավորների հետ: Այդ հատկությունները, և դրանց համադրումը տարբեր մեքենային ուսումնասիրության (ML) ալգորիթմների հետ, հետո օգտագործվում են նախադասությունների դասավորման որպես պլագարիզացված կամ ոչ պլագարիզացված խնդիրը: The proposed approach has been deployed and assessed using datasets presented at SemEval-2017.  Analysis of experimental data demonstrates that utilizing extracted features and their combinations with various ML classifiers achieves promising results.', 'bn': 'ওয়েব এবং তথ্য প্রযুক্তির উন্নতি ডিজিটাল লাইব্রেরীর দ্রুত বৃদ্ধি এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয় মেশিন অনুবাদ টুলের কাছে সাহায্য করেছে, যা এক ভাষ এগুলো বিভিন্ন ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষায় প্রবেশযোগ্য বিষয়বস্তু বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছে, যা সহজে অনুবাদ করা প্লাজিজিরিয়াম প্রদর্শন করেছে, যার বিভিন্ন ভাষায় লেখাগুলোর মধ্যে প্লেজিজমের স্বীকৃতি প্রদানের চ্যালেঞ্জারের চেয়ে বেশী চ্যালেঞ্জার। This paper proposes a new technique for enhancing English-Arabic cross-language plagiarism detection at the sentence level.  এই প্রযুক্তিটি সেমেন্টিক এবং সিন্ট্যাক্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিনিময়ে ভিত্তিক, শব্দ, বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক এবং বহুভাষায় এই বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং তাদের বিভিন্ন মেশিন শিক্ষার (এমএল) অ্যালগরিদমের সাথে যোগাযোগ, তারপর ব্যবহার করা হয় যাতে শ্রেণীর বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ক্ষেত্ প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি সেমইভাল-২০১৭-এ উপস্থিত তথ্য সেট ব্যবহার করে প্রস্তাবিত এবং মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে। পরীক্ষার তথ্য বিশ্লেষণ প্রদর্শন করে যে বিভিন্ন এমএল বিভিন্ন ক্লাসাইফারদের সাথে তাদের যুক্তি ব্যবহার করে প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল', 'am': 'የመረብ እና የመረጃ ቴክኖጂ ማድረግ ለጥፍ የዲጂተል መብረቦች እና የመረጃ ማተርጓም መሣሪያዎችን ለጥፍ አቀረበ፡፡ እነዚህ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች የሚጠቀሙትን ማድረግ ያበዛሉ፡፡ በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች ያሉ ጽሑፎችን የሚያውቀው ፕላጂፖርሲምን በመፍጠር በአንድ ቋንቋ ውስጥ የተጻፈውን የፕላጂፖስቲምን ከማሳወቅ በጣም አዋቂ ነው፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም የንግግሊዝና-አረቢያ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋን የፕላጂጂያ ግንኙነትን ለማበርታት አዲስ ስህተት ያሳያል፡፡ ይሄ ቴክኖክቲክ በአካባቢ ቋንቋ አቋራጭ እነዚህም ምርጫዎች እና በተለያዩ መሣሪያዎች ትምህርት (ML) መግለጫ እና ግንኙነታቸውን እንደተጨማሪው ወይም እንደተጨማሪው መግለጫ ማድረግ ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ The proposed approach has been deployed and assessed using datasets presented at SemEval-2017.  የፈተና ዳታዎችን መተላለፊያ የሚያሳየው የውጤት ምርጫዎች እና በተለያዩ ML ክፍተሮች ጋር ግንኙነታቸው የተስፋ ውጤቶች እንዲደርስ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'ńįnternet v…ô m…ôlumat teknolojisinin geliŇüm…ôsi, dijital kitablarńĪnńĪn v…ô maŇüńĪn √ßeviri vasit…ôl…ôrinin t…ôl…ôsirl…ônm…ôsin…ô s…ôb…ôb olaraq m…ôktublarńĪ bir dild…ôn baŇüqa dil…ô √ßevirir. Bunlar m√ľxt…ôlif dill…ôrd…ô el…ô faydalanabilir m…ôlumatlarńĪ artńĪrdńĪ ki, bu m…ôlumatlarńĪ kolayca √ßeviril…ôn plagiarismi olaraq "√ßox dil plagiarismi" olar. T…ôkc…ô dill…ôrd…ô yazńĪlmńĪŇü m…ôtnl…ôr arasńĪnda plagiarism tanńĪmasńĪ aynńĪ dild…ô yazńĪlmńĪŇü korpus i√ßind…ô plagiarismi tanńĪmadan daha √ß…ôtindir. Bu kańüńĪt c√ľml…ônin s…ôviyy…ôsind…ô ńįngiliz…ô-…ôr…ôb dill…ôrini √ßox-√ßox plagiarism keŇüfini artńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn yeni bir tekniki t…ôklif edir. Bu tehnika semantik v…ô sintaktik x√ľsusiyy…ôtl…ôrin √ßńĪxarmasńĪna dayanan s√∂z sńĪralarńĪ, s√∂zl…ôri i√ß…ôril…ôn v…ô s√∂zl…ôri √ßoxlu dil kodlayńĪcńĪlarńĪ il…ô birlikl…ôndirir. Bu x√ľsusiyy…ôtl…ôr v…ô m√ľxt…ôlif maŇüńĪn √∂yr…ônm…ôsi (ML) algoritmi il…ô birl…ôŇüdirilm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn, s√∂zl…ôri ya plagiarizl…ônmiŇü ya da plagiarizl…ônmiŇü olaraq d…ôst…ôkl…ônm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edilir. M…ôsl…ôh…ôt t…ôrzini semiEval-2017 t…ôr…ôfind…ô g√∂st…ôril…ôn veril…ôn qurńüular vasit…ôsil…ô istifad…ô edilmiŇüdir. M√ľxt…ôlif m…ôlumatlarńĪn analizi m√ľxt…ôlif ML klasifikat√ßńĪlarńĪ il…ô √ßńĪxarńĪlmńĪŇü f…ôaliyy…ôtl…ôri v…ô birlikl…ôri istifad…ô edilm…ôsini g√∂st…ôrir.', 'cs': 'Rozvoj webových a informačních technologií přispěl k rychlému růstu digitálních knihoven a nástrojů pro automatický strojový překlad, které snadno překládají texty z jednoho jazyka do druhého. Ty zvýšily obsah přístupný v různých jazycích, což vede k snadnému provedení přeloženého plagiátu, které se označují jako "plagiát mezi jazyky". Rozpoznání plagiátu mezi texty v různých jazycích je náročnější než identifikace plagiátu v korpusu psaném ve stejném jazyce. Tento článek navrhuje novou techniku pro zlepšení detekce anglicko-arabského plagiátu na úrovni věty. Tato technika je založena na extrakci sémantických a syntaktických funkcí pomocí pořadí slov, vložení slov a zarovnání slov s vícejazyčnými kodéry. Tyto vlastnosti a jejich kombinace s různými algoritmy strojového učení (ML) jsou pak použity, aby pomohly klasifikovat věty buď jako plagiátované, nebo ne-plagiátované. Navrhovaný přístup byl nasazen a hodnocen pomocí datových sad prezentovaných na SemEval-2017. Analýza experimentálních dat ukazuje, že využitím extrahovaných vlastností a jejich kombinací s různými klasifikátory ML dosahuje slibných výsledků.', 'et': 'Veebi ja infotehnoloogia areng on aidanud kaasa digitaalsete raamatukogude ja automaatse masintõlke tööriistade kiirele kasvule, mis hõlpsasti tõlkivad tekste ühest keelest teise. Need on suurendanud erinevates keeltes kättesaadavat sisu, mille tulemuseks on kergesti teostatav tõlgitud plagiaat, mida nimetatakse "keeleüleseks plagiaadiks". Plagiaadi tunnustamine erinevates keeltes tekstides on keerulisem kui plagiaadi tuvastamine samas keeles kirjutatud korpuses. Käesolevas töös pakutakse välja uus meetod inglise-araabia keeleülese plagiaadi tuvastamiseks karistuse tasemel. See tehnika põhineb semantilisel ja süntaktilisel funktsioonide ekstraheerimisel, kasutades sõna järjekorda, sõna manustamist ja sõna joondamist mitmekeelsete kodeerijatega. Neid funktsioone ja nende kombinatsiooni erinevate masinõppe algoritmidega kasutatakse seejärel, et aidata klassifitseerida lauseid kas plagiaeritud või mitteplagiaeritud lausetena. Kavandatud lähenemisviisi on rakendatud ja hinnatud SemEval-2017 andmekogumite abil. Katseandmete analüüs näitab, et ekstraheeritud funktsioonide ja nende kombinatsioonide kasutamine erinevate ML klassifitseerijatega annab paljulubavaid tulemusi.', 'bs': 'Napredak mreže i informacione tehnologije doprinosio je brzom rastu digitalnih biblioteka i automatskih alata za prevod mašina koji su lako prevodili tekste iz jednog jezika na drugi. Oni su povećali sadržaj pristupljiv na različitim jezicima, koji rezultira lako izvršavajući prevedeni plagijazam, koji se naziva "transjezički plagijazam". Prepoznavanje plagijarizma među tekstima na različitim jezicima je izazovnije nego identifikacija plagijarizma unutar korpusa napisanog na istom jeziku. Ovaj papir predlaže novu tehniku za unapređenje engleskog-arapskog krstojezičkog otkrića plagijarizma na razini rečenice. Ova tehnika je temeljena na ekstrakciji semantičkih i sintaktičkih karakteristika koristeći red riječi, ugrađenje riječi i poravnanje riječi sa mnogijezičkim koderima. Te karakteristike, i njihova kombinacija sa različitim algoritmima za učenje mašine (ML), onda se koristi kako bi pomoglo zadatku klasifikacije rečenica kao plagizirane ili ne plagizirane. Predloženi pristup je raspoređen i procijenjen korištenjem podataka predstavljenih na semiEval-2017. Analiza eksperimentalnih podataka pokazuje da korištenje izvlačenih karakteristika i njihovih kombinacija sa različitim klasifikatorima ML postiže obećavajući rezultati.', 'fi': 'Verkko- ja tietotekniikan kehitys on edistänyt digitaalisten kirjastojen ja automaattisten konekäännöstyökalujen nopeaa kasvua, jotka kääntävät tekstiä helposti kieleltä toiselle. Ne ovat lisänneet eri kielillä saatavaa sisältöä, mikä johtaa helposti käännettyyn plagiointiin, jota kutsutaan monikieliseksi plagiointiksi. Plagioinnin tunnistaminen eri kielillä teksteissä on haastavampaa kuin plagioinnin tunnistaminen samalla kielellä kirjoitetussa korpusessa. Tässä työssä ehdotetaan uutta tekniikkaa englannin ja arabian kielirajat ylittävän plagioinnin tunnistamiseksi lausetasolla. Tämä tekniikka perustuu semanttiseen ja syntaktiseen ominaisuuksien poimintaan käyttäen sanajärjestystä, sanaupotusta ja sanalinjausta monikielisillä koodereilla. Näitä ominaisuuksia ja niiden yhdistelmää erilaisten koneoppimisen algoritmien kanssa käytetään apuna lauseiden luokittelussa joko plagioiduiksi tai plagioimattomiksi. Ehdotettu lähestymistapa on otettu käyttöön ja arvioitu SemEval-2017:ssä esiteltyjen aineistojen avulla. Kokeellisen aineiston analyysi osoittaa, että poimittujen ominaisuuksien ja niiden yhdistelmien hyödyntäminen erilaisten ML-luokittelijoiden kanssa tuottaa lupaavia tuloksia.', 'ca': 'L\'avançament de la Web i la tecnologia de l\'informació ha contribuït al ràpid creixement de biblioteques digitals i eines de traducció automàtica que tradueixen els textos fàcilment d\'una llengua a l\'altra. Això ha augmentat el contingut accesible en diferents llengües, que resulta en un plagiarisme traduit fàcilment, anomenat "plagiarisme de llengües cruzades". Recognition of plagiarism among texts in different languages is more challenging than identifying plagiarism within a corpus written in the same language.  This paper proposes a new technique for enhancing English-Arabic cross-language plagiarism detection at the sentence level.  Aquesta tècnica es basa en l\'extracció semàntica i sinàctica de característiques utilitzant ordre de paraules, integració de paraules i alliniament de paraules amb codificadors multilingües. Aquestes característiques, i la seva combinació amb diferents algoritmes d\'aprenentatge màquinari (ML), s\'utilitzen per ajudar a classificar frases com plagiarises o no plagiarises. The proposed approach has been deployed and assessed using datasets presented at SemEval-2017.  L\'anàlisi de dades experimentals demostra que l\'ús de característiques extraites i les seves combinacions amb diversos classificadors ML aconsegueix resultats prometedors.', 'af': "Die vordering van die web en inligting teknologie het bygedra aan die vinnige groei van digitale biblioteeke en automatiese masjien vertaling nutsprogramme wat maklik teks van een taal na ander vertaling word. Hierdie het die inhoud wat toeganklik is in verskillende tale, verhoog, wat maklik uitvoer oorselde plagiarisme, wat verkondig word as 'kruistaal plagiarism'. Herkenning van plagiërisme onder teks in verskillende tale is meer pragtig as die identifiseer van plagiërisme binne 'n korpus wat in dieselfde taal geskryf is. Hierdie papier stel 'n nuwe tekniks voor te verbeter Engels-Arabiese kruistaal plagiërisme beskrywing op die setvlak. Hierdie tekniks is gebaseer op semantiese en sintaktieke funksie uitpakking met gebruik van woord volgorde, woord inbêring en woord oplyn met meerderlingse koders. Hierdie funksies, en hulle kombinasie met verskillende masjien leer (ML) algoritme, word dan gebruik om die taak van klassifisering van setinge te help as of plagiëriseerde of nie-plagiëriseerde. Die voorgestelde toegang is uitgebruik en verasseer deur die gebruik van datastelle wat op SemEval-2017 voorgestel is. Analisie van eksperimentele data vertoon dat die gebruik van uitgevoerde funksies en hulle kombinasies met verskeie ML klassifiseerders beloftende resultate bereik.", 'sk': 'Napredek spleta in informacijske tehnologije je prispeval k hitri rasti digitalnih knjižnic in orodij za avtomatsko strojno prevajanje, ki preprosto prevajajo besedila iz enega jezika v drugega. Ti so povečali dostopnost vsebine v različnih jezikih, kar omogoča enostavno izvajanje prevedenega plagiatorstva, ki se imenuje "medjezikovno plagiatorstvo". Priznavanje plagiata med besedili v različnih jezikih je težje kot prepoznavanje plagiata v korpusu, napisanem v istem jeziku. V prispevku je predlagana nova tehnika za izboljšanje odkrivanja plagiata med angleško-arabskimi jeziki na ravni kazni. Ta tehnika temelji na semantični in sintaktični ekstrakciji značilnosti z uporabo vrstnega reda besed, vdelave besed in poravnave besed z večjezičnimi kodirniki. Te funkcije in njihova kombinacija z različnimi algoritmi strojnega učenja se nato uporabljajo za pomoč pri razvrščanju stavkov kot plagiarjene ali neplagiarjene. Predlagani pristop je bil uveden in ocenjen z uporabo naborov podatkov, predstavljenih na seji SemEval-2017. Analiza eksperimentalnih podatkov kaže, da z uporabo ekstrahiranih funkcij in njihovih kombinacij z različnimi klasifikatorji ML dosežemo obetavne rezultate.', 'ha': "Babbatarwa wa intanet da technical information sun ƙara wa matuƙar wa littafan digitali da zanen fassarori masu kanana farat ɗaya da za'a tafsir matsayi daga wata harshe zuwa wani harshe. Haƙĩƙa, waɗannan sun ƙãra wanda za'a iya haɗa da shi cikin harshen daban-daban, mai yiwuwa ta fassarar da mai sauƙi a fassarar plagirism, da aka kama shi 'plagirism-sarar-language'... Ana ganin plagiti a cikin littattafai masu cikin harshe daban-daban, yana mafi shana ko kuwa a gane plagiti a cikin wata nau'in da aka rubũta shi da harshe. Wannan warafa yana bukãtar da wani technci na ƙara ganin-harshen Ingiriya-Larabci na fassarar-na'ura a cikin muhallin maganar. Wannan technci ne a kan salon da zaɓen ci na semantic and syntactic ke amfani da tsarin magana, mai shiga da kalma da masu daidaita da kode-na'ura masu baka. Wannan feature, da kuma komowarsu da aka sanar da algoritori masu cikin kwamfyutan (ML) daba, za'a yi amfani da su dõmin a taimake aikin mai rarraba azãba kamar an jarraba shi ko kuma ba'a plagiriɗa. An deploy wannan zaɓen aikin da aka ƙaddara shi da aka yi amfani da tsarin da aka bãyar da shi a SemEV-2017. Ana'anar data na jarrabi ya nuna cewa, ya yi amfani da wasu mistakarda da haɗuwarsu da darafõfin ML masu yi wa'adi da ake yi musu alkawari.", 'jv': 'Awas awak dhéwé sistem web lan informasi teknôlogi sing nyebutaké bantuan ing nggawe dolanan ciptaaken Digitêl lan alat sing itoleh bantuan sistem sing sampeyan sampeyan kanggo sampeyan urip sing sampeyan sampeyan. Puwedhakan iki lak bantuan ingkang dianggap barêng-barêng, sing bakal sedhaya gampang kanggo tukang nggambar kapan pangan. Rasané Plastik sing dipun nggambar texting ing ing sak dilané, kuwi nggawé luwih apik sing katêpakan karo koyok sinau winih ning sabên langga kuwi. Perintah iki supoyata sistem anyar kanggo nggawe ngubah ingkang-arap kuwi pawaran pangalan kelas. Bu teknik temel sistem semanti ve sinaksi perusahaan extraksyon kelime ardesi, word embedding ve word alignment cun multilanguage koder. Punika-Punika sing karo akeh gampang karo Algorithm sing gak nggambar kelas (ML) iki, dadi iso nggawe ngubah bantuan kanggo kelas nggo Kemerdekaan kapan kelas Nejer Ndeleksyon karo data sing beraksi dipontrolan kuwi nggambar kelas extract karo konbinksi karo akeh basa gambaran ML sing bisa basa sing ngwalikno dadi.', 'he': 'התקדמות של רשת וטכנולוגיה מידע תורמה לגידול מהיר של ספריות דיגיטליות וכלי התרגום מכונות אוטומטיים אלה הגבירו את התוכן הגיוני בשפות שונות, מה שמוביל ביצוע בקלות פלג\'יאריזם מתרגם, שנקרא "פלג\'יאריזם בין שפות". זיהוי פלגיאריות בין טקסטים בשפות שונות הוא מאתגר יותר מאשר זיהוי פלגיאריות בתוך קורפוס כתוב באותה שפה. העיתון הזה מציע טכניקה חדשה לשפר את זיהוי הפלגיאריזם בשפה הצלבית אנגלית-ערבית ברמה המשפט. הטכניקה הזו מבוססת על חיפוש תכונות סמנטיות וסינטקטיקות באמצעות סדר מילים, קישום מילים ומתאים מילים עם קודנים רבים שפותיים. המאפיינים האלה, והשילוב שלהם עם אלגוריתמים שונים של למידת מכונות (ML), משתמשים לאחר מכן כדי לעזור למשימה להקליף משפטים כאלו מפלגיאריזם או לא מפלגיאריזמים. הגישה המוצעת הופעלה והערכה באמצעות קבוצות נתונים שנמצאו בסימוול-2017. ניתוח הנתונים הניסיוניים מראה שהשימוש בתוכניות מווצאות והשילובים שלהם עם מסגרי ML שונים משיגים תוצאות מבטיחות.', 'bo': 'The advancement of the web and information technology has contributed to the rapid growth of digital libraries and automatic machine translation tools which easily translate texts from one language to another. འདི་དག་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་མ་འདྲ་ཞིག་གིས་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་རུང་བའི་ནང་དོན་དག་མངོན་ཕར་ཐོགས་བྱས་ཡོད། སྐད་རིགས་མ་འདྲ་བའི་ཐ་ཡིག་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་རྟོགས་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་གཅིག་ནང་བྲིས་པའི་མིང་ཁང་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་ཨ་རིའི་སྐོར་ལས་བརྗོད་རྗེས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྔར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། This technique is based on semantic and syntactic feature extraction using word order, word embedding and word alignment with multilingual encoders. རང་ཉིད་སྟངས་འདི་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཉམ་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་སྒྲིག་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་བ་ནི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དེ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་བཏང་ཚར་བ་དང་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་SemEval-2017 དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Enriching the Transformer with Linguistic Factors for Low-Resource Machine Translation', 'es': 'Enriquecimiento del transformador con factores lingüísticos para la traducción automática de bajos recursos', 'ar': 'إثراء المحول بالعوامل اللغوية للترجمة الآلية منخفضة الموارد', 'pt': 'Enriquecendo o transformador com fatores linguísticos para tradução automática de poucos recursos', 'fr': 'Enrichir le transformateur avec des facteurs linguistiques pour une traduction automatique à faibles ressources', 'ja': '低資源機械翻訳のための言語的要因を備えたトランスフォーマーの充実', 'hi': 'कम संसाधन मशीन अनुवाद के लिए भाषाई कारकों के साथ ट्रांसफॉर्मर को समृद्ध करना', 'ru': 'Обогащение трансформатора лингвистическими факторами для малоресурсного машинного перевода', 'zh': '语言素富转换器,资源匮机器翻译', 'ga': 'An Claochladán a Shaibhriú le Tosca Teangeolaíochta d’Aistriúchán Meaisín ar Acmhainn Íseal', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A transzformátor gazdagítása nyelvi tényezőkkel az alacsony erőforrású gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Εμπλουτισμός του μετασχηματιστή με γλωσσικούς παράγοντες για μηχανική μετάφραση χαμηλού πόρων', 'it': 'Arricchire il trasformatore con fattori linguistici per la traduzione automatica a basso costo', 'lt': 'Enriching the Transformer with Linguistic Factors for Low-Resource Machine Translation', 'mk': 'Enriching the Transformer with Linguistic Factors for Low-Resource Machine Translation', 'kk': 'Төменгі ресурс машинаның аудару үшін лингвистикалық факторлармен түрлендірушісін жақсарту', 'ms': 'Menkaya Penukar dengan Faktor Bahasa untuk Terjemahan Mesin Sumber Terrendah', 'mt': 'L-arrikkiment tat-Trasformatur b’Fatturi Lingwistiċi għat-Traduzzjoni ta’ Makkinarju b’Riżorsi Bażi', 'ml': 'ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ഫാക്ടറുകളുമായി ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dണര്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mn': 'Бага боловсруулагч машины хөрөнгө оруулах Linguistic факторуудыг багасгах', 'no': 'Forstørrar transformeringa med linguistiske faktorer for omsetjing av lavressursmaskinen', 'sr': 'Побогаћавање трансформатора са лингвистичним факторима за превезу машине нишких ресурсова', 'pl': 'Wzbogacenie transformatora o czynniki językowe dla tłumaczenia maszynowego o niskie zasoby', 'ro': 'Îmbogățirea transformatorului cu factori lingvistici pentru traducerea automată cu resurse reduse', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Enricing the Transformer with Linguistic Factors for Low-Resource Machine Translation', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Berika transformatorn med språkliga faktorer för maskinöversättning med låg resurs', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Làm giàu bộ biến hình bằng các yếu tố ngôn ngữ cho việc dịch cơ bản thấp', 'bg': 'Обогатяване на трансформатора с лингвистични фактори за машинен превод с ниски ресурси', 'nl': 'De transformator verrijken met taalkundige factoren voor machinevertaling met weinig middelen', 'da': 'Berige transformatoren med sproglige faktorer til maskinoversættelse med lav ressource', 'hr': 'Objačavanje transformera sa lingwiskim faktorima za prevod mašine niskih resursa', 'id': 'Menkaya Transformer dengan Faktor Bahasa untuk Translation mesin sumber rendah', 'ko': '언어 요소 풍부한 변환기로 저자원 번역 실현', 'fa': 'افزایش تغییردهنده با فکتورهای لینگ\u200cگیستیک برای ترجمه ماشین کم منبع', 'de': 'Anreicherung des Transformators mit linguistischen Faktoren für ressourcenschonende maschinelle Übersetzung', 'tr': 'Täze Ressurat Mazmunlar üçin Hat Ressurat Faýllary bilen Gürjüdleme', 'sw': 'Kuwezesha Tafsiri kwa Mashindano ya Kilinguistic kwa Tafsiri', 'af': 'Verrichting van die Transformeerder met Linguistiese Faktors vir Lae- Hulpbron Masjien Vertaling', 'sq': 'Duke pasur transformuesin me faktorë gjuhësor për përkthimin e makinës me burime të ulta', 'am': 'Enriching the Transformer with Linguistic Factors for Low-Resource Machine Translation', 'hy': 'Enriching the Transformer with Linguistic Factors for Low-Resource Machine Translation', 'az': 'Aşağı-Ressours Makinelərin Tərcümlənməsi üçün Linguistik Faktorları ilə Tərcümləyici Zənginləşdiriləcək', 'bs': 'Objačavanje transformera sa lingwiskim faktorima za prevod mašine niskih resursa', 'bn': 'নিম্ন- সম্পদ মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য লিঙ্গিস্টিক ফ্যাক্টর দ্বারা ট্রান্সফ্রান্সফার্ন করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Enriquejant el Transformer amb Factors Lingüístics per traducció de màquines de baix recursos', 'cs': 'Obohacení transformátoru o jazykové faktory pro strojový překlad s nízkými zdroji', 'et': 'Transformeri rikastamine keeleliste faktoritega vähese ressursiga masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Muuntajan rikastuttaminen kielellisillä tekijöillä vähäisen resurssin konekääntämiseen', 'jv': 'Jejaring', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'העשיר של המעבר עם גורמים לינגוליים לתרגום מכונת משאבים נמוכים', 'sk': 'Obogatitev transformatorja z jezikovnimi dejavniki za strojno prevajanje z nizkimi viri', 'bo': 'རྨས་གཞུང་བའི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བའི་ཚད་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་དབྱིབས་གཏོང་བ'}
{'en': 'Introducing factors, that is to say, word features such as linguistic information referring to the source tokens, is known to improve the results of neural machine translation systems in certain settings, typically in recurrent architectures. This study proposes enhancing the current state-of-the-art neural machine translation architecture, the Transformer, so that it allows to introduce external knowledge. In particular, our proposed modification, the Factored Transformer, uses linguistic factors that insert additional knowledge into the machine translation system. Apart from using different kinds of features, we study the effect of different architectural configurations. Specifically, we analyze the performance of combining words and features at the embedding level or at the encoder level, and we experiment with two different combination strategies. With the best-found configuration, we show improvements of 0.8 BLEU over the baseline Transformer in the IWSLT German-to-English task. Moreover, we experiment with the more challenging FLoRes English-to-Nepali benchmark, which includes both extremely low-resourced and very distant languages, and obtain an improvement of 1.2 BLEU', 'ar': 'من المعروف أن إدخال العوامل ، أي ميزات الكلمات مثل المعلومات اللغوية التي تشير إلى الرموز المميزة للمصدر ، تعمل على تحسين نتائج أنظمة الترجمة الآلية العصبية في إعدادات معينة ، عادةً في البنى المتكررة. تقترح هذه الدراسة تعزيز بنية الترجمة الآلية العصبية الحديثة ، وهي Transformer ، بحيث تسمح بتقديم المعرفة الخارجية. على وجه الخصوص ، يستخدم تعديلنا المقترح ، المحول العامل ، عوامل لغوية تُدخل معرفة إضافية في نظام الترجمة الآلية. بصرف النظر عن استخدام أنواع مختلفة من الميزات ، ندرس تأثير التكوينات المعمارية المختلفة. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم بتحليل أداء دمج الكلمات والميزات على مستوى التضمين أو على مستوى المشفر ، ونقوم بتجربة استراتيجيتين مختلفتين للجمع. مع أفضل تكوين تم العثور عليه ، نعرض تحسينات قدرها 0.8 BLEU على المحول الأساسي في مهمة IWSLT من الألمانية إلى الإنجليزية. علاوة على ذلك ، نجرب مع معيار FLoRes من الإنجليزية إلى النيبالية الأكثر تحديًا ، والذي يتضمن كلاً من اللغات منخفضة الموارد للغاية واللغات البعيدة جدًا ، وحصلنا على تحسين 1.2 BLEU', 'es': 'Se sabe que la introducción de factores, es decir, características de palabras como la información lingüística que hace referencia a los tokens fuente, mejora los resultados de los sistemas de traducción automática neuronal en ciertos entornos, normalmente en arquitecturas recurrentes. Este estudio propone mejorar la arquitectura actual de traducción automática neuronal de última generación, el Transformer, para que permita introducir conocimiento externo. En particular, nuestra modificación propuesta, el transformador factorizado, utiliza factores lingüísticos que insertan conocimientos adicionales en el sistema de traducción automática. Además de utilizar diferentes tipos de características, estudiamos el efecto de las diferentes configuraciones arquitectónicas. Específicamente, analizamos el rendimiento de combinar palabras y características en el nivel de incrustación o en el nivel del codificador, y experimentamos con dos estrategias de combinación diferentes. Con la configuración mejor encontrada, mostramos mejoras de 0.8 BLEU sobre el Transformer de referencia en la tarea IWSLT de alemán a inglés. Además, experimentamos con el punto de referencia más desafiante de inglés a nepalí de Flores, que incluye idiomas muy lejanos y de recursos extremadamente bajos, y obtenemos una mejora de 1.2 BLEU', 'pt': 'A introdução de fatores, ou seja, recursos de palavras, como informações linguísticas referentes aos tokens de origem, é conhecido por melhorar os resultados de sistemas de tradução automática neural em determinadas configurações, normalmente em arquiteturas recorrentes. Este estudo propõe aprimorar a atual arquitetura de tradução automática neural de última geração, o Transformer, de modo que permita introduzir conhecimento externo. Em particular, nossa modificação proposta, o Factored Transformer, usa fatores linguísticos que inserem conhecimento adicional no sistema de tradução automática. Além de usar diferentes tipos de recursos, estudamos o efeito de diferentes configurações arquitetônicas. Especificamente, analisamos o desempenho da combinação de palavras e recursos no nível de incorporação ou no nível do codificador e experimentamos duas estratégias de combinação diferentes. Com a configuração mais bem encontrada, mostramos melhorias de 0,8 BLEU em relação ao Transformer de linha de base na tarefa IWSLT de alemão para inglês. Além disso, experimentamos o benchmark FLoRes de inglês para nepalês, mais desafiador, que inclui idiomas com recursos extremamente baixos e muito distantes, e obtemos uma melhoria de 1,2 BLEU', 'fr': "L'introduction de facteurs, c'est-à-dire des caractéristiques de mots telles que des informations linguistiques faisant référence aux jetons sources, est connue pour améliorer les résultats des systèmes de traduction automatique neuronale dans certains environnements, généralement dans des architectures récurrentes. Cette étude propose d'améliorer l'architecture actuelle de traduction automatique neuronale de pointe, le Transformer, afin qu'elle permette d'introduire des connaissances externes. En particulier, la modification que nous proposons, le Factored Transformer, utilise des facteurs linguistiques qui introduisent des connaissances supplémentaires dans le système de traduction automatique. Outre l'utilisation de différents types de fonctionnalités, nous étudions l'effet de différentes configurations architecturales. Plus précisément, nous analysons les performances de combinaison de mots et de caractéristiques au niveau de l'intégration ou au niveau de l'encodeur, et nous expérimentons deux stratégies de combinaison différentes. Avec la meilleure configuration trouvée, nous montrons des améliorations de 0,8 BLEU par rapport au transformateur de base dans la tâche allemand-anglais IWSLT. De plus, nous expérimentons le benchmark anglais vers népalais de FlorES, plus difficile, qui inclut à la fois des langues extrêmement peu ressources et des langues très éloignées, et obtenons une amélioration de 1,2 UEBL", 'ja': '要因、すなわち、ソーストークンを参照する言語情報などの単語機能を導入することは、特定の設定、典型的には反復アーキテクチャにおけるニューラル機械翻訳システムの結果を改善することが知られている。 この研究では、外部知識を導入できるように、現在の最先端のニューラル機械翻訳アーキテクチャであるトランスフォーマーを強化することを提案しています。 特に、提案されている修正であるFactored Transformerは、追加の知識を機械翻訳システムに挿入する言語的要因を使用しています。 さまざまな種類の機能を使用することとは別に、さまざまな建築構成の効果を研究しています。 具体的には、埋め込みレベルまたはエンコーダレベルでの単語と機能の組み合わせのパフォーマンスを分析し、2つの異なる組み合わせ戦略を実験します。 最適な構成により、IWSLTドイツ語から英語へのタスクでは、ベースラインのトランスフォーマーよりも0.8 BLEUの改善が見られます。 さらに、極めて低いリソースと非常に遠い言語の両方を含む、より困難なFLoRes英語からネパール語へのベンチマークを実験し、1.2 BLEUの改善を得ました。', 'hi': 'कारकों का परिचय देना, अर्थात्, स्रोत टोकन का उल्लेख करते हुए भाषाई जानकारी जैसी शब्द विशेषताएं, कुछ सेटिंग्स में तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद प्रणालियों के परिणामों में सुधार करने के लिए जानी जाती हैं, आमतौर पर आवर्तक आर्किटेक्चर में। यह अध्ययन वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद वास्तुकला, ट्रांसफॉर्मर को बढ़ाने का प्रस्ताव करता है, ताकि यह बाहरी ज्ञान को पेश करने की अनुमति दे सके। विशेष रूप से, हमारे प्रस्तावित संशोधन, फैक्टर्ड ट्रांसफॉर्मर, भाषाई कारकों का उपयोग करता है जो मशीन अनुवाद प्रणाली में अतिरिक्त ज्ञान डालते हैं। विभिन्न प्रकार की विशेषताओं का उपयोग करने के अलावा, हम विभिन्न वास्तुशिल्प विन्यास के प्रभाव का अध्ययन करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम एम्बेडिंग स्तर पर या एन्कोडर स्तर पर शब्दों और सुविधाओं के संयोजन के प्रदर्शन का विश्लेषण करते हैं, और हम दो अलग-अलग संयोजन रणनीतियों के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं। सबसे अच्छा पाया विन्यास के साथ, हम IWSLT जर्मन-से-अंग्रेजी कार्य में आधार रेखा ट्रांसफार्मर पर 0.8 BLEU के सुधार दिखाते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम अधिक चुनौतीपूर्ण FLoRes अंग्रेजी-से-नेपाली बेंचमार्क के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं, जिसमें बेहद कम संसाधन वाली और बहुत दूर की भाषाएं शामिल हैं, और 1.2 BLEU का सुधार प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'zh': '引入因素,即单词特征,如引源标记语息,已知可于某处设置(常于循环架构中)改善神经机器翻译系统也。 本议增先进之神经机器翻译架构Transformer,以许引入外知。 特为改定,因子转换器,用语言因素,插额外知识于机器翻译统中。 非用异类之外,究其异架构也。 具体来说,论嵌编码器之单词,试二策焉。 用至善,显于 IWSLT 德语英语比基线 Transformer 崇 0.8 BLEU。 试更具挑战性FLoRes英语尼泊尔语基准,资源绝远,并获1.2 BLEU', 'ru': 'Внедряющие факторы, то есть особенности слова, такие как лингвистическая информация, относящаяся к токенам источника, как известно, улучшают результаты систем нейронного машинного перевода в определенных условиях, обычно в повторяющихся архитектурах. Данное исследование предлагает усовершенствовать современную архитектуру нейронного машинного перевода, Трансформатор, чтобы она позволяла внедрять внешние знания. В частности, наша предлагаемая модификация, Факторированный трансформатор, использует лингвистические факторы, которые вставляют дополнительные знания в систему машинного перевода. Помимо использования различных видов функций, мы изучаем влияние различных архитектурных конфигураций. В частности, мы анализируем производительность объединения слов и признаков на уровне встраивания или на уровне кодера и экспериментируем с двумя разными комбинационными стратегиями. С оптимальной конфигурацией мы демонстрируем улучшения на 0,8 BLEU по сравнению с базовым трансформатором в задаче IWSLT с немецкого на английский. Более того, мы экспериментируем с более сложным эталоном FLoRes English-to-Nepali, который включает в себя как чрезвычайно малоресурсные, так и очень отдаленные языки, и получаем улучшение на 1,2 БЛЮ', 'ga': 'Is eol go gcuireann fachtóirí a thabhairt isteach, is é sin le rá, gnéithe focal mar fhaisnéis theangeolaíoch a thagraíonn do na comharthaí foinse, feabhas ar thorthaí na gcóras néar-aistriúcháin meaisín i suíomhanna áirithe, go hiondúil in ailtireachtaí athfhillteacha. Molann an staidéar seo feabhas a chur ar an ailtireacht nua-aimseartha aistriúcháin meaisín néaraigh, an Trasfhoirmeoir, ionas gur féidir eolas seachtrach a thabhairt isteach. Go háirithe, úsáideann ár modhnú molta, an Claochladán Fachtóirí, fachtóirí teangeolaíochta a chuireann eolas breise isteach sa chóras aistriúcháin meaisín. Seachas cineálacha éagsúla gnéithe a úsáid, déanaimid staidéar ar éifeacht na bhfoirmíochtaí ailtireachta éagsúla. Go sonrach, déanaimid anailís ar fheidhmíocht focail agus gnéithe a chomhcheangal ag an leibhéal leabaithe nó ag leibhéal an ionchódóra, agus déanaimid tástáil le dhá straitéis teaglaim éagsúla. Leis an gcumraíocht is fearr aimsithe, léirímid feabhsuithe de 0.8 BLEU thar an gClaochladán bunlíne sa tasc Gearmáinis-go-Béarla IWSLT. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid tástáil ar thagarmharc níos dúshlánaí FLores Béarla-go-Neipealais, lena n-áirítear teangacha an-íseal agus an-i bhfad i gcéin, agus faighimid feabhas de 1.2 BLEU', 'ka': 'სიტყვების ინფორმაციები, როგორც სიტყვების ინფორმაცია, როგორც სიტყვების ინფორმაცია, როგორც სიტყვების ინფორმაცია, იცილებიან, რომ ნეიროლური მაქსინური განგორმაციის სისტემის წარმოდგენების გა ამ სწავლის შესაძლებელია მიმდინარე სიტყვების ნეიროლური მანქანის გარგუმარების აქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიკის გაუქმება, რადგან ის შესაძლებელია გარეშე ცნობილების გა განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენი შესაძლებელი შეცვლა, ტარნფორმაციული ტრანფორმაციის გამოყენება ლენგურისტიკური ფექტურები, რომლებიც მაქსინური შეცვლის სისტემიში და განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებულებების გამოყენება დამატებით, ჩვენ განსხვავებული არქექტიკური კონფიგურაციების ეფექტის შესწავლობთ. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ ვაანალიზებთ სიტყვების და ფუნქციების შეერთება სიტყვების და ფუნქციების განსაკუთრებული დონეში ან კოდირების დონეში და ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებ საუკეთესო კონფიგურაციაზე, ჩვენ 0.8 BLEU-ის უკეთესოების შესაძლებლობა ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ IWSLT გერმანური-ანგლისური დავალებაში. დამატებით, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტებით უფრო შესაძლებელია FLoRes English-to-Nepali-benchmark, რომელიც საკუთარ ძალიან მარტივი რესურსურსი და ძალიან განმავლობელი ენები აქვს, და მივიღებთ 1.2 BLEU-ის შესაძ', 'hu': 'Az olyan tényezők bevezetése, vagyis a szó jellemzői, mint például a forrás tokenekre vonatkozó nyelvi információ, ismert, hogy javítják az idegi gépi fordító rendszerek eredményeit bizonyos körülmények között, jellemzően visszatérő architektúrákban. Ez a tanulmány javasolja a jelenlegi korszerű neurális gépi fordítási architektúra, a Transformer fejlesztését, hogy lehetővé tegye a külső ismeretek bevezetését. Különösen a javasolt módosításunk, a faktorozott transzformátor nyelvi tényezőket használ, amelyek további ismereteket helyeznek be a gépi fordítási rendszerbe. A különböző funkciók használata mellett különböző építészeti konfigurációk hatását vizsgáljuk. Konkrétan elemezzük a szavak és funkciók kombinációjának teljesítményét beágyazási szinten vagy kódoló szinten, és két különböző kombinációs stratégiával kísérletezünk. A legjobban megtalált konfigurációval az IWSLT német-angol feladatban 0,8 BLEU javulást mutatunk az alapvető transzformátorhoz képest. Ezenkívül kísérletezünk a kihívást jelentő FLoRes angol-nepáli referenciaértékkel, amely mind rendkívül alacsony forrású, mind nagyon távoli nyelveket tartalmaz, és 1.2 BLEU javulást érünk el.', 'el': 'Οι εισαγωγικοί παράγοντες, δηλαδή τα χαρακτηριστικά λέξεων όπως οι γλωσσικές πληροφορίες που αναφέρονται στα σήματα προέλευσης, είναι γνωστό ότι βελτιώνουν τα αποτελέσματα των νευρωνικών συστημάτων μηχανικής μετάφρασης σε ορισμένες ρυθμίσεις, συνήθως σε επαναλαμβανόμενες αρχιτεκτονικές. Η παρούσα μελέτη προτείνει την ενίσχυση της σύγχρονης αρχιτεκτονικής νευρολογικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης, του μετασχηματιστή, έτσι ώστε να επιτρέπει την εισαγωγή εξωτερικής γνώσης. Ειδικότερα, η προτεινόμενη τροποποίηση, ο Παράγοντας Μετασχηματιστής, χρησιμοποιεί γλωσσικούς παράγοντες που εισάγουν επιπλέον γνώσεις στο σύστημα μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Εκτός από τη χρήση διαφορετικών ειδών χαρακτηριστικών, μελετάμε την επίδραση των διαφορετικών αρχιτεκτονικών διαμορφώσεων. Συγκεκριμένα, αναλύουμε την απόδοση του συνδυασμού λέξεων και χαρακτηριστικών στο επίπεδο ενσωμάτωσης ή στο επίπεδο κωδικοποιητή και πειραματιζόμαστε με δύο διαφορετικές στρατηγικές συνδυασμού. Με την καλύτερη διαμόρφωση, παρουσιάζουμε βελτιώσεις του 0.8 σε σχέση με τον μετασχηματιστή βάσης στην εργασία Γερμανικά-Αγγλικά. Επιπλέον, πειραματιζόμαστε με το πιο απαιτητικό σημείο αναφοράς που περιλαμβάνει τόσο τις εξαιρετικά χαμηλές πηγές όσο και τις πολύ μακρινές γλώσσες, και επιτυγχάνουμε μια βελτίωση του 1.2 BLEU', 'kk': 'Мысалы, лингвистикалық мәліметтер, көзінің белгілеріне қатынайтын мәліметтерінің нәтижесін, невралдық машинаны аудару жүйелерінің нәтижесін кейбір параметрлерде жасау үшін, әдетте қайталанатын архитектуралард Бұл зерттеу назардағы невралдық компьютердің аудару архитектурасын түрлендіру үшін, сыртқы білімдерді таңдауға мүмкіндік береді. Мысалы, біздің түрлендіріміз, Факторияланған түрлендірушіміз, машина аудару жүйесіне қосымша мәліметтерді ендіретін лингвистикалық факторларды қолданады. Бірнеше түрлі мүмкіндіктерді қолданудан басқа архитектуралық баптаулардың эффектін зерттейміз. Сіз сөздер мен мүмкіндіктерді ендіру деңгейінде немесе кодтардың деңгейінде біріктіру жұмысын анализирамыз. Біз екі түрлі біріктіру стратегияларына тәжірибе жасаймыз. Ең жақсы баптаулармен, IWSLT немецке-ағылшын тапсырмасындағы негізгі түрлендіруші үшін 0,8 BLEU жақсартуларын көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, біз ағылшын тілінен непали тілдерінің ағылшын тілдеріне жақсы көмектесу үшін тәжірибеледік, бұл жерде жеткілікті, жеткілікті және жеткілікті тілдерді қолданып, 1,2 BLEU жаса', 'mk': 'Внесувањето фактори, што значи, зборни карактеристики како што се лингвистичките информации кои се однесуваат на изворните знаци, се познати дека ги подобруваат резултатите на невралните машински преведувачки системи во одредени поставувања, обично во рецидентните архитектури. Оваа студија предлага подобрување на актуелната најнова архитектура за превод на невропските машини, Трансформерот, за да овозможи воведување на надворешно знаење. In particular, our proposed modification, the Factored Transformer, uses linguistic factors that insert additional knowledge into the machine translation system.  Apart from using different kinds of features, we study the effect of different architectural configurations.  Специфично, ја анализираме резултатот на комбинацијата на зборови и карактеристики на ниво на вградување или на ниво на кодер, и експериментираме со две различни комбинации стратегии. Со најдобрата конфигурација, покажуваме подобрувања од 0,8 БЛЕ во однос на основниот трансформ во IWSLT германско-англиската задача. Покрај тоа, експериментираме со поголемиот предизвик на Флорес англиско-непалски референс, кој вклучува и екстремно ниски ресурси и многу далечни јазици, и добиваме подобрување од 1,2 БЛЕ', 'it': "Introdurre fattori, cioè caratteristiche di parole come le informazioni linguistiche riferite ai token sorgente, è noto per migliorare i risultati dei sistemi di traduzione automatica neurale in determinate impostazioni, tipicamente in architetture ricorrenti. Questo studio propone di migliorare l'attuale architettura di traduzione automatica neurale, il Transformer, in modo da consentire di introdurre conoscenze esterne. In particolare, la nostra proposta di modifica, il Factored Transformer, utilizza fattori linguistici che inseriscono ulteriori conoscenze nel sistema di traduzione automatica. Oltre ad utilizzare diversi tipi di funzionalità, studiamo l'effetto di diverse configurazioni architettoniche. Nello specifico, analizziamo le prestazioni della combinazione di parole e funzionalità a livello di embedding o a livello di encoder e sperimentiamo due diverse strategie di combinazione. Con la configurazione migliore, mostriamo miglioramenti di 0,8 BLEU rispetto al Transformer di base nel compito IWSLT tedesco-inglese. Inoltre, sperimentiamo con il benchmark FLoRes dall'inglese al nepalese più impegnativo, che include sia lingue estremamente a basso contenuto di risorse che lingue molto lontane, ottenendo un miglioramento di 1.2 BLEU", 'lt': 'Introducing factors, that is to say, word features such as linguistic information referring to the source tokens, is known to improve the results of neural machine translation systems in certain settings, typically in recurrent architectures.  Šiame tyrime siūloma patobulinti dabartinę naujausią nervinių mašinų vertimo architektūrą „Transformer“, kad būtų galima įdiegti išorines žinias. Visų pirma mūsų siūlomas pakeitimas, Faktorizuotas transformatorius, naudoja kalbinius veiksnius, kurie įtraukia papildomas žinias į mašinų vertimo sistemą. Be skirtingų savybių, mes tiriame skirtingų architektūrinių konfigūracijų poveikį. Konkrečiai mes analizuojame žodžių ir savybių derinimo rezultatus įterpimo lygiu arba kodavimo lygiu ir eksperimentuojame su dviem skirtingomis derinimo strategijomis. With the best-found configuration, we show improvements of 0.8 BLEU over the baseline Transformer in the IWSLT German-to-English task.  Be to, eksperimentuojame su sunkesniu FLoRes anglų ir Nepalo lyginamuoju rodikliu, kuris apima ir itin mažus išteklius, ir labai tolimas kalbas, ir siekiame pagerinti 1,2 BLEU', 'ms': 'Memperkenalkan faktor, iaitu, ciri perkataan seperti maklumat bahasa yang merujuk kepada token sumber, diketahui untuk meningkatkan keputusan sistem terjemahan mesin saraf dalam tetapan tertentu, biasanya dalam arkitektur berulang. Ujian ini melaporkan meningkatkan arkitektur terjemahan mesin saraf semasa, Transformer, supaya ia membolehkan memperkenalkan pengetahuan luaran. Secara khususnya, perubahan yang kami cadangkan, Transformer Faktor, menggunakan faktor bahasa yang memasukkan pengetahuan tambahan ke dalam sistem terjemahan mesin. Selain menggunakan jenis-jenis ciri-ciri yang berbeza, kami mempelajari kesan konfigurasi arkitektur yang berbeza. Secara khusus, kita menganalisis prestasi menggabungkan perkataan dan ciri-ciri pada tahap penyembedding atau pada tahap penyembedding, dan kita eksperimen dengan dua strategi kombinasi yang berbeza. Dengan konfigurasi yang ditemui terbaik, kami menunjukkan peningkatan 0.8 BLEU atas Transformer asas dalam tugas IWSLT Jerman-ke-Inggeris. Selain itu, kami eksperimen dengan tanda referensi FLoRes bahasa Inggeris-Nepal yang lebih menantang, yang termasuk bahasa yang sangat rendah sumber dan sangat jauh, dan mendapatkan peningkatan 1.2 BLEU', 'mt': 'Introducing factors, that is to say, word features such as linguistic information referring to the source tokens, is known to improve the results of neural machine translation systems in certain settings, typically in recurrent architectures.  This study proposes enhancing the current state-of-the-art neural machine translation architecture, the Transformer, so that it allows to introduce external knowledge.  B’mod partikolari, il-modifika proposta tagħna, it-Trasformatur Fatturat, tuża fatturi lingwistiċi li jdaħħlu għarfien addizzjonali fis-sistema tat-traduzzjoni tal-magna. Minbarra l-użu ta’ tipi differenti ta’ karatteristiċi, nistudjaw l-effett ta’ konfigurazzjonijiet arkitettoniċi differenti. Speċifikament, nagħmlu analiżi tal-prestazzjoni tal-kombinazzjoni ta’ kliem u karatteristiċi fil-livell tal-inkorporazzjoni jew fil-livell tal-kodifikatur, u nagħmlu esperimenti b’żewġ strateġiji ta’ kombinazzjoni differenti. Bil-konfigurazzjoni l-aħjar li nstabet, nagħmlu titjib ta’ 0.8 BLEU fuq il-linja bażi Transformer fil-kompitu IWSLT Ġermaniż-Ingliż. Moreover, we experiment with the more challenging FLoRes English-to-Nepali benchmark, which includes both extremely low-resourced and very distant languages, and obtain an improvement of 1.2 BLEU', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വാക്കുകള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രദര്\u200dശി ഈ പഠനത്തിന്റെ നിലവിലുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷയുടെ സ്ഥാനം കൂടുതല്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അതിനാ In particular, our proposed modification, the Factored Transformer, uses linguistic factors that insert additional knowledge into the machine translation system.  വ്യത്യസ്ത തരം വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനു ശേഷം, വ്യത്യസ്ത്രീകരണങ്ങളുടെ പ്രഭാവം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, വാക്കുകളും വിശേഷതകളും കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം നമ്മള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. എപ്പോഡിങ്ങ് നില, അല്ലെങ്കി ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ക്രമീകരണവുമായി കണ്ടെത്തിയ ക്രമീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d 0. 8 ബില്യുവിന്\u200dറെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് കാണിക്കുന് അതുകൊണ്ടും, നമ്മള്\u200d ഫ്ലോറസ് ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് മുതല്\u200d നെപ്പാലിയുടെ ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിലപിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. അതില', 'mn': 'Энэ нь хэл хэлний мэдээллийг эх үүсвэрийн тодорхойлолтуудын үр дүнг зарим тодорхойлолтуудын нөхцөлд сэтгэл хөдлөлийн системийн үр дүнг сайжруулахын тулд мэддэг. Энэ судалгаанд орчин үеийн мэдрэлийн сэтгэл хөрөнгө оруулах архитектурыг нэмэгдүүлэх боломжтой болгодог. Ялангуяа бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн өөрчлөлт, Факторт Трансформатор, машины орчуулах системд нэмэлт мэдлэг оруулдаг хэлний хүчин зүйлсийг ашигладаг. Бид өөр өөр төрлийн өөрчлөлтийг ашигласнаас гадна өөр архитектур загварын нөлөөг судалдаг. Тодорхой хэлбэл бид үг болон харилцаа холбогдох түвшинд эсвэл кодчуудын түвшинд нэгтгэх үйл ажиллагааг шинжилгээд хоёр өөр нэгтгэх стратегийг туршиж байна. Хамгийн шилдэг тохиолдолд бид 0.8 BLEU-г IWSLT Герман-аас Англи хэлний ажлын суурь шугам шилжүүлэгч дээр харуулж байна. Мөн бид Англи хэл болон Непали хэл дээр илүү хэцүү хэмжээнд туршилт хийдэг. Энэ нь маш бага байгууллага болон маш хол хэл болон 1.2 БЛЕУ-ын сайжруулалт гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Dette er kjent til å forbedra resultatet av neuralmaskinsomsetjingssystemet i enkelte innstillingar, vanlegvis i rekurserte arkitekturar. Denne studien foreslår å forbetra den gjeldande state of the art neural machine translation architecture, the Transformer, slik at det kan introdusera eksterne kunnskap. Dette er spesielt at vårt foreslått endring, den fabrikerte transformeren, brukar språkfaktorer som sett inn ekstra kunnskap i maskineoversettelsystemet. I staden for å bruka ulike typar funksjonar, studerer vi effekten av ulike arkitektiske oppsett. Spesielt analyserer vi utviklinga til å kombinere ord og funksjonar på innbyggingsnivået eller på koderinivået, og vi eksperimenterer med to ulike kombinasjonsstrategiar. Med den beste oppsettet som er funne, viser vi forbedringar av 0,8 BLEU over grunnlinjestransformeren i IWSLT-tysk-til-engelsk oppgåva. I tillegg eksperimenterer vi med det meste vanskelege FLoRes English-to-Nepali-benchmarket, som inkluderer både ekstremt lav ressursert og veldig distant språk, og får forbedring av 1,2 BLEU', 'pl': 'Czynniki wprowadzające, czyli cechy słowa, takie jak informacje językowe odnoszące się do tokenów źródłowych, są znane z poprawy wyników neuronowych systemów tłumaczenia maszynowego w określonych ustawieniach, zwykle w architekturach powtarzających się. W niniejszym opracowaniu proponuje się udoskonalenie obecnej najnowocześniejszej architektury neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego, Transformera, tak aby umożliwić wprowadzenie zewnętrznej wiedzy. W szczególności proponowana przez nas modyfikacja, transformator czynnikowy, wykorzystuje czynniki językowe, które wprowadzają dodatkową wiedzę do systemu tłumaczenia maszynowego. Oprócz wykorzystania różnego rodzaju cech badamy wpływ różnych konfiguracji architektonicznych. W szczególności analizujemy wydajność łączenia słów i cech na poziomie osadzenia lub na poziomie kodera oraz eksperymentujemy z dwoma różnymi strategiami kombinacji. Z najlepiej znalezioną konfiguracją, pokazujemy ulepszenia 0.8 BLEU nad transformatorem bazowym w zadaniu IWSLT niemiecko-angielskim. Ponadto eksperymentujemy z bardziej wymagającym standardem FLoRes English-to-Nepal, który obejmuje zarówno języki o bardzo niskich zasobach, jak i bardzo odległe, oraz uzyskuje poprawę 1.2 BLEU', 'ro': 'Introducerea factorilor, adică caracteristicile cuvintelor, cum ar fi informațiile lingvistice referitoare la jetoanele sursă, este cunoscută pentru a îmbunătăți rezultatele sistemelor de traducere automată neurală în anumite setări, de obicei în arhitecturi recurente. Acest studiu propune îmbunătățirea arhitecturii actuale de traducere automată neurală, Transformer, astfel încât să permită introducerea cunoștințelor externe. În special, modificarea propusă de noi, Factored Transformer, utilizează factori lingvistici care inserează cunoștințe suplimentare în sistemul de traducere automată. Pe lângă utilizarea diferitelor tipuri de caracteristici, studiem efectul diferitelor configurații arhitecturale. Mai exact, analizăm performanța combinării cuvintelor și caracteristicilor la nivel de încorporare sau la nivel de encoder și experimentăm cu două strategii diferite de combinație. Cu cea mai bună configurație găsită, prezentăm îmbunătățiri de 0,8 BLEU față de transformatorul de bază în sarcina IWSLT germană-engleză. Mai mult decât atât, experimentăm cu cel mai provocator benchmark FLoRes din engleză în nepaleză, care include atât limbi extrem de scăzute, cât și limbi foarte îndepărtate, și obținem o îmbunătățire de 1.2 BLEU', 'so': 'Waxyaabaha la soo bandhigayo, taasi waa in la yidhaahdo, hadalka waxaa loo yaqaan sida macluumaadka luuqada ah ee looga jeedo calaamadaha sourceeda, waxaa loo yaqaan inuu hagaajiyo midhihiisa tarjumaadka maskinada ee neurada ah, sida caadiga ah meelaha la soo celiyo. Waxbarashadan wuxuu soo jeedaa in uu kordhiyo dhismaha tarjumaadda ee qoraalka neurada ah, turjumista, si uu u oggolaado aqoonta dibadda ah. Si gaar ah, isbedeshiintayada la soo jeeday, turjumista Factored, wuxuu isticmaalaa alaabta luqada ah oo aqoonta dheeraad ah ku soo geliya nidaamka turjumaadda machineada. Inta aan isticmaalin noocyo kala duduwan, waxaynu baranaynaa saamaynta dhismaha kala duduwan. Si gaar ah, waxaynu baaritaannaa sameynta hadalka iyo qalabka isku xiriirka ee heerka koronta ama heerka codsiga, waxaana baaritaannaa laba qoraal oo kala duduwan. Tilmaamaha ugu fiican ee la helay, waxaan tusnaa hagaajinta 0.8 BLEU oo ku qoran tarafka hoose ee IWSLT-Jarmal-to-Ingiriis. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku jirrabnaa bangiga afka Ingiriiska-ilaa-Nepali ee aad u adag ee FLoRes, kaas oo ku jira luqadaha aad u hooseeya iyo aad u fog, waxaana helaynaa horumarinta 1.2 BLEU', 'sv': 'Att introducera faktorer, det vill säga ordfunktioner som språklig information som hänvisar till källtokens, är känt för att förbättra resultaten av neurala maskinöversättningssystem i vissa miljöer, vanligtvis i återkommande arkitekturer. Denna studie föreslår att man förstärker den nuvarande state-of-the-art neurala maskinöversättningsarkitekturen Transformer, så att den gör det möjligt att introducera extern kunskap. I synnerhet använder vår föreslagna ändring, Factored Transformer, språkliga faktorer som infogar ytterligare kunskap i maskinöversättningssystemet. Förutom att använda olika typer av funktioner studerar vi effekten av olika arkitektoniska konfigurationer. Specifikt analyserar vi resultatet av att kombinera ord och funktioner på inbäddningsnivå eller på kodningsnivå, och vi experimenterar med två olika kombinationsstrategier. Med den bäst funna konfigurationen visar vi förbättringar av 0,8 BLEU jämfört med baslinjen Transformer i IWSLT tysk-till-engelska uppgiften. Dessutom experimenterar vi med det mer utmanande FLoRes engelska-till-nepalesiska riktmärket, som omfattar både extremt låga resurser och mycket avlägsna språk, och får en förbättring på 1,2 BLEU', 'ta': 'மூலத்தின் குறிகளை குறிப்பிடும் மொழி தகவல் போன்ற வார்த்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, சில அமைப்புகளில் புதிய இயந்திர மொழிமாற்று அமைப்புகளின் முடிவுகளை மேம்படு This study proposes enhancing the current state-of-the-art neural machine translation architecture, the Transformer, so that it allows to introduce external knowledge.  குறிப்பிட்டு, எங்கள் பரிந்திருக்கப்பட்ட மாற்றம், கணினி மொழிமாற்றி அமைப்பில் கூடுதல் அறிவை சொருகும் மொழிமாற்றும்  வேறு வகையான குணங்களை பயன்படுத்துவதில்லை குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் வார்த்தைகளையும் தன்மைகளையும் சேர்க்கும் செயல்பாட்டையும் ஆராய்ந்து கொள்கிறோம் உள்ளிட்ட நிலையில் அல சிறந்த கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட வடிவமைப்புடன், நாம் 0. 8 பிலியுவின் முன்னேற்றத்தைக் காட்டுகிறோம் IWSLT ஜெர்மன்- முதல் ஆங்க மேலும், அதிக சவாலான FLoRes ஆங்கிலத்தில் இருந்து நெபாலி பென்பேலிக் குறைந்த மொழிகளுடன் சேர்க்கிறோம், அதில் மிகவும் குறைந்த மூலம் மற்றும் த', 'sr': 'Upoznavajući faktore, to znači, karakteristike reči poput jezičkih informacija koje se odnose na izvorne znakove, poznaju se da poboljšaju rezultate sustava prevođenja neuralnih mašina u određenim nastavama, obično u rekonstrukcijama arhitektura. Ova studija predlaže unapređenje trenutnog stanja neuralne mašine za prevod, Transformera, tako da omogućava da predstavi spoljno znanje. Posebno, naša predložena modifikacija, fabrikovani transformator, koristi jezičke faktore koje uključuju dodatne znanje u sistem prevoda mašine. Osim upotrebe različitih vrsta karakteristika, proučavamo učinak različitih arhitekturnih konfiguracija. Posebno, analiziramo učinkovitost kombinacije riječi i karakteristika na ugrađenom nivou ili na nivou kodera, i eksperimentiramo sa dve različite kombinacijske strategije. Uz najbolje pronađenu konfiguraciju pokazujemo poboljšanje 0,8 BLEU zbog početnog transformera u njemačkom do engleskom zadatku IWSLT-a. Osim toga, eksperimentiramo sa najizazovnijim standardom FLoResa engleskog do Nepalija, koji uključuje i izuzetno niske resurse i veoma daleke jezike, i dobijamo poboljšanje od 1,2 BLEU-a', 'ur': 'یہ بات ہے کہ لکھنے کی معلومات جیسی زبان کی معلومات سورج ٹوکنوں کی طرف متوجہ ہوتی ہے، ان کا نتیجہ نیورل ماشین کی ترجمہ سیستم کے بہتر ہونے کے لئے معلوم ہوتا ہے، جو معمولاً دوبارہ ترجمہ معماروں میں ہے. یہ مطالعہ اس طرح پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ موجود state-of-the-art neural machine translation architecture، Transformer، اس لئے کہ یہ باہر علم کو معلوم کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے. مخصوصا، ہماری پیشنهاد کی بدلنی، فکتورڈ ٹرانسفور، زبان کی فکتوروں کو استعمال کرتا ہے جو ماشین ترجمہ سیسٹم میں اضافہ علم پیدا کرتی ہیں. ہم مختلف طریقوں کے فائدے کے مطابق مختلف طریقوں کے مطابق مختلف طریقوں کی تصویر کا اثر پڑھتے ہیں۔ خاص طور پر، ہم کلمات اور فکراتوں کو انڈینگ سطح یا انڈینگ سطح میں ترکیب کرنے کے کامل تحقیق کرتے ہیں، اور ہم دو مختلف ترکیب استراتژی کے ساتھ تجربہ کرتے ہیں. بہترین پیدا ہونے کے ساتھ، ہم نے 0.8 BLEU کی اصلاح کو IWSLT جرمن سے انگلیسی ٹرانسٹر کے بارے میں دکھایا ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ ہم بہت مشکل FLoRes English-to-Nepali benchmark کے ساتھ آزمائش کررہے ہیں، جو بہت کم سرمایہ اور بہت دور زبانوں میں شامل ہوتی ہے، اور 1.2 BLEU کی سوداگری حاصل کرتی ہے', 'si': 'මුළු තොක්කුන්ට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක්, කියන්නේ, භාෂාත්මක තොක්කුවක් වගේ වචන අවශ්\u200dයය, ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ තොක්කුන්ට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න,  මේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ප්\u200dරස්තූති ජාතිය- of- the- art neural machine translation නිර්මාණය ස්ථාපනය, වෙනස් කරනවා, ඉතින් ඒක පුළුවන්  විශේෂයෙන්, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත වෙනස් කරනවා, විශාල වෙනස් කරනවා, භාෂාත්මක විශේෂය භාවිතා කරනවා, ඒ වගේ වෙනස් වර්ගයක් විශේෂ වර්ගයක් භාවිත කරන්න බැරි විදිහට, අපි වෙනස් විශේෂ සංවිධානයේ ප්\u200dරතික විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි වචනය සහ විශේෂතාවක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වචනය සහ සම්බන්ධ ක්\u200dරමයක් තියෙනවා නැත්තම් කෝඩාර් ක්\u200dරමයක් ත හොඳම සොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සැකසුම් එක්ක, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අධාරණ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තකය IWSLT ජර්මාන්තියෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය තවත්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ තව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ FLoRes English-to-Nepal bench-ark එක්ක, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩු සම්පූර්ණය සහ ගොඩක් දුර්ණ භාෂාවක්', 'uz': "@ info Bu ta'qituvni tashqi natijadagi neyron tarjima maktablarini oshirish imkoniyatini tahrirlash imkoniyatini tahrirlash imkoniyatini beradi. Ko'rsatilgan o'zgarishlarimiz, Faktor tarjima qiluvchimiz, mashinaning tarjima tizimga qoʻshish qoʻshilgan lingvistik faktorelaridan foydalanadi. Biz har xil turli xossalarni ishlatishdan tasavvur qilamiz, har xil arxituvlar moslamalarining effektini o'rganamiz. Kodlash usulida, biz soʻzlarni birlashtirish va xossalarni birlashtirish darajada yoki kodlash darajadagi imkoniyatlarni analyzmiz, va biz ikkita boshqa bir qanday birlashtirish strategiya bilan imtiyozmaymiz. Eng yaxshi topilgan moslamalar bilan biz IWSLT Olmoncha- Ingliz vazifani asosiy tarjima qilishda 0.8 BLEU'ning o'zgarishlarini ko'rsamiz. Ko'pchilik, biz FLoRes Ingliz tiliga Nepaliga qanday qiziqarli tajriba qilamiz. Bu tilda juda qisqa murakkablik va juda uzoq tillar bor va 1.2 BLEU'ning yaxshi yaxshi ko'proq o'zgarishni olib kelamiz.", 'vi': 'Giới thiệu các yếu tố, tức là, các chức năng từ như thông tin ngôn ngữ liên quan đến các hiệu phát, được biết đến để cải thiện kết quả của hệ thống dịch chuyển máy thần kinh ở một số thiết lập, thường trong các kiến trúc thường xuyên. Nghiên cứu này đề nghị nâng cao kiến trúc dịch cỗ máy thần kinh hiện đại, bộ biến hình, nên nó cho phép giới thiệu kiến thức bên ngoài. Đặc biệt, thay đổi dự kiến của chúng ta, Biến hình Nhân tạo, sử dụng các yếu tố ngôn ngữ thêm vào hệ thống dịch chuyển máy. Ngoài việc sử dụng các tính năng khác nhau, chúng tôi nghiên cứu các hiệu ứng của các cấu hình kiến trúc khác nhau. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi phân tích khả năng kết hợp các từ và các tính năng ở mức nhúng vào hoặc ở mức mã hóa, và chúng tôi thí nghiệm với hai chiến lược kết hợp khác nhau. Với cấu hình được tìm thấy tốt nhất, chúng tôi cho thấy cải tiến 0.8 tạo liên quan tới Tranlão cơ bản trong nhiệm vụ IWSLT tiếng Đức-Anh. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi thử nghiệm với tiêu chuẩn mô tả tiếng Anh-Nepomus, Nó chứa cả ngôn ngữ nghèo và xa xôi, và đạt được một cải tiến', 'da': 'Indførelse af faktorer, det vil sige ordfunktioner såsom sproglig information, der henviser til kildetekens, er kendt for at forbedre resultaterne af neurale maskinoversættelsessystemer i visse indstillinger, typisk i tilbagevendende arkitekturer. Dette studie foreslår at forbedre den nuværende state-of-the-art neurale maskinoversættelsesarkitektur, Transformer, så det gør det muligt at introducere ekstern viden. Vores foreslåede ændring, Factored Transformer, bruger især sproglige faktorer, der indsætter yderligere viden i maskinoversættelsessystemet. Udover at bruge forskellige typer funktioner, undersøger vi effekten af forskellige arkitektoniske konfigurationer. Specielt analyserer vi ydeevnen ved at kombinere ord og funktioner på indlejringsniveau eller på encoderniveau, og vi eksperimenterer med to forskellige kombinationsstrategier. Med den bedst fundede konfiguration viser vi forbedringer af 0,8 BLEU i forhold til baseline Transformer i IWSLT tysk-til-engelsk opgave. Desuden eksperimenterer vi med den mere udfordrende FLoRes engelsk-nepalesisk benchmark, som omfatter både ekstremt lav ressource og meget fjerne sprog, og opnår en forbedring på 1.2 BLEU', 'hr': 'Uveličujući faktori, to što se kaže, riječi poput jezičkih informacija koje se odnose na izvorne znakove, poznaju se poboljšati rezultate sustava prevoda neuronskih strojeva u određenim nastavama, obično u rekonstrukcijama arhitektura. U ovom studiju predlaže poboljšanje trenutne strukture za prevod neuralnih strojeva, Transformera, kako bi omogućilo predstaviti vanjske znanje. Posebno, naša predložena modifikacija, faktorirana transformacija, koristi jezičke faktore koje uključuju dodatne znanje u sustav prevoda stroja. Osim korištenja različitih vrsta karakteristika, proučavamo učinak različitih arhitekturnih konfiguracija. Posebno, analiziramo učinkovitost kombinacije riječi i karakteristika na razini integracije ili na razini kodera, i eksperimentiramo s dvije različite kombinacijske strategije. Uz najbolje pronađenu konfiguraciju pokazujemo poboljšanje 0,8 BLEU zbog početnog transformera u njemačkom do engleskom zadatku IWSLT-a. Osim toga, eksperimentiramo s najizazovnijim standardom FLoResa engleskog do Nepalija, koji uključuje i ekstremno niske resurse i vrlo daleke jezike, i dobijamo poboljšanje od 1,2 BLEU-a', 'nl': 'Introducerende factoren, dat wil zeggen woordkenmerken zoals taalkundige informatie die verwijst naar de brontokens, verbeteren de resultaten van neurale machinevertaalsystemen in bepaalde omgevingen, meestal in terugkerende architecturen. Deze studie stelt voor de huidige state-of-the-art neural machine translation architectuur, de Transformer, te verbeteren, zodat externe kennis kan worden geïntroduceerd. Met name onze voorgestelde wijziging, de Factored Transformer, maakt gebruik van linguïstische factoren die extra kennis in het machinevertaalsysteem inbrengen. Naast het gebruik van verschillende soorten functies, bestuderen we het effect van verschillende architecturale configuraties. Specifiek analyseren we de prestaties van het combineren van woorden en functies op het inbeddingsniveau of op het encoderniveau, en we experimenteren met twee verschillende combinatiestrategieën. Met de best gevonden configuratie tonen we verbeteringen van 0.8 BLEU ten opzichte van de baseline Transformer in de IWSLT Duits-naar-Engels taak. Bovendien experimenteren we met de meer uitdagende FLoRes English-to-Nepali benchmark, die zowel extreem lage resources als zeer verre talen omvat, en verkrijgen we een verbetering van 1.2 BLEU', 'bg': 'Известно е, че въвеждащите фактори, т.е. думи като езикова информация, отнасяща се до източниците, подобряват резултатите от невронните системи за машинен превод в определени настройки, обикновено при повтарящи се архитектури. Това изследване предлага подобряване на съвременната архитектура на невронния машинен превод, Трансформатора, така че да позволи въвеждането на външни знания. По-специално, нашата предложена модификация, Факторизираният трансформатор, използва лингвистични фактори, които въвеждат допълнителни знания в системата за машинен превод. Освен използването на различни видове функции, ние изучаваме ефекта от различни архитектурни конфигурации. По-конкретно анализираме ефективността на комбинирането на думи и функции на ниво вграждане или на ниво кодер и експериментираме с две различни стратегии за комбиниране. С най-добре откритата конфигурация показваме подобрения на 0,8 спрямо базовия трансформатор в задачата Немско-Английско. Освен това експериментираме с по-предизвикателния английски-непалски референтен показател, който включва както изключително ниски ресурси, така и много отдалечени езици, и получаваме подобрение от 1.2 лв.', 'de': 'Einführende Faktoren, d.h. Wortmerkmale wie sprachliche Informationen, die sich auf die Quelltoken beziehen, verbessern bekanntermaßen die Ergebnisse neuronaler maschineller Übersetzungssysteme in bestimmten Umgebungen, typischerweise in wiederkehrenden Architekturen. Diese Studie schlägt vor, die aktuelle neurale maschinelle Übersetzungsarchitektur, den Transformer, zu erweitern, um externes Wissen einzuführen. Insbesondere unsere vorgeschlagene Modifikation, der Factor Transformer, nutzt linguistische Faktoren, die zusätzliches Wissen in das maschinelle Übersetzungssystem einbringen. Neben der Verwendung verschiedener Arten von Merkmalen untersuchen wir die Wirkung verschiedener architektonischer Konfigurationen. Konkret analysieren wir die Leistung der Kombination von Wörtern und Merkmalen auf Einbettebene oder auf Encoder-Ebene und experimentieren mit zwei verschiedenen Kombinationsstrategien. Mit der am besten gefundenen Konfiguration zeigen wir Verbesserungen von 0.8 BLEU gegenüber dem Basistransformator in der IWSLT Deutsch-Englisch Aufgabe. Darüber hinaus experimentieren wir mit dem anspruchsvolleren FLoRes English-to-Nepali Benchmark, der sowohl extrem ressourcenarme als auch sehr entfernte Sprachen umfasst, und erzielen eine Verbesserung von 1.2 BLEU', 'id': 'Mengenalkan faktor, yaitu, karakteristik kata seperti informasi bahasa yang merujuk token sumber, dikenal untuk meningkatkan hasil dari sistem terjemahan mesin saraf dalam pengaturan tertentu, biasanya dalam arsitektur berulang-ulang. Studi ini mengusulkan meningkatkan arkitektur terjemahan mesin saraf modern, Transformer, sehingga memungkinkan untuk memperkenalkan pengetahuan luar. Terutama, modifikasi kami yang diusulkan, Transformer Faktor, menggunakan faktor bahasa yang memasukkan pengetahuan tambahan ke dalam sistem terjemahan mesin. Selain menggunakan berbagai macam fitur, kami mempelajari efek dari konfigurasi arsitektur yang berbeda. Secara spesifik, kami menganalisis prestasi dari menggabungkan kata-kata dan fitur pada tingkat penyembedding atau tingkat penyembedding, dan kami eksperimen dengan dua strategi kombinasi yang berbeda. Dengan konfigurasi terbaik yang ditemukan, kami menunjukkan peningkatan 0,8 BLEU atas Transformer dasar dalam tugas IWSLT Jerman-ke-Inggris. Moreover, we experiment with the more challenging FLoRes English-to-Nepali benchmark, which includes both extremely low-resourced and very distant languages, and obtain an improvement of 1.2 BLEU', 'ko': '모두가 알다시피 일부 요소, 즉 단어의 특징, 예를 들어 지향원 표기된 언어 정보를 도입하면 신경기계 번역 시스템이 어떤 상황에서의 결과를 개선할 수 있다. 주로 순환 구조에서 나타난다.이 연구는 외부 지식을 도입하기 위해 현재 가장 선진적인 신경기계 번역 체계 구조인 Transformer를 강화할 것을 제안한다.특히 우리가 제시한 수정, 인자 변환, 언어 요소 사용, 추가 지식을 기계 번역 시스템에 삽입합니다.서로 다른 유형의 기능을 사용하는 것 외에 우리는 서로 다른 건축 배치의 효과도 연구했다.구체적으로 우리는 삽입층이나 인코더층에서 단어와 특징을 조합하는 성능을 분석하고 두 가지 서로 다른 조합 전략으로 실험을 진행했다.최적의 구성을 통해 IWSLT 독일어-영어 작업에서 베이스라인 변환기 0.8 BLEU보다 향상된 내용을 보여줍니다.그 밖에 우리는 더욱 도전적인 FloRes English to Nepali 기준 테스트를 시도했는데 자원이 매우 낮고 매우 먼 언어를 포함하여 1.2 BLEU의 개선을 얻었다', 'fa': 'تعداد تولید کننده، یعنی ویژه\u200cهای کلمه\u200cای مثل اطلاعات زبان\u200cشناسی که به نشانه\u200cهای منبع ارائه می\u200cدهند، به نتیجه\u200cهای سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cی ماشین\u200cهای عصبی در تنظیمات\u200cهای خاص، معمولاً در معماری\u200cهای تکرار می\u200c این مطالعه پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که ساختار ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی فعلی، ترجمه\u200cکننده، تا اجازه دهد دانش خارجی را معرفی کند. مخصوصا، تغییرات پیشنهاد ما، تغییرات فکتوری شده، از فکتوری زبان\u200cشناسی استفاده می\u200cکند که علم اضافه\u200cای را در سیستم ترجمه ماشین وارد می\u200cکند. غیر از استفاده از نوع ویژه های مختلف، اثر پیکربندی های معماری مختلف را مطالعه می کنیم. به طور خاص، ما عملکرد ترکیب کلمات و ویژه\u200cهایی را در سطح پیوند یا در سطح enkoder تحلیل می\u200cکنیم و با دو استراتژی ترکیب متفاوت آزمایش می\u200cکنیم. با بهترین پیکربندی پیدا شده، ما بهترین توسعه\u200cهای 0.8 BLEU بر روی تغییرگر پایین خط در کار آلمانی به انگلیسی IWSLT را نشان می\u200cدهیم. علاوه بر این، ما با برنامه\u200cهای انگلیسی و نپالی سخت\u200cترین FLoRes-to-Nepali آزمایش می\u200cکنیم، که شامل هر دو زبان بسیار کم و بسیار دور است، و بهبود ۱.۲ BLEU را می\u200cگیریم.', 'sw': 'Kufundisha sababu, hilo ni kusema, maneno yanahusisha kama vile taarifa za lugha zinazomaanisha ishara za vyanzo, yanafahamika kuboresha matokeo ya mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine ya kijamii katika mazingira fulani, kwa kawaida katika majengo yanayoendelea. Utafiti huu unapendekeza kuongeza hali ya sasa ya ujenzi wa kutafsiri mashine ya kisasa, Transfer, ili kuiruhusu kutangaza maarifa ya nje. Kwa hakika, mabadiliko yetu yanayopendekezwa, Mfumo wa Tafsiri, unatumia sababu za lugha zinazoingiza maarifa zaidi katika mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine. Mbali na kutumia aina mbalimbali, tunasoma madhara ya miundombinu tofauti. Kwa ujumla, tunachambua utendaji wa kuunganisha maneno na tabia katika kiwango cha kuongezeka au kwenye kiwango cha kodi, na tunajaribu kwa mikakati miwili tofauti ya muungano. Kwa kutumia maendeleo bora zaidi, tunaonyesha maendeleo ya BLEU 0.8 juu ya Transfer wa msingi katika kazi ya IWSLT ya Ujerumani-hadi Kiingereza. Zaidi ya hayo, tunajaribu kupitia bendera ya FLoRes ya Kiingereza hadi Nepali, ambayo inajumuisha lugha zisizo rasilimali na zile mbali sana, na kupata maboresho ya BLEU 1.2', 'tr': 'Möň bellenen faktörler bolsa, lingwistiki maglumatlar ýaly çeşme tokaýlary diýip bolan sözleri, näyral maşynyň terjime sistemleriniň netijesini belli düzümlerde geliştirmek üçin tanalýar. Bu araşdyrma häzirki möhüm state-of-the-art neural maşynyň terjime arhitektegi, terjime edip, daşarydaky bilgileri tanyşdyrmagy mümkin edýär. Aýratyn üçin biziň teklip eden üýtgetmegimiz, Faýly Çevirmegimiz, makine terjime sistemine ýene bir bilgi girdirjek lingwistiki faktörlerden ullanýar. Farklı tanyşlary ulanmakdan başga, farklı arhitektür düzümleriniň etkisini öwrenýär. Adatça, biz sözleri we özellikleri integral derejesinde ýada koder derejesinde birleştirip barýarys we iki üýtgeşik strategiýasy bilen synanyşýarys. IWSLT Germaniýadan-iňlisçe gören iň gowy tapylýan konfigurasiýasy bilen 0.8 BLEU üýtgewleri IWSLT-de-Iňlisçe görevidiginde görkezýäris. Mundan soňra biz FLoResyň iňlisçe-Nepali çempionlygynda gaty kynçylyk derejesi bilen synanyşýarys. Bu ýerde iň az derejesi we gaty uzak dillerden hem bar we 1.2 BLEU-yň gelişmesini çözýäris', 'af': "Introduksiende faktore, dit is om te sê, woord funksies soos lingwisiese inligting wat na die bron tokens verwys, is bekend om die resultate van neurale masjien vertaling stelsels in sekere instellings te verbeter, tipies in herhaalde arkitektuure. Hierdie studie stel voorstel om die huidige staat van die kunste neurale masjien vertaling arkitektuur te verhoog, die Transformer, sodat dit toelaat om eksterne kennis te introduseer. Spesifieke, ons voorgestelde verandering, die Faktoreerde Transformeerder, gebruik lingwisiese faktore wat addisionele kennis in die masjien vertaling stelsel invoeg. Ons studeer die effek van verskillende arkitektuur konfigurasies buitekant ander soorte funksies. Spesifieke, ons analyseer die prestasie van die kombinasie van woorde en funksies by die inbêring vlak of by die enkodervlak, en ons eksperimenteer met twee verskillende kombinasie strategies. Met die beste gevind konfigurasie, wys ons verbeteringe van 0. 8 BLES oor die basisline Transformeerder in die IWSLT Duits-na-Engels taak. Ook, ons eksperimenteer met die meer vanskerpende FLoRes Engels-na-Nepali-benchmark, wat beide ekstrem lae hulpbron en baie afgeleë tale inkluit en 'n verbetering van 1.2 BLEU kry", 'sq': 'Duke prezantuar faktorë, që do të thotë, karakteristika fjalësh të tilla si informacioni gjuhësor që referohet tek tokenat e burimit, është e njohur që përmirëson rezultatet e sistemeve të përkthimit nervor të makinave në disa rregullime, tipikisht në arkitektura të përsëritura. This study proposes enhancing the current state-of-the-art neural machine translation architecture, the Transformer, so that it allows to introduce external knowledge.  Në veçanti, modifikimi ynë i propozuar, Transformuesi Faktoruar, përdor faktorë gjuhësor që futin njohuri shtesë në sistemin e përkthimit të makinave. Përveç përdorimit të llojeve të ndryshme të karakteristikave, ne studiojmë efektin e konfigurimeve arkitekturale të ndryshme. Veçanërisht, ne analizojmë performancën e kombinimit të fjalëve dhe karakteristikave në nivelin e përfshirjes ose në nivelin e koduesit, dhe ne eksperimentojmë me dy strategji të ndryshme kombinimi. Me konfigurimin më të gjetur, ne tregojmë përmirësime të 0.8 BLEU në lidhje me Transformuesin bazë në detyrën IWSLT gjerman-në-anglisht. Përveç kësaj, ne eksperimentojmë me normën më të sfidueshme FLoRes anglisht-në-Nepali, e cila përfshin si gjuhë ekstremisht me burime të ulëta si edhe gjuhë shumë të largëta dhe fitojmë një përmirësim prej 1.2 BLEU', 'am': 'ውጤቶችን በመግጠም፣ ቃላት የቋንቋዊ መረጃዎችን እንደሚያሳየው ቋንቋዊ መረጃዎች፣ የናቡራዊ መሣሪያን ትርጉም ውጤቶች በተለያዩ ባሕላቶች፣ በተጨማሪው መዝገብ ውስጥ የሚቆጠሩ መዝገብ ነው፡፡ ይህም ትምህርት የአሁኑን የፀሐይ የሆኑትን የዘጠኝ የሆኑትን የፖስታ ትርጉም መሠረት፣ የTransformer እና የውጭ እውቀትን ለማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ በተለይም፣ የተዘጋጀው ለውጦታችን፣ የፋክቶር ትርጉም፣ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች እውቀትን ወደ መሳሳይ ትርጉም ስርዓት የሚጨምር የቋንቋ ውይይቶች ይጠቅማል፡፡ Apart from using different kinds of features, we study the effect of different architectural configurations.  በተለይም፣ ቃሎችን እና የግንኙነቶችን በአካባቢው ደረጃዎች ወይም የኮድ ደረጃውን እናሳውቃለን፣ እናም ሁለት የተለያዩ ጥቅሎች እናሞክራለን፡፡ በተለጠቀው ምርጫዎች ላይ በIWSLT ጀርመን-ወደ እንግሊዘኛ ስራ ላይ የ0.8 BLEU ጥናት ማሳየትን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የፍሎRes እንግሊዝኛ-ወደ ነፕላይ የኢንጂልዩን የኢንጂልዩን የቅርጽ መጻሕፍት እና የሩቅ ቋንቋዎች እና 1.2 BLEU ማሻሻል እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այսինքն, բառերի հատկությունները, ինչպիսիք են լեզվաբանական տեղեկատվությունը, որը վերաբերում է աղբյուրների նշաններին, հայտնի է, որպեսզի բարելավեն նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգերի արդյունքները որոշ միջավայրում, սովորաբար կրկնվող ճա Այս ուսումնասիրությունը առաջարկում է բարելավել ներկայիս ամենահետաքրքիր նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման ճարտարապետությունը, Թանֆորմերը, որպեսզի հնարավորություն լինի ներկայացնել արտաքին գիտելիքներ: Հատկապես, մեր առաջարկած փոփոխությունը, Ֆակտորային տրանֆորմերը, օգտագործում է լեզվաբանական գործոններ, որոնք ավելին գիտելիքներ են ներառում մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգի մեջ: Apart from using different kinds of features, we study the effect of different architectural configurations.  Հատկապես, մենք վերլուծում ենք բառերի և առանձնահատկությունների համադրման արդյունքը ներգրավման մակարդակում կամ կոդերի մակարդակում, և փորձում ենք երկու տարբեր համադրման ռազմավարություններով: Ամենալավ գտնվող կառուցվածքի միջոցով մենք ցույց ենք տալիս 0.8-ի կառուցվածքի զարգացումներ, որոնք կատարվում են IW-Սլեթ գերմաներեն-անգլերեն աշխատանքի վերաբերյալ: Ավելին, մենք փորձում ենք ավելի դժվար ֆլորեսի անգլերեն-նեպալիայի հարաբերական նպատակով, որը ներառում է բավականին ցածր ռեսուրսներ ունեցող և շատ հեռավոր լեզուներ, և ստանում է 1.2 բլեւ', 'az': "İşləyici faktörlər, məsələn, dil məlumatı kimi mənbə möcüzələri barəsində danışan söz məlumatlarının sonuçlarını bəzi quruluş sistemlərində yaxşılaşdırmaq məqsədilə tanıyır. Bu təhsil, həmin məlumatın nöral maşın tərcümə arhitektarını art ırmağı təklif edir ki, bu təhsil dış bilgiləri tanıyırsın. Özellikle, bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz dəyişiklik, Faktor Transformer, maşına çevirim sisteminə əlavə bilgi daxil edən dil faktörləri istifadə edir. Biz müxtəlif tərzlərin istifadəsindən başqa, müxtəlif arhitektür yapılandırmaların etkisini öyrənirik. Biz sözləri və özellikləri birləşdirmək səviyyəsində və ya kodlayıcı səviyyəsində birləşdirmək performansını analiz edirik və iki müxtəlif birləşdirilmiş stratejilərlə təcrübə edirik. Ən gözəl yapılandırma ilə, IWSLT Almanca-İngilizə işində ilk çətin transformatörü ilə 0.8 BLEU'nin yaxşılıqlarını göstəririk. Daha çox çətin FLoRes İngilizə-Nepali benchmark ilə təcrübə edirik, bu da çox az qüvvət və çox uzaq dillər içərisində idi və 1.2 BLEU ilə yaxşılaşdırılır.", 'bn': 'বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর মধ্যে নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেমের ফলাফল উন্নত করার পরিচিতি জানা যায়, সাধারণত পুনরায় প্রতিষ্ঠানগুলোতে ভাষাগত তথ্যের মতো শব্দের বি এই গবেষণাটি বর্তমান নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের কাঠামো বৃদ্ধি করার প্রস্তাব প্রদান করেছে, যাতে এটি বাইরের জ্ঞানের সুযোগ প্রদান করতে পারে। In particular, our proposed modification, the Factored Transformer, uses linguistic factors that insert additional knowledge into the machine translation system.  বিভিন্ন ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করা ছাড়া, আমরা বিভিন্ন আর্কিটেক্টুরেল কনফিগারেশনের প্রভাব গবেষণা করছি। বিশেষ করে, আমরা শব্দ এবং বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্য বিশ্লেষণ করি বিভিন্ন কৌশলের সাথে সংযুক্ত করার ব্যাপারে অথবা এনকোডারের স্তরে এবং আমরা  ইউএসএলটি জার্মান-থেকে ইংরেজি কাজের বেস্ট্রান্সফ্রান্সের ব্যাপারে আমরা ০. ৮ বিলুর উন্নতি দেখাচ্ছি। এছাড়াও, আমরা এফলোরেস ইংরেজি থেকে নেপালী বেনম্যার্কের বেশী চ্যালেঞ্জের সাথে পরীক্ষা করছি, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে খুব কম সম্পদ এবং অনেক দূরে ভাষা, আর ১.', 'bs': 'Uhvaćajući faktore, to znači, karakteristike riječi poput jezičke informacije koje se odnose na izvorne znakove, poznaju se da poboljšaju rezultate sustava prevođenja neuronskih strojeva u određenim nastavama, obično u rekonstrukciji arhitekture. Ova studija predlaže poboljšanje trenutne strukture neuralnog prevoda, Transformera, kako bi omogućilo da predstavi spoljno znanje. Posebno, naša predložena modifikacija, faktorirana transformacija, koristi jezičke faktore koje uključuju dodatne znanje u sustav prevoda mašine. Osim korištenja različitih vrsta karakteristika, proučavamo učinak različitih arhitekturnih konfiguracija. Posebno, analiziramo učinkovitost kombinacije riječi i karakteristika na nivou integracije ili na nivou kodera, i eksperimentiramo sa dvije različite kombinacije strategije. Uz najbolje pronađenu konfiguraciju pokazujemo poboljšanje 0,8 BLEU zbog početnog transformera u njemačkom do engleskom zadatku IWSLT-a. Osim toga, eksperimentiramo sa najizazovnijim standardom FLoResa engleskog do Nepalija, koji uključuje i izuzetno niske resurse i veoma daleke jezike, i dobijamo poboljšanje od 1,2 BLEU-a', 'cs': 'Zaváděcí faktory, to znamená, že slovní vlastnosti, jako jsou jazykové informace odkazující na zdrojové tokeny, zlepšují výsledky neuronových strojových překladů v určitých nastaveních, obvykle v opakovaných architekturách. Tato studie navrhuje rozšíření současné nejmodernější architektury neuronového strojového překladu Transformátoru tak, aby umožnilo zavádět externí znalosti. Konkrétně naše navrhovaná modifikace Factored Transformer využívá jazykové faktory, které do systému strojového překladu vloží další znalosti. Kromě použití různých druhů prvků studujeme vliv různých architektonických konfigurací. Konkrétně analyzujeme výkonnost kombinování slov a funkcí na úrovni vložení nebo na úrovni kodéru a experimentujeme se dvěma různými kombinačními strategiemi. S nejlépe nalezenou konfigurací ukazujeme zlepšení 0.8 BLEU oproti základnímu transformátoru v německo-anglickém úkolu IWSLT. Kromě toho experimentujeme s náročnějším FLoRes benchmarkem angličtiny-nepálštiny, který zahrnuje jak extrémně nízké zdroje, tak i velmi vzdálené jazyky, a získáváme zlepšení 1.2 BLEU', 'ca': "És conegut que introduint factors, és a dir, característiques de paraules com la informació lingüística que fa referència a les fitxes de font, millora els resultats dels sistemes neuromàtics de traducció en determinats entorns, típicament en arquitectures recurrents. Aquest estudi propon millorar l'arquitectura actual de traducció neural de màquines modernes, el Transformer, de manera que permet introduir coneixements externs. En particular, la nostra modificació proposada, la Transformadora Factorada, utilitza factors lingüístics que introdueixen coneixements adicionals al sistema de traducció màquina. A part d'utilitzar diferents tipus de característiques, estudiem l'efecte de diferents configuracions arquitectòniques. En concret, analitzem el rendiment de combinar paraules i característiques al nivell d'incorporació o al nivell del codificador, i experimentem amb dues estratègies de combinació diferents. Amb la millor configuració trobada, mostren millors de 0,8 BLEU en relació amb la base Transformer en la tasca IWSLT alemanya a anglès. A més, experimentem amb el punt de referència FLoRes més desafiant anglès-Nepal, que inclou llengües extremadament baixos recursos i molt llunyanes, i obtenim una millora de 1,2 BLEU", 'et': 'Teadaolevalt parandavad neuromasintõlke süsteemide tulemusi teatud seadistustes, tavaliselt korduvates arhitektuurides, näiteks keeleline teave, mis viitab allikatele. Selles uuringus tehakse ettepanek täiustada praegust kaasaegset neuro masintõlke arhitektuuri Transformerit, nii et see võimaldaks tutvustada väliseid teadmisi. Eelkõige kasutatakse meie kavandatud muudatuses faktorimuundurit keelelisi tegureid, mis lisavad masintõlkesüsteemi täiendavaid teadmisi. Lisaks erinevate funktsioonide kasutamisele uurime erinevate arhitektuuriliste konfiguratsioonide mõju. Täpsemalt analüüsime sõnade ja funktsioonide kombineerimise jõudlust manustamise tasandil või kodeerija tasandil ning eksperimenteerime kahte erinevat kombineerimisstrateegiat. Kõige paremini leitud konfiguratsiooni korral näitame IWSLT saksa-inglise ülesandes 0,8 BLEU võrreldes algväärtusega Transformer. Lisaks eksperimenteerime keerulisemat FLoRes inglise-nepalli võrdlusalust, mis hõlmab nii väga vähese ressursiga kui ka väga kaugeid keeli, ning saavutame 1,2 BLEU võrra parema tulemuse.', 'fi': 'Tekijﾃｶiden, toisin sanoen sanaominaisuuksien, kuten lﾃ､hdekoodiin viittaavan kielitiedon, tiedetﾃ､ﾃ､n parantavan neurokonekﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶsjﾃ､rjestelmien tuloksia tietyissﾃ､ asetuksissa, tyypillisesti toistuvissa arkkitehtuureissa. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tutkimuksessa ehdotetaan nykyaikaisen neurokonekﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶksen arkkitehtuurin, Transformerin, kehittﾃ､mistﾃ､ siten, ettﾃ､ se mahdollistaa ulkoisen tiedon kﾃ､yttﾃｶﾃｶnoton. Erityisesti ehdotetussa muutosehdotuksessa, Factored Transformer, kﾃ､ytetﾃ､ﾃ､n kielellisiﾃ､ tekijﾃｶitﾃ､, jotka lisﾃ､ﾃ､vﾃ､t konekﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶsjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､n lisﾃ､tietoa. Erilaisten ominaisuuksien lisﾃ､ksi tutkimme erilaisten arkkitehtonisten kokoonpanojen vaikutusta. Analysoimme erityisesti sanojen ja ominaisuuksien yhdistﾃ､misen suorituskykyﾃ､ upotustasolla tai koodaajatasolla ja kokeilemme kahta erilaista yhdistelmﾃ､strategiaa. Parhaiten lﾃｶydetyllﾃ､ konfiguraatiolla nﾃ､ytﾃ､mme 0,8 BLEU:n parannuksia perusmuuntajaan verrattuna IWSLT saksa-englanti -tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n. Lisﾃ､ksi kokeilemme haastavampaa FLoRes English-Nepali -vertailumenetelmﾃ､ﾃ､, joka sisﾃ､ltﾃ､ﾃ､ sekﾃ､ erittﾃ､in vﾃ､hﾃ､n resursseja ettﾃ､ hyvin kaukaisia kieliﾃ､, ja saamme parannuksen 1,2 BLEU:n tasolle.', 'jv': 'Nambah ingkang karo nggunakaké, sing wis nambah, kelangan cara-cara ngono informasi anyar nggawe tarjamahan karo token sing kelas nggunakake, diangubah dhéwé ngertuakake sistem tarjamahan alam sing berarti ning atik dhéwé, sadurungubah sak architecture sing berarti. Piranti iki supoyo nglanggar nglanggar aturan anyar tentang karo architecture Neral, Transformer, dadi supoyo iso nggawe ngerwih akeh barang. Genjer-Genjer, nambah gunakake modification, Transformer "Faktur" nggawe sistem anyar tentang kanggo nyelarani ingkang sampeyan Jaringan. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Alpha" for "a", "Bravo" for "b Ngompok sampeyan sing luwih dumateng, kita sembarang langgar pada 0.8 B luwih dumateng liyane Transformer karo nggambar barang IWSLT Jagad-kanggo-Inggris Nanging, awak dhéwé éntukno ngono nggawe luwih dumadhi kanggo ngilangno FLOResInggris-to-Nebali, sing sumulakno ngono nggawe nguasai luwih apik lan luwih-luwih dumadhi, lan oleh dumadhi kanggo ngerasai kanggo 1.2 Bibler', 'sk': 'Uvodni dejavniki, torej besedne značilnosti, kot so jezikovne informacije, ki se nanašajo na izvorne žetone, izboljšujejo rezultate nevronskih sistemov strojnega prevajanja v določenih nastavitvah, običajno v ponavljajočih se arhitekturah. Ta študija predlaga izboljšanje najsodobnejše arhitekture nevronskega strojnega prevajanja Transformerja, tako da omogoča uvajanje zunanjega znanja. Naša predlagana sprememba, faktorski transformator, uporablja jezikovne dejavnike, ki vstavijo dodatno znanje v sistem strojnega prevajanja. Poleg uporabe različnih vrst funkcij preučujemo učinek različnih arhitekturnih konfiguracij. Natančneje analiziramo učinkovitost kombiniranja besed in funkcij na ravni vdelave ali na ravni kodirnika ter eksperimentiramo z dvema različnima kombinacijskima strategijama. Z najbolje ugotovljeno konfiguracijo prikazujemo izboljšave 0,8 BLEU v primerjavi z osnovnim transformatorjem v opravilu nemško-angleško IWSLT. Poleg tega eksperimentiramo z bolj zahtevnim merilom FLoRes angleško-nepalščino, ki vključuje jezike z izjemno nizkimi viri in zelo oddaljene jezike, in pridobimo izboljšanje za 1,2 BLEU', 'he': 'המציגת גורמים, כלומר, תכונות מילים כמו מידע שפתי מתייחס לסימנים המקורים, ידועה לשפר את תוצאות מערכות התרגום של מכונות עצביות במסדרות מסוימות, בדרך כלל בארכיטקטורות חוזרות. המחקר הזה מציע לשפר את הארכיטקטורה הנוכחית של המכונה העצבית הנוכחית, הטרנספורטר, כדי שיאפשר להציג ידע חיצוני. במיוחד, השינוי המוצע שלנו, הטרנספורטר המפעל, משתמש בגורמים שפתיים שמכניסים ידע נוסף למערכת התרגום המכונה. מלבד השימוש בסוגים שונים של תכונות, אנחנו לומדים את ההשפעה של תכונות ארכיטקטוניות שונות. במיוחד, אנו מנתחים את ביצועים של שילוב מילים ומתכונות ברמה של קישום או ברמה של הקודר, וננסה עם שתי אסטרטגיות שילוב שונות. עם הצגה הממצאה הכי טובה, אנחנו מראים שיפורים של 0.8 BLEU במהלך התמרת הבסיסית במשימה IWSLT גרמנית לאנגלית. חוץ מזה, אנו מנסים עם נקודת התייחסות FLoRes אנגלית-לנפאלית יותר מאתגרת, שכוללת גם שפות נמוכות מאוד ומרחקות מאוד, ולהשיג שיפור של 1.2 BLEU', 'ha': 'Yana ƙara fassarar da, shi ne ya ce, "word feature such as information in linguistic as an gaya wa ayukan ayukan na source, an sani to improve the matsalar of fassarar translation system na neural cikin wasu settings, a typically in architectura idan an sake koma. Wannan littafin yana son ya ƙara muhallin fassarar masu cikin-yanzu-yanzu-na-yanzu, Transformer, don haka yana yarda ya ƙara da ilmi na bakin. A cikin ƙayyade, ana amfani da shiryoyin shiryoyin ayuka da aka buɗe fassarar da aka Faso-Fassarar da shi, yana amfani da matsayin linguistic waɗanda ke shigar da wani ilmi na ƙaranci cikin tsarin tarjibu na\'ura. Bai yi amfani da wasu hanyõyi dabam\'a, muna karanta aikin tsarin tsari masu buƙata. A ƙayyade, Munã anayyar da aikin da za\'a haɗa magana da feature cikin daraja da aka faɗaɗa, ko kan daraja na kodi, kuma munã jarraba da takilaikin biyu masu haɗi. @ info: whatsthis Kayya, ko kuma, za mu jarraba da bangon FLoRes na Ingiriya-zuwa-Nepale, wanda ke ƙunsa da cikakki masu ƙaranci da harshen masu nĩsa, kuma za mu sami kyautatawa a 1.2 BLEU', 'bo': 'Introducing factors, that is to say, word features such as linguistic information referring to the source tokens, is known to improve the results of neural machine translation systems in certain settings, typically in recurrent architectures. This study proposes enhancing the current state-of-the-art neural machine translation architecture, the Transformer, so that it allows to introduce external knowledge. ང་ཚོའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ལ་དམིགས་གསལ་བྱས་པར་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པ་དེ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་སྐད སྣ་མ་བརྙན་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་སོ་སོའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྒྲིག་མཁན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་མ་འདྲ་བ་བསླབ་ཡོད། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལྡན་མཐའ་ཤོས་བྱས་པ་དེ་འགྱུར་བ་ནི 0.8 BLEU ་ལྟ་བ་ཀྱི་རྨན་གཞུང་གཞིའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་ཚོ་ནི་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེ་བའི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་དཔྱད་བརྟན་དགོས་པའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་གཉིས་ལས་བརླབ'}
{'en': 'A Multi-Pass Sieve Coreference Resolution for Indonesian', 'ar': 'حل مصحح غربال متعدد التمريرات للإندونيسية', 'es': 'Una resolución de correferencia de tamices de múltiples pasadas para indonesio', 'fr': "Une résolution de coréférence de tamis multi-passes pour l'indonésien", 'pt': 'Uma resolução de co-referência de peneira de múltiplas passagens para indonésio', 'ja': 'インドネシア語のマルチパスシーブコアレファレンス分解能', 'zh': '印度尼西亚语之多通道筛分共验解决方案', 'hi': 'इंडोनेशियाई के लिए एक बहु-पास छलनी Coreference संकल्प', 'ru': 'Разрешение многопроходного ситового ядра для индонезийского', 'ga': 'Rún Croíthagartha Criathar Ilphas don Indinéisis', 'ka': 'ინდონეციური მრავალ-პასუხი Sieve კოფერენციის რეზოციონია', 'hu': 'Több menetű szitáról szóló Coreferencia-állásfoglalás indonéz nyelven', 'el': 'Ψήφισμα συνεργασίας με κόσκινο πολλαπλών διαστάσεων για την Ινδονησία', 'lt': 'Indonezijos vyriausybės rezoliucija dėl daugiapakopės sėklos konferencijos', 'it': "Risoluzione di Coreferenza del setaccio multi-passo per l'indonesiano", 'ms': 'A Multi-Pass Sieve Coreference Resolution for Indonesian', 'mt': "Riżoluzzjoni ta' Koreferenza għal Żerriegħa Multi-Pass għall-Indoneżjan", 'ml': 'ഇന്തോനേഷ്യയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി ഒരു പല- പാസ് സീവ് കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് റിസ്റ്റര്\u200dമെന്\u200dസ്', 'mk': 'A Multi-Pass Sieve Coreference Resolution for Indonesian', 'no': 'Ein oppløysing av fleire passar Sieve-koreferens for Indonesisk', 'pl': 'Rezolucja dotycząca współpracy z sieciami wielopłaszczowymi dla indonezyjskiego', 'mn': 'Индонезийн хэмжээний хэмжээний шийдвэрлэл', 'sr': 'Резолюција кореференције многопрошлог за индонезијски', 'ro': 'O rezoluție de corefență a siturilor multiple pentru indonezia', 'kk': 'Индонезия үшін көптеген Sieve бағдарламаларының айырмашылығы', 'so': 'Koreference Resolution for Indonesian', 'sv': 'En Coreferensresolution med flera pass för siktning för indonesiska', 'ta': 'Name', 'si': 'ඉන්ඩෝනේසියානු වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් පාස් සියව් කෝරෙෆෙරෙන්සියාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්', 'ur': 'انڈونزین کے لئے Multi-Pass Sieve Coreference Resolution', 'vi': 'Giải quyết xuyên suốt lá phiếu cho Lãnh Tụ Indonesia', 'uz': 'IndoneziyaName', 'hr': 'Rezolucija za višeprolaznu Sieve koreferenciju za Indoneziju', 'bg': 'Резолюция за многократно преминаване на сито за индонезийски', 'da': 'En resolution om flere passager af sigtning for Indonesien', 'ko': '인도네시아어의 다통체는 모두 해소를 가리킨다', 'nl': 'Een multi-pass zeef Coreference resolutie voor Indonesisch', 'sw': 'Hudumu ya Usafiri wa Kupitia Usafiri wa Kihindi', 'id': 'Resolusi Multi-Pass Sieve Coreference untuk Indonesia', 'de': 'Eine Multi-Pass Siebe Coreferenz Resolution für Indonesisch', 'tr': 'Indoneziýanyň birnäçe gezek arkalanyşy', 'af': "'n Multi-Pass Sieve Koreferensie Resolusie vir IndonesiëName", 'sq': 'Një rezolutë bashkëdrejtimi me shumë kalime për Indonezinë', 'hy': 'Ինդոնեզիան', 'fa': 'Name', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'İndonezi üçün çox-keçici Sieve Koreferens Çözünürlüyü', 'bn': 'ইন্দোনেশিয়ার জন্য একটি মাল্টি পাস সিভ কোরেফেন্স সিলেশন', 'ca': 'Una Resolució de Coreferència de Sieve Multi-Pass per a Indonèsia', 'bs': 'Rezolucija za multi-Pass Sieve koreferencije za Indoneziju', 'cs': 'Víceprůchodové sítové usnesení pro indonéské společnosti', 'fi': 'Multi-Pass Sieve Coreference Resolution for Indonesian', 'et': 'Mitme läbipääsuga sõela Coreference resolutsioon Indoneesia jaoks', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'פתרון קופירנציה במעבר רב לאינדונזי', 'sk': 'Več prehodov sito Coreference resolucija za indonezijsko', 'bo': 'སྣ་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་Sieve གཟུགས་གཙོ་བོའི་དབུགས་ཐག་མིན་ཐག', 'jv': 'Resolusi Cébro Multi-pass Sive kanggo Ndoleh Pangan'}
{'en': 'Coreference resolution is an NLP task to find out whether the set of referring expressions belong to the same concept in discourse. A multi-pass sieve is a deterministic coreference model that implements several layers of sieves, where each sieve takes a pair of correlated mentions from a collection of non-coherent mentions. The multi-pass sieve is based on the principle of high precision, followed by increased recall in each sieve. In this work, we examine the portability of the multi-pass sieve coreference resolution model to the Indonesian language. We conduct the experiment on 201 Wikipedia documents and the multi-pass sieve system yields 72.74 % of MUC F-measure and 52.18 % of BCUBED F-measure.', 'ar': 'Coreference Resolution هي مهمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية (NLP) لمعرفة ما إذا كانت مجموعة التعبيرات المرجعية تنتمي إلى نفس المفهوم في الخطاب. المنخل متعدد الممرات هو نموذج مرجعي حتمي ينفذ عدة طبقات من المناخل ، حيث يأخذ كل غربال زوجًا من الإشارات المترابطة من مجموعة من الإشارات غير المتماسكة. يعتمد الغربال متعدد الممرات على مبدأ الدقة العالية ، متبوعًا بزيادة السحب في كل غربال. في هذا العمل ، ندرس إمكانية نقل نموذج دقة مرجع المنخل متعدد التمريرات إلى اللغة الإندونيسية. نجري التجربة على 201 من وثائق Wikipedia ونظام الغربال متعدد المسارات ينتج 72.74٪ من MUC F- مقياس و 52.18٪ من مقياس BCUBED F.', 'es': 'La resolución de correferencias es una tarea de la PNL para averiguar si el conjunto de expresiones de referencia pertenece al mismo concepto en el discurso. Un tamiz multipaso es un modelo de correferencia determinista que implementa varias capas de tamices, donde cada tamiz toma un par de menciones correlacionadas de una colección de menciones no coherentes. El tamiz de paso múltiple se basa en el principio de alta precisión, seguido de una mayor recuperación en cada tamiz. En este trabajo, examinamos la portabilidad del modelo de resolución de correferencia de tamiz de múltiples pasadas al idioma indonesio. Llevamos a cabo el experimento en 201 documentos de Wikipedia y el sistema de tamiz multipaso produce el 72,74% de la medida F de MUC y el 52,18% de la medida F de BCUBED.', 'fr': "La résolution de coréférence est une tâche de NLP visant à déterminer si l'ensemble d'expressions référentes appartient au même concept dans le discours. Un tamis multipasse est un modèle de coréférence déterministe qui implémente plusieurs couches de tamis, chaque crible prenant une paire de mentions corrélées à partir d'une collection de mentions non cohérentes. Le tamis multipasse est basé sur le principe de la haute précision, suivie d'un rappel accru dans chaque tamis. Dans ce travail, nous examinons la portabilité du modèle de résolution de coréférence du tamis multipasse vers la langue indonésienne. Nous menons l'expérience sur 201 documents Wikipédia et le système de tamis multipasses donne 72,74\xa0% de la mesure F MUC et 52,18\xa0% de la mesure F BCUBED.", 'pt': 'A resolução de correferência é uma tarefa da PNL para descobrir se o conjunto de expressões referenciais pertence ao mesmo conceito no discurso. Uma peneira de múltiplas passagens é um modelo de correferência determinístico que implementa várias camadas de peneiras, onde cada peneira recebe um par de menções correlacionadas de uma coleção de menções não coerentes. A peneira multi-passagem é baseada no princípio de alta precisão, seguido de maior recolhimento em cada peneira. Neste trabalho, examinamos a portabilidade do modelo de resolução de correferência multi-pass sieve para o idioma indonésio. Conduzimos o experimento em 201 documentos da Wikipédia e o sistema de peneira multipassagem rende 72,74% da medida F do MUC e 52,18% da medida F do BCUBED.', 'ja': 'コアリファレンス解決は、参照表現のセットがディスカッションで同じ概念に属するかどうかを調べるためのNLPタスクです。マルチパスふるいは、いくつかの層のふるいを実装する決定論的コアレファレンスモデルであり、各ふるいは、非コヒーレントな言及の集合から相関する言及のペアを取ります。マルチパスふるいは、高精度の原理に基づいており、各ふるいでリコールが増加します。本作では、インドネシア語へのマルチパスふるいコアレゾリューションモデルの移植性について検討する。私たちは201のウィキペディア文書で実験を行い、マルチパスふるいシステムは、MUC Fメジャーの72.74 ％とBCUBED Fメジャーの52.18 ％を得ます。', 'hi': 'Coreference संकल्प यह पता लगाने के लिए एक NLP कार्य है कि क्या अभिव्यक्तियों को संदर्भित करने का सेट प्रवचन में एक ही अवधारणा से संबंधित है। एक बहु-पास छलनी एक नियतात्मक कोरफेरेंस मॉडल है जो छलनी की कई परतों को लागू करता है, जहां प्रत्येक छलनी गैर-सुसंगत उल्लेखों के संग्रह से सहसंबद्ध उल्लेखों की एक जोड़ी लेता है। मल्टी-पास छलनी उच्च परिशुद्धता के सिद्धांत पर आधारित है, जिसके बाद प्रत्येक छलनी में रिकॉल में वृद्धि हुई है। इस काम में, हम इंडोनेशियाई भाषा के लिए बहु-पास छलनी कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्यूशन मॉडल की पोर्टेबिलिटी की जांच करते हैं। हम 201 विकिपीडिया दस्तावेजों पर प्रयोग करते हैं और मल्टी-पास छलनी प्रणाली MUC F-माप का 72.74% और BCUBED F-माप का 52.18% पैदावार करती है।', 'zh': 'Coreference解析者,NLP事也,所以求引表达式集语同名也。 多通道筛是一确定性共推理模型,其成重筛,每筛从一朋非相干提及中取一双相关。 多道筛基于高精度理,随于每筛中增召率。 于是考之多通道筛共理解析印度尼西亚语之可移植性。 于201维基百科文档上实验之,多通道筛系统生72.74%之MUC F量直52.18%之BCUBED F。', 'ru': 'Разрешение Coreference является задачей NLP, чтобы выяснить, принадлежит ли набор ссылочных выражений к одной и той же концепции в дискурсе. Многопроходное сито - это детерминированная модель керна, которая реализует несколько слоев сит, где каждое сито берет пару коррелированных упоминаний из коллекции некогерентных упоминаний. Многопроходное сито основано на принципе высокой точности с последующим увеличением количества отзывов в каждом сите. В этой работе мы изучаем переносимость модели разрешения многопроходного ситового ядра на индонезийский язык. Мы проводим эксперимент на 201 документе Википедии, и многопроходная ситовая система дает 72,74% F-измерения MUC и 52,18% F-измерения BCUBED.', 'ga': 'Is tasc de chuid NLP é taifeach croí-chomhdhála chun fáil amach an mbaineann an tacar de nathanna tagartha leis an gcoincheap céanna sa dioscúrsa. Is samhail de chroílár cinntitheach é criathar ilphas a chuireann sraitheanna éagsúla de chriathar i bhfeidhm, ina nglacann gach criathar péire tagairtí comhghaolmhara ó bhailiúchán tagairtí neamhchomhleanúnacha. Tá an criathar il-pas bunaithe ar phrionsabal na cruinneas ard, agus ina dhiaidh sin athghairm méadaithe i ngach criathar. San obair seo, scrúdaíonn muid inaistritheacht na samhla réitigh croíchomhdhála criathar ilphas chuig an Indinéisis. Déanaimid an turgnamh ar 201 doiciméad Vicipéid agus tugann an córas criathar ilphas 72.74% de thomhas-F MUC agus 52.18% de thomhas-F BCUBED.', 'hu': 'A Coreferencia-felbontás egy NLP feladat annak megállapítására, hogy a hivatkozó kifejezések halmaza ugyanazon koncepcióhoz tartozik-e a diskurzusban. A többmenetes szita egy determinisztikus coreferencia modell, amely több rétegű szitát hajt végre, ahol minden szita egy pár korrelált említést vesz a nem koherens említések gyűjteményéből. A többmenetes szita a nagy pontosság elvén alapul, amelyet minden szitában fokozott visszahívás követ. Ebben a munkában megvizsgáljuk a többmenetes szita coreferencia felbontási modell indonéz nyelvre való hordozhatóságát. A kísérletet 201 Wikipédia dokumentumon végezzük, és a többmenetes szita rendszer a MUC F mértékének 72,74%-át és a BCUBED F mértékének 52,18%-át eredményezi.', 'el': 'Το ψήφισμα της συναπόφασης είναι ένα έργο NLP για να εξακριβωθεί αν το σύνολο των αναφερόμενων εκφράσεων ανήκει στην ίδια έννοια στον λόγο. Ένα κόσκινο πολλαπλών περασμάτων είναι ένα ντετερμινιστικό μοντέλο που εφαρμόζει διάφορα στρώματα κόσκινου, όπου κάθε κόσκινο παίρνει ένα ζευγάρι συσχετισμένων αναφορών από μια συλλογή μη συνεκτικών αναφορών. Το κόσκινο πολλαπλών περασμάτων βασίζεται στην αρχή της υψηλής ακρίβειας, ακολουθούμενο από αυξημένη ανάκληση σε κάθε κόσκινο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε τη φορητότητα του μοντέλου επίλυσης πολυμορφίας κόσκινου στην ινδονησιακή γλώσσα. Διεξάγουμε το πείραμα σε έγγραφα της Βικιπαίδειας 201 και το σύστημα κόσκινου πολλαπλών διαστάσεων αποδίδει 72,74% του μέτρου και 52,18% του μέτρου Φ.', 'it': "La risoluzione della coreferenza è un compito NLP per scoprire se l'insieme delle espressioni di riferimento appartiene allo stesso concetto nel discorso. Un setaccio multi-passaggio è un modello deterministico di coreferenza che implementa diversi strati di setacci, dove ogni setaccio prende una coppia di menzioni correlate da una raccolta di menzioni non coerenti. Il setaccio multipassa si basa sul principio di alta precisione, seguito da un maggiore richiamo in ogni setaccio. In questo lavoro esaminiamo la portabilità del modello di risoluzione della coreferenza del setaccio a più passaggi alla lingua indonesiana. Conduciamo l'esperimento su 201 documenti Wikipedia e il sistema di setaccio multi-passaggio produce il 72,74% della misura F MUC e il 52,18% della misura F BCUBED.", 'lt': 'Bendrosios konferencijos rezoliucija yra NLP užduotis nustatyti, ar nuorodos į tai pačiai sąvokai priklauso kalboje. Daugiakrypčio sieto model is – tai lemiamojo nuokrypio modelis, kuriame įdiegiami keli sietų sluoksniai, kai kiekvienas sietas gauna porą koreliuotų minčių iš nesuderinamų minčių rinkinio. Daugiakryptinis sietas grindžiamas aukšto tikslumo principu, po to kiekviename siete dažniau atsiimamas. Šiame darbe išnagrinėjame daugiapakopio sieto nuokrypio rezoliucijos modelio perkeliamumą į Indonezijos kalbą. Eksperimentuojame 201 Wikipedia dokumentų metu, o daugiapakopio sieto sistema gauna 72,74 % MUC F ir 52,18 % BCUBED F priemonių.', 'mk': 'Coreference resolution is an NLP task to find out whether the set of referring expressions belong to the same concept in discourse.  A multi-pass sieve is a deterministic coreference model that implements several layers of sieves, where each sieve takes a pair of correlated mentions from a collection of non-coherent mentions.  The multi-pass sieve is based on the principle of high precision, followed by increased recall in each sieve.  In this work, we examine the portability of the multi-pass sieve coreference resolution model to the Indonesian language.  Ние го спроведуваме експериментот на 201 документи од Википедија и мултипасниот систем на седишта дава 72,74 отсто од МУЦ мерка Ф и 52,18 отсто од BCUBED мерка Ф.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്ന പ്രഭാഷണങ്ങളുടെ സെറ്റ് പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d കോ ഒരു മള്\u200dപാസ് സീവ് ഒരു നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് മോഡലാണ്. അത് പല തടാകങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ ഓരോ സീവിവും കണക്കിലുള്ള പ The multi-pass sieve is based on the principle of high precision, followed by increased recall in each sieve.  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പല-പാസ്സിന്റെ സീവ് കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് റിലേഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ഇന്തോനേഷ്യന്\u200d ഭാഷ 201 വിക്കിപീഡിയയുടെ രേഖകളില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണത്തെ നടത്തുന്നു. പല-പാസ്സ് സീവ് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 72.', 'ms': 'Resolusi rujukan adalah tugas NLP untuk mengetahui sama ada set ungkapan rujukan milik konsep yang sama dalam ungkapan. Sebuah penyelamat berbilang-laluan adalah model keterangan yang menentukan yang melaksanakan beberapa lapisan penyelamat, di mana setiap penyelamat mengambil sepasang sebutan yang berkorrelasi dari koleksi sebutan yang tidak konsisten. Penutup berbilang-laluan berdasarkan prinsip ketepatan tinggi, diikuti oleh peningkatan pengulangan dalam setiap penutup. In this work, we examine the portability of the multi-pass sieve coreference resolution model to the Indonesian language.  We conduct the experiment on 201 Wikipedia documents and the multi-pass sieve system yields 72.74% of MUC F-measure and 52.18% of BCUBED F-measure.', 'mn': 'Хамгийн чухал шийдвэрлэл бол NLP даалгавар юм. Олон давхар ширхэг нь хэдэн давхар ширхэг загварыг дамжуулдаг хэд хэдэн давхар ширхэг загвар юм. Тэнд ширхэг бүр хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо холбогдсон Олон дагуулын ширхэг нь өндөр тодорхойлолтын зарчмын үндсэн, дараа нь ширхэг бүрийн дурсамж нэмэгдсэн. Энэ ажлын тулд бид Индонезийн хэл руу олон дахь шийдвэрлэлийн загварыг судалж байна. Бид 201 оны Wikipedia баримтуудын туршилтыг хийсэн бөгөөд олон дахь ширхэг систем нь MUC F-хэмжээний 72.74% болон BCUBED F-хэмжээний 52.18%.', 'no': 'Høftoppløysing er ein NLP-oppgåve for å finna om settet av referanser-uttrykk høyrer til den same konsepten i diskursen. Eit multi pass sieve er ein deterministisk koreferansmemodel som implementerer fleire lag av sieve, der kvar sieve tar eit par korrelaterte menyar frå eit samling av ikkje-koherent menyar. Multipass sieve er basert på prinsippen av høg presisjon, etterfulgt av økt rekoll i kvar sieve. I denne arbeiden er vi undersøk at det fleire gjennomgående oppløysingsmodulet er overført til Indonesisk språk. Vi gjer eksperimentet på 201 Wikipedia-dokument og multi pass sieve-systemet gjer 72,74 % av MUC F-målet og 52,18 % av BCUBED F-målet.', 'pl': 'Rozwiązanie współpracy jest zadaniem NLP mającym na celu ustalenie, czy zbiór odwołujących się wyrażeń należy do tego samego pojęcia w dyskursie. Sito wieloprzepustowe jest deterministycznym modelem koreferencji, który implementuje kilka warstw sit, gdzie każde sito bierze parę skorelowanych wzmianek z kolekcji niespójnych wzmianek. Sito wieloprzepustowe opiera się na zasadzie wysokiej precyzji, po czym następuje zwiększony odzysk w każdym sitie. W niniejszej pracy badamy możliwość przenoszenia modelu rozdzielczości współprzepustowej sita do języka indonezyjskiego. Przeprowadzamy eksperyment na dokumentach 201 Wikipedii, a system sitowy wielopłaszcza wydaje 72,74% miary F MUC oraz 52,18% miary F BCUBED.', 'kk': 'Қайшылық айырымдылығы - NLP тапсырмасы дискурстың бір концепциясына қатынасын анықтау үшін. Көптеген жұмыс - бірнеше қабатты жұмыс қабаттарды іске асыратын дефицистикалық сәйкестік үлгісі. Әрбір жұмыс сәйкестік емес мәліметтердің жинағынан бірнеше сәйкестік сәйкестіктерді ал Көптеген жүгірткі көптеген дәл дәл-дәл принципіне негізделген, әрбір жүгірткінде еске салу үшін көптеген. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз Индонезиялық тіліне көп жұмыс сәйкестігінің айырмашылығын тексереміз. Біз 201 Википедия құжаттары туралы экспериментті жұмыс істейміз. МUC F-өлшемінің 72,74% және BCUBED F-өлшемінің 52,18%.', 'mt': 'Ir-riżoluzzjoni tal-koreferenza hija kompitu tal-NLP biex jiġi stabbilit jekk is-sett ta’ espressjonijiet ta’ referenza jappartjenx għall-istess kunċett fid-diskors. Siġill b’ħafna pass a ġġi huwa mudell ta’ korreferenza determinanti li jimplimenta diversi saffi ta’ siġill, fejn kull siġill jieħu pari ta’ semmijiet korrelati minn ġabra ta’ semmijiet mhux koerenti. Is-sieve b’ħafna passaġġi hija bbażata fuq il-prinċipju ta’ preċiżjoni għolja, segwita minn żieda fil-ġbir lura f’kull sieve. In this work, we examine the portability of the multi-pass sieve coreference resolution model to the Indonesian language.  We conduct the experiment on 201 Wikipedia documents and the multi-pass sieve system yields 72.74% of MUC F-measure and 52.18% of BCUBED F-measure.', 'ro': 'Rezolvarea coreferenței este o sarcină PNL pentru a afla dacă setul de expresii de referință aparțin aceluiași concept în discurs. O sită cu mai multe treceri este un model determinist de coreferență care implementează mai multe straturi de sită, în care fiecare sită ia o pereche de mențiuni corelate dintr-o colecție de mențiuni non-coerente. Sita cu mai multe treceri se bazează pe principiul de înaltă precizie, urmată de o retragere sporită în fiecare sită. În această lucrare, examinăm portabilitatea modelului de rezoluție a corefenței sitei multiple în limba indoneziană. Realizăm experimentul pe 201 documente Wikipedia, iar sistemul de sită cu trecere multiplă produce 72,74% din măsura F MUC și 52,18% din măsura F BCUBED.', 'ka': 'კონფერენციის განსაზღვრება არის NLP სამუშაო, რომელიც გავიგოთ თუ არა განსაზღვრებული გამოსახულების კონფიგურაცია იგივე კონფიგურაციისთვის. მრავალ პროსექტის კოლექტიკური მოდელია, რომელიც მრავალ კოლექტიკური კოლექტიკური მოდელია, რომელიც ყოველ კოლექტიკური კოლექტიკური კოლექტიკური კოლექტიკური შესახე მრავალ-პროცენტის სიახლის პრინციპზე დაბაზიან, რომელიც ყველა სიახლის შემდეგ უფრო მეტად დაიწყება. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ინდონეციური ენაზე მრავალ-პოსექტის კონტრექციის მოდელის პორექციალურობას შევხედავთ. ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ექსპერიმენტის 201 ვიკიპედიაში დოკუმენტებში და მრავალ-პროცენტის სისტემის 72,74% MUC F-ზომის და 52,18% BCUBED F-ზომის.', 'so': 'Go’aanka kaararka waa shaqada NLP, si uu u ogaado in kooxda hadalka lagu soo jeedo uu ka mid yahay fikrada isku mid ee hadalka. Dalka baasaboor badan waa sameynta caawimaadda, kaas oo qabanqaabiya qeybo kala duduwan, kaas oo ku qoran qoraal kasta oo la xiriira laga soo ururiyo xujooyin aan la xiriirin. Dalka baasaboorka badan waxay ku saleysan yihiin qaynuunka aad u sahlan, waxaana lagu soo raacay xasuusta aad u kordhaya hareeraha oo dhan. Markaas waxan waxaynu baaraynaa sameynta sameynta qeybta heerka ee luqada Indonesia. Imtixaanka baaritaanka ee Wikipedia 201 ayaannu sameynaa dukumentiyada iyo nidaamka baaritaanka kala duduwanu waxay bixisaa 72,74% oo ka mid ah MUC F-measure iyo 52.18% BCUBED F-measure.', 'sr': 'Rezolacija korisnosti je zadatak NLP-a da otkrije da li skup izraza koje se odnose pripada istom konceptu u diskusiji. Višeprolazna sieva je određeni model koreferencije koji implementira nekoliko slojeva sieva, gde svaka sieva uzima par korelacijskih spomena iz kolekcije neskladnih spomena. Višeprolazna sieva se temelji na principu visoke preciznosti, a nakon toga je povećana sjećanja u svakoj sievi. U ovom poslu, pregledavamo prenošljivost modela rezolucije multi-pass sieve koreferencije na Indonezijski jezik. Mi vodimo eksperiment na 201 Wikipedia dokumenta i multi pass sieve sistem daje 72,74% MUC F-mjere i 52,18% BCUBED F-mjere.', 'sv': 'Coreference resolution är en NLP-uppgift för att ta reda på om uppsättningen referensuttryck tillhör samma begrepp i diskursen. En multi-pass sil är en deterministisk coreferencemodell som implementerar flera lager av silar, där varje sil tar ett par korrelerade omnämnanden från en samling icke-sammanhängande omnämnanden. Multipasssikten bygger på principen om hög precision, följt av ökad återkoppling i varje sikt. I det här arbetet undersöker vi möjligheten att överföra modellen för flerpasssigt till det indonesiska språket. Vi genomför experimentet på 201 Wikipedia-dokument och multi-pass siktsystemet ger 72,74% av MUC F-mått och 52,18% av BCUBED F-mått.', 'ur': 'اچھا رخصت روشنی NLP کا کام ہے کہ جان لیں کہ کیا ارشاد مثالیں ایک ہی رخصت میں ہیں۔ ایک متعدد پاسس سیوی ایک مقررہ مہربانی موڈل ہے جو بہت سی لائر سیویں کی عملوم کرتا ہے، جہاں ہر سیوی ایک جوڑی مہربانی کا ذکر کرتا ہے جو غیر مشترک ذکر کی جمع کرتی ہے. بہت سی چوٹی چوٹی اس کے بعد ہر چوٹی میں بہت زیادہ یاد کرتی ہے اس کام میں ہم نے انڈونزین زبان کے لئے multi pass sieve coreference موڈل کی پورتبلیٹی کی تحقیق کی۔ ہم نے 201 ویکیپیڈیا ڈکومکینوں میں آزمائش کی اور ملتی پیس سیوی سیسٹم میں 72.74% MUC F-اندازے اور 52.18% BCUBED F-اندازے کے۔', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிட்ட கூற்றுகளின் அமைப்பு பேச்சில் ஒரே கருத்தில் இருக்கிறதா என்பதை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு NLP செயல். பல கடவுச்செல்லும் தீவிரமான குறிப்பு மாதிரி அது பல அடுக்குகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது, ஒவ்வொரு துண்டிக்கும் ஒரு இணைப்பு குறிப்புகளிலிருந்து ஒரு  The multi-pass sieve is based on the principle of high precision, followed by increased recall in each sieve.  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் பல கடவுச் சீவ் குறிப்பு தெளிவுத்திறன் மாதிரியை இந்தோனேசிய மொழிக்கு பரிசோதிக்கிறோம். 201 விகிபிடியா ஆவணங்களில் நாம் சோதனைப்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் பல கடவுச்செல்லும் திசைவு அமைப்பில் 72.74% MUC F-அளவில் 72.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන විස්තරය NLP වැඩිය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විස්තරයක් සම්බන්ධ විස්තරයෙන් එකම විස්තරයෙන් අයිති කියල A Multi-pass sieve is a deterministic corepherson Model that exerts a number of layer of sieves, where all sieve holds a double compared spots from a collection of non-coherent spots. ගොඩක් පාස් සියව් අධාරිත විශ්වාසයේ අධාරිත විශ්වාසය, පස්සෙන් හැම සියවෙලාවක්ම විශ්වාසයෙන්  මේ වැඩේ අපි ඉන්ඩෝනේසියානු භාෂාවට ගොඩක් පාස් සියව් කෝරෙෆෙර්ස් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය පරීක්ෂා කර අපි 201 විකිපිඩියාවේ පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා විකිපිඩියාවේ ලිපිණිපත්තු වලින් වඩා වඩා පාස් සියව් පද්ධතියෙන් MUC F-මාප 72.74% වලින් BCUBED', 'vi': 'Thành lập nghị quyết đó là nhiệm vụ của ngôn ngữ quốc gia để tìm hiểu xem bộ dạng chỉ thị có giống nhau trong cuộc đối thoại hay không. Một cái sàng trải nhiều đèo là một mô hình săm Giám mục, thực hiện nhiều lớp sàn lọc, nơi mỗi sàn lọc lấy một cặp các đề cập liên quan từ một bộ sưu tập các đề cập không liên quan. Cái sàng lọc nhiều vượt được dựa trên nguyên tắc độ chính xác cao, sau đó là sự thu hồi tăng trong mỗi sàng lọc. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi xem xét khả năng chuyển giao của mô hình có khả năng hủy diệt nhiều kính sang ngôn ngữ Indonesia. Chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm trên tài liệu nóc Wikipedia, và hệ thống sàn lọc nhiều lần sẽ cho thấy 72.74=.* của MUC F-thước đo và 52.18. của BCUBED F-thước đo.', 'uz': "Name Ko'pchilik vazifa - bir qancha qatlamni ishga tushirish mumkin. Bu yerda ko'pchilik qo'llanmalar bir ikki bogʻ'liq taxminan qo'llanmalarni bir xil qo'llab qo'yish mumkin. Ko'pchilik vazifasi eng yuqori darajaga asosida, keyin har bir vaqtda qo'yish qoidaga qo'shiladi. Bu ishda biz bir necha marta ko'pchilik boshqaruv murojaat modelini Indoneziya tilga qaramaymiz. 201 Wikipedia hujjatlarini bajaramiz va bir necha marta shifoy tizimi MUC F-metrlarining 72.74% va 52.18% BCUBED F-metrlarini bajaramiz.", 'bg': 'Решаването на кореференцията е задача на НЛП, за да се разбере дали наборът от препращащи изрази принадлежи към една и съща концепция в дискурса. Многопропусково сито е детерминистичен модел на кореференция, който прилага няколко слоя сита, където всяко сито взема двойка корелационни споменания от колекция от несвързани споменания. Многопропусковото сито се основава на принципа на висока точност, последвано от повишено изземване във всяко сито. В тази работа изследваме преносимостта на модела за разделителна способност на многопропускателното сито към индонезийския език. Провеждаме експеримента върху 201 документа на Уикипедия и системата за многопропусково сито дава 72,74% от МУК Ф-мярка и 52,18% от БУБЕД Ф-мярка.', 'da': 'Coreference resolution er en NLP-opgave at finde ud af, om sættet af henvisningsudtryk hører til det samme begreb i diskursen. En multi-pass sigte er en deterministisk coreferencemodel, der implementerer flere lag sigter, hvor hver sigte tager et par korrelerede omtaler fra en samling af ikke-sammenhængende omtaler. Multipasssigten er baseret på princippet om høj præcision efterfulgt af øget tilbagekaldelse i hver sigte. I dette arbejde undersøger vi muligheden for at overføre multi-pass sigtekoreference resolution model til det indonesiske sprog. Vi gennemfører eksperimentet på 201 Wikipedia-dokumenter og multi-pass sigtesystemet giver 72,74% af MUC F-mål og 52,18% af BCUBED F-mål.', 'hr': 'Rezolucija korisnosti je zadatak NLP-a kako bi otkrio da li skup izraza koje se odnose pripada istom konceptu u diskusiji. Višeprolazna sieva je određujući model pristojnosti koji provodi nekoliko slojeva sieva, gdje svaka sieva uzima par korelacijskih spomena iz kolekcije neuskladnih spomena. Višeprolazna sieva je temeljena na principu visoke preciznosti, slijedeći povećanom sjećanju na svakoj sievi. U ovom poslu, pregledavamo prenošljivost modela rezolucije višeprolaznih sitnih pristojnosti na Indonezijski jezik. Mi provodimo eksperiment na 201 Wikipedia dokumentima i multi pass sieve sustav daje 72,74% MUC F-mjere i 52,18% BCUBED F-mjere.', 'nl': 'Coreference resolutie is een NLP taak om na te gaan of de verzameling verwijzende uitdrukkingen in discours tot hetzelfde concept behoren. Een multi-pass zeef is een deterministisch coreferentiemodel dat verschillende lagen zeeven implementeert, waarbij elke zeef een paar gecorreleerde vermeldingen uit een verzameling niet-coherente vermeldingen neemt. De multi-pass zeef is gebaseerd op het principe van hoge precisie, gevolgd door verhoogde terugroeping in elke zeef. In dit werk onderzoeken we de overdraagbaarheid van het multi-pass zeef coreference resolutiemodel naar de Indonesische taal. We voeren het experiment uit op 201 Wikipedia documenten en het multi-pass zeefsysteem levert 72,74% van MUC F-meting en 52,18% van BCUBED F-meting.', 'de': 'Die Coreference Resolution ist eine NLP-Aufgabe, um herauszufinden, ob die Gruppe der Bezugsausdrücke im Diskurs zum gleichen Konzept gehört. Ein Multi-Pass-Sieb ist ein deterministisches Coreferenzmodell, das mehrere Schichten von Sieben implementiert, wobei jedes Sieb ein Paar korrelierter Erwähnungen aus einer Sammlung nicht kohärenter Erwähnungen nimmt. Das Mehrpasssieb basiert auf dem Prinzip der hohen Präzision, gefolgt von einem erhöhten Rückruf in jedem Sieb. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir die Portabilität des Multipass-Sieb-Coreferenz-Auflösungsmodells auf die indonesische Sprache. Wir führen das Experiment an 201 Wikipedia Dokumenten durch und das Multipass Siebsystem liefert 72,74% des MUC F-Maßes und 52,18% des BCUBED F-Maßes.', 'id': 'Resolusi koreferensi adalah tugas NLP untuk mencari tahu apakah set ekspresi referensi milik konsep yang sama dalam diskors. Sebuah benteng multi-pass adalah model koreferensi determinis yang mengimplementasi beberapa lapisan benteng, di mana setiap benteng mengambil sepasang sebutan yang berkorelatesi dari koleksi sebutan yang tidak koherent. Benteng multi-pass berdasarkan prinsip presisi tinggi, diikuti oleh peningkatan pengingat di setiap benteng. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami memeriksa portabilitas model resolusi multi-pass sieve coreference ke bahasa Indonesia. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada dokumen Wikipedia 201 dan sistem penyelamat multi-pass menghasilkan 72,74% dari ukuran F MUC dan 52,18% dari ukuran F BCUBED.', 'ko': '공지소해는 자연 언어 처리 임무로 문장 중의 한 조의 지칭 표현이 같은 개념에 속하는지 찾아내는 것이 목적이다.다중 체는 확정적인 공지 모델로 몇 층의 체를 실현했는데 그 중에서 각 체는 한 조의 비상간 언급에서 한 쌍의 관련 언급을 추출한다.여러 개의 체는 고정밀의 원칙에 근거한 다음에 각 체의 리콜률을 증가시킨다.이 작업에서 우리는 인도네시아 언어에서의 이식 가능성을 다통체 공통적으로 연구했다.우리는 201개의 위키백과 문서에서 다중 채널 선별 시스템의 MUC F-measure와 BCUBED F-measure의 생산률이 각각 72.74%와 52.18% 로 실험을 진행했다.', 'sw': 'Uamuzi wa Baraza la Mabadiliko ni kazi ya NLP kutambua ikiwa seti ya maoni ya kujieleza ni ya dhana hiyo katika mazungumzo. Vizuizi vingi vingi ni muundo wa msingi unaotekeleza vipande kadhaa vya mabomu, ambapo kila vikosi kinachukua majina mawili yanayohusiana na makundi yanayohusiana na watu wasio na ushirikiano. Mazungumzo ya kupitishwa kwa mara nyingi yanategemea kanuni ya ukweli wa juu, na kufuatia kukumbuka kwa kila vikwazo. In this work, we examine the portability of the multi-pass sieve coreference resolution model to the Indonesian language.  Tunafanya majaribio katika nyaraka za Wikipedia mwaka 201 na mfumo wa vikwazo vingi vinatoa asilimia 72.74 ya MUC F na asilimia 52.18 ya BCUBED F.', 'tr': 'Ýardam çözümleri NLP täblisasidir, sözleşmeler boýunça bir düşünjä meňzeýändigini öňlemek üçin. Birnäçe gökyş dişi, birnäçe gökyş diňe süýtgeden çykyşyň içine alýan deterministik nähili bir nusgdur. Bu ýerde her a ýyş, kohereket däl çykyşyň bir toparyndan birnäçe gepleşikli bir nusga alýar. Birnäçe gezek ýokary dogrudylygyň prinsipine daýanýar, we her gezek öňünde hatyrylygy artdyr. Bu işde, Indoneziýa dilinde örän geçişi örnekleriniň taýýarlandyrylygyny barýarys. Biz 201-nji Vikipediýa senediň barlag etdik we köp-ýüz syýasatyň 72.74% MUC F ölçüsi we BCUBED F ölçüsi 52.18%.', 'af': "Hoofheidsoplossing is 'n NLP taak om uit te vind of die stel van verwysing uitdrukkings aan dieselfde konsepte in diskursie behoort. 'n Multipass sieve is 'n deterministiese koreferensie model wat verskeie laag van sieve implementeer, waar elke sieve 'n paar korrelasieerde mentione neem van' n versameling van nie-koherent mentione. Die multi pass sieve is gebaseer op die prinsipe van hoë presisie, volg deur vergroot rekening in elke sieve. In hierdie werk, ondersoek ons die portabiliteit van die multi-pass sieve-voorwerp-oplossing model na die Indonesiese taal. Ons doen die eksperiment op 201 Wikipedia-dokumente en die multi-pass sieve stelsel gee 72.74% van MUC F-maat en 52.18% van BCUBED F-maat.", 'fa': 'راه حل پیشنهاد یک کار NLP است تا بفهمید که آیا مجموعه اشاره\u200cهای اشاره به یک مفهوم در صحبت تعلق دارد. یک دیوار بسیاری از گذشته\u200cها یک مدل محافظت تصمیم\u200cگیری است که چند طبقه از دیوار\u200cها را اجرا می\u200cکند، جایی که هر دیوار دو جفت از ذکر\u200cهای متصل از جمع\u200cآوری از ذکر\u200cهای متصل نیستند. دیوار بسیار زیادی بر اساس اصل دقیق بالا است، پس از یاد افزایش در هر دیوار. در این کار، ما مدل تأکید حفاظت زیادی را به زبان اندونیزی تحقیق می کنیم. ما آزمایش را در سند ویکیپدییا ۲۰۱ انجام می دهیم و سیستم سیم سیم سیم متعددی ۲۲.۷۴% از مقدار MUC F و ۲۲.۱۸% از مقدار BCUBED F می دهد.', 'am': 'የኩነቶች ውይይት በንግግር ውስጥ በአንድ አካባቢ መሆኑን ማረጋገጥ የNLP ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ በብዙ ልዕራብ የኮርፖርት አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ሞዴል ነው፡፡ የብዙ አካባቢ ግንብ ከፍ ከፍ ያለውን አካሄድ አካል በመሠረት ላይ ነው፥ በኋላም በየአካባቢው ሁሉ ላይ ማስታወስ ይጨመርበታል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ የብዙው የክፍለ ሥርዓት መልዕክት የኢንዶኒያዊ ቋንቋ አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በ201 Wikipedia ሰነዶች ላይ ፈተናውን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Rezoluta e korrferencës është një detyrë NLP për të zbuluar nëse grupi i shprehjeve të referuara i përket të njëjtit koncept në diskors. Një rrjedhë me shumë kalime është një model përcaktues korreference që zbaton disa shtresa rrjedhëse, ku secili rrjedhës merr një çift përmendimesh të lidhura nga një koleksion përmendimesh jo koherente. The multi-pass sieve is based on the principle of high precision, followed by increased recall in each sieve.  Në këtë punë, ne e shqyrtojmë portabilitetin e modelit të zgjidhjes së korreferencës me shumë kalime në gjuhën indoneziane. Ne kryejmë eksperimentin në 201 dokumente të Wikipedias dhe sistemi i mbylljes me shumë kalime jep 72.74% të masës F të MUC dhe 52.18% të masës F të BCUBED.', 'az': 'Mərhəmətli çözünürlük NLP işidir, söhbətlərin istifadə etdiyi ifadələrin qurduğunu öyrənmək üçün. Multipass sieve, bir neçə səviyyədə dişləndirir ki, hər dişlən bir neçə səviyyədə müəyyən edilməz məlumatların koleksiyonundan bir cüt müxtəlif məlumatları alır. Multipass sieve yüksək qiymətin prinsipinə dayanır, sonra hər tərəfdə daha çox yad edilir. Bu işdə, biz Indoneziya dilinə çoxlu-pass sieve-coreference modelinin götürülməsini incidirik. Biz 201 Wikipedia belələrində imtahana çəkirik və çox-pass sieve sistemi MUC F ölçülərinin 72,74%-ini və BCUBED F ölçülərinin 52,18%-ini veririk.', 'hy': 'Կորեֆերանսի լուծումն է ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքն այն պարզելու համար, թե արդյոք վերաբերյալ արտահայտությունների համակարգը պատկանում է նույն գաղափարին խոսակցության մեջ: Բազմահատվածային ցանցը նշանակալի կորեֆերանսի մոդել է, որը իրականացնում է մի քանի շերտեր ցանցը, որտեղ յուրաքանչյուր ցանցը վերցնում է մի զույգ կապված հիշողություններ ոչ կապված հիշողությունների հավաքածուց: Բազմահատվածային ցանցը հիմնված է բարձր ճշգրտության սկզբունքի վրա, հետևում է ամեն ցանցը աճող վերադարձում: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք բազմահատվածային հաղորդակցման մոդելի տեղափոխելիությունը Ինդոնեզիայի լեզուն: Մենք կատարում ենք փորձը 201 Վիքիփեդիայի փաստաթղթերի վրա, և բազմահատվածային հատվածային համակարգի արդյունքում ստանում ենք 72.74 տոկոսը ՄՈԿ F-չափումից և 52.18 տոկոսը BCUBED F-չափումից:', 'bn': 'কোরেফারেন্সের সিদ্ধান্ত হচ্ছে এনএলপি কাজ যাতে বুঝতে পারে যে প্রকাশের বৈশিষ্ট্য এই কথোপকথনে একই ধারণার মাধ্ মাল্টিপাসের সিরিভ হচ্ছে একটি নির্ধারিত কোরেন্স মডেল যা বেশ কয়েকটি স্তরের বিরুদ্ধে বাস্তবায়ন করে, যেখানে প্রত্যেক সিরিভের উল্লেখের সংগ্ মাল্টি পাসের সিয়েভ উচ্চমূল্যের নীতির উপর ভিত্তি করেছে, তার পরে প্রত্যেক অবরোধের স্মরণ বৃদ্ধি পেয়েছে। এই কাজে আমরা মাল্টি পাসের সিয়েভ কোরেফেন্স সিলেন্সের মোডেল ইন্দোনেশিয়ার ভাষার প্রতি প্রতিযোগিতা পরীক্ষা করি। ২০১১ সালের উইকিপিডিয়া নথিপত্রে আমরা পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করি এবং বহুপাস-পাস সিভি সিস্টেমের ৭২.', 'cs': 'Coreferenční řešení je úkolem NLP zjistit, zda soubor odkazujících výrazů patří do stejného konceptu v diskurze. Víceprůchodové síto je deterministický koreferenční model, který implementuje několik vrstev sít, kde každé síto bere dvojici korelovaných zmínek ze sbírky nekonzistentních zmínek. Víceprůchodové síto je založeno na principu vysoké přesnosti, po němž následuje zvýšený odvolání v každém sítě. V této práci zkoumáme přenositelnost multi-passového sítového modelu koreferenčního rozlišení do indonéského jazyka. Experiment provádíme na dokumentech 201 Wikipedie a víceprůchodový sítový systém využívá 72,74% MUC F-měření a 52,18% BCUBED F-měření.', 'bs': 'Rezolucija korisnosti je zadatak NLP-a da otkrije da li skup predloženih izraza pripada istom konceptu u diskusiji. Višeprolazna sieva je određujući model pristojnosti koji implementira nekoliko slojeva sieva, gdje svaka sieva uzima par korelacijskih spomena iz kolekcije neuskladnih spomena. Višeprolazna sieva se temelji na principu visoke preciznosti, slijedeći povećanom sjećanju u svakoj sievi. U ovom poslu, pregledavamo prenošljivost modela rezolucije višeprolaznih sitnih pristojnosti na Indonezijski jezik. Mi vodimo eksperiment na 201 Wikipedia dokumenta i multi pass sieve sistem daje 72,74% MUC F-mjere i 52,18% BCUBED F-mjere.', 'ca': "La resolució de coreferència és una tasca del NLP per descobrir si el conjunt d'expressions referides pertany al mateix concepte en discurs. Una sieva multi-pass és un model de coreferència determinista que implementa diverses capes de sieves, on cada sieva agafa un parell de mentions correlacionades d'una col·lecció de mentions no coherents. La sieva multipassada es basa en el principi d'alta precisió, seguida d'una recuperació incrementada en cada sieva. En aquest treball, examinem la portabilitat del model de resolució de coreferència de sieve multi-pass a la llengua indonésia. Hem fet l'experiment en 201 documents de Wikipedia i el sistema de siet multi-pass produeix 72,74% de la mesura F de la MUC i 52,18% de la mesura F de la BCUBED.", 'fi': 'Coreferenssiratkaisu on NLP:n tehtävä selvittää, kuuluuko viittaavien ilmaisujen joukko samaan käsitteeseen diskurssissa. Moniläpivientiseula on deterministinen korferenssimalli, joka toteuttaa useita seulakerroksia, joissa jokainen seula ottaa pari korreloitua mainintaa epäjohdonmukaisten mainintojen kokoelmasta. Monisyöttöseula perustuu korkean tarkkuuden periaatteeseen, jota seuraa lisääntynyt takaisinveto kussakin seulassa. Tässä työssä tutkitaan monikerroksisen seulan koreferenssiresoluutiomallin siirrettävyyttä indonesian kielelle. Tutkimme 201 Wikipedia-dokumenttia ja monisyöttöseulontajärjestelmä tuottaa 72,74% MUC F-mitasta ja 52,18% BCUBED F-mitasta.', 'et': 'Koreferensi lahendamine on uue tööprogrammi ülesanne selgitada välja, kas viitavate väljendite kogum kuulub diskursuses samasse kontseptsiooni. Mitmekülgne sõel on deterministlik sõelumismudel, mis rakendab mitut sõelakihti, kus iga sõel võtab paari korrelatsioonilist märkust mittekohuste märkuste kogumist. Mitmekülgsõel põhineb suure täpsuse põhimõttel, millele järgneb iga sõela suurem tagasivõtmine. Käesolevas töös uurime mitmekäigulise sõela koreferenssi resolutsiooni mudeli ülekantavust indoneesia keelde. Eksperiment viiakse läbi 201 Wikipedia dokumendiga ning mitmekäigulise sõela süsteem annab 72,74% MUC F-mõõdist ja 52,18% BCUBED F-mõõdist.', 'ha': "Tsarin Cornference yana da wani aikin NLP don ya gane kowa'in daidaita maganar ajiya na zama da shi cikin mazaɓa. Wani mai maras-bayan mulki shi ne wata misali mai ƙayyade, wanda ke sami wasu zanjayi, inda kowace cewa yana karɓi sunan-biyu daga koma'in da ba'a haɗe su ba. The multi-shige is based on the kimar sarki, followed by an ƙãre memory in each shige. In this work, we examine the portability of the multi-pass sieve coreference resolution model to the Indonesian language.  Ko samun takardar Wikimedia 201 da aka sami tsarin girgije masu multi-maiti, yana da 81.74% wa MUC F-balanci kuma 52.18% na BCUBED F-ƙayyade.", 'jv': 'Menu item "multi-pass" jeneng sistem sing dadi nggawe coreferning nggawe sistem sing nyebute nggawe Layer 1, ning awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan segala kejahatan Multi-pass yang dipunangé uwong ngomong nik kabèh perusahaan seneng pisan banget, dadi wis mulai gawe ngupakan seneng pisan seneng pisan. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné nyong bisa ngubah perusahaan anyar dengang nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan anyar bantêr. Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan kanggo nggambar tokkument nang 2011, banjur sistem sing nyebutaké nyebuté kapan mulasar 75%.', 'sk': 'Reševanje koreference je naloga NLP, da ugotovimo, ali sklop referenčnih izrazov pripada istemu konceptu v diskurzu. Večprečno sito je deterministični model koreference, ki izvaja več plasti sitov, kjer vsako sito vzame par korelacijskih omemb iz zbirke neskladnih omemb. Večprečno sito temelji na načelu visoke natančnosti, ki mu sledi večji odpoklic v vsakem sito. V tem delu preučujemo prenosljivost modela koreferenčne ločljivosti večprehodnega sita v indonezijski jezik. Eksperiment izvajamo na 201 Wikipedijskih dokumentih in sistem večprečnega sita prinaša 72,74% MUC F-meritve in 52,18% BCUBED F-meritve.', 'he': 'הפתרון הקודם הוא משימה של NLP לברר אם הקבוצה של ביטויים מתייחסים שייכת לאותו מושג בתנאי. A multi-pass sieve is a deterministic coreference model that implements several layers of sieves, where each sieve takes a pair of correlated mentions from a collection of non-coherent mentions.  המעגל המולט-דרכים מבוסס על העקרון של מדויק גבוה, ולאחר מכן זיכרון גבוה בכל המעגל. בעבודה הזו, אנו בודקים את היכולת של מודל הפתרון של סיבוב סיבוב במעברים רבים לשפה האינדונזית. אנו מבצעים את הניסוי על 201 מסמכים ויקיפדיה, והמערכת המעטפת במעבר רב מובילה 72.74% ממדידת F MUC ו-52.18% ממדידת F BCUBED.', 'bo': 'Coreference resolution is an NLP task to find out whether the set of referring expressions belong to the same concept in discourse. Multi-pass sieve ནི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། The multi-pass sieve is based on the principle of high precision, followed by increased recall in each sieve. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་གི་སྣ་ཚོགས་གཙང་གཅད་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་201་བརྩིས་བློ་ཚིག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་ཕྱོགས་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་གིས་ལབ་པའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'PyEuroVoc : A Tool for Multilingual Legal Document Classification with EuroVoc Descriptors', 'ar': 'PyEuroVoc: أداة لتصنيف المستندات القانونية متعددة اللغات باستخدام واصفات EuroVoc', 'pt': 'PyEuroVoc: Uma Ferramenta para Classificação Multilíngue de Documentos Jurídicos com Descritores EuroVoc', 'fr': 'PyEuroVoc\xa0: un outil de classification des documents juridiques multilingues avec des descripteurs EuroVoc', 'es': 'PyEuroVoc: una herramienta para la clasificación multilingüe de documentos legales con descriptores de EuroVoc', 'ja': 'PyEuroVoc ： EuroVoc記述子を使用した多言語法律文書分類のためのツール', 'ru': 'PyEuroVoc: инструмент для многоязычной классификации правовых документов с дескрипторами EuroVoc', 'zh': 'PyEuroVoc:用 EuroVoc 言符,多言法文档分类之具', 'hi': 'PyEuroVoc: EuroVoc डिस्क्रिप्टर के साथ बहुभाषी कानूनी दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण के लिए एक उपकरण', 'ga': 'PyEuroVoc: Uirlis chun Doiciméad Dlíthiúil Ilteangach a Aicmiú le Tuairisceoirí EuroVoc', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένα εργαλείο για την ταξινόμηση πολυγλωσσικών νομικών εγγράφων με περιγραφείς', 'hu': 'PyEuroVoc: A többnyelvű jogi dokumentumok besorolásának eszköze EuroVoc leírókkal', 'it': 'PyEuroVoc: uno strumento per la classificazione dei documenti giuridici multilingue con i descrittori EuroVoc', 'kk': 'PyEuroVoc: EuroVoc сипаттамаларымен бірнеше тілді жақсы құжат классификациясы үшін құрал', 'lt': 'PyEuroVoc: daugiakalbio teisinio dokumento klasifikavimo su EuroVoc aprašytojais įrankis', 'mk': 'PyEuroVoc: Инструмент за класификација на мултијазички правен документ со описници на EuroVoc', 'ms': 'PyEuroVoc: Alat untuk Pengklasifikasi Dokumen Hukum Berbahasa dengan Penulis EuroVoc', 'mn': 'PyEuroVoc: EuroVoc тодорхойлогчдын олон хэлний хууль баримтын классификацийн хэрэгсэл', 'mt': 'PyEuroVoc: Għodda għall-Klassifikazzjoni tad-Dokument Legali Multilingwi mad-Deskritturi tal-EuroVoc', 'ml': 'പിയൂറോവോക്ക്: Multilingual Legal Documentation Classification with EuroVoc Descriptors', 'no': 'PyEuroVoc: A Tool for Multilingual Legal Document Classification with EuroVoc Descriptors', 'ro': 'PyEuroVoc: Un instrument pentru clasificarea documentelor juridice multilingve cu descriptorii EuroVoc', 'pl': 'PyEuroVoc: Narzędzie do wielojęzycznej klasyfikacji dokumentów prawnych z opisem EuroVoc', 'sr': 'PyEuroVoc: Alat za klasifikaciju međujezičkih pravnih dokumenta sa opisivačima EuroVoc', 'so': 'PyEuroVoc: A Tool for sharciga sharciga luuqadaha badan oo kala duduwan', 'sv': 'PyEuroVoc: Ett verktyg för flerspråkig klassificering av juridiska dokument med EuroVoc Descriptors', 'si': 'PyEVoc: ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් නීතිය ලිපින්ත විශේෂණය සමඟ යුද්ධය', 'ta': 'பையூரோவோக்: பல மொழிகளுக்கு ஒரு கருவி', 'ur': 'PyEuroVoc: EuroVoc Descriptors کے ساتھ multilingual Legal Document Classification Tool', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'PyEuro Voc: Một công cụ cho việc mô tả pháp lý đa ngôn ngữ với các mô tả Euron.', 'nl': 'PyEuroVoc: Een hulpmiddel voor meertalige classificatie van juridische documenten met EuroVoc-descriptoren', 'bg': 'PyEuroVoc: Инструмент за многоезична класификация на правни документи с описания на ЕвроVoc', 'da': 'PyEuroVoc: Et værktøj til klassificering af flersprogede juridiske dokumenter med EuroVoc beskrivere', 'hr': 'PyEuroVoc: alat za klasifikaciju višejezičkog pravnog dokumenta s opisivačima EuroVoc', 'de': 'PyEuroVoc: Ein Werkzeug zur mehrsprachigen Klassifizierung von Rechtsdokumenten mit EuroVoc Descriptoren', 'ko': 'PyEuroVoc: EuroVoc 설명자를 사용하여 다국어 법률 파일을 분류하는 도구', 'id': 'PyEuroVoc: Alat untuk Klasifikasi Dokumen Hukum Berbahasa Dengan Deskriptor EuroVoc', 'fa': 'PyEuroVoc: یک ابزار برای شناسایی سند قانونی چند زبان با توصیف\u200cکنندگان EuroVoc', 'sw': 'PyEuroVoc: Kifaa kinachotengenezwa kwa Sheria za Kilugha nyingi kwa ajili ya maelezo ya Ulaya', 'af': "PyEuroVoc: ' n Gereedskap vir veelvuldige regverdige dokument klassifisering met EuroVoc beskrywers", 'sq': 'PyEuroVoc: Një mjet për klasifikimin e dokumentit ligjor shumëgjuhës me përshkrimtarët e EuroVoc', 'tr': 'PyEuroVoc: EuroVoc deskriptörleri bilen bir köp dilli Maglumat Senedleri', 'am': 'Voc: A tool for Multilingual Legal Document Classification with EuroVoc Descriptors', 'az': 'PyEuroVoc: EuroVoc Tafsilələri ilə çoxlu dilli Yaxşı Dəstə Klasifikasiyası üçün bir Araç', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'PyEuroVoc: ইউরোভো ডিস্ক্রিপ্টরের সাথে বহুভাষী আইনগত নথি ক্লাসিকেশনের একটি টুল', 'ca': 'PyEuroVoc: Una eina de classificació multilingüe de documents legals amb descriptors EuroVoc', 'cs': 'PyEuroVoc: Nástroj pro vícejazyčné klasifikaci právních dokumentů s popisy EuroVoc', 'bs': 'PyEuroVoc: alat za klasifikaciju multijezičkih pravnih dokumenta sa opisivačima EuroVoc', 'et': 'PyEuroVoc: vahend mitmekeelse juriidilise dokumendi klassifitseerimiseks EuroVoci kirjeldajatega', 'fi': 'PyEuroVoc: työkalu monikieliseen oikeudellisten asiakirjojen luokitteluun EuroVoc-kuvaajien avulla', 'jv': 'piraVoc: A Tool kanggo Dokumen Ligatining Multi-Lingui Kesik Gandhisik karo YuVoc Descriptor', 'ha': 'Voc: A tool for multilinguin Legal Document Classification with URVoc descriptors', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'PyEuroVoc: orodje za večjezično klasifikacijo pravnih dokumentov z EuroVoc opisovalci', 'bo': 'PyEuroVoc: A Tool for Multilingual Legal Document Classification with EuroVoc Descriptors'}
{'en': 'EuroVoc is a multilingual thesaurus that was built for organizing the legislative documentary of the European Union institutions. It contains thousands of categories at different levels of specificity and its descriptors are targeted by legal texts in almost thirty languages. In this work we propose a unified framework for EuroVoc classification on 22 languages by fine-tuning modern Transformer-based pretrained language models. We study extensively the performance of our trained models and show that they significantly improve the results obtained by a similar tool-JEX-on the same dataset. The code and the fine-tuned models were open sourced, together with a programmatic interface that eases the process of loading the weights of a trained model and of classifying a new document.', 'ar': 'EuroVoc هو قاموس متعدد اللغات تم إنشاؤه لتنظيم الفيلم الوثائقي التشريعي لمؤسسات الاتحاد الأوروبي. إنه يحتوي على آلاف الفئات على مستويات مختلفة من الخصوصية ويتم استهداف واصفاتها بنصوص قانونية في ما يقرب من ثلاثين لغة. في هذا العمل نقترح إطارًا موحدًا لتصنيف EuroVoc على 22 لغة من خلال ضبط نماذج اللغة الحديثة القائمة على المحولات. ندرس على نطاق واسع أداء نماذجنا المدربة ونبين أنها تحسن النتائج التي تم الحصول عليها بواسطة أداة مماثلة - JEX - على نفس مجموعة البيانات. كانت الشفرة والنماذج المضبوطة مفتوحة المصدر ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع واجهة برمجية تسهل عملية تحميل أوزان نموذج مدرب وتصنيف مستند جديد.', 'fr': "EuroVoc est un thésaurus multilingue qui a été créé pour organiser le documentaire législatif des institutions de l'Union européenne. Il contient des milliers de catégories à différents niveaux de spécificité et ses descripteurs sont ciblés par des textes juridiques dans près de trente langues. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un cadre unifié pour la classification EuroVoc sur 22 langues en affinant les modèles linguistiques préentraînés modernes basés sur Transformer. Nous étudions de manière approfondie les performances de nos modèles entraînés et montrons qu'ils améliorent de manière significative les résultats obtenus par un outil similaire, JEX, sur le même ensemble de données. Le code et les modèles affinés étaient open source, ainsi qu'une interface programmatique qui facilite le processus de chargement des poids d'un modèle entraîné et de classification d'un nouveau document.", 'pt': 'EuroVoc é um tesauro multilingue que foi construído para organizar o documentário legislativo das instituições da União Europeia. Ele contém milhares de categorias em diferentes níveis de especificidade e seus descritores são alvo de textos legais em quase trinta idiomas. Neste trabalho, propomos uma estrutura unificada para classificação EuroVoc em 22 idiomas, ajustando modelos de linguagem pré-treinados baseados em Transformers modernos. Estudamos extensivamente o desempenho de nossos modelos treinados e mostramos que eles melhoram significativamente os resultados obtidos por uma ferramenta semelhante - JEX - no mesmo conjunto de dados. O código e os modelos ajustados foram de código aberto, juntamente com uma interface programática que facilita o processo de carregamento dos pesos de um modelo treinado e de classificação de um novo documento.', 'es': 'EuroVoc es un tesauro multilingüe que se creó para organizar el documental legislativo de las instituciones de la Unión Europea. Contiene miles de categorías con diferentes niveles de especificidad y sus descriptores están dirigidos por textos legales en casi treinta idiomas. En este trabajo proponemos un marco unificado para la clasificación de EuroVOC en 22 idiomas mediante el ajuste de modelos lingüísticos preentrenados basados en Transformer modernos. Estudiamos exhaustivamente el rendimiento de nuestros modelos entrenados y demostramos que mejoran significativamente los resultados obtenidos con una herramienta similar, JEX, en el mismo conjunto de datos. El código y los modelos ajustados eran de código abierto, junto con una interfaz programática que facilita el proceso de carga de los pesos de un modelo entrenado y de clasificación de un nuevo documento.', 'ja': 'EuroVocは、欧州連合機関の立法文書を整理するために構築された多言語用シソーラスです。これには、さまざまなレベルの特異性の数千のカテゴリが含まれており、その記述子は、ほぼ30の言語の法的テキストによってターゲットとされています。この研究では、現代のTransformerベースの事前に訓練された言語モデルを微調整することにより、22言語でのEuroVoc分類の統一されたフレームワークを提案します。私たちは、訓練されたモデルのパフォーマンスを幅広く研究し、同じデータセット上の類似のツールであるJEXによって得られた結果を大幅に改善することを示します。コードと微調整されたモデルは、トレーニングされたモデルの重みをロードし、新しい文書を分類するプロセスを容易にするプログラマティックインターフェースと共にオープンソースされました。', 'zh': 'EuroVoc多言词典,欧盟立法纪录片立也。 其包数千类,其符是近三十种语言法本。 于是微调基于Transformer世,为22种语者EuroVoc类建一框架。 博究模范之性,显善同数集上因类器JEX得也。 代码、调,开源也,及一编程界面也,简加载练其权重,异于新文档。', 'ru': 'EuroVoc - это многоязычный тезаурус, созданный для организации законодательной документации учреждений Европейского союза. Он содержит тысячи категорий на разных уровнях специфичности, и его дескрипторы ориентированы на юридические тексты почти на 30 языках. В этой работе мы предлагаем унифицированную основу для классификации EuroVoc на 22 языках путем тонкой настройки современных языковых моделей на основе трансформеров. Мы подробно изучаем эффективность наших обученных моделей и показываем, что они значительно улучшают результаты, полученные с помощью аналогичного инструмента - JEX - на том же наборе данных. Код и доработанные модели были получены из открытых источников вместе с программным интерфейсом, который облегчает процесс загрузки весов обученной модели и классификации нового документа.', 'hi': 'EuroVoc एक बहुभाषी थिसॉरस है जिसे यूरोपीय संघ के संस्थानों के विधायी वृत्तचित्र के आयोजन के लिए बनाया गया था। इसमें विशिष्टता के विभिन्न स्तरों पर हजारों श्रेणियां शामिल हैं और इसके वर्णनकर्ताओं को लगभग तीस भाषाओं में कानूनी ग्रंथों द्वारा लक्षित किया जाता है। इस काम में हम 22 भाषाओं पर EuroVoc वर्गीकरण के लिए एक एकीकृत ढांचे का प्रस्ताव ठीक ट्यूनिंग आधुनिक ट्रांसफॉर्मर आधारित pretrained भाषा मॉडल द्वारा. हम अपने प्रशिक्षित मॉडल के प्रदर्शन का बड़े पैमाने पर अध्ययन करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि वे एक ही डेटासेट पर एक समान उपकरण - जेईएक्स - द्वारा प्राप्त परिणामों में काफी सुधार करते हैं। कोड और ठीक-ठाक मॉडल खुले स्रोत थे, साथ ही एक प्रोग्रामेटिक इंटरफ़ेस के साथ जो एक प्रशिक्षित मॉडल के वजन को लोड करने और एक नए दस्तावेज़ को वर्गीकृत करने की प्रक्रिया को आसान बनाता है।', 'ga': 'Is teasáras ilteangach é EuroVoc a tógadh chun clár faisnéise reachtach institiúidí an Aontais Eorpaigh a eagrú. Tá na mílte catagóir ann ag leibhéil éagsúla sainiúlachta agus dírítear ar a thuairisceoirí trí théacsanna dlíthiúla i mbeagnach tríocha teanga. San obair seo molaimid creat aontaithe d’aicmiú EuroVoc ar 22 teanga trí mhionchoigeartú a dhéanamh ar mhúnlaí teanga réamhoilte nua-aimseartha atá bunaithe ar an gClaochladán. Déanaimid staidéar fairsing ar fheidhmíocht ár samhlacha oilte agus léirímid go bhfeabhsaíonn siad go suntasach na torthaí a fhaightear trí uirlis den chineál céanna - JEX - ar an tacar sonraí céanna. Foinsíodh an cód agus na samhlacha mionchoigeartaithe, mar aon le comhéadan cláir a éascaíonn an próiseas chun meáchain samhail oilte a lódáil agus chun doiciméad nua a rangú.', 'hu': 'Az EuroVoc egy többnyelvű tezaurusz, amelyet az Európai Unió intézményeinek jogalkotási dokumentumának megszervezésére építettek. Több ezer kategóriát tartalmaz különböző sajátossági szinteken, és leíróit közel harminc nyelven megjelenő jogi szövegek célozzák meg. Ebben a munkában az EuroVoc osztályozásának egységes keretrendszerét javasoljuk 22 nyelven a modern Transformer alapú előképzett nyelvi modellek finomhangolásával. Alaposan tanulmányozzuk képzett modelleink teljesítményét, és megmutatjuk, hogy jelentősen javítják a hasonló eszköz - JEX - által ugyanazon adatkészleten elért eredményeket. A kód és a finomhangolt modellek nyílt forráskódú voltak, valamint egy olyan programos interfész, amely megkönnyíti egy képzett modell súlyának betöltését és egy új dokumentum osztályozását.', 'el': 'Το EuroVoc είναι ένας πολύγλωσσος θησαυρός που δημιουργήθηκε για την οργάνωση του νομοθετικού ντοκιμαντέρ των θεσμικών οργάνων της Ευρωπαϊκής Ένωσης. Περιέχει χιλιάδες κατηγορίες σε διαφορετικά επίπεδα εξειδίκευσης και οι περιγραφείς του στοχεύουν από νομικά κείμενα σε σχεδόν τριάντα γλώσσες. Στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε ένα ενοποιημένο πλαίσιο για την ταξινόμηση των 22 γλωσσών μέσω της τελειοποίησης σύγχρονων προτύπων γλώσσας βασισμένων στον μετασχηματιστή. Μελετάμε εκτενώς την απόδοση των εκπαιδευμένων μοντέλων μας και αποδεικνύουμε ότι βελτιώνουν σημαντικά τα αποτελέσματα που επιτυγχάνονται από ένα παρόμοιο εργαλείο με το στο ίδιο σύνολο δεδομένων. Ο κώδικας και τα εκλεπτυσμένα μοντέλα ήταν ανοιχτού κώδικα, μαζί με μια προγραμματική διεπαφή που διευκολύνει τη διαδικασία φόρτωσης των βαρών ενός εκπαιδευμένου μοντέλου και ταξινόμησης ενός νέου εγγράφου.', 'ka': 'EuroVoc არის მრავალენგური ტესასური, რომელიც იქნება, რომელიც იქნება ევროპოსონის ინსტუტიციების legislative დოკუმენტაციის ორგანიზაციისთვის. ის აქვს ათასობით კატეგორია განსხვავებული განსაზღვრებულობის დონეში და მისი განსაზღვრებელი ძალიან ტექსტის მიხედვით დასაწყებული 30 ენაში. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ ერთადერთი ფრამეტრი EuroVoc კლასიფიკაციაზე 22 ენაზე, რომელიც ახალი ტრანფორმეტრისტერის განსაზღვრებული ენათების მოდელების გამოყენებით. ჩვენ გავსწავლობთ ჩვენი მოდელების გამოყენებას და ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელების გამოყენებას და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ისინი მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფ პროგრამიკური ინტერფესტი, რომელიც განახლებელია მოდელის სიმაღლე და ახალი დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაციის პროცესი.', 'it': "EuroVoc è un thesaurus multilingue costruito per organizzare il documentario legislativo delle istituzioni dell'Unione Europea. Contiene migliaia di categorie a diversi livelli di specificità e i suoi descrittori sono oggetto di testi giuridici in quasi trenta lingue. In questo lavoro proponiamo un framework unificato per la classificazione EuroVoc su 22 lingue, mettendo a punto moderni modelli linguistici pre-addestrati basati su Transformer. Studiamo approfonditamente le prestazioni dei nostri modelli addestrati e mostriamo che migliorano significativamente i risultati ottenuti da uno strumento simile - JEX - sullo stesso set di dati. Il codice e i modelli perfezionati erano open source, insieme ad un'interfaccia programmatica che facilita il processo di caricamento dei pesi di un modello addestrato e di classificazione di un nuovo documento.", 'kk': 'EuroVoc - Еуропалық Союз институттарының законодативті құжаттамасын орындау үшін құрылған көптеген тіл тесаурусы. Бұл әртүрлі ерекшелік деңгейінде миңдеген санаттар бар және оның сипаттамалары жалғыз мәтіндері жалғыз 30 тілде мақсат етіледі. Бұл жұмыстың біріктірілген EuroVoc классификациясының 22 тілде біріктірілген фреймін қолданамыз. Қазіргі Трансформациялық тіл үлгілерін баптау арқылы. Біз оқылған үлгілеріміздің істеу және олар бір деректер жиынында ұқсас құралы - JEX- қараған нәтижелерді көп жақсартып көрсетеді. Код мен жақсы бапталған үлгілер көзгертілген, бағдарламалық интерфейсімен бірге бағдарламалық интерфейсі, бақылау үлгісін жүктеу және жаңа құжатты классификациялау процесін өзгертеді.', 'lt': 'EuroVoc yra daugiakalbis tezaurus, sukurtas Europos Sąjungos institucijų teisėkūros dokumentams organizuoti. It contains thousands of categories at different levels of specificity and its descriptors are targeted by legal texts in almost thirty languages.  Šiame darbe siūlome suvienodintą EuroVoc klasifikavimo 22 kalbomis sistemą patobulinant šiuolaikinius Transformer pagrįstus ikimokomus kalbų modelius. Išsamiai tiriame mūsų parengtų modelių rezultatus ir rodome, kad jie gerokai pagerina panašios priemonės - JEX - rezultatus tame pačiame duomenų rinkinyje. Kodas ir patikslinti modeliai buvo atviri, taip pat programinė sąsaja, palengvinanti apmokomo modelio svorio pakrovimą ir naujo dokumento klasifikavimą.', 'mk': 'EuroVoc е мултијазичен тезаурус кој беше изграден за организација на легислативниот документарен филм на институциите на Европската унија. Таа содржи илјадници категории на различни нивоа на специфичност и нејзините описи се насочени со правни тексти на скоро триесет јазици. In this work we propose a unified framework for EuroVoc classification on 22 languages by fine-tuning modern Transformer-based pretrained language models.  Ги проучуваме екстремно изведувањата на нашите обучени модели и покажуваме дека тие значително ги подобруваат резултатите добиени со слична алатка - ЈЕКС - на истиот податок. Кодот и финетизираните модели беа отворени, заедно со програмски интерфејс кој го олеснува процесот на вчитување на теговите на обучен модел и класификација на нов документ.', 'ms': 'EuroVoc adalah tesaur berbilang bahasa yang dibina untuk mengatur dokumen undang-undang institusi Uni Eropah. Ia mengandungi ribuan kategori pada tahap spesifik yang berbeza dan penerangnya ditujukan oleh teks undang-undang dalam hampir tiga puluh bahasa. Dalam kerja ini kami melamar kerangka bersatu untuk klasifikasi EuroVoc pada 22 bahasa dengan menyesuaikan model bahasa berasaskan Transformer modern. Kami mempelajari prestasi model terlatih kami secara luas dan menunjukkan bahawa mereka meningkatkan keputusan yang diperoleh oleh alat yang sama - JEX - pada set data yang sama. Kod dan model yang disesuaikan adalah sumber terbuka, bersama dengan antaramuka program yang memudahkan proses memuatkan berat model terlatih dan mengklasifikasikan dokumen baru.', 'ml': 'യൂറോപ്പയോണിയന്\u200d സ്ഥാനങ്ങളുടെ നിയമപ്രമാണത്തിനുള്ള രേഖകള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കാനായി ഒരു പല ഭാഷക്കാര്\u200d തിയൂസറാണ് യ അതില്\u200d ആയിരക്കണക്കിന് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിഭാഗങ്ങളുണ്ട്. അതിന്റെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d മുപ്പതു ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിയമമായ പദാവലികള്\u200d ലക് ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d 22 ഭാഷകളില്\u200d യൂറോവോക്ക് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു യൂണിക്ക് ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചെയ്യ നമ്മുടെ പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രഭാവം വിശാലമായി പഠിക്കുകയും, ഒരു പോലുള്ള ഉപകരണത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും അവയുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ മെച് കോഡും സുന്ദരിതമായ മോഡലുകളും തുറന്നുകൊണ്ടിരുന്നു. ഒരു പ്രോഗ്രാമിക്ക് ഇന്റര്\u200dഫെസ്സും കൂടെ ഒരു പ്രോഗ്രാമിറ്റിക്ക് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയിരു', 'mt': "EuroVoc huwa thesaurus multilingwi li nbena għall-organizzazzjoni tad-dokumentarju leġiżlattiv tal-istituzzjonijiet tal-Unjoni Ewropea. Fih eluf ta’ kategoriji f’livelli differenti ta’ speċifiċità u d-deskritturi tagħha huma mmirati minn testi legali fi kważi tletin lingwa. F’din il-ħidma qed nipproponu qafas unifikat għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-EuroVoc fuq 22 lingwa billi nirranġaw il-mudelli moderni tal-lingwa mħarrġa minn qabel ibbażati fuq it-Transformer. Aħna nistudjaw b'mod estensiv il-prestazzjoni tal-mudelli mħarrġa tagħna u nuru li dawn itejbu b'mod sinifikanti r-riżultati miksuba minn għodda simili - JEX - fuq l-istess sett ta' dejta. Il-kodiċi u l-mudelli rranġati kienu sors miftuħ, flimkien ma’ interfaċċja programmatika li tiffaċilita l-proċess tat-tagħbija tal-piżijiet ta’ mudell imħarreġ u tal-klassifikazzjoni ta’ dokument ġdid.", 'ro': 'EuroVoc este un tezaur multilingv care a fost construit pentru organizarea documentarului legislativ al instituțiilor Uniunii Europene. Conține mii de categorii la diferite niveluri de specificitate, iar descriptorii săi sunt vizați de texte juridice în aproape treizeci de limbi. În această lucrare propunem un cadru unificat pentru clasificarea EuroVoc pe 22 de limbi prin reglarea fină a modelelor moderne de limbi pre-instruite bazate pe Transformer. Studiem extensiv performanța modelelor noastre instruite și demonstrăm că acestea îmbunătățesc semnificativ rezultatele obținute de un instrument similar - JEX - pe același set de date. Codul și modelele reglate fin au fost open source, împreună cu o interfață programatică care ușurează procesul de încărcare a greutăților unui model instruit și de clasificare a unui nou document.', 'mn': 'EuroVoc бол Европын Холбооны байгууллагуудын хуулийн баримт баримтыг зохион байгуулахын тулд олон хэлний тезаур юм. Энэ нь олон мянга мянган төрлийн тодорхойлолтын түвшинд байдаг бөгөөд түүний тодорхойлогчид бараг 30 хэл дээр хуулийн текст зориулагддаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид EuroVoc-ын 22 хэлний хуваалцааны нэгтгэл хөрөнгө оруулсан орчин үеийн Трансформер-ын суурилсан хэл загваруудын тулд нэгтгэл хөрөнгө оруулдаг. Бид сургалтын загварын үйл ажиллагааг маш их судалж, тэд ижил өгөгдлийн сан дээр төстэй JEX-ээр гарсан үр дүнг маш чухал сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Код болон тодорхойлогдсон загварууд нээлттэй байлаа. Программатикийн интерфейстэй хамтдаа сургалтын загварын жингийг ачааллаж, шинэ бичгийг ангилах үйлдлийг хялбарчилж чадна.', 'pl': 'EuroVoc to wielojęzyczny tezaurus, który został zbudowany do organizacji dokumentu legislacyjnego instytucji Unii Europejskiej. Zawiera on tysiące kategorii o różnych poziomach specyfiki, a jego deskryptory są ukierunkowane na teksty prawne w prawie trzydziestu językach. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy ujednolicone ramy klasyfikacji EuroVoc na 22-językach poprzez dostosowanie nowoczesnych modeli językowych opartych na Transformerze. Obszernie badamy wydajność naszych przeszkolonych modeli i pokazujemy, że znacząco poprawiają one wyniki uzyskane za pomocą podobnego narzędzia:JEX na tym samym zbiorze danych. Kod i dostrojone modele były open source, wraz z programowym interfejsem ułatwiającym proces ładowania ciężarów przeszkolonego modelu i klasyfikacji nowego dokumentu.', 'no': 'EuroVoc er ein fleirspråk thesaurus som ble bygd for å organisera den legislative dokumentasjonen av europeiske unionsinstitusjonane. Det inneheld tusenvis av kategoriar på ulike spesifikasjonsnivå og deskriptorane er målt av retttekstar i nesten tretti språk. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit uniformert rammeverk for EuroVoc-klassifikasjon på 22 språk ved å finne oppsett av moderne transformeringsmodeller for språk som er foreslått. Vi studerer utviklinga av våre trengte modeller og viser at dei betydelig forbedrar resultatet som er henta av eit liknande verktøy – JEX – på samme datasett. Koden og finnstillingsmodellen vart opna kjerne, saman med eit program- grensesnitt som lettar prosessen for å lasta vekta av eit trengt modell og klassifisera eit ny dokument.', 'si': 'යුරෝවෝක් තමයි විශාල භාෂාවක් තේසෝරුස් කියලා යුරෝපිය සංවිධාන ස්ථාපනයේ නීතිපත්තික ලිප ඒකෙන් විවිධ ස්ථානයේ විවිධ ස්ථානයක් වලින් වර්ගයක් තියෙනවා සහ ඒකේ විස්තර කරුණාකරුවන්ට නීතික ප මේ වැඩේ අපි යුරෝවොක් වලින් භාෂාවක් 22 වලින් එක්කරු ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා අධ්\u200dයාත්මක වෙනස් කරුණාකරණ අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු මෝඩේල්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාලිත විදිහට පරීක්ෂණා කරනවා ඒ වගේම දත්ත සැට් එක්ක වගේම ඔවුන් ප්\u200dර කෝඩ් සහ හොඳ සැකසුම් මෝඩේල් විවෘත කරලා තියෙනවා, අලුත් ලිපිණියක් විවෘත කරන්න ප්\u200dරවෘත්තික අන්තර්ජනයක් සමග සමග විවෘ', 'sr': 'EuroVoc je multijezički thesaurus koji je izgrađen za organizaciju zakonodavnog dokumentara institucija Evropske unije. U njoj se nalazi hiljade kategorija na različitim nivoima specifičnosti i njegovi opisivači su ciljani pravnim tekstima na skoro 30 jezika. U ovom poslu predlažemo jedinstveni okvir za EuroVoc klasifikaciju na 22 jezika, tako što su moderni transformatorski modeli preklinjeni jezik. Proučavamo široko učenje naših obučenih modela i pokazujemo da značajno poboljšavaju rezultate koji su dobili sličnim alatom - JEX - na istom setu podataka. Kod i ispravni modeli su otvoreni, zajedno sa programskim interfejsom koji olakšava proces opterećenja težine obučenog model a i klasifikacije novog dokumenta.', 'sv': 'EuroVoc ﾃ､r en flersprﾃ･kig tesaurus som byggdes fﾃｶr att organisera lagstiftningsdokumentﾃ､ren om Europeiska unionens institutioner. Den innehﾃ･ller tusentals kategorier pﾃ･ olika nivﾃ･er av specificitet och dess deskriptorer riktas till juridiska texter pﾃ･ nﾃ､stan trettio sprﾃ･k. I detta arbete fﾃｶreslﾃ･r vi ett enhetligt ramverk fﾃｶr EuroVoc-klassificering pﾃ･ 22 sprﾃ･k genom finjustering av moderna Transformer-baserade fﾃｶrkrﾃ､nade sprﾃ･kmodeller. Vi studerar utfﾃｶrligt prestandan hos vﾃ･ra utbildade modeller och visar att de avsevﾃ､rt fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttrar resultaten frﾃ･n ett liknande verktyg - JEX - pﾃ･ samma dataset. Koden och de finjusterade modellerna var ﾃｶppna kﾃ､llor, tillsammans med ett programmatiskt grﾃ､nssnitt som underlﾃ､ttar processen att ladda vikterna pﾃ･ en utbildad modell och klassificera ett nytt dokument.', 'so': 'EuroVoc is a multilingual thesaurus that was built for organizing the legislative documentary of the European Union institutions.  Waxaa ku jira kumanyaal kooxo oo kala duduwan heerarka gaarka ah, oo qoraalka sharciga waxaa loogu talagalay qoraal-qoraal oo ku dhowaad soddon luuqadood. Shuqulkaas waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa koorsho ku qoran 22 luqadood oo Yurub ah, tusaalaha afka hore oo lagu soo bandhigay afka hore. Waxaynu si fiican u baranaynaa samooyinka tababarida, waxaana tusnaa inay si weyn u hagaajiyaan resultiyada laga helay qalabka isku mid ah - JEX - kaas oo ah sameynta macluumaadka. Qorada iyo modellada aad u fiican waxaa la furan jiray soul, isla markaasna waxaa la waday weji programka ah oo u fududaysiiya dhamaadka miisaanka model la tababaray iyo in loo qorayo warqad cusub.', 'ta': 'ஐரோப்பிய ய யூரோப்பியன் அமைப்புகளின் சட்ட ஆவணங்களை அமைப்பதற்காக உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பல்வேறு மொழிக் குறிப்பாகும். இதில் ஆயிரக்கணக்கான வகுப்புகள் இருக்கின்றன வேறு குறிப்பிட்ட மட்டத்தில் மற்றும் அதன் விவரிப்புகள் சட்ட மொழிகளில்  இந்த வேலையில் நாம் 22 மொழிகளில் ஒரு ஒன்றிணைக்கப்பட்ட சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். சரியான தேவையான மொழி மாற்று மாதிரிகளை  எங்கள் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாட்டை நாங்கள் விரிவாக ஆராயிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் அதே கருவியால் அவர்கள் பெற்ற முடிவுகளை மேம்படு குறியீடு மற்றும் நன்றாக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் திறந்த மூலத்தில் இருந்தன, ஒரு நிரல் இடைமுகத்துடன், அது பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியின் எடைகளை ஏற்றுவதற', 'ur': 'یورووک ایک بہت سی زبان تئسور ہے جو اروپا یونیوس کے سازمانوں کی قوانین دکھانے کے لئے بنائی گئی تھی۔ اس میں ہزاروں کاٹیوں کو مختلف سطح کی مختلف سطح میں لگا رہا ہے اور اس کے سفارش کرنے والوں کو تقریباً تیس زبانوں میں قانون لکھنے کے ذریعہ لگا رہا ہے. ہم اس کام میں 22 زبانوں پر یورووک کلاسیفوں کے لئے ایک متحدہ فرم پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو آسان ترنسفور کی بنیاد رکھنے والی زبان مدل کے ذریعہ مطابق تغییر کرتی ہے۔ ہم اپنی تربیت کی مدلکوں کی عملکرد پڑھتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ انہوں نے ایک جیسی تولیل -JEX -کے ذریعہ ان نتائج کو اضافہ کردیا ہے کوڈ اور پاکیزہ ٹونڈ موڈل کھولے گئے تھے، ایک پروگرامٹیک اینٹرنیٹ کے ساتھ جو ایک ٹرنیٹ موڈل کے وزن کو لڈ کرنے کی پروسس کو آسان کر دیتا ہے اور ایک نئی دکھائی کا کلاس کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Ewropa bir necha tillar tezaurusi, yurub yurub bunday qoidagi dokumentar qo'shish uchun yaratilgan edi. Bu yerda har xil darajada minglab tur turlari bor, va унинг descriptlari esa soddon tillarda sharciga matnlar yordamida target. Bu ishda biz 22 tillarda bir birlashtirilgan freymni tahlil qilamiz. Name Biz o'rganilgan modellarning natijasini ko'paytirib o'rganamiz va ular huddi bir xil asboblar tomonidan olingan natijalarini juda ham yaxshi ko'ra ko'rsatamiz. Kodlash va yozilgan modellar ochilgan manba bilan bir dastur interfeys bilan ochilgan edi. Ular taʼminlovchi modelning vektlarini yuklash va yangi hujjatni tayyorlash imkoniyatini осон qiladi.", 'vi': '"EuroS" là một từ điển đa ngôn ngữ được xây dựng để tổ chức cuốn phim tư liệu pháp của các tổ chức quốc tế. Nó chứa hàng ngàn loại khác nhau về mức độ đặc biệt và các mô tả của nó được nhắm vào các văn bản pháp luật trong gần ba ngôn ngữ. Trong công việc này chúng tôi đề nghị một hệ thống thống thống thống thống thống thống định dạng ngôn ngữ Euratom bằng cách tinh chỉnh các mô hình giọng biến hình mới. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu kỹ các mô hình được đào tạo của chúng tôi và cho thấy chúng cải thiện đáng kể kết quả từ một công cụ tương tự (JX) trên cùng một bộ dữ liệu. Mật mã và các mô hình hoàn chỉnh được mở nguồn, cùng với một giao diện lập trình giúp việc nạp lượng tạ của mô hình được huấn luyện và phân loại một tài liệu mới.', 'bg': 'ЕвроВок е многоезичен тезавър, създаден за организиране на законодателния документален филм на институциите на Европейския съюз. Той съдържа хиляди категории на различни нива на специфичност, а нейните дескриптори са насочени към правни текстове на почти тридесет езика. В тази работа ние предлагаме единна рамка за класификация на 22 езика чрез фина настройка на съвременните трансформаторни предварително обучени езикови модели. Изследваме обстойно ефективността на нашите обучени модели и показваме, че те значително подобряват резултатите, получени от подобен инструмент - върху същия набор от данни. Кодът и фината настройка на моделите бяха с отворен код, заедно с програматичен интерфейс, който улеснява процеса на зареждане на тежестите на обучен модел и класифициране на нов документ.', 'da': 'EuroVoc er en flersproget tesaurus, der blev bygget til at organisere den lovgivningsmæssige dokumentar om EU-institutionerne. Den indeholder tusindvis af kategorier på forskellige specifikke niveauer, og dets deskriptorer er rettet mod retstekster på næsten tredive sprog. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en fælles ramme for EuroVoc klassificering på 22 sprog ved at finjustere moderne Transformer-baserede prætrænede sprogmodeller. Vi studerer udførligt ydeevnen af vores uddannede modeller og viser, at de forbedrer resultaterne betydeligt af et lignende værktøj - JEX - på samme datasæt. Koden og de finjusterede modeller var open source sammen med en programmatisk grænseflade, der letter processen med at indlæse vægten af en uddannet model og klassificere et nyt dokument.', 'nl': 'EuroVoc is een meertalige thesaurus die is gebouwd voor het organiseren van de wetgevingsdocumentaire van de instellingen van de Europese Unie. Het bevat duizenden categorieën op verschillende niveaus van specificiteit en de descriptoren zijn gericht op juridische teksten in bijna dertig talen. In dit werk stellen we een uniform raamwerk voor EuroVoc-classificatie voor 22-talen voor door moderne Transformer-gebaseerde vooraf getrainde taalmodellen te verfijnen. We bestuderen uitvoerig de prestaties van onze getrainde modellen en tonen aan dat ze de resultaten die met een soortgelijke tool van JEX op dezelfde dataset worden verkregen aanzienlijk verbeteren. De code en de verfijnde modellen waren open source, samen met een programmatische interface die het proces van het laden van de gewichten van een getraind model en het classificeren van een nieuw document vergemakkelijkt.', 'id': 'EuroVoc adalah tesaur berbagai bahasa yang dibangun untuk mengatur dokumen legislatif dari institusi Uni Eropa. Ini mengandung ribuan kategori di tingkat spesifik yang berbeda dan deskripsinya ditujukan oleh teks hukum dalam hampir tiga puluh bahasa. Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mengusulkan cadangan yang bersatu untuk klasifikasi EuroVoc pada 22 bahasa dengan memperbaiki model bahasa modern berdasarkan Transformer. Kami mempelajari ekstensif prestasi model terlatih kami dan menunjukkan bahwa mereka meningkatkan hasil yang diperoleh oleh alat yang sama - JEX - pada set data yang sama. Kode dan model-tuned terbuka sumber, bersama dengan antarmuka program yang memudahkan proses memuat berat model terlatih dan klasifikasi dokumen baru.', 'ko': '유로 Voc은 EU 기구의 입법 다큐멘터리를 조직하는 데 사용되는 여러 언어의 동의어 라이브러리다.그것은 수천 개의 종류를 포함하고, 구체적인 정도는 각각 다르며, 묘사부호는 30개 언어에 가까운 법률 텍스트의 목표이다.이 작업에서 우리는 현대 변환기 기반의 예비 훈련 언어 모델을 마이크로스피커로 조정하여 22개 언어에 대해 EuroVoc 분류를 하는 통일된 구조를 제시했다.우리는 우리가 훈련한 모델의 성능을 광범위하게 연구했고, 그것들이 유사한 도구인 JEX를 같은 데이터 집합에서 얻은 결과를 현저하게 개선시켰다는 것을 보여 주었다.코드와 마이크로스피커를 거친 모델은 모두 기원된 것이고 프로그래밍 인터페이스가 있어 훈련을 거친 모델의 무게를 싣고 새 문서를 분류하는 과정을 간소화시켰다.', 'de': 'EuroVoc ist ein mehrsprachiger Thesaurus, der zur Organisation der Legislativdokumentation der Institutionen der Europäischen Union entwickelt wurde. Es enthält Tausende von Kategorien mit unterschiedlichen Spezifitätsstufen und seine Deskriptoren sind durch Rechtstexte in fast dreißig Sprachen abgezielt. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein einheitliches Framework für die EuroVoc-Klassifizierung auf 22-Sprachen vor, indem moderne Transformer-basierte vortrainierte Sprachmodelle optimiert werden. Wir untersuchen ausführlich die Leistung unserer trainierten Modelle und zeigen, dass sie die mit einem ähnlichen Tool wie JEX erzielten Ergebnisse signifikant verbessern. Der Code und die fein abgestimmten Modelle waren Open Source, zusammen mit einer programmatischen Schnittstelle, die das Laden der Gewichte eines trainierten Modells und die Klassifizierung eines neuen Dokuments erleichtert.', 'sw': 'EuroVoc ni nadharia ya lugha mbalimbali iliyoandaliwa kwa ajili ya kuandaa filamu ya kisheria ya taasisi za Umoja wa Ulaya. Ina maelfu ya makundi katika kiwango tofauti cha mahsusi na maelezo yake yanalengwa na maandishi ya kisheria kwa karibia lugha thelathini. Katika kazi hii tunapendekeza mfumo wa usambazaji wa lugha 22 wa Ulaya kwa kutumia mifano ya lugha ya sasa yenye asili ya KiTransformer yenye matumizi ya lugha. Tunafuatilia kwa kiasi kikubwa ufanisi wa mifano yetu iliyoendeshwa na kuonyesha kwamba wanaboresha matokeo makubwa yaliyopatikana na zana kama hizo - JEX - katika seti hiyo ya taarifa. Kodi na mifano yenye mafanikio yalianzishwa wazi, pamoja na mahusiano ya programu ambayo inapunguza mchakato wa kubeba mizigo ya muundo ulioendeshwa na kutangaza nyaraka mpya.', 'tr': "EuroVoc Avrupa Uniýasynyň kanunlary gurlamak üçin guruldy bir multi dilli tesorus. Munyň içinde näçe müňlerçe takyk derejesinde sany kategoriýalar bar we onuň tassymlaryny 30 dilde yasal metinler tarapyndan amaçlandyrylýar. Bu işde EuroVoc klasifikasynda 22 dillerde birleşik bir çerçewçi teklip edip görýäris. Şu çerçewçide moderni Transformer'e taýýarlanan ýakyn dil nusgalary bilen taýýarlanýar. Biz eğitimli modellerimizin etkinliğini büyük bir şekilde çalışıyoruz ve aynı veri setinde özelliklerin aynı bir araç tarafından -JEX -nin neticelerini önemli bir şekilde geliştirdiklerini gösteriyoruz. Köd we ýakyn düzümlenmiş modeller a çylyp, programçi interface bilen bu şekilde eğlenen nusganyň ağırlygyny ýüklemegini we täze bir sened bejermek prosesini aňsatýar.", 'fa': 'EuroVoc یک تئاتوروس بسیاری از زبان\u200cهای زبانی است که برای ساختن مدارک قانونی موسسات اتحادیه اروپایی ساخته شده است. شامل هزاران تنظیم در سطح مختلف مشخص است و توصیف\u200cکنندگان آن توسط متن قانونی در تقریباً ۳۰ زبان هدف می\u200cگیرند. در این کار، ما یک چهارچوب متحد برای classification EuroVoc بر ۲۲ زبان توسط مدل\u200cهای زبانی پیش\u200cفرض به تغییر\u200cپذیر مدرن روشن می\u200cکنیم. ما عملکرد مدلهای آموزش ما را به وسیله کشور مطالعه می کنیم و نشان می دهیم که آنها نتیجه های مشابهی را توسط یک ابزار مشابهی - JEX - در مجموعه داده های مشابهی بهبود می دهند. کد و مدل\u200cهای خوب تنظیم شده\u200cاند، با یک interface ی برنامه\u200cریزی که فرایند بار وزن\u200cهای یک مدل آموزش داده شده و یک سند جدید را آسان می\u200cکند.', 'sq': 'EuroVoc është një thesaur shumëgjuhës që u ndërtua për organizimin e dokumentarit legjislativ të institucioneve të Bashkimit Evropian. Ajo përmban mijëra kategori në nivele të ndryshme specifike dhe përshkrimtarët e saj janë synuar nga tekstet ligjore në pothuajse tridhjetë gjuhë. Në këtë punë ne propozojmë një kuadër të unifikuar për klasifikimin e EuroVoc në 22 gjuhë duke përshtatur modelet moderne të gjuhës me bazë në Transformer. Ne studiojmë në mënyrë të gjerë performancën e modeleve tona të trajnuar dhe tregojmë se ato përmirësojnë ndjeshëm rezultatet e arritura nga një mjet i ngjashëm - JEX - në të njëjtin set të dhënash. Kodi dhe modelet e rregulluara ishin të hapura, së bashku me një interfaqe programatike që lehtëson procesin e ngarkimit të peshëve të një modeli të stërvitur dhe klasifikimit të një dokumenti të ri.', 'af': "EuroVoc is 'n multilingwe thesaurus wat gebou is vir die regslatiewe dokumentaar van die Europeese Unitiese instellings te organiseer. Dit bevat duisende kategorie op verskillende vlakke van spesifiekheid en sy beskrywers word deur wetlike teks in amper dertig tale doel. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n eenvoudige raamwerk vir EuroVoc klasifikasie op 22 tale deur fyn-tuning van moderne Transformer-gebaseerde voorskryfde taal modele te stel. Ons studeer uitbreidig die prestasie van ons opgelei modele en wys dat hulle betekenlik die resultate wat deur 'n gelyke gereedskap - JEX - ontvang is, verbeter op dieselfde datastel. Die kode en die fine-tuned modele was oopgemaak, saam met 'n program koppelvlak wat die proses van laai van die gewigte van 'n opgelei model en van klassifisering van 'n nuwe dokument.", 'am': 'ዩሮቪክ የኢትዮጵያ አካባቢዎች ሕግ ሰነዱን ለመቀጠል የተሠራ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ በሺሕዎች ክፍሎች በተለያዩ ደረጃዎች ውስጥ ይኖራሉ፤ የሕግ ጽሑፎችዋም በሠላሳ ቋንቋዎች ይደረጋሉ። በዚህ ስራ 22 ቋንቋዎች ላይ የተለያየን የዩሮፓክስ መፍረጃን በመጠቀም የአሁኑን ትርጉም-based የተመሳሳይ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች እናሳልቃለን፡፡ የተጠቃሚን የሞዴላዎቻችንን ማስተምር እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የኮድ እና የተዋበ ሞላዎች የተከፈቱ ናቸው፤ በተጨማሪም የፕሮግራምት interface የሞዴል ሚዛኖችን የሚያቃልል እና አዲስ ሰነድ መክፈቻን የሚያስተካክል ነው፡፡', 'hy': "ԵվրոՎոքը բազլեզու թեզավրուս է, որը կառուցվել է Եվրոպական Միացյալ ինստիտուցիաների օրենսդրական փաստաթղթերի կազմակերպման համար: Այն պարունակում է հազարավոր կատեգորիաներ յուրաքանչյուր մասնավորության մակարդակներով, և դրա նկարագրողները նշանակում են օրինական տեքստերով գրեթե երեսուն լեզուներում: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք եվրովակի 22 լեզուների դասակարգման միավոր շրջանակ՝ բարելավելով ժամանակակից տրանսֆերմերի հիմնված նախադասակարգված լեզվի մոդելները: Մենք մեծամասնությամբ ուսումնասիրում ենք մեր վարժեցված մոդելների արտադրողությունը և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ դրանք նշանակալի բարելավում են նույն տվյալների համակարգի արդյունքները, որոնք ստացվել են նույն գործիքով' Յեքսի միջո Կոդը և բարձրացված մոդելները բաց աղբյուրներ էին, միասին ծրագրային ինտերֆեյսը, որը հեշտացնում է մարզի մոդելի կշիռը բեռնելը և նոր փաստաթղթի դասակարգումը:", 'hr': 'EuroVoc je multijezički thesaurus koji je izgrađen za organizaciju zakonodavnog dokumentara institucija Europske unije. U njemu sadrži hiljade kategorija na različitim razinama specifičnosti i opisivači su ciljani pravnim tekstima na skoro trideset jezika. U ovom poslu predlažemo ujedinjeni okvir za klasifikaciju EuroVoc na 22 jezika, kako bi se ispravljali moderni modeli preklinjenih jezika na transformeru. Proučavamo široko učenje naših obučenih modela i pokazujemo da značajno poboljšavaju rezultate koji su dobili sličnim alatom - JEX - na istom setu podataka. Kod i ispravni modeli su otvoreni, zajedno s programskim interfejsom koji olakšava proces opterećenja težine obučenog model a i klasifikacije novog dokumenta.', 'bn': 'ইউরোভোক একটি বহুভাষাভাষী ধারণা যা ইউরোপীয় ইউনিয়ন প্রতিষ্ঠানের আইনী তথ্যচিত্র আয়োজনের জন্য নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে। এর মধ্যে বিভিন্ন বিশেষ পর্যায়ে হাজার হাজার বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন স্তরে আছে এবং এর বর্ণনা প্রায় ত্রিশ ভাষায় আইনি লেখার লক এই কাজে আমরা ২২ ভাষায় ইউরোভোক ক্লাসাফেশনের জন্য একটি একত্রিত ফ্রেম প্রস্তাব করি আধুনিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভাষায় ভাষার মডেল আমরা ব্যাপক ভাবে আমাদের প্রশিক্ষিত মডেলের প্রভাব গবেষণা করছি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে তারা একই ধরনের টুলের ফলাফলের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি করেছে -  কোড এবং সুন্দর মোডেল খোলা হয়েছে, একসাথে একটি প্রোগ্রামিক ইন্টারফেস যা প্রশিক্ষিত মডেলের ওজন লোড করার প্রক্রিয়া সহজ করে দেয় এবং নতুন নথিপত্র বিভা', 'cs': 'EuroVoc je vícejazyčný thesaurus, který byl vytvořen pro organizaci legislativního dokumentu orgánů Evropské unie. Obsahuje tisíce kategorií na různých úrovních specifičnosti a jeho deskriptory jsou zaměřeny na právní texty v téměř třiceti jazycích. V této práci navrhujeme jednotný rámec pro klasifikaci EuroVoc na 22 jazycích jemným laděním moderních předtrénovaných jazykových modelů založených na Transformeru. Důkladně studujeme výkonnost našich trénovaných modelů a ukazujeme, že výrazně zlepšují výsledky získané podobným nástrojem coveJEX na stejné sadě dat. Kód a jemně vyladěné modely byly otevřené, spolu s programovým rozhraním, které usnadňuje proces nakládání závaží trénovaného modelu a klasifikace nového dokumentu.', 'az': 'EuroVoc Avropa Uniyasının qaydalarının qurduğu hökmünü organize etmək üçün inşa edilmiş çoxlu dil tezorudur. Onun müxtəlif dəyişiklik səviyyələrində minlərlə kategoriya daxil edir və onun təfsirləri neredeyse otuz dildə yasal metinlər tarafından müəyyən edilir. Bu işdə EuroVoc klasifikasyonu 22 dildə təklif edirik ki, moderni Transformer-dən təklif edilmiş dil modelləri ilə təklif edilir. Biz öyrəndiyimiz modellərin performansını çox öyrənirik və onlar eyni verilən qutularda bənzər bir vasitədə - JEX vasitəsilə gələn nəticələri çox yaxşılaşdırırlar. Kod və düzgün modellər a çıq mənbəli idilər, təhsil edilmiş modelin ağırlığını yükləməsini və yeni dökümünü seçməsini asanlaşdırır.', 'bs': 'EuroVoc je multijezički thesaurus koji je izgrađen za organizaciju zakonodavnog dokumentara institucija Evropske unije. Ona sadrži hiljade kategorija na različitim nivoima specifičnosti i opisivači su ciljani pravnim tekstima na skoro 30 jezika. U ovom poslu predlažemo jedinstveni okvir za klasifikaciju EuroVoc na 22 jezika, uspoređujući moderne modele preklinjenih jezika na transformeru. Proučavamo široko učenje naših obučenih modela i pokazujemo da značajno poboljšavaju rezultate koji su dobili sličnim alatom - JEX - na istom setu podataka. Kod i ispravni modeli su otvoreni, zajedno sa programskim interfejsom koji olakšava proces opterećenja težine obučenog model a i klasifikacije novog dokumenta.', 'et': 'EuroVoc on mitmekeelne tesaurus, mis on loodud Euroopa Liidu institutsioonide seadusandliku dokumendi korraldamiseks. See sisaldab tuhandeid kategooriaid eri eripära tasemel ja selle kirjeldused on suunatud õigustekstidele peaaegu kolmekümnes keeles. Selles töös pakume välja EuroVoci klassifikatsiooni ühtse raamistiku 22 keelele, täpsustades kaasaegseid Transformeritel põhinevaid eeltreenitud keelemudeleid. Uurime põhjalikult oma koolitatud mudelite jõudlust ja näitame, et need parandavad märkimisväärselt sarnase tööriista - JEX - tulemusi samas andmekogumis. Kood ja täpsustatud mudelid olid avatud lähtekoodiga koos programmeeritud liidesega, mis lihtsustab koolitatud mudeli kaalude laadimist ja uue dokumendi klassifitseerimist.', 'ca': "EuroVoc és un tesaure multilingüe construït per a organitzar el documental legislatiu de les institucions de la Unió Europea. Conté milers de categories a diferents nivells d'especificitat i els seus descriptors són mirats per textos legals en gairebé trenta llengües. In this work we propose a unified framework for EuroVoc classification on 22 languages by fine-tuning modern Transformer-based pretrained language models.  Estudem ampliament el rendiment dels nostres models entrenats i demostrem que milloren significativament els resultats obtenits per una eina similar - JEX - en el mateix conjunt de dades. El codi i els models arreglats estaven oberts, juntament amb una interfície programàtica que facilita el procés de càrrega de pes d'un model entrenat i de classificació d'un nou document.", 'fi': 'EuroVoc on monikielinen tesaurus, joka rakennettiin Euroopan unionin toimielinten lainsäädäntödokumentin järjestämiseen. Se sisältää tuhansia eri erityispiirteiden luokkia, ja sen kuvaajat ovat lähes kolmenkymmenellä kielellä laadittujen oikeudellisten tekstien kohteena. Tässä työssä ehdotamme yhtenäistä viitekehystä EuroVoc-luokitukselle 22 kielelle hienosäätämällä nykyaikaisia Transformer-pohjaisia esikoulutettuja kielimalleja. Tutkimme laajasti koulutettujen malliemme suorituskykyä ja osoitamme, että ne parantavat merkittävästi samanlaisen työkalun - JEX - tuloksia samasta aineistosta. Koodi ja hienoviritetyt mallit toteutettiin avoimella lähdekoodilla sekä ohjelmallisella käyttöliittymällä, joka helpottaa koulutetun mallin painojen lataamista ja uuden asiakirjan luokittelua.', 'jv': "paper size Suara ing atusan akeh kategori sing dipun waenganggo sampeyan sing dipun Nang gawar iki, kita supoyo nggawe sistem sing beraksi kanggo kelas YuVoc nang 22 dila sing apik tur abasane, dadi nggawe modolan Transformer kuwi model sing apik tur angel. Awak dhéwé éntuk luwih akeh pisan kelas depatensi model sing berarti ngono ngono nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas kuwi nggawe barang kelas telu -jex- lan dataset sing berarti. Where's the input?", 'ha': "EureVoc ne wani littafin mulki-lingui wanda aka gina dõmin a organize takardar takardar sharci na Umojin Yurubi. Yana da dubu na nau'i cikin darajõji daban-daban, kuma fassararsa na yi amfani da matsayin sharĩ'a cikin taki'in harshen talãtin. Daga wannan aikin da Muke goyyade wani firam mai haɗa wa fassarar ayukan EUROVoc a cikin 22 harshen yurubutu da misãlai masu sami'a mai kyau-tun Transformer-based na-yanzu ta baka. Tuna karanta aikin misalin misalinmu wanda aka tsare, kuma munã nuna cewa suna kyautata matsalar da matsalar da ke samu - JEX - a kan sami danganta. Kodi da motsi da aka buɗe masu tsari da aka buɗe, sami da wata interfekt na shiryoyin ayuka da za'a sauƙa ƙe aikin loda nau'i na sami'in da aka yi wa shirin ayuka da kuma a rarrabe wata takarda sãbuwa.", 'sk': 'EuroVoc je večjezični tezaver, ki je bil zgrajen za organizacijo zakonodajnega dokumentarja institucij Evropske unije. Vsebuje tisoče kategorij na različnih ravneh specifičnosti, njegove deskriptorje pa so usmerjene v pravna besedila v skoraj tridesetih jezikih. V tem delu predlagamo enoten okvir za EuroVoc klasifikacijo na 22 jezikih z natančnim nastavitvijo sodobnih transformatorskih predtreniranih jezikovnih modelov. Obsežno preučujemo učinkovitost naših usposobljenih modelov in pokažemo, da bistveno izboljšujejo rezultate, pridobljene s podobnim orodjem - JEX - na istem naboru podatkov. Koda in prefinjeni modeli so bili odprtokodni, skupaj s programskim vmesnikom, ki olajša postopek nalaganja uteži usposobljenega modela in klasifikacije novega dokumenta.', 'bo': 'EuroVoc(EuroVoc)ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་སྒྲུང་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་རིགས་ཅིག་རེད། འདིས་ནི་ཡིག་རྩལ་ཁང་གི་སྒྲིག་ཆའི་ཆོས་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲི དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་མ་འདྲ་བའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་སྟོང་ཕྲག་པ་དང་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པ་དེ་ནི་ཕལ་ཆེར་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཁོངས་འབྲི་བའི་ཡིག་ In this work we propose a unified framework for EuroVoc classification on 22 languages by fine-tuning modern Transformer-based pretrained language models. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱིས་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཅིག་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ནི་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་འཆར་སྤྱོད་ཆས་གཅིག་མཚུངས་པར་རྐྱེ The code and the fine-tuned models were open sourced, together with a programmatic interface that eases the process of loading the weights of a trained model and of classifying a new document.', 'he': 'EuroVoc is a multilingual thesaurus that was built for organizing the legislative documentary of the European Union institutions.  It contains thousands of categories at different levels of specificity and its descriptors are targeted by legal texts in almost thirty languages.  בעבודה הזו אנו מציעים מסגרת מאוחדת לסיוג EuroVoc על 22 שפות על ידי התאים מודרני מודרני מודלים שפות מבוססים מראש. We study extensively the performance of our trained models and show that they significantly improve the results obtained by a similar tool - JEX - on the same dataset.  The code and the fine-tuned models were open sourced, together with a programmatic interface that eases the process of loading the weights of a trained model and of classifying a new document.'}
{'en': 'TEASER : Towards Efficient Aspect-based SEntiment Analysis and Recognition', 'ar': 'دعابة: نحو تحليل واعٍ فعال قائم على الجوانب', 'pt': 'TEASER: Rumo à Análise e Reconhecimento Eficiente de Sentimentos Baseados em Aspectos', 'fr': 'TEASER\xa0: Vers une analyse et une reconnaissance des sentiments efficaces basées sur les aspects', 'es': 'TEASER: Hacia un análisis y reconocimiento eficientes de sentimientos basados en aspectos', 'ja': 'ティーザー：効率的なアスペクトベースのSEntiment分析と認識に向けて', 'zh': 'TEASER曰:迈向高效之信可也', 'hi': 'टीज़र: कुशल पहलू-आधारित SEntiment विश्लेषण और मान्यता की ओर', 'ru': 'ТИЗЕР: На пути к эффективному анализу и распознаванию чувствительности на основе аспектов', 'ga': 'TEASAR: I dTreo Anailíse agus Aitheantas Meonachán atá Bunaithe ar Ghné Éifeachtúil', 'ka': 'TEASER: ეფექტიური აზექტური ანალიზაცია და განაცნობა', 'hu': 'TEASER: A hatékony szempontokon alapuló SEntiment elemzés és felismerés felé', 'el': 'TEASER: Προς την αποτελεσματική ανάλυση και αναγνώριση με βάση τις πτυχές', 'it': "TEASER: Verso un'analisi e un riconoscimento SEntiment basati sugli aspetti efficienti", 'kk': 'ТЕАСТАР: Үзімді аспекттің негіздеген SEntiment Analysis and Recognition', 'mk': 'Надвор кон ефикасна анализа и признавање на сентиментот базиран на аспекти', 'lt': 'Veiksmingos aspektais grindžiamos jautrumo analizės ir pripažinimo link', 'ms': 'TEASER: Ke arah Analisi dan Pengenalan SENTIM Berasas Aspek Efisien', 'ml': 'TEASER: ആസ്പെക്റ്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്വേഷിക്കുകയും തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും ചെയ്യുക', 'mt': 'TEASER: Lejn Analiżi u Rikonoxximent tas-Sentiment ibbażati fuq l-Aspett Effiċjenti', 'mn': 'ТЕАСЕР: Үзэмшигтэй нөхцөл дээр суурилсан SEntiment Analysis and Recognition руу', 'no': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'pl': 'TEASER: W kierunku skutecznej analizy i rozpoznawania SEntimentów opartej na aspektach', 'ro': 'TEASER: Către o analiză și recunoaștere eficientă bazată pe aspecte SEntiment', 'sr': 'Preko efikasnog aspekta analiza i priznanja', 'si': 'TEASER: Effecent Aspect-based SENT විශේෂණය සහ පිළිගන්න', 'so': 'TEASER: Towards Effective Aspect-based SENT Analysis and Recognition', 'sv': 'TEASER: Mot effektiv aspektbaserad SEntimentanalys och erkännande', 'ta': 'TEASER: பார்வையில் அடிப்படையான அமர்வு ஆராய்வு மற்றும் அடையாளம்', 'ur': 'TEASER: Efficient Aspect-based SEntiment Analysis and Recognition Towards', 'vi': 'TEASER: Hướng tới khía cạnh hiệu quả phân tích và nhận biết', 'uz': 'TEASER: Aspect asosida qoʻllangan seans analyzed va aniqlash', 'bg': 'Към ефективен анализ и признаване на сентимента, базиран на аспекти', 'nl': 'TEASER: Naar een efficiënte aspect-based SEntiment analyse en herkenning', 'da': 'TEASER: Mod effektiv aspektbaseret SEntiment analyse og anerkendelse', 'hr': 'TEASER: prema učinkovitoj analizi i priznanju pružanja na aspektu', 'ko': 'Triser: 측면 기반 정서 분석 및 식별', 'de': 'TEASER: Auf dem Weg zu einer effizienten Aspektbasierten SEntiment-Analyse und -Erkennung', 'id': 'TEASER: Menuju Analisi dan Pengenalan Sentimen Berdasarkan Aspek Efisien', 'fa': 'تأثیر: به سمت تحلیل و شناسایی بازرسی بر اساس نظر فعالی', 'sw': 'TEASER: Uchambuzi na Utambuzi', 'tr': 'ASER: Etkin aspekte tabanlı SEntiment Analizi ve tanımlama yönüne doğru', 'af': 'TEASTER: Na Effektiewe Aspekte-gebaseerde SENTIAL-analyseer en herkenning', 'sq': 'Për Analizën dhe njohjen e ndjenjave të efektshme bazuar në aspekte', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Որպես արդյունավետ հարցերով հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծություն և ճանաչելը', 'az': 'TEYZER: Efficient Aspect-based SEntiment Analysis and Recognition t톛r톛find톛', 'bn': 'টেসার: ভিত্তিক সেন্টিমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ এবং পরিচিতি', 'cs': 'TEASER: Směrem k efektivní analýze a rozpoznávání SEntimentů založené na aspektech', 'bs': 'Prema efikasnom aspektu analiziranju i priznanju', 'et': 'TEASER: Tõhusa aspektipõhise seikluse analüüsi ja tunnustamise suunas', 'fi': 'TEASER: Kohti tehokasta aspektipohjaista analyysiä ja tunnustusta', 'ca': 'TEASER: A un anàlisi i reconeixement eficients de sentiment basats en aspectes', 'jv': 'KEASAR', 'sk': 'TEASER: Na poti k učinkoviti analizi in prepoznavanju na podlagi vidikov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'TEASER: Towards Efficient Aspect-based SEntiment Analysis and Recognition', 'he': 'לעבור לניתוח והזיהוי התחושות המבוססים באפקטים יעילים'}
{'en': 'Sentiment analysis aims to detect the overall sentiment, i.e., the polarity of a sentence, paragraph, or text span, without considering the entities mentioned and their aspects. Aspect-based sentiment analysis aims to extract the aspects of the given target entities and their respective sentiments. Prior works formulate this as a sequence tagging problem or solve this task using a span-based extract-then-classify framework where first all the opinion targets are extracted from the sentence, and then with the help of span representations, the targets are classified as positive, negative, or neutral. The sequence tagging problem suffers from issues like sentiment inconsistency and colossal search space. Whereas, Span-based extract-then-classify framework suffers from issues such as half-word coverage and overlapping spans. To overcome this, we propose a similar span-based extract-then-classify framework with a novel and improved heuristic. Experiments on the three benchmark datasets (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) show our model consistently outperforms the current state-of-the-art. Moreover, we also present a novel supervised movie reviews dataset (Movie20) and a pseudo-labeled movie reviews dataset (moviesLarge) made explicitly for this task and report the results on the novel Movie20 dataset as well.', 'fr': "L'analyse des sentiments vise à détecter le sentiment général, c'est-à-dire la polarité d'une phrase, d'un paragraphe ou d'une plage de texte, sans tenir compte des entités mentionnées et de leurs aspects. L'analyse des sentiments basée sur les aspects vise à extraire les aspects des entités cibles données et leurs sentiments respectifs. Des travaux antérieurs formulent cela comme un problème de marquage de séquence ou résolvent cette tâche à l'aide d'un cadre d'extraction puis de classification basé sur l'étendue où toutes les cibles d'opinion sont d'abord extraites de la phrase, puis à l'aide de représentations d'étendue, les cibles sont classées comme positives, négatives ou neutres. Le problème du marquage de séquence souffre de problèmes tels que l'incohérence des sentiments et l'espace de recherche colossal. Alors que le cadre d'extraction puis de classification basé sur SPAN souffre de problèmes tels que la couverture d'un demi-mot et le chevauchement des plages. Pour pallier ce problème, nous proposons un cadre similaire basé sur l'extraction puis la classification avec une nouvelle heuristique améliorée. Des expériences sur les trois ensembles de données de référence (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) montrent que notre modèle surpasse constamment les performances de pointe actuelles. De plus, nous présentons également un ensemble de données de critiques de films supervisées de romans (Movie20) et un ensemble de données de critiques de films pseudo-étiquetés (MovieLarge) créés explicitement pour cette tâche et rapportons également les résultats sur le jeu de données roman Movie20.", 'pt': 'A análise de sentimento visa detectar o sentimento geral, ou seja, a polaridade de uma frase, parágrafo ou extensão de texto, sem considerar as entidades mencionadas e seus aspectos. A análise de sentimentos baseada em aspectos visa extrair os aspectos de determinadas entidades-alvo e seus respectivos sentimentos. Trabalhos anteriores formulam isso como um problema de marcação de sequência ou resolvem essa tarefa usando uma estrutura de extração e classificação baseada em span, onde primeiro todos os alvos de opinião são extraídos da sentença e, em seguida, com a ajuda de representações de span, os alvos são classificados como positivo, negativo ou neutro. O problema de marcação de sequência sofre de problemas como inconsistência de sentimento e espaço de pesquisa colossal. Considerando que, a estrutura de extração e classificação baseada em Span sofre de problemas como cobertura de meia palavra e intervalos sobrepostos. Para superar isso, propomos uma estrutura de extração e classificação baseada em intervalo semelhante com uma heurística nova e aprimorada. Experimentos nos três conjuntos de dados de referência (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) mostram que nosso modelo supera consistentemente o atual estado da arte. Além disso, também apresentamos um novo conjunto de dados de resenhas de filmes supervisionados (Movie20) e um conjunto de dados de resenhas de filmes pseudo-rotulados (moviesLarge) feitos explicitamente para essa tarefa e relatamos os resultados no novo conjunto de dados Movie20.', 'ar': 'يهدف تحليل المشاعر إلى اكتشاف المشاعر العامة ، أي قطبية الجملة أو الفقرة أو امتداد النص ، دون النظر إلى الكيانات المذكورة وجوانبها. يهدف تحليل المشاعر القائم على الجانب إلى استخراج جوانب الكيانات المستهدفة المحددة ومشاعر كل منها. تصوغ الأعمال السابقة هذا كمشكلة وضع علامات على التسلسل أو حل هذه المهمة باستخدام إطار عمل يستند إلى الاستخراج ثم التصنيف حيث يتم أولاً استخراج جميع أهداف الرأي من الجملة ، ثم بمساعدة تمثيلات الامتداد ، يتم تصنيف الأهداف على أنها إيجابي أو سلبي أو محايد. تعاني مشكلة وضع العلامات على التسلسل من مشكلات مثل تناقض المشاعر ومساحة البحث الهائلة. في حين أن إطار العمل القائم على الاستخراج ثم التصنيف يعاني من مشكلات مثل تغطية نصف كلمة والمسافات المتداخلة. للتغلب على هذا ، نقترح إطارًا مشابهًا يستند إلى الاستخراج ثم التصنيف مع اكتشاف إرشادي جديد ومحسّن. تُظهر التجارب على مجموعات البيانات المعيارية الثلاث (Restaurant14 و Laptop14 و Restaurant15) أن نموذجنا يتفوق باستمرار على أحدث التقنيات. علاوة على ذلك ، نقدم أيضًا مجموعة بيانات مراجعات أفلام رواية خاضعة للإشراف (Movie20) ومجموعة بيانات مراجعات أفلام ذات تصنيف زائف (moviesLarge) تم إعدادها بشكل صريح لهذه المهمة والإبلاغ عن النتائج على مجموعة بيانات Movie20 الرواية أيضًا.', 'es': 'El análisis de sentimientos tiene como objetivo detectar el sentimiento general, es decir, la polaridad de una oración, un párrafo o un lapso de texto, sin considerar las entidades mencionadas y sus aspectos. El análisis de sentimientos basado en aspectos tiene como objetivo extraer los aspectos de las entidades objetivo dadas y sus respectivos sentimientos. Los trabajos anteriores formulan esto como un problema de etiquetado de secuencias o resuelven esta tarea utilizando un marco de extracción y clasificación basado en el span donde primero se extraen todos los objetivos de opinión de la oración, y luego con la ayuda de representaciones de span, los objetivos se clasifican como positivos, negativos o neutrales. El problema del etiquetado de secuencias adolece de problemas como la inconsistencia de los sentimientos y el colosal espacio de búsqueda. Visto y considerando: Que el marco de extracción y clasificación basado en SPAN sufre de problemas como la cobertura de media palabra y los intervalos superpuestos. Para superar esto, proponemos un marco similar de extracción y clasificación basado en span con una heurística novedosa y mejorada. Los experimentos en los tres conjuntos de datos de referencia (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) muestran que nuestro modelo supera sistemáticamente al estado de vanguardia actual. Además, también presentamos un conjunto de datos novedoso de reseñas de películas supervisadas (Movie20) y un conjunto de datos de reseñas de películas pseudoetiquetado (MoviesLarge) creado explícitamente para esta tarea e informamos los resultados en el nuevo conjunto de datos Movie20.', 'ja': 'センチメント分析は、言及されたエンティティとその側面を考慮することなく、全体的なセンチメント、すなわち、文章、パラグラフ、またはテキストスパンの極性を検出することを目的としている。 アスペクトに基づく感情分析は、所与のターゲットエンティティとそのそれぞれの感情のアスペクトを抽出することを目的としている。 以前の研究では、これをシーケンスタグ付け問題として定式化するか、まず文からすべての意見ターゲットを抽出し、次にスパン表現の助けを借りてターゲットをポジティブ、ネガティブ、またはニュートラルに分類するスパンベースの抽出-その後分類フレームワークを使用して、このタスクを解決します。 シーケンスタグ付けの問題は、感情の不一致や巨大な検索スペースなどの問題に悩まされています。 一方、スパンベースの抽出-その後の分類フレームワークは、半単語のカバレッジやスパンの重複などの問題に苦しんでいます。 これを克服するために、私たちは新規で改善されたヒューリスティックを備えた同様のスパンベースの抽出-その後の分類フレームワークを提案します。 3つのベンチマークデータセット（レストラン14、ラップトップ14、レストラン15 ）の実験では、当社のモデルが現在の最先端を一貫して上回っていることが示されています。 さらに、このタスクのために明示的に作成された新規の監修ムービーレビューデータセット（ Movie 20 ）および疑似ラベル付きムービーレビューデータセット（ moviesLarge ）も提示し、結果を新規のMovie 20データセットにも報告します。', 'hi': 'भावना विश्लेषण का उद्देश्य समग्र भावना का पता लगाना है, यानी, एक वाक्य, पैराग्राफ, या पाठ अवधि की ध्रुवीयता, उल्लिखित संस्थाओं और उनके पहलुओं पर विचार किए बिना। पहलू-आधारित भावना विश्लेषण का उद्देश्य दिए गए लक्ष्य संस्थाओं के पहलुओं और उनकी संबंधित भावनाओं को निकालना है। पूर्व कार्य इसे अनुक्रम टैगिंग समस्या के रूप में तैयार करते हैं या इस कार्य को एक स्पैन-आधारित अर्क-फिर-वर्गीकृत ढांचे का उपयोग करके हल करते हैं जहां पहले सभी राय लक्ष्यों को वाक्य से निकाला जाता है, और फिर स्पैन प्रतिनिधित्व की मदद से, लक्ष्यों को सकारात्मक, नकारात्मक या तटस्थ के रूप में वर्गीकृत किया जाता है। अनुक्रम टैगिंग समस्या भावना असंगतता और विशाल खोज स्थान जैसे मुद्दों से ग्रस्त है। जबकि, स्पैन-आधारित अर्क-तो-वर्गीकृत रूपरेखा आधे-शब्द कवरेज और ओवरलैपिंग स्पैन जैसे मुद्दों से ग्रस्त है। इसे दूर करने के लिए, हम एक उपन्यास और बेहतर हेरिस्टिक के साथ एक समान अवधि-आधारित अर्क-फिर-वर्गीकृत ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। तीन बेंचमार्क डेटासेट (रेस्तरां 14, लैपटॉप 14, रेस्तरां 15) पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल लगातार वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है। इसके अलावा, हम इस कार्य के लिए स्पष्ट रूप से किए गए एक उपन्यास पर्यवेक्षित मूवी समीक्षा डेटासेट (Movie20) और एक छद्म लेबल वाले मूवी रिव्यू डेटासेट (moviesLarge) को भी प्रस्तुत करते हैं और उपन्यास Movie20 डेटासेट पर परिणामों की रिपोर्ट भी करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Анализ настроений направлен на обнаружение общего настроения, то есть полярности предложения, абзаца или текстового диапазона, без учета упомянутых сущностей и их аспектов. Аспектный анализ настроений направлен на извлечение аспектов данных целевых объектов и их соответствующих настроений. Предыдущие работы формулируют это как проблему маркировки последовательностей или решают эту задачу с помощью основы на интервале между извлечением и классификацией, где сначала из предложения извлекаются все цели мнения, а затем с помощью представлений интервала цели классифицируются как положительные, отрицательные или нейтральные. Проблема маркировки последовательностей страдает от таких проблем, как несоответствие настроений и колоссальное пространство поиска. В то время как основанная на интервале структура "экстракт - затем классифицировать" страдает от таких проблем, как охват полусловом и перекрывающиеся интервалы. Чтобы преодолеть это, мы предлагаем аналогичную основанную на интервале экстракт - затем классифицировать фреймворк с романным и улучшенным эвристическим. Эксперименты с тремя эталонными наборами данных (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) показывают, что наша модель постоянно превосходит современную. Кроме того, мы также представляем набор данных для обзоров фильмов (Movie20) и набор данных для обзоров фильмов с псевдомаркировкой (moviesLarge), специально созданный для этой задачи, а также сообщаем о результатах в наборе данных Movie20.', 'zh': '情析旨检情,即句也,段落文本跨度之极性,而不思所及之体也。 盖情析指取给定目标实体者,各得其情也。 前事序之,或用跨度而后类框架决之,其先尽于句,而后助于跨度,则类为极,极中性。 序标有情,与巨搜空间。 然则 Span 之先取后类框架存乎半字覆盖率跨度之重。 克此者,举类跨度而后类框架,有新进之启发式框架。 三准集(Restaurant14,Laptop14,Restaurant15)之实验明,始终优于前。 供一新监电影论数集(Movie20)与伪署电影论数集(moviviLarge),具以小说Movie20集。', 'ga': 'Is é is aidhm d’anailís meon an meon iomlán a bhrath, i.e., polaraíocht abairte, alt nó réise téacs, gan na heintitis atá luaite agus a ngnéithe a chur san áireamh. Tá sé mar aidhm ag anailís dhearcadh atá bunaithe ar ghnéithe gnéithe na sprioc-eintiteas tugtha agus a gcuid mothúchán faoi seach a bhaint as. Foirmíonn réamhoibreacha é seo mar fhadhb chlibeála seichimh nó réitíonn an tasc seo trí úsáid a bhaint as creat réise-bhunaithe sliocht-ansin-rangaigh ina mbaintear na spriocanna tuairime ar fad as an abairt ar dtús, agus ansin le cabhair ó léiriúcháin réise, rangaítear na spriocanna mar dearfach, diúltach nó neodrach. Tá fadhb na clibeála seichimh ag fulaingt mar gheall ar cheisteanna mar neamh-chomhsheasmhacht meon agus spás cuardaigh ollmhór. De bharr an méid sin, tá fadhbanna ar nós clúdach leathfhocail agus raonta forluiteacha ag baint leis an gcreat sliocht-ansin-rangaithe bunaithe ar Span. Chun é seo a shárú, molaimid creat réise-bhunaithe sleachta-ansin-rangú comhchosúil le heorasaí nua agus feabhsaithe. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar na trí thacar sonraí tagarmharcála (Bialann14, Glúine14, Bialann15) go n-éiríonn lenár múnla go seasta níos fearr ná an staid reatha. Ina theannta sin, cuirimid i láthair freisin tacar sonraí athbhreithnithe scannán maoirsithe nua (Movie20) agus tacar sonraí léirmheasanna scannán bréige-lipéadaithe (moviesLarge) a rinneadh go sainráite don tasc seo agus tuairiscímid na torthaí ar thacar sonraí an úrscéil Movie20 freisin.', 'ka': 'Sentiment ანალიზაციის მიზეზი იქნება ყველაფერი სენტიმენტის განახლება, მაგალითად სიტყვების, პარაგრაფის, ან ტექსტის სიტყვების პოლარიტის განახლება, რომელიც განახლებული ელექტიმენტების ანალიზია, რომელიც აპექტიურად დაბათებული სენტიმენტის ანალიზია, მიზეზიან, რომ მინდა მინდომის მინდომის ანალიზია და მათი შესახებ სენტიმენტი გა პირველი სამუშაო მუშაობა ამის ფორმულება როგორც სერექციის მაგრამების პრობლემა, ან ამ რაოდენობის გარეშე გამოყენებული ექსპექტი-შემდეგ-კლასიფიკაციის ფრამულის გამოყენება, სადაც პირველი ყველა მისანიშნალ მისანიშ პრობლემა, როგორც სენტიმენტის კონსტენსტური და კოლოსტური ძიება სივრცე, იქნება პრობლემადან. მაგრამ, Span-based extract-then-classify frameworks იქნება პრობლემებისგან, როგორც ნახევალ სიტყვების საკუთარი და საკუთარი სიტყვებისგან. ამას გადავიწყებთ, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ განსხვავებული განსხვავებული ექსპექტიკური კლასიფიკაციის ფრამეტრი პრომენტით და გაუკეთებული ექსპექტიკური. გამოცდილება სამი ბენქმარკური მონაცემების შესახებ (რესტორან14, ლეპტოპ14, რესტორან15) ჩვენი მოდელის მონაცემები მხოლოდ უფრო გავაკეთებს მიმდინარე სიცემების შესახე დამატებით, ჩვენ ახლა პრომენტის მონაცემებული ფილმის განაცემების კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფი', 'hu': 'Az érzelmek elemzése célja, hogy felismerje az általános érzelmeket, azaz egy mondat, bekezdés vagy szöveg polaritását, anélkül, hogy figyelembe venné az említett entitásokat és azok aspektusait. Aspect-based sentiment elemzés célja, hogy kivonja az adott célentitások aspektusait és azok érzelmeit. A korábbi munkák ezt szekvencia-címkézési problémának fogalmazzák meg, vagy ezt a feladatot egy span-alapú extract-then-clasifice keretrendszer segítségével oldják meg, ahol először az összes véleménycélt kivonják a mondatból, majd span reprezentációk segítségével a célpontokat pozitívnak, negatívnak vagy semlegesnek minősítik. A szekvencia címkézési probléma olyan problémákkal szenved, mint az érzelmi következetlenség és a kolosszális keresési tér. Míg a Span-alapú kivonat-majd-osztályozás keretrendszer olyan kérdésekkel szenved, mint a félszó lefedettsége és az átfedő tartományok. Ennek leküzdése érdekében egy hasonló span-alapú extract-then-class keretrendszert javasolunk egy új és továbbfejlesztett heurisztikával. A három referenciaadatkészleten (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk folyamatosan felülmúlja a jelenlegi korszerűséget. Továbbá bemutatunk egy új, felügyelt filmkritika adatkészletet (Movie20), valamint egy álcímkézett filmkritika adatkészletet (MovieLarge), amelyet kifejezetten erre a feladatra készítettünk, és az eredményeket a Movie20 adatkészleten is jelentjük.', 'el': 'Η ανάλυση συναισθημάτων στοχεύει στην ανίχνευση του συνολικού συναισθήματος, δηλαδή της πολικότητας μιας πρότασης, παραγράφου ή διαστήματος κειμένου, χωρίς να λαμβάνονται υπόψη οι οντότητες που αναφέρονται και οι πτυχές τους. Η ανάλυση συναισθημάτων με βάση τις πτυχές στοχεύει στην εξαγωγή των πτυχών των δεδομένων οντοτήτων-στόχων και των αντίστοιχων συναισθημάτων τους. Προηγουμένες εργασίες το διατυπώνουν ως ένα πρόβλημα επισήμανσης ακολουθίας ή λύνουν αυτό το έργο χρησιμοποιώντας ένα πλαίσιο με βάση το οποίο αρχικά εξάγονται όλοι οι στόχοι γνώμης από την πρόταση, και στη συνέχεια με τη βοήθεια αναπαραστάσεων του διαστήματος, οι στόχοι ταξινομούνται ως θετικοί, αρνητικοί ή ουδέτεροι. Το πρόβλημα επισήμανσης ακολουθίας πάσχει από ζητήματα όπως ασυνέπεια συναισθημάτων και κολοσσιαίο χώρο αναζήτησης. Ενώ, το πλαίσιο με βάση το απόσπασμα-μετά-ταξινόμηση πάσχει από ζητήματα όπως η κάλυψη μισών λέξεων και οι επικαλυπτόμενες περιοχές. Για να το ξεπεράσουμε αυτό, προτείνουμε ένα παρόμοιο πλαίσιο εξαγωγής-μετά-ταξινόμησης με μια νέα και βελτιωμένη heuristik. Τα πειράματα στα τρία σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σταθερά την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας. Επιπλέον, παρουσιάζουμε επίσης ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων εποπτευόμενων κριτικών ταινιών (Movie20) και ένα ψευδομακάρισμα δεδομένων κριτικών ταινιών (moviesLarge) που έγιναν ρητά για αυτό το έργο και αναφέρουμε τα αποτελέσματα στο νέο σύνολο δεδομένων Movie20.', 'it': "L'analisi dei sentimenti mira a rilevare il sentimento generale, cioè la polarità di una frase, paragrafo o arco di testo, senza considerare le entità menzionate e i loro aspetti. L'analisi del sentiment basata sugli aspetti mira ad estrarre gli aspetti delle entità target e dei loro rispettivi sentimenti. I lavori precedenti formulano questo come un problema di sequenze tagging o risolvono questo compito utilizzando un framework basato su span estratto-poi-classificazione in cui prima tutti i target di opinione sono estratti dalla frase, e poi con l'aiuto di rappresentazioni di span, i target sono classificati come positivi, negativi o neutri. Il problema del tag della sequenza soffre di problemi come l'incoerenza sentimentale e lo spazio di ricerca colossale. Mentre, il framework estratto-poi-classificazione basato su Span soffre di problemi come la copertura di mezza parola e intervalli sovrapposti. Per ovviare a questo, proponiamo un quadro simile basato sull'estrazione e poi sulla classificazione con un euristico nuovo e migliorato. Gli esperimenti sui tre set di dati di riferimento (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) mostrano che il nostro modello supera costantemente lo stato dell'arte attuale. Inoltre, presentiamo un nuovo set di dati di recensioni cinematografiche supervisionate (Movie20) e un set di dati di recensioni cinematografiche pseudo-etichettati (movieLarge) creati esplicitamente per questo compito e riportiamo i risultati anche sul nuovo set di dati Movie20.", 'lt': 'Sentimento analize siekiama nustatyti bendrą jausmą, t. y. sakinio, dalies arba teksto apimties poliarumą, neatsižvelgiant į minėtus subjektus ir jų aspektus. Aspektais pagrįsta jausmų analizė siekiama išbraukti konkrečių tikslinių subjektų aspektus ir jų atitinkamus jausmus. Ankstesniais darbais tai apibrėžiama kaip sekos žymėjimo problem a arba išspręsiama ši užduotis naudojant skalės pagrindu grindžiamą ekstrakto-tuomet-klasifikavimo sistemą, kurioje pirmiausia iš sakinio išimami visi nuomonės tikslai, o vėliau naudojant skalės atvaizdavimus, tikslai klasifikuojami kaip teigiami, neigiami arba neutral ūs. Sekos žymėjimo problema kyla dėl tokių problem ų kaip jausmų neatitikimas ir milžiniškas paieškos erdvė. Whereas, Span-based extract-then-classify framework suffers from issues such as half-word coverage and overlapping spans.  Norėdami tai įveikti, siūlome panašią ekstrakto klasifikavimo sistemą, pagrįstą apimtimi, su nauja ir patobulinta heuristika. Trijų lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų modelis nuosekliai viršija dabartinę pažangą. Be to, mes taip pat pristatome naują prižiūrimą kino apžvalgų duomenų rinkinį (Movie20) ir pseudo pažymėtą kino apžvalgų duomenų rinkinį (MovesLarge), kuris buvo aiškiai atliktas šiai užduotims, ir pranešame apie rezultatus ir apie naują kino apžvalgą20.', 'kk': 'Сентименттің анализациясы, яғни сөз, абзац немесе мәтін кеңістіктерінің жалпы сезімдерін анықтау үшін мақсатты. Арнаптың негіздеген сезімдер анализациясы келтірілген мақсатты нысандардың қасиеттерін және олардың сәйкес сезімдерін тарқатуға мақсатты. Алдыңғы жұмыс істейді, бұл тапсырманы реттеу тегтерінің мәселесі ретінде, немесе бұл тапсырманы теңдеу- теңдеу- тең- классификациялау бағдарламасынан шешу үшін, біріншіден бұл тапсырманың мақсаттары сөзден тарқатылады, содан ке Келесі белгілеу мәселесі, сезімдердің нетәуелсіздігі және сұрақтық іздеу кеңістігі сияқты мәселелерден тұрады. Спан-негіздеген тарқату-кезде классификациялау фреймінің жарты сөздердің мәселелері, мысалы, жарты сөздердің мәселелері және көтеріліп жатыр. Бұл көтеру үшін біз романдық және геуристікті жақсы түрде жасалған сәйкес келтірілген сәйкес түрлендіру бағдарламасын ұсынамыз. Үш бағдарламалық деректер жинағындағы тәжірибелер (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) моделіміздің қазіргі орындағы күй- жайын көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, бұл тапсырма үшін романдық қарау фильмдерді қарау деректер жиынын (Movie20) және псевдудо белгіленген фильмдерді қарау деректер жиынын (фильмдерLarge) тапсырма үшін таңдап, романдық Movie20 деректер жиынының нәтижесін қара', 'ms': 'Analisis perasaan bertujuan untuk mengesan perasaan keseluruhan, iaitu polariti kalimat, paragraf, atau jangkauan teks, tanpa mempertimbangkan entiti yang disebut dan aspek mereka. Analisis sentimen berdasarkan aspek bermaksud untuk mengekstrak aspek entiti sasaran yang diberikan dan sentimen mereka. Prior works formulate this as a sequence tagging problem or solve this task using a span-based extract-then-classify framework where first all the opinion targets are extracted from the sentence, and then with the help of span representations, the targets are classified as positive, negative, or neutral.  The sequence tagging problem suffers from issues like sentiment inconsistency and colossal search space.  Sementara, kerangka ekstrak-maka-klasifikasi berdasarkan Span menderita dari isu seperti penutupan separuh perkataan dan jangkauan bertutup. Untuk mengatasinya, kami melamar kerangka ekstrakt-kemudian-klasifikasi yang sama dengan novel dan heuristik yang lebih baik. Eksperimen pada tiga set data tanda rujukan (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) menunjukkan model kita secara konsisten melebihi keadaan semasa. Selain itu, kami juga mempersembahkan set data ulasan filem yang diawasi novel (Movie20) dan set data ulasan filem yang ditandai pseudo (moviesLarge) dibuat secara eksplicit untuk tugas ini dan melaporkan keputusan pada set data Movie20 novel juga.', 'mt': 'L-analiżi tas-sensazzjoni għandha l-għan li tidentifika s-sensazzjoni ġenerali, jiġifieri l-polarità ta’ sentenza, paragrafu, jew firxa tat-test, mingħajr ma tikkunsidra l-entitajiet imsemmija u l-aspetti tagħhom. L-analiżi tas-sentimenti bbażata fuq l-aspetti għandha l-għan li testrakta l-aspetti tal-entitajiet fil-mira partikolari u s-sentimenti rispettivi tagħhom. Ix-xogħlijiet preċedenti jifformulaw din bħala problem a tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza jew isolvu dan il-kompitu bl-użu ta’ qafas ta’ klassifikazzjoni bbażat fuq il-firxa tal-estratti-imbagħad-klassifikazzjoni fejn l-ewwel il-miri kollha tal-opinjoni jiġu estratti mis-sentenza, u mbagħad bl-għajnuna ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-firxa, il-miri huma kklassifikati bħala pożittivi, negattivi, jew Il-problema tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza tbati minn kwistjonijiet bħall-inkonsistenza tas-sentimenti u l-ispazju tat-tiftix kolossali. Billi l-qafas tal-klassifikazzjoni tal-estratti bbażat fuq Spanja jsofri minn kwistjonijiet bħall-kopertura ta’ nofs il-kliem u l-firxiet li jikkoinċidu. Biex tingħeleb dan, qed nipproponu qafas simili bbażat fuq firxa ta’ estratti-imbagħad-klassifikazzjoni b’ġeuristika ġdida u mtejba. L-esperimenti fuq it-tliet settijiet ta’ dejta referenzjarji (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) juru li l-mudell tagħna b’mod konsistenti jaqbeż l-aħħar avvanz attwali. Barra minn hekk, qed nippreżentaw ukoll sett ta’ dejta ġdid ta’ reviżjonijiet tal-films supervizzati (Movie20) u sett ta’ dejta ta’ reviżjonijiet tal-films psewdotikkettati (filmsLarge) magħmul b’mod espliċitu għal dan il-kompitu u nirrappurtaw ir-riżultati dwar is-sett ta’ dejta tal-films il-ġdid ukoll.', 'mk': 'Анализата на чувствата има за цел да го детектира целокупното чувство, tj. поларитетот на реченицата, параграфот или текстот, без да се разгледуваат споменетите ентитети и нивните аспекти. Анализата на чувствата базирана на аспекти има за цел да ги извади аспектите на дадените целни ентитети и нивните соодветни чувства. Претходните работи го формулираат ова како проблем со одбележување на секвенца или ја решаваат оваа задача користејќи рамка на екстракт-тогаш-класификација базирана на растојание каде прво сите цели на мислење се извадени од реченицата, а потоа со помош на претставувања на растојание, целите се класификувани како позитивни, негативни или не Проблемот со означувањето на секвенцата страда од проблеми како што се чувствата на несогласност и колосално место за пребарување. Додека рамките за екстракт-тогаш-класификување базирани на Шпанија страдаат од прашања како што се покривање на половина зборови и прекривање на рамките. За да го надминеме ова, предложуваме слична рамка за екстракт-тогаш-класификација со нов и подобрен хеористик. Експериментите на трите компјутери на податоци (Ресторант14, Лаптоп14, Ресторант15) покажуваат дека нашиот модел постојано го надминува сегашниот современ резултат. Покрај тоа, ние исто така претставуваме нов набљудуван филмски рецензиски податоци (Movie20) и псевдо-означен филмски рецензиски податоци (moviesLarge) направен експлицитно за оваа задача и ги известуваме резултатите и на новиот филмски рецензиски податоци (Movie20).', 'ml': 'ഒരു വാക്ക്, പാര്\u200dപ്പ്, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ടെക്സ്പേന്\u200d എന്നിവയുടെ മൊത്തം വികാരണങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്യായം ലക്ഷ്യമാണ്, അതായത് വ കൊടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഗങ്ങളെയും അവയുടെ വിചാരകങ്ങളെയും പുറത്തെടുക്കാനുള്ള ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്നു. മുമ്പ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു സെക്കന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ ടാഗിങ്ങ് പ്രശ്നമാക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നമാണെന്നോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d സ്പാന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായിട്ടുള്ള പിന്നെ ക്ലാസ്ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ടാഗിങ്ങ് പ്രശ്നം വിചാരിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രശ് Whereas, Span-based extract-then-classify framework suffers from issues such as half-word coverage and overlapping spans.  ഇതിനെ വിജയിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പോലെയുള്ള സ്പാന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള പിന്നെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ക് ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേ മൂന്ന് ബെന്\u200dക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d (റെസ്റ്റാര്\u200dട്ടാന്\u200dഡ 14, ലാപ്റ്റോപ്പോപ്14, റെസ്റ്റര്\u200dനാറ്റി15) നമ്മു അതുകൊണ്ടും, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d സിനിമ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാവുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ സിനിമ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാവുകള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ജോ', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх ухааны шинжилгээ нь хэлбэрийн, хэлбэрийн, хэлбэрийн, эсвэл текст хэмжээний нийтлэг мэдрэмжүүдийг ойлгохын тулд зориулагддаг. Дасгалын үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ нь өгөгдсөн зорилготой байгууллагуудын талаар, тэдний харилцааны сэтгэл хөдлөлийг татах зорилго юм. Эхний ажил үүнийг дарааллаар тагтаж буй асуудлын хувьд тодорхойлох эсвэл үүнийг давхар-суурилсан тайлбар-дарааллаар ангид тайлбарлах хэлбэрээр шийдвэрлэх боломжтой. Эхлээд бүх санааны зорилго нь өгүүлбэрээс гарч ирсэн бөгөөд дараа нь тэгшитгэ Дараагийн асуудал нь сэтгэл хөдлөл болон хайх орон зайд байдаг. Гэхдээ Спан-д суурилсан хагас үгийнхээ дараа нь нэмэгдэх хэмжээсүүд нь хагас үгийнхээ дараа нь хэмжээсүүдийн тухай асуудлууд болж байна. Үүнийг давхарлахын тулд бид шинэ, сайжруулагдсан хэмжээсүүдтэй адилхан хэмжээсүүдийг нэмэгдүүлэх боломжтой. Гурван хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) бидний загварыг одоогийн урлагийн байдлыг үргэлж үзүүлдэг. Мөн бид нар энэ ажлын төлөө шинэ зохиолын дамжуулагдсан киноны шинжилгээ өгөгдлийн санг (Кином20) болон шинжилгээ нэрлэгдсэн киноны шинжилгээ (КиномLarge) өгөгдлийн санг тайлбарлаж өгдөг.', 'ro': 'Analiza sentimentelor își propune să detecteze sentimentul general, adică polaritatea unei propoziții, paragrafe sau intervale de text, fără a lua în considerare entitățile menționate și aspectele acestora. Analiza sentimentului bazată pe aspecte își propune să extragă aspectele entităților țintă date și sentimentele lor respective. Lucrările anterioare formulează acest lucru ca o problemă de etichetare a secvenței sau rezolvă această sarcină folosind un cadru de extragere-apoi-clasificare bazat pe span, unde mai întâi toate țintele de opinie sunt extrase din propoziție, iar apoi cu ajutorul reprezentărilor span, țintele sunt clasificate ca pozitive, negative sau neutre. Problema de etichetare a secvențelor suferă de probleme precum inconsistența sentimentelor și spațiul colosal de căutare. În timp ce, cadrul extract-apoi-clasificare bazat pe Span suferă de probleme cum ar fi acoperirea jumătate de cuvânt și intervale suprapuse. Pentru a depăși acest lucru, propunem un cadru similar bazat pe extract-apoi-clasificare, cu o euristică nouă și îmbunătățită. Experimentele efectuate pe cele trei seturi de date de referință (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) arată că modelul nostru depășește constant nivelul actual de ultimă generație. Mai mult decât atât, prezentăm, de asemenea, un set de date pentru recenziile filmelor supravegheate (Movie20) și un set de date pentru recenziile filmelor pseudoetichetate (movieLarge) realizate în mod explicit pentru această sarcină și raportăm rezultatele și pe setul de date Movie20.', 'pl': 'Analiza sentymentów ma na celu wykrycie ogólnego sentymentu, tj. polaryzacji zdania, akapitu lub zakresu tekstu, bez uwzględnienia wymienionych podmiotów i ich aspektów. Analiza sentymentów oparta na aspektach ma na celu wyodrębnienie aspektów danych podmiotów docelowych i ich odpowiednich sentymentów. Poprzednie prace formułują to jako problem tagowania sekwencji lub rozwiązują to zadanie za pomocą opartego na rozpiętości ramy ekstraktu-następnie klasyfikacji, w którym najpierw wszystkie cele opinii są wyodrębnione ze zdania, a następnie za pomocą reprezentacji rozpiętości, cele są klasyfikowane jako pozytywne, negatywne lub neutralne. Problem z tagowaniem sekwencji cierpi na problemy takie jak niespójność sentymentów i kolosalna przestrzeń wyszukiwania. Podczas gdy ramy oparte na rozdzielczości wyciąg-następnie klasyfikuj cierpią z powodu takich problemów jak pokrycie półsłowa i nakładające się zakresy. Aby to przezwyciężyć, proponujemy podobny, oparty na rozpiętości strukturę ekstraktu-a-klasyfikacji z nową i ulepszoną heurystyką. Eksperymenty na trzech zestawach danych referencyjnych (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) pokazują, że nasz model konsekwentnie przewyższa aktualny stan sztuki. Ponadto prezentujemy również nowy zestaw danych nadzorowanych recenzji filmów (Movie20) oraz pseudoznakowany zestaw danych recenzji filmów (moviesLarge) stworzony specjalnie dla tego zadania oraz raportujemy wyniki na temat nowego zestawu danych Movie20.', 'no': 'Sentimentanalysen må oppdaga den generelle sentimenten, t.d. polariteten på eit setning, avsnitt eller tekstavsnitt, utan å forstå dei oppgjevne einingane og aspektane sine. Den aspektbaserte sentimentanalisen må utpakke aspekten av dei oppgjevne målene og deres respektive sentimentar. Førre arbeider å formere dette som eit sekvensmerkingsproblem eller løyse denne oppgåva ved å bruka eit spenbasert extract-then-klassifisera rammeverket der første alle meningsmålene vert pakka ut frå setninga, og så med hjelp av spenserepresentasjonar, er målene klassifisert som positiv, negativ eller nøytral. Problemet med merkinga av sekvens får frå problema som følelser ikkje samsvar og søkjemodus. Mens spanbasert extract-then-klassifiserer rammeverket går frå problemer som halvorddekkevne og overlapping av mellomrom. For å overføre dette, foreslår vi eit liknande spenbasert ekstrakt-deretter-klassifisert rammeverket med eit roman og forbetra heuristisk. Eksperimentane på dei tre benchmarkdatasetta (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) viser modellen vårt konsistent utfører den gjeldande tilstanden av kunsten. I tillegg presenterer vi også ein novel oversikt filmoversikt dataset (Film20) og eit pseudomerket filmoversikt dataset (filmLarge) som er gjort ekspliskt for denne oppgåva og rapporterer resultatet om film20-dataset også.', 'so': 'Baaritaanka xilliga ah waxaa loola jeedaa in la ogaado xisaabta guud, tusaale ahaan polarinimada ereyga, paragraf, ama qoraalka, iyadoon ka fiirsanaynin waxyaabaha la soo sheegay iyo dhinacyadooda. Analyska fikrada waxaa loola jeedaa inuu soo bixiyo dhinacyada alaabta la siiyo iyo fikradooda. Shaqooyinka hore waxay ka dhigaan dhibaatada tagsiga ama ay ku xajisaa shaqaalahaan si ay u isticmaalaan sawir-ka-saaran-daba-daba-hoos, meesha ugu horeysa dhamaan waxyaabaha aragtida laga soo saaro xafiiska, kadibna waxaa lagu caawiyaa wakiilada span, waxyaabaha waxaa loo qeyb-dhigi karaa positive, negative ama neutral. Dhibaatooyinka tagsiga dabadeed waxay ka dhibaataysaa arrimaha la xiriira tusaale ahaan fekerka iyo goobta raadinta farsamada ah. Whereas, Span-based extract-then-classify framework suffers from issues such as half-word coverage and overlapping spans.  Inaan ka adkayso, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa firaaqad la mid ah oo ku saabsan saxda iyo horumarinta. Imtixaan ku saabsan saddexda takhasuska bangiga (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) waxay muujiyaan modelkeeni si joogto ah u muuqata xaalada-the-art. Sidoo kale waxaynu u keennaa waraaq la ilaaliyo filimaanta macluumaadkiisa (movie 20) iyo macluumaadka filimada la qoray (filimaamLarge) oo aad u cad u samaysay shuqulkan, waxaana sidoo kale wargelinaynaa resultiyada ku qoran taariikhda fiidiyo 20.', 'sr': 'Sentimentna analiza cilja je da otkrije ukupni osjećaj, tj. polarnost rečenice, paragrafa ili teksta, bez razmišljanja o spomenutim entitetima i njihovim aspektima. Analiza sentimenta na osnovu aspekta ima cilj da izvuče aspekte određenih ciljnih entitata i njihovih respektivnih osjećaja. Prije delova formiraju ovo kao problem označavanja sekvence ili rešiti ovaj zadatak koristeći okvir ekstrakta-onda-klasifikacije, gdje su prvo svi ciljevi mišljenja izvedeni iz rečenice, a zatim uz pomoć predstavljanja razina, ciljevi su klasifikovani kao pozitivni, negativni ili neutralni. Problem označavanja sekvence pati od problema poput neskladnosti sentimenta i velikog prostora pretraživanja. Međutim, na španskom osnovu ekstrakta-onda-klasifikacijskog okvira pati od pitanja poput polovičnog pokrivanja i preklapanja prostora. Da bi to prevazili, predlažemo sličan ekstrakt-onda-klasifikacijski okvir sa romanom i poboljšanim heurističkim. Eksperimenti na tri serije podataka o referenciji (Restoran14, Laptop14, Restoran15) pokazuju da naš model konsekventno iznosi trenutno stanje umjetnosti. Osim toga, predstavljamo i roman nadziranog filmskog pregleda podataka (Film20) i pseudo-označenog filmskog pregleda podataka (filmovi Veliki) koji su izrazili jasno za ovaj zadatak i izvještavali rezultate o novom filmskom setu podataka.', 'sv': 'Känsleanalys syftar till att upptäcka den övergripande känslan, dvs polariteten i en mening, stycke eller textspann, utan att ta hänsyn till de entiteter som nämns och deras aspekter. Aspektbaserad sentimentalanalys syftar till att extrahera aspekterna av de givna målenheterna och deras respektive sentiment. Tidigare arbeten formulerar detta som ett sekvensmärkningsproblem eller löser denna uppgift med hjälp av ett span-baserat extrakt-sedan-klassificera ramverk där först alla opinionsmål extraheras ur meningen, och sedan med hjälp av span representationer klassificeras målen som positiva, negativa eller neutrala. Problemet med sekvensmärkning lider av problem som sentimentinkonsekvens och kolossalt sökutrymme. Medan Span-baserade extrakt-sedan-klassificera ramverk lider av frågor som halvord täckning och överlappande spännvidder. För att övervinna detta föreslår vi ett liknande span-baserat extrakt-sedan-klassificering ramverk med en ny och förbättrad heuristisk. Experiment på de tre jämförelsedatauppsättningarna (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) visar att vår modell konsekvent överträffar den nuvarande toppmodern. Dessutom presenterar vi ett nytt övervakat filmgranskningsdataset (Movie20) och ett pseudomärkt filmgranskningsdataset (MovieLarge) som gjorts uttryckligen för denna uppgift och rapporterar resultaten på den nya Movie20-datasetet.', 'si': 'සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණය අදහස් කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ දේවල් හොයාගන්න, ඉතින්, වාක්ය, පැරතුම, නැත්තම් පාළුවක් ස්ථානයක් හැකියා ස්පෙක්ට් අධාරිත සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණය අරමුණයි, දෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන ඉලක්ෂිත වර්ගය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ගෞර මුලින් වැඩ කරන්නේ මේක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ටැග් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, නැත්නම් මේ වැඩියාව විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ටැග් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා වගේම සංවේදනය සහ සොයාගැනීමේ අවසාන ඒ වගේම, ස්පැන් අධාරිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, වචන වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්න මේක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි. බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් තුනක් පරීක්ෂණය (රෙස්ටෝරැන්ටර් 14, ලැප්ටොප් 14, රෙස්ටෝරැන්ටර් 15) අපේ මොඩේලය පෙන්වන්න පු තවත්, අපි ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා චිත්\u200dරපටිය පරීක්ෂණය දත්ත සැට (චිත්\u200dරපටිය 20) සහ ප්\u200dරධානයක් ලේබල් කරලා චිත්\u200dරපටිය පරීක්ෂණය දත්ත සැට (', 'ta': 'உணர்வு ஆராய்வு மொத்த உணர்வுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும், அதாவது, வாக்கி, paragraph, அல்லது உரை ஸ்பேன், பொருள்கள் மற்றும் அவை விளைவுகளையும் பார்க்காமல் ஒரு த கொடுக்கப்பட்ட இலக்கு பொருளின் விளைவுகளையும் மற்றும் அவை உணர்வுகளையும் வெளியேற்ற வேண்டும். முன்னிருப்பு வேலைகள் இதை ஒரு வரிசையாக ஒட்டுதல் பிரச்சனையாக வடிவமைக்கும் அல்லது இதை தீர்வு செய்யும் ஸ்பான் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள வெளியீடு- பின்னர் வகைப்படுத்தும் சட்டத்திலிரு தொடர்ந்து ஒட்டுதல் பிரச்சனைகள் உணர்வு பொருத்தம் மற்றும் வண்ணமான தேடும் இடம் போன்ற பிரச்சனைகளில் இருந் ஆனால், பாதி வார்த்தை மற்றும் மேல்மேற்கோள்கள் போன்ற பிரச்சனைகளில் இருந்து பாதி வார்த்தை மற்றும் வெளியீட்டு வ இதை வெற்றி பெற, நாம் ஒரு போன்ற ஸ்பான் அடிப்படையிலான வெளியீட்டு பின்னர் வகைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட சட்டத்தை ஒரு புதையத்துடன்  மூன்று பெங்குரு தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் உள்ள சோதனைகள் (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) எங்கள் மாதிரி தற்போதைய நிலையில் உள்ள- கலைக்கு முறையில் காட்டு மேலும், நாம் ஒரு புதிய பாதையை கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட படம் பரிசோதிக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பு (படம் 20) மற்றும் ஒரு புதிய சித்திர குறிப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பு (படங்கள் பெரியது) வெளிப்படையா', 'ur': 'سنتی تحقیقات کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ کلمہ، پاراگراف، یا متن کی منحصر کی مختلف احساسات کو پہچان سکیں، بغیر ان کے ذریعے اور ان کی منحصروں کے ذریعے. نظر پر بنیاد ہوا احساس تحلیل کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ ان کے ذمہ داروں اور ان کے احساساتوں کے اندازے نکال دیں۔ پہلے کام کرتا ہے کہ اسے ایک سطح ٹاگنگ مسئلہ کے طور پر فرمول کریں یا اس کا کام حل کریں ایک سطح-بنیادی extract-then-classify فرمول کے مطابق جہاں پہلے سارے منظور موضوعوں کو sentence سے نکالے جاتے ہیں، اور پھر اس سطح نمائش کے مدد سے موضوعات مثبت, منفی یا ناتورال کے طور پر کلی سفارش ٹاگنگ مسئلہ کی طرح احساس ناپاکیزگی اور سرمایہ جگہ کی جگہ سے مشکل ہوتی ہے. جبکہ اسپان کی بنیاد ہے اٹھانے کے بعد کلاسفات کا فرمود ایسے موضوع سے ہے جیسے آدھی کلمات کا پوشاک اور اوپر لپٹ کی جگہ۔ اس پر غالب ہونے کے لئے ہم ایک ایسی طرح طرح کے اندازے سے اٹھانے کے بعد کلاس کا فرمود پیش کریں گے جو ایک کاهن کے ساتھ اور بڑھائے جاتے ہیں۔ تین بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ کے تجربے (رستوران 14, لاپٹوپ 14, رستورانٹ 15) ہمارے موڈل کو ہمیشہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ موجود آرت کی حالت سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ اور ہم نے اس کام کے لئے صریح طور پر ایک نوم تحت نظر کی فیلم ریونسٹ ڈیٹ سٹ (فیلم 20) اور ایک pseudo-labeled فیلم ریونسٹ ڈیٹ سٹ (فیلم بزرگ) کو پیش کیا ہے اور نوم فیلم 20 ڈیٹ سٹ کے نتائج کو بھی گزارش دے رہے ہیں.', 'vi': 'Bản phân tích cảm xúc nhằm phát hiện tình cảm chung, tức là cực của một câu, một đoạn, hay cả dòng văn bản, mà không cân nhắc các thực thể được đề cập và các khía cạnh của nó. Phân tích ủy mị dựa trên khía cạnh nhằm thu thập các khía cạnh của các thực thể mục tiêu và tình cảm của họ. Những công việc trước đây đặt nó như một vấn đề định hiệu dãy số hoặc giải quyết nhiệm vụ này bằng một bộ phận phân loại tách thời gian, nơi đầu tiên tất cả các mục tiêu ý kiến được chiết xuất từ bản án, sau đó nhờ sự giúp đỡ của các biểu hiện thời gian, mục tiêu được phân loại thành tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích dương, âm tính, hoặc trung lập. Vấn đề hiệu số mệnh của vấn đề có vấn đề như mâu thuẫn cảm xúc và một không gian tìm kiếm khổng lồ. Trong khi đó, bộ khung chiết xuất lỗi thời của Span đang phải gánh chịu những vấn đề như việc che đậy một nửa từ và chồng chéo. Để vượt qua chuyện này, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống phân loại tách tương tự với một thần kinh mới và cải tiến. Các thí nghiệm trên ba bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Reston) cho thấy mô hình của chúng tôi hoàn toàn vượt trội. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi cũng giới thiệu một tập tin xem phim được giám sát mới (Movie 20) và một tập tin đánh giá giả (moà Large) được làm rõ ràng cho nhiệm vụ này và báo cáo kết quả trong tập tin mới Movie 20.', 'uz': "Sentimet analyzeri huddi bir so'z, paragraf yoki matn chegarasini aniqlash uchun imkoniyatini aniqlash mumkin. Ko'rinadigan sentiment analyzeri koʻrsatilgan maqola obʼektlarning qismlarini va har xil hissiyalarni ajratish mumkin. Birinchi vazifalar bu vazifani sezgiruvchi muammolar sifatida yaratish yoki bu vazifani span asosida ajratish va keyin klassifning chegarasini ishlatish mumkin. Keyin hamma ma ma'lumotlar birinchi so'zdan chiqaradi va keyin span representations yordamida, maqolalar yaxshi, negativ yoki katta. @ info: whatsthis Shunday qilib, Spanish asosida chiqish va keyin classifik freymlar bir necha so'zni koʻchirish va spanlarni koʻpaytirish mumkin. Buni yaxshi ko'rib chiqarish uchun, biz span asosida bir xil darajadagi darajaga qarab chiqaramiz va yuriylikni yaxshi ko'paytirish uchun. Name Ko'rib, biz bu vazifani aniqlangan kino taʼminotlari (Movie 20) va pseudo-lab boʻlgan filmni taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibini ko'rsatdik va novel Movie20 maʼlumotlar tarkibida natijalari haqida beradi.", 'nl': 'Sentiment analyse is bedoeld om het algemene sentiment te detecteren, d.w.z. de polariteit van een zin, alinea of tekstbereik, zonder rekening te houden met de genoemde entiteiten en hun aspecten. Aspect-based sentiment analyse heeft als doel de aspecten van de gegeven doelentiteiten en hun respectieve sentiments te extraheren. Eerdere werken formuleren dit als een sequentie tagging probleem of lossen deze taak op met behulp van een span-based extract-then-classificate framework waarbij eerst alle opiniedoelen uit de zin worden gehaald, en vervolgens met behulp van span representaties, de doelen worden geclassificeerd als positief, negatief of neutraal. Het sequence tagging probleem heeft te maken met problemen als sentiment inconsistentie en kolossale zoekruimte. Terwijl het op Span gebaseerde extract-then-classificate framework lijdt aan problemen als halfwoorddekking en overlappende overspanningen. Om dit te overwinnen, stellen we een soortgelijk span-based extract-then-classification framework voor met een nieuwe en verbeterde heuristiek. Experimenten met de drie benchmark datasets (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) laten zien dat ons model consistent beter presteert dan de huidige state-of-the-art. Daarnaast presenteren we ook een nieuwe supervised film reviews dataset (Movie20) en een pseudo-gelabelde film reviews dataset (moviesLarge) die expliciet voor deze taak is gemaakt en rapporteren we de resultaten ook op de nieuwe Movie20 dataset.', 'da': 'Følelsesanalysen har til formål at opdage den overordnede følelse, dvs. polariteten af en sætning, afsnit eller tekst spænd, uden at tage hensyn til de nævnte enheder og deres aspekter. Aspektbaseret sentimentalanalyse har til formål at udtrække aspekter af de givne målenheder og deres respektive sentimentals. Tidligere værker formulerer dette som et sekvensmærkningsproblem eller løser denne opgave ved hjælp af en span-baseret ekstrakt-derefter-klassificere ramme, hvor først alle meningsmålene udtrækkes fra sætningen, og derefter ved hjælp af span repræsentationer klassificeres målene som positive, negative eller neutrale. Problemet med sekvensmærkning lider af problemer som følelsesmæssig inkonsekvens og kolossal søgeplads. Mens Span-baseret ekstrakt-derefter-klassificere ramme lider af spørgsmål som halvord dækning og overlappende spænder. For at overvinde dette foreslår vi en lignende span-baseret ekstrakt-derefter-klassificering ramme med en ny og forbedret heuristik. Eksperimenter med de tre benchmark datasæt (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) viser, at vores model konsekvent overgår den aktuelle state-of-the-art. Desuden præsenterer vi også et nyt overvåget filmanmeldelsesdatasæt (Movie20) og et pseudomærket filmanmeldelsesdatasæt (MovieLarge), der er lavet eksplicit til denne opgave, og rapporterer resultaterne på det nye Movie20 datasæt.', 'de': 'Die Sentimentanalyse zielt darauf ab, das allgemeine Sentiment, d.h. die Polarität eines Satzes, Absatzes oder Textbereichs zu erkennen, ohne die genannten Entitäten und ihre Aspekte zu berücksichtigen. Die aspektbasierte Sentiment Analyse zielt darauf ab, die Aspekte der gegebenen Zielentitäten und ihre jeweiligen Sentiments zu extrahieren. Frühere Arbeiten formulieren dies als Sequenz-Tagging-Problem oder lösen diese Aufgabe mithilfe eines span-based extract-then-classifice Frameworks, in dem zunächst alle Meinungsziele aus dem Satz extrahiert werden, und dann mit Hilfe von span-Repräsentationen die Ziele als positiv, negativ oder neutral klassifiziert werden. Das Sequenz-Tagging-Problem leidet unter Problemen wie Sentiment Inkonsistenz und kolossalem Suchraum. Während das Span-basierte Extrakt-dann-Klassifizieren-Framework unter Problemen wie Halbwortabdeckung und überlappenden Spannen leidet. Um dies zu überwinden, schlagen wir ein ähnliches span-based extract-then-classize Framework mit einer neuartigen und verbesserten Heuristik vor. Experimente an den drei Benchmark-Datensätzen (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) zeigen, dass unser Modell den aktuellen Stand der Technik durchweg übertrifft. Darüber hinaus präsentieren wir einen neuartigen Supervised Movie Reviews Dataset (Movie20) und einen Pseudo-Labeled Movie Reviews Dataset (moviesLarge) explizit für diese Aufgabe erstellt und berichten die Ergebnisse auch auf dem neuen Movie20 Dataset.', 'bg': 'Анализът на сентимента има за цел да открие цялостното чувство, т.е. полярността на изречение, абзац или текстов обхват, без да се вземат предвид споменатите субекти и техните аспекти. Анализът на сентимента, базиран на аспекти, има за цел да извлече аспектите на дадените целеви субекти и техните съответни сентиментации. Предишни творби формулират това като проблем с етикетирането на последователността или решават тази задача, използвайки рамка за извличане-след-класификация, в която първо всички цели на мнението се извличат от изречението, а след това с помощта на представяне на обхвата, целите се класифицират като положителни, отрицателни или неутрални. Проблемът с етикетирането на последователността страда от проблеми като сантиментално несъответствие и колосално пространство за търсене. Докато рамката, базирана на извлечение-след-класификация, страда от проблеми като покритие на половин дума и припокриващи се интервали. За да преодолеем това, предлагаме подобна рамка, базирана на интервал екстракция-след-класификация, с нова и подобрена евристика. Експериментите върху трите базови набора данни (Ресторант14, Лаптоп14, Ресторант15) показват, че нашият модел постоянно надминава сегашното състояние на техниката. Освен това, представяме и набор от данни за ревюта на филми под надзор (Филм20) и набор от данни за ревюта на филми с псевдо-етикет (ФилмГолеми), направени изрично за тази задача, както и докладваме резултатите за набора от данни на романа Филм20.', 'hr': 'Izvještajna analiza cilja je otkriti ukupni osjećaj, tj. polarnost rečenice, odstavka ili teksta, bez razmatranja spomenutih entitata i njihovih aspekta. Analiza osjećaja na osnovu aspekta cilja je izvući aspekte određenih ciljnih subjekta i njihovih odgovarajućih osjećaja. Prije djela to formuliraju kao problem označavanja sekvence ili rješavanje ovog zadatka koristeći okvir ekstrakta-onda-klasifikacije, gdje su prvo svi ciljevi mišljenja izvučeni iz rečenice, a zatim s pomoć predstavljanja razina ciljevi klasifikirani kao pozitivni, negativni ili neutralni. Problem označavanja sekvence pati od problema poput neskladnosti osjećaja i kolosnog prostora pretraživanja. Međutim, na osnovu spanskog ekstrakta-onda-klasifikacijskog okvira pati od pitanja poput polariječnog pokrivanja i preklapanja prostora. Da bi to prevazili, predlažemo sličan ekstrakt-onda-klasifikacijski okvir sa romanom i poboljšanim heurističkim. Eksperimenti na tri standardna seta podataka (Restoran14, Laptop14, Restoran15) pokazuju naš model konsekventno iznosi trenutno stanje umjetnosti. Također, predstavljamo i novu nadzornu filmsku pregledu podataka (Movie20) i pseudo-označenu filmsku pregledu podataka (filmovi Veliki) koji su izrazili jasno za ovaj zadatak i prijavili rezultate o novom filmskom kompetu podataka.', 'id': 'Analisis perasaan bermaksud untuk mendeteksi keseluruhan perasaan, i.e., polaritas kalimat, paragraf, atau jangkauan teks, tanpa mempertimbangkan entitas yang disebut dan aspek mereka. Aspect-based sentiment analysis aims to extract the aspects of the given target entities and their respective sentiments.  Pekerjaan sebelumnya membentuk ini sebagai masalah pengukuran urutan atau memecahkan tugas ini menggunakan rangka ekstrakt-maka-klasifikasi berdasarkan jangkauan di mana pertama-tama semua sasaran pendapat dikekstraksi dari kalimat, dan kemudian dengan bantuan represensi jangkauan, sasaran diklasifikasi sebagai positif, negatif, atau neutral. Masalah penanda urutan menderita dari masalah seperti ketidakkonsistensi perasaan dan ruang pencarian besar. Sementara, struktur ekstrakt-maka-klasifikasi berdasarkan Span menderita dari masalah seperti penutupan setengah kata dan penutupan jangkauan. Untuk mengatasi ini, kami mengusulkan rangka ekstrakt-kemudian-klasifikasi yang sama dengan sebuah novel dan heuristik yang lebih baik. Eksperimen pada tiga set data benchmark (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) menunjukkan model kami secara konsisten melebihi state-of-the-art saat ini. Selain itu, kami juga mempersembahkan sebuah set data reviews film yang diawasi novel (Movie20) dan sebuah set data reviews film yang diawasi pseudo (moviesLarge) yang dibuat secara eksplicit untuk tugas ini dan melaporkan hasil pada set data Movie20 novel juga.', 'fa': 'تحلیل احساساتی هدف دارد که احساسات عمومی را شناسایی کند، یعنی قطبی یک جمله، پاراگراف یا طول متن، بدون توجه به عنوان شرایط اشاره شده و اشاره\u200cهایشان. تحلیل احساسات بر اساس نظر، هدف می\u200cگیرد که نقطه\u200cهای موجودات هدف و احساسات مختلف آنها را خارج کند. کارهای پیشینه این را به عنوان یک مشکل نقاشی برای نقاشی کردن ترکیب یا حل این کار را با استفاده از یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ مشکل نقاشی از مشکلات مثل ناپایداری احساسات و فضای جستجوی کلاس رنج می\u200cبرد. در حالی که چهارچوب\u200cهای استخراج-پس-کلاس اسپانیا به عنوان پوشش نیم کلمه\u200cها و جایگاه\u200cهای تغییر\u200cپوشش درد می\u200cیابد. برای تغییر این کار، ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها تجربه\u200cها روی سه مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سنگ\u200cمارک (رستوران ۱۴، لپ\u200cتاپ ۱۴، رستوران ۱۵) مدل ما را به طور کامل از وضعیت هنر اجرا می\u200cکنند. علاوه بر این، ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای فیلم (فیلم ۲۰۰) و مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای فیلم (فیلم\u200cهای بزرگ) را برای این کار مشخصا ساخته\u200cایم و نتایج\u200cها را در مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای فیلم ۲۰۰ نیز گزارش می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Sentiment analysis aims to detect the overall sentiment, i.e., the polarity of a sentence, paragraph, or text span, without considering the entities mentioned and their aspects.  Uchambuzi wa hisia kwa mtazamo unalenga kuondoa vipengele vya vitu vinavyopewa lengo na hisia zao zinazoheshimiwa. Kazi ya awali inatengeneza hili kama tatizo la kuchagua mfululizo au kutatua juhudi hili kwa kutumia miundombi yenye asili ya spania yenye utaratibu ambao kwanza malengo yote ya maoni yanaondolewa kutoka kwenye hukumu hiyo, na kisha kwa msaada wa uwakilishi wa spania, malengo yanadanganyika kama chanya, hasi au katikati. Tatizo la kutangaza kwa mfululizo linaathiri kutokana na masuala kama vile kutokuwepo kwa hisia na upatikanaji wa kutafuta ukoloni. Wakati huo huo, mfumo wa aina hiyo wa Uhispania unaosababishwa na masuala kama vile habari ya nusu ya maneno na upande wa siku. Ili kushinda hili, tunapendekeza mfumo unaofanana na maeneo yanayotokana na maeneo yanayofanana na maeneo yanayofanana na hali ya juu. Majaribio kwenye seti hizo tatu za bendera (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) zinaonyesha model yetu kwa ujumla unaofanya hali ya sanaa ya sasa. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaweka riwaya inayofuatiliwa na taarifa za filamu (filamu 20) na seti ya filamu inayotajwa kwa jina la utafiti (filamu Large) iliweka wazi kwa kazi hii na kuripoti matokeo kwenye seti ya data za Wikipedia 20.', 'tr': 'Sensitiw analizi hemme duýgularyny, diýmek bolsa sözlem, paragrafyň polaritlygyny, ýa-da metin gezek diýilip agzalan guramlaryny maslahat etmek üçin amaçlandyrýar. Görnüş tabanly duýgular analyzasynda berilen maksadyň zadynyň we olaryň sylagy duýgularynyň aspektlerini çykarmak maksady. Öňki işleýän bu zady bir sanat etiketleme meselesi hökmünde çözür ýada bu zadyny özüne-tabanly extract-then-klasifik çerçevesi ullanýar. Ilkinji sanat hedefleri sözlerden çekilýär we soňra süýtgeden suratlaryň kömegi bilen, hedefler pozitif, negatif we neutral ýaly bölünýärler. Bu terjime etilemek meselesi duýgular ýaly hasaplanjak we koloslar arama seleňinden bolar. Spaniýa daýanýan extract-then-klasifikasyň çerçevesinden ýarym sözleri örän meselelerden çykýar. Muny üstüne çykmak üçin, bir roman we üstünleşen heuristik bilen meňzeş bir şekilde a şrak-dan soňra klasifik çerçevesini teklip edip görýäris. Üç benchmark veri setirinde (Restoran14, Laptop14, Restoran15) nusgasymyzyň häzirki möhüm taýýarlarynyň üstüne ýok ýagdaýyny görkezýär. Mundan soňra biz filmiň üstünde gözleýän resmi datasetini (Movie20) we pseudo-etilen filmiň resmi datasetini (filmler Ullakan) bu zadyň üçin a çıklandyryldy we netijelerini roman filmi20 sanynda bildirdik.', 'ko': '정서분석은 전체적인 정서, 즉 문장, 단락 또는 텍스트의 경계의 극성을 측정하는 데 목적을 두고 언급된 실체와 그 방면을 고려하지 않는다.측면의 정서 분석을 바탕으로 목표 실체에 대한 측면과 각자의 정서를 추출하는 데 목적을 둔다.이전의 작업에서 이를 서열 표기 문제로 묘사하거나 광도를 바탕으로 추출한 다음에 분류 구조를 이용하여 이 임무를 해결했다. 먼저 문장에서 모든 관점 목표를 추출한 다음에 광도를 빌려 목표를 적극적, 소극적, 중성으로 분류했다.서열 라벨 문제에는 감정의 불일치와 커다란 검색 공간 등의 문제가 존재한다.그러나 경계를 바탕으로 추출한 다음에 분류 프레임워크에 반어 범위와 중첩 경계 등 문제가 존재한다.이 문제를 극복하기 위해 우리는 광범위한 추출을 바탕으로 분류하는 비슷한 구조를 제시했고 새로운 계발식 방법을 채택했다.세 가지 기준 데이터 집합(Restaurant14,Laptop14,Restaurant15)에서의 실험은 우리의 모델이 시종 현재의 가장 선진적인 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.그 밖에 우리는 새로운 감독 영화 평론 데이터 집합(Movie20)과 위조 라벨 영화 평론 데이터 집합(movies Large)을 제시했고 새로운 무비20 데이터 집합에 결과를 보고했다.', 'am': 'የሰዓት ትምህርት አካባቢ፣ የፍርድ፣ ፓርላማ ወይም የጽሑፍ ስፋት፣ የተናገረውን አካባቢዎች እና ጉዳዮቻቸውን ሳይመለከቱ የሙሉ ስሜት ማግኘት ነው፡፡ በተመሳሳይ የስሜት አስተያየት የተሰጠውን አካባቢዎች እና የአካላዊ ስሜቶች ለመውጣት ነው፡፡ አስቀድሞ የሚሠራ ሥራ ይህ ስራ በቁጥጥር ላይ መግለጫ መሆኑን ወይም በመጀመሪያ የቆጣጠሩ ተቃውሞ ሁሉ ከፍርድ ወጥተዋል፣ ከዚያም በኋላ በስፓን መልዕክቶች እርዳታ አካባቢ፣ ተቃውሞዎቹ አካባቢ፣ negative ወይም በቁጥጥር እንደተለያዩበት ነው፡፡ የግንኙነት መግለጫ መከራ እንደ ስሜት ውጤታዊ ስህተት እና ቀላል ፍለጋት ስፍራን ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የስፓን-based ውጤት-ከ-በኋላ የክፍለ ሥርዓት እኩሌታዊ ቃላት ክፍተት እና ክፍተቶችን እንደተጨማሪው ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ለዚህ ለማሸንፍ፣ በተመሳሳይ፣ በተጨማሪው የስፓን የኋላ የክፍለ ሥርዓት እና በኖሮው እና በተሻለ የኦርቲክ ፍሬም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በሦስቱ benchmark datasets (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) ሞዴላያችንን በሁኔታ-of-the-art እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል። ደግሞም የፊልማን ተመልከት ዳታ ማዕከላዊ (ፊሌቪ20) እና የፊልዮ መልዕክት ዳታዎችን (ፊልሞዎች Large) ለዚህ ስራ ግልፅ እና በኖሮው ፊዲዮ 20 ዳታ ላይ ፍሬቶችን እናገልጽበታለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Analiza e ndjenjave synon të zbulojë ndjesinë e përgjithshme, pra polaritetin e një fjalie, paragrafi apo zgjatje teksti, pa konsideruar njësitë e përmendura dhe aspektet e tyre. Analiza e ndjenjave bazuar në aspekte synon të nxjerrë aspektet e njësive të caktuara objektive dhe ndjenjat e tyre respektive. Punët e mëparshme e formulojnë këtë si një problem shekuese të etiketave ose zgjidhin këtë detyrë duke përdorur një kuadër ekstrakt-pastaj-klasifikues me bazë të shtrëngimit ku së pari të gjitha objektivat e opinionit nxirren nga fjalimi, dhe pastaj me ndihmën e përfaqësimeve të shtrëngimit, objektivat klasifikohen si pozitive, negative apo neutrale. The sequence tagging problem suffers from issues like sentiment inconsistency and colossal search space.  Ndërsa, kuadri i klasifikuar me bazë në Spanjë vuan nga çështje të tilla si mbulimi gjysmë-fjalësh dhe zgjatje të mbishtypura. Për ta kapërcyer këtë, ne propozojmë një kuadër të ngjashëm ekstrakt-atëherë-klasifikim me një roman dhe përmirësim heuristik. Eksperimentet në tre baza të dhënash (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) tregojnë se modeli ynë vazhdimisht mbizotëron gjendjen aktuale. Përveç kësaj, ne paraqesim gjithashtu një grup të dhënash të shqyrtimeve të filmit të mbikqyrur (Movie20) dhe një grup të dhënash të shqyrtimeve të filmit të pseudo-etiketuar (moviesLarge) të bërë eksplicitamente për këtë detyrë dhe të raportojmë rezultatet në grupin e dhënash të filmit të novel20 gjithashtu.', 'hy': 'Զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը նպատակով է հայտնաբերել ընդհանուր զգացմունքը, այսինքն նախադասության, պարբերակի կամ տեքստի տարածության հյուսիսականությունը, առանց հաշվի առնելու նշված անհատները և նրանց ասպեկտները: Սպեկտների վրա հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը նպատակում է վերցնել նշված նպատակային էակների ասպեկտները և նրանց հարաբերական զգացմունքները: Նախորդ աշխատանքները սա ձևավորում են որպես հաջորդականության նշաններ տալու խնդիր կամ լուծում են այս խնդիրը օգտագործելով տարածության հիմքով բացատրված-ապա-դասակարգված շրջանակ, որտեղ առաջին հերթին կարծիքի նպատակները հանվում են նախադասությունից, հետո օգտագործելով տարածության ներկայացումները նպատակները դասակար Խնդիրը հաջորդականության նշանների նշաններով տառապում է այնպիսի խնդիրներից, ինչպիսիք են զգացմունքների անհամապատասխանությունը և հսկայական որոնման տարածքը: Մինչդեռ Իսպանիայի հիմնված արտադրողական-ապա-դասակարգված շրջանակը տառապում է այնպիսի խնդիրներից, ինչպիսիք են կես բառերի ծածկումը և հակառակ տարածքները: Այս ամենը հաղթահարելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նմանատիպ լայնությամբ հիմնված արտահանման-ապա-դասակարգման շրջանակ նորարար և բարելավված հորիստիկայի հետ: Երեք համեմատական տվյալների (ռեստորան14, լապտոպ14, ռեստորան15) փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը մշտապես գերազանցում է ներկայիս տեխնոլոգիաները: Ավելին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք նաև նոր վերահսկված ֆիլմի վերանայման տվյալների համակարգ (movie20) և կեղծ ֆիլմի վերանայման տվյալների համակարգ (movies Large), որը արտահայտվել է այս խնդրի համար և տեղեկացնել արդյունքները նաև նոր ֆիլմի 20 տվյալների համակարգի մասին:', 'az': 'Sentiment analizi, sözlərin, paragrafının, ya da metin səviyyəsinin nümunəsini, danışdığı və onların aspektlərini düşünmədən bütün hissləri keşfetməyə məcburiyyət edir. Aspect-tabanlı hisslər analizi verilən məqsədilərin və hisslərinin aspektlərini çıxartmaq məqsədildir. Önceki işlər bunu seçmə etiketləmə problemi olaraq formülə edər ya da bu işləri span-based extract-then-classify framework vasitəsilə çəkir. İlk dəfə bütün fikir nişanları cümlədən çıxarılır və sonra müəyyən edilmələrin yardımıyla, məqsədilər pozitif, negatif və ya nötrəl kimi klasifiklənirlər. Seyir etiketləmə problemi hisslərin inconsistenci və çoxlu arama alanı kimi problemlərdən başa düşər. Lakin Span-tabanlı extract-then-classify frameworkləri yarı sözlərin örtüsü və aşırı-aşırı uzaqları kimi məsələlərdən çəkilir. Bunu üstün etmək üçün, bənzər bir istiqamətdə ekstrakt-sonra-sınıf framework ünü romanla və heuristik düzəltmək üçün təklif edirik. Üç benchmark veri qurğularının sınaqları (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) modelimizi müəyyən vaxtı art ıq durumunu göstərir. Daha sonra, biz də bu işin üçün a çıq-aydın yaratdığımız bir roman gözləyirli film reviews dataset (Movie20) və pseudo-etiketli film reviews dataset (moviesLarge) və roman Movie20 verilənlərin sonuçlarını da bildiririk.', 'af': "Sentiment-analisie doel om die hele sentiment te ontdek, t.e. die polarisie van 'n seting, paragraaf of teks-span, sonder om die entiteite wat geantwoord word en hulle aspekte te bepaal. Aspekte-gebaseerde sentimentanalisie doel om die aspekte van die gegewe doel entiteite en hulle respektiewe sentimente uit te trek. Vorige werke formeer hierdie as 'n volgorde merking probleem of los hierdie taak met 'n span-gebaseerde extract-then-klassifiseer raamwerk waar eerste al die besonderhede doels van die seting uitgevoer word, en dan met die hulp van span voorstellings, die doels word geklassifiseer as positiewe, negatiewe of neutrale. Die volgorde merking probleem lyf van probleem soos sentiment inkonsistensie en kolos soektog spasie. Maar Span-gebaseerde extract-then-klassifiseer raamwerk lyk van probleme soos helftewoord omdekking en oorvloediging spans. Om hierdie oorwin te word, voorstel ons 'n gelyke span-gebaseerde extract-then-klassifiseer raamwerk met 'n roman en verbeter heuristies. Experiments on the three benchmark datasets (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) show our model consistently outperforms the current state of the art. Ook, ons stel ook 'n roman ondersoekte film hersienings datastel (Movie20) en 'n pseudo-etiketeerde film hersienings datastel (filme Groot) uitduidelik gemaak vir hierdie taak en rapporteer die resultate ook op die novel Movie20 datastel.", 'bn': 'সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে সাধারণ অনুভূতি সনাক্ত করার, যেমন একটি বাক্য, প্যারাফ বা টেক্সপ্যানের দূরীতির উদ্দেশ্য, যা উল্ পরিস্থিতি ভিত্তিক অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষণের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে প্রদত্ত লক্ষ্যবস্তু এবং তাদের শ্রেষ্ঠত্বের প্রতি বিশ্লেষণ। প্রাথমিক কাজ এটিকে সেকেন্ড ট্যাগিং সমস্যা হিসেবে তৈরি করে অথবা এই কাজ সমাধান করে স্প্যান ভিত্তিক এক্সট্রেক্ট- তারপর ক্লাসিফার্কের মাধ্যমে যেখানে প্রথমে সব মতামতের লক্ষ্য এই বাক্য সেকেন্স ট্যাগিং সমস্যাটি অনুভূতি এবং কলোসাল অনুসন্ধানের স্থানের মত বিষয়গুলোর মধ্য থেকে বেদনাদায়ক। যেহেতু স্প্যান ভিত্তিক এক্সট্রেক্ট-পর্যন্ত বিভিন্ন ক্লাসেফ ফ্রেক্কার যেমন অর্ধ-শব্দ কাভারেজ এবং স্প্যানেজ এই বিষয়টি পরাজিত করার জন্য আমরা একই রকম স্প্যান ভিত্তিক এক্সট্রেক্ট-তারপর-পর্যন্ত ক্লাসিফার্ক প্রস্তাব করি একটি উপন্যাস এবং  Experiments on the three benchmark datasets (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) show our model consistently outperforms the current state-of-the-art.  এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি নভেল পর্যবেক্ষণ করা চলচ্চিত্রের তথ্য পর্যবেক্ষণের তথ্যের পর্যবেক্ষণ (চলচ্চিত্র ২০) এবং একটি পিসুডো লেবেল করা চলচ্চিত্রের ডাটারিভিউ সেট (চলচ্চিত্র', 'cs': 'Sentimentní analýza si klade za cíl zjistit celkový sentiment, tedy polaritu věty, odstavce nebo textového rozpětí, aniž bychom zohlednili zmíněné entity a jejich aspekty. Aspektová sentimentová analýza si klade za cíl extrahovat aspekty daných cílových entit a jejich příslušné sentimenty. Předchozí práce formulují tento problém jako sekvenční tagování problému nebo řeší tento úkol pomocí rozsahového extraktu-then-classificate frameworku, kde jsou nejprve extrahovány všechny názorové cíle z věty, a pak pomocí rozsahových reprezentací jsou cíle klasifikovány jako kladné, negativní nebo neutrální. Problém s tagováním sekvence trpí problémy, jako jsou nesrovnalost sentimentů a kolosální vyhledávací prostor. Zatímco rámec založený na rozšíření extraktu-then-classificate trpí problémy, jako je například pokrytí polovičního slova a překrývající se rozpětí. Abychom to překonali, navrhujeme podobný rámec založený na rozpětí extraktu a pak klasifikaci s novou a vylepšenou heuristikou. Experimenty na třech referenčních datových sadách (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) ukazují, že náš model konzistentně překonává současný stav techniky. Kromě toho představujeme nový soubor recenzí supervizovaných filmů (Movie20) a pseudoznačený soubor recenzí filmů (moviesLarge) vytvořený explicitně pro tento úkol a vykazujeme výsledky i na novém datovém souboru Movie20.', 'bs': 'Sentimentna analiza cilja je da otkrije ukupni osjećaj, tj. polarnost rečenice, paragrafa ili teksta, bez razmišljanja o spomenutim entitetima i njihovim aspektima. Analiza osjećanja na osnovu aspekta cilja je izvući aspekte određenih ciljnih entitata i njihovih odgovarajućih osjećaja. Prije djela to formuliraju kao problem označavanja sekvence ili rješavanje ovog zadatka koristeći okvir ekstrakta-onda-klasifikacije, gdje su prvo sva cilja mišljenja izvučena iz rečenice, a zatim s pomoć predstavljanja razina, ciljevi su klasifikirani kao pozitivni, negativni ili neutralni. Problem označavanja sekvence pati od problema poput neskladnosti sentimenta i velikog prostora pretraživanja. Međutim, na osnovu spanskog ekstrakta-tada-klasifikacije okvira pati od pitanja poput polariječnog pokrivanja i preklapanja prostora. Da bi to prevazili, predlažemo sličan ekstrakt-onda-klasifikacijski okvir sa romanom i poboljšanim heurističkim. Eksperimenti na tri standardna seta podataka (Restoran14, Laptop14, Restoran15) pokazuju da naš model konsekventno iznosi trenutno stanje umjetnosti. Također, predstavljamo i roman nadzirani film pregled podataka (Film20) i pseudo-označeni film pregled podataka (filmovi Veliki) koji su izrazili jasno za ovaj zadatak i izvještavali rezultate o novom filmskom setu podataka Movie20 također.', 'ca': "L'anàlisi del sentiment mira a detectar el sentiment general, és a dir, la polaritat d'una frase, paràgraf o espai de text, sense tenir en compte les entitats mencionades i els seus aspectes. L'anàlisi del sentiment basada en aspectes té l'objectiu d'extrair els aspectes de les entitats alvo dadas i els seus respectius sentiments. Els treballs anteriors ho formulen com un problem a d'etiquetage de seqüència o resolen aquesta tasca utilitzant un marc d'extract-llavors-classificació basat en l'espai on primer tots els objectius d'opinió són extraïts de la frase, i després amb l'ajuda de representacions d'espai, els objectius són classificats com positius, negatius o neutrals. El problema d'etiquetar la seqüència pateix problemes com l'inconsistencia sentimental i l'espai de recerca colossal. Mentre que el marc d'extracció-llavors-classificació basat en Espanya pateix problemes com la cobertura de mitja paraula i les superposicions. Per superar això, proposem un marc similar basat en l'espai d'extracció-llavors-classificació amb una heurística nova i millorada. Els experiments dels tres conjunts de dades de referència (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) mostran que el nostre model supera constantment l'actualitat. A més, també presentem un nou conjunt de dades sobre revisions de pel·lícules supervisades (Movie20) i un conjunt de dades sobre revisions de pel·lícules pseudo-etiquetats (moviesLarge) fets explícitament per aquesta tasca i també informem dels resultats sobre el conjunt de dades sobre la nova Movie20.", 'et': 'Sentimendianalüüsi eesmärk on tuvastada üldine sentiment ehk lause, lõike või tekstiulatuse polaarsus, arvestamata nimetatud olemeid ja nende aspekte. Aspektipõhise sentimentaalüüsi eesmärk on välja võtta konkreetsete sihtorganite aspektid ja nende vastavad tunnetused. Varasemad tööd sõnastavad seda kui järjestuse märgistamise probleemi või lahendavad selle ülesande, kasutades span-based ekstrakt-seejärel-klassifitseerimise raamistikku, kus esmalt kõik arvamuse sihtmärgid on välja võetud lausest ja seejärel span-representatsioonide abil liigitatakse sihtmärgid positiivseteks, negatiivseteks või neutraalseteks. Järjekorra sildistamise probleem kannatab selliste probleemide tõttu nagu sentimentaalne vastuolu ja tohutu otsinguruum. Span-põhine ekstrakt-seejärel-klassifitseeri raamistik kannatab selliste probleemide all nagu poolsõna katvus ja kattuvad ulatused. Selle ületamiseks pakume välja sarnase span-based ekstrakt-then-classifique raamistiku uue ja täiustatud heuristika. Kolme võrdlusandmekogumi (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) eksperimendid näitavad, et meie mudel on pidevalt ületanud praeguse tehnika taseme. Lisaks esitame ka uudse juhendatud filmiaruannete andmekogumi (Movie20) ja pseudomärgistusega filmiaruannete andmekogumi (MoviesLarge), mis on loodud selgesõnaliselt selle ülesande jaoks ning anname aru ka uudse Movie20 andmekogumi tulemustest.', 'fi': 'Tunteanalyysin tavoitteena on havaita yleinen tunne eli lauseen, kappaleen tai tekstin polariteetti ottamatta huomioon mainittuja kokonaisuuksia ja niiden näkökohtia. Aspektipohjaisen tunneanalyysin tavoitteena on poimia kohdekokonaisuuksien näkökulmia ja niiden tuntemuksia. Aiemmat työt muotoilevat tämän sekvenssimerkkausongelmaksi tai ratkaistaan tämä tehtävä span-pohjaisella extract-then-classificate -kehyksellä, jossa ensin kaikki mielipiteet poimitaan lauseesta, ja sitten span-representaatioiden avulla kohteet luokitellaan positiivisiksi, negatiivisiksi tai neutraaleiksi. Sekvenssimerkkausongelma kärsii tunteiden epäjohdonmukaisuudesta ja valtavasta hakutilasta. Span-pohjainen extract-then-classificate framework kärsii ongelmista, kuten puolisanan kattavuudesta ja päällekkäisistä väleistä. Tämän ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme samanlaista span-pohjaista uute-sitten-luokittelukehystä, jossa on uusi ja parannettu heuristiikka. Kokeet kolmesta vertailuaineistosta (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu jatkuvasti nykytekniikan tasosta. Lisäksi esittelemme erityisesti tätä tehtävää varten tehdyn valvotun elokuvakatsauksen aineiston (Movie20) ja pseudoleimatun elokuvakatsauksen aineiston (MoviesLarge) sekä raportoimme myös romaanin Movie20 aineiston tulokset.', 'jv': 'Sentiment pect-basic Sensitive Ngawe next track Taning Ngawe jenis-jenis iki, kita supoyo nggawe tarjamahan luwih dumadhi podho "extract-after-CLASS" Getama pertama ing telu bench dataset (restoran14, Laptop 14, restoran16) iso nggambar modelu nambah sing ngendalikno urip nggawe barang-urip saiki. Label', 'he': 'Sentiment analysis aims to detect the overall sentiment, i.e., the polarity of a sentence, paragraph, or text span, without considering the entities mentioned and their aspects.  Aspect-based sentiment analysis aims to extract the aspects of the given target entities and their respective sentiments.  עבודות קודמות מייצגות את זה כבעיה של תווית רצף או לפתור את המשימה הזאת באמצעות מסגרת מייצג-אז-קלאס מבוססת מייצג-אז-קלאס שבו קודם כל מטרות הדעה מווצאות מהמשפט, ואז עם עזרת מייצגים של מייצגים של מייצגים, המטרות מסווגות כחיוביים, שליליים או נוטרלים. הבעיה עם התג הרצף סובלת ממשאות כמו אי-תואמות רגשות ומרחב חיפוש ענקי. בעוד שסגרת המסגרת המבוססת על ספנס סובלת מבעיות כמו כיסוי חצי מילים ומערכת התקפלות. כדי להתגבר על זה, אנו מציעים מסגרת מוצקה-אז-קלאסית דומה עם רומן והיוריסטיקה משופרת. ניסויים על שלושת קבוצות נתונים (מסעדה 14, מכשיר המחשב 14, מסעדה 15) מראים שהדוגמא שלנו יוצאת מהמצב המיוחד הנוכחי. חוץ מזה, אנחנו גם מציגים סדר נתונים של ביקורת סרטים מפקחים על רומן (Movie20) וסדר נתונים של ביקורת סרטים עם תווים פסאודו (MovesLarge) שנעשה באופן ברור עבור המשימה הזו ולדווח על התוצאות גם על סדר נתונים של הסרטים הרומנים Movie20.', 'ha': "Ana ƙayyade wa zaman shawara don ya yi amfani da wajen gane hisãbi gaba ɗaya, misali, tsarin maganar, rubutu, ko kuma matsayin, idan ba ka kula da abubuwan da aka faɗa ba da matsayinsu. Ana ƙayyade bakin da aka yiwu aka yi amfani da ya sami duk matsayin abun da aka bai wa ajalinsu. Primary aikin na ƙayyade wannan a matsayin tagogi ko kuma ya sole wannan aikin da za'a yi amfani da wani firam wanda ya ƙayyade span-baka-baka-danne-danne wanda za'a fito duk ma'anarsa a farkon da za'a fito daga maganar, sa'an nan kuma a yi taimakon mataimaki ga span, za'a ƙayyade goalli kamar mataimaki, negative ko neutral. The sequence tagging problem suffers from issues like sentiment inconsistency and colossal search space.  A lokacin da, firam mai ƙayyade span-da-daban-mai-fassara yana da su daga masu kama da rufe-kalmar da aka rufe spani. To domin ta rinjãya wannan, Munã nufi wani firam mai kama da span-da-sa'an nan-daraja da wani bango da aka samar da shi. Tajararin bayani na danna biyu (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) za'a nuna motel'in da ke samu gabatar da halin-the-art. Za da haka, muna halatar da wani noveli wanda aka tsare na filinaiki na tsari (Movie20) da wani danne na tsudo-labeted filinaiki (filamu Large) na bayyana bayani ga wannan aikin kuma munã gaya matsalan na danna na Movie20.", 'bo': 'Sentiment analysis aims to detect the overall sentiment, i.e. the polarity of a sentence, paragraph, or text span, without considering the entities mentioned and their aspects. Aspect-based sentiment analysis aims to extract the aspects of the given target entities and their respective sentiments. Prior works formulate this as a sequence tagging problem or solve this task using a span-based extract-then-classify framework where first all the opinion targets are extracted from the sentence, and then with the help of span representations, the targets are classified as positive, negative, or neutral. དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཚོར་བ་དང་མཐོང་མེད་པའི་བར་སྟོང་དང་། གང་ལགས་ཞེ་ན། Span-based extract-then-classify framework has suffered from issues such as half-word coverage and overlapping spans. འདི་ལྟ་མི་བཀག་པའི་སྐོར་ལས། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྩ་བའི་ཕྱོགས་རྩིས་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། གསར་གཏོད་དང་ ཡ Experiments on the three benchmark datasets (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) show our model consistently outperforms the current state-of-the-art. Moreover, we also present a novel supervised movie reviews dataset (Movie20) and a pseudo-labeled movie reviews dataset (moviesLarge) made explicitly for this task and report the results on the novel Movie20 dataset as well.', 'sk': 'Analiza čustva je namenjena odkrivanju celotnega čustva, tj. polarnosti stavka, odstavka ali razpona besedila, brez upoštevanja omenjenih entitet in njihovih vidikov. Analiza sentimenta na podlagi vidikov je namenjena izvleči vidike danih ciljnih subjektov in njihovih ustreznih sentimentalnih občutkov. Predhodna dela to oblikujejo kot problem označevanja zaporedja ali rešijo to nalogo z uporabo okvira, ki temelji na obsegu ekstrakta-nato-klasifikacije, kjer so najprej vsi cilji mnenja izvlečeni iz stavka, nato pa s pomočjo ponazoritev obsega cilji razvrščeni kot pozitivni, negativni ali nevtralni. Težava z označevanjem zaporedja trpi zaradi težav, kot so čustvena neskladnost in ogromen iskalni prostor. Medtem ko okvir, ki temelji na izvlečku-nato-klasifikaciji, trpi zaradi težav, kot so pokritost polbesed in prekrivanje razponov. Da bi to premagali, predlagamo podoben obsežni okvir ekstrakta-nato-klasifikacije z novo in izboljšano heuristiko. Poskusi na treh referenčnih naborih podatkov (Restaurant14, Laptop14, Restaurant15) kažejo, da je naš model dosledno boljši od sedanjih najsodobnejših. Poleg tega predstavljamo tudi nov nadzorovan nabor podatkov o pregledih filmov (Movie20) in psevdoznačen nabor podatkov o pregledih filmov (MoviesLarge), izrecno izdelan za to nalogo, ter poročamo tudi o rezultatih novega nabora podatkov Movie20.'}
{'en': 'Litescale : A Lightweight Tool for Best-worst Scaling Annotation', 'es': 'Litescale: una herramienta ligera para la anotación de escalado mejor-peor', 'ar': 'Litescale: أداة خفيفة الوزن لأفضل وأسوأ شرح للمقياس', 'fr': "Litescale\xa0: un outil léger pour les meilleures annotations de mise à l'échelle", 'pt': 'Litescale: uma ferramenta leve para a pior anotação de escala', 'zh': 'Litescale曰:最佳缩放注轻量级具', 'ja': 'Litescale ：最悪のスケーリングアノテーションのための軽量ツール', 'ru': 'Litescale: Легкий инструмент для аннотации наихудшего масштабирования', 'hi': 'Litescale: सर्वश्रेष्ठ सबसे खराब स्केलिंग एनोटेशन के लिए एक हल्के उपकरण', 'ga': 'Litescale: Uirlis Éadroma don Anótáil Scála is Fearr', 'hu': 'Litescale: Egy könnyű eszköz a legrosszabb méretezési jegyzékhez', 'el': 'Ένα ελαφρύ εργαλείο για την καλύτερη και χειρότερη επισήμανση κλίμακας', 'ka': 'Name', 'lt': 'Litescale: A Lightweight Tool for Best-worst Scaling Annotation', 'kk': 'Литескалы: Ең жақсы масштабтау үшін аяқтық құралы', 'it': 'Litescale: uno strumento leggero per le annotazioni di scalabilità migliori', 'mk': 'Litescale: A Lightweight Tool for Best-worst Scaling Annotation', 'ms': 'Litescale: A Lightweight Tool for Best-worst Scaling Annotation', 'ml': 'ലിറ്റെസ്കേല്\u200d: ഏറ്റവും മോശപ്പെട്ട വലിപ്പത്തിനുള്ള ഉപകരണം', 'mt': 'Litskala: Għodda ħafifa għall-Aqwa Annotazzjoni tal-Iskalar', 'no': 'Litescale: Eit lysverktøy for best skaleringsnotasjon', 'pl': 'Litescale: lekkie narzędzie do najlepszych komentarzy skalowania', 'ro': 'Litescale: Un instrument ușor pentru cele mai bune adnotări de scalare', 'sr': 'Litescale: Lako težinski alat za najgore oznake za skaliranje', 'so': 'Liisanka: A Lightweight Tool for Best Scaling', 'sv': 'Litescale: Ett lättviktsverktyg för bästa möjliga skalningsannotering', 'ta': 'ஒளி அளவு: சிறந்த அளவுக்கான ஒரு ஒளி எடை கருவி', 'mn': 'Литескал: Сайн хамгийн муу хэмжээний хэмжээний жингийн хэрэгсэл', 'si': 'ලිටිස්කේල්: හොඳම ස්කේලින්ග් සැලසුම් වෙනුවෙන් ලිටිස්කේල් උපකරණයක්', 'ur': 'Litescale: A Lightweight Tool for Best Scaling Annotation', 'uz': 'OĘ»lchami:', 'vi': 'Litescale: Một công cụ về thang âm đỉnh nhất', 'hr': 'Litescale: Laka težina alata za najgore oznake za skaliranje', 'nl': 'Litescale: Een lichtgewicht hulpmiddel voor de beste-slechtste schaalanotatie', 'de': 'Litescale: Ein leichtes Tool für Best-Worst Scaling Anmerkungen', 'id': 'Skala: Alat ringan untuk Annotasi Skala Terburuk', 'fa': 'Litescale: یک ابزار سبک برای بهترین نویسندۀ مقیاس', 'bg': 'Лек инструмент за най-лоша анотация на скалиране', 'da': 'Litescale: Et letvægtsværktøj til den bedste værste skalering Annotation', 'af': "Litescale: ' n Ligte Gewigte Nutsprogramme vir Beste- worst Skalering Annotation", 'ko': 'Litescale: 최상위 및 최하위 축척 주석을 위한 경량 도구', 'tr': 'Litsek:En kötü ölçeklenme Annotation için A çmak Aracı', 'sw': 'Kipimo: Kifaa cha mwanga kwa Tamko Bora Bora', 'hy': 'Լիթսալ. Լեյլ գործիք լավագույն չափման նշումների համար', 'sq': 'Litskale: Një mjet i lehtë për anotacionin më të keq të shkallës', 'am': 'Scale: A Lightweight Tool for Best Scaling Annotation', 'bs': 'Litescale: Letki alat za najgoru oznake za skaliranje', 'bn': 'সাইটস্কেল: সর্বোচ্চ পরিমাণ বিজ্ঞাপনের জন্য একটি লাইটওয়েট টুল', 'ca': 'Litescala: Una eina lliure per anotar la millor peor escala', 'et': 'Litescale: kerge tööriist parima halvima skaalamise annotatsiooni jaoks', 'az': 'Litescale: En pis Scaling Annotation üçün ən yüngül Alet', 'fi': 'Litescale: Kevyt työkalu parhaan skaalauksen merkintään', 'cs': 'Litescale: lehký nástroj pro nejlepší nejhorší škálování anotace', 'jv': 'unit-format', 'he': 'מעמד קטן: כלי קל לאנוטציה הגרועה ביותר', 'sk': 'Litescale: Lahko orodje za najboljše najslabše opombe za tehtanje', 'ha': 'Litescale: A Lightweight Tool for Best-worst Scaling Annotation', 'bo': 'Litescale:ཚད་འཕགས་ཤིས་ཀྱི་ཉེས་པ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ལ་ཉུང་བའི་ལག་ཆ་ཞིག་'}
{'en': 'Best-worst Scaling (BWS) is a methodology for annotation based on comparing and ranking instances, rather than classifying or scoring individual instances. Studies have shown the efficacy of this methodology applied to NLP tasks in terms of a higher quality of the datasets produced by following it. In this system demonstration paper, we present Litescale, a free software library to create and manage BWS annotation tasks. Litescale computes the tuples to annotate, manages the users and the annotation process, and creates the final gold standard. The functionalities of Litescale can be accessed programmatically through a Python module, or via two alternative user interfaces, a textual console-based one and a graphical Web-based one. We further developed and deployed a fully online version of Litescale complete with multi-user support.', 'es': 'BWS (BWS) es una metodología de anotación basada en la comparación y clasificación de instancias, en lugar de clasificar o puntuar instancias individuales. Los estudios han demostrado la eficacia de esta metodología aplicada a las tareas de PNL en términos de una mayor calidad de los conjuntos de datos producidos al seguirla. En este documento de demostración del sistema, presentamos Litescale, una biblioteca de software libre para crear y administrar tareas de anotación de BWS. Litescale calcula las tuplas para anotar, administra los usuarios y el proceso de anotación, y crea el estándar de oro final. Se puede acceder a las funcionalidades de Litescale mediante programación a través de un módulo de Python, o a través de dos interfaces de usuario alternativas, una basada en consola de texto y otra gráfica basada en la Web. Desarrollamos e implementamos una versión totalmente en línea de Litescale con soporte multiusuario.', 'pt': 'Best-worst Scaling (BWS) é uma metodologia para anotação baseada na comparação e classificação de instâncias, em vez de classificar ou pontuar instâncias individuais. Estudos têm demonstrado a eficácia desta metodologia aplicada a tarefas de PNL em termos de uma maior qualidade dos conjuntos de dados produzidos por ela. Neste documento de demonstração do sistema, apresentamos o Litescale, uma biblioteca de software livre para criar e gerenciar tarefas de anotação do BWS. Litescale calcula as tuplas para anotar, gerencia os usuários e o processo de anotação e cria o padrão ouro final. As funcionalidades do Litescale podem ser acessadas programaticamente por meio de um módulo Python, ou por meio de duas interfaces de usuário alternativas, uma baseada em console textual e uma baseada na Web gráfica. Desenvolvemos e implantamos ainda mais uma versão totalmente online do Litescale com suporte multiusuário.', 'ar': 'القياس الأفضل-الأسوأ (BWS) هو منهجية للتعليق التوضيحي تستند إلى مقارنة الأمثلة وترتيبها ، بدلاً من تصنيف أو تسجيل الحالات الفردية. أظهرت الدراسات فعالية هذه المنهجية المطبقة على مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية من حيث الجودة العالية لمجموعات البيانات المنتجة باتباعها. في ورقة عرض النظام هذه ، نقدم Litescale ، مكتبة برامج مجانية لإنشاء وإدارة مهام التعليقات التوضيحية لـ BWS. يحسب Litescale المجموعات للتعليق ، وإدارة المستخدمين وعملية التعليقات التوضيحية ، وإنشاء المعيار الذهبي النهائي. يمكن الوصول إلى وظائف Litescale برمجيًا من خلال وحدة Python النمطية ، أو عبر واجهتي مستخدم بديلتين ، واحدة قائمة على وحدة تحكم نصية وواحدة رسومية قائمة على الويب. لقد قمنا بتطوير ونشر إصدار كامل عبر الإنترنت من Litescale مع دعم متعدد المستخدمين.', 'fr': "Best-worst Scaling (BWS) est une méthodologie d'annotation basée sur la comparaison et le classement des instances, plutôt que sur la classification ou la notation des instances individuelles. Des études ont démontré l'efficacité de cette méthodologie appliquée aux tâches de PNL en termes d'amélioration de la qualité des ensembles de données produits en la suivant. Dans ce document de démonstration du système, nous présentons Litescale, une bibliothèque logicielle gratuite permettant de créer et de gérer des tâches d'annotation BWS. Litescale calcule les tuples à annoter, gère les utilisateurs et le processus d'annotation, et crée l'étalon-or final. Les fonctionnalités de Litescale sont accessibles par programmation via un module Python ou via deux interfaces utilisateur alternatives, une interface textuelle basée sur une console et une interface graphique basée sur le Web. Nous avons développé et déployé une version entièrement en ligne de Litescale avec prise en charge multi-utilisateurs.", 'ja': '最悪スケーリング（ BWS ）は、個々のインスタンスを分類またはスコアリングするのではなく、インスタンスの比較とランク付けに基づいてアノテーションを行う方法論です。研究は、NLPタスクに適用されるこの方法論の有効性を、それに従うことによって生成されるデータセットのより高い品質の観点から示している。このシステムデモ論文では、BWSアノテーションタスクを作成および管理するためのフリーソフトウェアライブラリであるLitescaleを紹介します。Litescaleは、アノテーションするタプルを計算し、ユーザーとアノテーションプロセスを管理し、最終的なゴールドスタンダードを作成します。Litescaleの機能は、Pythonモジュールを介して、またはテキストコンソールベースのものとグラフィカルWebベースのものの2つの代替ユーザーインターフェースを介してプログラムでアクセスできます。さらに、マルチユーザーサポートを備えた完全オンライン版のLitescaleを開発し、導入しました。', 'zh': '最佳-最差缩放 (BWS) 乃比较排名实例之注法,非特例分评分也。 论此术用于NLP者有效性在循其所生之数而高质量之。 此篇系统演文,言Litescale,所以创治BWS注免费软件库也。 Litescale 计批注之元组,治用户注,创黄金之极。 Litescale 可以访 Python 模块以编程,亦可以二代用户界面(一本控制台之用户界面,一 Web 之形用户界面)访之。 开张在线Litescale版,多有用户扶持。', 'hi': 'सर्वश्रेष्ठ-सबसे खराब स्केलिंग (बीडब्ल्यूएस) व्यक्तिगत उदाहरणों को वर्गीकृत करने या स्कोर करने के बजाय तुलना और रैंकिंग उदाहरणों के आधार पर एनोटेशन के लिए एक पद्धति है। अध्ययनों ने एनएलपी कार्यों पर लागू इस पद्धति की प्रभावकारिता को इसका पालन करके उत्पादित डेटासेट की उच्च गुणवत्ता के संदर्भ में दिखाया है। इस प्रणाली प्रदर्शन पत्र में, हम Litescale, बीडब्ल्यूएस एनोटेशन कार्यों को बनाने और प्रबंधित करने के लिए एक मुफ्त सॉफ्टवेयर लाइब्रेरी प्रस्तुत करते हैं। Litescale annotate करने के लिए tuples की गणना करता है, उपयोगकर्ताओं और एनोटेशन प्रक्रिया का प्रबंधन करता है, और अंतिम सोने का मानक बनाता है। लाइटस्केल की कार्यक्षमताओं को एक पायथन मॉड्यूल के माध्यम से प्रोग्रामेटिक रूप से एक्सेस किया जा सकता है, या दो वैकल्पिक उपयोगकर्ता इंटरफेस, एक टेक्स्ट कंसोल-आधारित एक और एक ग्राफिकल वेब-आधारित एक के माध्यम से। हमने आगे विकसित किया और मल्टी-यूजर सपोर्ट के साथ लाइटस्केल का एक पूरी तरह से ऑनलाइन संस्करण तैनात किया।', 'ru': 'Наихудшее масштабирование (BWS) - это методология аннотирования, основанная на сравнении и ранжировании экземпляров, а не на классификации или оценке отдельных экземпляров. Исследования показали эффективность этой методологии, применяемой к задачам NLP, с точки зрения более высокого качества наборов данных, полученных в результате ее следования. В этом системном демонстрационном документе мы представляем Litescale, библиотеку свободного программного обеспечения для создания и управления задачами аннотации BWS. Litescale вычисляет кортежи для аннотирования, управляет пользователями и процессом аннотирования, а также создает окончательный золотой стандарт. Доступ к функциям Litescale можно получить программно через модуль Python или через два альтернативных пользовательских интерфейса, текстовый консольный и графический веб-интерфейс. Мы также разработали и развернули полностью онлайн-версию Litescale в комплекте с многопользовательской поддержкой.', 'ga': 'Is modheolaíocht í an Scálú is Measa is Fearr (BWS) le haghaidh nótaí bunaithe ar chásanna a chur i gcomparáid agus a rangú, seachas cásanna aonair a rangú nó a scóráil. Tá léirithe ag staidéir éifeachtúlacht na modheolaíochta seo a chuirtear i bhfeidhm ar thascanna NLP i dtéarmaí chaighdeán níos airde na dtacar sonraí a tháirgtear trína leanúint. Sa pháipéar taispeána córais seo, cuirimid Litescale i láthair, leabharlann bogearraí saor in aisce chun tascanna nótaí BWS a chruthú agus a bhainistiú. Ríomhann Litescale na tuples chun anótáil a dhéanamh, bainistíonn sé na húsáideoirí agus an próiseas anótála, agus cruthaíonn sé an caighdeán óir deiridh. Is féidir feidhmiúlachtaí Litescale a rochtain go ríomhchláraithe trí mhodúl Python, nó trí chomhéadan úsáideora eile, ceann atá bunaithe ar chonsól téacsach agus ceann grafach bunaithe ar an nGréasán. Rinneamar a thuilleadh forbartha agus imlonnaithe ar leagan iomlán ar líne de Litescale mar aon le tacaíocht ilúsáideora.', 'ka': 'ყველაზე საუკეთესო სკვილირება (BWS) არის ანტორაციის მეტოლოგია, რომელიც შემდგომარება და რენტირება ინსტაციების დაბაზეულია, ვიდრე კლასიფიკაცია ან სკვილირება ინსტ სწავლებები გამოჩვენეთ ეს მეტოლოგიის эფექტიურობა, რომელიც NLP დავალებისთვის გამოყენებული მონაცემების უფრო მეტი კალექტის შესახებ. ამ სისტემის დემონსტრაციის დომენტში, ჩვენ Litescale-ს, თავისუფალი პროგრამის ლიბერიკა, რომ BWS ანტორაციის დავალებების შექმნა და გადაეყენება. Name Name ჩვენ უფრო მეტად განვითარებით და გამოყენებით Litescale-ის უფრო დასრულებული მომხმარებელი მხარეს მომხმარებელი გერიცია.', 'el': 'Η καλύτερη-χειρότερη κλιμάκωση (BWS) είναι μια μεθοδολογία σχολιασμού που βασίζεται στη σύγκριση και την κατάταξη των περιπτώσεων, αντί να ταξινομεί ή να βαθμολογεί μεμονωμένες περιπτώσεις. Μελέτες κατέδειξαν την αποτελεσματικότητα αυτής της μεθοδολογίας που εφαρμόζεται στα καθήκοντα NLP όσον αφορά την υψηλότερη ποιότητα των συνόλων δεδομένων που παράγονται με την εφαρμογή της. Σε αυτό το έγγραφο επίδειξης συστήματος, παρουσιάζουμε μια βιβλιοθήκη ελεύθερου λογισμικού για τη δημιουργία και διαχείριση εργασιών σχολιασμού BWS. Το υπολογίζει τις τελείες για να σχολιάσει, διαχειρίζεται τους χρήστες και τη διαδικασία σχολιασμού και δημιουργεί το τελικό χρυσό πρότυπο. Οι λειτουργίες του μπορούν να προσεγγιστούν προγραμματικά μέσω μιας ενότητας Python, ή μέσω δύο εναλλακτικών διεπαφών χρήστη, μιας κονσόλας κειμένου και μιας γραφικής διαδικτυακής. Αναπτύξαμε περαιτέρω και αναπτύξαμε μια πλήρως ηλεκτρονική έκδοση του με υποστήριξη πολλαπλών χρηστών.', 'hu': 'A legrosszabb skálázás (BWS) a jegyzetek összehasonlításán és rangsorolásán alapuló módszertan, ahelyett, hogy az egyes példányokat osztályoznák vagy pontoznák. Tanulmányok kimutatták, hogy az NLP-feladatokra alkalmazott módszer hatékonysága a követéssel létrehozott adatkészletek magasabb minősége tekintetében hatékony. Ebben a rendszerbemutató tanulmányban bemutatjuk a Litescale-t, egy szabad szoftverkönyvtárat a BWS jegyzetelési feladatok létrehozására és kezelésére. A Litescale kiszámítja a tuplek jegyzetelését, kezeli a felhasználókat és a jegyzetelési folyamatot, és létrehozza a végső aranyszabványt. A Litescale funkciói programozva Python modulon keresztül, vagy két alternatív felhasználói felületen keresztül érhetők el, egy szöveges konzol alapú és egy grafikus Web alapú felületen keresztül. Továbbfejlesztettük és telepítettük a Litescale teljesen online verzióját, többfelhasználós támogatással.', 'it': "Best-worst Scaling (BWS) è una metodologia per l'annotazione basata sul confronto e la classifica delle istanze, piuttosto che classificare o classificare singole istanze. Gli studi hanno dimostrato l'efficacia di questa metodologia applicata ai compiti PNL in termini di una qualità superiore dei set di dati prodotti seguendo la stessa. In questo documento dimostrativo di sistema, presentiamo Litescale, una libreria software gratuita per creare e gestire attività di annotazione BWS. Litescale calcola le tuple da annotare, gestisce gli utenti e il processo di annotazione e crea lo standard gold finale. Le funzionalità di Litescale possono essere accessibili programmaticamente attraverso un modulo Python, o tramite due interfacce utente alternative, una testuale basata su console e una grafica basata su Web. Abbiamo ulteriormente sviluppato e distribuito una versione completamente online di Litescale completa di supporto multi-utente.", 'kk': 'Ең жақсы масштабтау (BWS) деген әрбір инстанцияларды салыстыру және сәйкестіру орнына негіздеген жазбалардың методологиясы. Сынақтар NLP тапсырмаларына қолданылатын бұл методологияның эффективнігін көрсетті. Келесіден шығаратын деректер жиындарының сапасы жоғары. Бұл жүйелік демонстрациялау қағазында, БWS жазбаларын құру және басқару үшін бос бағдарлама жиынын Litescale деп таңдаймыз. Литескал түпкелерді есептеп, пайдаланушыларды және жазбаларды басқару және соңғы алтын стандартты құрады. Litescale функциялары Python модулі арқылы не екі альтернативті пайдаланушылар интерфейсі арқылы, текстуалды консоль негізінде бір және графикалық Веб негізінде қолданылады. Біз көп пайдаланушыларды қолдаумен Litescale- тың толық онлайн нұсқасын жасадық.', 'lt': 'Geriausias skalavimas (BWS) yra anotacijos metodika, grindžiama palyginimo ir klasifikavimo atvejais, o ne atskirų atvejų klasifikavimo ar vertinimo metodu. Tyrimai parodė, kad ši metodika, taikoma NLP užduotims, yra veiksmingesnė, atsižvelgiant į aukštesnę duomenų rinkinių kokybę, gautą taikant šią metodiką. Šiame sistemos demonstraciniame dokumente pristatome Litescale, nemokamą programinės įrangos biblioteką BWS anotacijos užduotims sukurti ir valdyti. Litescale apskaičiuoja dublius anotuoti, tvarko naudotojus ir anotacijos procesą ir sukuria galutinį aukso standartą. The functionalities of Litescale can be accessed programmatically through a Python module, or via two alternative user interfaces, a textual console-based one and a graphical Web-based one.  Toliau plėtojome ir diegėme visiškai internetinę Litescale versiją, kuri buvo užbaigta įvairių naudotojų parama.', 'mk': 'Најлошото скалирање (BWS) е методологија за анотација базирана на споредба и рангирање на инстанции, наместо класификација или оценка на индивидуални инстанции. Истражувањата покажаа ефикасност на оваа методологија аплицирана на задачите на НЛП во однос на повисок квалитет на податоците произведени со следењето на неа. Во овој системски демонстрациски документ, ја претставуваме Litescale, слободна софтверска библиотека за создавање и управување со задачите за анотација на BWS. Litescale ги пресметува двојните за да ги анотира, ги менаџира корисниците и процесот на анотирање, и го создава последниот златен стандард. Функционалностите на Litescale може да се пристапат програмски преку Python модул или преку две алтернативни кориснички интерфејси, текстуална конзола базирана и графична веб-базирана. Понатаму развивме и распоредивме целосна онлајн верзија на Литскала комплетна со поддршка од мултикорисници.', 'ms': 'Skala terbaik terburuk (BWS) adalah metodologi untuk anotasi berdasarkan perbandingan dan peringkatan kejadian, daripada mengklasifikasi atau menilai kejadian individu. Studi telah menunjukkan kegunaan metodologi ini dilaksanakan pada tugas NLP dalam terma kualiti lebih tinggi bagi set data yang dihasilkan dengan mengikutinya. Dalam kertas demonstrasi sistem ini, kami perkenalkan Litescale, perpustakaan perisian percuma untuk mencipta dan mengelola tugas anotasi BWS. Litescale computes the tuples to annotate, manages the users and the annotation process, and creates the final gold standard.  Fungsi Litescale boleh diakses secara programmatik melalui modul Python, atau melalui dua antaramuka pengguna alternatif, satu berasaskan konsol teks dan satu berasaskan Web grafik. Kami lebih lanjut mengembangkan dan menggunakan versi secara online Litescale lengkap dengan sokongan pengguna berbilang.', 'mt': "L-agħar Skalar (BWS) huwa metodoloġija għall-annotazzjoni bbażata fuq it-tqabbil u l-klassifikazzjoni tal-istanzi, minflok il-klassifikazzjoni jew il-klassifikazzjoni tal-istanzi individwali. Studji wrew l-effikaċja ta’ din il-metodoloġija applikata għall-kompiti tal-NLP f’termini ta’ kwalità ogħla tas-settijiet tad-dejta prodotti billi segwewha. F’dan id-dokument ta’ dimostrazzjoni tas-sistema, qed nippreżentaw Litescale, librerija tas-softwer mingħajr ħlas biex to ħloq u timmaniġġja kompiti ta’ annotazzjoni tal-BWS. Litescale tikkalkula t-doppji biex tinnota, timmaniġġja l-utenti u l-proċess ta’ annotazzjoni, u to ħloq l-istandard finali tad-deheb. Il-funzjonalitajiet ta’ Litescale jistgħu jiġu a ċċessati b’mod programmatiku permezz ta’ modulu Python, jew permezz ta’ żewġ interfaċċji alternattivi tal-utent, wieħed ibbażat fuq konsola testwali u wieħed ibbażat fuq l-Internet grafiku. Aħna żviluppajna aktar u implimentajna verżjoni kompletament onlajn ta' Litescale kompluta b'appoġġ għal diversi utenti.", 'ml': 'വ്യക്തിയുടെ അവസ്ഥ വിശദീകരിക്കുക അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനു പകരം അത്യുത്തമമായി വിശദീകരണത്തിനുള്ള മികച്ച മാ എംഎല്\u200dപി ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഈ രീതിയിലെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടന പേപ്പറില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ലിറ്റെസ്കാലിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു, ബിഡബ്ലിഎസ് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്ക ലിറ്റെസ്കാല്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കളെയും അഭിപ്രായം പ്രക്രിയയെയും കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന ഉപയോക്താക്കളെയും കൈകാര്യം ചെയ് ലിറ്റെസ്കാലിന്റെ പ്രോഗ്രാമികമായി ഒരു പൈത്തോന്\u200d ഘടകം വഴിയോ രണ്ടു വിറ്റൊരു ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഇന്റര്\u200dമെസ്റ്റുകളിലൂടെ, ഒരു ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d കോണ്\u200dസോള ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വികസിപ്പിച്ച് ലിറ്റെക്കാലിന്\u200dറെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d പതിപ്പ് അയച്ചു', 'mn': 'Хамгийн муу хэмжээний (BWS) нь индивидуалыг хуваалцах эсвэл хуваалцах эсвэл хуваалцах оронд харьцуулах, хуваалцах үйл явцуудыг харьцуулах, хуваалцах аргачлал юм. Судалгаанууд NLP ажиллагаанд хэрэглэгдсэн энэ методологийг дагаж өгөгдлийн сангийн өндөр чанарыг харуулсан. Энэ системийн үзүүлэлтийн цаасан дээр бид Литескалийг үнэгүй програм хангамжийн номын бичсэн бөгөөд BWS-ийн анзаарлын ажлыг бүтээх болон удирдах хэрэгтэй. Литескал хэрэглэгчдийг тооцоолж, хэрэглэгчдийг удирдаж, нээлттэй процессийг удирдаж, сүүлийн алтын стандарт бий болгодог. Litescale-ын функцийнуудыг Python модуль, эсвэл хоёр өөр хэрэглэгчийн интерфейсүүдийн аргаар програмчлалын хувьд ашиглаж болно. Текст консоль суурилсан нэг болон график Веб суурилсан нэг. Бид олон хэрэглэгчийн дэмжлэгүүдтэй бүрэн Литескалийн онлайн хувилбарыг хөгжүүлж хувилбарласан.', 'ro': 'Best-worst Scaling (BWS) este o metodologie de adnotare bazată pe compararea și clasificarea instanțelor, mai degrabă decât clasificarea sau scorarea instanțelor individuale. Studiile au demonstrat eficacitatea acestei metodologii aplicate sarcinilor PNL în ceea ce privește o calitate mai ridicată a seturilor de date produse prin urmarea acesteia. În această lucrare demonstrativă de sistem, vă prezentăm Litescale, o bibliotecă de software gratuit pentru crearea și gestionarea sarcinilor de adnotare BWS. Litescale calculează tuplele pentru a adnota, gestionează utilizatorii și procesul de adnotare și creează standardul gold final. Funcționalitățile Litescale pot fi accesate programatic printr-un modul Python sau prin intermediul a două interfețe de utilizator alternative, una bazată pe consolă textuală și una grafică bazată pe Web. Am dezvoltat și implementat în continuare o versiune complet online a Litescale, completă cu suport multi-utilizator.', 'pl': 'Best-worst Scaling (BWS) to metodologia adnotacji oparta na porównywaniu i rankingu instancji, zamiast klasyfikować lub oceniać poszczególne instancje. Badania wykazały skuteczność tej metodologii stosowanej do zadań NLP pod względem wyższej jakości zbiorów danych tworzonych poprzez jej realizację. W tym artykule demonstracyjnym systemu prezentujemy Litescale, wolną bibliotekę oprogramowania do tworzenia i zarządzania zadaniami adnotacji BWS. Litescale oblicza kropki do adnotacji, zarządza użytkownikami i procesem adnotacji i tworzy ostateczny złoty standard. Do funkcjonalności Litescale można uzyskać dostęp programowo za pośrednictwem modułu Pythona lub za pośrednictwem dwóch alternatywnych interfejsów użytkownika, tekstowego konsolowego i graficznego internetowego. Dalej opracowaliśmy i wdrożyliśmy w pełni online wersję Litescale wraz z obsługą wielu użytkowników.', 'sr': 'Najgore skaliranje (BWS) je metodologija za annotaciju koja se temelji na usporedbi i redoviranju slučajeva, umjesto klasifikacije ili izvlačenju individualnih slučajeva. Istraživanja su pokazale efikasnost ove metodologije koja se primjenjuje na zadatke NLP-a u smislu višeg kvaliteta kompeta podataka proizvođenih praćenjem njega. U ovom sistemskom demonstracijskom papiru predstavljamo Litescale, slobodnu softver biblioteku za stvaranje i upravljanje obavezama za annotaciju BWS-a. Litescale raèunava tuple za annotaciju, upravlja korisnicima i procesom annotacije, i stvara konačni zlatni standard. Funkcionalnosti Litescale mogu biti pristupljene programatički kroz Python modul, ili kroz dva alternativna korisnička interfejsa, tekstualnu konsolu baziranu na tekstualnoj konsolu i grafičku na internetu. Dalje smo razvili i rasporedili kompletnu verziju Litescale kompletnu s podrškom višekorisnika.', 'sv': 'Best-worst Scaling (BWS) är en metod för anteckningar baserad på att jämföra och rangordna instanser, snarare än att klassificera eller betygsätta enskilda instanser. Studier har visat effektiviteten av denna metod som tillämpas på NLP-uppgifter i termer av högre kvalitet på de datamängder som produceras genom att följa den. I detta systemdemonstrationsdokument presenterar vi Litescale, ett fritt programvarubibliotek för att skapa och hantera BWS-anteckningar. Litescale beräknar tuplerna att kommentera, hanterar användarna och kommenteringsprocessen och skapar den slutliga guldstandarden. Funktionerna i Litescale kan nås programmatiskt via en Python modul, eller via två alternativa användargränssnitt, ett textkonsolbaserat och ett grafiskt webbaserat. Vi vidareutvecklade och distribuerade en helt online version av Litescale komplett med stöd för flera användare.', 'so': 'Qiimeynta ugu fiican (BWS) waa qaab ay ku habboon in lagu barbarto iyo hablada la wareejiyo, taas oo ka bedela fasaxa ama iskuuleynta xaaladaha gaarka ah. Waxbarashada waxaa tustay saameyn ku saabsan qaababkan lagu sameeyo shaqada NLP, sida ay tahay mid aad u sareeya takhasuska macluumaadka la soo saaray. Qoraalkan muujinta nidaamkan waxaynu keennaa Litescale, maktabadda software oo lacag la’aan ah, si aan u sameyno oo u maamulno shaqooyinka waraaqaha BWS. Litescale computes the tuples to annotate, manages the users and the annotation process, and creates the final gold standard.  Shaqooyinka Litescale waxaa lagu soo bandhigi karaa barnaamijka midowga Python, ama Interfacyada isticmaalayaasha oo kala duduwan, mid ku saleysan qoraal console iyo mid ku saleysan bogga shabakadda. Waxaannu horumarinnay oo ku soo dejinay warqad internetka ee Litescale oo dhamaan kaalmada isticmaalayaal badan.', 'ta': 'Best-worst Scaling (BWS) is a methodology for annotation based on comparing and ranking instances, rather than classifying or scoring individual instances.  ஆராய்ச்சிகள் NLP பணிகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட இந்த முறைமையின் விளைவை காண்பித்துள்ளார்கள் அதை பின்பற்றி உருவாக்கிய இந்த முறைமையில் பாகுபடுத்தல் தாளில், நாங்கள் லிட்ஸ் அளவு, ஒரு இலவச மென்பொருள் நூலகத்தை கொண்டு BWS அறிவிப்பு பணிகளை  Litescale கணக்கிடும் பயனர் மற்றும் அறிவிப்பு செயல்பாட்டை நிர்வகிக்கும் துப்புகளை கணக்கிடும், மற்றும் இறுதியான தங்க நிலை Litescale செயல்பாடுகள் பைதான் கூற்றின் மூலம் நிரலாக அணுகலாம், அல்லது இரண்டு மாற்று பயனீட்டாளர் இடைமுகங்களின் மூலம், ஒரு உரை கான்சோல் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள ஒரு மற் நாங்கள் மேலும் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளோம் மற்றும் பல பயனர் ஆதரவுடன் முழு online பதிப்பை அனுப்பி வைத்தோம்.', 'si': 'හොදම ස්කේලින්ග් (BWS) තමයි ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙක් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට අධාරිත විදිහට පත්තර අධ්\u200dයාණය පෙන්වන්නේ මේ විද්\u200dයාවයේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය NLP වැඩකට ඇතුළත් කරලා තියෙන්නේ ඒක පස්සේ නිර්මාණය කරපු දත් මේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය පත්තේ, අපි Litescale වෙනුවෙන්, නිදහස් සොෆ්ටවර් ලිබ්\u200dරේක්ටරියක් BWS ක්\u200dරියාවක් නිර් Litescale පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ටුප්ල් කිරීමට, පාවිච්චිකරුවන්ට සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, සහ අන්තිම රත්තර ස්ථානය සිරී Name අපි තව ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති කරනවා සහ ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති කරනවා ලිටිස්කේල්ගේ සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ඇන්ලයින් විස්තරයක්', 'no': 'Den beste største skaleringa (BWS) er ein metodologi for annotasjon basert på sammenlikning og rankeringsinstansar, i staden for å klassifisera eller skalera individuelle instansar. Studiene har vist effektiviteten av denne metodika som er brukt til NLP-oppgåver med høgare kvalitet på datasettene som er produsert av følgjande. I denne systemdemonstrasjonspapiret viser vi Litescale ein fri programvarbibliotek for å oppretta og handtera BWS-notasjonsoppgåver. Name Litescale-funksjonane kan brukast programmet gjennom ein Python-modul, eller gjennom to alternativ brukargrensesnitt, ein tekstkonsollbasert og eit grafisk nettbasert. Vi utvikla og utvikla ein fullstendig online versjon av Litescale fullført med støtte for fleire brukarar.', 'ur': 'سب سے بدترین اسکالینگ (BWS) ایک طریقہ ہے جو ایک شخص کے مطابق کلاس یا اسکالینگ کے بغیر مقایسہ اور رئنگ کے مطابق بنیاد رکھتا ہے۔ تحقیقات نے اس طریقے کے مطابق NLP تاسکیوں پر لازم کیا ہے جو اس کے پیچھے پیدا ہونے کے ذریعہ ان ڈیٹ سٹوں کی زیادہ کیفیت کے مطابق ہے. اس سیسٹم دکھانے کے کاغذ میں ہم Litescale کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک منفی سائٹوفر لائیبری جو BWS انٹوریٹ کے کاموں کو بنانے اور مدیریت کرنے کے لئے۔ لیٹسکل نے ٹوپل کو اظہار کرنے کے لئے محاسبہ کرتا ہے، کارساز اور اظہار کی پروسس کی مدیریت کرتا ہے، اور آخری سونے کی استاندارد پیدا کرتا ہے. لیٹسکل کی فناکیٹیوں کو پیٹون موڈیول کے ذریعہ پروگرامٹیکی سے پہنچا سکتا ہے، یا دو مختلف یوسٹر ایٹرنفس کے ذریعہ، ایک ٹکسٹیول کنسول کی بنیاد رکھی ہوئی اور ایک گرافیک ویب بنیاد رکھی ہوئی. ہم نے بہت سی کارساز کی مدد سے کامل لیٹسکل کی ایک پوری آنلاین ویورژی پیدا کر دی۔', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis Taʼminlovlar keyin quyidagi maʼlumotlar tizimlarining eng yuqori darajaga qoʻllanilganligini koʻrsatadi. Bu tizimni demonstration papirda, biz Litescale, BWS taʼminlovchi vazifalarini yaratish va boshqarish uchun boʻsh dastur kutubxonasini koʻrsatimiz. Name Name Biz bir nechta foydalanuvchilar qoʻllanmagan Litescalening muvaffaqiyatli online versiyasini ishga tushirib oldik.', 'vi': 'Giỏi nhất so với mức độ nóng (BWS) là một phương pháp ghi chú dựa trên so sánh và xếp hạng các trường hợp, thay vì phân loại hay ghi điểm từng trường hợp. Nghiên cứu đã cho thấy hiệu quả của phương pháp này được áp dụng cho các công việc NLP trong việc xác định chất lượng dữ liệu cao hơn khi làm theo nó. Trong tờ giấy biểu tình hệ thống này, chúng tôi giới thiệu Litescale, một thư viện phần mềm miễn phí để thực hiện và quản lý thanh ghi chú của BWS. Từ giải thoát thoát sẽ tính to án các rãnh để ghi chú, điều khiển người dùng và tiến trình ghi chú, và tạo ra tiêu chuẩn vàng cuối cùng. Các chức năng của Litchfield có thể được tiếp cận theo lập trình qua mô- đun Python, hoặc thông qua hai giao diện người dùng khác, một kết cấu kết nối bàn và một cấu hình mạng khác. Chúng tôi đã phát triển thêm và triển một phiên bản của Litescale hoàn toàn có đầy đủ người dùng hỗ trợ.', 'bg': 'Най-лошото скалиране е методология за анотация, базирана на сравняване и класиране на инстанции, вместо класифициране или оценяване на отделни инстанции. Проучванията показват ефикасността на тази методология, приложена към задачите на НЛП, по отношение на по-високо качество на наборите от данни, получени чрез нейното следване. В този доклад за демонстрация на системата представяме библиотека за свободен софтуер за създаване и управление на задачи за анотация. Литескал изчислява туплете за анотация, управлява потребителите и процеса на анотация и създава окончателния златен стандарт. Функционалностите на Литескал могат да бъдат достъпни програмно чрез модул или чрез два алтернативни потребителски интерфейса, текстов конзолен и графичен уеб базиран. По-нататък разработихме и внедрихме напълно онлайн версия на Литескал, пълна с мултипотребителска поддръжка.', 'da': 'Best-worst Scaling (BWS) er en metode til annotering baseret på sammenligning og rangering af forekomster i stedet for at klassificere eller score enkelte forekomster. Undersøgelser har vist effektiviteten af denne metode anvendt på NLP-opgaver med hensyn til en højere kvalitet af de datasæt, der produceres ved at følge den. I dette system demonstration papir præsenterer vi Litescale, et gratis softwarebibliotek til at oprette og administrere BWS annotation opgaver. Litescale beregner tuplerne til at kommentere, administrerer brugerne og annotationsprocessen og opretter den endelige guldstandard. Funktionerne i Litescale kan tilgås programmatisk gennem et Python modul, eller via to alternative brugergrænseflader, en tekstkonsolbaseret en og en grafisk webbaseret en. Vi udviklede og implementerede yderligere en fuldt online version af Litescale komplet med multi-bruger support.', 'hr': 'Najgore skaliranje (BWS) je metodologija za annotaciju koja se temelji na usporedbi i rangiranju slučajeva, umjesto klasifikacije ili izvlačenju pojedinih slučajeva. Ispitivanja pokazala su djelotvornost te metode primjenjene na zadatke NLP-a u smislu višeg kvaliteta kompeta podataka proizvođenih nakon njega. U ovom dokumentu za demonstraciju sustava, predstavljamo Litescale, slobodnu softver biblioteku za stvaranje i upravljanje obavezama za annotaciju BWS-a. Litescale računa tuple za annotaciju, upravlja korisnicima i procesom annotacije i stvara konačni zlatni standard. Funkcionalnosti Litescale mogu se programatički pristupiti kroz Python modul ili kroz dva alternativna korisnička interfejsa, tekstualnu konsolu baziranu na tekstualnoj konsolu i grafičku internetu baziranu na internetu. Dalje smo razvili i rasporedili kompletnu verziju Litescale kompletnu s podrškom višekorisnika.', 'nl': 'Best-worst Scaling (BWS) is een methode voor annotatie gebaseerd op het vergelijken en rangschikken van instanties, in plaats van individuele instanties te classificeren of te scoren. Studies hebben aangetoond dat deze methodologie toegepast wordt op NLP-taken in termen van een hogere kwaliteit van de datasets geproduceerd door het volgen ervan. In dit demonstratiedocument presenteren we Litescale, een gratis softwarebibliotheek voor het maken en beheren van BWS annotatietaken. Litescale berekent de tupels om te annoteren, beheert de gebruikers en het annotatieproces en creëert de uiteindelijke gouden standaard. De functionaliteiten van Litescale zijn programmatisch toegankelijk via een Python-module, of via twee alternatieve gebruikersinterfaces, een tekstuele console-gebaseerde en een grafische web-gebaseerde. We hebben een volledig online versie van Litescale verder ontwikkeld en geïmplementeerd, compleet met ondersteuning voor meerdere gebruikers.', 'de': 'Best-Worst Scaling (BWS) ist eine Methode zur Annotation, die auf dem Vergleich und Ranking von Instanzen basiert, anstatt einzelne Instanzen zu klassifizieren oder zu bewerten. Studien haben die Wirksamkeit dieser Methodik für NLP-Aufgaben im Hinblick auf eine höhere Qualität der Datensätze gezeigt, die durch die Anwendung dieser Methodik erzeugt werden. In diesem Systemdemonstrationspapier stellen wir Litescale vor, eine freie Software-Bibliothek zum Erstellen und Verwalten von BWS-Annotationsaufgaben. Litescale berechnet die Tupel, die zu kommentieren sind, verwaltet die Benutzer und den Annotationsprozess und erstellt den endgültigen Goldstandard. Die Funktionen von Litescale können programmatisch über ein Python-Modul oder über zwei alternative Benutzeroberflächen aufgerufen werden, eine textbasierte Konsole und eine grafische Web-basierte. Wir haben eine vollständig online Version von Litescale mit Multi-User-Support weiterentwickelt und bereitgestellt.', 'ko': 'Best-worst Scaling(BWS)은 단일 인스턴스를 분류하거나 점수를 매기는 대신 인스턴스 비교와 정렬에 기반한 주석 기법입니다.연구에 따르면 더 높은 품질의 데이터 세트의 측면에서 볼 때 이런 방법이 NLP 임무에 적용되는 것은 효과적인 것으로 나타났다.이 시스템 프레젠테이션 파일에서는 BWS 주석 작업을 만들고 관리하는 데 사용되는 Litescale에 대해 설명합니다.Litescale은 주석할 원조를 계산하고 사용자와 주석 과정을 관리하며 최종 금 표준을 생성합니다.Python 모듈을 통해 프로그래밍 방식으로 접근할 수도 있고 선택할 수 있는 두 개의 사용자 인터페이스를 통해 접근할 수도 있다. 하나는 텍스트 컨트롤러 기반의 사용자 인터페이스이고 다른 하나는 그래픽 웹 기반의 사용자 인터페이스이다.우리는 Litescale의 온라인 버전을 더욱 개발하고 배치하며 다중 사용자 지원을 제공합니다.', 'fa': 'بهترین اندازه\u200cگیری (BWS) یک روش\u200cشناسی برای نوشته\u200cگیری است که بر پایه مقایسه\u200cگیری و رشته\u200cگیری است، به جای کلاس\u200cگیری یا تمرکز فردی است. مطالعه\u200cها موثرت این روش\u200cشناسی را نشان داده\u200cاند که بر وظیفه\u200cهای NLP به عنوان کیفیت بالاتری از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها تولید شده\u200cاند. در این کاغذ نمایش سیستم، ما Litescale را نشان می دهیم، یک کتابخانه نرم\u200cافزار آزاد برای ایجاد و مدیریت وظیفه\u200cهای نمایش BWS. Litescale توپ\u200cها را محاسبه می\u200cکند تا آگاهی دهند، کاربر\u200cها و فرایند آگاهی را مدیریت می\u200cکند، و استاندارد نهایی طلا را ایجاد می\u200cکند. Functionalities of Litescale can be accessed by programming through a Python module, or via two alternative user interfaces, a textual console based one and a graphical Web based. ما بیشتر توسعه دادیم و یک نسخه کامل آنلاین از لیتسکل کامل با پشتیبانی بسیاری از کاربران استفاده کردیم.', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi bora zaidi (BWS) ni njia ya kuchanganyikiwa kwa matukio yanayofananisha na yanayofanana, badala ya kutangaza au kuchukua matukio binafsi. Utafiti umeonyesha ufanisi wa mbinu hii uliotumika katika kazi za NLP kwa kiwango kikubwa cha seti za data zinazozaliwa kwa kufuatia. Katika karatasi hii ya maandamano ya mfumo, tunaweka Litescale, maktaba huru ya programu ya kompyuta ili kutengeneza na kusimamia kazi za matangazo ya BWS. Litescale inakadiria vifaa vya kutangaza, hudhibiti watumiaji na mchakato wa kutangaza, na kutengeneza kiwango cha dhahabu cha mwisho. The functionalities of Litescale can be accessed programmatically through a Python module, or via two alternative user interfaces, a textual console-based one and a graphical Web-based one.  Tuliendeleza zaidi na kutuma toleo la mtandaoni kamili la Litescale lililokamilika kwa msaada wa watumiaji wengi.', 'af': "Beste worst Skalering (BWS) is 'n metodologie vir annotasie gebaseer op vergelyking en ranking voorbeelde, eerder as klassifisering of skoring individuele voorbeelde. Studies het die effektiviteit van hierdie metodologie vertoon wat op NLP-opdragte gebruik word in terms of 'n hoëre kwaliteit van die datastel wat deur dit volg uitgevoer word. In hierdie stelsel demonstrasie papier, laat ons Litescale voorsien, 'n vry sagteware biblioteek om BWS annotasie opdragte te skep en bestuur. Litescale bereken die tuples om te annoteer, bestuur die gebruikers en die annotasie proses en skep die eindelike goue standaard. Die funksionaliteite van Litescale kan program toegang word deur 'n Python module, of deur twee alternatiewe gebruikerkoppelvlakke, 'n tekstuele konsole gebaseerde een en 'n grafiese Web-gebaseerde een. Ons het verder ontwikkel en 'n volledige online weergawe van Litescale voltooi met multigebruiker ondersteun.", 'tr': "Iň gowy mykdarlanjak (BWS) ýazgyrlamak üçin gadyrlamak üçin adlandyrma metodikidir. Indiki sahypalary klasifiklemek ýa-da görkezmek yerine daýanýar. Araştyrmalar NLP görevlerine uygulanan bu metodologiýanyň etkinlik ukypyny görkezildi. Bu sistem demostrasiýasy kagyzynda, biz Litescale'i özgür softwary kitaphanesini BWS duşurmek täbliklerini bejermek we yönetmek üçin seçirýäris. Name Litescale funksiýatlary Python modüli ýädä, ýada iki başga arşiw interfejleri ýädä, tekstual konsollany tabanly we grafik Web tabanly bar. Biz Litescale'yň kompletten bir nusgasyny köp Ullançylar destegi bilen döwletlendirdik we üýtgedik.", 'sq': 'Shkallimi më i keq (BWS) është një metodologji për anotacion bazuar në krahasimin dhe renditjen e rasteve, në vend që të klasifikojë apo të shënojë raste individuale. Studimet kanë treguar efektshmërinë e kësaj metodologie të aplikuar në detyrat e NLP lidhur me një cilësi më të lartë të të dhënave të prodhuara duke e ndjekur atë. Në këtë letër demonstrimi të sistemit, ne paraqesim Litescale, një bibliotekë programi falas për të krijuar dhe menaxhuar detyrat e anotacionit të BWS. Litescale llogarit tuplet për të anotuar, menaxhon përdoruesit dhe procesin e anotimit dhe krijon standartin e artë përfundimtar. Funksionet e Litescale mund të hyjnë në mënyrë programatike nëpërmjet një moduli Python, ose nëpërmjet dy interfaqeve alternative të përdoruesit, një konsole tekstuale dhe një grafike në internet. Ne zhvilluam dhe vendosëm më tej një version plotësisht online të Litescale kompletuar me mbështetje shumëpërdorues.', 'am': 'የተሻለ ስልክ (BWS) የተለየ የአካል ሁኔታዎችን ከመለየት ወይም ለመለየፍ የሚደረግ እና በተለየ ሁኔታዎችን በማስተካከል ለመተካከል የተደረገው ማሳየት ማድረግ ነው፡፡ Studies have shown the efficacy of this methodology applied to NLP tasks in terms of a higher quality of the datasets produced by following it.  በዚህ ሲስተም የማስታወቂያ ፕሮግራም፣ ሊትካሌን፣ BWS ማስታወቂያውን ለመፍጠርና ለማስተካከል ነጻ ሶፍትዌር መጽሐፍ እናቀርባለን፡፡ የተመሳሳይ ሚዛን የሚጠቅሙትን እና የሚጠቃቀሙትን እና የመግለጫውን ጉዳይ ይቆጥራል፤ የመጨረሻውን የወርቅ ዓላማ ይፈጥራል። የሊትካሌክ ምርጫዎች ፕሮግራሞክራዊ በPython module ወይም በተለየ ሁለት የተጠቃሚ ተጠቃሚ ፊደል፣ የጽሑፍ ኮኖስ-based አንዱን እና የግራፊካዊ ዌብ-based አንዱን ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ የሊቴክላን የሙሉ የመስመር ገጽ እና በብዙ ተጠቃሚዎች ድጋፍ የተፈጸመን የኢንተርኔት ግንኙነት አቀረብን፡፡', 'hy': 'Լավագույն աստիճանավորումը (BW S) նշումների մեթոդոլոգիա է, որը հիմնված է համեմատելու և դասավորման օրինակների վրա, ոչ թե դասավորելու կամ գնահատելու անհատական օրինակների վրա: Հետազոտությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս մեթոդոլոգիայի արդյունավետությունը, որը կիրառվում է ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքների վրա, այն տվյալների ավելի բարձր որակի տեսքով, որը ստեղծվում է հետևելով դրան: Այս համակարգի ցուցադրական թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք Լիթելալ, անվճար ծրագրային գրադարան, որը ստեղծում է և ղեկավարում է BW-ի նոտացիայի խնդիրները: Լիտասկալը հաշվարկում է երկու անգամ գրում, կառավարում է օգտագործողներին և գրում, և ստեղծում է վերջնական ոսկու ստանդարտ: Լիթսալայի ֆունկցիոնալ գործունեությունները կարելի է հասնել ծրագրավորման միջոցով Պատոնի մոդուլների միջոցով, կամ երկու այլընտրանքային օգտագործողական ինտերֆեյսի միջոցով, տեքստոլային կոնսոլի հիմնված և գրաֆիկ վեբ-հիմնված Մենք նաև զարգացրեցինք և օգտագործեցինք Լիթսալայի ամբողջովին առցանց տարբերակը, որը կատարվում է բազմաօգտագործողների աջակցությամբ:', 'az': "Ən pis ölçü (BWS) individu olaraq dəyişdirmək və təkrarlanmaq yerinə salmaq və dəyişdirmək olaraq məlumatların metodikidir. Sənimlər NLP işlərinə uyğun bu metodolojinin etkinliğini göstərdilər, bu metodolojinin ardınca gələn verilən qurmaqların yüksək keyfiyyəti ilə göstərdilər. Bu sistem göstəricisi kağıdında, biz Litescale'i, BWS annotation işlərini yaratmaq və idarə etmək üçün özgür bir proqramlı kitabxanı göstəririk. Litescale tutuları bildirmək, istifadəçiləri və annotasyon prosesini idarə edir və son altın standartini yaradır. Litescale funksiyallarını Python modulu vasitəsilə, ya da iki alternatif istifadəçi interfeysi vasitəsilə, textual konsole tabanlı və grafik Web tabanlı vasitəsilə təklif edə bilər. Biz çoxlu istifadəçilərin dəstəki ilə tamamlanmış Litescale'in tamamlanması və onlayn verzijini təşkil etdik.", 'id': 'Skaling terbaik terburuk (BWS) adalah metodologi untuk anotasi berdasarkan perbandingan dan peringkatan kejadian, daripada mengklasifikasi atau menilai kejadian individu. Studi telah menunjukkan efektivitas metodologi ini yang diterapkan untuk tugas NLP dalam terma kualitas yang lebih tinggi dari set data yang diproduksi dengan mengikutinya. In this system demonstration paper, we present Litescale, a free software library to create and manage BWS annotation tasks.  Litescale computes the tuples to annotate, manages the users and the annotation process, and creates the final gold standard.  Fungsi Litescale dapat diakses secara programmatis melalui modul Python, atau melalui dua antarmuka pengguna alternatif, satu konsol tekstual dan satu web grafis. Kami lebih lanjut mengembangkan dan menggunakan versi sepenuhnya online Litescale lengkap dengan dukungan multi-pengguna.', 'bs': 'Najgore skaliranje (BWS) je metodologija za annotaciju bazirana na usporedbi i redoviranju slučajeva, umjesto klasifikacije ili izvlačenja pojedinih slučajeva. Ispitivanja pokazala su djelotvornost ove metodologije primjenjene na zadatke NLP-a u smislu višeg kvaliteta kompeta podataka proizvođenih praćenjem njega. U ovom dokumentu za demonstraciju sistema predstavljamo Litescale, slobodnu softver biblioteku za stvaranje i upravljanje obavezama za annotaciju BWS-a. Litescale računa tuple za annotaciju, upravlja korisnicima i procesom annotacije i stvara konačni zlatni standard. Funkcionalnosti Litescale mogu se programatički pristupiti kroz Python modul, ili kroz dva alternativna korisnička interfejsa, tekstualna konzola bazirana na tekstualnoj konsolu i grafička na internetu. Dalje smo razvili i rasporedili kompletnu verziju Litescale kompletnu s podrškom višekorisnika.', 'ca': "La millor escala (BWS) és una metodologia d'anotació basada en comparar i classificar instances en lloc de classificar o puntuar instances individuals. Els estudis han demostrat l'eficacia d'aquesta metodologia aplicada a les tasques de NLP en termes d'una qualitat més alta dels conjunts de dades produïts seguint-la. En aquest paper de demostració del sistema, presentem Litescale, una biblioteca de software lliure per crear i gestionar tasques d'anotació BWS. Litescale computa els dobles per anotar, gestiona els usuaris i el procés d'anotació, i crea l'estàndard d'or final. Les funcionalitats de Litescale es poden accedir programàticament a través d'un módul Python, o a través de dues interfaces alternatives d'usuari, una basada en consola textual i una gràfica basada en Web. Vam desenvolupar i desplegar una versió completament en línia de Litescale completa amb suport multiusuari.", 'bn': 'সবচেয়ে খারাপ স্ক্যানিং (বিডিউএস) ব্যক্তিগত ঘটনার তুলনা এবং রেঙ্কিং ইনস্টেমের উপর ভিত্তিক ক্ষেত্রে বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক বিভিন্ন বি গবেষণাগুলো এনএলপির কাজে প্রয়োজনীয় এই পদ্ধতির কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করেছে নিচে তৈরি করা ডাটাসেটের বেশী মান। এই সিস্টেমের বিক্ষোভের কাগজে আমরা লিটেক্যালের সামনে উপস্থাপন করছি, যা বিডিউএস বিজ্ঞাপনের কাজ তৈরি এবং পরিচালনা করার জন্য লিটেক্যালেস ব্যবহারকারীদের ব্যবস্থা এবং বিজ্ঞাপন প্রক্রিয়াকে পরিচালনা করার জন্য টাপল গুলো গণনা করেছে এবং চূড়ান্ত সো লিটেক্যালের কার্যকলাপ পাইথন মডিউলের মাধ্যমে প্রোগ্রামিকভাবে প্রবেশ করতে পারে, অথবা দুটি বিকল্প ব্যবহারকারী ইন্টারফেসের মাধ্যমে, একটি টেক্সচুয়াল আমরা আরো উন্নয়ন করেছি এবং লিটেক্যালের পুরো অনলাইন সংস্করণ প্রাপ্ত করেছি বহুল ব্যবহারকারীর সমর্থন দিয়ে।', 'cs': 'Best-worst Scaling (BWS) je metodika pro anotaci založená na porovnávání a hodnocení instancí, spíše než klasifikaci nebo bodování jednotlivých instancí. Studie prokázaly účinnost této metodiky aplikované na úkoly NLP z hlediska vyšší kvality datových souborů vytvořených jejím dodržováním. V tomto systémovém demonstračním článku představujeme Litescale, svobodnou softwarovou knihovnu pro vytváření a správu BWS anotace úloh. Litescale vypočítá kropky k anotaci, spravuje uživatele a proces anotace a vytváří konečný zlatý standard. K funkcím Litescale lze přistupovat programově prostřednictvím modulu Python nebo přes dvě alternativní uživatelské rozhraní, textové konzole a grafické webové. Dále jsme vyvinuli a nasadili plně online verzi Litescale s podporou pro více uživatelů.', 'et': "Parim-halvim skaleerimine (BWS) on annoteerimise metoodika, mis põhineb eksemplaride võrdlemisel ja järjestamisel, mitte üksikute eksemplaride liigitamisel või hindamisel. Uuringud on näidanud selle metoodika tõhusust, mida rakendatakse uue tööprogrammi ülesannete suhtes seoses selle järgimisega saadud andmekogumite parema kvaliteediga. Käesolevas süsteemi tutvustamistöös tutvustame Litescale'i, vaba tarkvara raamatukogu BWS annotatsiooniülesannete loomiseks ja haldamiseks. Litescale arvutab annoteerimiseks vajalikud tuplid, haldab kasutajaid ja annoteerimisprotsessi ning loob lõpliku kuldstandardi. Litescale'i funktsioonidele pääseb ligi programmiliselt Pythoni mooduli kaudu või kahe alternatiivse kasutajaliidese kaudu, tekstikonsoolipõhise ja graafilise veebipõhise. Arendasime ja kasutusele võtsime täielikult veebiversiooni Litescale koos mitme kasutaja toega.", 'fi': 'Best-worst Scaling (BWS) on havaintomenetelmä, joka perustuu esiintymien vertailuun ja luokitteluun yksittäisten esiintymien luokittelun tai pisteytyksen sijaan. Tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet, että tätä menetelmää sovellettiin NLP-tehtäviin sen avulla tuotettujen aineistojen laadun parantamiseksi. Tässä järjestelmäesittelyssä esittelemme Litescale-ohjelmistokirjaston BWS-merkintätehtävien luomiseen ja hallintaan. LiteScale laskee tuplit, joilla tehdään huomautuksia, hallinnoi käyttäjiä ja huomautusprosessia ja luo lopullisen kultastandardin. Litescalen toiminnallisuuksia voidaan käyttää ohjelmoidusti Python-moduulin kautta tai kahden vaihtoehtoisen käyttöliittymän kautta, tekstikonsolipohjaisen ja graafisen Web-pohjaisen käyttöliittymän kautta. Kehitimme ja otimme käyttöön Litescalen täysin online-version, joka sisältää monikäyttäjien tuen.', 'jv': 'Rangering Wuraning wis mbukake efek diolah sistem iki, kang aplikasi kanggo tasks NLP ning arep kalitas langkung gawe dataset sing wis ngawe barang seneng dadi nyong. Nang sistem nambah akeh pemberas iki, kita ngubah "Lisescale", akeh basa perangkat lunak bebas kanggo nggawe lan jipember tasks kanggo ngilanggar bantuan BWS. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Gambar perusahaan i Lisescale iso diandeses program kang modul piraten, uga sampeyan gambar kelas alih dumateng, console textual sing basa sampeyan lan web sing basa gambar. Awak dhéwé luwih-luwih nggawe lan ngedepgade versi online sing komplit kanggo nggawe nguasai multi-user', 'he': 'המדרגות הכי גרועות (BWS) היא מטדולוגיה עבור הערות המבוססת על השוואה ומדרגות מקרים, במקום להקליף או להקליף מקרים בודדים. מחקרים הראו את היעילות של המטדולוגיה הזו שמשתמשת למשימות NLP במונחים של איכות גבוהה יותר של קבוצות הנתונים שנוצרות על ידי העקבות אחריה. בנייר ההדגמה של המערכת הזאת, אנחנו מציגים Litescale, ספריית תוכנה חינם ליצור ולטפל במשימות הערות BWS. Litscale מחשב את הכפילים כדי להציין, מנהל את המשתמשים ותהליך ההציאה, ויוצר את הסטנדרט הזהב האחרון. אפשר לגשת לפונקציונליות של Litescale תוכנית דרך מודול Python, או דרך שתי משתמשים אינטרנסים אלטרנטיביים, אחד מבוסס על קונסולה טקסטולית ואחד מבוסס על רשת גרפית. התפתחנו וחזרנו גרסה לאינטרנט מלאה של ליטסקאלה שמשלמת עם תמיכה רבה משתמשים.', 'sk': 'Najboljše najslabše lestvice (BWS) je metodologija za označevanje, ki temelji na primerjavi in razvrščanju primerkov, namesto razvrščanja ali ocenjevanju posameznih primerkov. Študije so pokazale učinkovitost te metodologije, ki se uporablja za naloge NLP, v smislu višje kakovosti naborov podatkov, pridobljenih z njenim sledenjem. V tem sistemskem demonstracijskem prispevku predstavljamo Litescale, knjižnico brezplačne programske opreme za ustvarjanje in upravljanje opravil označevanja BWS. Litescale izračuna tuple za označevanje, upravlja uporabnike in postopek označevanja ter ustvari končni zlati standard. Funkcionalnosti Litescale je mogoče dostopati programsko preko Python modula ali preko dveh alternativnih uporabniških vmesnikov, besedilnega konzolnega in grafičnega spletnega. Nadalje smo razvili in uvedli popolnoma spletno različico Litescale, ki je dopolnjena s podporo za več uporabnikov.', 'ha': "Tsarin Hakima mafi girma (BWS) shi ne wata hanyoyi wa mai cũtarwa a kan daidaita da shiryoyin ayuka masu tsakanin da sauri, kuma don ka rarraba su ko yin score wa masu motsi guda. Haƙĩka, an nuna aikin wannan metode da aka amfani da shi zuwa aikin NLP cikin wasu sifa da aka samar da shi. Daga wannan takardar nuna na'urar system, muna halatar da Litescale, littafin kwamfyutan wata na'urar kwamfyuta don ya samu kuma ana shagala aikin zartarwa na BWS. @ info: whatsthis Farawa na Litescale za'a iya iya haɗa shirin kwamfyutan a wani shirin Python, ko kuma a yi amfani da wasu fuskõkin mai amfani da kwamfyuta biyu, wata na komsola mai daidaita na littãfi da wani na'ura mai fassara na Web-based. Mun ƙara kodi kuma Muka saka wani version na Litescale cikakki da mataimaki mai yawa daga masu amfani da shi.", 'bo': 'འོད་ཀྱང་། ཚད་རྟགས་ཀྱི་དོན་ལས་ཉེས་མཐའ་མོ་ཞིག་ནི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་རེད། ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ནུས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་NLP ལས་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདིའི་ནུས་པ་སྟངས་ལ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་ཡོད། In this system demonstration paper, we present Litescale, a free software library to create and manage BWS annotation tasks. Litescale computes the tuples to annotate, manages the users and the annotation process, and creates the final gold standard. The functionalities of Litescale can be accessed programmatically through a Python module, or via two alternative user interfaces, a textual console-based one and a graphical Web-based one. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་སྒོ་འབྱེད་དང་ཐོག'}
{'en': 'Cross-Lingual Wolastoqey-English Definition Modelling', 'ar': 'نمذجة تعريف Wolastoqey-English عبر اللغات', 'pt': 'Modelagem de Definição de Wolastoqey-Inglês Cross-Lingual', 'fr': 'Modélisation de définition polyglotte wolastoqey-anglais', 'es': 'Modelado de definiciones de wolastoqey-inglés en varios idiomas', 'ja': 'クロスリンガル・ウォラストキー-英語定義モデリング', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-लिंगुअल वोलास्टोकी-अंग्रेजी परिभाषा मॉडलिंग', 'zh': '跨语沃拉斯托基-英语定义建模', 'ru': 'Кросс-лингвальное моделирование Wolastoqey-английского определения', 'ga': 'Samhaltú Sainmhínithe Trastheangach Wolastoqey-Béarla', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Διασγλωσσική μοντελοποίηση ορισμού Wolastoqey-English', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű wolastoqey-angol definíciós modellezés', 'it': 'Modellazione di definizioni cross-lingual Wolastoqey-English', 'lt': 'Cross-Lingual Wolastoqey-English Definition Modelling', 'kk': 'Ағылшын тілінің көпшілік Wolastoqey- Англис анықтамасының үлгісіName', 'ms': 'Comment', 'mk': 'Name', 'mt': 'Cross-Lingual Wolastoqey-English Definition Modelling', 'no': 'Name', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ഗുള്\u200d വോളാസ്റ്റോക്കെ- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വിവരം മോഡിലിങ്ങ്', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne modelowanie definicji wolastoqey-angielskiej', 'ro': 'Modelarea definiţiilor interlingvistice Wolastoqey-engleză', 'si': 'Name', 'mn': 'Төрвөн-хэлбэртэй Вуластоqey-Англи хэлний тодорхойлолтын загвар', 'sr': 'Kroz-Lingual Wolastoqey-engleski model definicije', 'ta': 'Cross- Lingual Wolastoqey- English Definition Modelling', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig wolastoqey-engelsk definitionsmodellering', 'ur': 'Cross-Lingual Wolastoqey-English Definition Modelling', 'so': 'Rus-Lingual Wolastoqey-Ingiriis Definition Modelling', 'uz': 'Cross-Lingual Wolastoqey-English Definition Modelling', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Междулингвистично Wolastoqey- английски дефиниция Моделиране', 'da': 'Tværsproget wolastoqey-engelsk definitionsmodellering', 'hr': 'KrozLingualna Wolastoqey-engleska modela definicije', 'nl': 'Cross-Linguale Wolastoqey-Engelse definitiemodellering', 'fa': 'Name', 'de': 'Sprachübergreifende Wolastoqey-Englisch Definition Modellierung', 'ko': '다중 언어Wolastoqey 영어 정의 모델링', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Çot-Dilli Wolastoqey-Iňlisçe Bellamy', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ቋንቋ', 'id': 'Modeling Definisi Wolastoqey-English Cross-Lingual', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': '√á…ôrz-Lingual Wolastoqey-ńįngiliz…ô Definisyon Modeli', 'sw': 'Msalama wa Lugha Wolastoqey-Uelezaji wa Kiingereza', 'bs': 'KrozLingualna Wolastoqey-engleska modela definicije', 'cs': 'Vytváření modelů mezi jazyky Wolastoqey-English', 'sq': 'Cross-Lingual Wolastoqey-English Definition Modelling', 'et': 'Keeleülene Wolastoqey - inglise definitsiooni modelleerimine', 'fi': 'Cross-Lingual Wolastoqey-Englanti Määritelmän mallinnus', 'ca': 'Modell de definició de Wolastoque-anglès translíngua', 'bn': 'ক্রস- লিঙ্গুয়েল উলাস্টোকেই- ইংরেজী সংজ্ঞা মডেলিং', 'sk': 'Medjezikovno Wolastoqey-angleško definicijsko modeliranje', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Cross-Lingual Wolastoqey-English Definition Modelling', 'bo': 'Cross-Lingual Wolastoqey-English Definition Modelling', 'jv': 'layer-mode-effects'}
{'en': 'Definition modelling is the task of automatically generating a dictionary-style definition given a target word. In this paper, we consider cross-lingual definition generation. Specifically, we generate English definitions for Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) words. Wolastoqey is an endangered, low-resource polysynthetic language. We hypothesize that sub-word representations based on byte pair encoding (Sennrich et al., 2016) can be leveraged to represent morphologically-complex Wolastoqey words and overcome the challenge of not having large corpora available for training. Our experimental results demonstrate that this approach outperforms baseline methods in terms of BLEU score.', 'ar': 'نمذجة التعريف هي مهمة إنشاء تعريف بأسلوب القاموس تلقائيًا لكلمة مستهدفة. في هذه الورقة ، نعتبر إنشاء تعريف متعدد اللغات. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم بإنشاء تعريفات باللغة الإنجليزية لكلمات Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey هي لغة مهددة بالانقراض منخفضة الموارد. نفترض أن تمثيلات الكلمات الفرعية القائمة على تشفير زوج البايت (Sennrich et al. ، 2016) يمكن الاستفادة منها لتمثيل كلمات Wolastoqey المعقدة شكليًا والتغلب على التحدي المتمثل في عدم وجود مجموعة كبيرة متاحة للتدريب. توضح نتائجنا التجريبية أن هذا النهج يتفوق على الأساليب الأساسية من حيث درجة BLEU.', 'fr': "La modélisation de définition consiste à générer automatiquement une définition de style dictionnaire en fonction d'un mot cible. Dans cet article, nous examinons la génération de définitions multilingues. Plus précisément, nous générons des définitions anglaises pour les mots wolastoqey (Malécite-Passamaquoddy). Le wolastoqey est une langue polysynthétique en voie de disparition et à faibles ressources. Nous émettons l'hypothèse que les représentations de sous-mots basées sur le codage par paires d'octets (Sennrich et al., 2016) peuvent être utilisées pour représenter des mots wolastoqey morphologiquement complexes et surmonter le défi de ne pas avoir de grands corpus disponibles pour la formation. Nos résultats expérimentaux démontrent que cette approche surpasse les méthodes de base en termes de score BLEU.", 'pt': 'A modelagem de definição é a tarefa de gerar automaticamente uma definição no estilo de dicionário dada uma palavra de destino. Neste artigo, consideramos a geração de definições multilíngues. Especificamente, geramos definições em inglês para palavras Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey é uma língua polissintética ameaçada de extinção e de poucos recursos. Nossa hipótese é que as representações de subpalavras baseadas na codificação de pares de bytes (Sennrich et al., 2016) podem ser aproveitadas para representar palavras Wolastoqey morfologicamente complexas e superar o desafio de não ter grandes corpora disponíveis para treinamento. Nossos resultados experimentais demonstram que essa abordagem supera os métodos de linha de base em termos de pontuação BLEU.', 'es': 'El modelado de definiciones es la tarea de generar automáticamente una definición de estilo diccionario dada una palabra objetivo. En este artículo, consideramos la generación de definiciones multilingües. Específicamente, generamos definiciones en inglés para palabras Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). El wolastoqey es un lenguaje polisintético de escasos recursos y en peligro de extinción. Presumimos que las representaciones de subpalabras basadas en la codificación de pares de bytes (Sennrich et al., 2016) pueden aprovecharse para representar palabras Wolastoqey morfológicamente complejas y superar el desafío de no tener grandes cuerpos disponibles para la capacitación. Nuestros resultados experimentales demuestran que este enfoque supera a los métodos de referencia en términos de puntuación BLEU.', 'ja': '定義モデリングは、ターゲット単語を指定した辞書スタイルの定義を自動的に生成するタスクです。本稿では、クロスリンガルの定義生成について考察する。具体的には、Wolastoqey (Malecite - Passamaquoddy)単語の英語の定義を生成します。Wolastoqeyは絶滅危惧種であり、低資源の多合成言語です。我々は、バイトペア符号化に基づくサブワード表現（ Sennrich et al., 2016 ）を活用して、形態学的に複雑なWolastoqey単語を表現し、トレーニングに利用可能な大きな体を持たないという課題を克服できると仮定する。我々の実験結果は、このアプローチがBLEUスコアの点でベースライン法よりも優れていることを示している。 \ufeff', 'hi': 'परिभाषा मॉडलिंग एक लक्ष्य शब्द को दिए गए शब्दकोश-शैली की परिभाषा को स्वचालित रूप से उत्पन्न करने का कार्य है। इस पेपर में, हम क्रॉस-लिंगुअल परिभाषा पीढ़ी पर विचार करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) शब्दों के लिए अंग्रेजी परिभाषाएं उत्पन्न करते हैं। Wolastoqey एक लुप्तप्राय, कम संसाधन polysynthetic भाषा है। हम परिकल्पना करते हैं कि बाइट जोड़ी एन्कोडिंग (Sennrich et al., 2016) पर आधारित उप-शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व को रूपात्मक रूप से जटिल वोलास्टोकी शब्दों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने और प्रशिक्षण के लिए उपलब्ध बड़े कॉर्पोरेट नहीं होने की चुनौती को दूर करने के लिए लाभ उठाया जा सकता है। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि यह दृष्टिकोण BLEU स्कोर के संदर्भ में आधार रेखा विधियों को मात देता है। \ufeff', 'ru': 'Моделирование определений - это задача автоматической генерации определения типа словаря, заданного целевым словом. В этой статье мы рассмотрим генерацию кросс-лингвистического определения. В частности, мы генерируем английские определения слов Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey - это исчезающий, малоресурсный полисинтетический язык. Мы предполагаем, что представления подсловов, основанные на кодировании пары байтов (Sennrich et al., 2016), могут быть использованы для представления морфологически сложных слов Воластоки и преодоления проблемы отсутствия больших корпусов, доступных для обучения. Наши экспериментальные результаты показывают, что этот подход превосходит базовые методы с точки зрения оценки по шкале BLEU. \ufeff', 'zh': '定义者建模给定也单词自生字典式定义之任也。 在本文中,我们想了言语定义。 具体来说,为Wolastoqey(Malecite-Passamaquoddy)单词生英语义。 Wolastoqey者,濒临灭绝之低资源多合言也。 设字节于编码子词(Sennrich等,2016)可以形杂Wolastoqey词,克无大语料库可以教战。 吾实验结果表明,优于BLEU得分基线。 \ufeff', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le samhaltú sainmhínithe an tasc chun sainmhíniú ar stíl foclóra nuair a thugtar spriocfhocal a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid machnamh ar ghiniúint sainmhínithe tras-teangacha. Go sonrach, ginimid sainmhínithe Béarla ar fhocail Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Teanga il-sintéiseach atá i mbaol, is ea Wolastoqey. Tugaimid hipitéis gur féidir uiríll fo-fhocail atá bunaithe ar ionchódú beart beart (Sennrich et al., 2016) a ghiaráil chun focail Wolastoqey atá casta ó thaobh moirfeolaíoch a léiriú agus chun an dúshlán a shárú nach bhfuil corpóra mór ar fáil le haghaidh oiliúna. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn an cur chuige seo modhanna bunlíne i dtéarmaí scór BLEU.', 'ka': 'განსაზღვრებული მოდელირება არის საქაღალდეგის სტილის განსაზღვრებას ავტომატურად შექმნა მისაღების სიტყვა. ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ ამ კონფიგურაციაში კრესი ენგურაციის განსაზღვრება. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ ინგლისური განსაკუთრებების შექმნა Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) სიტყვებისთვის. Wolastoqey არის სოლისინტეტიკური, ცოტა რესურსისტიკური ენაა. ჩვენ ჰიპოტეზეცით, რომ საბეტური სიტყვების გამოსახულებები (Sennrich et al., 2016) შეიძლება იყოს მომპოროლოგიურად კომპლექციული Wolastoqey სიტყვების გამოსახულებლად და გადავიწყენოთ დიდ კომპორაციის გამოსახულებლა ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ ეს წარმოდგენები უფრო გავაკეთებენ ბაზალური მეტოვები BLEU წარმოდგენებით.', 'hu': 'A definíciómodellezés feladata, hogy automatikusan generáljon egy szótár-stílusú definíciót egy célszó megadásával. Ebben a tanulmányban a többnyelvű definíció generációját vizsgáljuk. Konkrétan angol definíciókat generálunk a Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) szavakhoz. A Wolastoqey egy veszélyeztetett, alacsony erőforrású poliszintétikus nyelv. Feltételezzük, hogy a bájtpár kódoláson alapuló alszó reprezentációk (Sennrich et al., 2016) felhasználhatók arra, hogy morfológiailag összetett Wolastoqey szavakat reprezentáljanak, és legyőzzék azt a kihívást, hogy nincs elérhető nagy corpora edzésre. Kísérleti eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy ez a megközelítés felülmúlja a kiindulási módszereket a BLEU pontszám tekintetében.', 'el': 'Η μοντελοποίηση ορισμού είναι το καθήκον της αυτόματης δημιουργίας ενός ορισμού τύπου λεξικού που δίνεται σε μια λέξη-στόχο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε τη δημιουργία γλωσσικών ορίων. Συγκεκριμένα, δημιουργούμε αγγλικούς ορισμούς για λέξεις Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Η Wolastoqey είναι μια υπό εξαφάνιση πολυσυνθετική γλώσσα χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους. Υποθέτουμε ότι οι αναπαραστάσεις υπολέξεων που βασίζονται στην κωδικοποίηση ζεύγους Byte (κ.α., 2016) μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για να αναπαραστήσουν μορφολογικά σύνθετες λέξεις και να ξεπεράσουν την πρόκληση να μην έχουν μεγάλα σώματα διαθέσιμα για εκπαίδευση. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα αποδεικνύουν ότι αυτή η προσέγγιση ξεπερνά τις βασικές μεθόδους όσον αφορά την βαθμολογία BLEU.', 'kk': 'Мақсатты сөзді сөздік стилінің анықтамасын автоматты түрде құру тапсырмасы. Бұл қағазда біз тілді анықтамаларды құру үшін ойлаймыз. Мәселен, Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) сөздерінің ағылшын тілдерін құрамыз. Wolastoqey - қауіпсіз, төмен ресурс полисинтетикалық тіл. Біз байт екі кодтамасына негізделген ішкі сөздерді (Sennrich et al., 2016) қолдану үшін морфологиялық комплексті Wolastoqey сөздерін таңдау үшін көпшілік корпорасының көмегімен көмектесуге болады. Біздің тәжірибелі нәтижеміз бұл тәжірибе BLEU нәтижесінің негізгі тәсілдерін жасайды.', 'it': "La modellizzazione delle definizioni è il compito di generare automaticamente una definizione in stile dizionario data una parola di destinazione. In questo articolo, consideriamo la generazione di definizioni cross-lingual. Nello specifico, generiamo definizioni inglesi per le parole Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey è un linguaggio polisintetico a bassa risorsa in via di estinzione. Ipotizziamo che le rappresentazioni di sotto-parole basate sulla codifica di coppia di byte (Sennrich et al., 2016) possano essere sfruttate per rappresentare parole Wolastoqey morfologicamente complesse e superare la sfida di non avere grandi corpora disponibili per l'allenamento. I nostri risultati sperimentali dimostrano che questo approccio supera i metodi di base in termini di punteggio BLEU.", 'mk': 'Моделирање на дефиниција е задача за автоматски генерирање дефиниција во стил на речник со цел збор. Во овој весник, размислуваме за генерација на меѓујазични дефиниции. Специфично, генерираме англиски дефиниции за зборовите Wolastoqey. Воластоки е загрозен, нискоресурсен полисинтетички јазик. Ние хипотезираме дека подзборовите претставувања базирани на кодирање на пар бајти (Sennrich и други, 2016) можат да бидат искористени за да претставуваат морфолошки-комплексни зборови Воластоки и да го надминат предизвикот да немаат голема корпора достапна за обука. Нашите експериментални резултати покажуваат дека овој пристап ги надминува основните методи во поглед на оценката БЛЕУ.', 'lt': 'Apibrėžimo modeliavimas yra užduotis automatiškai generuoti žodyno stiliui skirtą apibrėžtį, suteiktą tiksliniu žodžiu. In this paper, we consider cross-lingual definition generation.  Konkrečiai mes sukuriame anglų kalbos apibrėžtis Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) žodžiams. Wolastoqey yra pavojinga, mažai išteklių turinti polisintetinė kalba. Mes hipotezuojame, kad parašai, pagrįsti byte pair kodavimu (Sennrich et al., 2016), gali būti naudojami taip, kad būtų galima atstovauti morfologiškai sudėtingiems Wolastoqey žodžiams ir įveikti iššūkį, kad didelis korporas nebūtų prieinamas mokymui. Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad šis metodas viršija pradinius metodus pagal BLEU rezultatus.', 'ms': 'Modelan takrifan adalah tugas untuk menghasilkan secara automatik takrifan gaya kamus diberi kata sasaran. Dalam kertas ini, kita mempertimbangkan generasi definisi saling bahasa. Secara khusus, kita menghasilkan definisi Inggeris untuk perkataan Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey adalah bahasa polisintetik yang mengancam, sumber rendah. Kami hipotesis bahawa perwakilan sub-perkataan berdasarkan pengekodan pasangan bait (Sennrich et al., 2016) boleh digunakan untuk mewakili perkataan Wolastoqey secara morfologik-kompleks dan mengatasi cabaran tidak mempunyai corpora besar tersedia untuk latihan. Hasil percubaan kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan ini melampaui kaedah asas dalam terma skor BLEU.', 'ml': 'ലക്ഷ്യം വാക്ക് നല്\u200dകിയ നിഘണ്ടി- ശൈലിയുടെ നിര്\u200dണ്ണയം സ്വയം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ജോലി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ക്രിസ്ലിങ്കുള്ള വിശദീകരണ തലമുറയില്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വോളാസ്റ്റോക്കേയ്ക്കുള്ള ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. വോളാസ്റ്റോക്കെയൊരു അപകടത്തിലാണ്, കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d പോലിസിന്റിക് ഭാഷ. We hypothesize that sub-word representations based on byte pair encoding (Sennrich et al., 2016) can be leveraged to represent morphologically-complex Wolastoqey words and overcome the challenge of not having large corpora available for training.  നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ബിലിയുവിന്റെ സ്കോര്\u200dട്ടിനുള്ളില്\u200d ഈ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും', 'no': 'Definisjonsmodellering er oppgåva for automatisk laga ein ordbokstildefinisjon gjeven eit målord. I denne papiret ser vi på å generera krysspråk definisjonar. Spesielt lager vi engelske definisjonar for Wolastoqey- ord. Wolastoqey er eit vanskeleg, låg- ressurspolysyntetisk språk. Vi hypotiserer at underord-representasjonar basert på byte-par-koding (Sennrich et al., 2016) kan brukast til å representera morfologisk komplekse Wolastoqey-ord og overføra utfordringa for å ikkje ha stor korpora tilgjengeleg for trening. Eksperimentale resultat våre viser at denne tilnærminga utfører baselinjesmetodar i form av BLEU-poeng.', 'mt': 'L-immudellar tad-definizzjoni huwa l-kompitu li tiġi ġġenerata awtomatikament definizzjoni tal-istil tad-dikjaratur mogħtija kelma fil-mira. F’dan id-dokument, nikkunsidraw il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ definizzjoni translingwistika. Speċifikament, niġġeneraw definizzjonijiet Ingliżi għall-kliem Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey huwa lingwa polisintetika ta’ riżorsi baxxi u mhedda. Aħna nippreżentaw ipoteżi li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet sottokliem ibbażati fuq l-ikkodifikar tal-par tal-byte (Sennrich et al., 2016) jistgħu jiġu sfruttati biex jirrappreżentaw kliem morfoloġikament kumpless Wolastoqey u jingħelbu l-isfida li ma jkunx hemm korpra kbira disponibbli għat-taħriġ. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru li dan l-approċċ jaqbeż il-metodi ta’ bażi f’termini ta’ punteġġ BLEU.', 'ro': 'Modelarea definiției este sarcina de a genera automat o definiție în stil dicționar dată unui cuvânt țintă. În această lucrare, luăm în considerare generarea de definiții interlingvistice. Mai exact, generăm definiții în limba engleză pentru cuvintele Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey este un limbaj polisintetic pe cale de dispariţie, cu resurse reduse. Ipotezăm că reprezentările subcuvintelor bazate pe codificarea perechilor de octeți (Sennrich et al., 2016) pot fi folosite pentru a reprezenta cuvinte Wolastoqey complexe morfologic și pentru a depăși provocarea de a nu avea corpore mari disponibile pentru antrenament. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că această abordare depășește metodele de bază în ceea ce privește scorul BLEU.', 'si': 'විශ්වාස මොඩේලින්ගේ විශ්වාස ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාසයක් සැකසුම්  මේ පත්තරේ අපි බොහොම භාෂාවික විශ්වාස කරනවා. විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි විශ්වාස කරනවා වෝලාස්ටෝකී (මාලෙසිට්-පාසාමාකෝඩී) වචන වචන වලට. වෝලාස්ටෝකී තමයි අනතුරු වෙන්න පොලිසින්ටෙටික භාෂාවක්. අපි හිතන්නේ බායිට් ජෝරික් සංකේතනයට අධිරූපය සබ් වචන ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් මොර්ෆෝලෝගික් සංකේතික වුල්ලාස්ට අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ මේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය බ්ලූයුස් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වගේ', 'mn': 'Тодорхойлолтын загвар бол зорилготой үг өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийн тодорхойлолтыг автоматаар үүсгэх үйл ажил юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон хэл тодорхойлолтыг бодож байна. Ялангуяа бид Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) үгийн Англи хэлний тодорхойлолтыг бий болгодог. Wolastoqey бол аюултай, бага нөөцийн полисинтетик хэл. Бид бит хоёр кодлог (Sennrich et al., 2016) дээр үндсэн суб-үг илэрхийлэл нь морфологик комплекс Wolastoqey үгүүдийг илэрхийлэх боломжтой болж, том корпора сургалтын тулд ашиглах боломжгүй асуудлыг алдагдах боломжтой гэж боддог. Бидний туршилтын үр дүнд энэ арга нь BLEU оноо хэмжээгээр үндсэн арга замыг илэрхийлж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Modelowanie definicji to zadanie automatycznego generowania definicji w stylu słownika podanej słowu docelowemu. W niniejszym artykule rozważamy generowanie definicji między językami. W szczególności generujemy angielskie definicje słów Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey jest zagrożonym, niskim zasobem językiem polisyntetycznym. Zakładamy hipotezę, że reprezentacje podsłów oparte na kodowaniu par bajtów (Sennrich et al., 2016) mogą być wykorzystane do reprezentowania morfologicznie złożonych słów Wolastoqey i pokonania wyzwania związanego z brakiem dużych korpusów dostępnych do treningu. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że podejście to przewyższa metody bazowe pod względem wyniku BLEU.', 'so': 'Qorshaha ku saabsan waa shaqada ku imaanshaha qaab-qaab ah oo lagu qoray hadal goal ah. Warqadan, waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa qarniga afafka kala duwan. Si gaar ah, waxaynu qoraalka afka ingiriisiga ee Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey waa luqad dhibaato leh oo hoos-hoos badan oo polysynthetic ah. Waxaynu leenahay fikrad ku saabsan qoraalka hoose ee ku qoran labo kooban (Sennrich et al., 2016) si loo represento hadal morphologically-complex Wolastoqey ah, waxaana ka adkaysan dhibaatada aan heysan shirkad weyn oo waxbarasho lagu heli karo. Imtixaankayada waxay muujiyaan in qaababkan ka soo baxo qaabab hoose ah oo ku saabsan scorta BLEU.', 'sr': 'Modeliranje definicije je zadatak automatskog generiranja definicije stila rečnika podataka ciljnoj reči. U ovom papiru razmišljamo o generaciji prejezika. Posebno, stvaramo engleske definicije za Wolastoqey reči. Wolastoqey je ugrožen, nisko-resursno polisintetički jezik. Pretpostavljamo da podrečne predstave bazirane na kodiranju bajtskih parova (Sennrich et al., 2016) mogu biti upotrebljene za predstavljanje morfološki kompleksnih Wolastoqey riječi i prevladavanje izazova da ne bude dostupna velika korpora za obuku. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da taj pristup iznosi početne metode u smislu BLEU rezultata.', 'ta': 'கொடுக்கப்பட்ட அகராதி பாணி வரையறை மாதிரியின் செயல் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பல மொழியின் வரையறை தலைமுறையில் கருதுகிறோம். குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் வோலாஸ்டோகேயின் ஆங்கிலத்தின் விவரங்களை உருவாக்கு வோலாஸ்டோக்கி ஒரு ஆபத்தான, குறைந்த மூலத்திற்கு போலிசிண்டிட்டிக் மொழி. பைட்ட் ஜோட் குறியீட்டை அடிப்படையில் துணை வார்த்தை குறியீடுகளை நாங்கள் துணை குறிமுறைப்பிடுகிறோம் (சென்ன்ரிக் மற்றும் 2016) மோர்போலிக்கலியல் சிக்கல எங்கள் சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'تعریف موڈلینگ کا کام یہ ہے کہ ایک موقع لفظہ دیئے گئے لفظ کی تعریف اپنے ساتھ پیدا کرے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم مختلف زبان کی تعریف کی نسل سمجھتے ہیں۔ خاص طور پر، ہم Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) کلمات کے لئے انگلیسی تعریف پیدا کرتے ہیں۔ وولاستوکیی ایک خطرناک، کم منبع پولیسینٹیسی زبان ہے۔ ہم فرض کرتے ہیں کہ بائیٹ جوڑ کا اکنوڈینگ (Sennrich et al., 2016) پر بنیاد پائی ہوئی زیب کلمات کی تعلیم کے لئے مولکولوژیکی پیچیدہ والاستوکیی کلمات کی تعلیم کرنے کے لئے استعمال کر سکتے ہیں اور اس کی چال پر غالب آسکتے ہیں کہ بہت بڑے کوروں کے لئے موجود نہیں ہوتے۔ ہمارے آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ طریقہ بلیوس سکوٹ کے مطابق بیس لین طریقے سے زیادہ کامل ہوتا ہے.', 'sv': 'Definitionsmodellering är uppgiften att automatiskt generera en ordlista-stil definition givet ett målord. I denna uppsats behandlar vi generation av flerspråkiga definitioner. Specifikt genererar vi engelska definitioner för Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) ord. Wolastoqey är ett utrotningshotat, lågresurspolysyntetiskt språk. Vi antar att underordsrepresentationer baserade på byte par kodning (Sennrich et al., 2016) kan utnyttjas för att representera morfologiskt komplexa Wolastoqey ord och övervinna utmaningen att inte ha stora corpora tillgängliga för träning. Våra experimentella resultat visar att detta tillvägagångssätt överträffar baslinjemetoderna när det gäller BLEU-poäng.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda biz bir necha tilning aniqlashni tasavvur qilamiz. Koʻrsatilgan, biz Wolastoqey (Malecite- Passamaquoddy) so'zlari uchun ingliz tilini aniqlash. Wolastoqey juda xavfsiz, kamaytirgan manba polysyntettik tili. Biz o'zgarishni o'zgartirish uchun oddiy murakkablik Wolastoqey so'zlarini namoyishga qo'shish uchun tub so'zning taʼminlovchilari (Sennrich et al., 2016) asosida (Sennrik et al., 2016) qo'llangan soʻzlarni tashkilotga ega bo'lishi mumkin va o'rganish uchun katta kompaniya mavjud emas Bizning tajriba natijalarimiz bu usul BLEU scorning asosiy usullarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Định nghĩa Mẫu là nhiệm vụ tự động tạo ra một định nghĩa kiểu từ điển được đưa ra từ đích. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi xem xét sản phẩm lai ngôn ngữ. Cụ thể, chúng tôi tạo ra định nghĩa tiếng Anh cho: Wolastzey là một ngôn ngữ chất lượng đông chất thấp đang gặp nguy hiểm. Chúng tôi giả định rằng các biểu tượng ngầm dựa trên mã hóa hai byte pair (Sennkich et al., thẩm 6) có thể được kích hoạt để đại diện cho các từ Dã Cẩu phức tạp theo kiểu lịch hoặc vượt qua thử thách không có cơ quan lớn để huấn luyện. Các kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng tôi chứng minh rằng phương pháp này hoàn thiện các phương pháp cơ bản.', 'nl': 'Definitiemodellering is de taak van het automatisch genereren van een woordenboek-stijl definitie gegeven aan een doelwoord. In dit artikel kijken we naar het genereren van meertalige definities. Specifiek genereren we Engelse definities voor Wolastoqey (Maleciet-Passamaquoddy) woorden. Wolastoqey is een bedreigde polysynthetische taal met weinig bronnen. We veronderstellen dat subwoordrepresentaties gebaseerd op byte pair encoding (Sennrich et al., 2016) kunnen worden gebruikt om morfologisch complexe Wolastoqey woorden weer te geven en de uitdaging om geen grote corpora beschikbaar te hebben voor training te overwinnen. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat deze aanpak beter presteert dan baseline methodes in termen van BLEU score.', 'da': 'Definitionsmodellering er opgaven med automatisk at generere en ordbogsstil definition givet et målord. I denne artikel overvejer vi generering af tværsprogede definitioner. Specifikt genererer vi engelske definitioner for Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) ord. Wolastoqey er et truet polysyntetisk sprog med lav ressource. Vi antager, at underordrepræsentationer baseret på byte pair kodning (Sennrich et al., 2016) kan udnyttes til at repræsentere morfologisk komplekse Wolastoqey ord og overvinde udfordringen ved ikke at have store corpora til rådighed for træning. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser, at denne tilgang overstiger baseline metoder med hensyn til BLEU score.', 'bg': 'Дефиниционното моделиране е задачата за автоматично генериране на дефиниция в стил речник, дадена целева дума. В тази статия разглеждаме създаването на междуезична дефиниция. По-конкретно, ние генерираме английски дефиниции за думи Воластокей (Малецит-Пасамакодиди). Воластокей е застрашен, нискоресурсен полисинтетичен език. Хипотезата ни е, че подсловните изображения, базирани на кодиране на байтови двойки (Сенрич и др., 2016), могат да бъдат използвани, за да представят морфологично сложни думи на Уоластоки и да преодолеят предизвикателството да нямат големи корпуси на разположение за обучение. Нашите експериментални резултати показват, че този подход надминава базовите методи по отношение на оценката.', 'hr': 'Modeliranje definicije je zadatak automatskog proizvedenja definicije stila riječi pod ciljnom riječju. U ovom papiru razmišljamo o generaciji prejezičke definicije. Posebno, stvaramo engleske definicije za riječi Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey je ugrožen, nisko-resursno polisintetički jezik. Pretpostavljamo da podriječje zasnovane na kodiranju bajtskih parova (Sennrich et al., 2016) mogu biti upotrijebljene za predstavljanje morfološki kompleksnih riječi Wolastoqey i prevladanje izazova da ne bude dostupna velika tijela za obuku. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da taj pristup iznosi početne metode u smislu BLEU rezultata.', 'id': 'Definition modelling is the task of automatically generating a dictionary-style definition given a target word.  Dalam kertas ini, kita mempertimbangkan generasi definisi saling bahasa. Secara spesifik, kita menghasilkan definisi Inggris untuk kata-kata Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey adalah bahasa polisintetis berbahaya, sumber daya rendah. Kami hipotesis bahwa represisi sub-kata berdasarkan kodifikasi pasangan byte (Sennrich et al., 2016) dapat diaktifkan untuk mewakili kata-kata Wolastoqey morfologis-kompleks dan mengatasi tantangan tidak memiliki corpora besar tersedia untuk latihan. Hasil percobaan kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan ini melebihi metode dasar dalam terma skor BLEU.', 'sw': 'Mfanuzi wa ufafanuzi ni jukumu la kutengeneza ufafanuzi wa mtindo wa lugha uliofanywa na neno la lengo. Katika karatasi hii, tunafikiria kizazi cha ufafanuzi wa lugha mbalimbali. Kwa hakika, tunatengeneza maelezo ya Kiingereza kwa ajili ya Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey is an endangered, low-resource polysynthetic language.  Tunapata imani kwamba wawakilishi wa maneno ya chini kwa kutumia ujumbe wa kodi mbili (Sennrich et al., 2016) unaweza kutumika kuwawakilisha maneno matatizo ya kijamii ya Wolastoqey na kushinda changamoto ya kutokuwepo na makampuni makubwa kwa ajili ya mafunzo. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu hii inaonyesha njia za msingi kwa mujibu wa score za BLEU.', 'ko': '정의 모델링은 목표 단어를 지정한 상황에서 사전식 정의를 자동으로 생성하는 작업입니다.본문에서 우리는 다중 언어의 정의 생성을 고려한다.구체적으로 우리는 Wolastoqey(Malecite Passamaquody) 단어에 대해 영어 정의를 생성한다.Wolastoqey는 멸종 위기에 처한 저자원의 다합성 언어다.우리는 바이트가 인코딩된 하위 단어에 대한 표시(Sennrich et al., 2016)를 바탕으로 형태가 복잡한 Wolastoqey어를 나타낼 수 있다고 가정하고 대형 어료 라이브러리가 없는 훈련을 극복할 수 있다.우리의 실험 결과는 이 방법이 BLEU 평점에서 베이스라인 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 준다.', 'af': "Name In hierdie papier, ons besluit kruistale definisie generasie. Spesifieke, ons genereer Engels definisies vir Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) woorde. Wolastoqey is 'n gevaardige, lae- hulpbron polisintetiese taal. Ons hipotesis dat sub-woord voorstellings gebaseer op byte paar kodering (Sennrich et al., 2016) kan wees voorgestel om morphologies-komplekse Wolastoqey woorde te verteenwoord en die uitdrukking van nie groot korpora beskikbaar te hê vir onderwerp nie. Ons eksperimentele resultate bevestig dat hierdie toegang oortrek baselyn metodes in terms van BLEU-punt.", 'sq': 'Modelimi i përcaktimit është detyra e krijimit automatik të një përcaktimi stili-fjalor të dhënë një fjalë objektiv. Në këtë letër, ne konsiderojmë gjeneratën e përcaktimit ndërgjuhësor. Veçanërisht, ne krijojmë përkufizime angleze për fjalët Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey është një gjuhë polisintetike me burime të ulëta në rrezik. Ne hipotezojmë se përfaqësimet nënfjalore të bazuara në kodimin e çiftit byte (Sennrich et al., 2016) mund të përfaqësohen për të përfaqësuar fjalët morfologjikisht-komplekse Wolastoqey dhe të kapërcejnë sfidën e të mos ketë korpra të mëdha në dispozicion për trajnimin. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale demonstrojnë se ky qasje tejkalon metodat bazë lidhur me rezultatin BLEU.', 'de': 'Definitionsmodellierung ist die Aufgabe, automatisch eine Wörterbuchdefinition mit einem Zielwort zu generieren. In diesem Beitrag betrachten wir die Generierung von sprachübergreifenden Definitionen. Konkret generieren wir englische Definitionen für Wolastoqey (Malezit-Passamaquoddy)-Wörter. Wolastoqey ist eine gefährdete, ressourcenarme polysynthetische Sprache. Wir gehen davon aus, dass Sub-Word-Repräsentationen basierend auf Byte-Pair-Codierung (Sennrich et al., 2016) genutzt werden können, um morphologisch komplexe Wolastoqey-Wörter darzustellen und die Herausforderung zu meistern, keine großen Korpora für das Training zur Verfügung zu haben. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass dieser Ansatz in Bezug auf den BLEU-Score die Baseline-Methoden übertrifft.', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር በዚህ ገጽ የቋንቋ ትውልድ ነው:: በተለይም፣ ለኦሎስቶክይ (ማሌክইট-Passamaquoddy) ቃላትን እንግሊዘኛ ግንኙነቶችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፎሎስቶክይ የደነገገ፣ የዋና የፖሊስቲካ ቋንቋ ነው፡፡ አዋጅ ቃላት የቦት ሁለት የኢንድኮድ (Sennrich et al., 2016) በሚያሳየው እና በሞፎሎጂ-complex Wolastoqey ቃላት በመቆጣጠር እና ለትልቅ ኮርፖርት ያላገኘውን ግጭት ማሸንጎት እናሸንፋለን፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎቻችን የBLEU ጥያቄ ጥያቄ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Növbəti modelləşdirilməsi məqsəd sözlük-stili tərzini avtomatik olaraq ürəklənməkdir. Bu kağızda, çox dil tanımlama nəsili düşünürük. Biz Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) sözləri üçün İngiliz tanımları yaradırıq. Wolastoqey təhlükəsizli, düşük ressursuz polisintetik dilidir. Bizim hökmümüzə gəldik ki, bayit çift kodlaması (Sennrich et al., 2016) ilə dəstəkli sözlər Morfolojik-kompleks Wolastoqey sözlərini göstərmək və təhsil etmək üçün böyük korpora olmamaq üçün çətinliklərini üstün edə bilər. Bizim təcrübəmiz sonuçlarımız bu metodların BLEU nöqtəsi ilə baseline metodlarını göstərir.', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে একটি লক্ষ্য শব্দ প্রদান করা একটি অভিধান- শৈল্পিক সংজ্ঞা তৈরি করার কাজ। এই পত্রিকায়, আমরা ক্রিশ ভাষার সংজ্ঞা প্রজন্মের বিবেচনা করি। বিশেষ করে, আমরা উলাস্তোকের (মালেকিত-পাসামাকুডি) শব্দের জন্য ইংরেজী সংবাদ তৈরি করি। উলাস্তোকেই একটি বিপজ্জনক, নিম্নলিসিন্টিক ভাষা। আমরা হিসেবে বাইট জোড়া এনকোডিং (সেন্রিকেট আল, ২০১৬) ভিত্তিক সাবওয়ার্ডের প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা যাচ্ছে মোরফোল্যালিক-জটিল উলাস্তোকেই শব্দের প্ আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রমাণ করে যে এই প্রতিযোগিতা বিলিউ স্কোরের মাধ্যমে বেসাইলাইনের মাধ্যমে প্রয়োজন করে।', 'fa': 'مدل تعریف کار خودکار تولید یک تعریف سبک ویژه\u200cنامه به یک کلمه هدف داده شده است. در این کاغذ، ما نسل تعریف متفاوتی را به نظر می گیریم. مخصوصاً ما تعریف انگلیسی برای کلمات ولاستوکیه (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) را تولید می\u200cکنیم. Wolastoqey یک زبان بسیار سینتاتیک از منابع خطرناک و کم است. ما فرض می\u200cکنیم که نمایش\u200cهای زیر کلمه بر اساس رمزبندی سایت\u200cها (Sennrich et al., 2016) می\u200cتوانند برای نمایش کلمه\u200cهای "Wolastoqey" مورفولوژیکی پیچیده\u200cای استفاده کنند و چالش بزرگی که برای تمرین کردن شرکت\u200cهای بزرگ در دسترس نداشته باشند. نتیجه آزمایشی ما نشان می دهد که این روش روش\u200cهای پایین به عنوان امتیاز BLEU بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'hy': 'Definition modelling is the task of automatically generating a dictionary-style definition given a target word.  In this paper, we consider cross-lingual definition generation.  Մասնավորապես, մենք ստեղծում ենք անգլերեն սահմանափակումներ Վոլաստոկի բառերի համար: Ուոլաստոկին վտանգված, ցածր ռեսուրսների պոլիսինթետիկ լեզու է: Մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ բայտի զույգերի կոդավորման հիմնված բառերի ենթաբառերի ներկայացումները (Sennych et al., 2016) կարող են օգտագործվել որպեսզի ներկայացնեն մորֆոլոգիապես բարդ Վոլաստոկի բառերը և հաղթահարեն մարտահրավերը, որ մեծ կապորա հասանելի չլինեն ուսուցման համար: Մեր փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս մոտեցումը գերազանցում է հիմնական մեթոդները, ինչպիսիք են ԲԼԵՎ գնահատականը:', 'ca': "La modelació de definicions és la tasca de generar automàticament una definició d'estil de diccionari donada una paraula alvo. En aquest paper, considerem la generació de definicions translingües. En concret, generem definicions angleses per les paraules Wolastoqey. Wolastoqey és un llenguatge polisintètic de baix recursos en perill. Suposem que representacions sub-paraules basades en codificació de parell de bytes (Sennrich et al., 2016) poden ser utilitzades per representar paraules morfològicament complexes Wolastoqey i superar el repte de no tenir gran corpora disponible per a formar-se. Els nostres resultats experimentals demostren que aquest enfocament supera els mètodes de base en termes de puntuació BLEU.", 'cs': 'Definiční modelování je úkolem automatického generování slovníkového stylu definice daného cílového slova. V tomto článku se zabýváme generováním mezi jazyky. Konkrétně generujeme anglické definice pro Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) slova. Wolastoqey je ohrožený polysyntetický jazyk s nízkými zdroji. Předpokládáme hypotézu, že reprezentace podslov založené na kódování bajtových párů (Sennrich et al., 2016) lze využít k reprezentaci morfologicky komplexních Wolastoqey slov a překonat výzvu, že nemáme k dispozici velké korpusy pro trénink. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují, že tento přístup překonává základní metody z hlediska BLEU skóre.', 'et': 'Definitsioonide modelleerimine on ülesanne automaatselt genereerida sõnastiku stiilis definitsioon sihtsõna. Käesolevas dokumendis käsitleme keeleülese definitsiooni genereerimist. Täpsemalt loome inglise keeles mõisted Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) sõnadele. Wolastoqey on ohustatud, vähese ressursiga polüsünteetiline keel. Hüpoteesime, et baidipaari kodeerimisel põhinevaid alamsõnade esitusi (Sennrich et al., 2016) saab kasutada morfoloogiliselt keerukate Wolastoqey sõnade esindamiseks ja ületada väljakutse, et koolituseks ei ole saadaval suuri korpuseid. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et see lähenemisviis on BLEU skoori osas parem kui algmeetodid.', 'fi': 'Määritelmämallinnus on tehtävä luoda automaattisesti sanastotyylinen määritelmä kohdesanalle. Tässä artikkelissa pohdimme monikielisen määritelmän syntymistä. Erityisesti luomme englanninkielisiä määritelmiä Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) sanoille. Wolastoqey on uhanalainen, vähäresurssinen polysynteettinen kieli. Hypoteesimme, että tavuparikoodaukseen perustuvia alasanaesityksiä (Sennrich et al., 2016) voidaan hyödyntää edustamaan morfologisesti monimutkaisia Wolastoqey-sanoja ja voittamaan haasteen, jonka mukaan suuria korpusia ei ole saatavilla koulutukseen. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että tämä lähestymistapa ylittää lähtötason menetelmät BLEU-pistemäärän suhteen.', 'tr': 'Tanamlamak modlemesi bolsa maksady sözlük-biçiminden bejerilýän bir sözlük tarzıny otomatik olaraň janlaşdyrmakdyr. Bu kagyzda, biz çerçe dil definisyony döredip pikir edýäris. Adatça, Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy) sözleri üçin iňlisçe tanyşlary döredik. Wolastoqey - tehlikeli, azajyk-kanagatly polysyntetik dildir. Biz tahmin ediyoruz ki, bayit çift kodlamasına dayanan sub-kelime ifadeleri (Sennrich et al., 2016) morpholojik karmaşık Wolastoqey kelimelerini temsil etmek için yaratılabilir ve büyük korpora ulaşabilmek için değerlendirilebilir. Biziň synanyşan netijelerimiz bu ýagdaýyň BLEU अ अ अ ýagdaýynda esasy çyzgyly ýuw tutandygyny görkezýär.', 'bs': 'Modeliranje definicije je zadatak automatskog stvorenja definicije stila rečnika podataka ciljnoj riječi. U ovom papiru razmišljamo o generaciji prejezičke definicije. Posebno, stvaramo engleske definicije za riječi Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey je ugrožen, nisko-resursno polisintetički jezik. Pretpostavljamo da podriječje zasnovane na kodiranju bajtskih parova (Sennrich et al., 2016) mogu biti upotrebljene za predstavljanje morfološki kompleksnih Wolastoqey riječi i prevladanje izazova da ne bude dostupna velika tijela za obuku. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da taj pristup iznosi početne metode u smislu BLEU rezultata.', 'jv': 'Define modelling is the task of automatically generated a word-style Define given a goal word. Nanging kuwi iki, awake dhewe pancene kelangan kelangan seneng pisan-pakan. Eruptan, kita nggambar kelas nggambar nggambar kanggo kelas nggambar Wulusetoqy kuwi nganggo-ngêngêngêngé, sing paling-ngêngêngé kuwi. Awak dhéwé ngerti ngerti Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntukno ngerasahan kanggo ngerasakno nggawe barang pancen dumadhi sing nyeangké uwong nggambar barang blo.', 'he': 'מודל הגדרות הוא המשימה של ליצור אוטומטית הגדרה בסגנון מילון שנתנה מילה מטרה. בעיתון הזה, אנו שוקלים את דור ההגדרה לשפתיים. במיוחד, אנחנו יוצרים הגדרות אנגליות למילים של וולסטוקי. Wolastoqey is an endangered, low-resource polysynthetic language.  We hypothesize that sub-word representations based on byte pair encoding (Sennrich et al., 2016) can be leveraged to represent morphologically-complex Wolastoqey words and overcome the challenge of not having large corpora available for training.  תוצאות הניסויים שלנו מראות שהגישה הזו מעלית שיטות בסיסית במונחים של נקודת BLEU.', 'sk': 'Definicijsko modeliranje je naloga samodejnega ustvarjanja definicije slovarskega slovarja za ciljno besedo. V tem članku obravnavamo generacijo medjezične definicije. Natančneje, generiramo angleške definicije za besede Wolastoqey (Malecite-Passamaquoddy). Wolastoqey je ogrožen polisintetični jezik z nizkimi viri. Predpostavljamo hipotezo, da je mogoče predstavitve podbesed, ki temeljijo na kodiranju bajtnih parov (Sennrich et al., 2016), uporabiti za predstavitev morfološko kompleksnih Wolastoqeyevih besed in premagati izziv, da za usposabljanje ni na voljo velikih korpusov. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da ta pristop presega osnovne metode v smislu rezultatov BLEU.', 'ha': '@ action: inmenu Ina cikin wannan takardan, za mu yi bincike da zaɓani na fassarar harshen. Yana ƙayyade maganar Wolastoqey (Malecite-Paramaquodd). Wolastoqey wata harshen da aka yi wa halin, na ƙaranci-resource na Polsynthetic. We hypothesize that sub-word representations based on byte pair encoding (Sennrich et al., 2016) can be leveraged to represent morphologically-complex Wolastoqey words and overcome the challenge of not having large corpora available for training.  MatarayinMu na jarrabi ya nuna cewa wannan hanyor ta sami hanyoyin baƙaƙƙe a cikin tsarin BLEU.', 'bo': 'འགྲེལ་བཤད་མ་དབྱེ་བ་ནི་རང་འགུལ ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྐད་ཀྱི་ངོ་བོའི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་དང་། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གི་བརྗོད་ཐོག་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད། Wolastoqey ནི་ཕལ་ཆེར་ཆུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཉུང་བའི་འགྱུར་བ་ཞིག་རེད། We hypothesize that sub-word representations based on byte pair encoding (Sennrich et al., 2016) can be leveraged to represent morphologically-complex Wolastoqey words and overcome the challenge of not having large corpora available for training. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་གི་གནད་སྡུད་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྨས་གཞི་རྩིས་ཐོག་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'On the Contribution of Per-ICD Attention Mechanisms to Classify Health Records in Languages with Fewer Resources than English', 'ar': 'حول مساهمة آليات الاهتمام لكل من التصنيف الدولي للأمراض في تصنيف السجلات الصحية بلغات ذات موارد أقل من اللغة الإنجليزية', 'pt': 'Sobre a Contribuição dos Mecanismos de Atenção por CID para Classificação de Registros de Saúde em Idiomas com Menos Recursos que o Inglês', 'fr': "Sur la contribution des mécanismes d'attention par ICD à la classification des dossiers de santé dans des langues ayant moins de ressources que l'anglais", 'es': 'Sobre la contribución de los mecanismos de atención por ICD para clasificar los registros de salud en idiomas con menos recursos que el inglés', 'ja': '英語よりもリソースの少ない言語で健康記録を分類するためのICDごとの注意メカニズムの貢献について', 'hi': 'अंग्रेजी की तुलना में कम संसाधनों वाली भाषाओं में स्वास्थ्य रिकॉर्ड को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए प्रति-आईसीडी ध्यान तंत्र के योगदान पर', 'ru': 'О вкладе механизмов внимания к МКБ в классификацию медицинских карт на языках с меньшим объемом ресурсов, чем английский', 'zh': '每ICD关注机制英语少于言语之健录以类之', 'ga': 'Ar Ranníocaíocht Meicníochtaí Airde Per-ICD chun Taifid Sláinte a Aicmiú i dTeangacha le Níos Lú Acmhainní ná Béarla', 'el': 'Για τη συμβολή των μηχανισμών προσοχής ανά ΔΠΔ στην ταξινόμηση των αρχείων υγείας σε γλώσσες με λιγότερους πόρους από τα αγγλικά', 'ka': 'Per-ICD ატრუნციის მექანიზმის დამატებით კლასიფიკაცია ჯანდაცხოვრების რესურსის ენაში', 'hu': 'Az ICD figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmusok hozzájárulásáról az egészségügyi nyilvántartások osztályozásához kevesebb erőforrással rendelkező nyelveken, mint az angol', 'it': "Sul contributo dei meccanismi di attenzione per-ICD per classificare le cartelle cliniche in lingue con meno risorse rispetto all'inglese", 'kk': 'Ағылшынша тілде саулық жазуларды түрлендіру механизмтерінің қатынасы', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷിനെക്കാള്\u200d കുറച്ച് വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ആശ്വാസ സ്ത്ര ര രേഖകള്\u200d ക്ലാസിസ്സില്\u200d ചെയ്യാനുള്ള മെക്കനിസ', 'mt': 'Dwar il-Kontribuzzjoni ta’ Mekkaniżmi ta’ Attenzjoni Per-ICD għall-Klassifikazzjoni tar-Rekords tas-Saħħa f’Lingwi b’inqas Riżorsi mill-Ingliż', 'lt': 'dėl kiekvieno ICD dėmesio mechanizmų indėlio į sveikatos įrašų klasifikavimą kalbomis, kuriose ištekliai mažesni nei anglų kalba', 'mk': 'За придонесот на механизмите за внимание за период од ИКД за класификување на здравствените записи на јазици со помалку ресурси од англиски', 'ms': 'Pada kontribusi Mekanisme Perhatian Per-ICD untuk Klasifikasikan Rekod Kesehatan dalam Bahasa dengan Sumber Kurang Dari Inggeris', 'mn': 'Англи хэлийн эрүүл мэндийн Records-ээс бага нөөцтэй хэлнээс илүү бага нөөцтэй', 'ro': 'Cu privire la contribuția mecanismelor de atenție per-ICD la clasificarea dosarelor de sănătate în limbi cu mai puține resurse decât limba engleză', 'pl': 'O wkładzie mechanizmów uwagi na ICD w klasyfikację dokumentów zdrowia w językach o mniejszej ilości zasobów niż angielski', 'sr': 'U vezi pridonošenja mehanizma za pažnju po ICD-u klasifikaciji zdravstvenih ploča na jezicima sa manjim resursima nego na engleskom jeziku', 'si': 'On the Contibution of Per-ICD Attension Engineering to Classified Health Records in Links with Fewer ressources than English', 'no': 'På deltaken av Per-ICD-atteringsmekanisme til klassifisering av helseprogram i språk med mindre ressursar enn engelsk', 'so': 'On the Contribution of Per-ICD Attention mechanisms to Classify Health Records in languages with few resources than Ingiriis', 'sv': 'Om bidraget fr책n per-ICD uppm채rksamhetsmekanismer f철r att klassificera h채lsojournaler p책 spr책k med f채rre resurser 채n engelska', 'ta': 'மொழிகளில் சிறிய மூலங்களை விட சிறிய மூலங்களை விட தனிப்படுத்துவதற்கான செயல்பாடு', 'ur': 'انگلیسی سے کم سرمایہ کے ساتھ زبانوں میں سلامتی ریکورڈ کا کلاسیف کرنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Về sự đóng góp của cơ chế chú ý Per-ICD về bí mật Y khoa về Ngôn ngữ với nguồn lực ít hơn tiếng Anh', 'bg': 'За приноса на механизмите за внимание за класифициране на здравните досиета на езици с по-малко ресурси от английския език', 'hr': 'U vezi pridonošenja mehanizma pripazljivanja po ICD-u klasifikaciji zdravstvenih ploča na jezicima s manjim resursima nego na engleskom jeziku', 'nl': 'Over de bijdrage van Attentiemechanismen per ICD aan het classificeren van gezondheidsdossiers in talen met minder middelen dan Engels', 'de': 'Zum Beitrag von Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen pro ICD zur Klassifizierung von Gesundheitsakten in Sprachen mit weniger Ressourcen als Englisch', 'da': 'Om bidraget fra Per-ICD opmærksomhedsmekanismer til klassificering af sygejournaler på sprog med færre ressourcer end engelsk', 'sw': 'Katika toleo la Mifumo ya Kuchunguza Habari za Afya katika lugha na rasilimali wachache kuliko Kiingereza', 'tr': 'Per-ICD Saglyk Kaynaklary Iňlisçe görä Taýýarlamak üçin', 'af': 'Op die bydraaiïng van Per-ICD-aandagsmekanisme na Klassifiseer Geheidsopneem in Taal met Minder Hulpbron as Engels', 'fa': 'در مورد مشارکت مکانیسم توجه به کلاس گزارش سلامتی در زبانها با منابع کمتر از انگلیسی', 'id': 'On the Contribution of Per-ICD Attention Mechanisms to Classify Health Records in Languages with Fewer Resources than English', 'sq': 'On the Contribution of Per-ICD Attention Mechanisms to Classify Health Records in Languages with Fewer Resources than English', 'ko': '각 ICD 주의 메커니즘이 영어 자원보다 적은 언어로 건강 기록을 분류하는 데 기여한 바', 'bn': 'ভাষায় স্বাস্থ্য রেকর্ড গ্লাস করার জন্য প্রতিটি আইসিডি মনোযোগ প্রদানের বিভাগে ইংরেজির চেয়ে কম সম্পদ', 'bs': 'U vezi pridonošenja mehanizma pažnje po ICD-u klasifikaciji zdravstvenih ploča na jezicima s manjim resursima nego na engleskom jeziku', 'am': 'በ የ-ICD ተሟጋቾች ማሰናጃዎችን ለመclassify ጤና Records በቋንቋዎች ውስጥ ጥቂት resource ከምንግሊዝኛ', 'cs': 'O příspěvku mechanismů pozornosti pro ICD k klasifikaci zdravotních záznamů v jazycích s menším množstvím zdrojů než angličtina', 'et': 'ICD tähelepanu mehhanismide panuse kohta terviseandmete klassifitseerimisel vähem ressursse kui inglise keeles', 'hy': 'On the Contribution of Per-ICD Attention Mechanisms to Classify Health Records in Languages with Fewer Resources than English', 'fi': 'ICD:n seurantamekanismien vaikutuksesta terveystietojen luokitteluun kielillä, joilla on vähemmän resursseja kuin englanniksi', 'az': 'ńįngilizd…ôn az ressurs olan dill…ôrd…ô SańülńĪq KayńĪtlarńĪnńĪn Per-ICD Attention Mechanisml…ôrinin s…ôb…ôbi', 'ca': "En la contribució dels mecanismes per ICD d'atenció per classificar els registres sanitaris en llengües amb menys recursos que en anglès", 'sk': 'O prispevku mehanizmov pozornosti po ICD k razvrščanju zdravstvenih evidenc v jezikih z manj virov kot angleščina', 'jv': 'Nang kontribusi Per-CID Attribusi Mehanis kanggo Keasahaan Rejilan Sak Jaakan kanggo Daerah sing kator Ressursi kanggo Inggris', 'he': 'על התרומה של מכונות תשומת לב Per-ICD להקליף רשומות בריאות בשפות עם פחות משאבים מאנגלית', 'ha': 'On the KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་དུ་Per-ICD ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལག་ཆ་གི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡིག་ནང་གི་འཕྲོད་རིམ་མང་ཙམ་ཅིག'}
{'en': 'We introduce a multi-label text classifier with per-label attention for the classification of Electronic Health Records according to the International Classification of Diseases. We apply the model on two Electronic Health Records datasets with Discharge Summaries in two languages with fewer resources than English, Spanish and Swedish. Our model leverages the BERT Multilingual model (specifically the Wikipedia, as the model have been trained with 104 languages, including Spanish and Swedish, with the largest Wikipedia dumps) to share the language modelling capabilities across the languages. With the per-label attention, the model can compute the relevance of each word from the EHR towards the prediction of each label. For the experimental framework, we apply 157 labels from Chapter XI   Diseases of the Digestive System of the ICD, which makes the attention especially important as the model has to discriminate between similar diseases. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list-of-languages', 'ar': 'نقدم مُصنِّف نص متعدد العلامات مع الاهتمام بكل تسمية لتصنيف السجلات الصحية الإلكترونية وفقًا للتصنيف الدولي للأمراض. نطبق النموذج على مجموعتي بيانات للسجلات الصحية الإلكترونية مع ملخصات التفريغ بلغتين مع موارد أقل من الإنجليزية والإسبانية والسويدية. يستفيد نموذجنا من نموذج BERT متعدد اللغات (تحديدًا ويكيبيديا ، حيث تم تدريب النموذج بـ 104 لغة ، بما في ذلك الإسبانية والسويدية ، مع أكبر مقالب لـ Wikipedia) لمشاركة إمكانات نمذجة اللغة عبر اللغات. مع الاهتمام لكل تسمية ، يمكن للنموذج حساب أهمية كل كلمة من السجلات الصحية الإلكترونية تجاه توقع كل تسمية. بالنسبة للإطار التجريبي ، قمنا بتطبيق 157 ملصق من الفصل الحادي عشر - أمراض الجهاز الهضمي في مقوم نظم القلب ومزيل الرجفان القابل للزراعة ، مما يجعل الانتباه مهمًا بشكل خاص حيث يتعين على النموذج التمييز بين الأمراض المتشابهة. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list-of-languages', 'es': 'Introducimos un clasificador de texto de múltiples etiquetas con atención por etiqueta para la clasificación de las historias clínicas electrónicas de acuerdo con la Clasificación Internacional de Enfermedades. Aplicamos el modelo en dos conjuntos de datos de registros médicos electrónicos con resúmenes de alta en dos idiomas con menos recursos que inglés, español y sueco. Nuestro modelo aprovecha el modelo multilingüe BERT (específicamente Wikipedia, ya que el modelo ha sido entrenado en 104 idiomas, incluidos el español y el sueco, con los mayores volcados de Wikipedia) para compartir las capacidades de modelado lingüístico en todos los idiomas. Con la atención por etiqueta, el modelo puede calcular la relevancia de cada palabra del EHR para la predicción de cada etiqueta. Para el marco experimental, aplicamos 157 etiquetas del Capítulo XI — Enfermedades del Sistema Digestivo del ICD, lo que hace que la atención sea especialmente importante, ya que el modelo tiene que discriminar entre enfermedades similares. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list-of-languages', 'fr': "Nous introduisons un classificateur de texte à étiquettes multiples avec une attention par étiquette pour la classification des dossiers médicaux électroniques selon la classification internationale des maladies. Nous appliquons le modèle à deux ensembles de données de dossiers médicaux électroniques avec des résumés de sortie en deux langues avec moins de ressources que l'anglais, l'espagnol et le suédois. Notre modèle tire parti du modèle multilingue BERT (en particulier Wikipédia, car le modèle a été formé avec 104 langues, y compris l'espagnol et le suédois, avec les plus grands dumps Wikipédia) pour partager les capacités de modélisation linguistique entre les langues. Avec l'attention par étiquette, le modèle peut calculer la pertinence de chaque mot du DSE par rapport à la prédiction de chaque étiquette. Pour le cadre expérimental, nous appliquons 157 étiquettes du chapitre XI — Maladies de l'appareil digestif de l'ICD, ce qui rend l'attention particulièrement importante étant donné que le modèle doit faire la distinction entre des maladies similaires. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list-of-languages", 'pt': 'Introduzimos um classificador de texto multi-rótulo com atenção por rótulo para a classificação de Prontuários Eletrônicos de Saúde de acordo com a Classificação Internacional de Doenças. Aplicamos o modelo em dois conjuntos de dados de Registros Eletrônicos de Saúde com Resumos de Alta em dois idiomas com menos recursos do que inglês, espanhol e sueco. Nosso modelo aproveita o modelo BERT Multilingual (especificamente a Wikipedia, pois o modelo foi treinado com 104 idiomas, incluindo espanhol e sueco, com os maiores dumps da Wikipedia) para compartilhar os recursos de modelagem de linguagem entre os idiomas. Com a atenção por rótulo, o modelo pode calcular a relevância de cada palavra do EHR para a previsão de cada rótulo. Para o quadro experimental, aplicamos 157 rótulos do Capítulo XI – Doenças do Aparelho Digestivo da CID, o que torna a atenção especialmente importante, pois o modelo tem que discriminar entre doenças semelhantes. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list-of-languages', 'zh': '引入一多标签文本分类器,每标签皆有注意,以国际病之类电子健记分之。 宜用二电子录数集,其二语出院摘要,其资少于英语,西班牙语瑞典语。 用BERT多言(尤为维基百科,以其已用104种言(西班牙语与瑞典语)教习,有大维基百科转储)跨言建模功能也。 凡标签之意,量EHR之单词,与人之占相关性。 实验框架用ICD第十一章消化系统病之157表,此使关注尤为重要,形分相似之病也。 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list-of-languages', 'ja': '国際疾病分類に従って、電子健康記録の分類にラベルごとの注意を払ったマルチラベルのテキスト分類器を導入します。 このモデルは、英語、スペイン語、スウェーデン語よりもリソースの少ない2つの言語で、退院サマリー付きの2つの電子健康記録データセットに適用します。 私たちのモデルは、BERT多言語モデル（特にウィキペディア）を活用しています。このモデルは、スペイン語とスウェーデン語を含む104の言語で訓練されており、最大のウィキペディアダンプを備えています）を使用して、言語間で言語モデリング機能を共有しています。 ラベルごとの注意を払うことで、モデルは、EHRから各ラベルの予測に向けて各単語の関連性を計算することができます。 実験フレームワークでは、ICDの第XI章「消化器系の疾患」の157のラベルを適用します。これにより、モデルは類似の疾患を区別する必要があるため、注意が特に重要になります。1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md # list – of – language', 'hi': 'हम रोगों के अंतर्राष्ट्रीय वर्गीकरण के अनुसार इलेक्ट्रॉनिक स्वास्थ्य रिकॉर्ड के वर्गीकरण के लिए प्रति-लेबल ध्यान के साथ एक बहु-लेबल पाठ क्लासिफायर पेश करते हैं। हम अंग्रेजी, स्पेनिश और स्वीडिश की तुलना में कम संसाधनों के साथ दो भाषाओं में निर्वहन सारांश के साथ दो इलेक्ट्रॉनिक हेल्थ रिकॉर्ड डेटासेट पर मॉडल लागू करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल BERT बहुभाषी मॉडल (विशेष रूप से विकिपीडिया, जैसा कि मॉडल को स्पेनिश और स्वीडिश सहित 104 भाषाओं के साथ प्रशिक्षित किया गया है, जिसमें सबसे बड़े विकिपीडिया डंप हैं) भाषाओं में भाषा मॉडलिंग क्षमताओं को साझा करने के लिए। प्रति-लेबल ध्यान के साथ, मॉडल प्रत्येक लेबल की भविष्यवाणी की दिशा में ईएचआर से प्रत्येक शब्द की प्रासंगिकता की गणना कर सकता है। प्रयोगात्मक ढांचे के लिए, हम अध्याय XI से 157 लेबल लागू करते हैं - आईसीडी के पाचन तंत्र के रोग, जो ध्यान को विशेष रूप से महत्वपूर्ण बनाता है क्योंकि मॉडल को समान बीमारियों के बीच भेदभाव करना पड़ता है। 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list-of-languages', 'ru': 'Введем многоуровневый текстовый классификатор с поучительным вниманием для классификации электронных медицинских карт в соответствии с Международной классификацией болезней. Мы применяем модель на двух наборах электронных медицинских записей с резюме выписок на двух языках с меньшими ресурсами, чем английский, испанский и шведский. Наша модель использует модель BERT Multilingual (в частности, Википедию, поскольку модель была обучена 104 языками, включая испанский и шведский, с крупнейшими дампами Википедии), чтобы делиться возможностями языкового моделирования между языками. При внимании к каждой метке, модель может вычислить релевантность каждого слова от EHR к прогнозированию каждой метки. Для экспериментальной структуры мы применяем 157 меток из Главы XI – Заболевания пищеварительной системы МКБ, что делает внимание особенно важным, так как модель должна различать похожие заболевания. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list-of-languages', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach aicmitheoir téacs illipéid le haird in aghaidh an lipéid le haghaidh aicmiú Taifead Leictreonach Sláinte de réir Aicmithe Idirnáisiúnta Galar. Cuirimid an tsamhail i bhfeidhm ar dhá thacar sonraí Thaifid Sláinte Leictreonacha le hAchoimrí Urscaoilte i dhá theanga le níos lú acmhainní ná an Béarla, an Spáinnis agus an tSualainnis. Déanann ár múnla giaráil ar mhúnla BERT Ilteangach (an Vicipéid go sonrach, toisc gur cuireadh oiliúint ar an tsamhail le 104 teanga, lena n-áirítear Spáinnis agus Sualainnis, leis na dumpaí Vicipéide is mó) chun na cumais samhaltaithe teanga a roinnt ar fud na dteangacha. Le haird in aghaidh an lipéid, is féidir leis an tsamhail ábharthacht gach focal ón EHR i dtreo gach lipéad a thuar a ríomh. Maidir leis an gcreat turgnamhach, cuirimid i bhfeidhm 157 lipéad ó Chaibidil XI – Galair an Chórais Díleácha an ICD, rud a fhágann go bhfuil an aird thar a bheith tábhachtach toisc go gcaithfidh an tsamhail idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir galair chomhchosúla. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list-of-languages', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მრავალური ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციას ჩვენ დავიყენებთ ელექტრონიური ჯანმრთელობის კლასიფიკაციაციაზე, რომელიც ერთ-ნიშნალური ინტერნეციის კლასიფიკაციაციას შესაძ ჩვენ მოდელს ორი ელექტრონიური ჯანმრთელობის რეკოდისტების მონაცემების მონაცემებზე გამოყენებთ, ექსტრაზის რეკუმენტებით ორი ენაში, რომლებიც უფრო მეტი ჩვენი მოდელმა ბერტი მრავალენგური მოდელს (განსაკუთრებით ვიკიპედია, როგორც მოდელმა 104 ენებით განაკეთებულია, როგორც შვიდური და შვიდური, უფრო დიდი ვიკიპედია დამატებული) იყოს, რომ ენის მოდელური შე ყველა სიტყვის EHR-დან ყველა სიტყვის წარმოდგენისთვის მოდელი შეიძლება გამომუშაოთ. ექსპერიმენტიური პარამეტრებისთვის ჩვენ გამოყენებთ 157 ლებელი XI-დან - ICD-ის Digestive System-ის დაავადება, რომელიც განსაკუთრებით მნიშვნელოვანია, როგორც მოდელის განსაკუთრებით გასანიშ 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - ენების', 'hu': 'Bevezetjük az elektronikus egészségügyi nyilvántartások nemzetközi osztályozása szerinti osztályozására címkénkénti figyelmet ellátó, többcímkés szövegosztályozót. A modellt két elektronikus egészségügyi nyilvántartási adatkészletre alkalmazzuk, amelyek a mentesítési összefoglalókat két nyelven kevesebb forrással rendelkeznek, mint az angol, a spanyol és a svéd. Modellünk a BERT többnyelvű modelljét használja (különösen a Wikipédiát, mivel a modellt 104 nyelven képezték, köztük spanyolul és svédül, a legnagyobb Wikipédia dump-ekkel), hogy megosszák a nyelvmodellezési képességeket az egyes nyelveken. A címkenkénti figyelemmel a modell kiszámíthatja az egyes szavak relevanciáját az EHR-ből az egyes címkék előrejelzése szempontjából. A kísérleti keretrendszer tekintetében 157 címkét alkalmazunk az ICD emésztőrendszeri betegségei XI. fejezetéből, ami különösen fontossá teszi a figyelmet, mivel a modellnek meg kell különböztetnie a hasonló betegségek között. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list nyelvek', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε έναν ταξινομητή κειμένου πολλαπλών ετικετών με επιμέλεια ανά ετικέτα για την ταξινόμηση Ηλεκτρονικών Αρχείων Υγείας σύμφωνα με τη Διεθνή Ταξινόμηση Νοήσεων. Εφαρμόζουμε το μοντέλο σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων Ηλεκτρονικών Αρχείων Υγείας με Σύνοψη Απαλλαγής σε δύο γλώσσες με λιγότερους πόρους από τα Αγγλικά, Ισπανικά και Σουηδικά. Το μοντέλο μας χρησιμοποιεί το πολύγλωσσο μοντέλο (ειδικά τη Βικιπαίδεια, καθώς το μοντέλο έχει εκπαιδευτεί με 104 γλώσσες, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των ισπανικών και σουηδικών, με τα μεγαλύτερα κενά της Βικιπαίδειας) για να μοιραστεί τις δυνατότητες μοντελοποίησης γλωσσών σε όλες τις γλώσσες. Με την προσοχή ανά ετικέτα, το μοντέλο μπορεί να υπολογίσει τη συνάφεια κάθε λέξης από την ΕΕΣ για την πρόβλεψη κάθε ετικέτας. Για το πειραματικό πλαίσιο, εφαρμόζουμε 157 ετικέτες από το κεφάλαιο ΧΙ.Ασθένειες του πεπτικού συστήματος του ΔΠΔ, γεγονός που καθιστά την προσοχή ιδιαίτερα σημαντική καθώς το μοντέλο πρέπει να κάνει διάκριση μεταξύ παρόμοιων ασθενειών. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list γλωσσών', 'kk': 'Біз көп жарлық мәтін классификациясын, әрбір жарлық белгілерде электрондық саулық жазулардың классификациясына сәйкес келеді. Біз үлгісін екі электрондық саулық жазу деректер жиынына қолдану үлгісін ағылшын, Испан және Шведшадан аз ресурстар қолдануға арналған екі тілде қолдануға болады. Біздің үлгіміз BERT көптеген тілді үлгілеу мүмкіндіктерін тілдерде ортақтастыру үшін бірнеше тілді үлгілеу үлгісін (әдетте Википедия, мұндай үлгісі 104 тілден, Испан және Швед тілдерінде, ең үлкен Википеди Бір жарлық белгілерде үлгісі EHR- ден әрбір сөздің маңыздылығын есептеп алады. Тәжірибелікті қоршау үшін XI тапсырмасынан 157 жарлық қолданып тұрмыз - ICD тапсырмалар жүйесінің аурулары, бұл үлгі ұқсас аурулардың арасында бөліктеу үшін өте маңызды болады. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - of- languages', 'lt': 'We introduce a multi-label text classifier with per-label attention for the classification of Electronic Health Records according to the International Classification of Diseases.  Taikome model į dviejuose elektroninių sveikatos įrašų duomenų rinkiniuose su atleidimo iš darbo santraukomis dviem kalbomis, kuriose ištekliai yra mažesni nei anglų, ispanų ir švedų kalbomis. Mūsų modelis naudoja BERT daugiakalbį model į (ypač Wikipedia, nes modelis buvo mokytas 104 kalbomis, įskaitant ispanų ir švedų kalbas, su didžiausiomis Wikipedia nuotekomis), kad kalbų modeliavimo gebėjimai būtų dalijami visomis kalbomis. Atsižvelgiant į kiekvieną etiketę, modelis gali apskaičiuoti kiekvieno EHR žodžio svarbą kiekvienos etiketės prognozavimui. Eksperimentinei sistemai taikome 157 ženklus iš XI skyriaus „TDI skaitmeninės sistemos ligos“, kuriame ypatingai svarbus dėmesys, nes modelis turi diskriminuoti panašias ligas. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages', 'it': "Introducemo un classificatore di testo multi-etichetta con attenzione per etichetta per la classificazione delle cartelle cliniche elettroniche secondo la classificazione internazionale delle malattie. Applichiamo il modello su due insiemi di dati delle cartelle cliniche elettroniche con riassunti di scarico in due lingue con meno risorse rispetto all'inglese, allo spagnolo e allo svedese. Il nostro modello sfrutta il modello multilingue BERT (in particolare Wikipedia, in quanto il modello è stato formato con 104 lingue, tra cui spagnolo e svedese, con i più grandi dump di Wikipedia) per condividere le capacità di modellazione linguistica in tutte le lingue. Con l'attenzione per etichetta, il modello può calcolare la rilevanza di ogni parola dall'EHR per la previsione di ogni etichetta. Per il quadro sperimentale, applichiamo 157 etichette dal Capitolo XI - Malattie del sistema digerente della ICD, il che rende l'attenzione particolarmente importante in quanto il modello deve discriminare tra malattie simili. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages", 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu klassifikatur tat-test b’tikketta multipla b’attenzjoni għal kull tikketta għall-klassifikazzjoni tar-Rekords Elettroniċi tas-Saħħa skont il-Klassifikazzjoni Internazzjonali tal-Mard. Aħna napplikaw il-mudell fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta tar-Rekords Elettroniċi tas-Saħħa b’Sommarji tal-Ħruġ f’żewġ lingwi b’inqas riżorsi mill-Ingliż, Spanjol u Żvediż. Il-mudell tagħna jagħti spinta lill-mudell multilingwi BERT (speċjalment il-Wikipedia, peress li l-mudell ġie mħarreġ b’104 lingwa, inklużi l-Ispanjol u l-Isvediż, bl-akbar dumps tal-Wikipedia) biex jaqsam il-kapaċitajiet tal-mudell tal-lingwi mal-lingwi kollha. B’attenzjoni għal kull tikketta, il-mudell jista’ jikkalkula r-rilevanza ta’ kull kelma mill-EHR lejn it-tbassir ta’ kull tikketta. Għall-qafas sperimentali, aħna napplikaw 157 tikketta mill-Kapitolu XI - Mard tas-Sistema Diġitali tal-ICD, li tagħmel l-attenzjoni partikolarment importanti peress li l-mudell għandu jiddiskrimina bejn mard simili. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -tal-lingwi', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме мултиетикетски текст класификатор со внимание по етикета за класификацијата на Електронските здравствени рекорди според Меѓународната класификација на болести. Го применуваме моделот на двата компјутери на податоци на Електронските здравствени рекорди со резултати за отпуштање на две јазици со помалку ресурси отколку англиски, шпански и шведски. Нашиот модел го користи Мултијазичниот модел БЕРТ (посебно Википедија, бидејќи моделот е обучен со 104 јазици, вклучително и шпански и шведски, со најголемите википедиски депонии) за споделување на способностите за моделирање јазици низ јазиците. Со внимание по етикета, моделот може да ја пресмета релевантноста на секој збор од ЕХР кон предвидувањето на секоја етикета. За експерименталната рамка, применуваме 157 етикети од поглавје XI - Болести на дигистичкиот систем на МКД, што го прави вниманието особено важно бидејќи моделот мора да дискриминира помеѓу сличните болести. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - of- languages', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan pengklasifikasi teks berbilang-label dengan perhatian per-label untuk pengklasifikasi Rekod Kesehatan Elektronik menurut Pengklasifikasi Penyakit Antarabangsa. Kami menerapkan model pada dua set data Rekod Kesehatan Elektronik dengan Ringkasan Buang dalam dua bahasa dengan sumber yang kurang daripada bahasa Inggeris, Sepanyol dan Swedia. Our model leverages the BERT Multilingual model (specifically the Wikipedia, as the model have been trained with 104 languages, including Spanish and Swedish, with the largest Wikipedia dumps) to share the language modelling capabilities across the languages.  Dengan perhatian per-label, model boleh menghitung relevan setiap perkataan dari EHR menuju ramalan setiap label. Untuk kerangka percubaan, kami melaksanakan 157 label dari Bab XI - penyakit Sistem Digestif ICD, yang membuat perhatian terutama penting kerana model perlu mendiskriminasi antara penyakit yang sama. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages', 'mn': 'Бид олон загварын текст хуваалцагч нарын нэг загварын анхаарлыг илэрхийлж, олон улсын өвчин халдварын хуваалцааны анхаарлыг илэрхийлж байна. Бид энэхүү загварыг 2 хэл дээр англи, Испан болон Шведийн хэл дээр бага нөөц болох Discharge Summary-тэй хоёр цахилгаан эрүүл мэндийн Records өгөгдлийн санд ашигладаг. Бидний загвар нь БЕРТ олон хэл загварыг (ялангуяа Wikipedia, загвар нь 104 хэл болон Испан болон Швед болон хамгийн том Wikipedia загвартай) хэл загварын загварын талаар хуваалцах боломжтой болгодог. Нэг жагсаалтын анхаарлын тулд загвар нь ЕХР-ээс бүх үгийг тооцоолж чадна. Үүний туршилтын хэлбэрийн тулд бид XI хэлбэрээс 157 тэмдэглэл ашиглаж байна. Энэ нь ИКД-ын Digestive System-ийн өвчин юм. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy wieloznakowy klasyfikator tekstowy z uwagą na klasyfikację elektronicznych dokumentów zdrowia według Międzynarodowej Klasyfikacji Chorób. Model stosujemy na dwóch zbiorach danych elektronicznej dokumentacji zdrowia z podsumowaniem zwolnień w dwóch językach, z mniejszą ilością zasobów niż angielski, hiszpański i szwedzki. Nasz model wykorzystuje model wielojęzyczny BERT (szczególnie Wikipedia, ponieważ model został przeszkolony z 104 językami, w tym hiszpańskim i szwedzkim, z największymi zrzutami Wikipedii), aby dzielić się możliwościami modelowania języków w poszczególnych językach. Dzięki uwagi na etykietę model może obliczyć znaczenie każdego słowa z EKR dla przewidywania każdej etykiety. W ramach eksperymentalnych stosujemy 157 etykiety z rozdziału XI Choroby układu trawiennego ICD, co sprawia, że uwaga jest szczególnie ważna, ponieważ model musi rozróżniać podobne choroby. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list językowe', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein fleire merkelapp tekstklassifiserer med merkelappen for klassifikasjonen av elektroniske helseprogram etter internasjonale klassifikasjon av sykdommer. Vi bruker modellen på to datasett for elektronisk helseprogram med diskharge samandrag i to språk med mindre ressursar enn engelsk, spansk og svensk. Modellen vårt leverer BERT multispråk-modellen (spesielt Wikipedia, sidan modellen er trent med 104 språk, inkludert spansk og svensk, med dei største Wikipediadump) for å dele språk-modelleringskapasiteten over språka. Med merkelappen kan modellen rekna ut kvar ord som er relevant frå EHR mot forhåndsvising av kvar merkelapp. For det eksperimentelle rammeverket, bruker vi 157 etikettar frå kapittel XI – Sykdommar av ICD-systemet, som gjer oppmerksomheten spesielt viktig som modellen må diskriminere mellom liknande sykdommar. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - of- languages', 'ro': 'Introducem un clasificator de text cu etichete multiple cu atenție pe etichetă pentru clasificarea dosarelor medicale electronice conform Clasificării Internaționale a Bolilor. Aplicăm modelul pe două seturi de date ale dosarelor medicale electronice cu rezumate de descărcare în două limbi cu mai puține resurse decât engleza, spaniola și suedeza. Modelul nostru utilizează modelul multilingv BERT (în special Wikipedia, deoarece modelul a fost instruit cu 104 limbi, inclusiv spaniolă și suedeză, cu cele mai mari dump-uri Wikipedia) pentru a partaja capacitățile de modelare lingvistică în toate limbile. Cu atenția fiecărei etichete, modelul poate calcula relevanța fiecărui cuvânt din EHR pentru predicția fiecărei etichete. Pentru cadrul experimental, aplicăm 157 de etichete din capitolul XI - Boli ale sistemului digestiv al ICD, ceea ce face ca atenția să fie deosebit de importantă deoarece modelul trebuie să discrimineze între boli similare. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -de-limbi', 'ml': 'എലെക്ട്രോണിക് ആശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ റെക്സ്പോര്\u200dട്ടുകളുടെ ക്ലാസിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പല-ലേറ്റ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് വിശദീകരിക ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്, സ്പാനിഷ്, സ്പാനിഷ് എന്നിവരെക്കാളും കുറച്ച് വിഭവങ്ങളുണ്ടായി രണ്ട് ഇലക്ട്രോണിക് ആശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ റെക്കോര്\u200dഡ ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടി പല ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു (പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് വിക്കിപിഡിയ, സ്പാനിഷും സ്വീഡിഷും ഉള്ള 104 ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന ഓരോ ലേബറിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധ കൊണ്ട്, എല്ലാ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും എഹ്ആരില്\u200d നിന്നും എല്ലാ ലേബിളിന്റെയും പ്രവചനത്തിനുമുമ്പിലേക് പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമെന്\u200dറിന് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ചാപ്റ്റര്\u200d എക്സിയില്\u200d നിന്നും 157 ലേബ്ലെറ്റുകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഐസിഡിയുടെ ഡിജെസ്റ്റിവ് സ 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - ഭാഷകള്\u200d', 'si': 'අපි ගොඩක් ලේබල් ලේබල් ලේබල් ක්\u200dරිස්ටර් එකක් ලේබල් එකක් අවධානය කරනවා එලෙක්ට්\u200dරෝනික ස්වාස්ත්\u200dය රිකෝඩ් ලේබල් ලේබල අපි ඇලෙක්ට්\u200dරෝනික් ස්වාස්ත්වයේ දත්ත සඳහා මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ ඉංග්\u200dරීස්, ස්පැනිස් හා ස්වීඩිෂ් වලි අපේ මෝඩෙල් බෙර්ට් ගොඩක් භාෂාභාෂාත්මක මොඩේලය (විශේෂයෙන්ම විකිපිඩියාව, මොඩේලය 104 භාෂාත්මයෙන්, ස්පැනිස් සහ ස්වීඩිෂ්, විකිප ප්\u200dරතිලේබල අවධානය සමඟ, මොඩේල් එක පුළුවන් EHR වලින් හැම ලේබල් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිලේශනය ගැන ගණන් කරන්න. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරමාණය වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරමාණය XI වලින් 157 ලේබල් භාවිත කරනවා - ICD වලින් ප්\u200dරමාණ පද්ධතියේ අවස්ථාවක් වලින්, ඒකෙන්  1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - of- language', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo klasifikatora teksta sa pažnjom po etiketi za klasifikaciju elektronskih zdravstvenih ploča prema Međunarodnoj klasifikaciji bolesti. Mi primjenjujemo model na dva elektronska zdravstvena registracija podataka sa sažetkama otpuštanja na dva jezika sa manjim resursima od engleskog, španjolskog i švedskog. Naš model utiče na BERT multijezički model (posebno na Wikipedia, jer je model obučen sa 104 jezika, uključujući španjolske i švedske, sa najvećim bacanjem Wikipedije) da podijeli sposobnosti za modeliranje jezika širom jezika. Uz pažnju po etiketi, model može računati relevantnost svake reči od EHR prema predviđanju svake etikete. Za eksperimentalni okvir, primjenjujemo 157 etiketa iz poglavlja XI - bolesti Digestivnog sustava ICD-a, što čini pažnju posebno važnom jer model mora diskriminirati između sličnih bolesti. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - jezika', 'so': 'Waxaannu u soo bandhignaynaa qoraal kasta oo kala duduwan oo aad u taqaan fasalka daryeelka caafimaadka ee Electronic Records, sida uu qabto International Classification of Diseases. Tusaalada waxaan ku codsanaynaa labada taariikhda daryeelka caafimaadka ee Electronic, taasoo ku qoran labada luqadood oo ay ka yar yihiin resources Ingiriis, Isbanish iyo Iswidish. Tusaale ahaan ayaa ku qoraya modelalka luuqadaha badan ee BERT (si gaar ah Wikipedia, sida modellka lagu baray af 104 luqadood, including Isbanishka iyo Iswidishka, kuwaas oo ugu weyn Wikipedia) si uu u qaybsado awoodaha qaabilaadda luuqadaha oo dhan. Dhaqaalaha mid kasta, modelku wuxuu xisaabin karaa faa’iidada hadal kasta oo EHR ka soo baxay, iyadoo loo sii sheego calaamad kasta. Qoraalka imtixaanka ah 157 baarar ayaannu ka codsanaynaa Chapteer XI - cudurada nidaamka kala gedisan ee ICD, kaas oo si gaar ah u muhiimsanaya, sababtoo ah modelku waa inuu ku takooro cudurada isku mid ah. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -luqadaha', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en textklassificerare med flera etiketter med uppmärksamhet per etikett för klassificeringen av elektroniska hälsojournaler enligt den internationella klassificeringen av sjukdomar. Vi tillämpar modellen på två datauppsättningar med ansvarsfrihetssammanfattningar på två språk med färre resurser än engelska, spanska och svenska. Vår modell utnyttjar BERT flerspråkiga modell (särskilt Wikipedia, eftersom modellen har tränats med 104 språk, inklusive spanska och svenska, med de största Wikipedia dumps) för att dela språkmodelleringsfunktionerna över alla språk. Med uppmärksamheten per etikett kan modellen beräkna relevansen av varje ord från EHR för förutsägelsen av varje etikett. För det experimentella ramverket använder vi 157 etiketter från kapitel XI - Sjukdomar i matsmältningssystemet i ICD, vilket gör uppmärksamheten särskilt viktig eftersom modellen måste skilja mellan liknande sjukdomar. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -av-språk', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு பலவிதமான உரை வகுப்பாளரை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் ஒவ்வொரு பட்டியலுக்கும் கவனத்துடன் மின்னட்ரானிக் ஆரோக்க பதிவுகளை வகுப்பிற்கா நாம் இரண்டு மின்னஞ்சல் விருப்பத்தேர்வு தரவுத்தளங்களில் மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் இரண்டு மொழிகளில் வடிவமைப்பு சுருக்கங்கள எங்கள் மாதிரி பெர்ட் பல மொழி மாதிரியை வழங்குகிறது (குறிப்பிட்ட விகிபிடியா, மாதிரி 104 மொழிகளால் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஸ்பானிஷ் மற்றும் ஸ்வீடிஷ், ம ஒவ்வொரு விளக்கச்சீட்டுக்கும் கவனத்தை கொண்டு, மாதிரி ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தையும் EHR யிலிருந்து ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தை For the experimental framework, we apply 157 labels from Chapter XI - Diseases of the Digestive System of the ICD, which makes the attention especially important as the model has to discriminate between similar diseases.  1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - மொழிகள்', 'ur': 'ہم ایک multi-label text classifier کو پہنچاتے ہیں جو ایک لیبل کے ذریعے الکترونیک سلامتی ریکورڈ کے کلاسپیٹ کے مطابق بیماریوں کی کلاسپیٹ کے مطابق الکترونیک سلامتی ریکورڈ کی کلاسپیٹ کرتا ہے. ہم نے دو الکترونیک سلامتی رکورد ڈیٹ سٹ پر مدل کو دو زبانوں میں ڈیشارج جماریوں کے ساتھ استعمال کیا جو انگلیسی, اسپانیایی اور سوئدی سے کم منبع ہیں۔ ہمارا موڈل BERT Multilingual Model (ویکیپیڈیا کی مخصوص طور پر، جس طرح موڈل 104 زبانوں سے آموزش کی گئی ہے، اسپانیایی اور سوئڈی کے شامل، سب سے بڑے ویکیپیڈیا ڈمپ کے ساتھ) زبانوں میں موڈلینگ قابلیت کا شریک کرنے کے لئے ہے۔ ہر لئبل کی توجه کے ساتھ، مدل ہر لئبل کی پیش بینی کی طرف سے ہر لئبل کی ضرورت کا شمار کر سکتا ہے. آزمائش فرمور کے لئے ہم ایک قسمت XI سے 157 لیبل لازم کرتے ہیں - ICD کے Digestive System کی بیماری، جس نے اچھی طرح توجه کو اہم بنایا ہے جس طرح مدل برابر بیماریوں کے درمیان جدائی کرنے کی ضرورت ہے. 1" (msgctxt: "panel:showusername") to "1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một người phân loại văn bản đa nhãn được chú ý đặc trưng cho việc phân loại các đơn vị Y tế điện tử theo Hạng Bệnh tật quốc tế. Chúng tôi áp dụng mô hình này trên hai tập tin dữ liệu về Y tế điện tử với các cuộc họp gia đình tại hai ngôn ngữ có ít nguồn tài nguyên hơn tiếng Anh, Tây Ban Nha và Thụy Điển. Cách mô hình của chúng ta đang điều khiển mô hình đa ngôn ngữ của BERT (cụ thể là Wikipedia, vì đã được đào tạo bằng 104 ngôn ngữ, bao gồm cả tiếng Tây Ban Nha và Thụy Điển, cùng với hàng đa loại Wikipedia) lớn nhất để chia sẻ khả năng mô hình ngôn ngữ cho cả các ngôn ngữ. Với sự chú ý của mỗi nhãn, mô hình này có thể tính toán sự liên quan của mỗi từ từ trên EHOME với khả năng tiên đoán của mỗi nhãn. Đối với bộ phận thử nghiệm, chúng tôi áp dụng nhãn 157 từ chương trình Nội Bệnh của Hệ thống tiêu hóa I.C. Điều đó làm cho sự quan tâm đặc biệt quan trọng vì mô hình này có sự phân biệt giữa các bệnh tương tự. L https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list Ngôn', 'uz': "Biz ko'plab yozuvchi matn tahrirchini ko'plab-ketlik tarjima qilamiz, va internasjonal kasalliklarning bir tarkibi darajasida elektron tibbiy sahifalarni tahrirlash uchun ko'plab-ketlik tahrirchini anglatamiz. Biz ikkita elektron tibbiy sahifa haqida maʼlumotlar tarkibini ikkita tillarda ajratish tugmasi bilan ingliz, Ispanchadan va Shvetchadan kam manbalar bilan qoʻllamiz. Bizning modelimiz BERT Multi-tillar modelini (hususan Wikipedia, bu modeli ispancha va Shvetsiya tilida 104 tillari bilan o'rganish mumkin, eng katta Wikipedia tugmalari bilan o'rganish mumkin) tilni o'xshash mumkin. Har bir yorliq taʼminlovchi boʻlsa, modeli har bir yorliqning EHR tomonidan bir so'zning muhimligini hisoblash mumkin. Tekshirish jadvali uchun, biz ICD'ning Digestive System kasalliklarini 157 yordamida qo'llayapmiz. Bu model o'xshash kasalliklarni o'zgartirish kerak. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -tillar", 'nl': 'We introduceren een multi-label tekstclassificator met per label aandacht voor de classificatie van Elektronische Gezondheidsdossiers volgens de Internationale Classificatie van Ziekten. We passen het model toe op twee elektronische gezondheidsdossiers datasets met ontslagsamenvattingen in twee talen met minder middelen dan Engels, Spaans en Zweeds. Ons model maakt gebruik van het BERT Meertalige model (met name de Wikipedia, omdat het model is getraind met 104 talen, waaronder Spaans en Zweeds, met de grootste Wikipedia dumps) om de taalmodelleringsmogelijkheden in alle talen te delen. Met de aandacht per label kan het model de relevantie van elk woord uit de EHR berekenen voor de voorspelling van elk label. Voor het experimentele kader hanteren we 157 labels uit hoofdstuk XI Ziekten van het spijsverteringssysteem van de ICD, wat de aandacht vooral belangrijk maakt omdat het model onderscheid moet maken tussen soortgelijke ziekten. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -van-talen', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме многоетикетен текстов класификатор с внимание по етикет за класификацията на електронните здравни досиета съгласно Международната класификация на болестите. Прилагаме модела върху два набора данни от електронни здравни досиета с резюмета за освобождаване от отговорност на два езика с по-малко ресурси от английски, испански и шведски език. Нашият модел използва многоезичния модел (по-специално Уикипедия, тъй като моделът е обучен с 104 езика, включително испански и шведски, с най-големите дупки в Уикипедия), за да сподели възможностите за моделиране на езиците между отделните езици. С вниманието по етикет моделът може да изчисли релевантността на всяка дума от ЕХР към прогнозирането на всеки етикет. За експерименталната рамка прилагаме 157 етикета от глава ХI - Заболявания на храносмилателната система на МКД, което прави вниманието особено важно, тъй като моделът трябва да дискриминира подобни заболявания. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo višeetičnu klasifikaciju teksta s jednim etiketom pažnjom za klasifikaciju elektronskih zdravstvenih ploča prema Međunarodnoj klasifikaciji bolesti. Primjenjujemo model na dva elektronska zdravstvena registracija podataka s sažetkama otpuštanja na dva jezika s manjim resursima od engleskog, španjolskog i švedskog. Naš model utiče na BERT multijezički model (posebno na Wikipedia, jer je model obučen sa 104 jezika, uključujući španjolske i švedske, s najvećim bacanjem Wikipedije) kako bi dijelili sposobnosti za modeliranje jezika na jezicima. Uz pažnju po etiketi, model može izračunati važnost svake riječi iz EHR-a prema predviđanju svake etikete. Za eksperimentalni okvir primjenjujemo 157 etiketa iz poglavlja XI - bolesti Digestivnog sustava ICD-a, što čini pozornost posebno važnom jer model mora diskriminirati između sličnih bolesti. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - jezika', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en multilabel tekstklassificering med opmærksomhed pr. label til klassificering af elektroniske sundhedsoplysninger i henhold til den internationale klassificering af sygdomme. Vi anvender modellen på to datasæt med Decharge Summaries på to sprog med færre ressourcer end engelsk, spansk og svensk. Vores model udnytter BERT flersprogede model (specielt Wikipedia, da modellen er blevet uddannet med 104 sprog, herunder spansk og svensk, med de største Wikipedia dumps) til at dele sprogmodelleringsfunktionerne på tværs af sprogene. Med opmærksomheden pr. etiket kan modellen beregne relevansen af hvert ord fra EHR i forhold til forudsigelsen af hver etiket. Til forsøgsrammerne anvender vi 157 etiketter fra kapitel XI - Sygdomme i fordøjelsessystemet i ICD, hvilket gør opmærksomheden særlig vigtig, da modellen skal skelne mellem lignende sygdomme. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -af-sprog', 'de': 'Wir führen einen Multi-Label Textklassifikator mit Pro-Label Aufmerksamkeit für die Klassifizierung elektronischer Gesundheitsakten nach der Internationalen Klassifikation von Krankheiten ein. Wir wenden das Modell auf zwei Datensätze elektronischer Gesundheitsakten mit Entlastungszusammenfassungen in zwei Sprachen mit weniger Ressourcen als Englisch, Spanisch und Schwedisch an. Unser Modell nutzt das BERT Mehrsprachige Modell (insbesondere die Wikipedia, da das Modell mit 104-Sprachen, einschließlich Spanisch und Schwedisch, mit den größten Wikipedia-Dumps trainiert wurde), um die Sprachmodellierungsfähigkeiten in allen Sprachen zu teilen. Mit der Pro-Label Aufmerksamkeit kann das Modell die Relevanz jedes Wortes aus dem EHR für die Vorhersage jedes Labels berechnen. Für den experimentellen Rahmen verwenden wir 157 Labels aus Kapitel XI. Erkrankungen des Verdauungssystems der ICD, was die Aufmerksamkeit besonders wichtig macht, da das Modell zwischen ähnlichen Krankheiten unterscheiden muss. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list Sprachen', 'ko': '국제 질병의 분류에 따라 우리는 모든 라벨의 주의를 가진 다중 라벨 텍스트 분류기를 소개하여 전자 건강 기록에 사용되는 분류를 소개했다.우리는 두 개의 전자 건강 기록 데이터 집합에 이 모델을 응용했는데 그 중에서 퇴원 총결산은 두 가지 언어를 사용했고 자원은 영어, 스페인어, 스웨덴어보다 적었다.우리의 모델은 BERT 다중 언어 모델(특히 위키백과를 이용한다. 이 모델은 스페인어와 스웨덴어를 포함하여 104개 언어로 교육을 받았기 때문에 위키백과의 저장량이 가장 크다)을 다중 언어로 언어 모델링 능력을 공유할 수 있다.이 모델은 각 레이블에 대한 참고를 통해 EHR의 각 단어가 각 레이블에 대해 예측하는 연관성을 계산할 수 있습니다.실험 구조에서 우리는 제11장인 ICD 소화기 계통 질병 중 157개의 라벨을 응용했는데 이것은 모델이 비슷한 질병을 구분해야 하기 때문에 주목을 특히 중요하다.1https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list- 언어', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan klasifikasi teks multi-label dengan perhatian per-label untuk klasifikasi rekaman kesehatan elektronik menurut Klasifikasi Penyakit Internasional. We apply the model on two Electronic Health Records datasets with Discharge Summaries in two languages with fewer resources than English, Spanish and Swedish.  Model kami menggunakan model berbilang bahasa BERT (khususnya Wikipedia, sebagai model telah dilatih dengan 104 bahasa, termasuk bahasa Spanyol dan Swedia, dengan dumps terbesar Wikipedia) untuk berbagi kemampuan model bahasa di seluruh bahasa. Dengan perhatian per label, model dapat menghitung relevan setiap kata dari EHR menuju prediksi setiap label. Untuk cadangan percobaan, kami menerapkan 157 label dari Bab XI - penyakit Sistem Digestif ICD, yang membuat perhatian khusus penting karena model harus diskriminasi antara penyakit yang sama. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages', 'fa': 'ما یک متن متن چندین برچسب را معرفی می\u200cکنیم با توجه به هر برچسب برای برچسب برچسب\u200cهای ضبط سلامتی الکترونیک بر اساس برچسب\u200cهای بیماری بیماری بیماری بیماری. ما مدل را روی دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای سلامتی الکترونیک با جمعه\u200cهای جدا کردن در دو زبان با کمتر منابع از انگلیسی، اسپانیایی و سوئدی استفاده می\u200cکنیم. مدل ما مدل زیادی زبان BERT را (مخصوصا ویکیپیدیا) به عنوان مدل با 104 زبان آموزش داده شده است، شامل اسپانیایی و سوئدی، با بزرگترین اندازه\u200cهای ویکیپیدیا) برای تقسیم کردن توانایی\u200cهای مدل زبان در زبانها. با توجه به هر نقاشی، مدل می تواند اثر هر کلمه از EHR به پیش بینی هر نقاشی را محاسبه کند. برای چهارچوب آزمایشی، ما 157 نقاشی از بخش XI را استفاده می کنیم - بیماری سیستم دیگری ICD، که توجه را به ویژه مهم می کند که مدل باید بین بیماری مشابه جدا شود. ۱ https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages', 'sw': 'We introduce a multi-label text classifier with per-label attention for the classification of Electronic Health Records according to the International Classification of Diseases.  Tunatumia mifano kwenye taarifa mbili za Takwimu za Afya ya Electronic yenye Mkutano wa Udhibiti kwa lugha mbili yenye rasilimali ndogo zaidi ya Kiingereza, Kihispania na Kiswahili. Mradi wetu umetumia mtindo wa lugha nyingi wa BERT (hasa wa Wikipedia, kama mfano huo umefundishwa kwa lugha 104, ikiwa ni pamoja na Kihispania na Kiswahili, na vifaa vikubwa vikubwa vya Wikipedia) kushirikiana uwezo wa mifano ya lugha katika lugha zote. Kwa mtazamo wa kila label, mwelekeo unaweza kuhesabu umuhimu wa kila neno kutoka EHR kuelekea kutabiri kila label. Kwa mfumo wa majaribio, tunatumia maabara 157 kutoka Chapter XI - Magonjwa ya Mfumo wa Digesti wa ICD, ambayo inafanya hisia za muhimu hasa kwa sababu model inapaswa kutofautisha kati ya magonjwa yanayofanana na hayo. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -ya lugha', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n multi-etiket teks klassifiseerder met per-etiket aandag vir die klassifikasie van Elektroniese gesondrekord volgens die internasionale klassifikasie van gesondighede. Ons het die model aangepas op twee elektroniese gesondheidsopneem datastelle met uitlaai opsommings in twee tale met minder hulpbronne as Engels, Spaanse en Sweedse. Ons model verwyder die BERT Multilingual Model (spesifieke die Wikipedia, want die model is opgelei met 104 tale, insluitend Spaanse en Sweedse, met die grootste Wikipedia dumpe) om die taal modellering kapasiteite te deel oor die tale. Met die per-etiket aandag kan die model die relevante van elke woord van die EHR na die voorskou van elke etiket bereken. Vir die eksperimentele raamwerk, toewend ons 157 etikette van Hoofstuk XI - Verlossing van die Digestiewe Stelsel van die ICD, wat die aandag besonder belangrik maak as die model moet diskrimineer tussen gelyke siektes. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - of- languages", 'tr': "Biz halkara hasaplaryň klasifikasyna görä birnäçe etiketli metin klasifikasyny bilen tanyşdyrýarys. Biz bu nusgany iki dilde, Iňlisçe, Ispanýolça we Şwediýadan az çeşmeler bolan iki Elektronik Saýlaw Kaynaklarynda geçiririk. Biziň nusgymyz BERT köp dilli nusgasyny (özellikle Wikipedia, bu nusgasy 104 dil bilen okalýar, espanyol we šwedççe, iň uly Wikipediýa dumplary bilen) diller içinde modelleme ukyplaryny paýlaşmak üçin bejerýär. Her etiket dikkatini kullanarak, Model her kelime EHR'den her etiket tahminine ulaşabilir. Denminatyň çerçevesi üçin biz XI kapitulyndan 157 etiketleri uygulapdyk -ICD Digestiv Sisteminiň hasaplaryny, nusga ýaly hasaplaryň arasynda paýlaşmaly däldir. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages", 'am': 'በአለምአቀፍ ደዌዎች መጻሕፍት የተባለው የአሌክትሮኒካዊ ጤና መጻሕፍት ለመግለጽ በብዙ-label የጽሑፍ መጻሕፍትን ለማቀናቀል እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በሁለት ቋንቋ ላይ የኢሌክትሮኒክ ጤና መዝገብ ማድረጊያውን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በቋንቋዎች ላይ የብERT ብልቋንቋ ሞዴል (በተለየ Wikipedia፣ ስፓኒስታን እና ስዊድንም በተለይ ትልቁ Wikipedia dumps) ቋንቋዎችን በቋንቋዎች ላይ ምሳሌዎችን ማሳየት በ104 ቋንቋዎች የተማረ ነው፡፡ በሁሉም አካባቢ ተጠቃሚ፣ ሞዴል ከEHR የሁሉን ቃላት ግንኙነት ከሁሉም ምልክት ለመቀጠል ይችላል፡፡ ለፈተናው ፍሬም 157 ምልክቶችን ከኤክስቲ የዲጂስቴን ድምፅ እናደርጋለን፡፡ 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list ቋንቋዎች', 'bn': 'ইন্টারন্যাশনাল ক্লাসিক অফ রোগের অনুসারে ইলেক্ট্রোনিক স্বাস্থ্য রেকর্ডের ব্যবহারের জন্য প্রতি লেবেলেটের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে আমরা এক বহ আমরা দুই ইলেক্ট্রোনিক স্বাস্থ্য রেকর্ডের ডাটাসেটে মডেল প্রয়োগ করি দুই ভাষায় ডিস্কার্জ সামার্মের সাথে ইংরেজি, স্প্যানি আমাদের মডেল বিবের্ট মাল্টিভাষায় মডেল (বিশেষ করে উইকিপিডিয়া, যেমন মডেল ১০৪ ভাষায় প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে, যার মধ্যে স্প্যানিশ এবং সুইডিয়া, যার মধ্যে সবচেয়ে ব প্রতি লেবেলের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি দিয়ে মডেল ইএইচআর থেকে প্রত্যেক শব্দের প্রভাব গণনা করতে পারে প্রতি লেবেলের ভবিষ্যতের প্ For the experimental framework, we apply 157 labels from Chapter XI - Diseases of the Digestive System of the ICD, which makes the attention especially important as the model has to discriminate between similar diseases.  ১ https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - ভাষা', 'az': 'Biz bir √ßoxlu etiketli m…ôtn klasifikatńĪnńĪ, h…ôr etiketli m…ôlumatlarńĪn elektronik SańülńĪq KayńĪtlarńĪnńĪn klasifikasyonuna g√∂r…ô, uluslararasńĪ x…ôst…ôlikl…ôrin klasifikasyonuna g√∂r…ô t…ôŇükil edirik. Biz bu modeli ńįngilizce, ńįspanyolca v…ô ńįsve√ßd…ôn daha az kaynaklńĪ iki dild…ô Discharge Summaries il…ô iki Elektronik SańülńĪk Records veri qurńüularńĪna istifad…ô edirik. Modelimiz BERT √ßoxlu dil modelini (√∂zl…ôrin…ô d…ô Wikipedia kimi, modeli 104 dill…ô t…ôhsil edildiyi kimi ńįspanyol v…ô ńįsve√ßdi il…ô, …ôn b√∂y√ľk Wikipedia dumplarńĪ il…ô) dil modellik qabiliyy…ôtl…ôrini dill…ôrin arasńĪnda paylaŇümaq √ľ√ß√ľn t…ôhsil edir. H…ôr etiketli dikkati il…ô, model h…ôr s√∂z√ľn EHR t…ôr…ôfind…ôn h…ôr etiketin √∂ng√∂r√ľn√ľŇü√ľn…ô q…ôd…ôr √ßoxluńüunu hesabla bil…ôr. Eksperiment √ßarŇüńĪńüńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn XI baŇülńĪńüńĪndan 157 etiketl…ôr istifad…ô edirik - ICD Digestive Sisteminin x…ôst…ôliyi, bu modeli b…ônz…ôr x…ôst…ôl…ôrd…ôn ayńĪrmaq lazńĪmdńĪr. 1" (msgctxt: "panel:showusername") to "1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - of-languages', 'ca': "Introduïm un classificador de textos multietiquetats amb atenció per etiqueta per la classificació de registres electrònics de salut segons la Classificació Internacional de Malalties. Aplicam el model en dos conjunts de dades Electronic Health Records amb Resumes de Descàrrega en dues llengües amb menys recursos que l'anglès, l'espanyol i el suec. El nostre model aprofita el model multilingüe BERT (específicament la Wikipedia, com el model ha estat entrenat amb 104 llengües, incloent l'espanyol i el suec, amb els grans bots de Wikipedia) per compartir les capacitats de modelació de llengües a través de les llengües. Amb l'atenció per etiqueta, el model pot calcular la pertinencia de cada paraula de l'EHR cap a la predicció de cada etiqueta. Per al marc experimental, aplicam 157 etiquetes del Capítol XI - Malalties del Sistema Digestiu de la DCI, que fa especial atenció perquè el model ha de discriminar entre malalties similars. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages", 'cs': 'Představujeme víceznačkový textový klasifikátor s pozorností pro klasifikaci elektronických zdravotních záznamů podle Mezinárodní klasifikace onemocnění. Model aplikujeme na dva soubory elektronických zdravotních záznamů s propuštěním ve dvou jazycích s menším množstvím zdrojů než angličtina, španělština a švédština. Náš model využívá vícejazyčný model BERT (konkrétně Wikipedii, protože model byl trénován s 104 jazyky, včetně španělštiny a švédštiny, s největšími výpisy Wikipedie), aby sdílel možnosti modelování jazyků napříč jazyky. S pozorností na jednotlivé štítky může model vypočítat relevanci každého slova z EHR pro predikci každého štítku. Pro experimentální rámec používáme 157 etikety z kapitoly XI. onemocnění trávicího systému ICD, což dělá pozornost zvláště důležitou, protože model musí rozlišovat podobné onemocnění. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list jazykové', 'sq': 'Ne futim një klasifikues teksti me shumë etiketa me vëmendje për çdo etiketë për klasifikimin e Rekordeve Elektronike të Shëndetësisë sipas klasifikimit ndërkombëtar të sëmundjeve. Ne e aplikojmë model in në dy grupe të dhënash të Rekordeve Elektronike të Shëndetësisë me përmbledhje të shkarkimit në dy gjuhë me më pak burime se anglisht, spanjoll dhe suedez. Our model leverages the BERT Multilingual model (specifically the Wikipedia, as the model have been trained with 104 languages, including Spanish and Swedish, with the largest Wikipedia dumps) to share the language modelling capabilities across the languages.  With the per-label attention, the model can compute the relevance of each word from the EHR towards the prediction of each label.  For the experimental framework, we apply 157 labels from Chapter XI - Diseases of the Digestive System of the ICD, which makes the attention especially important as the model has to discriminate between similar diseases.  1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք բազմաթիվ պիտակների տեքստի դասակարգիչ, որտեղ յուրաքանչյուր պիտակ ուշադրություն է դարձնում առողջապահության էլեկտրոնական ձայնագրությունների դասակարգի համար ըստ հիվանդությունների միջազգային դասակարգի: Մենք կիրառում ենք մոդելը երկու էլեկտրոնական առողջապահության ձայնագրությունների տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որոնք երկու լեզուներում ավելի քիչ ռեսուրսներ ունեն, քան անգլերենը, իսպաներենը և շվեդիան: Մեր մոդելը օգտագործում է BER-ի բազմալեզու մոդելը (հատկապես Վիքիփեդիան, քանի որ մոդելը կրթություն է ստացել 104լեզուներով, ներառյալ իսպաներեն և շուդդական լեզուներով, ամենամեծ Վիքիփեդիայի թաղանթներով) լեզուների մոդելման ունակությունների կիս Մոդելը կարող է հաշվարկել EHR-ից յուրաքանչյուր բառի կարևորությունը յուրաքանչյուր պիտակ կանխատեսելու համար: Փորձարկվող շրջանակի համար մենք կիրառում ենք 157 պիտակ ինտերնետային համակարգի հոգեբանական հիվանդություններից, որոնք ուշադրությունը հատկապես կարևոր են դարձնում, քանի որ մոդելը պետք է տարբերակի նման հիվանդությունների միջև: 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages', 'fi': 'Otamme käyttöön kansainvälisen tautiluokituksen mukaiseen sähköisten terveysrekisterien luokitteluun monimerkkisen tekstiluokituksen. Sovellamme mallia kahteen sähköiseen terveysrekisteriaineistoon, joissa on vastuuvapauden yhteenveto kahdella kielellä vähemmän resursseja kuin englanniksi, espanjaksi ja ruotsiksi. Mallimme hyödyntää BERT Multilingual -mallia (erityisesti Wikipediaa, koska mallia on koulutettu 104 kielellä, mukaan lukien espanja ja ruotsi, joilla on suurimmat Wikipedia-dumpit) jakamaan kielimallinnusmahdollisuudet eri kielillä. Merkintökohtaisella huomiolla malli voi laskea kunkin sanan merkityksen EHR:stä kunkin merkinnän ennustamiseen. Kokeelliseen viitekehykseen sovelletaan 157 merkkiä ICD:n luvusta XI - Diseases of the Digestive System -taudit, mikä tekee huomion erityisen tärkeäksi, koska mallin on eroteltava samankaltaisia sairauksia. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages', 'et': 'Tutvustame elektrooniliste terviseandmete klassifitseerimiseks rahvusvahelise haigusklassifikatsiooni alusel mitmemärgiselist tekstiklassifitseerijat, millel on tähelepanu märgiste kaupa. Me rakendame mudelit kahel elektroonilisel tervisekogumil, millel on heakskiidu andmise kokkuvõtted kahes keeles vähem ressursse kui inglise, hispaania ja rootsi keeles. Meie mudel kasutab BERT mitmekeelset mudelit (täpsemalt Vikipeediat, sest mudelit on koolitatud 104 keeles, sealhulgas hispaania ja rootsi keeles, kus Wikipedia dumpingud on suurimad), et jagada keele modelleerimise võimalusi kõigis keeltes. Märgistuse tähelepanu põhjal saab mudel arvutada iga sõna asjakohasuse EHR-ist iga märgise prognoosimisel. Eksperimentaalses raamistikus rakendame 157 märgistust ICD XI peatükist "Seedesüsteemi haigused", mis muudab tähelepanu eriti oluliseks, sest mudel peab diskrimineerima sarnaseid haigusi. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list keeltest', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo višeetičnu klasifikaciju teksta sa pažnjom po etiketi za klasifikaciju elektronskih zdravstvenih ploča prema Međunarodnoj klasifikaciji bolesti. Mi primjenjujemo model na dva elektronska zdravstvena registracija podataka sa sažetkama otpuštanja na dva jezika sa manjim resursima od engleskog, španjolskog i švedskog. Naš model utiče na BERT multijezički model (posebno na Wikipedia, jer je model obučen sa 104 jezika, uključujući španjolske i švedske, sa najvećim bacanjem Wikipedije) da dijele sposobnosti za modeliranje jezika na jezicima. Uz pažnju po etiketi, model može izračunati relevantnost svake riječi iz EHR prema predviđanju svake etikete. Za eksperimentalni okvir primjenjujemo 157 etiketa iz poglavlja XI - bolesti Digestivnog sustava ICD-a, što čini pažnju posebno važnom jer model mora diskriminirati između sličnih bolesti. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list - jezika', 'jv': "We first met with a multi-label text Awak dhéwé ngubah model karo data sing nyebutaké duruh éwé ning larangan 'Debharge', 'Spanish' lan Sudhis. model dhéwé nggawe modèl BERT Multi Lingui (ngomong kapan ning wipedia), kaya model sing dituruti cara-cara éwé karo nganggo cara-cara sing itlanjut cara-cara sing itlanjut karo spanyol lan Suwiti, lan padha dump wipedia sing gawé gawe perusahaan anyar nggawe dilané. Samsul kanggo nggawe barang pancen dumadhi, kéné gunakake etiket nang Kapit XI - Rasane Sistem Digester sing sak IDD, sing wis ngawe barang nggawe barang apik dhéwé, padha bakal terus nggawe layang seneng model iso disimperané karo sak usul sing sumulakno. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-language", 'ha': "We introduce a multi-label text classifier with per-label attention for the classification of Electronic Health Records according to the International Classification of Diseases.  Tuna shirya shirin ayukan masu biyu na Electronic Head Registers data set with Discharge Summaries in biyu languages with kaɗan resource mafi ƙaranci daga Ingiriya, Isbanish da Iswidish. Tuduniyarmu yana ƙara misalin mulki-lingui na BERT (hususann Wikimedia, kamar an sanar da misalin ayuka 104, ikin Isbanish da Iswidishki, da masu girma wa Wikimedia) dõmin ya share abincin masu motsi da misalin harshen cikin zimanmu. Bayan taƙaitãwa ga kowace-label, shirin ya iya ƙidãya muhimmin wa kõwane magana daga EHR zuwa kuma ya yi birnin kõwace label. Ko dõmin firam masu jarraba, muna amfani da alama 157 daga Chap XI - Disastar na Digest na ICD, wanda ke sanya muhimu ga muhimmin kama da misalin ya kamata a yi rarraba tsakanin kasar nau'i kamar haka. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -harshen", 'sk': 'Za klasifikacijo elektronskih zdravstvenih evidenc v skladu z Mednarodno klasifikacijo bolezni uvajamo več oznak besedilnega klasifikatorja s pozornostjo na oznako. Model uporabljamo na dveh naborih podatkov elektronskih zdravstvenih evidenc s povzetki razrešnice v dveh jezikih z manj virov kot angleščina, španščina in švedščina. Naš model uporablja BERT večjezični model (zlasti Wikipedijo, saj je bil model usposobljen s 104 jeziki, vključno s španščino in švedščino, z največjimi Wikipedijskimi smetmi), da deli zmogljivosti za modeliranje jezikov v vseh jezikih. S pozornostjo na oznako lahko model izračuna pomembnost vsake besede iz EHR za napoved vsake oznake. Za eksperimentalni okvir uporabljamo 157 oznak iz poglavja XI – Bolezni prebavnega sistema ICD, zaradi česar je pozornost še posebej pomembna, saj mora model razlikovati podobne bolezni. 1  https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -jezikov', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מסווג טקסט רב-תווים עם תשומת לב לכל תווית לסווג של רשומות בריאות אלקטרוניות לפי הסווג הבינלאומי של מחלות. אנחנו משתמשים במודל על שני קבוצות נתונים של רשומות בריאות אלקטרוניות עם סדרות השחרור בשתי שפות עם פחות משאבים מאנגלית, ספרדית ושוודית. המודל שלנו מנצל את המודל הרב-שפתי BERT (במיוחד ויקיפדיה, כפי שהמודל הוכשר ב-104 שפות, כולל ספרדית ושוודית, עם השריפות הגדולות ביותר בוויקיפדיה) כדי לחלוק את יכולות הדוגמנים של שפות ברחבי השפות. עם תשומת לב לכל תווית, המודל יכול לחשב את הרלוונטיות של כל מילה מהEHR לכיוון חיזוי של כל תווית. למסגרת הניסויים, אנחנו משתמשים 157 תוויות מפרק XI - מחלות מערכת הדגיסטיבית של ICD, מה שעושה את תשומת הלב חשובה במיוחד כיוון שהמודל צריך להבדיל בין מחלות דומות. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -של שפות', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་རྣམས་ནང་མིང་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་གེ་དམིགས་བསལ་སྟངས་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འགྱུར་བའི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་བྱས། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱིས་BERT Multilingual Model(īpaši the Wikipedia, as the model have been trained with 104 languages, including Spanish and Swedish, with the largest Wikipedia dumps) to share the language modeling capabilities across the languages. གཟུགས་རིས་མིང་ལ་ཞིབ་པ་དང་མིང་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་རེ་རེ་རེའི་གནད་དོན་རྟོགས་ཐུབ། For the experimental framework, we apply 157 labels from Chapter XI - Diseases of the Digestive System of the ICD, which makes the attention especially important as the model has to discriminate between similar diseases. 1 https://github.com/google-research/bert/blob/master/multilingual.md#list -of-languages'}
{'en': 'Can the Transformer Be Used as a Drop-in Replacement for RNNs in Text-Generating GANs?', 'ar': 'هل يمكن استخدام المحول كبديل للإسقاط لـ RNNs في شبكات GAN لتوليد النص؟', 'es': '¿Se puede utilizar el transformador como un reemplazo directo de las RNN en las GAN que generan texto?', 'pt': 'O Transformer pode ser usado como um substituto para RNNs em GANs de geração de texto?', 'fr': 'Le transformateur peut-il être utilisé comme remplacement direct pour les RNN dans les réseaux de génération de texte\xa0?', 'ru': 'Может ли трансформатор использоваться в качестве дроп-ин-замены для RNN в текстогенерирующих GAN?', 'zh': '转换器文本成 GAN 中 RNN 直换否?', 'ja': '変圧器は、テキスト生成GANのRNNのドロップインリプレースメントとして使用できますか？', 'hi': 'क्या ट्रांसफॉर्मर का उपयोग टेक्स्ट-जनरेटिंग जीएएन में आरएनएन के लिए ड्रॉप-इन रिप्लेसमेंट के रूप में किया जा सकता है?', 'ga': 'An féidir an Trasfhoirmeoir a Úsáid mar Ionad Buail Isteach do RNNanna i nGiniúint Téacs-GAN?', 'ka': 'შეიძლება ტრანფორმეტრის გამოყენება როგორც გადატანა RNN- ს ტექსტის დამყენებაში?', 'hu': 'Használható-e a transzformátor az RNN-ek legördülő cseréje a szöveggeneráló GAN-okban?', 'el': 'Μπορεί ο μετασχηματιστής να χρησιμοποιηθεί ως εναλλακτική αντικατάσταση για τα RNN σε ΓΝΑ που παράγουν κείμενο;', 'it': 'Il trasformatore può essere utilizzato come sostituto drop-in per RNN in GAN per la generazione di testo?', 'lt': 'Ar transformatorius gali būti naudojamas kaip įrašymo pakaitalas DNR teksto generuojančiose GAN?', 'kk': 'Трансформациясы Мәтін құру GAN- лердегі RNN- лердің алмастыру үшін қолданылады ба?', 'mk': 'Може ли трансформаторот да се користи како замена за влез за РНН во ГАН генерирачки текст?', 'ms': 'Boleh Pengubah digunakan sebagai Ganti-Masuk untuk RNN dalam GAN Menjana Teks?', 'ml': 'ടെക്സ്റ്റര്\u200d ജിയാന്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d RNNs-നുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളായി മാറ്റുന്നതിന് ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുമോ?', 'no': 'Kan transformereren brukast som utbyttet for RNN i tekstlagar GAN?', 'pl': 'Czy transformator może być używany jako zastępca RNN w GAN generujących tekst?', 'ro': 'Transformatorul poate fi folosit ca înlocuitor drop-in pentru RNN-uri în GAN-uri care generează text?', 'sr': 'Može li Transformer biti korišten kao zamjena za zamjenu za RNN u GAN za proizvodnju teksta?', 'mt': 'It-Trasformer jista’ jintuża bħala sostituzzjoni ta’ Drop-in għall-RNNs f’GANs li jiġġeneraw it-test?', 'mn': 'Текст үүсгэгч GAN-д RNN-ын орлуулах үед Трансформатор хэрэглэгдэж болох уу?', 'so': 'Turjubaalka ayaa looga isticmaali karaa sidii Drop-in-Replacement for RNNs in Text-Generation GANs?', 'sv': 'Kan transformatorn användas som en drop-in ersättning för RNN i textgenererande GAN?', 'si': 'පාළුවන් නිර්මාණය කරපු GAN වල RNN වලට ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්ද?', 'ta': 'மாற்றி GANs உரை உருவாக்கும் உரையில் RNNs மாற்றுமாற்றியாக பயன்படுத்த முடியுமா?', 'ur': 'Can the Transformer be used as a Drop-in Replacement for RNN in Text-Generating GANs?', 'vi': 'Có thể tạo biến hình sẽ được sử dụng như thay thế RNN trong các giải phát Văn bản không?', 'uz': 'Comment', 'bg': 'Може ли трансформаторът да се използва като заместител на РНН в генериращи текст газове?', 'nl': "Kan de transformator worden gebruikt als drop-in vervanging voor RNN's in tekst-genererende GAN's?", 'da': "Kan transformatoren bruges som en drop-in erstatning for RNN'er i tekstgenererende GAN'er?", 'hr': 'Može li Transformer biti korišten kao zamjena za zamjenu za RNN u GAN za proizvodnju teksta?', 'de': 'Kann der Transformator als Drop-in-Ersatz für RNNs in textgenerierenden GANs verwendet werden?', 'id': 'Bisakah Transformer digunakan sebagai pengganti drop-in untuk RNN dalam GAN-Generasi Teks?', 'ko': '텍스트 생성 GAN에서 변환기는 RNN의 대체품이 될 수 있습니까?', 'fa': 'می\u200cتواند تغییردهنده به عنوان جایگزینی درآمده برای RNN در ساختن GAN متن استفاده شود؟', 'sw': 'Je, Wafsiri huyo anaweza kutumika kama Mahadilisho ya NNN katika Uzalishaji wa GAN?', 'tr': "Ullançy Adyny RNN'iň Iň Gaýşartýan Täze Gaýd Edilmek üçin ullanylabilir?", 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'hy': 'Կարո՞ղ է վերածիչը օգտագործվել որպես ներքևի փոխարինում տեքստի ստեղծող ԳԱՆ-ների համար:', 'af': "Kan die Transformeerder Gebruik word as 'n Drop- in Vervang vir RNN in Teks- Genereering GAN?", 'az': "M톛tn Yap캼c캼 GAN'l톛rd톛 RNN'l톛rin 톛v톛zi olaraq Transformer istifad톛 edil톛 bil톛rmi?", 'sq': 'Can the Transformer Be Used as a Drop-in Replacement for RNNs in Text-Generating GANs?', 'ca': "Pot ser utilitzat el Transformer com a substitució d'entrada per RNN en GAN generadors de text?", 'cs': 'Může být transformátor použit jako Drop-in náhrada RNN v textových GAN?', 'bn': 'টেক্সট-তৈরি করা GAN-এর প্রতিস্থাপনের জন্য কি ট্রান্সফার্নার ব্যবহার করা যাবে?', 'bs': 'Može li Transformer biti korišćen kao zamjena za propuštenje RNN u GAN za proizvodnju teksta?', 'et': 'Kas transformaatorit saab kasutada teksti genereerivates gaasides RNN-ide asendusena?', 'fi': 'Voidaanko muuntajaa käyttää RNN:ien korvaajana tekstiä tuottavissa GAN:issä?', 'sk': 'Ali se lahko transformator uporablja kot nadomestilo za RNN v GAN-ih, ki ustvarjajo besedilo?', 'jv': 'Kon Transformer Gak Geusul dumateng dumateng pangan dumateng dumateng dumateng dumateng dumateng DNN dumateng gambar Teks ?', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཚིག་ཡིག་གསར་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་GANs ནང་གི་RNN ལ་བསུབ་པའི་ཚབ་བཅུག་སྟངས་ལ་སྤྱོད་དགོས་སམ', 'he': 'האם המעבר יכול להשתמש בתור מחליף של RNN בגנ"א לייצור טקסט?'}
{'en': 'In this paper we address the problem of fine-tuned text generation with a limited computational budget. For that, we use a well-performing text generative adversarial network (GAN) architecture-Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), and attempted a drop-in replacement of the LSTM layer with a self-attention-based Transformer layer in order to leverage their efficiency. The resulting Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) was evaluated for performance, quality and diversity of generated text and stability. Computational experiments suggested that a transformer architecture is unable to drop-in replace the LSTM layer, under-performing during the pre-training phase and undergoing a complete mode collapse during the GAN tuning phase. Our results suggest that the transformer architecture need to be adapted before it can be used as a replacement for RNNs in text-generating GANs.', 'es': 'En este artículo abordamos el problema de la generación de texto ajustada con un presupuesto computacional limitado. Para ello, utilizamos una arquitectura de red adversaria generativa de texto (GAN) de buen rendimiento: Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), e intentamos un reemplazo inmediato de la capa LSTM por una capa Transformer basada en la autoatención para aprovechar su eficiencia. El DPGAN de Autoatención (SADPGAN) resultante se evaluó para determinar el rendimiento, la calidad y la diversidad del texto generado y la estabilidad. Los experimentos computacionales sugirieron que una arquitectura de transformador no puede reemplazar directamente la capa LSTM, tiene un rendimiento inferior durante la fase de preentrenamiento y sufre un colapso de modo completo durante la fase de ajuste de GAN. Nuestros resultados sugieren que la arquitectura del transformador debe adaptarse antes de que pueda usarse como reemplazo de las RNN en las GAN que generan texto.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo abordamos o problema da geração de texto ajustado com um orçamento computacional limitado. Para isso, usamos uma arquitetura de rede adversária generativa de texto (GAN) de bom desempenho - GAN de promoção da diversidade (DPGAN) e tentamos uma substituição imediata da camada LSTM por uma camada Transformer baseada em autoatenção para aproveitar sua eficiência. O DPGAN de Auto-Atenção resultante (SADPGAN) foi avaliado quanto ao desempenho, qualidade e diversidade do texto gerado e estabilidade. Experimentos computacionais sugeriram que uma arquitetura de transformador é incapaz de substituir a camada LSTM, apresentando baixo desempenho durante a fase de pré-treinamento e sofrendo um colapso de modo completo durante a fase de ajuste de GAN. Nossos resultados sugerem que a arquitetura do transformador precisa ser adaptada antes que possa ser usada como um substituto para RNNs em GANs geradores de texto.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة نتناول مشكلة إنشاء نص دقيق بميزانية حسابية محدودة. لذلك ، نستخدم بنية شبكة خصومة نصية (GAN) جيدة الأداء - تعزيز التنوع GAN (DPGAN) ، وحاولنا استبدال طبقة LSTM بطبقة محول قائمة على الانتباه الذاتي من أجل الاستفادة كفاءتهم. تم تقييم DPGAN الناتج عن الاهتمام الذاتي (SADPGAN) من حيث الأداء والجودة وتنوع النص الذي تم إنشاؤه والاستقرار. اقترحت التجارب الحسابية أن بنية المحولات غير قادرة على استبدال طبقة LSTM ، وأداء ضعيف أثناء مرحلة ما قبل التدريب وتخضع لانهيار وضع كامل أثناء مرحلة ضبط GAN. تشير نتائجنا إلى أن بنية المحولات تحتاج إلى تكييف قبل استخدامها كبديل لشبكات RNN في شبكات GAN لتوليد النص.', 'zh': '在本文中,我们决定了有限的计算下微调文本生成的。 是以用性良文本,抗网络(GAN)架构 - 多样性促GAN(DPGAN),试以基于自注之Transformer,直代LSTM层,以利其效率。 由此观之DPGAN(SADPGAN)性,质成之多样性,稳定性之评估。 计实验明,变压器架构不可插LSTM,于预练不佳,于GAN调谐阶段经历全式崩溃。 臣等考结果表明,变压器架构须调整,然后可以文本成GAN中RNN之替代品。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम एक सीमित कम्प्यूटेशनल बजट के साथ ठीक-ठाक पाठ पीढ़ी की समस्या को संबोधित करते हैं। इसके लिए, हम एक अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन पाठ उत्पादक प्रतिकूल नेटवर्क (GAN) आर्किटेक्चर का उपयोग करते हैं - विविधता-प्रचार GAN (DPGAN), और उनकी दक्षता का लाभ उठाने के लिए एक आत्म-ध्यान-आधारित ट्रांसफॉर्मर परत के साथ LSTM परत के ड्रॉप-इन प्रतिस्थापन का प्रयास करते हैं। परिणामी स्व-ध्यान DPGAN (SADPGAN) का मूल्यांकन प्रदर्शन, गुणवत्ता और उत्पन्न पाठ और स्थिरता की विविधता के लिए किया गया था। कम्प्यूटेशनल प्रयोगों ने सुझाव दिया कि एक ट्रांसफॉर्मर आर्किटेक्चर एलएसटीएम परत को बदलने में असमर्थ है, पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण चरण के दौरान अंडर-परफॉर्मिंग और जीएएन ट्यूनिंग चरण के दौरान एक पूर्ण मोड पतन से गुजर रहा है। हमारे परिणाम बताते हैं कि ट्रांसफॉर्मर आर्किटेक्चर को अनुकूलित करने की आवश्यकता है इससे पहले कि इसे टेक्स्ट-जनरेटिंग जीएएन में आरएनएन के प्रतिस्थापन के रूप में उपयोग किया जा सके।', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous abordons le problème de la génération de texte affinée avec un budget de calcul limité. Pour cela, nous utilisons une architecture de réseau antagoniste génératif de texte (GAN) performante - le GAN favorisant la diversité (DPGAN), et avons tenté de remplacer la couche LSTM par une couche Transformer basée sur l'auto-attention afin de tirer parti de leur efficacité. Le DPGAN auto-attention résultant (SADPGAN) a été évalué en termes de performance, de qualité et de diversité du texte généré et de stabilité. Des expériences informatiques ont suggéré qu'une architecture de transformateur est incapable de remplacer la couche LSTM, qu'elle est sous-performante pendant la phase de pré-apprentissage et qu'elle subit un effondrement complet du mode pendant la phase de réglage GAN. Nos résultats suggèrent que l'architecture du transformateur doit être adaptée avant de pouvoir être utilisée en remplacement des RNN dans les GaN générateurs de texte.", 'ja': '本稿では、限られた計算予算で微調整されたテキスト生成の問題について述べる。そのために、優れたパフォーマンスのテキスト生成対抗ネットワーク（ GAN ）アーキテクチャ-多様性促進GAN （ DPGAN ）を使用し、LSTMレイヤーを自己注目ベースのトランスフォーマーレイヤーにドロップイン交換して、その効率性を活用しようとしました。得られた自己応答ＤＰＧＡＮ （ ＳＡＤＰＧＡＮ ）を、生成されたテキストの性能、品質、及び多様性ならびに安定性について評価した。計算実験では、変圧器アーキテクチャは、LSTM層をドロップインで置き換えることができず、事前訓練段階ではパフォーマンスが低下し、GANチューニング段階では完全なモード崩壊を経験することが示唆されました。私たちの結果は、変圧器アーキテクチャをテキスト生成GANのRNNの代替として使用する前に適応させる必要があることを示唆しています。', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы рассмотрим проблему точной настройки генерации текста с ограниченным вычислительным бюджетом. Для этого мы используем хорошо функционирующую генеративную архитектуру состязательной сети (GAN) - DIVERSITY-PROMOTING GAN (DPGAN), и попытались заменить слой LSTM слоем Трансформатора на основе самовнимания, чтобы повысить их эффективность. Результирующее самовосстановление DPGAN (SADPGAN) оценивалось на производительность, качество и разнообразие сгенерированного текста и стабильность. Вычислительные эксперименты предположили, что архитектура трансформатора не в состоянии заменить слой LSTM, недовыполняя во время фазы предварительного обучения и подвергаясь полному коллапсу режима во время фазы настройки GAN. Наши результаты показывают, что архитектура трансформатора должна быть адаптирована, прежде чем она может быть использована в качестве замены RNN в текстогенерирующих GAN.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo tugaimid aghaidh ar fhadhb na giniúna mionchoigeartaithe téacs le buiséad teoranta ríomhaireachtúil. Ar an ábhar sin, bainimid úsáid as ailtireacht líonra sáraíochta ginte téacs (GAN) a fheidhmíonn go maith - GAN chun Éagsúlacht a Chur Chun Cinn (DPGAN), agus rinneamar iarracht ciseal Claochladáin féin-aird a chur in ionad an chiseal LSTM le sraith Claochladáin féin-aird a thabhairt ar ais chun giaráil. a n-éifeachtúlacht. Rinneadh measúnú ar an DPGAN Féin-Airde (SADPGAN) mar thoradh air maidir le feidhmíocht, cáilíocht agus éagsúlacht an téacs ginte agus cobhsaíocht. Mhol turgnaimh ríomhaireachtúla nach bhfuil ailtireacht claochladáin in ann an ciseal LSTM a chur in ionad an chiseal LSTM, tearcfheidhmíocht le linn na céime réamh-oiliúna agus go raibh sé ag titim i mód iomlán le linn chéim tiúnta GAN. Tugann ár dtorthaí le fios gur gá ailtireacht an chlaochladáin a oiriúnú sular féidir é a úsáid in ionad RNNanna i GANanna ginte téacs.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban korlátozott számítási költségvetéssel rendelkező finomhangolt szöveggenerálás problémáját foglalkozunk. Ehhez egy jól teljesítő szöveggenerációs ellenséges hálózat (GAN) architektúrát használunk - Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), és megpróbáltuk az LSTM réteget egy önfigyelemre alapú Transformer réteggel helyettesíteni, hogy kihasználhassuk hatékonyságukat. Az így kapott önfigyelem DPGAN (SADPGAN) értékelését a generált szöveg teljesítményének, minőségének és sokszínűségének és stabilitásának tekintetében értékeltük. A számítástechnikai kísérletek azt sugallták, hogy a transzformátor architektúrája nem képes lecserélni az LSTM réteget, a kiképzés előtti szakaszban alul teljesítmény és a GAN hangolási fázisban teljes üzemmód összeomláson megy keresztül. Eredményeink azt sugallják, hogy a transzformátor architektúráját át kell igazítani, mielőtt RNN-eket helyettesíthetnénk szöveggeneráló GAN-okban.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα της εκλεπτυσμένης δημιουργίας κειμένου με περιορισμένο υπολογιστικό προϋπολογισμό. Για αυτό, χρησιμοποιούμε μια αποδοτική αρχιτεκτονική αντιγραφικού δικτύου (και επιχειρήσαμε μια εναλλακτική αντικατάσταση του στρώματος με ένα στρώμα μετασχηματιστή που βασίζεται στην αυτοπροσοχή, προκειμένου να αξιοποιήσουμε την αποτελεσματικότητά τους. Η προκύπτουσα αυτοπροσοχής αξιολογήθηκε ως προς την απόδοση, την ποιότητα και την ποικιλομορφία του παραγόμενου κειμένου και τη σταθερότητα. Υπολογιστικά πειράματα πρότειναν ότι μια αρχιτεκτονική μετασχηματιστή δεν είναι σε θέση να αντικαταστήσει το στρώμα LSTM, που δεν αποδίδει κατά τη φάση προ-εκπαίδευσης και υφίσταται πλήρη κατάρρευση λειτουργίας κατά τη φάση συντονισμού GAN. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι η αρχιτεκτονική του μετασχηματιστή πρέπει να προσαρμοστεί πριν μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί ως αντικατάσταση των RNN στα GAN που παράγουν κείμενο.', 'it': "In questo articolo affrontiamo il problema della generazione di testo perfezionato con un budget computazionale limitato. Per questo, utilizziamo un'architettura di rete avversaria generativa di testo (GAN) ben performante - Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), e abbiamo tentato una sostituzione drop-in del livello LSTM con un livello Transformer basato su auto-attenzione per sfruttare la loro efficienza. Il risultato Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) è stato valutato per prestazioni, qualità e diversità del testo generato e stabilità. Esperimenti computazionali hanno suggerito che un'architettura del trasformatore non è in grado di sostituire il livello LSTM, sottoperformante durante la fase di pre-allenamento e subendo un collasso della modalità completa durante la fase di tuning GAN. I nostri risultati suggeriscono che l'architettura del trasformatore deve essere adattata prima di poter essere utilizzata come sostituto per RNN nei GAN che generano testo.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз мәтін құру мәселесін шектелген есептеу бөлшегімен шектелген. Бұл үшін біз жақсы орындалатын мәтін қарсы желі (GAN) архитектурасын қолданып, әртүрлі-қарсы көмектесетін GAN (DPGAN) қабаттың алмастыруын қолданып, олардың эффективнілігін көмектесу үшін өзіңізге негізделген транформациялау қабатты Өзді қатынау DPGAN (SADPGAN) нәтижесі жасалған мәтін және стабиліктердің ықтималдығы, сапаты және әртүрлігі үшін бағалады. Компьютерлік тәжірибелері түрлендіруші архитектурасы LSTM қабатты алмастыруға болмайды, алдын- ала оқыту кезінде жұмыс істеп, GAN баптау кезінде толық режім сұлбасын алмастыруға болады. Біздің нәтижелеріміз түрлендіруші архитектурасы GAN жасау үшін RNN үшін алмастыру үшін қолданылатын алмастыру керек деп ойлайды.', 'lt': 'In this paper we address the problem of fine-tuned text generation with a limited computational budget.  Tuo tikslu mes naudojame gerai veikiantį teksto sukuriamą priešiško tinklo (GAN) architektūrą – GAN, skatinančio įvairovę (DPGAN), ir bandėme pakeisti LSTM sluoksnį savarankiškai orientuotu Transformer sluoksniu, kad būtų padidintas jų veiksmingumas. Atsižvelgiant į sukauptų tekstų veiksmingumą, kokybę ir įvairovę ir stabilumą buvo įvertintas gautas savarankiškas DPGAN (SADPGAN). Kompiuteriniai eksperimentai parodė, kad transformatoriaus architektūra negali pakeisti LSTM sluoksnio, per pasirengimo mokymui etapą nepakankamai veiksminga ir GAN koregavimo etapo metu visiškai žlugo režimas. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad transformatoriaus architektūra turi būti pritaikyta, kol ji gali būti naudojama kaip DNR pakaitalas tekstus gaminančiose GAN.', 'mk': 'Во овој документ го решаваме проблемот со фино изменетата генерација на текст со ограничен компјутерски буџет. За тоа, користиме добри успешни текстови генерирачки противнички мрежи (ГАН) архитектура - ГАН за промовирање на различност (ДПГАН), и се обидовме да го замениме слојот на ЛСТМ со слој на трансформер базиран на себе внимание со цел да ја искористиме нивната ефикасност. Резултатот на самовниманието ДПГАН (САДПГАН) беше проценет за перформансата, квалитетот и различноста на генерираниот текст и стабилноста. Компутационите експерименти покажаа дека архитектурата на трансформаторот не е во состојба да го замени слојот на ЛСТМ, недостасува за време на фазата на предобуката и претрпе целосен колапс на режимот за време на фазата на гулање на ГАН. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека архитектурата на трансформаторот мора да биде адаптирана пред да може да се користи како замена за РНН во ГАН генерирани текст.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kita mengatasi masalah generasi teks yang disesuaikan dengan anggaran pengiraan yang terbatas. Untuk itu, kami menggunakan arkitektur rangkaian musuh pembuatan teks (GAN) yang berfungsi dengan baik - GAN yang Mempromosikan Keberagamaan (DPGAN), dan cuba menggantikan lapisan LSTM dengan lapisan Transformer berdasarkan perhatian diri untuk menggunakan efisiensi mereka. Perhatian Sendiri DPGAN (SADPGAN) yang menghasilkan diteliti untuk prestasi, kualiti dan pelbagai teks dan kestabilan yang dijana. Eksperimen komputasi menyarankan bahawa arkitektur pengubah tidak dapat menjatuhkan-masuk menggantikan lapisan LSTM, melaksanakan rendah semasa fase pralatihan dan mengalami runtuhan mod lengkap semasa fase penyesuaian GAN. Hasil kami menyarankan bahawa arkitektur pengubah perlu disesuaikan sebelum ia boleh digunakan sebagai pengganti untuk RNN dalam GAN yang menghasilkan teks.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument nindirizzaw il-problem a tal-ġenerazzjoni ta’ testi rfini b’baġit komputattiv limitat. Għal dan, a ħna nużaw arkitettura tan-netwerk avversarju ġenerattiv tat-test (GAN - text generative adversary network - GAN - Diversity-Promoting GAN - DPGAN), u ppruvaw nissostitwixxu s-saff tal-LSTM b’saff tat-Transformer ibbażat fuq l-attenzjoni tagħhom stess sabiex ninfurzaw l-effiċjenza tagħhom. Id-DPGAN (SADPGAN) li rriżulta mill-awtonomija ġie evalwat għall-prestazzjoni, il-kwalità u d-diversità tat-test u l-istabbiltà ġġenerati. Esperimenti komputattivi ssuġġerew li arkitettura tat-trasformatur ma tkunx tista’ tissostitwixxi s-saff LSTM, ma tkunx qed tagħmel prestazzjoni tajba matul il-fażi ta’ qabel it-taħriġ u li tkun għaddejja minn kollass komplet tal-modalità matul il-fażi ta’ a ġġustament GAN. Ir-riżultati tagħna jissuġġerixxu li l-arkitettura tat-trasformatur trid tiġi adattata qabel ma tkun tista’ tintuża bħala sostituzzjoni għall-RNNs f’GANs li jiġġeneraw it-test.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид тооны төлөвлөгөөнд хязгааргүй тооцоололтын төлөвлөгөөтэй бүтээгдэхүүний асуудлыг тайлбарлаж байна. Үүний тулд бид сайн үйлдвэрлэлтэй текст бий болгон эсрэг сүлжээ (GAN) архитектурыг ашиглаж, өөрсдийн үр дүнг ашиглахын тулд LSTM давхарыг өөртөө анхаарлын төвөгтэй Трансформер давхартай орлуулж оролдсон. Үүний үр дүнд Өөрөө-анхаарлын ДПГАН (SADPGAN) нь үүсгэсэн текст болон тогтвортой байдлын үр дүнд, сайн чанар, төрөл байдлын үр дүнд үнэлсэн. Компьютерийн туршилтууд нь шилжүүлэгч архитектур нь LSTM давхарыг орлуулж чадахгүй гэдгийг сануулсан. Өмнө дасгал хөгжүүлэх давхар давхар давхар давхар давхар давхар давхар давхар давхар давхар болон GAN цэнэглэ Бидний үр дүнд өөрчлөгчийн архитектур нь текст үүсгэдэг GAN-д RNN-г орлуулахын өмнө ашиглах хэрэгтэй гэдгийг сануулдаг.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പരിധിയില്ലാത്ത കണക്കൂട്ടല്\u200d ബജെറ്റുമായി നല്ല ടെക്സ്റ്റ് തലമുറന്ന പ്രശ് അതിനു വേണ്ടി, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പദാവലി ജനററിവ് വിരോധമായ നെറ്റര്\u200dക്കേറ്റര്\u200d സ്ഥാനം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഡിപിജിയാന്\u200d (ഡിപിജിയാന്\u200d) വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ സ് സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നത് ഡിപിപിജിയാന്\u200d (സാഡിപിഗാന്\u200d) നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റ് വ്യത്യാസവും, സ്ഥിരമായ വ്യത്യസ്താ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു മാറ്റം മാറ്റുന്ന ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കേണ്ട സ്ഥാനത്തിനുപകരം LSTM ലേഡറിന് പകര്\u200dത്തുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യമല്ല, പ്രോട്ര നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു മാറ്റുന്ന സ്ഥാനം മാറ്റുന്നതിനു മുമ്പ് RNNs-ന് പകര്\u200dപ്പാക്കുന്നതിനുമുമ്പായി മാറ്റുന', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუტაში ჩვენ დავწყენებთ კომპუტაციალური ბიზეტის პრობლემა, რომელიც კომპუტაციალური ბიზეტისთვის. ამიტომ, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ წარმოადგენებული ტექსტის გენერაციური განატებრიალური ქსელი (GAN) არქტიქტიკური - განსხვავებული განახლებელი GAN (DPGAN) და დავცდილობთ LSTM წარმოადგენის შეცვლა თავიდან დაახლოებით განახლოებით განახლოებით განახლოები შემდეგ თავისუფალური დაახლოების DPGAN (SADPGAN) გამოყენება, გამოყენებული ტექსტის და სტაბლიტურის განსხვავებაზე. Name ჩვენი წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომ ტრანფორმეტრის აქტიქტიქტურაციას უნდა აეპორტირება, სანამ ეს შეიძლება გამოიყენება როგორც RNN-ის შეცვლა ტექსტის დავიქმნა GAN', 'ro': 'În această lucrare abordăm problema generării textului reglat fin cu un buget computațional limitat. Pentru aceasta, folosim o arhitectură de rețea adversară generativă de text (GAN) performantă - Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), și am încercat o înlocuire drop-in a stratului LSTM cu un strat Transformer bazat pe auto-atenție pentru a valorifica eficiența lor. DPGAN (SADPGAN) rezultat a fost evaluat pentru performanța, calitatea și diversitatea textului generat și stabilitatea. Experimentele computaționale au sugerat că o arhitectură de transformator nu este capabilă să înlocuiască stratul LSTM, performanțele insuficiente în timpul fazei de pre-antrenament și suferă un colaps complet al modului în timpul fazei de reglare GAN. Rezultatele noastre sugerează că arhitectura transformatorului trebuie adaptată înainte de a putea fi utilizată ca înlocuitor pentru RNN-urile în GAN-urile generatoare de text.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule poruszamy problem precyzyjnego generowania tekstu przy ograniczonym budżecie obliczeniowym. W tym celu używamy dobrze wydajnej architektury sieci przeciwnej generującej tekst (GAN) oraz próbowaliśmy zastąpić warstwę LSTM warstwą transformatora opartą na własnej uwadze, aby wykorzystać ich efektywność. Wynikający z nich samoobsługowy DPGAN (SADPGAN) został oceniony pod kątem wydajności, jakości i różnorodności generowanego tekstu oraz stabilności. Eksperymenty obliczeniowe sugerowały, że architektura transformatora nie jest w stanie zastąpić warstwy LSTM, co nie wydaje się w fazie przedtreningowej i ulega całkowitemu załamaniu trybu podczas fazy dostrajania GAN. Nasze wyniki sugerują, że architektura transformatora musi zostać dostosowana zanim będzie mogła zostać wykorzystana jako zastępstwo RNN w generujących tekst GAN.', 'no': 'I denne papiret vert vi oppretta problemet for å laga fint tekst med eit begrenset databasebudsjett. Dette bruker vi ein godt utføring av tekst som genererar negativt nettverk (GAN) - arkitektur – Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), og prøvde å byta ut ein nedtrekking av LSTM-laget med eit sjølvoppmerksbasert transformeringslag for å levera effektiviteten. Det resulterte Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) er evaluert for utvikling, kvalitet og mangfold av laga tekst og stabilitet. Computational experiments suggested that a transformer architecture cannot drop-in replace the LSTM layer, under performing during the pre-training phase and undergoing a complete mode collapse during the GAN tuning phase. Resultatet våra tyder på at transformeringsarkitekturen må vera tilpassa før den kan brukast som bytt ut for RNN i tekstgenererande GAN.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru rješavamo problem generacije teksta sa ograničenim računalnim budžetom. Zbog toga, koristimo dobro izvršenu tekstsku generičnu neprijateljsku mrežu (GAN) arhitekturu - raznolikost-poticavajuću GAN (DPGAN), i pokušali smo zameniti sloj LSTM-a sa slojem transformera na sebi baziranom pažnji kako bi uticali na njihovu efikasnost. Rezultat DPGAN samopouzdanja (SADPGAN) bio je procenjen za provedbu, kvalitetu i raznolikost proizvedenog teksta i stabilnosti. Kompjuterski eksperimenti su predložili da se transformatorska arhitektura ne može zameniti sloj LSTM-a, koji je pod izvršenom tokom faze predobuke i potpunog kolapsa režima tijekom faze naprave GAN-a. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da se transformatorska arhitektura mora prilagoditi prije nego što se koristi kao zamjena za RNN u tekstualnim GAN-ima.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats behandlar vi problemet med finjusterad textgenerering med begränsad beräkningsbudget. För detta använder vi en välfungerande text generativ adversarial network (GAN)-arkitektur - Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), och försökte ersätta LSTM-lagret med ett självuppmärksamhetsbaserat Transformer-lager för att utnyttja deras effektivitet. Resultatet av Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) utvärderades för prestanda, kvalitet och mångfald av genererad text och stabilitet. Beräkningsexperiment antydde att en transformatorarkitektur inte kan släppa in LSTM-lagret, vilket underpresterar under förberedelsefasen och genomgår en fullständig kollaps under GAN-inställningsfasen. Våra resultat tyder på att transformatorarkitekturen behöver anpassas innan den kan användas som ersättning för RNN i textgenererande GAN.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ ලිපින්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්පූර්ණ පණිවිඩයක් තියනවා. ඒකෙන්, අපි හොඳයි පාළුවක් ප්\u200dරභාවිත විරෝධික ජාලය (GAN) විශ්වාසය භාවිත කරනවා - විවෘතිය-ප්\u200dරභාවිත GAN (DPGAN), ඒ වගේම LSTM ස්ථානයේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් ස්ව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ස්වයංග්\u200dරහය DPGAN (SADPGAN) විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ පාළුව සහ ස්ථාවත්වය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, ක පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙනවා කියලා තියෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණයක් ස්ථාපනයක් LSTM ස්ථානය වෙනස් කරන්න බැරි කියලා, පරී අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිපත්ත', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஒரு வரையறுக்கப்பட்ட கணிப்பொறி கட்டுப்பொருளுடன் சரியான உரை உருவாக்கத்தின் பிரச்ச இதுக்காக, நாம் நன்றாக செயல்படுத்தும் உரை பொதியான எதிர்பாரியான பிணையத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் - வித்தியாசமான - மேம்படுத்தல் GAN (DPGAN), மற்றும் ஒரு துளியை மாற்றி LSTM அடுக்கு முயற்சி முடிவில் தானே கவனம் DPGAN (SADPGAN) உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உரையை மற்றும் நிலையையும் செயல்படுத்த, தரம் மற்றும் பல்வேறு வித்தியாசமாக கணக்கீட்டு சோதனைகள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது ஒரு மாற்று உருவாக்கி LSTM அடுக்கை மாற்ற முடியாது, முன் பயிற்சி காலத்தில் செயல்படும் போது முழு முறைமைய நம் முடிவு', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaynu ka sheekeysanaynaa dhibaatada qarniga qoraalka ah oo la xiriira budgetarka xisaabta xadiiqada ah. Taas darteed waxaynu isticmaalnaa shabakad aad u samaysan kartooyinka qoraalka ah oo ka geesta ah (GAN), Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), waxaana isku daynay in lagu beddelo darafka LSTM lagula beddelo darafka iskuul-hoosaysiinta ah si aan u awoodo. Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) sababtiisa waxaa lagu qiimeeyay sameynta, qiimaha iyo kala duduwan qorniin iyo stabilis. Imtixaanka xisaabta ah waxay soo jeedeen in laynka beddelin kari maayo inuu ka beddelo saqafka LSTM, oo lagu sameynayo fasalka waxbarashada ka horraysa iyo in qaab kamid ah uu ku dhici karo fasaxa sameynta GAN. Abaalkayaga waxaa ka jeedinaya in la beddelo dhismaha beddelinta inta aan loo isticmaali karo beddelinta RNNs oo ku qoran GAN.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک محدود کمپیوٹریشن بوڈیٹ کے ساتھ ٹھیک ٹیکسٹ نسل کے مسئلہ سے مشکل کریں گے۔ اس کے لئے ہم ایک بہتر عمل کرنے والی پیغام کے ساتھ مخالف نیٹ ورک (GAN) معماری استعمال کرتے ہیں - مختلف پیغام دینے والی GAN (DPGAN) اور LSTM لائر کا ڈراپ-ین بدلنے کی کوشش کرتے ہیں کہ ان کے کامیابی کو دفع کرنے کے لئے اپنی توجه پر بنیاد تغییر لائر کے ساتھ۔ نتیجۂ Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) کو فعالیت، کیفیت اور مختلفیت کے لئے ارزیابی کی گئی تھی۔ کمپیوٹریشن آزمائش نے سفارش کی کہ ایک تغییر معمار معمار LSTM لائر کو دفع کرنے کے لئے غیر قابل ہے، اس سے پہلے آموزش فاز میں کم عمل کرنے کے لئے اور GAN ٹونگ فاز میں ایک کامل موڈ کالپ پر چل رہا ہے. ہمارے نتیجے اس بات سے پیش کرتے ہیں کہ تغییر پھیلانے والے معمار کی تعمیر کی ضرورت ہے قبل اس سے پہلے کہ اس کا استعمال کرنا RNN کے لئے متن پیدا کرنے والی GANs میں ہے.', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta giải quyết vấn đề sản xuất văn bản hoàn chỉnh với một ngân sách tính hạn chế. Do đó, chúng tôi sử dụng cấu trúc văn bản tạo ra các đối thủ tạo thành công tốt (GAN) kiến trúc "Diversity-Promoted GAN (DGAN), và cố gắng thay thế cho cho cho lớp HTTM với một lớp biến áp dựa vào sự chú ý riêng để tạo hiệu quả của nó. The Kết quả: Self Nghiêm Nghiêm Nghiêm DGAN (SADGAN) đã được đánh giá để xác định khả năng, chất lượng và đa dạng của văn bản và sự ổn định. Qua các thí nghiệm vi tính cho thấy một kiến trúc chuyển hóa không thể thả-in thay thế lớp LSTM, đang thiếu thực hiện trong giai đoạn trước huấn luyện và đang trải qua sự sụp đổ chế độ hoàn to àn trong thời gian âm thanh GAN. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy kiến trúc máy biến hình cần phải được thích nghi trước khi nó có thể được sử dụng như thay thế RNN trong các giải phát ra văn bản.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz cheksiz kompyuterning chegarasi bilan yaxshi matn generalining muammolarini boshqaramiz. Bu uchun, biz yaxshi bajarayon matn generativ diqqat tarmoqni (GAN) ishlatamiz, diqqat-rivojlanish GAN (DPGAN) dasturidan foydalanamiz va ularning effektligini yozish uchun LSTM qatlarini o'zgartirib chiqishni istaysiz. Name Kompyuterni tahrirlash imkoniyatini tahrirlash imkoniyatini tahrirlaydi, oʻzgartirish arxituvchini oʻzgartirib boʻlmadi. Bizning natijalarimiz shunday aytganimiz, o'zgartirish arxituvchini o'zgartirishi kerak, bu GAN'larning matn yaratish uchun RNNS'ni oʻzgartirishi mumkin.", 'hr': 'U ovom papiru rješavamo problem generacije teksta s ograničenim računalnim proračunom. Zbog toga koristimo dobro izvršenu tekstsku generičnu adversarnu mrežu (GAN) arhitekturu - raznolikost-promicanje GAN (DPGAN) i pokušavamo zamjenu sloja LSTM-a s vlasnikom transformera na samopouzdanju kako bi utjecali na njihovu učinkovitost. Od rezultata DPGAN samopouzdanja (SADPGAN) procijenjena je za učinkovitost, kvalitet i raznolikost proizvedenog teksta i stabilnosti. Računalni eksperimenti su sugerirali da se građevina transformer a ne može zamijeniti sloj LSTM-a, nedovoljno ispunjavajući tijekom faze predobučenja i potpuni kolaps režima tijekom faze prilagođenja GAN-a. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da se transformatorska arhitektura mora prilagoditi prije nego što se koristi kao zamjena za RNN u tekstualnim GAN-ima.', 'da': "I denne artikel behandler vi problemet med finjusteret tekstgenerering med et begrænset beregningsbudget. Til dette bruger vi en velfungerende tekstgenerativ adversarial netværk (GAN)-arkitektur - Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), og forsøgte at erstatte LSTM-laget med et selvopmærksomhedsbaseret Transformer-lag for at udnytte deres effektivitet. Den resulterende Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) blev evalueret for ydeevne, kvalitet og mangfoldighed af genereret tekst og stabilitet. Computerende eksperimenter antydede, at en transformer arkitektur ikke er i stand til at drop-in erstatte LSTM laget, underudførte under præ-træningsfasen og gennemgik et komplet mode kollaps under GAN tuning fasen. Vores resultater tyder på, at transformatorarkitekturen skal tilpasses, før den kan bruges som erstatning for RNN'er i tekstgenererende GAN'er.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия разглеждаме проблема с фино настроеното генериране на текст с ограничен изчислителен бюджет. За целта използвахме добре ефективна текстово генерираща конферентна мрежа (ГАН) архитектура и се опитахме да заменим слоя с трансформаторен слой, базиран на самовниманието, за да увеличим ефективността им. Резултатът от самовниманието беше оценен за представяне, качество и разнообразие на генерирания текст и стабилност. Изчислителните експерименти предполагат, че архитектурата на трансформатора не е в състояние да замени слоя LSTM, като не работи по време на фазата на предобучение и претърпява пълен срив в режим по време на фазата на настройка на GAN. Нашите резултати предполагат, че архитектурата на трансформатора трябва да бъде адаптирана, преди да може да бъде използвана като заместител на RNN в текстово генериращи ГАН.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kita mengatasi masalah generasi teks yang disesuaikan dengan anggaran komputasi terbatas. Untuk itu, kami menggunakan arsitektur jaringan musuh pembuatan teks (GAN) yang berkembang dengan baik - GAN yang Mempromosikan Diversity (DPGAN), dan mencoba menggantikan lapisan LSTM dengan lapisan Transformer berdasarkan perhatian sendiri untuk menggunakan efisiensi mereka. Perhatian Sendiri DPGAN (SADPGAN) yang menghasilkan diteliti untuk prestasi, kualitas dan diversitas teks dan stabilitas yang dihasilkan. Eksperimen komputasi menyarankan bahwa arsitektur transformer tidak dapat menggantikan lapisan LSTM, tidak berfungsi dalam fase prapelatihan dan mengalami runtuhan mode lengkap selama fase tuning GAN. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa arsitektur transformer perlu diadaptasi sebelum dapat digunakan sebagai pengganti untuk RNN dalam GAN-generasi teks.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리가 해결한 문제는 텍스트를 미세하게 조정하여 유한한 계산 예산을 생성하는 것이다.이를 위해 우리는 성능이 좋은 텍스트 생성 대항성 네트워크(GAN) 체계 구조인 다양성 촉진형 GAN(DPGAN)을 사용하고 자신의 관심을 바탕으로 하는 전환층으로 LSTM층을 교체하여 효율을 높이려고 시도했다.이로 인해 발생하는 자체 주의 DPGAN(SADPGAN)은 텍스트 생성의 성능, 품질, 다양성 및 안정성으로 평가된다.계산 실험에 따르면 변압기 구조는 LSTM층을 교체할 수 없으며 예훈련 단계에서 좋지 않았고 GAN 조정 단계에서 완전 패턴 붕괴를 겪었다.우리의 결과는 트랜스포머 구조를 작문본으로 GAN의 RNN 대체품을 만들기 전에 이를 조정해야 한다는 것을 보여 준다.', 'nl': "In dit artikel behandelen we het probleem van het genereren van verfijnde tekst met een beperkt rekenbudget. Hiervoor gebruiken we een goed presterende tekst generative adversarian network (GAN) architectuur, Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), en probeerden we een drop-in vervanging van de LSTM laag door een zelfattentie gebaseerde Transformer laag om hun efficiëntie te vergroten. De resulterende Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) werd geëvalueerd op prestaties, kwaliteit en diversiteit van gegenereerde tekst en stabiliteit. Computationele experimenten suggereerden dat een transformatorarchitectuur niet in staat is om de LSTM laag te vervangen, onvoldoende presteert tijdens de pre-training fase en een volledige modus instorting ondergaat tijdens de GAN tuning fase. Onze resultaten suggereren dat de transformatorarchitectuur aangepast moet worden voordat deze kan worden gebruikt als vervanging voor RNN's in tekst-genererende GAN's.", 'tr': 'Biz bu kagyzda esasy çykylýan metin döredilişiniň kynçylygyny çykýarys. Şonuň üçin biz gowy eden metin döredijili teňkil netek (GAN) arhitekturlygyny ulanýarys we olaryň etkinliýetini etmäge üçin LSTM gatynyň ýerine düşürmegini öz-özüne tabanly bir terjime gatlaky bilen ýerleşdirip barýarys. Öz-ünsüz DPGAN (SADPGAN) eserleşmeler, keyfiýeti we üretilen metin we stability üçin deňlendirildi. Kompýuter deneyleri LSTM gatyny almak üçin bir terjime arhitektura düşürip bilmeýändigini düşündirler. Biziň netijelerimiz GAN döredilen metin üçin RNN üçin üýtgetmek üçin terjime arhitekturumyň gollanmasyny maslahat berýär.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunazungumzia tatizo la kizazi cha ujumbe wenye bajeti ya kompyuta yenye kiwango kidogo. Kwa hilo, tunatumia muundo mzuri wa ujenzi wa ujumbe wa maandishi (GAN) uliofanywa vizuri - Udhibiti wa Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), na tukajaribu kuanguka kwa kutumia daraja la LSTM yenye kiwango cha Transfer yenyewe kujitegemea ili kuitumia ufanisi wao. Matokeo yake ya kujitegemea DPGAN (SADPGAN) yalivutiwa kwa utendaji, ubora na utofauti wa maandishi na ustawi. Majaribio ya kompyuta yalipendekeza kwamba ujenzi wa mabadiliko hauwezi kuanguka katika kubadilisha kiwango cha LSTM, wakati wa jukwaa la mafunzo ya awali na kuendelea kwa namna kamili ya kuanguka wakati wa jukwaa la mafunzo ya GAN. Matokeo yetu yanapendekeza kwamba majengo ya mabadiliko yanahitaji kubadilishwa kabla ya kutumika kama mabadiliko ya RNNN kwa ajili ya GAN zinazozalisha maandishi.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag behandeln wir das Problem der fein abgestimmten Texterstellung mit begrenztem Rechenaufwand. Dazu verwenden wir eine gut performante text generative adversarian network (GAN)-Architektur, Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), und versuchten, die LSTM-Ebene durch eine selbstaufmerksamkeitsbasierte Transformer-Ebene zu ersetzen, um deren Effizienz zu steigern. Das resultierende Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) wurde hinsichtlich Leistung, Qualität und Vielfalt des generierten Textes und Stabilität bewertet. Computationale Experimente deuten darauf hin, dass eine Transformatorarchitektur nicht in der Lage ist, die LSTM-Schicht zu ersetzen, was während der Vortrainingsphase zu wenig Leistung bringt und während der GAN-Tuning-Phase einen vollständigen Modus-Kollaps erleidet. Unsere Ergebnisse legen nahe, dass die Transformatorarchitektur angepasst werden muss, bevor sie als Ersatz für RNNs in textgenerierenden GANs verwendet werden kann.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما مشکل نسل متن با یک بودجه محدودیت محدودیت را حل می کنیم. برای این، ما از یک شبکه دشمنی (GAN) تولید کننده\u200cی متن خوب انجام می\u200cدهیم، برای تغییر فعالیت آنها، GAN (DPGAN) استفاده می\u200cکنیم، و سعی می\u200cکردیم جایگزینی لایه LSTM را با یک لایه تغییر دهنده\u200cی خودتان به تغییر فعالیت خود انجام دهیم. نتیجه\u200cی خودتوجه DPGAN (SADPGAN) برای عملکرد، کیفیت و مختلف متن و ثبات تولید شده ارزیابی شد. آزمایشات کامپیوتری پیشنهاد دادند که یک معماری تغییر دهنده قادر نیست که لایه LSTM را جایگزینی کند، در حالی پیش آموزش تحت اجرایی قرار دهد و در حالی سقوط تنظیم GAN یک سقوط کامل حالت کامل انجام دهد. نتیجه\u200cهای ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که معماری تغییر دهنده باید قبل از اینکه بتواند به عنوان جایگزینی RNN در پیدا کردن GAN متن استفاده شود.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne trajtojmë problemin e gjenerimit të mirë të tekstit me një buxhet të kufizuar llogaritës. For that, we use a well-performing text generative adversarial network (GAN) architecture - Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), and attempted a drop-in replacement of the LSTM layer with a self-attention-based Transformer layer in order to leverage their efficiency.  Autovëmendja që rezulton DPGAN (SADPGAN) u vlerësua për performancën, cilësinë dhe diversitetin e tekstit të gjeneruar dhe stabilitetin. Eksperimentet kompjuterike sugjeruan se një arkitekturë e transformuesit nuk është në gjendje të zëvendësojë shtresën LSTM, të paktën të funksionojë gjatë fazës së parastërvitjes dhe të kalojë një rrëzim të plotë gjatë fazës së tuning GAN. Rezultatet tona sugjerojnë se arkitektura e transformuesit duhet të përshtatet përpara se të përdoret si zëvendësues për RNN në GAN-të gjeneruese teksti.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም የጽሑፍ ትውልድ በተወሰነ አካባቢል ጉዳይ እናስቸጋራለን፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት የጽሑፍ አነስተኛዊ ተቃዋሚ መረብ (GAN) የመሠረት መሠረት እናስቀምጣለን፣ የፍቃዳቸውን ለማስጠንቀቅ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የራሳቸው ተሟጋቾች የDPGAN (SADPGAN) ጥያቄ፣ ጥሩ እና ልዩ ልዩነት የፍጥረት ጽሑፍ እና ጥናት ተረጋገጠ፡፡ ምርጫዎች Our results suggest that the transformer architecture need to be adapted before it can be used as a replacement for RNNs in text-generating GANs.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք բարելավված տեքստի ստեղծման խնդիրը սահմանափակ հաշվարկների բյուջեն օգտագործելով: Այդ պատճառով մենք օգտագործում ենք լավ արդյունավետ տեքստի ստեղծագործող հակառակյալ ցանց (ԳԱՆ) ճարտարապետություն, ԳԱՆ-ի բազմազանություն-առաջացնելու ճարտարապետություն, և փորձում ենք փոխարինել LSMT շերտը ինքնաուշադրության վրա հիմնված տրանսֆերմերի շերտը, որպեսզի օգտագործենք նրանց արդյունավե Արդյունքում ստացված ինքնաուշադրությունը ԴՊՊԳԱN (ՍաԴՊԳԱN) գնահատվել է ստեղծված տեքստի և կայունության արտադրողության, որակի և բազմազանության համար: Համակարգչային փորձարկումները առաջարկեցին, որ ձևափոխողի ճարտարապետությունը չի կարողանում փոխարինել LSMT շերտը, թերահաջողությունը նախապատրաստման ֆիզի ընթացքում և ամբողջական ռեժիմի կործանման ընթացքում անցնել ԳԱN-ի հարմարեցման ֆ Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ վերափոխողի ճարտարապետությունը պետք է հարմարեցվի, մինչ այն կարելի է օգտագործել որպես ՌՆԹ-ի փոխարինում տեքստի ստեղծող ԳԱՆ-ներում:', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru riješimo problem generacije teksta sa ograničenim računalnim budžetom. Zbog toga koristimo dobro izvršenu tekstsku generičnu neprijateljsku mrežu (GAN) arhitekturu - GAN za promicanje raznolikosti (DPGAN) i pokušavamo zamjenu sloja LSTM-a sa slojem transformera na sebi baziranom pažnji kako bi uticala na njihovu učinkovitost. Rezultat je DPGAN samopouzdanja (SADPGAN) procijenjen za učinkovitost, kvalitet i raznolikost proizvedenog teksta i stabilnosti. Kompjuterski eksperimenti su sugerisali da se transformatorska arhitektura ne može zamijeniti sloj LSTM, koji je pod izvršenom tijekom faze predobuke i u potpunoj kolopaciji režima tijekom faze izmjene GAN-a. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da se transformatorska arhitektura mora prilagoditi prije nego što se koristi kao zamjena za RNN u tekstualnim GAN-ima.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সীমিত গণমেন্ট বাজেটের সাথে ভালো টেক্সট প্রজন্মের সমস্যা নিয়ে কথা বলি। এর জন্য আমরা একটি ভালো প্রদর্শনীয় টেক্সট জেনারেটিভ বিরোধী নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করি- ডিভারেট-প্রচারণা জিয়ান (ডিপিজিএনএন) কাঠামো ব্যবহার করি এবং এলএসএম স্তরের প্রতিস্থাপনে একটি আত্মমনোযোগী ট্র এর ফলে স্বেক-মনোযোগ ডিপিজিয়ান (সাডিপিজিয়ান) তৈরি করা টেক্সট এবং স্থিতির বৈচিত্র্যের জন্য মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে। গণমাত্রিক পরীক্ষার পরামর্শ প্রদান করেছে যে একটি পরিবর্তন স্থাপনার পরিবর্তনের কাঠামো এলএসএমএস স্তরের প্রতিস্থাপন করা যাচ্ছে না, পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণের পর্যায়ে প্রদর্ আমাদের ফলাফল পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে পরিবর্তনের কাঠামো পরিবর্তন করার প্রয়োজন যে এর প্রতিস্থাপনের পূর্বে RNNs-এর প্রতিস্থাপন হিসেবে ব্যবহার করা যা', 'ca': "En aquest article abordem el problem a de la generació de text finament ajustad amb un pressupost computacional limitat. Per això, utilitzem una arquitectura de la xarxa adversaria generadora de text (GAN) - GAN promotor de la diversitat (DPGAN), i vam intentar substituir la capa LSTM amb una capa de Transformer basada en l'autoatenció per aprofitar la seva eficiència. L'auto-atenció DPGAN (SADPGAN) resultant va ser avaluada pel rendiment, la qualitat i la diversitat del text i l'estabilitat generats. Els experiments computacionals suggereixen que una arquitectura transformadora no és capaç de substituir la capa LSTM, que no funciona bé durant la fase de pré-entrenament i passa per un col·lapse complet durant la fase de ajustament GAN. Els nostres resultats suggereixen que l'arquitectura del transformador ha de ser adaptada abans que pugui ser utilitzada com a substitució per RNN en GAN generadors de text.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou jemně laděného textu s omezeným výpočetním rozpočtem. K tomu používáme dobře výkonnou architekturu textové generační nepřátelské sítě (GAN) a pokusíme se nahradit vrstvu LSTM vrstvou transformátoru založenou na vlastní pozornosti, abychom využili jejich efektivitu. Výsledný Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) byl hodnocen z hlediska výkonnosti, kvality a rozmanitosti generovaného textu a stability. Výpočetní experimenty naznačují, že architektura transformátoru není schopna nahradit LSTM vrstvu, nedostatečně výkonná během fáze předtréninku a prochází úplným zhroucením režimu během fáze ladění GAN. Naše výsledky naznačují, že architektura transformátoru je třeba upravit předtím, než bude možné použít jako náhrada RNN v textově generujících GAN.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa käsitellään hienosääteisen tekstin tuottamisen ongelmaa rajallisella laskennallisella budjetilla. Tätä varten käytimme hyvin toimivaa tekstigeneratiivista vastakkainasetteluverkostoa (GAN) -arkkitehtuuria - Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), ja yritimme korvata LSTM-kerroksen itsehuomiopohjaisella Transformer-kerroksella tehostaaksemme sen tehokkuutta. Tuloksena saatu itsehuomio-DPGAN (SADPGAN) arvioitiin luodun tekstin suorituskykyä, laatua ja monimuotoisuutta sekä vakautta. Laskennalliset kokeet osoittivat, että muuntaja-arkkitehtuuri ei pysty korvaamaan LSTM-kerrosta, koska se on alisuorituskykyinen esikoulutusvaiheessa ja että se romahtaa täysin GAN-viritysvaiheessa. Tuloksemme viittaavat siihen, että muuntajan arkkitehtuuria on muokattava, ennen kuin sitä voidaan käyttää RNN:ien korvaamiseksi tekstiä tuottavissa GAN:issä.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös käsitleme piiratud arvutuseelarvega täpsustatud teksti genereerimise probleemi. Selleks kasutasime hästi toimivat tekst generatiivset võrku (GAN) arhitektuuri - mitmekesisust edendavat GAN (DPGAN) ja püüdsime asendada LSTM kihi isetähelepanu põhineva Transformer kihiga, et võimendada nende tõhusust. Saadud Enesetähelepanu DPGAN (SADPGAN) hinnati genereeritud teksti jõudlust, kvaliteeti ja mitmekesisust ning stabiilsust. Arvutuslikud katsed näitasid, et transformaatori arhitektuur ei suuda LSTM-kihti asendada, sest see ei ole koolituseelses etapis piisavalt toimiv ja GAN-häälestusetapis langeb täielikult kokku. Meie tulemused näitavad, et trafo arhitektuuri tuleb kohandada enne, kui seda saab kasutada RNN asendusena teksti genereerivates gaasides.', 'af': "In hierdie papier adres ons die probleem van fin-tuned teksgenerasie met 'n beperkte rekenaar budžet. Vir daardie gebruik ons 'n goed uitvoerde teks genereer teenstandaar netwerk (GAN) architecture - Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), en probeer 'n vervanging van die LSTM laag met 'n self-attention-based Transformer laag om hul effektiviteit te verwyder. Die resulteerde Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) was evalueer vir prestasie, kwaliteit en diversiteit van genereerde teks en stabiliteit. Rekenaasjonale eksperimente het voorgestel dat 'n transformeerder arkitektuur nie moontlik om in te vervang die LSTM laag, onder- uitvoer tydens die voor- onderwerp fase en onderwerp 'n volledige modus collapse tydens die GAN tuning fase. Ons resultate stel voorstel dat die transformeerder arkitektuur moet aanpas word voordat dit gebruik word as 'n vervanging vir RNN in teks-genereering van GAN.", 'az': "Bu kağızda biz müəyyən edilmiş mətn nəsillərinin problemlərini müəyyən bir hesap budžetı ilə çəkirik. Buna görə biz yaxşı işlənən mətn ürəyində düşmənçi a ğ (GAN) arhitektarını - Çeşitlik-Promoting GAN (DPGAN) istifadə edirik və onların etkinliğini dəyişdirmək üçün LSTM səviyyəsinin özünə təsirli Transformer səviyyəsi ilə düşürməyə çalışırıq. Nəfsiz təhlükəsizlik DPGAN (SADPGAN) ürəklənmiş mətn və sabitqətlərin müxtəlif performans, keyfiyyəti və çeşitlilik üçün değerlendirildi. Computational experiments suggested that a transformer architecture can't drop in the LSTM layer, under performing during the pre-training phase and underperforming a complete mode collapse during the GAN tuning phase. Bizim sonuçlarımız transformer arhitektarının metin ürəkləndirici GAN'lərdə RNN üçün əvəz edilməmişdən əvvəl uyğunlanması lazımdır.", 'jv': 'Nang pepul iki, kita alam mengko kesempakan kelangan seng akeh basa luwih dumateng budhet Ngawe wis digawe, kita gambar kelompok text Generative opoterayan network (GIN) architecture - Multirsity-Prooteng gamN (PPGIN), lan tented a Drop-in Replacement of the CStM layer with a Self-Attentive Transformer layer in order to raise their effecture. Self Laptop" and "Desktop Kita punika dipolehasno karo architecture transformer kudu ngewigatining sedhaya bisa enetus ampuhi kanggo ngubah perusahaan DNN kanggo ngirim PASS', 'sk': 'V prispevku obravnavamo problem natančnega ustvarjanja besedila z omejenim računalniškim proračunom. Za to smo uporabili dobro učinkovito arhitekturo tekstovnega generativnega kontradiktorskega omrežja (GAN) - Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), in poskušali zamenjati plast LSTM s plastjo transformatorja, ki temelji na samopozornosti, da bi izboljšali njihovo učinkovitost. Rezultat samopozornosti DPGAN (SADPGAN) je bil ocenjen glede zmogljivosti, kakovosti in raznolikosti ustvarjenega besedila ter stabilnosti. Računalniški poskusi so pokazali, da transformatorska arhitektura ne more nadomestiti plasti LSTM, ker je v fazi pred usposabljanjem premalo uspešna in je v fazi uglaševanja GAN v celoti propadla. Naši rezultati kažejo, da je treba transformatorsko arhitekturo prilagoditi, preden jo lahko uporabimo kot nadomestilo RNN v besedilnih GAN-ih.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan da Muke tambayar wa matsayin mai kyau da wani bajeti mai ƙayyade lissafi. Daga wannan, Munã yi amfani da wani matsayin mai kyau mai ƙididdigo na matsayin motsi (GAN) - Diversity-Promulative GAN (DevGAN), kuma muka jarraba wani ɗin-in musanya na GAN da wani rundunar LTRM mai fassarar-raye da faransa-bincike, dõmin ya cika fikancinsu. An evaluce fassaran Self-Attitory Daidai (SADAGAN) wa performance, tsari da baƙaƙƙe na matsayi da tabbatarwa wanda aka haife. Cijari na lissafa na ƙayyade cewa an buɗe tsarin mai shige shi bai iya iya baddala layin LTRM ba, da kuma a yi aiki a lokacin da aka yi amfani da shi a lokacin kwanan-yin-gyare kuma yana tafiyar da wata shiri ta cikakke lokacin da za'a tunkuɗe GAN. MatamayinMu na gaya cewa an canza tsarin da za'a shige shi kafin a yi amfani da shi kamar an musanya wa RNNs cikin matsayin-mai-gabatar da GAN.", 'he': 'In this paper we address the problem of fine-tuned text generation with a limited computational budget.  For that, we use a well-performing text generative adversarial network (GAN) architecture - Diversity-Promoting GAN (DPGAN), and attempted a drop-in replacement of the LSTM layer with a self-attention-based Transformer layer in order to leverage their efficiency.  The resulting Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) was evaluated for performance, quality and diversity of generated text and stability.  ניסויים מחשבים הציעו שארכיטקטורה של המעבר אינה מסוגלת להחליף את שכבת LSTM, להפעיל מתחת לביצוע במהלך שלב ההתאמנות ולעבר התמוטטות מושלמת במהלך שלב ההתאמנות של GAN. Our results suggest that the transformer architecture need to be adapted before it can be used as a replacement for RNNs in text-generating GANs.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་འདིར་སྒྲིག་ཡི་གེ་མི་འབྲི་ཚིག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ འདི་ལ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་གནད་དོན་ཡུལ་གྱིས་བྱུང་བའི་ཡིག་གེ་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱད་ནས་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་རྗེས་སུ་འདྲ་བྱེད་སྤྱད་ནས་རང་ཉིད་གནད་དོན་མཁན The resulting Self-Attention DPGAN (SADPGAN) was evaluated for performance, quality and diversity of generated text and stability. Computational experiments suggested that a transformer architecture is unable to drop-in replace the LSTM layer, under-performing during the pre-training phase and undergoing a complete mode collapse during the GAN tuning phase. ང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་འབྲས་ནི་བཟོ་བཅོས་མཁན་གྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་བཟོ་བཅོས་འདི་དགོས་པ་ལས་སྔོན་དུ་ཉེན་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་དགོས་པས།'}
{'en': 'Predicting the Factuality of Reporting of News Media Using Observations about User Attention in Their YouTube Channels', 'es': 'Predecir la realidad de la información de los medios de comunicación mediante observaciones sobre la atención de los usuarios en sus canales de YouTube', 'pt': 'Prevendo a factualidade da reportagem da mídia de notícias usando observações sobre a atenção do usuário em seus canais do YouTube', 'fr': "Prédire le caractère factuel des reportages des médias d'information à l'aide des observations sur l'attention des utilisateurs sur leurs chaînes YouTube", 'ar': 'توقع حقيقة الإبلاغ عن وسائل الإعلام الإخبارية باستخدام ملاحظات حول انتباه المستخدم في قنوات YouTube الخاصة بهم', 'ja': 'YouTubeチャンネルでのユーザーの注目度に関する観察結果を使用したニュースメディアの報道の事実性の予測', 'hi': 'अपने YouTube चैनलों में उपयोगकर्ता ध्यान के बारे में टिप्पणियों का उपयोग करके समाचार मीडिया की रिपोर्टिंग की तथ्यात्मकता की भविष्यवाणी करना', 'zh': '用用户 YouTube 频道之察以占新闻媒体报道之实', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование актуальности репортажей СМИ с использованием наблюдений о внимании пользователей в их каналах YouTube', 'ga': 'Ag Réamh-mheas ar Fhíoracht Tuairiscithe Meáin Nuachta Ag Úsáid Tuairimí faoi Aird Úsáideoir ina gCainéil YouTube', 'ka': 'ახალი მედიაზე გამოყენება მომხმარებელი დაახლოების შესახებ YouTube ფანელში', 'el': 'Προβλέποντας την Πραγματικότητα της Αναφοράς των Μέσων Ενημέρωσης χρησιμοποιώντας Παρατηρήσεις σχετικά με την προσοχή των χρηστών στα Κανάλια τους', 'hu': 'A hírmédia jelentésének valóságának előrejelzése YouTube-csatornáik felhasználói figyelemmel kapcsolatos megfigyelések segítségével', 'it': "Prevedere la realtà della segnalazione dei media di notizie utilizzando osservazioni sull'attenzione degli utenti nei loro canali YouTube", 'lt': 'Nustatyti naujienų žiniasklaidos pranešimo, naudojant pastabas apie vartotojų dėmesį jų YouTube kanaluose, galimybę', 'kk': 'Жаңалық медиақтар туралы хабарламалардың шындығын бақылау үшін YouTube арналарында', 'mk': 'Предвидување на фактуалноста за известување за новинските медиуми користејќи набљудувања за вниманието на корисниците во нивните Јутјуб канали', 'ms': 'Menimbangkan Faktalitas Laporan Media Berita Menggunakan Perhatian mengenai Perhatian Pengguna dalam Saluran YouTube mereka', 'mt': 'Tbassir tal-Fattwalità tar-Rappurtar tal-Midja tal-Aħbarijiet bl-Użu ta’ Osservazzjonijiet dwar l-Attenzjoni tal-Utenti fil-Kanali tal-YouTube tagħhom', 'mn': 'Хөгжлийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчийн анхаарлын тухай ажиглах бодит байдлыг илэрхийлж байна.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂട്ടുബ് ചാനലുകളില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധ കാണുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിങ്ങ് മെഡിയാ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്', 'no': 'Forventar faktualitet om rapportering av nyhetsmedium ved bruk av observasjonar om brukarhandtering i sine YouTube-kanalane', 'ro': 'Prezicerea realității raportării mass-media de știri folosind observații despre atenția utilizatorilor în canalele lor YouTube', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie faktyczności raportowania mediów wiadomościowych za pomocą obserwacji o uwadze użytkowników w ich kanałach YouTube', 'sr': 'Predviđajući činjenicu izveštaja novinskih medija koristeći promatranje o pozornosti korisnika u svojim YouTube kanalima', 'so': 'Predicting the Facultity of Reporting of News Media Using Observations about User Attention in their YouTube channels', 'si': 'වාර්තාව මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයේ වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ YouTube චැනල් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහ', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Att förutsäga faktumet av rapportering av nyhetsmedier med hjälp av observationer om användaruppmärksamhet i deras YouTube-kanaler', 'ur': 'نیویس میڈیا کی راپورت کرنے کی حقیقت کی پیش بینی کرتی ہے کہ ان کے یوٹیوب چنال میں کارساز اظہار کے بارے میں اظہار کا استعمال کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Định dạng các phái được thông báo tin tức sử dụng quan sát người dùng trong kênh YouTube của họ', 'da': 'Forudsigelse af den faktiske rapportering af nyhedsmedier ved hjælp af observationer om brugerens opmærksomhed i deres YouTube-kanaler', 'bg': 'Прогнозиране на фактността на докладването на медиите чрез наблюдения за вниманието на потребителите в техните канали', 'hr': 'Predvjedujući činjenicu izvještaja novinskih medija koristeći promatranje o pozornosti korisnika u svojim YouTube kanalima', 'de': 'Vorhersage der tatsächlichen Berichterstattung von Nachrichtenmedien anhand von Beobachtungen über die Aufmerksamkeit der Nutzer in ihren YouTube-Kanälen', 'nl': 'Voorspelling van de feitelijkheid van rapportage van nieuwsmedia met behulp van waarnemingen over gebruikersaandacht in hun YouTube-kanalen', 'sw': 'Akitangaza ukweli wa Taarifa ya Habari za Habari kwa kutumia Maoni kuhusu Mtumiaji wa Mtumiaji katika Chaneli za YouTube', 'fa': 'پیشنهاد واقعیت گزارش رسانه های خبری از استفاده از نظارت درباره توجه کاربر در کانال های یوتیوب ایشان', 'ko': '유튜브 채널에서 사용자의 주의력을 관찰함으로써 뉴스 매체 보도의 진실성을 예측하다', 'tr': 'Haýsy Maglumaty Bildirişiniň Gerçeklik Maglumaty Youtube Kanallarynda Ullançy Attention barada gözlerden ullanýarlar', 'af': 'Voorskou die Factuality of Reporting of News Media gebruik Observations About User Attention in Their YouTube Channels', 'sq': 'Predicting the Factuality of Reporting of News Media Using Observations about User Attention in Their YouTube Channels', 'id': 'Memprediksi Faktalitas Laporan Media Berita Menggunakan Observation tentang Perhatian Pengguna di Kanal YouTube mereka', 'hy': 'Նորությունների լրատվամիջոցների տեղեկատվության փաստացիալության կանխատեսումը օգտագործելով օգտագործողների ուշադրության մասին իրենց YouTube-ի կանանցում', 'az': 'X톛b톛r M톛dy톛nl톛rin Haqq Bildirilm톛sinin Faaliyy톛tini 칐z YouTube Kanallar캼nda Qullan캼c캼 Attention haqq캼nda G칬zl톛ri istifad톛 edirl톛r', 'am': 'የዜና ሚዲያ ተጠቃሚዎች ስለተጠቃሚ ትኩረት በዩቱዩብ ቻናሌዎች ላይ', 'cs': 'Předvídání skutečnosti reportingu zpravodajských médií pomocí pozorování o pozornosti uživatelů v jejich YouTube kanálech', 'bs': 'Predviđavajući činjenicu izvješća novinskih medija koristeći promatranje o pozornosti korisnika u svojim YouTube kanalima', 'bn': 'তাদের ইউটিউব চ্যানেলে ব্যবহারকারীদের মনোযোগের ব্যাপারে রিপোর্টিং মিডিয়া ব্যবহার করা পর্যবেক্ষণের ফ্যাকালিট', 'ca': 'Predicting the Factuality of Reporting of News Media Using Observations about User Attention on Their YouTube Channels', 'et': 'Uudismeedia aruandluse faktilisuse prognoosimine kasutades vaatlusi kasutaja tähelepanu kohta oma YouTube kanalites', 'fi': 'Uutismedian raportoinnin tosiasiallisuuden ennustaminen käyttämällä havaintoja käyttäjän huomiosta YouTube-kanavissaan', 'jv': 'Tatanan Perintah Panjenengan Jawih', 'sk': 'Napovedovanje dejstva poročanja novinarskih medijev z opazovanji o pozornosti uporabnikov v njihovih kanalih YouTube', 'ha': 'Predicting the Factory of Riding of News Media Using Notes about user Attemption in their YouTube Channel', 'bo': 'གསར་འགོད་བརྙན་ཞུ་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དུས་ཚོད་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་པ་དེ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་རྒྱུ་ལམ་ཐོག་ཏུ་སྟོན་ཞིང་', 'he': 'צפוי העובדה לדווח על תקשורת חדשות בשימוש Observations על תשומת לב המשתמשים בערוצי יוטיוב שלהם'}
{'en': 'We propose a novel framework for predicting the factuality of reporting of news media outlets by studying the user attention cycles in their YouTube channels. In particular, we design a rich set of features derived from the temporal evolution of the number of views, likes, dislikes, and comments for a video, which we then aggregate to the channel level. We develop and release a dataset for the task, containing observations of user attention on YouTube channels for 489 news media. Our experiments demonstrate both complementarity and sizable improvements over state-of-the-art textual representations.', 'pt': 'Propomos uma nova estrutura para prever a factualidade da reportagem dos meios de comunicação de notícias, estudando os ciclos de atenção do usuário em seus canais do YouTube. Em particular, projetamos um rico conjunto de recursos derivados da evolução temporal do número de visualizações, curtidas, desgostos e comentários de um vídeo, que depois agregamos ao nível do canal. Desenvolvemos e lançamos um conjunto de dados para a tarefa, contendo observações da atenção do usuário nos canais do YouTube para 489 mídias de notícias. Nossos experimentos demonstram complementaridade e melhorias consideráveis em relação às representações textuais de última geração.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un nouveau cadre pour prédire la factualité des reportages des médias d'information en étudiant les cycles d'attention des utilisateurs sur leurs chaînes YouTube. En particulier, nous concevons un ensemble riche de fonctionnalités dérivées de l'évolution temporelle du nombre de vues, de mentions J'aime, de n'aime pas et de commentaires pour une vidéo, que nous agrégons ensuite au niveau de la chaîne. Nous développons et publions un ensemble de données pour cette tâche, contenant des observations de l'attention des utilisateurs sur les chaînes YouTube pour 489 médias d'information. Nos expériences démontrent à la fois une complémentarité et des améliorations considérables par rapport aux représentations textuelles de pointe.", 'ar': 'نقترح إطارًا جديدًا للتنبؤ بحقيقة الإبلاغ عن وسائل الإعلام الإخبارية من خلال دراسة دورات انتباه المستخدم في قنواتهم على YouTube. على وجه الخصوص ، نحن نصمم مجموعة غنية من الميزات المستمدة من التطور الزمني لعدد المشاهدات ، والإعجابات ، وعدم الإعجاب ، والتعليقات لمقطع فيديو ، والتي نقوم بعد ذلك بتجميعها على مستوى القناة. نقوم بتطوير وإصدار مجموعة بيانات للمهمة ، تحتوي على ملاحظات حول انتباه المستخدم على قنوات YouTube لـ 489 من وسائل الإعلام الإخبارية. توضح تجاربنا كلاً من التكامل والتحسينات الكبيرة على التمثيلات النصية الحديثة.', 'es': 'Proponemos un marco novedoso para predecir la realidad de la información de los medios de comunicación mediante el estudio de los ciclos de atención de los usuarios en sus canales de YouTube. En particular, diseñamos un amplio conjunto de funciones derivadas de la evolución temporal del número de visualizaciones, me gusta, no me gusta y comentarios de un vídeo, que luego agregamos al nivel del canal. Desarrollamos y publicamos un conjunto de datos para la tarea, que contiene observaciones de la atención de los usuarios en los canales de YouTube para 489 medios de comunicación. Nuestros experimentos demuestran tanto la complementariedad como las mejoras considerables con respecto a las representaciones textuales de última generación.', 'zh': '建一新框架,研用户YouTube频道意,期以占新闻媒体报道之实。 特设意功能,自视频观数,好之,不喜论数之变,然后合之于频道级。 发数集,489新闻媒体YouTube频道用户注。 臣等实验验互补性与先进之文本显改。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новую структуру для прогнозирования фактологичности репортажей СМИ путем изучения циклов внимания пользователей на их каналах YouTube. В частности, мы создаем богатый набор функций, вытекающих из временной эволюции количества просмотров, лайков, неприязни и комментариев к видео, которые затем агрегируем на уровне канала. Мы разрабатываем и выпускаем датасет для задания, содержащий наблюдения за вниманием пользователей на каналах YouTube для 489 СМИ. Наши эксперименты демонстрируют как взаимодополняемость, так и значительные улучшения по сравнению с современными текстовыми представлениями.', 'ja': 'YouTubeチャンネルのユーザーの注目度サイクルを調べることで、ニュースメディアの報道の事実性を予測するための斬新なフレームワークを提案します。特に、動画の再生回数、「いいね」、「嫌い」、コメントの時間的な進化から派生した豊富な機能のセットを設計し、チャンネルレベルに集約します。489のニュースメディアのYouTubeチャンネルでユーザーの注目度を観察するデータセットを作成してリリースします。当社の実験は、最先端のテキスト表現よりも相補性と大幅な改善の両方を実証しています。', 'hi': 'हम अपने YouTube चैनलों में उपयोगकर्ता ध्यान चक्रों का अध्ययन करके समाचार मीडिया आउटलेट्स की रिपोर्टिंग की तथ्यात्मकता की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक उपन्यास ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम एक वीडियो के लिए विचारों, पसंद, नापसंद और टिप्पणियों की संख्या के अस्थायी विकास से व्युत्पन्न सुविधाओं का एक समृद्ध सेट डिज़ाइन करते हैं, जिसे हम तब चैनल स्तर पर एकत्रित करते हैं। हम कार्य के लिए एक डेटासेट विकसित और जारी करते हैं, जिसमें 489 समाचार मीडिया के लिए YouTube चैनलों पर उपयोगकर्ता के ध्यान की टिप्पणियां शामिल हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों दोनों पूरकता और बड़े सुधार ों को प्रदर्शित करते हैं, जो अत्याधुनिक पाठ्य प्रतिनिधित्व पर हैं।', 'ga': 'Molaimid creat nua chun fírinneacht an tuairiscithe ar asraonta meán nuachta a thuar trí staidéar a dhéanamh ar thimthriallta aird úsáideoirí ina gcuid cainéal YouTube. Dearaímid go háirithe sraith shaibhir gnéithe a dhíorthaítear ón éabhlóid ama ar líon na dtuairimí, na rudaí is maith leo, nach dtaitníonn leo, agus na tuairimí le haghaidh físeáin, agus déanfaimid iad a chomhiomlánú ansin go leibhéal an chainéil. Déanaimid tacar sonraí a fhorbairt agus a eisiúint don tasc, ina bhfuil breathnuithe ar aird úsáideoirí ar chainéil YouTube le haghaidh 489 meán nuachta. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh comhlántacht agus feabhsuithe suntasacha ar léiriúcháin téacs den scoth.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პროგრამის პროგრამის პროგრამის გამოსახულება, რომელიც ახალგაზრულება მედიაზე გაუკვების ფაქტურალობას, რომელიც გამოყენებელი ახალგაზრულება YouTube-ის კანალში განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ დავყენებთ განსაკუთრებული ფუნქციების რამდენიმე განსაკუთრებით ვიდეოს, რომლებიც შემდეგ ჩვენ დავყენებთ კანალის დონეზე. ჩვენ მოვიქცევთ და გახსნა მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია რაოდენობაში, რომელიც გამოყენებელი მონაცემების მონაცემები YouTube-ში 489 ნუტური მედიაზე. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტების კომპლემენტაციას და დიდი უფრო მეტადება ტექსუალური გამოსახულებაზე.', 'hu': 'Új keretrendszert javasolunk arra, hogy a YouTube-csatornáikban a felhasználók figyelmének ciklusainak tanulmányozásával megjósoljuk a hírmédiák tényszerűségét. Különösen a videó megtekintéseinek, tetszik, nem tetszik és megjegyzéseinek időbeli evolúciójából származó gazdag funkciókat tervezünk, amelyeket ezután összesítünk a csatorna szintjére. A feladathoz kifejlesztünk és kiadunk egy adatkészletet, amely 489 hírmédiához tartalmazza a felhasználói figyelmet a YouTube csatornákon. Kísérleteink a legkorszerűbb szöveges ábrázolásokkal szembeni komplementaritást és jelentős javulást mutatnak.', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują sistemą, pagal kurią būtų galima prognozuoti pranešimų apie naujienų žiniasklaidos centrus faktiškumą, tiriant vartotojų dėmesio ciklus jų YouTube kanalais. In particular, we design a rich set of features derived from the temporal evolution of the number of views, likes, dislikes, and comments for a video, which we then aggregate to the channel level.  Mes parengiame ir paskelbiame užduoties duomenų rinkinį, kuriame pateikiami vartotojų dėmesio stebėjimai YouTube kanalais 489 naujienų žiniasklaidai. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo ir papildomumą, ir didelius patobulinimus, palyginti su naujausiais tekstiniais atstovais.', 'kk': 'Біз YouTube каналдарында пайдаланушылардың маңыздық медиақтар туралы хабарламалардың шындығын бақылау үшін романдық қоршауын ұсынамыз. Мысалы, біз видео деңгейінің уақытша эволюциясынан шығарылған баяны қасиеттерді құрастырамыз, мысалы, келмейді және түсініктемелерін жасаймыз. Содан кейін арнал деңгейіне бірге қосып тұр Біз тапсырманың деректер тізімін жасап, 489 жаңалық медиақшалар үшін YouTube арналарында нақыштары бар. Біздің тәжірибеміз текстуралдық түсіндірімдерінің күйі бойынша жақсартылығын және өлшемі жақсартылығын көрсетеді.', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo framework per prevedere la fattualità della segnalazione dei media di notizie studiando i cicli di attenzione degli utenti nei loro canali YouTube. In particolare, progettiamo un ricco insieme di funzionalità derivate dall'evoluzione temporale del numero di visualizzazioni, like, antipatie e commenti per un video, che poi aggregamo a livello di canale. Sviluppiamo e rilasciamo un dataset per il compito, contenente osservazioni dell'attenzione degli utenti sui canali YouTube per 489 media di notizie. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano sia complementarità che notevoli miglioramenti rispetto alle rappresentazioni testuali all'avanguardia.", 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο για την πρόβλεψη της πραγματικότητας της αναφοράς των ΜΜΕ ειδήσεων μελετώντας τους κύκλους προσοχής των χρηστών στα κανάλια τους. Ειδικότερα, σχεδιάζουμε ένα πλούσιο σύνολο χαρακτηριστικών που προέρχονται από την χρονική εξέλιξη του αριθμού των προβολών, των συμπαθήσεων, των αντιπαθήσεων και των σχολίων για ένα βίντεο, τα οποία στη συνέχεια συγκεντρώνουμε σε επίπεδο καναλιού. Αναπτύσσουμε και δημοσιεύουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων για το έργο αυτό, το οποίο περιέχει παρατηρήσεις προσοχής των χρηστών στα κανάλια για τα νέα μέσα 489. Τα πειράματά μας καταδεικνύουν τόσο συμπληρωματικότητα όσο και σημαντικές βελτιώσεις έναντι των υπερσύγχρονων κειμένων αναπαραστάσεων.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме нова рамка за предвидување на фактичноста на известувањето за новинските медиуми со проучување на циклусите на внимание на корисниците на нивните Јутјуб канали. Особено, дизајнираме богат сет карактеристики кои се извлечени од температурната еволуција на бројот на погледи, како што се, не се допаѓаат, и коментари за видео, кое потоа го агресираме на нивото на каналот. Развиваме и објавуваме податоци за задачата, кои содржат набљудувања за вниманието на корисникот на YouTube каналите за 489 новински медиуми. Нашите експерименти покажуваат комплементарност и значителни подобрувања во однос на најсовремените текстуални претставувања.', 'ml': 'യൂട്ടൂബ് ചാനലിലെ ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധ സൈക്കിളുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വാര്\u200dത്തക പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, വീഡിയോ ഇഷ്ടപ്പെടാത്തതും, വെറുക്കുന്നതും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഉള്ള സമയത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും കൊണ്ടുവന്ന ഒരു സമ്പന്നതയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ജോലിക്കുള്ള ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുകയും വിടുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. 489 വാര്\u200dത്തകാര്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് യൂട് നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണതയും വലിയ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu qafas ġdid għat-tbassir tal-fattwalità tar-rappurtar tal-istabbilimenti tal-midja tal-a ħbarijiet billi nistudjaw iċ-ċikli tal-attenzjoni tal-utenti fil-kanali tagħhom tal-YouTube. B’mod partikolari, a ħna niddisinjaw sett għoli ta’ karatteristiċi derivati mill-evoluzzjoni temporali tan-numru ta’ fehmiet, bħal, dislike, u kummenti għal vidjo, li mbagħad naggregaw għal-livell tal-kanal. Aħna niżviluppaw u nirrilaxxaw sett ta’ dejta għall-kompitu, li fih osservazzjonijiet ta’ attenzjoni tal-utent fuq kanali YouTube għal 489 media tal-a ħbarijiet. Our experiments demonstrate both complementarity and sizable improvements over state-of-the-art textual representations.', 'ms': 'Kami mengusulkan kerangka baru untuk meramalkan kenyataan laporan keluar media berita dengan mempelajari siklus perhatian pengguna dalam saluran YouTube mereka. Terutama, kita merancang set fitur yang kaya yang berasal dari evolusi sementara bilangan pandangan, suka, tidak suka, dan komentar untuk video, yang kemudian kita kumpulkan ke aras saluran. Kami mengembangkan dan melepaskan set data untuk tugas ini, mengandungi pengamatan perhatian pengguna di saluran YouTube untuk 489 media berita. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan kedua-dua komplementariti dan peningkatan yang besar atas perwakilan teks-teks state-of-the-art.', 'mn': 'Бид хэрэглэгчдийн анхаарлын циклийг YouTube-н аргаар судалж, мэдээллийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчдийн тухай мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчдийн үнэндээ тайлбарлахын тулд шинэ хэлбэрийг санал болгож байна. Ялангуяа бид бичлэгийн дуртай, дургүй, таамаглахгүй тодорхойлолтуудын хувьсалын хувьсалын баян хэсэг бүтээгдэхүүн загвар бүтээж, дараа нь бид хувилбарын түвшинд нийлүүлдэг. Бид ажил дээр өгөгдлийн санг бүтээж, 489 мэдээллийн медиа дээр хэрэглэгчдийн анхаарал хангалттай байдаг. Бидний туршилтууд улс орнуудын хувьд нэмэгдүүлэлт болон хэмжээтэй сайжруулалтыг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Propunem un cadru nou pentru a prezice realitatea raportării mass-media de știri prin studierea ciclurilor de atenție ale utilizatorilor în canalele lor YouTube. În special, proiectăm un set bogat de caracteristici derivate din evoluția temporală a numărului de vizualizări, like-uri, displace și comentarii pentru un videoclip, pe care apoi le agregăm la nivelul canalului. Dezvoltăm și lansăm un set de date pentru această sarcină, conținând observații ale atenției utilizatorilor pe canale YouTube pentru 489 de mass-media de știri. Experimentele noastre demonstrează atât complementaritatea, cât și îmbunătățiri considerabile față de reprezentările textuale de ultimă generație.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowe ramy przewidywania faktyczności raportowania mediów informacyjnych poprzez badanie cykli uwagi użytkowników w ich kanałach YouTube. W szczególności projektujemy bogaty zestaw cech wywodzących się z czasowej ewolucji liczby widoków, polubień, niechęci i komentarzy do wideo, które następnie agregujemy do poziomu kanału. Opracowujemy i udostępniamy do tego zadania zestaw danych, zawierający obserwacje uwagi użytkowników na kanałach YouTube dla mediów informacyjnych 489. Nasze eksperymenty wykazują zarówno komplementarność, jak i znaczące ulepszenia w stosunku do najnowocześniejszych reprezentacji tekstowych.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novi okvir za predviđanje činjenice izveštaja novinskih medija proučavajući cikluse pozornosti korisnika u svojim YouTube kanalima. Posebno, mi dizajniramo bogat set karakteristika iz temporalne evolucije broja pogleda, poput, neprijatelja i komentara za video, koji se onda okupimo na nivo kanala. Razvijamo i oslobodimo set podataka za zadatak, sadržeći promatranje pažnje korisnika na YouTube kanalima za 489 novinskih medija. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju komplementarnost i velike poboljšanje u odnosu na tekstualne predstave države umjetnosti.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වාර්තාව මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අනුවිශ්නය කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ YouTube චැනල් වල ප විශේෂයෙන්, අපි වීඩියෝ සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, කැමතියි, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වි අපි කාර්යයෙන් දත්ත සෙට් විස්තර කරනවා හා ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා, යූටුබ් චැනල් 489 වාර්තාව මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයේ  අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ සම්පූර්ණතාවක් සහ ප්\u200dරමාණතාවක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න පුළුවන් විසිද්ධතාවක් ව', 'so': 'We propose a novel framework for predicting the factuality of reporting of news media outlets by studying the user attention cycles in their YouTube channels.  Si gaar ah, waxaynu u qoraynaa kooxo taajir ah oo ka soo baxay bedelka waqtiga ah ee aragtida, sida loo jecel yahay, nebcaado iyo commentarka fiidiyowga, kaas oo aynu ku kordhinno darajada kanalka. Waxaynu horumarinaynaa oo u dirnaa sawir macluumaad ah, kaas oo ku jira fiiriyo la jeedo isticmaalayaasha kanallada Youtube ee 489 media. Imtixaankayada waxay muujiyaan iskala xiriirta iyo hagaajinta aad u weyn oo ku saabsan qaybaha farshaxanka farshaxanka.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår ett nytt ramverk för att förutsäga faktabalanseringen av nyhetsmedier genom att studera användarnas uppmärksamhetscykler i deras YouTube-kanaler. I synnerhet utformar vi en rik uppsättning funktioner som härrör från den tidsmässiga utvecklingen av antalet visningar, gillar, ogillar och kommentarer för en video, som vi sedan sammanställer till kanalnivå. Vi utvecklar och släpper ett dataset för uppgiften som innehåller observationer av användarnas uppmärksamhet på YouTube-kanaler för 489 nyhetsmedier. Våra experiment visar både komplementaritet och betydande förbättringar jämfört med toppmoderna textrepresentationer.', 'ur': 'ہم نے اخبار میڈیو آئٹ کے بارے میں راپورٹ کرنے کی حقیقت کی پیش بینی کے لئے ایک نئی فرم پیش بینی کرتا ہے کہ ان کے یوٹیوب کانال میں کارساز کی توجه کی سکیلوں کو پڑھنے کے ذریعہ۔ مخصوصا، ہم نے ویڈیو کے لئے ایک ثروت مجموعہ کا مجموعہ طراحی کیا ہے جو نظر کی تعداد کی موقت تکامل سے آئی ہے، جیسے، ناپسند، اور مثالیں، اور مثالیں، جسے ہم چانال سطح پر جمع کرتے ہیں. ہم نے اس کام کے لئے ایک ڈیٹ سٹ کو تولید کریں اور آزاد کریں، جس میں 489 نیویس میڈیا کے لئے یوٹیوب چنال پر کارساز کی توجه کی نظر رکھی ہے. ہماری آزمائش دونوں تعلقات اور اندازہ سے زیادہ اضافہ کی حالت-آرتی ٹکسٹیول نمایش پر دکھاتی ہیں.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய சட்டம் முன்நிரூபிக்கிறோம் யூடியூப் வழிகளில் பயனர் கவனத்தின் சுற்றுகளை படித்து அறிக்கையின் உண்மையை அறிவ குறிப்பிட்ட பார்வைகள், பிடிக்கும், வீடியோ மற்றும் குறிப்பிடும் காணொளியின் முன்னேற்றத்திலிருந்து வரையப்பட்டுள்ள செல்லும் கூட்ட We develop and release a dataset for the task, containing observations of user attention on YouTube channels for 489 news media.  எங்கள் சோதனைகள் சிக்கல் மற்றும் அளவு முன்னேற்றங்களை காண்பிக்கிறது - கலை நிரல் நிரல் குறிப்பிட்டுள்ளது.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit nytt rammeverk for å foreslå faktualitet for å rapportera om nyhetskområder ved å studera brukargrensessiklane i YouTube-kanalane sine. I særskilt lager vi eit rikt sett av funksjonar som er avhengig frå tidlegare utvikling av talet på visingar, som er likevel, ikkje liker, og kommentarar for eit video, som vi så koplar til kanalnivå. Vi utviklar og slettar ei dataset for oppgåva, som inneheld observasjonar om brukargrensesjon på YouTube-kanalane for 489 nyhetsmedium. Eksperimentane våre demonstrerer både komplementaritet og storleikbare forbedringar over tekstuelle representasjonar i kunsten.', 'uz': "Biz foydalanuvchilar foydalanuvchi uslublarini YouTube kanallarini o'rganish orqali, yangi media toʻplamlarining haqiqida hisoblash haqiqatini o'rganish uchun novel freymini taqdim qilamiz. Ko'rinishlar soni taʼminlovchi, yolg'on, yolg'on va izohlarni tasavvur qilamiz va keyin kanal darajaga qaramamiz. Biz shu vazifa uchun maʼlumotlar tarkibini yaratib chiqaramiz va 489 xabar media uchun foydalanuvchiga qaramadi. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz murakkablik va ko'plab o'zgarishlar davlatning sohasi texnologiya representlariga ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở mới để dự đoán các yếu tố báo cáo truyền thông bằng cách nghiên cứu các chu kỳ chú ý của người dùng trên kênh YouTube. Chúng tôi thiết kế một loạt các tính năng phát triển theo thời gian của số lượng quan điểm, thích, ghét, và các bình luận cho một video, mà sau đó chúng tôi tổng hợp lên cấp kênh. Chúng tôi phát triển và phát hành một bộ dữ liệu cho nhiệm vụ, chứa các quan sát của người dùng trên kênh YouTube cho bản tin 489. Các thí nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy sự bổ sung và cải tiến đáng kể trên các biểu tượng văn bản.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нова рамка за прогнозиране на фактическостта на репортажите на медиите чрез изучаване на циклите на вниманието на потребителите в техните канали. По-специално, ние проектираме богат набор от функции, получени от времевата еволюция на броя на гледанията, харесванията, неприятностите и коментарите за видео, които след това обединяваме на нивото на канала. Разработваме и публикуваме набор от данни за задачата, съдържащ наблюдения на вниманието на потребителите в каналите за 489 новинарски медии. Нашите експерименти демонстрират както взаимно допълване, така и значителни подобрения спрямо най-съвременните текстови изображения.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novi okvir za predviđanje činjenice izvještaja novinskih medija proučavajući cikluse pozornosti korisnika u svojim YouTube kanalima. Posebno, mi dizajniramo bogat set karakteristika iz privremene evolucije broja pogleda, poput, neprijatelja i komentara za video, koji se onda okupljamo na nivo kanala. Razvijamo i objavljujemo set podataka za zadatak, sadržeći promatranje pozornosti korisnika na YouTube kanalima za 489 novinskih medija. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju komplementarnost i velike poboljšanje tijekom države umjetničkih tekstualnih predstavljanja.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny ramme for at forudsige faktualiteten af rapportering af nyhedsmedier ved at studere brugerens opmærksomhedscyklusser i deres YouTube-kanaler. Især designer vi et rigt sæt funktioner afledt af den tidsmæssige udvikling af antallet af visninger, synes godt om, ikke kan lide og kommentarer til en video, som vi derefter samler til kanalniveauet. Vi udvikler og frigiver et datasæt til opgaven, der indeholder observationer af brugerens opmærksomhed på YouTube kanaler til 489 nyhedsmedier. Vores eksperimenter demonstrerer både komplementaritet og betydelige forbedringer i forhold til state-of-the-art tekstrepræsentationer.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuw raamwerk voor om de feitelijkheid van verslaggeving van nieuwsmedia te voorspellen door de aandachtscyclus van gebruikers in hun YouTube-kanalen te bestuderen. Met name ontwerpen we een rijke reeks functies die zijn afgeleid van de tijdelijke evolutie van het aantal weergaven, likes, afkeuringen en opmerkingen voor een video, die we vervolgens aggregeren naar kanaalniveau. Voor deze taak ontwikkelen en publiceren we een dataset met observaties van gebruikersaandacht op YouTube kanalen voor 489 nieuwsmedia. Onze experimenten tonen zowel complementariteit als aanzienlijke verbeteringen ten opzichte van state-of-the-art tekstuele representaties.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein neuartiges Framework vor, um die Tatsächlichkeit der Berichterstattung von Nachrichtenmedien vorherzusagen, indem wir die Aufmerksamkeitszyklen der Nutzer in ihren YouTube-Kanälen untersuchen. Insbesondere entwerfen wir eine Reihe von Funktionen, die aus der zeitlichen Entwicklung der Anzahl der Aufrufe, Likes, Abneigungen und Kommentare für ein Video abgeleitet werden, die wir dann auf Kanalebene aggregieren. Für die Aufgabe entwickeln und veröffentlichen wir einen Datensatz, der Beobachtungen der Nutzeraufmerksamkeit auf YouTube-Kanälen für 489-Nachrichtenmedien enthält. Unsere Experimente zeigen sowohl Komplementarität als auch erhebliche Verbesserungen gegenüber modernen Textdarstellungen.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan cadangan baru untuk memprediksikan faktualitas laporan dari media media dengan mempelajari siklus perhatian pengguna di saluran YouTube mereka. Terutama, kami merancang set karakteristik yang kaya yang berasal dari evolusi temporal dari jumlah pandangan, seperti, tidak suka, dan komentar untuk video, yang kemudian kita agregasikan ke tingkat saluran. Kami mengembangkan dan melepaskan set data untuk tugas ini, mengandung pengamatan perhatian pengguna di saluran YouTube untuk 489 media berita. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan komplementaritas dan peningkatan yang besar atas representation teks terbaik.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچوب جدید برای پیش\u200cبینی حقیقت گزارش رسانه\u200cهای خبری با مطالعه دوره\u200cهای توجه به کاربر در کانال\u200cهای یوتیوب خود. مخصوصا، ما یک مجموعه ثروتمند از ویدئو طراحی می کنیم که از تکامل موقتی تعداد دیدئو، مانند، ناخوشایند و توضیح برای ویدئو، که سپس به سطح کانال جمع می کنیم. ما یک مجموعه داده برای این کار را توسعه می\u200cکنیم و آزاد می\u200cکنیم، شامل مشاهده\u200cهای توجه به کاربر در کانال\u200cهای یوتیوب برای رسانه\u200cهای خبری 489 است. آزمایش\u200cهای ما هم تعدادی و بهترین اندازه\u200cای بر روی نمایش\u200cهای متن\u200cهنر را نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mfumo wa riwaya kwa kutabiri ukweli wa taarifa za vyombo vya habari kwa kusoma vituo vya habari vya watumiaji katika mitandao yao ya YouTube. Kwa hakika, tunaunda seti zenye utajiri zilizotokana na mabadiliko ya muda mfupi ya maoni, yanapenda, yanachukia, na maoni kwa video, ambazo ndizo tunaongeza kwenye kiwango cha televisheni. Tunaendeleza na kuachia seti ya taarifa kwa kazi hiyo, yenye maoni ya watumiaji wa mitandao ya YouTube kwa vyombo vya habari 489. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha ushirikiano na maendeleo makubwa zaidi ya uwakilishi wa hali ya sanaa.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe raamwerk vir die voorskou van die waarheid van raporteer van nuusmedia uitlegte deur die gebruiker aandagsyklusse in hul YouTube kanale te studeer. In spesifieke, ons ontwerp 'n ryk stel van funksies afgeleide van die tydelike evolusie van die aantal aansigte, hou van, ongelukkige en kommentaar vir 'n video, wat ons dan bymekaar tot die kanaal vlak. Ons ontwikkel en verlos 'n datastel vir die taak, bevat observasies van gebruiker aandag op YouTube kanale vir 489 nuusmedia. Ons eksperimente wys complementariteit en groottebaar verbeteringe oor staat van die kunstens tektuele voorstellings.", 'ko': '우리는 유튜브 채널의 사용자 주의 주기를 연구함으로써 뉴스 매체 보도의 진실성을 예측하는 새로운 틀을 제시했다.특히 우리는 풍부한 특징을 설계했다. 이러한 특징은 영상의 보기, 좋아하는 것, 싫어하는 것, 평론의 수량의 시간 변화에서 비롯된 것이다. 그리고 우리는 이를 채널 단계로 모았다.우리는 이 임무를 위해 489개의 뉴스 매체가 유튜브 채널에서 사용자의 주의력을 관찰하는 데이터 집합을 개발하고 발표했다.우리의 실험은 가장 선진적인 텍스트 표현법과 상호 보완성과 상당히 큰 개선을 증명하였다.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një kuadër të ri për parashikimin e faktit të raportimit të mediave të lajmeve duke studiuar ciklet e vëmendjes së përdoruesve në kanalet e tyre të YouTube. Ne veçanërisht, ne dizajnojmë një sërë të pasur karakteristike të nxjerra nga evolucioni temporal i numrit të pamjeve, pëlqejnë, nuk pëlqejnë, dhe komenteve për një video, e cila pastaj bashkohet në nivelin e kanalit. Ne zhvillojmë dhe lëshojmë një set të dhënash për këtë detyrë, duke përmbajtur vëzhgime të vëmendjes së përdoruesit në kanalet YouTube për 489 media lajmesh. Our experiments demonstrate both complementarity and sizable improvements over state-of-the-art textual representations.', 'tr': 'Biz Youtube kanallarynda qullanaryň üns döneglerini öwrenýäp bilýän täzeliklerini täzeliklerini çaklamak üçin bir roman çerçevesini teklip edip otyrys. Aýratyn bolsa, biz bir wideo üçin baý bir topar hasaplanýarys we soňra kanal derejesine toplanýarys. Biz bu zadyň üçin bir veri setini döredip, 489 täbliw medýdançalaryň YouTube kanallarynda üns berilýärler. Biziň deneylerimiz hem tamamlandyrylygy hem ölçülikli çykyşlaryň durumynda täze-täze-täze çykyşlaryny görkezýär.', 'az': 'Biz Youtube kanallarında istifadəçilərin ünsiyyətini təhsil edib xəbər məlumatlarını təsbit etmək üçün yeni bir qurğu təklif edirik. Özellikle, biz bir video üçün bənzər, bənzər, bənzər və şəkillərin müəyyənləşdirilməsindən yaratdığımız müddətli təhsil qururuq, sonra da kanal seviyesinə toplanırıq. Biz bu işin üçün verilən qurğunu təhsil edirik, 489 xəbər mediyi üçün YouTube kanallarında istifadəçilərin gözləmələrini daxil edirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin', 'bn': 'ইউটিউব চ্যানেলে ব্যবহারকারীদের মনোযোগ সাইকেল পড়ার মাধ্যমে সংবাদ প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্রতিবেদনের বাস্তবতা প্রতিবেদনের বাস্ত বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি ভিডিওের জন্য একটি সমৃদ্ধ বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্যের ডিজাইন করি যা দেখা যাচ্ছে সাময়িক পরিবর্তনের সংখ্যা, পছন্দ, অপছন্দ করে এবং মন্তব্য করা হয়েছে, য ৪৮৯ সংবাদ প্রচার মাধ্যমের জন্য ইউটিউব চ্যানেলে ব্যবহারকারীদের মনোযোগ প্রদান করা হয়েছে আমরা এই কাজের জন্য একটি ডাটাসেট আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে তারা দেশের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতি সমতুল্য এবং বড় উন্নতি প্রদর্শন করছে।', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր կառուցվածք, որպեսզի կանխատեսենք լրատվական լրատվամիջոցների տեղեկատվության փաստացիալությունը՝ ուսումնասիրելով օգտագործողների ուշադրության ցիկլերը իրենց YouTube-ում: Մասնավորապես, մենք ստեղծում ենք մի հարուստ հատկություններ, որոնք առաջացել են տեսանկյունից, ինչպես օրինակ, անհավանելի տեսանկյունից և մեկնաբանություններից տեսանյութի համար, որը հետո միավորվում է կանանցի մակարդակի վրա: Մենք զարգացնում ենք և հրապարակում ենք տվյալների համակարգ, որը պարունակում է օգտագործողների ուշադրությունը YouTube-ի միջոցներում 489 լրատվամիջոցների համար: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս բազմազանությունը և նշանակալի բարելավումները ամենաբարձր տեքստային ներկայացումների նկատմամբ:', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novi okvir za predviđanje činjenice izvještavanja novinskih medija proučavanjem ciklusa pozornosti korisnika u svojim YouTube kanalima. Posebno, mi dizajniramo bogat set karakteristika iz temporalne evolucije broja pogleda, poput, neprijatelja i komentara za video, koji se onda okupimo na nivo kanala. Razvijamo i objavljujemo set podataka za zadatak, sadržeći promatranje pozornosti korisnika na YouTube kanalima za 489 novinskih medija. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju komplementarnost i velike poboljšanje u odnosu na tekstualne predstave države umjetnosti.', 'am': 'የዜና ሚዲያ አውታር አካባቢዎች በዩቱዩብ ቻናሎች ላይ የጥያቄ ጽሑፎችን በማስተምር የመረጃ ውይይትን ለመቀበል የመረጃ መሠረት እናሳልቃለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የዓይኖችን ቁጥር፣ የሚወድዱ፣ የጠሉ እና ለቪዲዮ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ 489 የዜና አውታር ሚዲያዎች ላይ የተጠቃሚዎችን ማስታወቂያ የሚያደርግ የዳታ ዘይት እናስገድዳለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን ትክክለኛ እና ትልቅ ትክክለኛ ትክክለኛ ትክክለኛ ትክክለኛዎችን ማሳየት ነው፡፡', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uudenlaista kehystä uutiskanavien raportoinnin tosiasiallisuuden ennustamiseksi tutkimalla käyttäjien huomiosyklejä niiden YouTube-kanavissa. Suunnittelemme erityisesti monipuolisen joukon ominaisuuksia, jotka perustuvat videon katselukertojen, tykkäysten, inhottavien ja kommenttien ajalliseen kehitykseen, jotka sitten yhdistämme kanavatasolle. Kehitämme ja julkaisemme 489 uutismedialle aineiston, joka sisältää havaintoja käyttäjien huomiosta YouTube-kanavissa. Kokeemme osoittavat sekä täydentävyyttä että merkittäviä parannuksia viimeisimpiin tekstiesityksiin verrattuna.', 'ca': "Proposem un nou marc per predir la realitat de la notificació de publicacions de mitjans de notícies estudiant els cicles d'atenció dels usuaris als seus canals de YouTube. En particular, dissenyem un conjunt ric de característiques derivats de l'evolució temporal del nombre de vistes, com, no agrada, i comentaris d'un vídeo, que llavors agrupam al nivell del canal. Desenvolvem i publicam un conjunt de dades per a la tasca, que conté observacions d'atenció dels usuaris a canals YouTube per 489 mitjans de notícies. Our experiments demonstrate both complementarity and sizable improvements over state-of-the-art textual representations.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nový rámec pro predikci skutečnosti reportingu zpravodajských médií prostřednictvím studia cyklů pozornosti uživatelů na jejich YouTube kanálech. Konkrétně navrhujeme bohatou sadu funkcí odvozených z časového vývoje počtu zobrazení, líbí se mi, nelíbí se a komentářů pro video, které pak agregováme na úroveň kanálu. Pro tento úkol vytváříme a uvolňujeme datovou sadu obsahující pozorování pozornosti uživatelů na kanálech YouTube pro 489 zpravodajská média. Naše experimenty demonstrují jak komplementaritu, tak značná zlepšení oproti nejmodernějším textovým reprezentacím.', 'et': "Pakume välja uuendusliku raamistiku uudistemeediakanalite aruandluse faktilisuse prognoosimiseks, uurides kasutajate tähelepanutsüklit nende YouTube'i kanalites. Eelkõige kujundame rikkaliku kogumi funktsioone, mis tulenevad video vaadete, meeldimiste, mitte meeldimiste ja kommentaaride ajalisest arengust, mis seejärel koondame kanali tasandile. Töötame välja ja avaldame 489 uudistemeediale andmekogumi, mis sisaldab vaatlusi kasutaja tähelepanu kohta YouTube kanalites. Meie eksperimendid näitavad nii vastastikust täiendavust kui ka märkimisväärseid parandusi kaasaegsete tekstikujunduste suhtes.", 'jv': "Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan nganggo kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang pengaturan tambah sing nyimpen YouTube. Juara-Juara, awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sistem barêng-barêng langgar kuwi kawula nggawe evolusi winih sampek dadi, koyok, seneng pisan lan komentar kanggo video, sing ngakus tambah kuwi nggawe dolanan nambah. Awak dhéwé nggawe lan mbukak dataset kanggo nggawe nggawe Perintah pengguna-pengguna kuwi YouTube channels kanggo media 489. Where's the text ?", 'sk': 'Predlagamo nov okvir za napovedovanje dejanskega poročanja novinarskih medijev s preučevanjem ciklov pozornosti uporabnikov v njihovih YouTube kanalih. Zlasti oblikujemo bogat nabor funkcij, ki izhajajo iz časovnega razvoja števila ogledov, všečkov, nevšeč in komentarjev za video, ki jih nato združimo na raven kanala. Za to nalogo razvijamo in objavljamo nabor podatkov, ki vsebuje opazovanja pozornosti uporabnikov na YouTube kanalih za 489 medijev novic. Naši eksperimenti dokazujejo komplementarnost in velike izboljšave nad najsodobnejšimi besedilnimi reprezentacijami.', 'ha': 'We propose a novel framework for predicting the factuality of reporting of news media outlets by studying the user attention cycles in their YouTube channels.  Kayyai, Munã ƙayyade wasu masu kyauta masu yawa wanda aka zo daga juyi-bayani na ƙayyadadde, misãlai, kuma mislike, kuma masu yarda da mawaƙo ga video, da haka tuna haɗa zuwa daraja na kanal. Tuna developer da kuma Muke sakar da wani dataset wa aikin, yana da kula ga masu amfani da shi kan kanallan YouTube na 489. Kayan jarrabõnmu sun nũna kammala da mafaniki mai girma kan halin-rubuci-na-sanar.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציעים מסגרת חדשה לחזות את העובדות של דיווחים על מקומות תקשורת חדשות על ידי לימוד את מחזור תשומת לב המשתמשים בערוצי יוטיוב שלהם. In particular, we design a rich set of features derived from the temporal evolution of the number of views, likes, dislikes, and comments for a video, which we then aggregate to the channel level.  אנו מפתחים ופרסמים קבוצת נתונים למשימה, שמכילים צפיות של תשומת לב המשתמש בערוצי יוטיוב ל-489 תקשורת חדשות. הניסויים שלנו מראים שיפורים משלמים וגם שיפורים משמעותיים מעל מייצגים טקסטיים חדשים.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་གསར་གཏོད་གཞུང་ཞིག་གིས་སྔོན་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་པར་གསར་འགོད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ཡུ་ཌོས་ཁོངས་ནང་གི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ག དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་མི་འདུག། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ཞིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་རྩལ་ཆོས་དང་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ཁག་དང་མཐོང་ནུས'}
{'en': 'A Psychologically Informed Part-of-Speech Analysis of Depression in Social Media', 'ar': 'تحليل جزء من الكلام مستنير نفسيا للاكتئاب في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي', 'es': 'Un análisis de parte del habla con información psicológica de la depresión en las redes sociales', 'pt': 'Uma análise de parte do discurso psicologicamente informada da depressão nas mídias sociais', 'fr': 'Une analyse de la partie du discours psychologiquement éclairée de la dépression dans les médias sociaux', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアにおける抑うつの心理学的情報に基づいた部分的な言語分析', 'zh': '社交媒体中抑郁症心信息词性析', 'ru': 'Психологически обоснованный анализ депрессии в социальных сетях', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया में अवसाद का एक मनोवैज्ञानिक रूप से सूचित भाग-का-भाषण विश्लेषण', 'ga': 'Anailís Cuid-de-Urlabhra ar an Dúlagar sna Meáin Shóisialta atá Eolas Síceolaíoch', 'ka': 'პოქონოლოგიურად ინფორმაციული სიტყვის ანალიზაციის ნაწილი სოციალური მედიაში', 'el': 'Μια ψυχολογικά ενημερωμένη ανάλυση μέρους ομιλίας της κατάθλιψης στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης', 'hu': 'A depresszió pszichológiailag tájékoztatott rész-of-speech elemzése a közösségi médiában', 'kk': 'Психологикалық мәліметті айтқан сөздердің бір бөлігі социалдық медиақтардағы депрессия талдауы', 'it': "Un'analisi parte-del-discorso psicologicamente informata della depressione nei social media", 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയിലെ ഡിപ്രഷനുകളിലെ ഒരു സൈക്കോളജിക്കല്\u200d അറിയിപ്പുള്ള ഭാഗം', 'mt': 'Analiżi ta’ Dipressjoni fil-Midja Soċjali ta’ Parti ta’ Diskors Informata Psikoloġikament', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэлбэрийн сэтгэл зүйн мэдээлэл', 'lt': 'A Psychologically Informed Part-of-Speech Analysis of Depression in Social Media', 'mk': 'Психолошки информирана анализа на дел од говорот на депресијата во социјалните медиуми', 'sr': 'Psihološki informativan dio govorne analize depresije u socijalnim medijima', 'si': 'Name', 'pl': 'Psychologicznie poinformowana część mowy analiza depresji w mediach społecznościowych', 'no': 'Name', 'so': 'Analyse of Depression in bulshada', 'sv': 'En psykologiskt informerad del-av-tal analys av depression i sociala medier', 'ro': 'O analiză informatică psihologică a depresiei în rețelele sociale', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا میں دھوکا کا ذهن کے ذریعے معلوم ہوا', 'ta': 'A Psychologically Informed Part-of-Speech Analysis of Depression in Social Media', 'vi': 'A tâm lý được phổ biến Một phần của bài diễn văn phân tích Suy sụp trong phương tiện xã hội', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Психологически информиран анализ на депресията в социалните медии', 'da': 'En psykologisk informeret del-af-tale analyse af depression i sociale medier', 'hr': 'Psihološki informiran dio govorne analize depresije u socijalnim medijima', 'nl': 'Een psychologisch onderbouwde deel-van-spraak analyse van depressie in sociale media', 'id': 'Analisi Depresi di Media Sosial yang Diinformasikan Secara Psikologi', 'de': 'Eine psychologisch fundierte Part-of-Speech Analyse von Depressionen in Social Media', 'ko': '소셜 미디어에서 우울증의 심리적 인지적 단어성 분석', 'fa': 'یک بخشی از تحلیل سخنرانی روانشناسی در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی', 'tr': 'Sosyal Medýdançalaryň Depressiýasynyň Psikolojik Maglumatlarynyň Bir parçasi', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Kuzungumza kwa Kiaikolojia', 'am': 'የሲኮሎጂ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የድምፅ አካላት የንግግር ክፍል', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում դեպրեսիայի հոգեբանորեն տեղեկացված խոսքի մասի վերլուծությունը', 'sq': 'Një Analizë e Depresionit në Mediat Sociale Pjesë e Fjalës të Informuar Psikologjikisht', 'az': "Sosyal Mediyalarda Depresiya'nın psikolojik bilgili Sözünün Bölümü Analizi", 'cs': 'Psychologicky informovaná část řeči analýza deprese v sociálních médiích', 'et': 'Psühholoogiliselt informeeritud kõneosa analüüs depressioonist sotsiaalmeedias', 'ca': 'Un anàlisi psicològicament informat de la depressió dels mitjans socials', 'bs': 'Psihološki informiran dio govorne analize depresije u socijalnim medijima', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে চাপের বিশ্লেষণের একটি মানসিকোলজিক তথ্য প্রদান করা অংশ', 'fi': 'Psykologisesti informoitu osa-puheen analyysi masennuksesta sosiaalisessa mediassa', 'jv': 'Pesokologi rak bahi-tanggal Karo Ketokakno Debresan kanggo Media Soale', 'ha': 'Analyze of depression in society', 'sk': 'Psihološko informirana analiza dela govora depresije v socialnih medijih', 'he': 'Analysis of Depression in Social Media', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག་གི་གཏོང་འཕེལ་གྱི་ཆ་ཤས་ཆ་ཤས་ལ།'}
{'en': 'In this work, we provide an extensive part-of-speech analysis of the discourse of social media users with depression. Research in psychology revealed that depressed users tend to be self-focused, more preoccupied with themselves and ruminate more about their lives and emotions. Our work aims to make use of large-scale datasets and computational methods for a quantitative exploration of discourse. We use the publicly available depression dataset from the Early Risk Prediction on the Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 and extract part-of-speech features and several indices based on them. Our results reveal statistically significant differences between the depressed and non-depressed individuals confirming findings from the existing psychology literature. Our work provides insights regarding the way in which depressed individuals are expressing themselves on social media platforms, allowing for better-informed computational models to help monitor and prevent mental illnesses.', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل ، نقدم تحليلًا مكثفًا لجزء من الكلام لخطاب مستخدمي وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي المصابين بالاكتئاب. كشفت الأبحاث في علم النفس أن المستخدمين المكتئبين يميلون إلى التركيز على الذات ، وأكثر انشغالًا بأنفسهم ، ويفكرون أكثر في حياتهم وعواطفهم. يهدف عملنا إلى الاستفادة من مجموعات البيانات والأساليب الحسابية واسعة النطاق للاستكشاف الكمي للخطاب. نستخدم مجموعة بيانات الاكتئاب المتاحة للجمهور من التنبؤ المبكر بالمخاطر على ورشة الإنترنت (eRisk) 2018 واستخراج ميزات جزء من الكلام والعديد من المؤشرات بناءً عليها. تكشف نتائجنا عن فروق ذات دلالة إحصائية بين الأفراد المصابين بالاكتئاب وغير المكتئبين والتي تؤكد النتائج من أدبيات علم النفس الموجودة. يقدم عملنا رؤى فيما يتعلق بالطريقة التي يعبر بها الأفراد المصابون بالاكتئاب عن أنفسهم على منصات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، مما يسمح بنماذج حسابية أكثر استنارة للمساعدة في مراقبة الأمراض العقلية والوقاية منها.', 'pt': 'Neste trabalho, apresentamos uma extensa análise parcial do discurso de usuários de mídias sociais com depressão. Pesquisas em psicologia revelaram que os usuários deprimidos tendem a ser autocentrados, mais preocupados consigo mesmos e ruminam mais sobre suas vidas e emoções. Nosso trabalho visa fazer uso de conjuntos de dados de grande escala e métodos computacionais para uma exploração quantitativa do discurso. Usamos o conjunto de dados de depressão disponível publicamente do Early Risk Prediction on the Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 e extraímos recursos de parte do discurso e vários índices com base neles. Nossos resultados revelam diferenças estatisticamente significativas entre os indivíduos deprimidos e não deprimidos, confirmando os achados da literatura de psicologia existente. Nosso trabalho fornece insights sobre a maneira como os indivíduos deprimidos estão se expressando nas plataformas de mídia social, permitindo modelos computacionais mais bem informados para ajudar a monitorar e prevenir doenças mentais.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous proposons une analyse approfondie des parties du discours des utilisateurs de médias sociaux souffrant de dépression. Des recherches en psychologie ont révélé que les consommateurs déprimés ont tendance à être centrés sur eux-mêmes, plus préoccupés par eux-mêmes et à ruminer davantage sur leur vie et leurs émotions. Notre travail vise à utiliser des ensembles de données et des méthodes informatiques à grande échelle pour une exploration quantitative du discours. Nous utilisons l'ensemble de données sur la dépression accessible au public du Early Risk Prediction on the Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 et extrayons des caractéristiques partielles de discours et plusieurs indices basés sur celles-ci. Nos résultats révèlent des différences statistiquement significatives entre les personnes déprimées et non déprimées, confirmant les résultats de la littérature psychologique existante. Notre travail fournit des informations sur la façon dont les personnes déprimées s'expriment sur les plateformes de médias sociaux, permettant ainsi de disposer de modèles informatiques mieux informés pour aider à surveiller et à prévenir les maladies mentales.", 'es': 'En este trabajo, ofrecemos un amplio análisis parcial del discurso de los usuarios de redes sociales con depresión. La investigación en psicología reveló que los usuarios deprimidos tienden a centrarse en sí mismos, a preocuparse más por sí mismos y a reflexionar más sobre sus vidas y emociones. Nuestro trabajo tiene como objetivo hacer uso de conjuntos de datos a gran escala y métodos computacionales para una exploración cuantitativa del discurso. Utilizamos el conjunto de datos de depresión disponible públicamente del Taller de predicción temprana de riesgos en Internet (ERisk) 2018 y extraemos características de parte del discurso y varios índices basados en ellas. Nuestros resultados revelan diferencias estadísticamente significativas entre los individuos deprimidos y no deprimidos, lo que confirma los hallazgos de la literatura de psicología existente. Nuestro trabajo proporciona información sobre la forma en que las personas deprimidas se expresan en las plataformas de redes sociales, lo que permite modelos computacionales mejor informados para ayudar a monitorear y prevenir las enfermedades mentales.', 'ja': '本研究では、うつ病を抱えるソーシャルメディアユーザーの話題について、広範囲にわたるスピーチ部分の分析を提供する。心理学の研究によると、抑うつ状態のユーザーは、自己に集中し、自分自身に集中し、自分の人生や感情についてもっと反省する傾向があることが明らかになりました。私たちの研究は、大規模なデータセットと計算方法を使用して、話の定量的な探求を行うことを目的としています。私たちは、インターネットワークショップ（ eRisk ） 2018の早期リスク予測から公的に入手可能なうつ病データセットを使用し、言語機能の一部とそれらに基づいたいくつかの指標を抽出します。私たちの結果は、既存の心理学文献からの発見を確認するうつ病と非うつ病の間で統計的に有意な違いを明らかにします。私たちの研究は、抑うつ状態にある個人がソーシャルメディアプラットフォーム上で自分自身を表現する方法についての洞察を提供し、精神疾患の監視と予防に役立つ情報に基づいた計算モデルを可能にします。', 'hi': 'इस काम में, हम अवसाद के साथ सोशल मीडिया उपयोगकर्ताओं के प्रवचन का एक व्यापक भाग-भाषण विश्लेषण प्रदान करते हैं। मनोविज्ञान में अनुसंधान से पता चला है कि उदास उपयोगकर्ता आत्म-केंद्रित होते हैं, खुद के साथ अधिक व्यस्त होते हैं और अपने जीवन और भावनाओं के बारे में अधिक जुगाली करते हैं। हमारे काम का उद्देश्य प्रवचन की मात्रात्मक खोज के लिए बड़े पैमाने पर डेटासेट और कम्प्यूटेशनल तरीकों का उपयोग करना है। हम इंटरनेट वर्कशॉप (eRisk) 2018 पर प्रारंभिक जोखिम भविष्यवाणी से सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध अवसाद डेटासेट का उपयोग करते हैं और उनके आधार पर पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच सुविधाओं और कई सूचकांकों को निकालते हैं। हमारे परिणाम मौजूदा मनोविज्ञान साहित्य से निष्कर्षों की पुष्टि करने वाले उदास और गैर-उदास व्यक्तियों के बीच सांख्यिकीय रूप से महत्वपूर्ण अंतर प्रकट करते हैं। हमारा काम उस तरीके के बारे में अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करता है जिसमें उदास व्यक्ति सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफार्मों पर खुद को व्यक्त कर रहे हैं, जिससे मानसिक बीमारियों की निगरानी और रोकथाम में मदद करने के लिए बेहतर-सूचित कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल की अनुमति मिलती है।', 'zh': '于是抑郁症之社交媒体用户,博析词性言。 心理学研明,抑郁之用户,往往以自为心,益自专于己,多思生理。 我们的事务要在大数据集和计算法对话定量探索。 用2018年互联网研讨会(eRisk)早占公抑郁症数集,并取其词性特征指数。 考实昭然,个体统计学显异,证心理学文献。 吾事有抑郁症于社交媒体台之上,许以明算助监测防精神疾病。', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы приводим обширный частичный анализ речи дискурса пользователей социальных сетей с депрессией. Исследования в области психологии показали, что депрессивные пользователи, как правило, сосредоточены на себе, больше заняты собой и больше размышляют о своей жизни и эмоциях. Наша работа направлена на использование крупномасштабных наборов данных и вычислительных методов для количественного исследования дискурса. Мы используем общедоступный набор данных о депрессии из Раннего прогнозирования риска на Интернет-мастерской (eRisk) 2018 и извлекаем части речевых функций и несколько индексов на их основе. Наши результаты выявляют статистически значимые различия между депрессивными и недепрессивными индивидуумами, подтверждающие выводы из существующей литературы по психологии. Наша работа дает представление о том, как люди с депрессией выражают себя на платформах социальных сетей, позволяя лучше информированным вычислительным моделям помогать отслеживать и предотвращать психические заболевания.', 'ga': 'Sa saothar seo, cuirimid anailís fhairsing pháirteach chainte ar fáil ar dhioscúrsa úsáideoirí na meán sóisialta a bhfuil dúlagar orthu. Léirigh taighde sa tsíceolaíocht go mbíonn claonadh ag úsáideoirí depressed a bheith féin-dírithe, níos mó imní orthu féin agus níos mó a rá faoi a saolta agus mothúcháin. Tá sé mar aidhm ag ár gcuid oibre úsáid a bhaint as tacair shonraí ar mhórscála agus as modhanna ríomhaireachtúla chun iniúchadh cainníochtúil a dhéanamh ar dhioscúrsa. Bainimid úsáid as an tacar sonraí dúlagar atá ar fáil go poiblí ón gCeardlann um Réamhthuar Riosca Luath ar an Idirlíon (eRisk) 2018 agus bainimid amach gnéithe cuid cainte agus roinnt innéacsanna bunaithe orthu. Nochtann ár dtorthaí difríochtaí suntasacha staitistiúla idir na daoine aonair dubhach agus neamh-dúlagar, rud a dhearbhaíonn torthaí na litríochta síceolaíochta atá ann cheana féin. Soláthraíonn ár gcuid oibre léargais maidir leis an mbealach a bhfuil daoine faoi dúlagar ag cur in iúl iad féin ar ardáin na meán sóisialta, ag ligean do mhúnlaí ríomhaireachta níos eolasaí chun cabhrú le monatóireacht agus cosc a chur ar mheabhairghalar.', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ განვითარებთ სოციალური მედია მომხმარებლის დიკოსუფური ანალიზაციის გარეშე. ფსიქოლოგიაში განსხვავებულია, რომ დემოპრესირებული მომხმარებელი უფრო მუშაობელია, უფრო მუშაობელია, და უფრო მუშაობელია და უფრო მუშაობელია ცხოვრე ჩვენი სამუშაო უნდა გამოყენოთ დიდი მაგალითი მონაცემების და კომპუტაციალური მეტისების გამოყენება დისკურსების კონტაქტიური გამოყენება. ჩვენ 2018-ის ინტერნეტი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო (eRisk) განსაზღვრებული დეპრესციის მონაცემები გამოყენებთ და გამოყენებთ სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მონაცემებ ჩვენი წარმოდგენები სტატისტიკურად მნიშვნელოვანი განსხვავებების განსხვავება დეპრესესი და არ-ევპრესესი ადამიანების განსხვავებას, რომლებიც მიმდინარე სი ჩვენი სამუშაო დავიწყება შესახებ როგორ ევპრესირებული ადამიანები სოციალური მედიაო პლატატურებში გამოსახულებენ, რომლებიც უფრო უფრო ინფორმაციული კომპუტაციალური მოდელების', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában átfogó beszédrész elemzést nyújtunk a depressziós közösségi média felhasználók diskurzusáról. A pszichológiai kutatások azt mutatták, hogy a depressziós felhasználók hajlamosak önösszpontosítani, jobban elfoglalják magukat, és többet kérdeznek életükről és érzelmeikről. Munkánk célja, hogy nagyszabású adathalmazokat és számítástechnikai módszereket használjunk fel a diskurzus kvantitatív feltárására. Az Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 korai kockázatelőrejelzésének nyilvánosan hozzáférhető depressziós adatkészletét használjuk fel, és ezek alapján kivonjuk a beszédrészes funkciókat és számos indexet. Eredményeink statisztikailag szignifikáns különbségeket mutatnak a depressziós és nem depressziós egyének között, amelyek megerősítik a meglévő pszichológiai szakirodalom eredményeit. Munkánk betekintést nyújt arra vonatkozóan, hogy a depressziós egyének miként fejezik ki magukat a közösségi média platformokon, lehetővé téve, hogy jobban tájékozott számítástechnikai modellek segítségével figyelemmel kísérhetők és megelőzhetők a mentális betegségek.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρέχουμε μια εκτενή ανάλυση του λόγου των χρηστών κοινωνικών μέσων με κατάθλιψη. Έρευνα στην ψυχολογία αποκάλυψε ότι οι καταθλιπτικοί χρήστες τείνουν να είναι αυτοσυγκεντρωμένοι, περισσότερο απασχολημένοι με τον εαυτό τους και να σκέφτονται περισσότερο για τη ζωή και τα συναισθήματά τους. Στόχος της εργασίας μας είναι η χρήση μεγάλων συνόλων δεδομένων και υπολογιστικών μεθόδων για μια ποσοτική διερεύνηση του λόγου. Χρησιμοποιούμε το δημοσίως διαθέσιμο σύνολο δεδομένων κατάθλιψης από την Πρώιμη Πρόβλεψη Κινδύνου στο Εργαστήρι Διαδικτύου 2018 και εξάγουμε χαρακτηριστικά τμήματος ομιλίας και αρκετούς δείκτες με βάση αυτά. Τα αποτελέσματα μας αποκαλύπτουν στατιστικά σημαντικές διαφορές μεταξύ των καταθλιπτικών και μη καταθλιπτικών ατόμων επιβεβαιώνοντας ευρήματα από την υπάρχουσα ψυχολογική βιβλιογραφία. Η εργασία μας παρέχει πληροφορίες σχετικά με τον τρόπο με τον οποίο τα άτομα με κατάθλιψη εκφράζονται στις πλατφόρμες κοινωνικών μέσων, επιτρέποντας καλύτερα ενημερωμένα υπολογιστικά μοντέλα για την παρακολούθηση και πρόληψη ψυχικών ασθενειών.', 'lt': 'In this work, we provide an extensive part-of-speech analysis of the discourse of social media users with depression.  Psichikos tyrimai parodė, kad depresijos vartotojai dažniausiai yra savarankiški, labiau susirūpinę savimi ir daugiau kalba apie savo gyvenimą ir emocijas. Mūsų darbu siekiama naudoti didelio masto duomenų rinkinius ir skaičiavimo metodus kiekybiniam diskurso tyrimui. Naudojame visuomenei prieinamą depresijos duomenų rinkinį iš 2018 m. interneto seminaro (eRisk) ankstyvosios rizikos prognozės ir ištraukiame kalbos dalis bei keletą jų pagrindu pagrįstų indeksų. Mūsų rezultatai rodo statistiškai reikšmingus skirtumus tarp depresijos neturinčių ir depresijos neturinčių asmenų, patvirtinančius esamos psichologinės literatūros duomenis. Mūsų darbe pateikiama informacija apie tai, kaip deprimiški asmenys išreiškia save social in ės žiniasklaidos platformose, leidžiant geriau informuoti skaičiavimo modelius, kurie padėtų stebėti ir užkirsti kelią psichikos ligoms.', 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс ішінде, социалдық медиа пайдаланушылардың депрессиясының бөлігін анализ береміз. Психологиялық зерттеулердің депресс пайдаланушылары өзінің көздеріне көздеген, өзінің өмірі мен емоциялары туралы көптеген және көптеген жағдайлары туралы көптеген. Біздің жұмысымыз директордың санативті зерттеу үлкен деректер жиындарын және есептеу әдістерін қолданатын. Біз 2018-нің Интернет жұмысының алдындағы қауіпсіздік алдындағы депрессия деректерін қолданып, сөйлеу бөлігін және оның негізінде бірнеше индекстерді тарқатып алып тастаймыз. Біздің нәтижелеріміз депресс және депресс емес адамдар арасындағы статистикалық түрлі айырмашылықтарды көрсетеді. Бұл психологиялық литературасынан табылған тапсырмалар. Біздің жұмысамыз депрессиялық адамдарды социалдық медиа платформасында көрсету арқылы, жақсы мәліметті компьютерлік үлгілерін бақылау және психикалық ауруларды қалау үшін көмектесу және қала', 'ms': 'Dalam kerja ini, kami menyediakan sebahagian dari analisis ucapan penjelasan pengguna media sosial dengan depresi. Penelitian dalam psikologi menunjukkan bahawa pengguna tertekan cenderung untuk fokus diri, lebih sibuk dengan diri mereka sendiri dan merayu lebih mengenai kehidupan dan emosi mereka. Our work aims to make use of large-scale datasets and computational methods for a quantitative exploration of discourse.  Kami menggunakan set data depresi yang tersedia secara umum dari Prediksi Risiko Awal di Workshop Internet (eRisk) 2018 dan mengekstrak sebahagian dari ciri-ciri ucapan dan beberapa indeks berdasarkan mereka. Hasil kami menunjukkan perbezaan statistik yang signifikan antara individu yang tertekan dan tidak tertekan yang mengesahkan penemuan dari literatur psikologi yang ada. Kerja kami memberikan pandangan mengenai cara individu yang tertekan mengekspresikan diri pada platform media sosial, membolehkan model komputasi yang lebih diberitahu untuk membantu mengawasi dan mencegah penyakit mental.', 'mk': 'Во оваа работа, ние обезбедуваме екстремна анализа на делот од говорот на дискурсот на корисниците на социјалните медиуми со депресија. Research in psychology revealed that depressed users tend to be self-focused, more preoccupied with themselves and ruminate more about their lives and emotions.  Нашата работа има за цел да се искористи голем број на податоци и компјутациски методи за квантитивно истражување на дискурсот. Ние го користиме јавно достапниот компјутер на податоци за депресија од предвидувањето на раните ризици на Интернет Workshop (eRisk) 2018 и извлекуваме дел од говорните карактеристики и неколку индекси базирани на нив. Нашите резултати откриваат статистички значајни разлики помеѓу депресивните и недепресивните поединци кои потврдуваат откритија од постоечката психолошка литература. Нашата работа обезбедува информации за начинот на кој депресивните поединци се изразуваат на платформите на социјалните медиуми, овозможувајќи подобро информирани компјутерски модели за да помогнат во мониторингот и спречувањето на менталните болести.', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെ വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വിശേഷഭാഗവും നല്\u200dകു സൈക്കോളജിയിലെ പരിശോധന വെളിപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നുവെന്തെന്നാല്\u200d ഡിപ്രസ്സ് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്ക നമ്മുടെ ജോലി വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളും കണക്കുണ്ടാക്കാനുള്ള രീതികളും ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. സംസാരം നിര ഇന്റര്\u200dക്ക് വര്\u200dക്ഷക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ആദ്യത്തെ റിസ്ക് പ്രിക്കേഷന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രസിദ്ധമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. സം നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സൈക്കോളജി സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d ഉറപ്പിച്ച് വരുത്തുന്ന വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d വെള നമ്മുടെ ജോലിയില്\u200d വ്യക്തിക്കാര്\u200d സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമില്\u200d സ്വയം പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്ന വഴിയെക്കുറിച്ച് ഉള്\u200dക്കാഴ്ചയുണ്ട്. അതി', 'mt': 'F’dan ix-xogħol, nagħtu analiżi estensiva tal-parti tad-diskors tal-utenti tal-midja soċjali bid-depressjoni. Ir-riċerka fil-psikoloġija żvelat li l-utenti depressi għandhom it-tendenza li jkunu ffukati lilhom infushom, aktar preokkupati magħhom infushom u jixtarru aktar dwar il-ħajja u l-emozzjonijiet tagħhom. Ix-xogħol tagħna għandu l-għan li jagħmel użu minn settijiet ta’ dejta fuq skala kbira u metodi komputattivi għal esplorazzjoni kwantitattiva tad-diskors. Aħna nużaw is-sett tad-dejta disponibbli pubblikament dwar id-depressjoni mit-Tbassir tar-Riskju Bikriju fuq il-Workshop tal-Internet (eRisk) 2018 u nieħdu parti mid-diskors u diversi indiċijiet ibbażati fuqhom. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru differenzi statistikament sinifikanti bejn l-individwi depressi u dawk mhux depressi li jikkonfermaw is-sejbiet mil-letteratura psikoloġika eżistenti. Ix-xogħol tagħna jipprovdi fehmiet dwar il-mod kif individwi depressi qed jesprimu ruħhom fuq pjattaformi tal-midja soċjali, li jippermettu mudelli komputattivi infurmati aħjar biex jgħinu jimmonitorjaw u jipprevjenu mard mentali.', 'it': "In questo lavoro, forniamo un'ampia analisi part-of-speech del discorso degli utenti dei social media con depressione. La ricerca in psicologia ha rivelato che gli utenti depressi tendono ad essere auto-focalizzati, più preoccupati con se stessi e a riflettere di più sulle loro vite e sulle loro emozioni. Il nostro lavoro mira a utilizzare dataset su larga scala e metodi computazionali per un'esplorazione quantitativa del discorso. Usiamo il set di dati sulla depressione disponibile pubblicamente dal Early Risk Prediction on the Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 ed estraiamo funzionalità part-of-speech e diversi indici basati su di esse. I nostri risultati rivelano differenze statisticamente significative tra gli individui depressi e non depressi confermando i risultati della letteratura psicologica esistente. Il nostro lavoro fornisce approfondimenti sul modo in cui le persone depresse si esprimono sulle piattaforme di social media, consentendo modelli computazionali più informati per aiutare a monitorare e prevenire le malattie mentali.", 'mn': 'Энэ ажил дээр бид нийгмийн медиа хэрэглэгчдийн хэлэлцээний талаар дэлхийн нэг хэсэг анализ өгдөг. Сэтгэл судалгааны судалгаагаар депресс хэрэглэгчид өөрсдийгөө төвлөрүүлж, өөрсдийгөө илүү анхааралтай, амьдралын, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн талаар илүү дуугарч байгааг харуулсан. Бидний ажлын зорилго нь ярианы хэмжээний судалгаанд том хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангууд, тооны арга хэрэглэх зорилго юм. Бид 2018 оны Интернет Workshop (eRisk) дээр анхны эрсдэлтэй хэмжээний хэсэг болон олон индексүүдийг ашигладаг. Бидний үр дүнд суурь сэтгэл зүйн уран зохиолынхаа олдлыг дэмждэг депресс болон сэтгэл хөдлөлгүй хүмүүсийн хоорондын статистикийн чухал ялгааг харуулдаг. Бидний ажил сэтгэл санааны өвчнүүдийг ажиглаж, сэтгэл санааны өвчнүүдийг зогсоохын тулд өөрсдийгөө нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэлбэрээр илэрхийлж байгаа хэлбэрийн тухай ойлголт гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy przeprowadzamy obszerną analizę dyskursu użytkowników mediów społecznościowych z depresją. Badania psychologiczne wykazały, że przygnębioni użytkownicy mają tendencję do skupienia się na sobie, bardziej zajęci samym sobą i zastanawiają się nad swoim życiem i emocjami. Nasza praca ma na celu wykorzystanie dużych zbiorów danych i metod obliczeniowych do ilościowego eksploracji dyskursu. Wykorzystujemy publicznie dostępny zestaw danych depresyjnych z Warsztatu Wczesnej Prognozy Ryzyka w Internecie (eRisk) 2018 i ekstraktujemy na nich funkcje części mowy oraz kilka indeksów. Nasze wyniki ujawniają istotne statystycznie różnice między osobami depresyjnymi i niedepresyjnymi potwierdzając wyniki z istniejącej literatury psychologicznej. Nasza praca dostarcza informacji dotyczących sposobu, w jaki osoby z depresją wyrażają się na platformach mediów społecznościowych, pozwalając na lepiej poinformowane modele obliczeniowe pomagające monitorować i zapobiegać chorobom psychicznym.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, oferim o analiză amplă a discursului utilizatorilor de social media cu depresie. Cercetările în psihologie au arătat că utilizatorii deprimați tind să fie auto-concentrați, mai preocupați de ei înșiși și să rumegeze mai mult despre viața și emoțiile lor. Activitatea noastră își propune să utilizeze seturi de date la scară largă și metode de calcul pentru o explorare cantitativă a discursului. Folosim setul de date despre depresie disponibil public din Previziunea Riscului Timpuriu pe Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 și extragem caracteristici parțiale de vorbire și mai mulți indici bazați pe acestea. Rezultatele noastre relevă diferențe semnificative statistic între persoanele depresive și cele non-depresive confirmând constatările din literatura de psihologie existentă. Activitatea noastră oferă informații despre modul în care persoanele depresive se exprimă pe platformele de social media, permițând modele computaționale mai bine informate pentru a ajuta la monitorizarea și prevenirea bolilor mintale.', 'sr': 'U ovom poslu, pružamo ogromnu analizu govora diskursa korisnika društvenih medija depresijom. Istraživanje u psihologiji otkrilo je da depresivni korisnici tendencije da budu sami fokusirani, preokupirani sami sebe i glasaju više o svojim životima i emocijama. Naš rad je cilj da iskoristimo velike skupine podataka i računalne metode za kvantitativno istraživanje diskursa. Koristimo javno dostupne podatke o depresiji iz ranog predviđanja rizika na Internetu radionici (eRisk) 2018 i izvlačimo deo govornih karakteristika i nekoliko indikata na temelju njih. Naši rezultati pokazuju statistički značajne razlike između depresivnih i neddepresivnih pojedinaca koji potvrđuju nalaze iz postojeće psihološke literature. Naš rad pruža uvid u vezi načina na koji se depresivni pojedinci izražavaju na platformama društvenih medija, omogućavajući bolje informiranim računalnim modelima da pomognu pratiti i spriječiti mentalne bolesti.', 'so': 'Shaqadaas waxaynu sameynaa baaritaanka hadalka oo ballaadhan ah ee hadalka isticmaalayaasha macluumaadka bulshada, taas oo aad u dhibaataysan. Baaritaanka dhimirka ayaa muuqday in isticmaalayaasha dhibka ah ay is-hoosaysiiyaan, waxyaabaha ay iskuul ka leeyihiin, waxna ka warsan yihiin noloshooda iyo fikradooda. Shaqo-keentayada waxaa loola jeedaa in uu isticmaalo kooban macluumaad iyo qaabab xisaab ah si ay u baaritaan hadal qiyaas ah. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa macluumaadka degaanka ee shabakadda Internetka (eRisk) 2018 ee caadooyinka khatarka ah ee dadweynaha ah, waxaana ka soo bixinaa qeyb ka mid ah hadalka iyo qaar ka mid ah caadooyin. Abaalkayaga waxay muuqataa kala duwanaansho qiimaan ah oo u dhexeeya dadka dhibaataysan iyo kuwa aan dhibaataysan, waxayna xaqiijiyaan falimaha cilmi-cilmi ah oo ku jira. Shuqulkayagu wuxuu ka helaa waxyaabo ku saabsan jidka ay qofka dhibaataysan ku muuqanayaan jardiinada shabakadda bulshada, waxayna u ogolaan karaan tusaalooyin xisaabta ah oo si wanaagsan u caawinaya in la ilaaliyo iyo ka hor maro cudurada dhimirka.', 'sv': 'I detta arbete ger vi en omfattande del-av-tal analys av diskursen hos användare av sociala medier med depression. Forskning inom psykologi visade att deprimerade användare tenderar att vara självfokuserade, mer upptagna med sig själva och fundera mer om sina liv och känslor. Vårt arbete syftar till att använda sig av storskaliga datauppsättningar och beräkningsmetoder för en kvantitativ utforskning av diskurs. Vi använder den allmänt tillgängliga depressionsdatauppsättningen från Early Risk Prediction on the Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 och extraherar delar av tal och flera index baserade på dem. Våra resultat visar statistiskt signifikanta skillnader mellan deprimerade och icke-deprimerade individer som bekräftar fynd från befintlig psykologilitteratur. Vårt arbete ger insikter om hur deprimerade individer uttrycker sig på sociala medier, vilket möjliggör bättre informerade beräkningsmodeller för att hjälpa till att övervaka och förebygga psykiska sjukdomar.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අපි සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයම භාවිතාන්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා. මනුස්සික විද්\u200dයාවේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා, ස්වයංගික විද්\u200dයාස කරනවා කියලා, ඔවුන්ග අපේ වැඩේ අල්ලගන්නවා ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයේ දත්ත සැට් සහ පරිගණනය විදියට භාවිත කරන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරධාන භාවිතාවේ ප්\u200dරධාන භාවිත විදියට ප්\u200dරධාන භාවිත විදියට ප්\u200dරධාන විදියට ප්\u200dරධාන විදියට භාවිත කරනවා 2018 ඉන්තර් අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ස්ථානික විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ විදිහට අවුලක් නැති විදිහට අවුලක් නැති විදිහට අ අපේ වැඩේ සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ගැන හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියෙනවා, සාමාජික ම', 'no': 'I denne arbeiden gjev vi eit utvida del av taleanalyse av diskursen av sosiale media-brukarar med depresjon. Research in psychology revealed that depressed users tend to be self-focused, more preoccupied with themselves and ruminate more about their lives and emotions. Arbeidet vårt mål å bruka store datasett og datametodar for kvantitativ utforsking av diskursar. Vi bruker den offentlige tilgjengelege depresjonsdatasettet frå den tidlegare risikoforventinga på Internettarbeidsområdet (eRisk) 2018 og pakk ut del av talefunksjonar og fleire indikatora basert på dei. Resultatet våre viser statistisk signifikante forskjeller mellom depreserte og ikkje-depreserte individuane som stadfestar finningar frå den eksisterande psikologiske literaturen. Arbeidet vårt gjev innsyningar om måten som depreserte individuar uttrykker seg på sosiale media-plattformar, og tillet deg bedre informasjonsmodeller for å hjelpa å overvaka og forebygge mentale sykdommar.', 'ur': 'اس کام میں ہم نے سوسیل میڈیا کارساز کی گفتگو کے ایک بڑے حصہ کا تحقیق دیتے ہیں۔ روانشناسی کے تحقیق نے ظاہر کیا کہ افسوس کارساز اپنے آپ کو دھوکہ دیتے ہیں اور اپنی جانوں اور احساساتوں کے بارے میں زیادہ مشغول ہیں۔ ہمارے کام کا ارادہ ہے کہ کلام کی تعداد کے لئے بڑی اسکیل ڈیٹ سٹ اور کمپیوٹ سیٹ استعمال کریں۔ ہم نے اپنا انٹرنیٹ کارشاپ (eRisk) 2018 کے پہلے ریسک پیش بینی سے کھول کھول کھول کھول دینے والی ڈیٹسٹ کو استعمال کیا ہے اور ان پر بنیاد رکھنے والی بہت سی نشانیاں اضافہ کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارے نتیجے مضطرب اور غیر افسوس افراد کے درمیان آمار سے اہم تفاوت ظاہر کرتے ہیں جو موجود روانشناسی ادبیات کے نتیجے کی تصدیق کرتے ہیں. ہمارا کام ایسے طریقے کے بارے میں بصیرت دیتا ہے جس طرح افسوس افسوس میڈیا پٹرومٹ پر اپنے آپ کو دکھاتے ہیں، جو بہتر اطلاعات کی کمپیوٹریسی موڈل کو مانٹر اور روانی بیماریوں سے روکتے ہیں۔', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு விரிவான பேச்சு பார்ப்பு ஆராய்ச்சியை வழங்குகிறோம். சமூக ஊடக பயனீட்டாளர்களின் பேச்ச மனநிலையில் ஆராய்ச்சி வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்டது என்று தெரிவித்தது ஆழமான பயனர்கள் தன்னை கவனமாக இருக்கிறார்கள் என்பது, தங்கள் உயிருடன் மே எங்கள் வேலை பெரிய தரவுத்தளங்கள் மற்றும் கணக்கீட்டு முறைகளை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும். முந்தைய ஆபத்து விருப்பங்களில் இருந்து நாம் பொது கிடைக்கும் பதிவு தகவல் அமைப்பை பயன்படுத்தி இணைய வார்ப்புகளில் (eRisk) 2018 மற்றும் பேச்சின் ப நம்முடைய முடிவு எங்கள் வேலையில் கவலைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட நபர்கள் சமூக ஊடக முறைமையில் தன்னைத் தெரியும் வழியில் கூறுகிறார்கள் என்பதை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, சிறந்த அறி', 'uz': "Bu vazifanda, biz jamiyat media foydalanuvchilari haqida gapiradigan qismini o'xshash qilamiz. Sikologiyatdagi taʼminot o'rganishni ko'rsatadi, boshqarish foydalanuvchilari o'zining o'zimlari va hayoti va hissiyotlari haqida ko'proq g'oyalar bo'ladi. Bizning ishlarimiz juda katta maʼlumotlar tarkibini va kompyuter usullardan foydalanish uchun suhbatni qidirish uchun. 2018 Internet Workshop (eRisk) haqida birinchi harakat davomiyotidan foydalanamiz va ular asosida bir necha xil tilni olib tashlamiz. Bizning natijalarimiz esa boshqaruvchilar va boshqarilmagan odamlar orasidagi statistik qismi o'zgarishlarini tasavvur qiladi. Mavjud psykologik litteratoridagi narsalarni tasdiqlash mumkin. Bizning ishlarimiz boshqaruvchi odamlar shamol media platformlarida o'zini ko'rinishini anglatadi, va yaxshi ma'lumotlar kompyuterning modellarini ko'rib turishiga yordam beradi.", 'vi': 'Trong công việc này, chúng tôi cung cấp một phân tích đầy đủ về ngôn ngữ của những người dùng truyền thông xã hội với cảm xúc trầm cảm. Nghiên cứu về tâm lý cho thấy những người bị trầm cảm có xu hướng tập trung, lo cho bản thân hơn và nghiền ngẫm về cuộc sống và cảm xúc của họ. Công việc của chúng tôi nhằm mục đích sử dụng các bộ dữ liệu quy mô lớn và các phương pháp tính to án cho việc khám phá ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi sử dụng bộ dữ liệu trầm cảm công khai từ dự đoán rủi ro trẻ sơ bộ trên the Internet Workshop (rủi ro) 208 và trích xuất các tính năng phần ngôn ngữ và một số căn cứ dựa vào nó. Những kết quả của chúng ta cho thấy sự khác biệt tiềm ẩn giữa những cá nhân trầm cảm và không trầm cảm xác nhận kết quả từ văn học tâm lý hiện tại. Công việc của chúng tôi cung cấp thông tin về cách những người bị trầm cảm bộc lộ trên các nền tảng truyền thông xã hội, cho phép có những mô hình tính thông tin tốt hơn để giúp giám sát và ngăn chặn bệnh thần kinh.', 'bg': 'В тази работа предлагаме обширен анализ на речта на дискурса на потребители на социални медии с депресия. Проучванията в психологията показват, че депресираните потребители са склонни да бъдат фокусирани към себе си, по-заети със себе си и да мислят повече за живота и емоциите си. Нашата работа има за цел да използва мащабни набори от данни и изчислителни методи за количествено изследване на дискурса. Използваме публично достъпния набор от данни за депресията от Ранно прогнозиране на риска в интернет семинара 2018 и извличаме част от речта функции и няколко индекса въз основа на тях. Нашите резултати разкриват статистически значими разлики между депресираните и недепресираните индивиди, потвърждаващи констатациите от съществуващата психологическа литература. Работата ни дава прозрения относно начина, по който депресираните индивиди изразяват себе си в социалните медийни платформи, позволявайки по-добре информирани изчислителни модели, които помагат за мониторинга и предотвратяването на психични заболявания.', 'hr': 'U ovom poslu pružamo ogromnu analizu govora o diskursu korisnika društvenih medija s depresijom. Istraživanje u psihologiji otkrilo je da depresivni korisnici tendencije biti sami usredotočeni, preokupirani sami sebe i glasaju više o svojim životima i emocijama. Naš rad je cilj iskoristiti velike skupine podataka i računalne metode za kvantitativno istraživanje diskursa. Koristimo javno dostupne podatke o depresiji iz ranog predviđanja rizika na Internetu radionici (eRisk) 2018. i izvlačimo dio govornih karakteristika i nekoliko indikata na temelju njih. Naši rezultati pokazuju statistički značajne razlike između depresivnih i neddepresivnih pojedinaca koji potvrđuju nalaze iz postojeće psihologije literature. Naš rad pruža uvid u vezi načina na koji se depresivni pojedinci izražavaju na platformama društvenih medija, omogućavajući bolje informirane računalne modele kako bi pomogli pratiti i spriječiti mentalne bolesti.', 'da': 'I dette arbejde giver vi en omfattende del-of-tale analyse af diskursen hos brugere af sociale medier med depression. Forskning i psykologi viste, at deprimerede brugere har tendens til at være selvopfokuserede, mere optaget af sig selv og drøfte mere om deres liv og følelser. Vores arbejde sigter mod at gøre brug af storstilede datasæt og beregningsmetoder til en kvantitativ udforskning af diskurs. Vi bruger det offentligt tilgængelige depressionsdatasæt fra Early Risk Prediction on te Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 og udtrækker dele af tale funktioner og flere indekser baseret på dem. Vores resultater afslører statistisk signifikante forskelle mellem deprimerede og ikke-deprimerede individer, der bekræfter resultater fra den eksisterende psykologiske litteratur. Vores arbejde giver indsigt i, hvordan deprimerede individer udtrykker sig på sociale medier, hvilket giver mulighed for bedre informerede beregningsmodeller til at hjælpe med at overvåge og forebygge psykiske sygdomme.', 'ko': '이 작업에서 우리는 우울증을 앓고 있는 소셜 미디어 사용자의 말에 대해 광범위한 단어성 분석을 실시했다.심리학 연구에 따르면 우울한 사용자는 종종 자기중심적이고 자신에 전념하며 자신의 생활과 정서에 대해 더 많이 생각하는 것으로 나타났다.우리의 업무는 대규모 데이터 집합과 계산 방법의 대화어를 이용하여 정량 탐색을 하는 데 목적을 두고 있다.우리는 2018년 인터넷 세미나(eRisk)에서 공개된 우울증 데이터 세트를 사용해 단어적 특징과 그에 근거한 몇 가지 지수를 추출했다.우리의 결과는 우울과 비우울 개체 간의 통계적 현저한 차이를 보여 주었고 기존 심리학 문헌의 발견을 실증했다.우리의 업무는 우울한 개체가 소셜미디어 플랫폼에서 자신의 방식을 표현하는 것에 대한 견해를 제공하고 더욱 현명한 계산 모델을 사용하여 정신질환을 모니터링하고 예방하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있다.', 'nl': 'In dit werk bieden we een uitgebreide part-of-speech analyse van het discours van social media gebruikers met depressie. Onderzoek in de psychologie toonde aan dat depressieve gebruikers de neiging hebben om zelfgericht te zijn, zich meer bezig te houden met zichzelf en meer na te denken over hun leven en emoties. Ons werk beoogt gebruik te maken van grootschalige datasets en computationele methoden voor een kwantitatieve verkenning van discours. We gebruiken de publiekelijk beschikbare depressie dataset uit de Early Risk Prediction on the Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 en extraheren op basis daarvan onderdelen van spraak en verschillende indices. Onze resultaten tonen statistisch significante verschillen tussen de depressieve en niet-depressieve individuen aan, die de bevindingen uit de bestaande psychologieliteratuur bevestigen. Ons werk geeft inzicht in de manier waarop depressieve individuen zich uiten op sociale media platforms, waardoor beter geïnformeerde computermodellen mogelijk zijn om psychische ziekten te monitoren en te voorkomen.', 'fa': 'در این کار، ما یک تحلیل قسمت سخنرانی وسیع از گفتگوهای کاربران رسانه اجتماعی با افسردگی پیشنهاد می کنیم. تحقیقات روانشناسی نشان داد که کاربران افسردگی به خودشان تمرکز می\u200cکنند، بیشتر از خودشان مشغول می\u200cشوند و بیشتر در مورد زندگی و احساساتشان شایسته می\u200cکنند. کار ما هدف است که از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای بزرگ و روش\u200cهای محاسباتی برای یک کشف محاسبات صحبت استفاده کنیم. ما از مجموعه داده\u200cهای افسردگی در دسترس عمومی از پیشنهاد اولین ریسک در کارگاه اینترنت (eRisk) ۲۰۱۸ استفاده می\u200cکنیم و بخشی از ویژه\u200cهای سخنرانی و چند تنظیم بر روی آنها خارج می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما تفاوت\u200cهای معنی\u200cاثر آمار\u200cاساسی بین افسرده\u200cها و افسرده\u200cهای غیرافسرده را نشان می\u200cدهند که تصدیق می\u200cکنند نتیجه\u200cها از ادبیات روانشناسی موجود است. کار ما در مورد راهی که افراد افسرده در آن روی platformهای رسانه های اجتماعی خودشان را نشان می دهند، به اجازه دادن مدل های کامپیوتری بهتر اطلاعات می دهند تا کمک کنترل و جلوگیری از بیماری روانی کنند.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit bieten wir eine umfangreiche Sprachteilanalyse des Diskurses von Social Media Nutzern mit Depression. Psychologische Forschung hat gezeigt, dass depressive Nutzer dazu neigen, sich selbst zu fokussieren, sich mehr mit sich selbst zu beschäftigen und mehr über ihr Leben und ihre Emotionen nachzudenken. Ziel unserer Arbeit ist es, große Datensätze und Rechenmethoden für eine quantitative Auseinandersetzung mit Diskursen zu nutzen. Wir nutzen den öffentlich zugänglichen Depressionsdatensatz aus dem Early Risk Prediction on the Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 und extrahieren auf dieser Grundlage Teilaspekte und mehrere Indizes. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen statistisch signifikante Unterschiede zwischen depressiven und nicht depressiven Personen, die Befunde aus der bestehenden psychologischen Literatur bestätigen. Unsere Arbeit liefert Einblicke in die Art und Weise, wie depressive Menschen sich auf Social Media Plattformen ausdrücken, und ermöglicht so besser informierte Computermodelle, um psychische Erkrankungen zu überwachen und zu verhindern.', 'id': 'In this work, we provide an extensive part-of-speech analysis of the discourse of social media users with depression.  Penelitian dalam psikologi mengungkapkan bahwa pengguna depresi cenderung untuk fokus diri, lebih sibuk dengan diri mereka sendiri dan merayu lebih tentang kehidupan dan emosi mereka. Pekerjaan kami bertujuan untuk menggunakan set data skala besar dan metode komputasi untuk eksplorasi kuantitatif diskors. Kami menggunakan dataset depresi yang tersedia publik dari Prediksi Risiko Awal di Workshop Internet (eRisk) 2018 dan mengekstrak sebagian dari ciri-ciri pidato dan beberapa indeks berdasarkan mereka. Hasil kami menunjukkan perbedaan statistik yang signifikan antara individu depresi dan non-depresi yang mengkonfirmasi penemuan dari literatur psikologi yang ada. Pekerjaan kami menyediakan penglihatan mengenai cara individu depresi mengekspresikan diri pada platform media sosial, memungkinkan model komputasi yang lebih diberitahu untuk membantu mengawasi dan mencegah penyakit mental.', 'sw': 'Katika kazi hii, tunatoa mchambuzi wa kina wa mazungumzo ya watumiaji wa mitandao ya kijamii kwa kushangaza. Utafiti wa kisaikolojia ulionyesha kuwa watumiaji wanaotumiwa na udhaifu wanajitegemea, wanajihusisha wenyewe na kujitetea zaidi kuhusu maisha yao na hisia zao. Kazi yetu inakusudia kutumia seti za takwimu kubwa na njia za kompyuta kwa ajili ya uchunguzi wa mazungumzo. Tunatumia taarifa za hisia zinazopatikana hadharani kutoka kwenye Warsha ya Kihatari ya awali (eRisk) ya mtandao wa intaneti (eRisk) 2018 na kuondoa sehemu ya hotuba na mashitaka kadhaa yanayozingatia. Our results reveal statistically significant differences between the depressed and non-depressed individuals confirming findings from the existing psychology literature.  Kazi yetu inatoa mitazamo kuhusu namna ambapo watu wanavyokerwa wanajieleza kwenye majukwaa ya mitandao ya kijamii, na wanaruhusu mifano ya kompyuta yenye taarifa zaidi ili kusaidia kufuatilia na kuzuia magonjwa ya akili.', 'af': "In hierdie werk verskaf ons 'n uitbreidige deel van spraak analiseer van die diskursie van sosiale media gebruikers met depressie. Research in psychologie het geopenbaar dat depresseerde gebruikers tendens self-fokus is, meer besoek met hulleself en meer ruminateer oor hul lewe en emosies. Ons werk doel doen om te gebruik van groot skaal datastelle en rekenaasjonale metodes vir 'n kvantitatiewe uitsoek van diskursie. Ons gebruik die geopenlik beskikbaar depresiële datastel van die Vroeër Risk voordeel op die Internet Werkshop (eRisk) 2018 en uitpak deel-van-spreek funksies en verskeie indiese wat op hulle gebaseer is. Ons resultate vertoon statistiese betekende verskille tussen die depreseerde en nie-depreseerde individue wat bevestig vindings van die bestaande psihologie literature. Ons werk verskaf insigte aangaande die manier waarop depreseerde individue hulleself op sosiale media platforme uitdruk, wat toelaat vir beter inligte rekenaarske modele om te help monitoreer en voorkom menslike siekte.", 'am': 'በዚህ ሥራ፣ የማኅበራዊ አውታር አውታር ተጠቃሚዎችን ግንኙነት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሲኮሎጂ ምርመራ፣ ደፍቆቹ ተጠቃሚዎች ራሳቸውን ለመምሰል፣ በነፍሳቸው እና እውቀታቸውን አብዝተዋል፡፡ ሥራችን ትልቅ ዳታዎችን እና የቁጥጥር ሥርዓቶችን ለመጠቀም ነው፡፡ መጀመሪያው የጥፋት ጉዳይ ጉዳይ ከኢንተርኔት ሰርቨርስቲ (eRisk) የተገኘውን የድብፅ አካባቢ ዳታዎችን እና በመሠረት የንግግር እድል ፈንታዎችን እና ብዙዎችን ክስ እናወጣለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን በተጨማሪው እና ያልታመኑት ሰዎች መካከል በstatistically significant ልዩነት የሚያሳውቃቸዋል፡፡ ሥራችን የሚደክሙት ሰዎች ማኅበራዊ አውታር ሚዲያ ጦማር ላይ ራሳቸውን በሚገልጹበት መንገድ የሚያሳውቃቸውን አስተያየት እና የmental ደዌቦችን ለመጠበቅ የሚችሉትን እና ማሰቃየትን የሚችሉትን አዋቂ ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu işde sosyal medýdançalaryň sözleriniň ýüregi boýunçylygynyň çykyşyny alyp barýarys. Psikologiýadaky araştyrmalar özüni üns berýän, özlerine köp üns berilýär we durmuşlary we duýgularyny barada köpräk gepleşirýär. Biziň işimiz çykyş gürrüňleriň kvantitat gezek üçin uly ölçekli veri setirlerini we hasaplamak üçin ullanmak maksady. 2018-nji ýyldan Iňki Risk Prediksiýasyndan (eRisk) internet Workshop (eRisk) içinde halk görkezilýän depresiýa maglumatlaryny we olaryň üstünde birnäçe indiki çykarýarys. Biziň netijelerimiz çykyş we çykyş bolmadyk adamlaryň arasyndaky statistiki wajyp deň üýtgeşiklerini görkeýär. Biziň işimiz adamlaryň sosyal medýä platformlarynda nähili nähili özüni nähili göwnüşleýän şeklinde düşünjeleri bar, gowy bilgili kompýuter nusgalaryny gözlemäge kömek etmegi we garşy hasaplaryna önlemegi üçin rugsat beren.', 'sq': 'Në këtë punë, ne ofrojmë një pjesë të gjerë të analizës së fjalimit të diskursit të përdoruesve të medias sociale me depresion. Kërkimi në psikologji zbuloi se përdoruesit e deprimuar kanë tendencë të jenë më të përqëndruar në vete, më të shqetësuar me veten e tyre dhe të gënjejnë më shumë rreth jetës dhe emocioneve të tyre. Puna jonë synon të përdorim grupe të dhënash në shkallë të madhe dhe metoda llogaritare për një eksplorim kuantitativ të diskursit. Ne përdorim të dhënat publikisht të disponueshme për depresion nga parashikimi i rrezikut të hershëm në seminarin e internetit (eRisk) 2018 dhe nxjerrim pjesë të fjalimit dhe disa indice bazuar në ta. Rezultatet tona zbulojnë dallime statistikisht të rëndësishme midis individëve të deprimuar dhe jo-deprimuar që konfirmojnë gjetjet nga literatura psikologjike ekzistuese. Puna jonë ofron kuptime lidhur me mënyrën se si individët e deprimuar janë duke shprehur veten në platforma të medias sociale, duke lejuar për modele kompjuterike më të informuar për të ndihmuar mbikqyrjen dhe parandalimin e sëmundjeve mentale.', 'hy': 'In this work, we provide an extensive part-of-speech analysis of the discourse of social media users with depression.  Հոգեբանության ուսումնասիրությունները բացահայտեցին, որ ընկճված օգտագործողները հակված են լինել ինքնուրույն կենտրոնացված, ավելի անհանգստացած իրենց հետ և ավելի շատ խոսում են իրենց կյանքի և զգացմունքների մասին: Մեր աշխատանքը նպատակն է օգտագործել մեծ մասշտաբով տվյալների համակարգերը և հաշվարկների մեթոդները խոսակցության քանակական ուսումնասիրության համար: Մենք օգտագործում ենք 2018 թվականի ինտերնետի աշխատասենյակում (eռիսկի) հանրային հասանելի դեպրեսիայի տվյալների համակարգը և հանում ենք խոսքի մասը և դրանց հիմնված մի քանի ինդեքսներ: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս վիճակագրական նշանակալի տարբերություններ դեպրեսիայի և ոչ դեպրեսիայի անհատների միջև, որոնք հաստատում են գոյություն ունեցող հոգեբանական գրականության արդյունքները: Մեր աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է ընկալումներ այն մասին, թե ինչպես են ընկճված անհատները արտահայտում իրենք սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների պլատֆորմերում, թույլ տալով ավելի լավ տեղեկացված հաշվարկների մոդելներ, որոնք օգնում են հոգեկան հիվանդությունների մո', 'az': 'Bu işdə, sosyal media istifadəçilərinin söhbətlərinin çox parçasını depresiya ilə təmin edirik. Psikolojik araştırmaların depresif istifadəçilərin özlərinə məxsus edilməsi, özlərinə daha çox endirilməsi və həyatları və duyguları barəsində daha çox danışmağı göstərdiyini göstərdi. Bizim işimiz çox ölçülü verilən qurbanları və hesaplama metodlarını müəyyən edir. Biz 2018-ci İnternet Workshop (eRisk) tərəfindən açıq-aşkar mövcuddur depresiya verilənlərini və bunların üstündə bir neçə indiks çəkirik. Sonuçlarımız depresif və depresif olmayan kişilər arasında statistik olaraq möhkəm fərqliyi göstərir ki, həmin psikoloji səhifələrindən istifadə edirlər. Bizim işimiz gizli insanların sosyal mediya platformlarında özlərini göstərdiyi kimi, daha yaxşı bilgili hesap modellərini monitor ə və mental xəstəlikləri öndərməyə imkan verir.', 'ca': "En aquest treball, proporcionem una extensa an àlisi de la part de la xerrada del discurs dels usuaris dels mitjans socials amb depressió. L'investigació en psicologia va revelar que els usuaris deprimits tendeixen a estar més egocentrats, més preocupats amb ells mateixos i a ruminar més sobre les seves vides i emocions. La nostra feina té l'objectiu d'utilitzar conjunts de dades a gran escala i mètodes computacionals per a una exploració quantitativa del discurs. Utilitzem el conjunt de dades de depressió públicament disponible de la Predicció del Risc Primer a la Workshop d'Internet (eRisk) 2018 i extreuem característiques de parla i diversos índics basats en elles. Els nostres resultats revelen diferències estatísticament significatives entre les persones deprimides i no deprimides, confirmant els descobriments de la literatura psicològica existent. La nostra feina proporciona insights sobre la manera en què les persones deprimides s'expressen en plataformes de mitjans socials, permetent que els models computacionals millor informats ajudin a monitoritzar i prevenir malalties mentals.", 'bn': 'এই কাজে আমরা সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম ব্যবহারকারীদের কথোপকথনের বিশেষ অংশ বিশ্লেষণ দিচ্ছি দুঃখের সাথে। মানসিকোলজিতে গবেষণা প্রকাশ করেছে যে দুর্দশাগ্রস্ত ব্যবহারকারীরা নিজেদের প্রতি নিজেদের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিত, তাদের জীবন ও আবেগ সম্ আমাদের কাজের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে বিশাল পরিমাণ ডাটাসেট এবং গণনামূলক পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করার জন্য যা কথোপকথনের পরিমাণ গবেষণা করা। আমরা ইন্টারনেট ওয়ার্কশার্ক (ইরিক্স) ২০১৮-এর প্রাথমিক ঝুঁকি সম্ভাবনা থেকে প্রকাশ্য দমনের ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করি এবং ভিত্তিক ভাষণের অংশ এবং বেশ কিছ Our results reveal statistically significant differences between the depressed and non-depressed individuals confirming findings from the existing psychology literature.  আমাদের কাজ সম্পর্কে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিত ব্যক্তি সামাজিক মিডিয়া প্ল্যাটফর্মে নিজেদের নিজেদের নিজেদের প্রকাশ করছেন, যার ফলে সংবাদ প্রদান কর', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös pakume ulatuslikku kõneanalüüsi depressiooniga sotsiaalmeedia kasutajate diskursusest. Psühholoogia uuringud näitasid, et depressioonis kasutajad kipuvad olema enesele keskendunud, rohkem mures endaga ja mõtlema rohkem oma elust ja emotsioonidest. Meie töö eesmärk on kasutada ulatuslikke andmekogumeid ja arvutusmeetodeid diskursuse kvantitatiivseks uurimiseks. Kasutame üldsusele kättesaadavat depressiooniandmekogumit internetitöötoast Early Risk on the Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 ning väljavõtame nende põhjal kõneosa funktsioone ja mitmeid indekseid. Meie tulemused näitavad statistiliselt olulisi erinevusi depressiooniga ja mittedepressiooniga isikute vahel, mis kinnitavad olemasoleva psühholoogilise kirjanduse leide. Meie töö annab ülevaate sellest, kuidas depressioonis inimesed end sotsiaalmeedia platvormides väljendavad, võimaldades paremini informeeritud arvutusmudeleid, mis aitavad jälgida ja ennetada vaimuhaigusi.', 'bs': 'U ovom poslu pružamo ogromnu analizu govora o diskursu korisnika socijalnih medija depresijom. Istraživanje u psihologiji pokazalo je da depresivni korisnici tendencije da su sami fokusirani, preokupirani sami sebe i glasaju više o svojim životima i emocijama. Naš rad je cilj da iskoristimo velike skupine podataka i računalne metode za kvantitativno istraživanje diskursa. Koristimo javno dostupne podatke o depresiji iz ranog predviđanja rizika na Internetu radionici (eRisk) 2018 i izvlačimo dio govornih karakteristika i nekoliko indikata na temelju njih. Naši rezultati pokazuju statistički značajne razlike između depresivnih i neddepresivnih pojedinaca koji potvrđuju nalaze iz postojeće psihološke literature. Naš rad pruža uvid o načinu na koji se depresivni pojedinci izražavaju na platformama društvenih medija, omogućavajući bolje informiranim računalnim modelima da pomognu pratiti i spriječiti mentalne bolesti.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä teemme laajan osan puheesta analyysin masennuksesta kärsivien sosiaalisen median käyttäjien diskurssista. Psykologian tutkimus osoitti, että masentuneet käyttäjät ovat yleensä itsekeskeisiä, enemmän huolissaan itsestään ja miettivät enemmän elämäänsä ja tunteitaan. Työn tavoitteena on hyödyntää laajoja aineistoja ja laskennallisia menetelmiä diskurssin kvantitatiiviseen tutkimiseen. Käytämme yleisesti saatavilla olevaa masennusaineistoa Early Risk Ennuste on the Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018:sta ja poimimme niiden pohjalta puheen osia ja useita indeksejä. Tuloksemme osoittavat tilastollisesti merkitseviä eroja masentuneiden ja ei-masentuneiden välillä, mikä vahvistaa olemassa olevan psykologian kirjallisuuden löydöksiä. Työmme tarjoaa oivalluksia siitä, miten masentuneet yksilöt ilmaisevat itseään sosiaalisen median alustoilla, mikä mahdollistaa paremmin tietoon perustuvien laskennallisten mallien avulla mielenterveyssairauksien seurantaa ja ehkäisyä.', 'cs': 'V této práci poskytujeme rozsáhlou část řeči analýzu diskurzu uživatelů sociálních médií s depresí. Výzkum v psychologii ukázal, že depresivní uživatelé mají tendenci být sebe zaměřeni, více zaměřeni na sebe a více přemýšlet o svých životech a emocích. Naše práce si klade za cíl využít rozsáhlé datové sady a výpočetní metody pro kvantitativní zkoumání diskurzu. Využíváme veřejně dostupný datový soubor depresí z Early Risk Prediction on the Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 a extrahujeme z nich funkce části řeči a několik indexů. Naše výsledky ukazují statisticky významné rozdíly mezi depresivními a non-depresivními jedinci potvrzující poznatky z dosavadní psychologické literatury. Naše práce poskytuje poznatky o způsobu, jakým se depresivní jedinci vyjadřují na platformách sociálních médií, což umožňuje lépe informované výpočetní modely, které pomáhají sledovat a prevenci duševních onemocnění.', 'sk': 'V tem delu predstavljamo obsežno analizo dela govora diskurza uporabnikov socialnih medijev z depresijo. Raziskave psihologije so pokazale, da so depresivni uporabniki navadno samoosredotočeni, bolj zaposleni s seboj in bolj premišljujejo o svojem življenju in čustvih. Cilj našega dela je uporaba obsežnih podatkovnih naborov in računalniških metod za kvantitativno raziskovanje diskurza. Uporabljamo javno dostopen nabor podatkov o depresiji iz zgodnje napovedovanje tveganja na internetni delavnici (eRisk) 2018 in na njih izvlečemo funkcije dela govora in več indeksov. Naši rezultati kažejo statistično značilne razlike med depresivnimi in nedepresivnimi posamezniki, ki potrjujejo ugotovitve iz obstoječe psihološke literature. Naše delo zagotavlja vpogled v način, kako se depresivni posamezniki izražajo na platformah družbenih medijev, kar omogoča bolje informirane računalniške modele, ki pomagajo spremljati in preprečevati duševne bolezni.', 'jv': "Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné mulai akeh lansangan akeh-lansangan ning resmi sing gawe nguasakno ning acara biasane pengguna empar. Pesindeksi barêng-barêng langgar kuwi kesempatan kuwi, kawulé supoyatan kanggo langgar sampek, supoyatan kanggo langgar sapa-sangan ngono kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngerayakno karo urip lan disempatan. Where's the data set Awak dhéwé nggunakake bebasan Daftar neng akeh Publik nang rak Pridik Pridik kanggo Internet Workspace (eRik) 2008 lan akeh tanggal apat-apat-apat-saka lan akeh endisik sing sabanjuré nang dhéwé. Rejalaké awak dhéwé éntukno ngerasai perkarahaan anyar tentang karo hal-perkarahaan kuwi ala kejahatan karo hal-perkarahaan kuwi mau ngerasai winih dhéwé kuwi mau ngerasai winih sing paling dhéwé. Awakdhéwé éntuk perbudhakan nggawe barang nggawe nguasai perbudhakan neng kuwi dianggawe barang nggawe barang pengguna kuwi tindakan media sotiki, iso ngubah perbudhakan modèl komputasi sing luwih apik sing luwih apik lan soko sakjane sak ngerasai winih.", 'ha': "Daga wannan aikin, Munã samar da rabo mai yawa na faɗi wa'adin masu amfani da mitandai na jamii da taƙaita. Reseni na aikin aikoloji ya bayyana cẽwa misfoki za'a ta zama masu fokusa ga kansa, kuma suna fara a cikin rãyukansu da hisãbunsa. Kayan aikinMu yana nufin su yi amfani da matsayin data masu girma da shiryoyin lissafa zuwa wani rabo mai ƙayyade magana. Tuna yi amfani da bayani da tsarin depression da ake iya samansa daga the Early Risiko Prediction on the Intanet Warware (eRic) 2018 kuma Munã fitar rabon masu husũma da daidaita masu baka su. MatamayinMu na bayyana diffaniki masu muhimmi a tsakanin depression da mutane waɗanda bã su da depression, sunã gaskata misãlai daga littafan littafan da ke gaba. Arimarmu yana da gannai a kan hanyar da misumarin mutane ke nuna kansu a kan zangaren mutane na jamii, kuma yana yarda da misãlai masu da lãbãri na lissafa don ya taimake tsarin su da kuma ya kange jiran mental in.", 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སུ་བཏོན་གཏོང་ནི་ Psikoloji(psychology)ནང་གི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་འདིས་སྐྱེས་པའི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོར་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རང་དབང་འདུག་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མི་ཚེ་དང་སེམས་ཚོར་སྐོར་ལས་ད ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ཆེ་བའི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་དང་རྩིས་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བྱས་ཡོད་པ་མ་ We use the publicly available depression dataset from the Early Risk Prediction on the Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 and extract part-of-speech features and several indices based on them. ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བ་དག་གིས་སྐྱེས་པའི་དབྱེ་རིག་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁག་མེད་པའི་མི་རྣམས་ལ་མཐོང ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་སྐོར་ལས་ངོས་འཛིན་པའི་མི་སྒེར་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ཐོག་ཏུ་སྟོན་པའི་རྩིས་འཁོར་རྩིས', 'he': 'בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מספקים חלק רחב של ניתוח הנאום של דיבור של משתמשים במדיה חברתית עם דיכאון. מחקר בפסיכולוגיה חשף שמשתמשים מדוכאים נוטים להיות ממוקדים בעצמם, יותר מודאגים בעצמם ומשמעים יותר על חייהם ורגשותיהם. העבודה שלנו מתכוונת להשתמש במערכות נתונים בקנה מידה גדולה ושיטות מחשב עבור חקירה כמונית של דיבור. We use the publicly available depression dataset from the Early Risk Prediction on the Internet Workshop (eRisk) 2018 and extract part-of-speech features and several indices based on them.  התוצאות שלנו חושפות הבדלים סטטיסטית משמעותיים בין האדם המדכא לבין האדם הלא-מדכא שמאשר את המצאות מהספרות הפסיכולוגית הקיומית. Our work provides insights regarding the way in which depressed individuals are expressing themselves on social media platforms, allowing for better-informed computational models to help monitor and prevent mental illnesses.'}
{'en': 'Evaluating Recognizing Question Entailment Methods for a Portuguese Community Question-Answering System about Diabetes Mellitus', 'fr': 'Évaluation de la reconnaissance des méthodes de questionnement pour un système de réponse aux questions de la communauté portugaise sur le diabète sucré', 'ar': 'تقييم التعرف على طرق استنتاج الأسئلة لنظام الإجابة على الأسئلة للمجتمع البرتغالي حول داء السكري', 'pt': 'Avaliando Métodos de Reconhecimento de Perguntas para um Sistema de Resposta a Perguntas da Comunidade Portuguesa sobre Diabetes Mellitus', 'es': 'Evaluación de los métodos de reconocimiento de la implicación de preguntas para un sistema de preguntas y respuestas de la comunidad portuguesa sobre la diabetes mellitus', 'zh': '评估葡萄牙社区糖尿病问答系统之方也', 'ja': '糖尿病に関するポルトガルのコミュニティの質問に答えるための質問エンターテイメント方法の認識の評価', 'ru': 'Оценка распознавания методов влечения вопросов для системы ответов на вопросы португальского сообщества о сахарном диабете', 'hi': 'मधुमेह मेलिटस के बारे में एक पुर्तगाली समुदाय प्रश्न-उत्तर प्रणाली के लिए पहचानने वाले प्रश्न अनिवार्यता विधियों का मूल्यांकन करना', 'ga': 'Meastóireacht a dhéanamh ar Mhodhanna Eisithe Ceiste do Chóras Freagraí Ceisteanna Pobal na Portaingéile maidir le Diaibéiteas Mellitus', 'hu': 'A cukorbetegséggel kapcsolatos portugál közösségi kérdésválaszadó rendszer elismerésének módszereinek értékelése', 'ka': 'პორტეგური საზოგადოებო საზოგადოებო კითხვების გასაუმუშაო სისტემა Diabetes Mellitus', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση Αναγνώρισης Μεθόδων Διευκόλυνσης Ερωτήσεων για ένα Σύστημα Απάντησης Ερωτήσεων της Πορτογαλικής Κοινότητας σχετικά με τον Μελίτη Διαβήτη', 'it': 'Valutazione dei metodi di identificazione delle domande per un sistema comunitario portoghese di risposta alle domande sul diabete mellito', 'lt': 'Evaluating Recognizing Question Entailment Methods for a Portuguese Community Question-Answering System about Diabetes Mellitus', 'kk': 'Португалиялық Компаттық сұрақтар жауап беру жүйесінің сұрақтар толтыру әдістерін бағалау', 'ms': 'Mengevaluasi Kaedah Pengesahan Pertanyaan untuk Sistem Pertanyaan-Jawapan Komuniti Portugis mengenai Diabetes Mellitus', 'ml': 'ഒരു പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗീഷ് സമൂഹത്തിനുള്ള ചോദ്യം- ഉത്തരം സിസ്റ്റം ഡയബെറ്റ്സ് മെലിറ്റുസിനെ സംബന്ധിച്ച് ചോദ്യം തിരിച്ചറി', 'mk': 'Оценувањето на признавањето на методите на проблеми со прашањата за системот за одговори на прашањата на португалската заедница во врска со дијабетскиот мелит', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni tar-Rikonoxximent tal-Metodi ta’ Qbil ta’ Mistoqsijiet għal Sistema Portugiża ta’ Tweġiba għal Mistoqsijiet dwar id-Dijabete Mellitus', 'ro': 'Evaluarea metodelor de recunoaștere a întrebărilor pentru un sistem comunitar portughez de răspuns la întrebări despre diabetul mellitus', 'no': 'Evaluerer gjenkjennomsiktige spørsmål-fullføringsmetodar for eit portugisk fellesskapssystem for spørsmål-svaring om diabetar mellitus', 'pl': 'Ocena metod rozpoznawania pytań dla portugalskiego systemu odpowiedzi na pytania dotyczącego cukrzycy Mellitus', 'mn': 'Португалийн Нийгмийн асуулт-хариултын системийн хувьд асуулт бүтээх аргыг үнэлэх', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Оценавање метода признања почињања питања за португални систем отговора на питање Общности о диабетима Мелитус', 'ur': 'پورٹوگل کی کمونٹی کے بارے میں سؤال انٹیلٹ منٹ کی تصدیق کرنے کے مطابق سوال انٹیلٹ منٹ طریقے کا ارزش کیا جاتا ہے', 'ta': 'Evaluating Recognizing Question Entailment Methods for a Portuguese Community Question-Answering System about Diabetes Mellitus', 'so': "Qiimeynta aqoonsashada daryeelka su'aalka ee ku saabsan Diabetes Mellitus", 'sv': 'Utvärdering av erkännande av frågeställningsmetoder för en portugisisk gemenskap frågeställningssystem om diabetes mellitus', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đánh giá về việc xác nhận câu hỏi về các phương pháp câu hỏi về Hệ thống Trả lời Câu hỏi của Cộng đồng Bồ Đào Nha về Diabetes Mellitus', 'nl': 'Evaluatie van het herkennen van vragenverhelderingsmethoden voor een Portugese gemeenschap vragenbeantwoordingssysteem over diabetes mellitus', 'da': 'Evaluering af anerkendelse af spørgsmålstegn ved et portugisisk fællesskabsspørgsmålstegn ved diabetes mellitus', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje metoda uklanjanja pitanja za portugalski sustav odgovora na pitanja zajednice o dijabetima mellitus', 'bg': 'Оценка на методите за разпознаване на въпроси за система за отговор на въпроси в португалската общност относно диабета мелитус', 'de': 'Evaluation Recogniting Question Entailment Methods for a Portuguese Community Question-Answering System about Diabetes Mellitus', 'id': 'Evaluasi Pengenalan Metode Penyakit Pertanyaan untuk Sistem Pertanyaan-Jawaban Komunitas Portugis tentang Diabetes Mellitus', 'fa': 'ارزیابی روش\u200cهای پایان شناسایی سوالات برای یک سیستم جواب\u200cجواب سوالات جامعه پورتوژیکی در مورد دیابت Mellitus', 'ko': '포르투갈어 지역사회 당뇨병 퀴즈 시스템에서 문제에 포함된 식별 방법에 대한 평가', 'af': "Geevalueer herkening Vraga Voltooiïng Metode vir 'n Portugese Samfunniese Vraga- Antwoord Stelsel oor Diabetes Mellitus", 'tr': 'Diabetes Mellitus barada Portugalça Toplumaty sorag-jogap sistemi üçin soraglary tamamlama taryhmasy', 'sw': 'Kupitia Kutambua njia za Ujumbe wa swali kwa mfumo wa swali la Kireno kuhusu Diabetes Mellitus', 'am': 'የፖርቱጋሊኛ ማኅበረሰብ የመቀበል ጥያቄ ስርዓት ስለDiabetes Mellitus', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i njohjes së metodave të mërzitjes së pyetjeve për një sistem të përgjigjeve të pyetjeve të komunitetit portugal rreth diabetes Mellitus', 'hy': 'Պորտուգալիական համայնքի հարցերի պատասխանատվության համակարգի հարցերի հիվանդության մեթոդների ճանաչման գնահատումը', 'az': 'Portugal Cumhuriyeti haqqında Diabetlər Mellitus haqqında soruşma-cavab sistemi üçün sual tamamlama metodları', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje metoda uklanjanja pitanja za portugalski sustav odgovora na pitanja zajednice o dijabetima mellitus', 'cs': 'Vyhodnocení metod rozpoznávání otázek pro systém odpovědí na otázky portugalské komunity o Diabetes mellitus', 'ca': 'Evaluation Recognizing Question Entailment Methods for a Portuguese Community Question-Answering System about Diabetes Mellitus', 'et': 'Küsimuste lahendamise meetodite hindamine Portugali kogukonna küsimustele vastamise süsteemis Mellituse kohta', 'fi': 'Portugalin yhteis√∂n Diabetes Mellitusta koskevan kyselyvastausj√§rjestelm√§n tunnistaminen', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah Panjenengan Entilment Methods kanggo Kemerdekaan Jejaring-Nggabung Kapen Putuk', 'he': 'הערכה של שיטות ההכרה בשאלות של מערכת תשובות לשאלות של הקהילה הפורטוגזית', 'sk': 'Ocena metod prepoznavanja vprašanj za portugalski sistem odgovarjanja na vprašanja o sladkorni bolezni', 'ha': 'Yana ƙayyade Method na Initiative for a Socket', 'bo': 'Portugal་ཚོགས་སྡེར་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལྟ་སྟངས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ངོས་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྟོགས་པ'}
{'en': 'This study describes the development of a Portuguese Community-Question Answering benchmark in the domain of Diabetes Mellitus using a Recognizing Question Entailment (RQE) approach. Given a premise question, RQE aims to retrieve semantically similar, already answered, archived questions. We build a new Portuguese benchmark corpus with 785 pairs between premise questions and archived answered questions marked with relevance judgments by medical experts. Based on the benchmark corpus, we leveraged and evaluated several RQE approaches ranging from traditional information retrieval methods to novel large pre-trained language models and ensemble techniques using learn-to-rank approaches. Our experimental results show that a supervised transformer-based method trained with multiple languages and for multiple tasks (MUSE) outperforms the alternatives. Our results also show that ensembles of methods (stacking) as well as a traditional (light) information retrieval method (BM25) can produce competitive results. Finally, among the tested strategies, those that exploit only the question (not the answer), provide the best effectiveness-efficiency trade-off. Code is publicly available.', 'fr': "Cette étude décrit le développement d'un point de référence de réponse aux questions de la communauté portugaise dans le domaine du diabète sucré à l'aide d'une approche Recognizing Question Entailment (RQE). À partir d'une question de prémisse, RQE vise à récupérer des questions archivées sémantiquement similaires, déjà répondues. Nous créons un nouveau corpus de référence portugais avec 785 paires entre les questions prémisses et les questions avec réponses archivées marquées par des jugements de pertinence par des experts médicaux. Sur la base du corpus de référence, nous avons exploité et évalué plusieurs approches RQE allant des méthodes traditionnelles de récupération d'informations aux nouveaux modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés et aux techniques d'ensemble utilisant des approches d'apprentissage pour classer. Nos résultats expérimentaux montrent qu'une méthode supervisée basée sur un transformateur entraînée avec plusieurs langues et pour des tâches multiples (MUSE) surpasse les alternatives. Nos résultats montrent également que des ensembles de méthodes (empilage) ainsi qu'une méthode traditionnelle (légère) de récupération d'informations (BM25) peuvent produire des résultats compétitifs. Enfin, parmi les stratégies testées, celles qui exploitent uniquement la question (et non la réponse) offrent le meilleur compromis efficacité-efficacité. Le code est accessible au public.", 'ar': 'تصف هذه الدراسة تطوير معيار إجابة المجتمع البرتغالي للإجابة على الأسئلة في مجال داء السكري باستخدام نهج التعرف على الأسئلة (RQE). نظرًا لسؤال مبدئي ، تهدف RQE إلى استرداد الأسئلة المؤرشفة المتشابهة لغويًا والتي تمت الإجابة عليها بالفعل. نحن نبني مجموعة مرجعية برتغالية جديدة مع 785 زوجًا بين الأسئلة المبدئية والأسئلة التي تمت الإجابة عليها في الأرشيف والتي تم تمييزها بأحكام ذات صلة من قبل خبراء طبيين. استنادًا إلى مجموعة المعايير ، قمنا بالاستفادة من العديد من مناهج RQE وتقييمها بدءًا من طرق استرجاع المعلومات التقليدية وحتى نماذج اللغة الكبيرة المدربة مسبقًا وتقنيات المجموعات باستخدام مناهج التعلم للترتيب. تُظهر نتائجنا التجريبية أن الطريقة القائمة على المحولات الخاضعة للإشراف والمدربة بلغات متعددة ولمهام متعددة (MUSE) تتفوق على البدائل. تظهر نتائجنا أيضًا أن مجموعات الطرق (التكديس) وكذلك طريقة استرجاع المعلومات (الخفيفة) التقليدية (BM25) يمكن أن تؤدي إلى نتائج تنافسية. أخيرًا ، من بين الاستراتيجيات المختبرة ، تلك التي تستغل السؤال فقط (وليس الإجابة) توفر أفضل مقايضة بين الفعالية والكفاءة. الرمز متاح للجمهور.', 'es': 'Este estudio describe el desarrollo de un punto de referencia de respuesta a preguntas de la comunidad portuguesa en el dominio de la diabetes mellitus utilizando un enfoque de reconocimiento de la implicación de preguntas (RQE). Dada una pregunta premisa, RQE pretende recuperar preguntas archivadas semánticamente similares, ya respondidas. Construimos un nuevo corpus de referencia en portugués con 785 pares entre preguntas premisas y preguntas respondidas archivadas marcadas con juicios de relevancia de expertos médicos. Basándonos en el corpus de referencia, aprovechamos y evaluamos varios enfoques de RQE que van desde los métodos tradicionales de recuperación de información hasta nuevos modelos lingüísticos grandes previamente entrenados y técnicas de conjunto utilizando enfoques de aprender a clasificar. Nuestros resultados experimentales muestran que un método supervisado basado en transformadores entrenado con múltiples idiomas y para múltiples tareas (MUSE) supera a las alternativas. Nuestros resultados también muestran que los conjuntos de métodos (apilamiento) y un método tradicional (ligero) de recuperación de información (BM25) pueden producir resultados competitivos. Finalmente, entre las estrategias probadas, aquellas que explotan solo la pregunta (no la respuesta), proporcionan la mejor compensación entre efectividad y eficiencia. El código está disponible públicamente.', 'pt': 'Este estudo descreve o desenvolvimento de um referencial português de resposta a perguntas da comunidade no domínio da Diabetes Mellitus usando uma abordagem de reconhecimento de perguntas (RQE). Dada uma questão de premissa, o RQE visa recuperar questões arquivadas semanticamente semelhantes, já respondidas. Construímos um novo corpus de referência português com 785 pares entre perguntas de premissa e perguntas respondidas arquivadas marcadas com julgamentos de relevância por médicos especialistas. Com base no corpus de referência, alavancamos e avaliamos várias abordagens de RQE, desde métodos tradicionais de recuperação de informações até novos grandes modelos de linguagem pré-treinados e técnicas de conjunto usando abordagens de aprendizado para classificação. Nossos resultados experimentais mostram que um método baseado em transformador supervisionado treinado com múltiplas linguagens e para múltiplas tarefas (MUSE) supera as alternativas. Nossos resultados também mostram que conjuntos de métodos (empilhamento), bem como um método tradicional (leve) de recuperação de informações (BM25) podem produzir resultados competitivos. Por fim, entre as estratégias testadas, aquelas que exploram apenas a pergunta (não a resposta), fornecem a melhor relação eficácia-eficiência. O código está disponível publicamente.', 'zh': '本论用识内含(RQE)开糖尿病领葡萄牙社区问基准。 给定一问,RQE 指检语义相似,已对存档问。 构一新葡萄牙语基准语料库,前问医学专家相关性断标存档对案有785是。 盖基准语料库,吾以数RQE论之,自旧信息检索至于用学新型大预训习言语形术。 吾实验结果表明,用多种语言、多任务(MUSE)训练之基于督变压器之法优于代方。 臣等考而明之,(积)及旧(轻型)信息检索(BM25)合而有竞争力。 最后试之策,其徒用之(而非对案)之策最上者有效性 - 效率权衡。 代码明可用也。', 'ru': 'Это исследование описывает разработку контрольного показателя ответов на вопросы португальского сообщества в области сахарного диабета с использованием подхода распознавания вопросов (RQE). Учитывая вопрос предпосылки, RQE стремится извлечь семантически похожие, уже ответившие, архивные вопросы. Мы создаем новый португальский контрольный корпус, состоящий из 785 пар вопросов между исходными и архивными ответами на вопросы, отмеченные релевантными оценками медицинских экспертов. Основываясь на базовом корпусе, мы использовали и оценивали несколько подходов RQE, начиная от традиционных методов поиска информации и заканчивая новыми крупными предварительно обученными языковыми моделями и ансамблевыми методами, использующими подходы, основанные на учебе. Наши экспериментальные результаты показывают, что контролируемый метод на основе трансформатора, обученный с несколькими языками и для нескольких задач (MUSE), превосходит альтернативы. Наши результаты также показывают, что совокупности методов (штабелирование), а также традиционный (легкий) метод извлечения информации (BM25) могут дать конкурентные результаты. Наконец, среди проверенных стратегий наилучшим компромиссом между эффективностью и результативностью являются те, которые используют только вопрос (а не ответ). Код общедоступен.', 'ja': 'この研究では、認識質問エンテイメント（ RQE ）アプローチを使用して、糖尿病の領域におけるポルトガルのコミュニティ-質問回答ベンチマークの開発について説明します。 前提となる質問を考えると、RQEは意味的に類似した、すでに回答されているアーカイブされた質問を取り出すことを目指す。 ポルトガルの新しいベンチマークコーパスを構築しました。このコーパスでは、オンプレミスの質問と医療専門家による関連性の判断が記されたアーカイブされた回答の間に785ペアがあります。 ベンチマークコーパスに基づいて、従来の情報検索方法から、学習からランクへのアプローチを使用した新規の大規模な事前トレーニング言語モデルとアンサンブル技術まで、いくつかのRQEアプローチを活用し、評価した。 私たちの実験結果は、複数の言語と複数のタスク（ MUSE ）でトレーニングされた監視された変圧器ベースの方法が、代替案を上回ることを示しています。 また、従来の（軽い）情報検索法（ BM 25 ）と同様に、手法（スタッキング）のアンサンブルが競合的な結果を生み出すことも示されている。 最後に、テストされた戦略のうち、質問のみを利用するもの（答えではない）は、最高の有効性と効率性のトレードオフを提供します。コードは一般に公開されています。', 'hi': 'यह अध्ययन एक पुर्तगाली समुदाय के विकास का वर्णन करता है-एक पहचानने वाले प्रश्न निहितार्थ (RQE) दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके मधुमेह मेलिटस के डोमेन में प्रश्न का उत्तर देने वाला बेंचमार्क। एक आधार प्रश्न को देखते हुए, RQE का उद्देश्य शब्दार्थ रूप से समान, पहले से ही उत्तर दिए गए, संग्रहीत प्रश्नों को पुनर्प्राप्त करना है। हम आधार प्रश्नों के बीच 785 जोड़े के साथ एक नया पुर्तगाली बेंचमार्क कॉर्पस बनाते हैं और चिकित्सा विशेषज्ञों द्वारा प्रासंगिकता निर्णयों के साथ चिह्नित प्रश्नों के संग्रहीत उत्तर दिए जाते हैं। बेंचमार्क कॉर्पस के आधार पर, हमने पारंपरिक जानकारी पुनर्प्राप्ति विधियों से लेकर बड़े पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल और एनसेंबल तकनीकों को सीखने-से-रैंक दृष्टिकोणों का उपयोग करके उपन्यास करने के लिए कई RQE दृष्टिकोणों का लाभ उठाया और मूल्यांकन किया। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि एक पर्यवेक्षित ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित विधि कई भाषाओं के साथ प्रशिक्षित और कई कार्यों (MUSE) के लिए विकल्पों को मात देती है। हमारे परिणाम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि विधियों (स्टैकिंग) के साथ-साथ एक पारंपरिक (प्रकाश) सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति विधि (बीएम 25) के ensembles प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम पैदा कर सकते हैं। अंत में, परीक्षण की गई रणनीतियों के बीच, जो केवल प्रश्न (उत्तर नहीं) का शोषण करते हैं, वे सबसे अच्छी प्रभावशीलता-दक्षता व्यापार-बंद प्रदान करते हैं। कोड सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध है।', 'ga': 'Déanann an staidéar seo cur síos ar fhorbairt tagarmhairc de chuid na Portaingéile maidir le Freagra Pobal-Ceisteanna i réimse an Diaibéiteas Mellitus ag baint úsáide as cur chuige um Shainaithint Ceiste (RQE). I bhfianaise na buncheiste, tá sé mar aidhm ag RQE ceisteanna atá comhchosúil agus a freagraíodh cheana féin a aisghabháil. Déanaimid corpas tagarmharcála Portaingéile nua a thógáil ina mbeidh 785 phéire idir buncheisteanna agus ceisteanna freagartha i gcartlann marcáilte le breithiúnais ábharthachta ó shaineolaithe leighis. Bunaithe ar an gcorpas tagarmharcála, rinneamar giaráil agus luacháil ar roinnt cineálacha cur chuige RQE, ó mhodhanna traidisiúnta aisghabhála faisnéise go mionsamhlacha móra teanga réamhoilte agus teicnící ensemble ag baint úsáide as cuir chuige foghlaim-go-rangú. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn modh maoirsithe atá bunaithe ar chlaochladán atá oilte le teangacha iolracha agus le haghaidh tascanna iolracha (MUSE) na roghanna eile. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí freisin gur féidir le ensembles modhanna (cruachta) chomh maith le modh traidisiúnta (éadrom) aisghabhála faisnéise (BM25) torthaí iomaíocha a tháirgeadh. Ar deireadh, i measc na straitéisí a ndearnadh tástáil orthu, is iad na cinn a bhaineann leas as an gceist amháin (ní an freagra) a sholáthraíonn an chomhbhabhtáil éifeachtúlachta is fearr. Tá an cód ar fáil go poiblí.', 'ka': 'ამ კვლევაში პორტეგური საზოგადოებო საზოგადოებო საზოგადოებო კითხვების გარეშე ბენქმარი Diabetes Mellitus დიომინში გამოყენებული კითხვების გარეშე (RQE) პროგრამის გამოყენება. პრომენტიკური კითხვის შესახებ, RQE უნდა სემონტიკურად განსხვავება, უკვე განსხვავებული, არქივებული კითხვები. ჩვენ შევქმნით ახალი პორდუტებური ბენქმარკური კორპუსი, 785 პრომენტის კითხვების შორის და არქივებული კითხვების შესახებ, რომლებიც მედიცინური ექსპერტების გასაკვე ბენქმარკური კორპუსის ბაზაზე, ჩვენ მივიღეთ და გავუმუშავეთ რამდენიმე RQE მიღებები, რომელიც განვითარებული ინფორმაციის მიღება მეტისგან განვითარება დიდი წინ მოდელების მონაცემებისთვის და განვითარებული ტექნო ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ მონაცემულებული ტრანფორმენტერის ბაზეული მეტი, რამდენიმე ენებით და რამდენიმე რამდენიმე რამდენიმე რამდენიმე ჩვენი წარმოდგენები ასევე აჩვენებენ, რომ მეტების (სტაქტირება) და ტრადიციონალური (სინათლური) ინფორმაციის მიღება (BM25) შეუძლიათ კონპექტირებული წარმოდგენ საბოლოოდ, ტესტირებული სტრატეგიების შორის, ისინი, რომლებიც მხოლოდ კითხვა (არა პასუხი) გამოიყენებენ ყველაზე საუკეთესო ეფექტიურობა-ეფექტიურობ კჲე ვ ოჲ ოსბლთკარა.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα μελέτη περιγράφει την ανάπτυξη ενός σημείου αναφοράς για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων στην πορτογαλική κοινότητα στον τομέα του διαβητικού με τη χρήση μιας προσέγγισης αναγνώρισης ερωτήσεων. Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη μια ερώτηση προϋπόθεσης, στοχεύει στην ανάκτηση σημασιολογικά παρόμοιων, ήδη απαντηθέντων, αρχειοθετημένων ερωτήσεων. Κατασκευάζουμε ένα νέο πορτογαλικό σώμα αναφοράς με ζεύγη 785 μεταξύ ερωτήσεων και αρχειοθετημένων απαντήσεων που επισημαίνονται με αποφάσεις σχετικότητας από ιατρικούς εμπειρογνώμονες. Με βάση το σώμα αναφοράς, αξιοποιήσαμε και αξιολογήσαμε διάφορες προσεγγίσεις που κυμαίνονται από παραδοσιακές μεθόδους ανάκτησης πληροφοριών έως νέα μεγάλα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα και τεχνικές συνόλου χρησιμοποιώντας προσεγγίσεις μάθησης-κατάταξης. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι μια εποπτευόμενη μέθοδος μετασχηματιστή εκπαιδευμένη με πολλαπλές γλώσσες και για πολλαπλές εργασίες (MUSE) ξεπερνά τις εναλλακτικές λύσεις. Τα αποτελέσματα μας δείχνουν επίσης ότι σύνολα μεθόδων (στοίβαξη) καθώς και μια παραδοσιακή (ελαφριά) μέθοδος ανάκτησης πληροφοριών (Β25) μπορούν να παράγουν ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα. Τέλος, μεταξύ των δοκιμασμένων στρατηγικών, αυτές που εκμεταλλεύονται μόνο την ερώτηση (όχι την απάντηση), παρέχουν την καλύτερη ανταλλαγή αποτελεσματικότητας-αποτελεσματικότητας. Ο κώδικας είναι δημόσιος διαθέσιμος.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy portugál közösségi kérdésválaszadási referenciaérték kialakítását írja le a Diabetes Mellitus területén, az elismerő kérdésekre vonatkozó (RQE) megközelítéssel. Egy előzetes kérdés alapján az RQE célja szemantikailag hasonló, már megválaszolt, archivált kérdések lekérése. Egy új portugál referenciakorpuszt építünk fel 785 párból a helyiségkérdések között és az orvosi szakértők relevanciával megjelölt archivált kérdésekből. A benchmark korpusz alapján számos RQE megközelítést használtunk és értékeltünk, a hagyományos információvisszakeresési módszerektől kezdve az új, nagyméretű, előre képzett nyelvi modellekig és együttes technikákig, tanulási módszereket alkalmazva. Kísérleti eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy egy felügyelt transzformátor alapú módszer több nyelven és több feladatra (MUSE) képzett módszer felülmúlja az alternatívákat. Eredményeink azt is mutatják, hogy a módszerek együttesei (halmozás) és a hagyományos (könnyű) információvisszakeresési módszer (BM25) versenyképes eredményeket hozhatnak. Végül a tesztelt stratégiák közül azok, amelyek csak a kérdést használják ki (nem a választ), a legjobb hatékonyság-hatékonyság kereskedelmet biztosítják. A kód nyilvánosan hozzáférhető.', 'it': 'Questo studio descrive lo sviluppo di un benchmark portoghese di risposta alle domande comunitarie nel campo del diabete mellito utilizzando un approccio di riconoscimento delle domande (RQE). Data una domanda di premessa, RQE mira a recuperare domande semanticamente simili, già risposte, archiviate. Costruiamo un nuovo corpus di riferimento portoghese con 785 coppie tra domande di premessa e domande risposte archiviate contrassegnate con giudizi di rilevanza da esperti medici. Sulla base del corpus di riferimento, abbiamo sfruttato e valutato diversi approcci RQE che vanno dai metodi tradizionali di recupero delle informazioni a nuovi modelli linguistici pre-addestrati di grandi dimensioni e tecniche di ensemble utilizzando approcci learn-to-rank. I nostri risultati sperimentali mostrano che un metodo supervisionato basato su trasformatori addestrato con più lingue e per compiti multipli (MUSE) supera le alternative. I nostri risultati mostrano anche che insiemi di metodi (impilamento) e un metodo tradizionale (leggero) di recupero delle informazioni (BM25) possono produrre risultati competitivi. Infine, tra le strategie testate, quelle che sfruttano solo la domanda (non la risposta), forniscono il miglior compromesso efficacia-efficienza. Il codice è disponibile al pubblico.', 'kk': 'Бұл зерттеу Португалия Компания- Сұрақтар жауап беру белгісін диабет меллитусының доменінде белгілейтін сұрақтар (RQE) қасиетін қолданып табылады. Премиз сұрақ берілсе, RQE симпатикалық симпатикалық сұрақтарды алдында жауап беру керек. Біз премиз сұрақтарының арасындағы 785 жаңа португалдық банкмарк корпус құрамыз және архив сұрақтарының арасындағы жауап берілген сұрақтарын медицина эксперттерінің маңызды шешімдер Жинақтық корпус негізінде, әдетті мәліметті алу әдістерінен, үлкен алдындағы тіл үлгілерін романдау үшін, және оқыту әдістерін қолданатын технологиялар арқылы бірнеше RQE арқылы бағаладық. Біздің тәжірибелік нәтижеміз бірнеше тілдер мен бірнеше тапсырмалар үшін (МUSE) бақылау тәртібін басқару тәртібін көрсетеді. Біздің нәтижелеріміз сондай-ақ әдеттегі мәліметті алу әдісі (BM25) және әдеттегі (жарық) мәліметті алу әдісі жасай алады. Соңында, тексерілген стратегиялардың арасында тек сұрақ қолданатын (жауап емес), ең жақсы эффективнік және эффективнік тәртіпсіздіктерді қолдануға болады. Код жалпы қол жеткізеді.', 'ms': 'Ujian ini menggambarkan pembangunan tanda referensi Perjawapan Pertanyaan-Komuniti Portugis dalam domain Diabetes Mellitus menggunakan pendekatan penyakit soalan (RQE). Berdasarkan soalan premis, RQE bermaksud untuk mendapatkan semula soalan yang sama secara semantik, sudah dijawab, terarkib. Kami membina cadangan referensi Portugis baru dengan 785 pasangan antara soalan premis dan soalan yang dijawab arkib ditandai dengan penilaian relevan oleh ahli perubatan. Berdasarkan corpus tanda referensi, kami menggunakan dan menilai beberapa pendekatan RQE yang berlangsung dari kaedah penghasilan maklumat tradisional hingga mencipta model bahasa besar yang dilatih dan teknik ensemble menggunakan pendekatan belajar-ke-rangka. Hasil percubaan kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah berasaskan pengubah yang diawasi dilatih dengan berbilang bahasa dan untuk berbilang tugas (MUSE) melebihi alternatif. Keputusan kami juga menunjukkan bahawa kumpulan kaedah (tumpukan) serta kaedah tradisional (ringan) pemulihan maklumat (BM25) boleh menghasilkan keputusan kompetitif. Akhirnya, di antara strategi yang diuji, orang-orang yang hanya mengeksploitasi soalan (bukan jawapan), menyediakan perdagangan efisiensi-efisiensi terbaik. Kod tersedia secara awam.', 'lt': 'Šiame tyrime apibūdinamas Portugalijos bendruomenės ir atsakymų į klausimus lyginamasis rodiklis diabeto Mellitus srityje, taikant klausimų problemos pripažinimo metodą. Atsižvelgiant į prielaidą, RQE siekia gauti semantiškai panašius, jau atsakytus, archyvuotus klausimus. Mes sukuriame naują Portugalijos lyginamąjį korpusą su 785 poromis tarp patalpų klausimų ir archyvuotų atsakytų klausimų, pažymėtų svarbiais medicinos ekspertų sprendimais. Remdamiesi lyginamuoju korpusu, mes sutelkėme ir įvertinome keletą RQE metodų: nuo tradicinių informacijos gavimo metodų iki naujų didelių iš anksto parengtų kalbų modelių ir kompleksų metodų, naudojant mokymosi lygiu metodus. Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad prižiūrimas transformatoriumi grindžiamas metodas, mokomas įvairiomis kalbomis ir atliekant įvairias užduotis (MUSE), yra didesnis už alternatyvas. Mūsų rezultatai taip pat rodo, kad metodų rinkiniai (surinkimas) ir tradicinis (lengvas) informacijos gavimo metodas (BM25) gali pasiekti konkurencinius rezultatus. Galiausiai iš išbandytų strategijų tie, kurie naudojasi tik klausimu (o ne atsakymu), užtikrina geriausią efektyvumo ir efektyvumo kompromisą. Kodeksas viešas.', 'mk': 'Оваа студија го опишува развојот на партугалски стандард за одговор на прашањата на заедницата во доменот на дијабетскиот мелит, користејќи пристап за препознавање на прашањата (РQE). Со оглед на претпоставено прашање, РQE има за цел да добие семантично слични, веќе одговорени, архивирани прашања. Создаваме нов португалски корпус со 785 пари помеѓу претпоставените прашања и архивираните одговори на прашања означени со релевантни пресуди од медицинските експерти. На основа на референтниот корпус, искористивме и проценивме неколку RQE пристапи кои се движат од традиционални методи за преземање информации до нови големи предобучени јазички модели и техники за ансембл користејќи научен до ранг пристапи. Нашите експериментални резултати покажуваат дека надгледуваниот метод базиран на трансформатори трениран со повеќе јазици и за повеќе задачи (МУСЕ) ги надминува алтернативите. Нашите резултати, исто така, покажуваат дека ансемблите на методи (собирање) како и традиционалниот (лесен) метод за преземање информации (БМ25) можат да произведат конкурентни резултати. Конечно, меѓу тестираните стратегии, оние кои го искористуваат само прашањето (а не одговорот), обезбедуваат најдобра размена за ефикасност и ефикасност. Кодексот е јавно достапен.', 'ml': 'ഈ പഠനത്തിന്റെ വിവരം പോര്\u200dട്ടൂഗീഷ് കമ്മിറ്റി- ചോദ്യം വിവരിക്കുന്നു. ഡയബെറ്റ്സ് മെലിറ്റിസിന്റെ ഡോമെയിനിലെ ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തര ഒരു മുന്നറിയിപ്പ് ചോദ്യം കൊണ്ട്, ആര്\u200dക്കിവേഡ് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d എടുക്കാന്\u200d RQE ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ പോര്\u200dട്ടൂഗീഷ് ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് പണിയുന്നു. മുന്നോട്ട് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d 785 ജോട്ടികള്\u200d ഉണ ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന് മുമ്പ് പഠിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരിക്കുന്ന രീതികളില്\u200d നിന്നും പല RQE സാധ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് പല ഭാഷകളുമായി പരിശീലന മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയാണ്. പല ജ നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു രീതികളുടെ (സ്റ്റാക്കി) പിന്നെ പാരമ്പര്യമായ (പ്രകാശം) വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ അവസാനം, പരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിദ്യാഭാഗ്യം മാത്രമേ ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നുള്ളൂ. Code is publicly available.', 'mt': 'Dan l-istudju jiddeskrivi l-iżvilupp ta’ punt ta’ riferiment Portugiż għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet fil-qasam tad-dijabete Mellitus bl-użu ta’ approċċ tar-rikonoxximent tal-mistoqsijiet (RQE). Minħabba mistoqsija preċedenti, l-RQE għandha l-għan li tikseb mistoqsijiet arkivjati semantikament simili, diġà mwieġba. We build a new Portuguese benchmark corpus with 785 pairs between premise questions and archived answered questions marked with relevance judgments by medical experts.  Abbażi tal-punt ta’ riferiment corpus, inħeġġu u vvalutaw diversi approċċi RQE li jvarjaw minn metodi tradizzjonali ta’ ġbir ta’ informazzjoni sa mudelli kbar ta’ lingwa mħarrġa minn qabel u tekniki ta’ ensemble bl-użu ta’ approċċi ta’ tagħlim għal grad ġodda. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru li metodu sorveljat ibbażat fuq it-trasformatur imħarreġ b’diversi lingwi u għal kompiti multipli (MUSE) jaqbeż l-alternattivi. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru wkoll li ensembles ta’ metodi (stacking) kif ukoll metodu tradizzjonali (ħfief) ta’ ġbir ta’ informazzjoni (BM25) jistgħu jipproduċu riżultati kompetittivi. Fl-aħħar nett, fost l-istrateġiji ttestjati, dawk li jisfruttaw biss il-mistoqsija (mhux it-tweġiba), jipprovdu l-aħjar kompromess bejn l-effikaċja u l-effiċjenza. Il-kodiċi huwa disponibbli għall-pubbliku.', 'no': 'Denne studien beskriver utviklinga av eit portugisisk fellesskap- spørsmål- svar- benchmarket i domenet av Diabetes Mellitus med ein tilnærming på gjenkjenning av spørsmål- Entailment (RQE). Gjennomsikt eit premise spørsmål, må RQE henta semantisk liknande, allereie svara, arkiverte spørsmål. Vi bygger eit ny portugisk benchmarkkorpus med 785 par mellom premise spørsmål og arkiverte svarspunkt merket med relevante sprøym av medisinske ekspertar. Basert på benchmarkkorpusen, har vi leverart og evaluert fleire RQE-tilnærmingar frå tradisjonelle informasjonshendingsmetoder til å novella store føretrainerte språk-modeller og ensemblere teknikke med læringstilnærmingar. Eksperimentale resultatet våre viser at ein oversikt transformeringsmetode treng med fleire språk og for fleire oppgåver (MUSE) utfører alternativene. Resultatet våre viser også at ensembler av metodar (stakkering) og ein tradisjonell (lys) informasjonshendingsmetode (BM25) kan produsere konkurrentiv resultat. Etter slutt, blant dei testerte strategiane, vil dei som berre eksploderer spørsmålet (ikkje svaret) gje det beste effektivt-effektivt-utvikling. Kode er tilgjengeleg offentlig.', 'sr': 'Ova studija opisuje razvoj portugalske zajednice-pitanja odgovarajuće kriterije u oblasti dijabeta Mellitus koristeći pristup prepoznavanja pitanja (RQE). S obzirom na primersko pitanje, RQE ima cilj da dobije semantički slične, već odgovore na arhivna pitanja. Napravili smo novi portugalski benchmark korpus sa 785 par između pitanja premijera i arhivirane odgovorne pitanja označene sa relevantnim osuđivanjem medicinskih stručnjaka. Na temelju benchmarknog korpusa, iskoristili smo i procenili nekoliko pristupa RQE od tradicionalnih metoda prikupljanja informacija do romana velikih predobučenih jezičkih modela i ensemblirali smo tehnike koristeći pristupe učenja na rank. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da nadzorna metoda na transformaciji obučena višestrukim jezicima i za višestruke zadatke (MUSE) iznosi alternative. Naši rezultati takođe pokazuju da osiguranja metoda (stakla) i tradicionalnog (svjetlosnog) metoda informacija (BM25) mogu proizvesti konkurentne rezultate. Na kraju, među testovanim strategijama, oni koji koriste samo pitanje (ne odgovor), pružaju najbolju trgovinu efikasnosti i učinkovitosti. Kod je javno dostupan.', 'ro': 'Acest studiu descrie dezvoltarea unui criteriu de referință pentru răspunsul la întrebări comunitare portugheze în domeniul diabetului mellitus utilizând o abordare de recunoaștere a întrebărilor (RQE). Având în vedere o întrebare premisă, RQE își propune să recupereze întrebări arhivate semantic similare, deja răspunse. Construim un nou corpus portughez de referință cu 785 perechi între întrebări de premisă și întrebări arhivate marcate cu judecăți relevante ale experților medicali. Pe baza corpului de referință, am utilizat și evaluat mai multe abordări RQE, variind de la metodele tradiționale de recuperare a informațiilor la modele lingvistice pre-instruite noi și tehnici de ansamblu de mari dimensiuni folosind abordări de învățare la rang. Rezultatele experimentale arată că o metodă supravegheată bazată pe transformator instruită cu mai multe limbi și pentru mai multe sarcini (MUSE) depășește alternativele. Rezultatele noastre arată, de asemenea, că ansamblurile de metode (stivuire) precum și o metodă tradițională (ușoară) de recuperare a informațiilor (BM25) pot produce rezultate competitive. În cele din urmă, printre strategiile testate, cele care exploatează doar întrebarea (nu răspunsul), oferă cel mai bun compromis eficiență-eficiență. Codul este disponibil publicului.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym opracowaniu opisano rozwój portugalskiego wskaźnika odpowiedzi na pytania społecznościowe w dziedzinie cukrzycy Mellitus przy użyciu metody rozpoznawania pytań (RQE). Biorąc pod uwagę pytanie założone, RQE ma na celu odzyskanie semantycznie podobnych, już odpowiedzianych, zarchiwizowanych pytań. Budujemy nowy portugalski korpus referencyjny z parami 785 pomiędzy pytaniami założeniowymi a zarchiwizowanymi odpowiedziami oznaczonymi ocenami istotności ekspertów medycznych. W oparciu o korpus referencyjny wykorzystaliśmy i oceniliśmy kilka podejść RQE, począwszy od tradycyjnych metod pozyskiwania informacji po nowe duże, wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe i techniki zespołowe wykorzystujące podejścia learn-to-rank. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że metoda oparta na nadzorowanym transformatorze przeszkolona w wielu językach i dla wielu zadań (MUSE) przewyższa alternatywy. Nasze wyniki pokazują również, że zespoły metod (układanie) oraz tradycyjna (lekka) metoda pozyskiwania informacji (BM25) mogą przynieść konkurencyjne wyniki. Wreszcie, wśród sprawdzonych strategii, te, które wykorzystują tylko pytanie (a nie odpowiedź), zapewniają najlepszy kompromis skuteczności i efektywności. Kod jest publicznie dostępny.', 'mn': 'Энэ судалгаанд Португалийн Нийгмийн-асуулт хариултын багц хэмжээний хөгжлийг Диабет Меллитусын хэлбэрээр танилцуулж буй асуулт бүтээлтийн (RQE) аргыг ашиглан тайлбарладаг. Нэг асуулт асуусан учраас, RQE нь хэдэн жилийн төстэй, аль хэдийн хариулттай асуултуудыг авах зорилго юм. Бид эрүүл мэндийн мэргэжилтнүүдийн шийдвэрлэх асуултуудын хооронд 785 хоёр хувь Португалийн банкмарк корпус бүтээж байна. Энгийн корпус дээр бид уламжлалтаар мэдээллийг авах арга замын өмнө суралцагдсан хэл загваруудыг шинэчлэх болон суралцах арга замыг ашиглан олон RQE арга замыг ашиглаж, үнэлгээд үзсэн. Бидний туршилтын үр дүнд олон хэл болон олон даалгавар (MUSE) дээр сургалтын шилжүүлэгчийн үндсэн аргыг харуулдаг. Бидний үр дүнд мөн арга зам, уламжлалт (гэрэл) мэдээллийн алдах арга (BM25) нь өрсөлдөөний үр дүнг гаргаж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг. Эцэст нь, шалгалтын стратегийн дунд зөвхөн асуултыг ашигладаг (хариулт биш) хүмүүс хамгийн үр дүнтэй үр дүнтэй, үр дүнтэй худалдааныг гаргадаг. Код олон нийтэд хангалттай.', 'ta': 'இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி ஒரு போர்த்துகீசிஷ் சமுதாயத்தை உருவாக்கும் கேள்வியை உருவாக்குகிறது டையாப்ட்ஸ் மெலிட்ஸ் களத்தில் பதில் பென்மார்க்க ஒரு முன்னேற்ற கேள்வி கொடுத்தால், RQE பொருத்தமான கேள்விகளை மீட்டெடுக்கும், ஏற்கனவே பதில், காப்புக்கப்பட்ட நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய போர்த்துகீசிஷ் பெங்க்மேக் குறிப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம் முன்னேற்ற கேள்விகள் மற்றும் காப்பகத்திற்கு பென்க்மார்க் குறிப்பை அடிப்படையில், நாங்கள் வழங்கி மற்றும் பரிசோதிக்கப்பட்டுள்ள பல RQE முறைமைகளை வழங்கி செய்து பாரமான தகவல் மீட்டும் முறைகளிலிருந் Our experimental results show that a supervised transformer-based method trained with multiple languages and for multiple tasks (MUSE) outperforms the alternatives.  முடிவு கடைசியாக, சோதிக்கப்பட்ட திட்டங்களில், கேள்வியை மட்டும் பயன்படுத்துகிறார் குறியீடு பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'sv': 'Denna studie beskriver utvecklingen av ett portugisiskt community-question answering benchmark inom området Diabetes Mellitus med hjälp av en Recognizing Question Entailment (RQE) metod. Med en premissfråga syftar RQE till att hämta semantiskt liknande, redan besvarade, arkiverade frågor. Vi bygger en ny portugisisk referenskorpus med 785 par mellan premisfrågor och arkiverade besvarade frågor markerade med relevanta bedömningar av medicinska experter. Baserat på benchmark corpus utnyttjade och utvärderade vi flera RQE-metoder som sträcker sig från traditionella informationshämtningsmetoder till nya stora förklädda språkmodeller och ensembletekniker med hjälp av learn-to-rank-metoder. Våra experimentella resultat visar att en övervakad transformatorbaserad metod utbildad med flera språk och för flera uppgifter (MUSE) överträffar alternativen. Våra resultat visar också att ansamlingar av metoder (stapling) och en traditionell (lätt) informationsinsamlingsmetod (BM25) kan ge konkurrenskraftiga resultat. Slutligen, bland de testade strategierna, de som bara utnyttjar frågan (inte svaret), ger den bästa effektivitetsavvägningen. Koden är allmänt tillgänglig.', 'si': 'මේ පරීක්ෂණය පුරුතුගුලි සමාජික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිච්චාර කරනවා Diabetes Mellitus ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, RQE අදහස් කරනවා සෙමාන්තික වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ආරක්ෂිත කරන්න, දැනටමත් ප්\u200d අපි අලුත් පොර්තුතිස් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් කොර්පස් එකක් හදන්නේ 785 ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ආරක්ෂිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අතර ඉන බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් කොර්පුස් වලින්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ RQE වලින් අවශ්\u200dය විදියට අනුමාන්\u200dය තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා භ අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ වෙනස් භාෂාවන් වලින් ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයෙක් වගේ වි අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පද්ධතිය (ස්ටැක්) සහ පද්ධතිය (ලෝටියි) තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරතිචාරය (BM25) ප්\u200d අන්තිමේදී, පරීක්ෂණා කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි (උත්තර නෙවෙයි), හොඳම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි. කෝඩ් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ලැබෙන්නේ.', 'so': "Waxbarashadan waxaa ku qoran horumarinta su'aalaha Burtuqiis-su'aalka ka jawaabta qofka ku qoran deegaanka Diabetes Mellitus, iyadoo lagu isticmaalayo qaababka aqoonsashada su'aalaha (RQE). Warar hore la siiyo, RQE wuxuu aimaa in uu soo celiyo su'aalo la mid ah, oo uu horay ugu jawaabay su'aalo la soo celiyey. Waxaannu dhisnaa qof cusub oo bangiga ah Burtuqiis oo leh 785 labo oo ka dhaxaysa su'aalaha hore iyo arimaha arkiikhda lagu jawaabay su'aalo ku saabsan xukummo ku saabsan xeerka dhakhtarka. Sida lagu saleyn karo qofka bangiga ah, waxaynu soo bandhignay oo qiimeynay qaar ka mid ah qaabab aad u soo qaadashada macluumaadka ee asalka ah iyo qaabab aad u weyn oo afka hore lagu barto iyo qaabab aad u baahan karo. Imtixaankayada waxaa muuqda in qaab la ilaaliyo oo lagu tababariyey luuqado kala duduwan iyo shaqooyin badan (MUSE) uu soo bandhigayo fursado. Sababyadayada waxaa sidoo kale tusin kara in kooxo qaababka (stacking) iyo qaab u soo qaadashada macluumaadka caadi ah (light) Ugu dambaysta, waxaa ka mid ah qoraalka la tijaabiyey, kuwa isticmaalaya su'aalka oo kaliya (aan ahayn jawaabta), waxay bixiyaan waxyaabaha ugu fiican ee ganacsiga. Codeynta waxaa lagu heli karaa bayaan.", 'ur': 'This study describes the development of a Portuguese Community-Question Answering benchmark in the domain of Diabetes Mellitus using a Recognizing Question Entailment (RQE) approach. ایک پرمیس سؤال کے ذریعہ سے RQE کا ارادہ ہے کہ اس سے پہلے ایک جیسا جواب دیا گیا ہے، آرکیس سؤال حاصل کرنا چاہتا ہے. ہم نے ایک نئی پورٹوگل بنچم مارک کورپوس بنایا ہے جس میں 785 جوڑے ہیں پرمیز سوال اور ارکسیوں کے درمیان جواب دیے گئے ہیں جن کے ذریعہ مطابق پزشکوں کے ذریعہ اہم فیصلہ کیا گیا ہے۔ بنچم مارک کورپوس پر، ہم نے بہت سی RQE کے مطابق مطابق کے مطابق مطابق معلومات حاصل کرنے کے طریقے سے بہت بڑے پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل کو روزنامہ بنایا ہے اور تکنیک کا مطابق استعمال کیا ہے ہمارے آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک نظارت کی تغییر دینے والی طریقہ بہت سی زبانوں کے ساتھ آموزش کی گئی ہے اور بہت سی کاموں کے لئے (MUSE) انتخاب کرنے والی طریقہ ہے۔ ہمارے نتیجے بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ طریقے (استکینگ) اور ایک سنتی (روشنی) معلومات حاصل کرنے کے طریقے (BM25) کے علائم پیدا کر سکتے ہیں۔ بالآخر، آزمائش کی استراتژی میں سے وہ لوگ جو صرف سوال کو استعمال کرتے ہیں (جواب نہیں) سب سے بہترین اثبات کے ذریعہ تدبیر دیتے ہیں۔ کیڈ ظاہر طور پر موجود ہے.', 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu này mô tả việc phát triển một tiêu chuẩn Trả lời Hỏi Hỏi địa phương Bồ Đào Nha trong lĩnh vực Diabetes Mellitus nhờ một phương pháp xác nhận câu hỏi câu hỏi (RQE). Dựa vào một câu hỏi tiêu chuẩn, RQE nhằm thu hồi theo ngữ pháp tương tự, đã trả lời, các câu hỏi được lưu. Chúng tôi xây dựng một tập đoàn gương mẫu Bồ Đào Nha mới với 7885 giữa những câu hỏi tiêu chuẩn và những câu trả lời lưu trữ được đánh dấu bằng những phán quyết phù hợp của chuyên gia y khoa. Dựa trên tập đoàn tiêu chuẩn, chúng tôi đã nâng cao và đánh giá nhiều phương pháp RQE, từ các phương pháp thu thập thông tin truyền thống cho đến các mô hình ngôn ngữ lớn được huấn luyện và các kỹ thuật kết hợp dựa trên phương pháp. Những kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy một phương pháp biến thế được huấn luyện theo nhiều ngôn ngữ và nhiều nhiệm vụ khác nhau (MUA) thực hiện tốt hơn. Kết quả của chúng tôi cũng cho thấy các tập hợp các phương pháp (xếp) cũng như một phương pháp tìm kiếm thông tin truyền thống (ánh sáng) (BM25) có thể tạo ra kết quả cạnh tranh. Cuối cùng, trong các chiến lược thử nghiệm, những người chỉ khai thác câu hỏi (không phải câu trả lời) cung cấp thỏa thuận hiệu quả nhất. Mật mã được công khai.', 'uz': "Bu taʼminot Portugalcha jamiyat- savol tarkibini diabetes Mellitus davrida javob beradigan soʻrov tarkibini aniqlash imkoniyatini anglatadi. Birinchi savol bilan RQE'ni qayta oʻxshash xabarga olishga harakat qiladi. Biz birinchi Portugalcha benchmark corpusni yaratib, birinchi muammolar va arxivlar orasidagi muammolar bilan bog'liq xususiyatlar bilan ishlatilgan savollar bilan 785 parcha qo'llanmiz. Benchmark korpus asosida, biz bir necha RQE usullarni qo'llab ko'rsatdik va qiymatimiz, tadqiqiy maʼlumot retrieval usullardan o'rganishdan oldin o'rganishdan oldin tillar modellari va o'rganishdan foydalanishga katta taʼminlovchi texnologiyalar. Bizning tajriba natijalarimiz ko'p tillar bilan boshqarilgan transformer asosida o'rganish usuli va ko'plab vazifalar (MUSE) bilan boshqarishni bajaradi. Bizning natijalarimiz shunday ko'rsatishi mumkin, oddiy (light) xabar olish usuli (BM25) rivojlanish natijalarini rivojlanishi mumkin. Endi, sinab qilingan strategiyada faqat savol ishlatuvchilar (javob emas), eng yaxshi effektiv soʻzni beradi. Kodlash shaxsiy mavjud.", 'da': 'Denne undersøgelse beskriver udviklingen af et portugisisk fællesskabsspørgsmål-svar benchmark inden for Diabetes Mellitus ved hjælp af en Recognizing Question Entailment (RQE) metode. Givet et præmissespørgsmål, RQE sigter mod at hente semantisk lignende, allerede besvarede, arkiverede spørgsmål. Vi bygger et nyt portugisisk benchmark korpus med 785 par mellem præmisspørgsmål og arkiverede besvarede spørgsmål markeret med relevans vurderinger af medicinske eksperter. Baseret på benchmark corpus udnyttede og evaluerede vi flere RQE tilgange lige fra traditionelle informationshentningsmetoder til nye store prætrænede sprogmodeller og ensembleteknikker ved hjælp af lære-til-rang tilgange. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser, at en overvåget transformer-baseret metode trænet med flere sprog og til flere opgaver (MUSE) overgår alternativerne. Vores resultater viser også, at ansatte af metoder (stabling) samt en traditionel (let) informationshentningsmetode (BM25) kan give konkurrencedygtige resultater. Endelig, blandt de testede strategier, de, der kun udnytter spørgsmålet (ikke svaret), giver den bedste effektivitet-effektivitet trade-off. Koden er offentligt tilgængelig.', 'nl': 'Deze studie beschrijft de ontwikkeling van een Portugese Community-Question Beantworting benchmark op het gebied van Diabetes Mellitus met behulp van een Recognizing Question Entailment (RQE) benadering. Gezien een premise vraag streeft RQE naar semantisch vergelijkbare, reeds beantwoorde, gearchiveerde vragen. We bouwen een nieuw Portugees benchmark corpus met 785 paren tussen premise vragen en gearchiveerde beantwoorde vragen gemarkeerd met relevantiebeoordelen door medische experts. Op basis van het benchmark corpus hebben we verschillende RQE benaderingen gebruikt en geëvalueerd, variërend van traditionele informatie retrieval methoden tot nieuwe grote vooraf getrainde taalmodellen en ensemble technieken met behulp van learn-to-rank benaderingen. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat een begeleide transformatorgebaseerde methode getraind met meerdere talen en voor meerdere taken (MUSE) de alternatieven overtreft. Onze resultaten tonen ook aan dat ensembles van methoden (stapelen) en een traditionele (lichte) informatieterugwinningsmethode (BM25) concurrerende resultaten kunnen opleveren. Tot slot bieden onder de geteste strategieën diegenen die alleen de vraag (niet het antwoord) benutten, de beste afweging tussen effectiviteit en efficiëntie. Code is openbaar beschikbaar.', 'bg': 'Това проучване описва разработването на референтна база за отговор на въпроси в Португалската общност в областта на диабета с помощта на подход за разпознаване на въпросите (РQE). Като се има предвид предварителен въпрос, има за цел да извлече семантично подобни, вече отговорени, архивирани въпроси. Изграждаме нов португалски референтен корпус с 785 двойки между въпросите на предпоставките и архивираните отговори въпроси, белязани с преценки за уместност от медицински експерти. Въз основа на референтния корпус, ние използвахме и оценихме няколко подхода, вариращи от традиционни методи за извличане на информация до нови големи предварително обучени езикови модели и ансамбълни техники, използващи подходи за учене към класиране. Нашите експериментални резултати показват, че контролиран трансформаторен метод, обучен с множество езици и за множество задачи (МУСЕ), превъзхожда алтернативите. Нашите резултати показват също, че ансамблите от методи (подреждане), както и традиционният (лек) метод за извличане на информация (БМ25), могат да доведат до конкурентни резултати. И накрая, сред тестваните стратегии, тези, които използват само въпроса (а не отговора), осигуряват най-добрия компромис ефективност-ефективност. Кодът е публично достъпен.', 'de': 'Diese Studie beschreibt die Entwicklung eines portugiesischen Community-Question Answering Benchmarks im Bereich Diabetes Mellitus unter Verwendung eines Recognizing Question Entailment (RQE)-Ansatzes. Ausgehend von einer Prämissenfrage zielt RQE darauf ab, semantisch ähnliche, bereits beantwortete, archivierte Fragen abzurufen. Wir bauen ein neues portugiesisches Benchmark-Korpus mit 785-Paaren zwischen Prämissenfragen und archivierten beantworteten Fragen auf, die mit Relevanzbewertungen durch medizinische Experten gekennzeichnet sind. Basierend auf dem Benchmark-Korpus nutzten und evaluierten wir verschiedene RQE-Ansätze, die von traditionellen Methoden zur Informationsgewinnung bis hin zu neuartigen großen vortrainierten Sprachmodellen und Ensembletechniken mit Learn-to-Rank-Ansätzen reichen. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass eine überwachte transformatorbasierte Methode, die mit mehreren Sprachen und für mehrere Aufgaben (MUSE) trainiert wird, die Alternativen übertrifft. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen auch, dass Methodenensembles (Stacking) sowie eine traditionelle (Light) Information Retrieval Methode (BM25) wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse erzielen können. Schließlich bieten unter den getesteten Strategien diejenigen, die nur die Frage (nicht die Antwort) nutzen, den besten Kompromiss zwischen Effektivität und Effizienz. Der Code ist öffentlich zugänglich.', 'hr': 'U ovom ispitivanju opisuje razvoj kriterije odgovarajućeg odgovora na portugalsku zajednicu i pitanja u oblasti dijabeta Mellitus koristeći pristup razumijevanja pitanja (RQE). S obzirom na pitanje premijera, RQE je cilj da dobije semantički slične, već odgovore na arhivna pitanja. Napravili smo novi portugalski korpus s 785 par između pitanja premijera i arhivirane odgovorne pitanja označene odgovarajućim osuđivanjima medicinskih stručnjaka. Na temelju referentnih korpusa, primjenjivali smo i procijenili nekoliko pristupa RQE-a od tradicionalnih metoda prikupljanja informacija do noveliranja velikih predobučenih jezičkih modela i ensemblirali smo tehnike koristeći pristupe učenja do reda. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da metoda nadzornog transformer a obučena višestrukim jezicima i za višestruke zadatke (MUSE) iznosi alternative. Naši rezultati također pokazuju da osiguranja metoda (sklapanje) i tradicionalnog (svjetlosnog) metoda (BM25) informacija mogu proizvesti konkurentne rezultate. Na kraju, među testiranim strategijama, oni koji koriste samo pitanje (ne odgovor), pružaju najbolju trgovinu učinkovitosti i učinkovitosti. Kodeks je javno dostupan.', 'id': 'This study describes the development of a Portuguese Community-Question Answering benchmark in the domain of Diabetes Mellitus using a Recognizing Question Entailment (RQE) approach.  Berdasarkan pertanyaan premis, RQE bermaksud untuk mendapatkan kembali pertanyaan yang sama secara semantis, sudah dijawab, terarchivasi. Kami membangun tubuh benchmark Portugis baru dengan 785 pasangan antara pertanyaan premis dan arsip menjawab pertanyaan yang ditandai dengan keputusan relevan oleh ahli medis. Berdasarkan benchmark corpus, kami menggunakan dan mengevaluasi beberapa pendekatan RQE yang berasal dari metode penghasilan informasi tradisional hingga novel besar model bahasa terlatih dan teknik ensemble menggunakan pendekatan belajar ke rangka. Hasil percobaan kami menunjukkan bahwa metode berbasis transformator yang diawasi dilatih dengan berbagai bahasa dan untuk berbagai tugas (MUSE) melebihi alternatif. Hasil kami juga menunjukkan bahwa ensembles metode (stacking) dan metode tradisional (light) informasi retrieval (BM25) dapat menghasilkan hasil kompetitif. Finally, among the tested strategies, those that exploit only the question (not the answer), provide the best effectiveness-efficiency trade-off.  Kode tersedia publik.', 'fa': 'این مطالعه توسعه توسعه یک جوامع پورتوژیکی-سوال جواب دادن مقدار پاسخ در مجموعه دیابت ملیتوس را توصیف می\u200cکند که با استفاده از دستور توسعه سوال شناسایی (RQE). با توجه به یک سوال پیش\u200cفرض، RQE هدف می\u200cگیرد که به صورت طبیعی مشابه بگیرد، قبلاً جواب داده باشد، سوال\u200cهای محفوظ. ما یک شرکت تخمین نوع پورتوگلیسی با 785 جفت بین سوالات پیشنهاد و سوالات بازداشته شده\u200cایم که توسط متخصص پزشکی با قضاوت های مربوط به معتبر نشان داده شده\u200cاند. بر اساس کورپوس صندوق، چندین دسترسی RQE را از طریق بازیابی اطلاعات سنتی به نوم مدل های پیش آموزش زبانی بزرگ و تکنیک\u200cها را با استفاده از دسترسی یادگیری به صندوق تحصیل می\u200cکنیم و ارزیابی می\u200cکردیم. نتیجه آزمایش ما نشان می دهد که یک روش تغییر دهنده بر اساس متغییر کننده آموزش شده با زبان\u200cهای متعدد و برای کارهای متعدد (MUSE) انتخابات را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد. نتیجه\u200cهای ما هم نشان می\u200cدهند که دسته\u200cهای روش\u200cها و روش\u200cهای (نور) رسمی (BM25) می\u200cتوانند نتیجه\u200cهای رقابتی را تولید کنند. بالاخره، بین استراتژی\u200cهای آزمایش، کسانی که تنها سوال را استفاده می\u200cکنند (جواب نیست) بهترین تجارت موثرت و موثرت را می\u200cدهند. قانون عمومی در دسترس است.', 'ko': '이 연구는 당뇨병 분야에서 인지적 문제내포(RQE) 방법을 사용해 포르투갈 지역사회 문제응답 기준을 개발하는 것을 기술했다.RQE는 비슷한 의미의 아카이브 문제를 검색하기 위한 사전 요구 사항을 제공합니다.우리는 새로운 포르투갈어 기준 어료 라이브러리를 구축하여 전제 문제와 보관된 785에 대한 답변 문제를 포함하고 의학 전문가가 관련 판단을 표시한다.기준 자료 라이브러리를 바탕으로 우리는 몇 가지 RQE 방법을 활용하여 평가했다. 전통적인 정보 검색 방법부터 새로운 대형 예비 훈련 언어 모델, 그리고 학습 순위 방법을 사용하는 통합 기술까지.우리의 실험 결과는 변압기를 감독하는 다국어 멀티태스킹 방법(MUSE)이 다른 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 보여준다.우리의 연구결과는 다양한 방법(중첩)과 전통적인 (광)정보 검색 방법(BM25)이 경쟁력 있는 결과를 낳을 수 있다는 것을 보여준다.마지막으로 테스트를 거친 전략에서 문제만 이용하는 전략은 최상의 효율 평가를 제공했다.코드는 공개됐습니다.', 'sw': 'Utafiti huu unaelezea maendeleo ya Jamii na Swali la Kireno linalojibu bendera katika maeneo ya Diabetes Mellitus kwa kutumia mbinu ya kutambua Ujumbe wa swali (RQE). Kutokana na swali la awali, RQE inakusudia kupunguza maswali yanayofanana na yanayofanana na kimwili, tayari ilijibu, maswali yaliyohifadhiwa. Tunajenga makampuni mpya ya bendera ya Kireno yenye viwili 785 kati ya maswali ya awali na maktaba yalijibu maswali yanayoonyeshwa na maamuzi yanayohusiana na wataalam wa afya. Kwa msingi wa makampuni ya bendera, tulipandisha na kutathmini mbinu kadhaa za RQE zinazotofauti na njia za kupata taarifa za kitamaduni ili kutengeneza mifano makubwa ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla na teknolojia za kujifunza kwa kutumia mbinu za kujifunza kwa kiwango kikubwa. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu inayofuatiliwa na mabadiliko yaliyotumiwa kwa lugha mbalimbali na kwa kazi nyingi (MUSE) inaonyesha mabadiliko. Matokeo yetu pia yanaonyesha kuwa mifano ya namna (kutangaza) pamoja na njia ya kurejesha taarifa za kitamaduni (mwanga) inaweza kuleta matokeo ya ushindani. Hatimaye, miongoni mwa mikakati iliyojaribiwa, wale wanaotumia swali tu (sio jibu), wanatoa ufanisi bora zaidi wa biashara. Sheria inapatikana hadharani.', 'am': 'ይህ ትምህርት የፖርቱጋዊ ኮምፒዩቲ-የውይይት የጥያቄ ኢንተርኔት (RQE) መግለጫ በመጠቀም በDiabetes Mellitus አካባቢ ላይ የኢንችሎት መልስ አቀማመጥ ይናገራል፡፡ የቀድሞው ጥያቄ በመጠየቅ ጊዜ RQE በተመሳሳይ እንደምትመስል ማድረግ ነው፡፡ አዲስ ፖርቱጋሊስ የቅርጽ ኮርፓስ እና 785 ዓይነቶችን በጥያቄ ጥያቄ እና የመዝገብ ቤት ውስጥ ባለው ጥያቄዎች በጥያቄ ባለው ፈቃድ ውርስ ታይቷል፡፡ በbenchmark ኮፕስስ በመሠረት ላይ የተለየን እና የRQE ደረጃዎችን ከባሕላዊ መረጃ ማግኘት ሥርዓት የተለየን እና ትልቁ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች እና የተማረ ደረጃዎችን በመጠቀም የተለየን ትልቅ ስልጣናዎች እና የመረጃ ዘዴዎችን ለመጠቀም የተለየን ደረጃዎች አሰብሰናል፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎቻችን በብዛት ቋንቋዎች የተማረከ የዘረዘ የፎርማት ሥርዓት እና ለብዙዎች ስራ (MUSE) የተለየውን መለወጫ ያሳያል፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን ደግሞ የሥርዓት (መቆጣጠር) እና የባሕላዊ (ብርሃን) መረጃ ማግኘት (BM25) ፍሬዎችን የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ በመጨረሻው፣ በተፈታተኑት ስርዓት፣ ጥያቄውን ብቻ የሚጠይቁ (መልስ ሳይሆን) የበለጠ ጥያቄ የንግድ ጥያቄ እንዲሰጡ ነው፡፡ የኮድ ግልፅ ነው', 'sq': 'Ky studim përshkruan zhvillimin e një pikë referenciale për përgjigjen e komunitetit-pyetjeve portugal në fushën e diabetes Mellitus duke përdorur një qasje të njohjes së problemeve të pyetjeve (RQE). Duke pasur parasysh një pyetje të premtuar, RQE synon të marrë pyetje semantike të ngjashme, tashmë të përgjigjura, të arkivuara. Ne ndërtojmë një kufom të ri portugal me 785 çifte midis pyetjeve të themeluara dhe pyetjeve të arkivuara të përgjigjura të shënuara me gjykime të rëndësishme nga ekspertët mjekësorë. Duke u bazuar në bazën e korrupsionit, ne përdorëm dhe vlerësuam disa metoda RQE që shkojnë nga metodat tradicionale të marrjes së informacionit deri në të rinovuar modele të mëdha gjuhësh të stërvitura para-stërvitura dhe teknika të ensembleve duke përdorur metoda mësimi-në-rangu. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale tregojnë se një metodë e mbikqyrur në bazë të transformuesit e stërvitur me gjuhë të shumta dhe për detyra të shumta (MUSE) i kalon alternativat. Rezultatet tona tregojnë gjithashtu se grupet e metodave (grumbullimit) si dhe një metodë tradicionale (e lehtë) për marrjen e informacionit (BM25) mund të prodhojnë rezultate konkurruese. Më në fund, midis strategjive të testuara, ato që shfrytëzojnë vetëm pyetjen (jo përgjigjen), ofrojnë kompromisin më të mirë efektiv-efektiv. Kodi është në dispozicion publik.', 'tr': 'Bu araşdyrma Diabetes Mellitus sahypasynda Portugalça Toplumaty-Soragy Açmak (RQE) golaýynyň gelişmesini tanaýar. Önemli sorag görä, RQE semantik ýaly soraglary almak maksady eýýäm jogap berilýär. Örnekler soraglary we arşiwlet soraglary arasynda 785 çift bilen täze Portugalça benchmark korpusyny gurdyk. Akademiýa köpüsüne daýanýar, biz düzenli maglumatlar alma yönteminden bäri uly öň-okuwçy dil modellerini romanlaşdyryp, we öwrenmek üçin nusgalary ulanarak beýleki metodlaryny ulandyk we deňleşdirdik. Biziň experimental netijelerimiz birnäçe dil bilen bilinmiş transformer taýýarlanan yöntemi we birnäçe işi üçin (MUSE) seçenekleri üstüne getirýär. Biziň netijelerimiz hem çyzgyşlaryň (stacking) yöntemlerinin we däpli bir (ışık) maglumat alma yöntemi (BM25) ýaryşykly netijeleri getirip biljekdigini görkezilýärler. Soňunda synanyşan strategiýalaryň arasynda diňe soragy ulananlar (jogaby däl), üstünlikde etkinlik-täsirlikli täsirlenheid taýýarlamagy täsirli bererler. _Mazmunlar', 'af': "Hierdie studie beskrywe die ontwikkeling van 'n Portugese gemeenskap-Vrag antwoord benchmark in die domein van Diabetes Mellitus deur 'n herkening Vrag Entailment (RQE) toegang te gebruik. Gien 'n premise vraag, doel RQE doen om semantiese gelykbaar, reeds geantwoord, argiewe vrae te kry. Ons bou 'n nuwe Portugese benchmark korpus met 785 paar tussen premise vrae en argief gevrae vrae wat met relevante oordelings gemerk word deur mediese eksperte. Op die benchmark-korpus het ons verskeie RQE-toegange geneem en evalueer vanaf tradisionele inligting-ontvangmetodes tot noveleer groot voor-onderwerp taal-modelle en ensembleer teknike gebruik learn-to-rank-toegange. Ons eksperimentele resultate vertoon dat 'n superviseerde transformer-gebaseerde metode wat met veelvuldige tale opgelei is en vir veelvuldige taak (MUSE) die alternatiewe uitvoer. Ons resultate wys ook dat ensembles van metodes (stapeling) en 'n tradisionele (lig) inligting-ontvangmetode (BM25) kan produseer rekenaar resultate. Eindelik, onder die testeerde strategies, die wat slegs die vraag (nie die antwoord) gebruik, verskaf die beste effektiviteit-effektiviteit-handel af. Kode is openlik beskikbaar.", 'bn': 'এই গবেষণা পোর্টুগীজ সম্প্রদায়-প্রশ্নের উন্নয়নের বর্ণনা করছে ডায়াবেটেস মেলিটাসের ডোমেইনে বেনম্যার্কের উত্তর দেয়া হয়েছে প্রশ্ন ইনটেমেন্ট প্রাথমিক প্রশ্ন দিয়ে রিকিউই এর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে সেমান্টিকভাবে একই ধরনের প্রশ্ন পুনরুদ্ধার করার, ইতোমধ্যে উত্তর দিয়ে আমরা একটি নতুন পর্তুগীজ বেনম্যার্ক কোর্পাস তৈরি করি যার সাথে প্রথম প্রশ্ন এবং আর্কাইভের মধ্যে ৭৫৫ জোড়া আছে যারা চিকিৎসা বিশেষজ Based on the benchmark corpus, we leveraged and evaluated several RQE approaches ranging from traditional information retrieval methods to novel large pre-trained language models and ensemble techniques using learn-to-rank approaches.  আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে বেশ কয়েকটি ভাষায় পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে এবং বেশ কিছু কাজের (এমএসএস আমাদের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রতিযোগিতার ফলাফল তৈরি করতে পারে (বিএম২৫) এবং ঐতিহ্যবাহী তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধার মাধ্যমেও। অবশেষে, পরীক্ষার কৌশলের মধ্যে যারা শুধুমাত্র প্রশ্ন ব্যবহার করে (উত্তর নয়) তাদের মধ্যে সবচেয়ে ভালো কার্যকর-কার্যকরী ব্যবসা  কোড প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'bs': 'U ovom ispitivanju opisuje razvoj kriterije odgovarajućeg odgovora na portugalsku zajednicu i pitanja u oblasti dijabeta Mellitus koristeći pristup prepoznavanja pitanja (RQE). S obzirom na pitanje premisa, RQE je cilj da dobije semantički slične, već odgovore na arhivna pitanja. Napravili smo novi portugalski benchmark korpus sa 785 par između pitanja premijera i arhivirane odgovorne pitanja označene s relevantnim osuđivanjem medicinskih stručnjaka. Na temelju referentnih korpusa, uključili smo i procijenili nekoliko pristupa RQE-a od tradicionalnih metoda prikupljanja informacija do romaniranja velikih predobučenih jezičkih modela i ensemblirali smo tehnike koristeći pristupe učenja na rank. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da nadzorna metoda na transformaciji obučena višestrukim jezicima i za višestruke zadatke (MUSE) iznosi alternative. Naši rezultati također pokazuju da osiguranja metoda (sklapanje) i tradicionalnog (svjetlosnog) metoda (BM25) informacija mogu proizvesti konkurentne rezultate. Na kraju, među testovanim strategijama, oni koji koriste samo pitanje (ne odgovor), pružaju najbolju trgovinu učinkovitosti i učinkovitosti. Kod je javno dostupan.', 'hy': 'Այս ուսումնասիրությունը նկարագրում է Պորտուգալիայի համայնքի հարցերի պատասխանի համեմատային նպատակի զարգացումը դիաբեթ Մելիթոսի ոլորտում, օգտագործելով Հարցերի Հետաքրքրության (RQE) մոտեցումը: Պարտադրված հարց առնելով, RQE-ն նպատակում է վերցնել սեմանտիկապես նման, արդեն պատասխանված, արխիվացված հարցեր: Մենք կառուցում ենք նոր պորտուգալիացի համեմատական մարմին 785 զույգերի միջև արխիվված հարցերի և արխիվված պատասխանների հարցերի միջև, որոնք նշանակում են բժշկական մասնագետների կարևորությունը: Հաշվի առնելով համեմատական կորպոսի վրա, մենք օգտագործեցինք և գնահատեցինք մի քանի RQE մոտեցումներ՝ սկսած ավանդական ինֆորմացիայի վերադարձման մեթոդներից մինչև նոր մեծ նախապատրաստ լեզվի մոդելներ և էնսբուլ տեխնիկաներ՝ օգտագործել Մեր փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ վերահսկված վերափոխողի հիմնված մեթոդը, որը սովորեցվում է բազմաթիվ լեզուներով և բազմաթիվ առաջադրանքների համար (МուԶ), արտադրում է այլընտրանքները: Our results also show that ensembles of methods (stacking) as well as a traditional (light) information retrieval method (BM25) can produce competitive results.  Վերջապես, փորձարկված ռազմավարությունների շրջանակում, նրանք, ովքեր օգտագործում են միայն հարցը (ոչ թե պատասխանը), ապահում են լավագույն արդյունավետությունը և արդյունավետությունը: Code is publicly available.', 'az': 'Bu araŇüdńĪrma, Diabetes Mellitus sah…ôsind…ôki Portugalca ToplumatńĪ-sual cavab ver…ôn benchmark t…ôhsil edilm…ôsini tanńĪyńĪr sual tamamlama (RQE) approach vasit…ôsil…ô t…ôhsil edir. ∆Źvv…ôlki suala g√∂r…ô, RQE semantik Ňü…ôkild…ô b…ônz…ôr sual almaq ist…ôyir, …ôvv…ôlc…ô cavab verilmiŇü, arŇüivlendirilmiŇü suallar. Biz t…ôklif suallarńĪ arasńĪnda 785 √ßift olan yeni portugalca benchmark korpusu inŇüa edirik v…ô arŇüivlendirilmiŇü m…ôlumatlar t…ôhsil ed…ôn m…ôlumatlarńĪ il…ô …ôlaq…ôsiz h√∂kml…ôri il…ô iŇüar…ô edilmiŇü cavab ver…ônl…ôr. Benchmark korpusu say…ôsind…ô, ne√ß…ô-ne√ß…ô RQE t…ôr…ôfind…ôn alńĪnan m…ôlumatlar alma metodlarńĪndan v…ô b√∂y√ľk √∂yr…ônmiŇü dil modell…ôrini yenil…ôŇüdirm…ôk v…ô √∂yr…ônm…ôk-d…ôr…ôc…ô t…ôr…ôfind…ôn istifad…ô ed…ôn tehnikl…ôri t…ômin edirik. Bizim t…ôcr√ľb…ômiz sonu√ßlarńĪmńĪz √ßoxlu dill…ôrl…ô t…ôhsil edilmiŇü transformer tabanlńĪ metodlarńĪnńĪn v…ô √ßoxlu iŇül…ôr √ľ√ß√ľn (MUSE) alternatiflarńĪnńĪn √ľst√ľnl√ľy√ľn√ľ g√∂st…ôrir. Bizim sonu√ßlarńĪmńĪz da g√∂st…ôrir ki, metodlarńĪn (stacking) v…ô n√ľmun…ôlik (light) m…ôlumat alma metodlarńĪnńĪn (BM25) m√ľqayis…ôdi sonu√ßlarńĪ √ľr…ôkl…ôŇüdir…ô bil…ôr. Sonunda, testl…ôn…ôn stratejil…ôrd…ôn, yalnńĪz sual istifad…ô ed…ônl…ôr (cavab deyil), …ôn yaxŇüńĪ effektivlik-effektivlik ticar…ôti verirl…ôr. Kod halda faydalanńĪr.', 'cs': 'Tato studie popisuje vývoj portugalského referenčního měřítka pro zodpovězení otázek v oblasti Diabetes mellitus s využitím přístupu k rozpoznávání otázek (RQE). Vzhledem k předpokladní otázce se RQE snaží získat sémanticky podobné, již zodpovězené, archivované otázky. Vytváříme nový portugalský referenční korpus s 785 páry mezi otázkami předpokladu a archivovanými odpověděnými otázkami označenými relevantními posudky lékařských odborníků. Na základě benchmarkového korpusu jsme využili a hodnotili několik RQE přístupů od tradičních metod vyhledávání informací až po nové velké předškolené jazykové modely a souborové techniky s využitím learn-to-rank přístupů. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují, že metoda založená na supervizovaném transformátoru trénovaná s více jazyky a pro více úkolů (MUSE) překonává alternativy. Naše výsledky také ukazují, že soubory metod (stohování), stejně jako tradiční (lehká) metoda vyhledávání informací (BM25) mohou dosáhnout konkurenčních výsledků. A konečně, mezi testovanými strategiemi, ty, které využívají pouze otázku (nikoli odpověď), poskytují nejlepší kompromis efektivity a efektivity. Kód je veřejně dostupný.', 'fi': 'Tässä tutkimuksessa kuvataan portugalilaisen yhteisön kyselyvastausvertailun kehittämistä Diabetes Mellituksen alalla käyttäen Recognizing Question Entailment (RQE) -lähestymistapaa. Lähtökysymyksen perusteella RQE pyrkii noutamaan semanttisesti samankaltaisia, jo vastattuja, arkistoituja kysymyksiä. Rakennamme uuden portugalilaisen vertailukorpusen, jossa on 785 paria lähtökohtien ja arkistoitujen vastausten välille, jotka on merkitty lääketieteen asiantuntijoiden merkityksellisyysarvioinneilla. Vertailukorpuksen pohjalta hyödynsimme ja arvioimme useita RQE-lähestymistapoja perinteisistä tiedonhakumenetelmistä uusiin suuriin esikoulutettuihin kielimalleihin ja ensemble-tekniikoihin käyttäen learn-to-rank -lähestymistapoja. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että monitoroitu muuntajapohjainen menetelmä, joka on koulutettu useilla kielillä ja moniin tehtäviin (MUSE), on parempi vaihtoehto. Tuloksemme osoittavat myös, että menetelmäkokonaisuudet (pinoaminen) sekä perinteinen (kevyt) tiedonhakumenetelmä (BM25) voivat tuottaa kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia. Lopuksi testatuista strategioista ne, joissa hyödynnetään vain kysymystä (ei vastausta), tarjoavat parhaan tehokkuuden ja tehokkuuden välisen kompromissin. Koodi on julkisesti saatavilla.', 'ca': "Aquest estudi descriu el desenvolupament d'un criteri de referència de resposta a preguntes de la comunitat portuguesa en el domini de Diabetes Mellitus fent servir un enfocament de reconeixement de malalties de preguntes (RQE). Dada una pregunta premisa, RQE intenta recuperar preguntes semànticament similars, ja respostes, arquivades. Construim un nou cos de referència portuguès amb 785 parelles entre preguntes premises i preguntes arquivades respostes marcades amb sentences de relevància d'experts mèdics. Sobre la base del corpus de referència, vam aprofitar i evaluar diversos enfocaments de QR que van des de mètodes tradicionals de recuperació d'informació fins a noves grans models de llenguatge pré-entrenats i tècniques d'ensemble utilitzant enfocaments d'aprenentatge a rangs. Els nostres resultats experimentals mostren que un mètode supervisat basat en transformadors entrenat amb múltiples llengües i per múltiples tasques (MUSE) supera les alternatives. Els nostres resultats també mostran que els conjunts de mètodes (pilar) i un mètode tradicional (lleuger) de recuperació d'informació (BM25) poden produir resultats competitius. Finalment, entre les estratègies testades, aquells que només expliquen la pregunta (no la resposta), proporcionen el millor compromís entre eficiència i eficiència. El codi està disponible al públic.", 'et': 'Käesolevas uuringus kirjeldatakse Portugali kogukonna küsimustele vastamise võrdlusaluse väljatöötamist Diabetes Mellituse valdkonnas, kasutades Recognizing Question Entailment (RQE) lähenemisviisi. Arvestades eeldusküsimust, on RQE eesmärk leida semantiliselt sarnased, juba vastatud, arhiveeritud küsimused. Ehitame uue Portugali võrdluskorpuse 785 paariga eeldusküsimuste ja arhiveeritud vastusega küsimuste vahel, mida tähistavad meditsiiniekspertide asjakohased otsused. Võrdluskorpuse põhjal võimendasime ja hindasime mitmeid RQE lähenemisviise, alates traditsioonilistest informatsiooni hankimise meetoditest kuni uute suurte eelõpetatud keelemudelite ja ansamblite meetoditeni, kasutades õppimise astmele lähenemisviise. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et mitme keelega ja mitme ülesande jaoks koolitatud juhendatud trafopõhine meetod (MUSE) on alternatiividest parem. Meie tulemused näitavad ka, et nii meetodite komplektid (virnastamine) kui ka traditsiooniline (kerge) informatsiooni hankimise meetod (BM25) võivad anda konkurentsivõimelisi tulemusi. Testitud strateegiate hulgas pakuvad parimat tulemuslikkuse ja tõhususe vahelist kompromisse vaid küsimust (mitte vastust) kasutavad need strateegiad, mis kasutavad ära ainult küsimust. Kood on avalikult kättesaadav.', 'he': 'מחקר זה מתאר את התפתחות של נקודת רמז של תשובת השאלות של הקהילה הפורטוגזית בתחום מדלבת מליטוס באמצעות גישה למחלה של שאלות מזהה (RQE). בהתחשב בשאלה משמעותית, RQE מתכוון להשיג שאלות סמנטית דומות, כבר ענו, ארכיבים. אנו בונים גוף רמז פורטוגזי חדש עם 785 זוגות בין שאלות משפטיות וארכיון שאלות ענו מסומנות עם שיפוטים רלוונטיים על ידי מומחים רפואיים. בהתבסס על הקורפוס המרמזי, השתמשנו ובערכנו בכמה גישות RQE מתרחשות משיטות גילוי מידע מסורתיות עד ניתוח דוגמנים גדולים לשפה מאומנים מראש ושיטות אנסמבל בשימוש גישות למידה לרמה. התוצאות הניסיוניים שלנו מראות ששיטה מבוססת על מערכת השינויים המבוססת על מנת להתאמן עם שפות רבות ולעבור משימות רבות (MUSE) מעלית את האלטרנטיבות. התוצאות שלנו גם מראות שסמלים של שיטות (עמוד) וגם שיטת חיפוש מידע מסורתית (קלה) (BM25) יכולים לייצר תוצאות תחרותיות. סוף סוף, בין האסטרטגיות הנבחנות, אלה שמניצלים רק את השאלה (לא התשובה), מספקים את הסחר היעילות-יעילות הטוב ביותר. Code is publicly available.', 'sk': 'Ta študija opisuje razvoj referenčne vrednosti za odgovore na vprašanja v portugalski skupnosti na področju sladkorne bolezni z uporabo pristopa prepoznavanja vprašanj (RQE). Glede na premično vprašanje si RQE prizadeva pridobiti semantično podobna, že odgovorjena, arhivirana vprašanja. Zgradili smo nov portugalski referenčni korpus s 785 parom med vprašanji o premisih in arhiviranimi odgovori, označenimi z ustreznimi presojami medicinskih strokovnjakov. Na podlagi referenčnega korpusa smo izkoristili in ocenili več pristopov RQE, ki segajo od tradicionalnih metod pridobivanja informacij do novih velikih vnaprej usposobljenih jezikovnih modelov in tehnik ansamblov, ki uporabljajo pristope "learn-to-rank". Naši eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da nadzorovana transformatorska metoda, usposobljena z več jeziki in za več nalogami (MUSE), presega alternative. Naši rezultati kažejo tudi, da lahko kompleti metod (zlaganje) in tradicionalna (lahka) metoda iskanja informacij (BM25) prinesejo konkurenčne rezultate. Nazadnje, med preizkušenimi strategijami, tiste, ki izkoriščajo samo vprašanje (ne odgovor), zagotavljajo najboljši kompromis med učinkovitostjo in učinkovitostjo. Koda je javno dostopna.', 'ha': "Wannan littafin na bayyana the developed of a Portuguayan Commonci-Sura'in da ake karɓa bongon cikin the Domen of Diablees mellitus by an san wani takwara na Kyauta Entailment (RQET). Gida wani tambayi na farko, RQU yana aimar ya sami masu motsi da misãlin na zaman da aka karɓa, masu tambayar da aka buɗe. We build a new Portuguese benchmark corpus with 785 pairs between premise questions and archived answered questions marked with relevance judgments by medical experts.  Basan da bangon bangon ayuka, muka samar da kuma muka ƙaddara wasu shiryoyin RQU masu motsi daga hanyoyin motsar masu tsari na zaman lãbãri zuwa yanzu masu motsi masu girma da aka yi wa zaman tsari da kuma masu buƙata, da amfani da tsaro-zuwa-daraja. MatarayinMu na nuna cewa an tsare na hanyor transformer da aka sanar da shi a cikin wasu harshen dabam-daban, kuma da wa aikin masu yawa (MUNU) yana samar da musamman. MatamayinMu na nuna cewa misãlai na hanyõyin (stakking) da hanyon mai riƙo (haske) da hanyor retrieki (BM25) za ta ƙara fassarar da fassarata. Gani, daga cikin jarrabai, waɗannan da ke amfani da su kawai da tambayar (ba su karɓa ba), suna da mafiya amfani da cinikin mafiya kyau. Ana iya ƙayyade kode da bayyane.", 'jv': 'This question describes the design of a portugical komunity-question responses bench in the domain of diaveces Mellicus used a Learning question Entayment (RqE) method. Nanging kapan pangan sing paling, RqE kuwi nggawe sematik dadi luwih apik, kaya ngono cegawe, nggawe layang seneng pisan. Awak dhéwé nggawe bench-bench sing uwong karo kongkar kongkar biasa sekang karo kongkar biasa layang karo ingkang dipulangan pangan lan nganggo dolanan sing dipulangan karo perusahaan langkung wijana sing isiné karo perusahaan winih dhéwé. Ngawe wis basa bench-coro sing dibenalke, kita jewis wis nggawe lan ijol-jewis ngerasai winih sing dibenalke RqE seneng dolanan informasi nggawe ngubah gambar sistem ngono nggawe model sing preransembar lan jewis ngerasai sistêm nggawe gerasane sakjane sampeyan cara nggawe Awakdhéwé éntukno sing paling nggawe barang akeh transformer-basa basa gambar tukang karo uga tindang karo ngon Multiple tasks (MUSE) sing bisa diagonalan akeh Alternate. Ndoleh-Ndoleh pisan tambah pisan kelompok nggawe sistem (stabking) lan akeh barang-barang nggawe barang nggawe informasi (lit) nggawe barang nggawe sistem sing bisa pasar dumadhakan gambar. Lha wih-wih, mengko alam sing ujian akeh pancen, wong wong liyane mung pangan-ingkang (ora awak dhéwé), nggawe barang apik efek-efek sing luwih apik dhéwé. Kod kang publik gawé', 'bo': 'This study describes the development of a Portuguese Community-Question Answering benchmark in the domain of Diabetes Mellitus using a Recognizing Question Entailment (RQE) approach. རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དྲི་ཚིག་ཞིག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་པ་དེ་ལྟར་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དུ་འཇུག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དབང་ཆ་ལ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དབང་ཆ་ལ་འགྲོ་བ་དང་ཐུག་མཛོད་ཁང་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བ་འདུག Based on the benchmark corpus, we leveraged and evaluated several RQE approaches ranging from traditional information retrieval methods to novel large pre-trained language models and ensemble techniques using learn-to-rank approaches. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་གི་འབྲུག ང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་ཀྱིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་དང་སྔོན་སྲོལ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཉར་འཇུག་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། མཐའ་མ་དེ། བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་པའི་འཇིག་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་འདྲི་ཚིག་གཅིག་པུ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་མི་ཐུབ། སྤྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་མང་ཙམ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ'}
{'en': 'On the Usability of Transformers-based Models for a French Question-Answering Task', 'ar': 'حول قابلية استخدام النماذج المستندة إلى المحولات لمهمة الإجابة على الأسئلة الفرنسية', 'es': 'Sobre la usabilidad de los modelos basados en transformadores para una tarea de respuesta a preguntas en francés', 'pt': 'Sobre a usabilidade de modelos baseados em transformadores para uma tarefa francesa de resposta a perguntas', 'fr': "Sur l'utilisabilité des modèles basés sur des transformateurs pour une tâche de réponse aux questions en français", 'ja': 'フランス語の質問応答タスクのための変圧器ベースのモデルの使い勝手について', 'zh': '论变形金刚在法国问答之可利用性', 'hi': 'एक फ्रांसीसी प्रश्न-उत्तर कार्य के लिए ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित मॉडल की प्रयोज्यता पर', 'ru': 'Об удобстве использования моделей на основе трансформаторов для выполнения задачи с ответом на французский вопрос', 'ga': 'Ar Inúsáidteacht Múnlaí Bunaithe ar Chlaochladáin le haghaidh Tasc Fraincise le Freagra na gCeisteanna', 'ka': 'ტრანფორმაციის მოდელების გამოყენებელობაზე ფრანგური კითხვა-დასაუპასუხისთვის მოდულების გამოყენებელობაზე', 'el': 'Σχετικά με τη χρηστικότητα μοντέλων βασισμένων σε μετασχηματιστές για ένα γαλλικό έργο απάντησης ερωτήσεων', 'hu': 'A transzformátorok alapú modellek használhatóságáról egy francia kérdésre válaszoló feladatra', 'it': "Sull'usabilità dei modelli basati su trasformatori per un compito francese di risposta alle domande", 'lt': 'Dėl Prancūzijos atsakymo į klausimus modelių naudojimo', 'mk': 'За употребноста на модели базирани на трансформирачи за задача на француски одговор на прашања', 'kk': 'Француз сұрақ- жауап беру тапсырмасының түрлендіруші негіздеген үлгілер пайдалануы', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഫ്രെഞ്ച് ചോദ്യം- ഉത്തരം ചെയ്യുന്ന ജോലിക്കുള്ള ട്രാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ മോഡലുകളുടെ ഉപ', 'mt': 'Dwar l-Użu ta’ Mudelli bbażati fuq it-Trasformaturi għal Kompitu Franċiż li jwieġeb għall-mistoqsijiet', 'mn': 'Француз асуулт-хариулт үйлдлийн төлөвлөгчийн суурь загварын ашиглах боломжтой', 'ro': 'Despre utilizarea modelelor bazate pe transformatori pentru o sarcină franceză de răspuns la întrebări', 'pl': 'O użyteczności modeli opartych na transformatorach do francuskiego zadania odpowiadania na pytania', 'sr': 'Na korištenju modela na transformaciji za francuski zadatak odgovornog pitanja', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Ku saabsan isticmaalka Iswidishka Models-based Transformers for a French Question-Answering', 'sv': 'Om användbarheten av transformatorbaserade modeller för en fransk frågesvarsuppgift', 'no': 'På bruk av transformeringsbaserte modeller for eit fransk oppgåve som svarar på spørsmål', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'فرانسوی سوال-جواب ٹاکس کے لئے ترنسفورٹ بنیادی موڈل کے استعمال کے قابلیت پر', 'vi': 'Về khả năng sử dụng các mô hình biến hình cho nhiệm vụ Trả lời câu hỏi Pháp', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'За използваемостта на базирани на трансформатори модели за френска задача за отговор на въпроси', 'nl': 'Over de bruikbaarheid van op Transformers gebaseerde modellen voor een Franse vragenbeantwoordingstaak', 'hr': 'Na korištenju modela na transformatorima za francuski zadatak odgovora na pitanje', 'da': 'Om anvendeligheden af transformatorbaserede modeller til en fransk spørgsmål-besvarelse opgave', 'de': 'Zur Anwendbarkeit transformatorbasierter Modelle für eine französische Fragebeantwortung', 'id': 'Tentang Kegunaan Model Berdasarkan Transformer untuk Tugas Jawab Pertanyaan Perancis', 'fa': 'روی استفاده از مدل\u200cهای تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cها برای یک کار پرسیدن\u200cجواب\u200cکننده\u200cی سوال فرانسوی', 'ko': '트랜스포머에 기초한 프랑스어 퀴즈 모델의 가용성', 'sw': 'Kuhusu matumizi ya Modeli za Watafsiri wenye msingi wa Majibu ya Ufaransa', 'tr': 'Fransuzça sorag-jogabat täbi üçin Transformer tabanly nusgalaryň ullanlykyna', 'sq': 'Për përdorueshmërinë e modeleve bazuar në transformuesit për një detyrë përgjigjesh të pyetjeve franceze', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Ֆրանսիացի հարցերի պատասխանի խնդիրների վերաբերյալ ձևերի օգտագործելիության մասին', 'az': 'Fransız sual-cavab verən işləri üçün Transformers-tabanlı Modellərin istifadəsi barəsində', 'bn': 'ফ্রেঞ্চ প্রশ্ন- উত্তরাধিকার কাজের জন্য ট্রান্সফর্মার ভিত্তিক মডেল ব্যবহারের ব্যবহার', 'bs': 'Na korištenju modela na transformatorima za francuski zadatak odgovora na pitanje', 'ca': "sobre l'utilitat de models basats en transformadors per a una tasca de resposta a preguntes francesa", 'et': 'Transformeritel põhinevate mudelite kasutatavuse kohta Prantsuse küsimustele vastamise ülesandes', 'cs': 'O použitelnosti modelů založených na transformátorech pro francouzské odpovědi na otázky', 'fi': 'Transformers-pohjaisten mallien käytettävyydestä ranskalaiseen kysymykseen vastaamiseen', 'jv': 'Jejaring', 'sk': 'O uporabnosti modelov, ki temeljijo na transformatorjih, za francosko nalogo odgovarjanja na vprašanja', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'על השימוש של דוגמנים מבוססים על מעיצים למשימת תשובות לשאלות צרפתית', 'bo': 'ཕེར་ཤིག་གི་འདྲི་ཞིབ་ལ་མཐུན་སྤྱོད་པར་གཞི་བརྗོད་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་བྱས་པའི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་ལ་'}
{'en': 'For many tasks, state-of-the-art results have been achieved with Transformer-based architectures, resulting in a paradigmatic shift in practices from the use of task-specific architectures to the fine-tuning of pre-trained language models. The ongoing trend consists in training models with an ever-increasing amount of data and parameters, which requires considerable resources. It leads to a strong search to improve resource efficiency based on algorithmic and hardware improvements evaluated only for English. This raises questions about their usability when applied to small-scale learning problems, for which a limited amount of training data is available, especially for under-resourced languages tasks. The lack of appropriately sized corpora is a hindrance to applying data-driven and transfer learning-based approaches with strong instability cases. In this paper, we establish a state-of-the-art of the efforts dedicated to the usability of Transformer-based models and propose to evaluate these improvements on the question-answering performances of French language which have few resources. We address the instability relating to data scarcity by investigating various training strategies with data augmentation, hyperparameters optimization and cross-lingual transfer. We also introduce a new compact model for French FrALBERT which proves to be competitive in low-resource settings.', 'ar': 'بالنسبة للعديد من المهام ، تم تحقيق أحدث النتائج باستخدام البنى القائمة على Transformer ، مما أدى إلى تحول نموذجي في الممارسات من استخدام البنى الخاصة بالمهمة إلى ضبط نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا. يتمثل الاتجاه المستمر في نماذج التدريب بكمية متزايدة من البيانات والمعلمات ، الأمر الذي يتطلب موارد كبيرة. إنه يؤدي إلى بحث قوي لتحسين كفاءة الموارد بناءً على تحسينات الخوارزميات والأجهزة التي تم تقييمها للغة الإنجليزية فقط. يثير هذا أسئلة حول قابليتها للاستخدام عند تطبيقها على مشكلات التعلم على نطاق صغير ، والتي يتوفر بشأنها قدر محدود من بيانات التدريب ، خاصة لمهام اللغات منخفضة الموارد. يعد الافتقار إلى الشركات ذات الحجم المناسب عائقًا أمام تطبيق النهج القائمة على البيانات ونقلها القائمة على التعلم مع حالات عدم الاستقرار القوية. في هذه الورقة ، نؤسس أحدث الجهود المكرسة لإمكانية استخدام النماذج المستندة إلى المحولات ونقترح تقييم هذه التحسينات على أداء الإجابة على الأسئلة للغة الفرنسية التي لديها القليل من الموارد. نعالج عدم الاستقرار المتعلق بندرة البيانات من خلال التحقيق في استراتيجيات التدريب المختلفة مع زيادة البيانات ، وتحسين المعلمات الفائقة ونقل عبر اللغات. نقدم أيضًا نموذجًا مضغوطًا جديدًا لـ FrALBERT الفرنسية والذي يثبت قدرته على المنافسة في الأماكن منخفضة الموارد.', 'pt': 'Para muitas tarefas, resultados de última geração foram alcançados com arquiteturas baseadas em Transformer, resultando em uma mudança paradigmática nas práticas do uso de arquiteturas específicas de tarefas para o ajuste fino de modelos de linguagem pré-treinados. A tendência em curso consiste em treinar modelos com uma quantidade cada vez maior de dados e parâmetros, o que requer recursos consideráveis. Isso leva a uma forte busca para melhorar a eficiência dos recursos com base em melhorias algorítmicas e de hardware avaliadas apenas para o inglês. Isso levanta questões sobre sua usabilidade quando aplicado a problemas de aprendizagem em pequena escala, para os quais uma quantidade limitada de dados de treinamento está disponível, especialmente para tarefas de idiomas com poucos recursos. A falta de corpora de tamanho adequado é um obstáculo para a aplicação de abordagens baseadas em dados e transferência de aprendizado com fortes casos de instabilidade. Neste artigo, estabelecemos um estado da arte dos esforços dedicados à usabilidade de modelos baseados em Transformers e propomos avaliar essas melhorias nos desempenhos de respostas a perguntas da língua francesa que possuem poucos recursos. Abordamos a instabilidade relacionada à escassez de dados investigando várias estratégias de treinamento com aumento de dados, otimização de hiperparâmetros e transferência entre idiomas. Também apresentamos um novo modelo compacto para o francês FrALBERT, que prova ser competitivo em ambientes de poucos recursos.', 'fr': "Pour de nombreuses tâches, des résultats de pointe ont été obtenus avec des architectures basées sur Transformer, ce qui a entraîné un changement paradigmatique dans les pratiques, passant de l'utilisation d'architectures spécifiques aux tâches à l'ajustement précis de modèles de langage préformés. La tendance actuelle consiste à utiliser des modèles de formation avec une quantité toujours croissante de données et de paramètres, ce qui nécessite des ressources considérables. Cela conduit à une recherche approfondie pour améliorer l'efficacité des ressources sur la base d'améliorations algorithmiques et matérielles évaluées uniquement pour l'anglais. Cela soulève des questions quant à leur facilité d'utilisation lorsqu'ils sont appliqués à des problèmes d'apprentissage à petite échelle, pour lesquels une quantité limitée de données de formation est disponible, en particulier pour les tâches linguistiques sous-financées. L'absence de corpus de taille appropriée est un obstacle à l'application d'approches basées sur les données et basées sur l'apprentissage par transfert avec de forts cas d'instabilité. Dans cet article, nous établissons un état des lieux des efforts consacrés à l'utilisabilité des modèles basés sur Transformer et proposons d'évaluer ces améliorations sur les performances de réponse aux questions de la langue française qui dispose de peu de ressources. Nous abordons l'instabilité liée à la rareté des données en étudiant diverses stratégies de formation avec augmentation des données, optimisation des hyperparamètres et transfert multilingue. Nous présentons également un nouveau modèle compact pour le FrAlbert français qui s'avère compétitif dans les environnements à faibles ressources.", 'hi': 'कई कार्यों के लिए, ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित आर्किटेक्चर के साथ अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त किए गए हैं, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप कार्य-विशिष्ट आर्किटेक्चर के उपयोग से लेकर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल के ठीक-ट्यूनिंग तक प्रथाओं में एक रूपात्मक बदलाव हुआ है। चल रही प्रवृत्ति में डेटा और मापदंडों की बढ़ती मात्रा के साथ प्रशिक्षण मॉडल शामिल हैं, जिसके लिए काफी संसाधनों की आवश्यकता होती है। यह केवल अंग्रेजी के लिए मूल्यांकन किए गए एल्गोरिथम और हार्डवेयर सुधारों के आधार पर संसाधन दक्षता में सुधार करने के लिए एक मजबूत खोज की ओर जाता है। यह छोटे पैमाने पर सीखने की समस्याओं पर लागू होने पर उनकी प्रयोज्यता के बारे में सवाल उठाता है, जिसके लिए प्रशिक्षण डेटा की एक सीमित मात्रा उपलब्ध है, विशेष रूप से कम संसाधन वाली भाषाओं के कार्यों के लिए। उचित आकार के कॉर्पोरेट की कमी मजबूत अस्थिरता के मामलों के साथ डेटा-संचालित और स्थानांतरण सीखने-आधारित दृष्टिकोणों को लागू करने के लिए एक बाधा है। इस पेपर में, हम ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित मॉडल की प्रयोज्यता के लिए समर्पित प्रयासों की एक अत्याधुनिक स्थापना करते हैं और फ्रांसीसी भाषा के प्रश्न-उत्तर देने वाले प्रदर्शनों पर इन सुधारों का मूल्यांकन करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिनके पास कुछ संसाधन हैं। हम डेटा वृद्धि, हाइपरपैरामीटर अनुकूलन और क्रॉस-लिंगुअल स्थानांतरण के साथ विभिन्न प्रशिक्षण रणनीतियों की जांच करके डेटा की कमी से संबंधित अस्थिरता को संबोधित करते हैं। हम फ्रेंच FrALBERT के लिए एक नया कॉम्पैक्ट मॉडल भी पेश करते हैं जो कम संसाधन सेटिंग्स में प्रतिस्पर्धी साबित होता है।', 'es': 'Para muchas tareas, se han logrado resultados de vanguardia con arquitecturas basadas en Transformer, lo que ha dado lugar a un cambio paradigmático en las prácticas, desde el uso de arquitecturas específicas para tareas hasta el ajuste de modelos de lenguaje previamente entrenados. La tendencia actual consiste en modelos de entrenamiento con una cantidad cada vez mayor de datos y parámetros, lo que requiere recursos considerables. Esto lleva a una fuerte búsqueda para mejorar la eficiencia de los recursos basada en mejoras algorítmicas y de hardware evaluadas solo para el inglés. Esto plantea dudas sobre su usabilidad cuando se aplica a problemas de aprendizaje a pequeña escala, para los que se dispone de una cantidad limitada de datos de capacitación, especialmente para tareas de idiomas con pocos recursos. La falta de corpus del tamaño adecuado es un obstáculo para la aplicación de enfoques basados en el aprendizaje basado en datos y transferencia con casos de fuerte inestabilidad. En este artículo, establecemos un estado de vanguardia de los esfuerzos dedicados a la usabilidad de los modelos basados en Transformer y proponemos evaluar estas mejoras en el rendimiento de respuesta a preguntas del idioma francés que tienen pocos recursos. Abordamos la inestabilidad relacionada con la escasez de datos mediante la investigación de varias estrategias de capacitación con aumento de datos, optimización de hiperparámetros y transferencia multilingüe. También presentamos un nuevo modelo compacto para el FRAlbert francés que demuestra ser competitivo en entornos de bajos recursos.', 'zh': '其于众务也,Transformer之架构先进也,以至于用特定者架构变于言语之微。 续势兼用增数、参数以训模形,此须大资也。 会导致英语估算法硬件改进强搜以崇资效率。 此举其可用性于小学,可用性于训练有限,特于资源贫乏之辞也。 乏规模者语料库宜用数驱移学之碍,而有强烈之不定者。 于本文,立最先进之力,基于Transformer之可用性,而建议评法语问答性能之改,几无资矣。 臣等考其数据增强,超参数优化、跨语传输诸训策以决稀缺数之不稳定性。 为法国FrALBERT推一新紧凑型,当于资源匮乏之中有竞争力。', 'ru': 'Для многих задач были достигнуты самые современные результаты с архитектурами на основе Трансформатора, что привело к парадигматическому сдвигу в практике от использования конкретных архитектур к тонкой настройке предварительно обученных языковых моделей. Текущая тенденция заключается в разработке моделей профессиональной подготовки с постоянно увеличивающимся объемом данных и параметров, что требует значительных ресурсов. Это приводит к сильному поиску повышения эффективности использования ресурсов на основе алгоритмических и аппаратных улучшений, оцениваемых только для английского языка. В связи с этим возникают вопросы об их удобстве в использовании применительно к небольшим учебным задачам, по которым имеется ограниченный объем учебных данных, особенно для выполнения задач, связанных с языками, не обеспеченными достаточными ресурсами. Отсутствие корпусов соответствующего размера препятствует применению основанных на данных и передаче знаний подходов, характеризующихся серьезной нестабильностью. В этой статье мы устанавливаем современное состояние усилий, направленных на удобство использования моделей на основе трансформаторов, и предлагаем оценить эти улучшения на основе ответов на вопросы производительности французского языка, который имеет мало ресурсов. Мы решаем проблему нестабильности, связанную с нехваткой данных, путем изучения различных стратегий обучения с расширением данных, оптимизацией гиперпараметров и межъязыковой передачей. Мы также представляем новую компактную модель для французского FrALBERT, которая доказала свою конкурентоспособность в условиях низких ресурсов.', 'ja': '多くのタスクでは、トランスフォーマーベースのアーキテクチャで最先端の結果が達成され、タスク固有のアーキテクチャの使用から事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルの微調整への実践のパラダイムシフトがもたらされています。 継続的な傾向は、かなりのリソースを必要とする、ますます多くのデータとパラメータを持つトレーニングモデルにあります。 英語のみで評価されたアルゴリズムとハードウェアの改善に基づいて、リソース効率を向上させるための強力な検索につながります。 これは、特にリソース不足の言語タスクのために限られた量のトレーニングデータが利用可能な小規模学習問題に適用された場合のユーザビリティに関する疑問を提起する。 適切なサイズのコーポラの欠如は、強力な不安定症例を伴うデータ駆動型および転移学習ベースのアプローチを適用する上での障害である。 本稿では、トランスフォーマーベースモデルの使い勝手に特化した最先端の取り組みを確立し、リソースの少ないフランス語の質問に答えるパフォーマンスについて評価することを提案する。 私たちは、データ増強、ハイパーパラメータ最適化、およびクロスリンガル転送を用いて、さまざまなトレーニング戦略を調査することによって、データ不足に関連する不安定性に対処します。 また、低資源環境での競争力を証明するフランスのFrALBERTの新しいコンパクトモデルも導入しました。', 'ga': 'I gcás go leor tascanna, baineadh torthaí úrscothacha amach le hailtireachtaí Trasfhoirmeoir-bhunaithe, rud a d’fhág go bhfuil athrú paradigmatic i gcleachtais ó úsáid ailtireachtaí tasc-shonracha go mionchoigeartú na múnlaí teanga réamhoilte. Is éard atá sa treocht leanúnach ná samhlacha oiliúna le méadú de shíor ag méadú ar líon na sonraí agus na bparaiméadar, a éilíonn acmhainní suntasacha. Is é an toradh a bhíonn air ná cuardach láidir chun éifeachtúlacht acmhainní a fheabhsú bunaithe ar fheabhsuithe algartamacha agus crua-earraí a ndearnadh meastóireacht orthu don Bhéarla amháin. Ardaíonn sé seo ceisteanna faoina n-úsáidteacht nuair a chuirtear i bhfeidhm iad ar fhadhbanna foghlama ar scála beag, a bhfuil méid teoranta sonraí oiliúna ar fáil ina leith, go háirithe le haghaidh tascanna teangacha gann ar acmhainní. Is bac é an easpa corpora den mhéid cuí ar chur chuige atá bunaithe ar shonraí agus ar fhoghlaim aistrithe a chur i bhfeidhm le cásanna láidre éagobhsaíochta. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos úrscothach ar na hiarrachtaí atá tiomnaithe d’inúsáidteacht na múnlaí atá bunaithe ar an gClaochladán agus molaimid na feabhsuithe sin a mheas ar fheidhmíocht na Fraincise le freagraí ar cheisteanna nach bhfuil mórán acmhainní acu. Tugaimid aghaidh ar an éagobhsaíocht a bhaineann le ganntanas sonraí trí straitéisí oiliúna éagsúla a fhiosrú le méadú sonraí, barrfheabhsú hipearpharaiméadair agus aistriú tras-teangach. Chomh maith leis sin, tugaimid isteach múnla nua dlúth do FraALBERT na Fraince a chruthaíonn go bhfuil sé iomaíoch i suíomhanna íseal-acmhainne.', 'el': 'Για πολλές εργασίες, έχουν επιτευχθεί αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας με αρχιτεκτονικές βασισμένες στον μετασχηματιστή, με αποτέλεσμα μια παραδειγματική μετατόπιση στις πρακτικές από τη χρήση αρχιτεκτονικών συγκεκριμένων εργασιών στην τελειοποίηση των προ-εκπαιδευμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων. Η συνεχιζόμενη τάση συνίσταται σε μοντέλα κατάρτισης με ολοένα αυξανόμενο αριθμό δεδομένων και παραμέτρων, γεγονός που απαιτεί σημαντικούς πόρους. Οδηγεί σε μια ισχυρή αναζήτηση για τη βελτίωση της αποδοτικότητας των πόρων με βάση αλγορίθμες και βελτιώσεις υλικού που αξιολογούνται μόνο για τα αγγλικά. Αυτό εγείρει ερωτήματα σχετικά με τη χρηστικότητα τους όταν εφαρμόζονται σε μαθησιακά προβλήματα μικρής κλίμακας, για τα οποία υπάρχει περιορισμένος αριθμός δεδομένων κατάρτισης, ιδίως για εργασίες γλωσσών που δεν διαθέτουν επαρκείς πόρους. Η έλλειψη κατάλληλων μεγεθών σωμάτων αποτελεί εμπόδιο στην εφαρμογή προσεγγίσεων βασισμένων σε δεδομένα και μεταφορά μάθησης με ισχυρές περιπτώσεις αστάθειας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, καθορίζουμε την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας των προσπαθειών αφιερωμένων στη χρηστικότητα των μοντέλων βασισμένων στον μετασχηματιστή και προτείνουμε την αξιολόγηση αυτών των βελτιώσεων στις επιδόσεις της γαλλικής γλώσσας που έχουν λίγους πόρους. Αντιμετωπίζουμε την αστάθεια που σχετίζεται με την έλλειψη δεδομένων διερευνώντας διάφορες στρατηγικές κατάρτισης με αύξηση δεδομένων, βελτιστοποίηση υπερπαραμέτρων και διασυνοριακή μεταφορά. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης ένα νέο συμπαγές μοντέλο για το γαλλικό το οποίο αποδεικνύεται ανταγωνιστικό σε συνθήκες χαμηλής κατανάλωσης πόρων.', 'ka': 'ბევრი დავალებისთვის განსაზღვრებული მოდელები ტრანფორმეტრის განსაზღვრებული აქტიქტიქტურის შესახებ გადასვლა, რომელიც პრადიგმატიკური გადასვლა პრაქტიქტურის განსაზღვრებული აქტიქტიქტურების გამოყენებიდან პროგრამიკ მიმდინარე ტენდენცია შექმნა მოდელში, რომელიც უფრო მეტი გაზრდება მონაცემები და პარამეტრები, რომელიც მნიშვნელოვანი რესურსები მოჭირდება. ეს ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან გამოყენება რესურსების ეფექტიურობას, რომელიც ალგორიტიმური და ჰაპერი ეს იქნება მათი გამოყენებელობის კითხვების შესახებ, როდესაც პატარა სწავლებელი პრობლემებისთვის გამოყენებულია, რომლის შესახებ განაკლებელი მონაცემების ზომა, განსაკუთ შესაბამისი ზომის კოპორაციის არსებობა არის შეცდომა მონაცემების და გატანსტრების განმავლობაში ძალიან ძალიან არსებელი შემთხვევაში. ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ განვიყენებთ ტრანფორმების მოდელების გამოყენებელობას და დავიწყენებთ ამ უფლებების გაუმუშაობას ფრანგური ენაზე, რომლებიც ცოტა რესურსები აქვს. ჩვენ მონაცემების შესახებ მონაცემების შესახებ განსხვავებული სტრატიგიების შესახებ მონაცემების აზექტირებით, ჰიპერ პარამეტრებით ოპტიმიზაცია და კრესი ენგ ჩვენ ასევე შევცვალოთ ახალი კომპოკტური მოდელის ფრანუსი FrALBERT-ს, რომელიც გამოწვება, რომ კომპექტიური იყოს ცოტა რესურსების შესახებ.', 'hu': 'Számos feladat esetében a Transformer-alapú architektúrákkal korszerű eredményeket értünk el, ami paradigmatikus változást eredményezett a gyakorlatban a feladatspecifikus architektúrák használatától az előkészített nyelvi modellek finomhangolásáig. A folyamatban lévő tendencia a folyamatosan növekvő adatmennyiségű és paraméterekkel rendelkező képzési modellekből áll, amelyek jelentős erőforrásokat igényelnek. Ez erőteljes keresést eredményez az erőforrás-hatékonyság javítására, amely csak angolul értékelt algoritmikai és hardveres fejlesztéseken alapul. Ez kérdéseket vet fel azok használhatóságával kapcsolatban, amikor kisméretű tanulási problémákra alkalmazzák, amelyekre vonatkozóan korlátozott mennyiségű képzési adat áll rendelkezésre, különösen az alacsony forrásokkal rendelkező nyelvi feladatok esetében. A megfelelő méretű corporák hiánya akadályozza az erős instabilitási esetekkel járó adatközpontú és tanulásalapú megközelítések alkalmazását. Ebben a tanulmányban a Transformer alapú modellek használhatóságára irányuló erőfeszítések korszerűsítését állapítjuk meg, és javaslatot teszünk a francia nyelv kérdésre adott teljesítményének értékelésére, amelyek kevés erőforrással rendelkeznek. Az adatok hiányával kapcsolatos instabilitást különböző képzési stratégiák vizsgálatával kezeljük az adatok nagyobbításával, hiperparaméterek optimalizálásával és nyelvek közötti transzferrel. Bemutatunk egy új kompakt modellt a francia FrALBERT számára is, amely alacsony erőforrással rendelkező környezetben versenyképes.', 'it': "Per molti compiti, sono stati raggiunti risultati all'avanguardia con architetture basate su Transformer, con conseguente cambiamento paradigmatico nelle pratiche dall'uso di architetture specifiche per compiti alla messa a punto di modelli linguistici pre-formati. La tendenza continua consiste in modelli di formazione con una quantità sempre crescente di dati e parametri, che richiedono notevoli risorse. Porta a una forte ricerca per migliorare l'efficienza delle risorse basata su miglioramenti algoritmici e hardware valutati solo per l'inglese. Ciò solleva interrogativi sulla loro usabilità quando vengono applicati a problemi di apprendimento su piccola scala, per i quali è disponibile una quantità limitata di dati di formazione, soprattutto per le attività linguistiche con scarse risorse. La mancanza di corpora di dimensioni adeguate è un ostacolo all'applicazione di approcci basati sui dati e sui trasferimenti basati sull'apprendimento con casi di forte instabilità. In questo articolo, stabiliamo uno stato dell'arte degli sforzi dedicati all'usabilità dei modelli basati su Transformer e proponiamo di valutare questi miglioramenti sulle prestazioni di risposta alle domande della lingua francese che hanno poche risorse. Affrontiamo l'instabilità relativa alla scarsità di dati studiando varie strategie di formazione con aumento dei dati, ottimizzazione degli iperparametri e trasferimento cross-lingual. Presentiamo anche un nuovo modello compatto per FrALBERT francese che si dimostra competitivo in ambienti a basso consumo di risorse.", 'lt': 'Daugeliui užduočių buvo pasiekti moderniausi rezultatai naudojant „Transformer“ grindžiamas architektūras, todėl praktika paradigmatiškai keičiasi nuo konkrečioms užduotims skirtų architektūrų naudojimo iki iš anksto parengtų kalbų modelių tobulinimo. Šią tendenciją sudaro mokymo modeliai, kuriuose vis daugiau duomenų ir parametrų reikalaujama didelių išteklių. It leads to a strong search to improve resource efficiency based on algorithmic and hardware improvements evaluated only for English.  Tai kelia klausimų dėl jų naudojimo, kai jie taikomi mažo masto mokymosi problemoms, dėl kurių turima riboto skaičiaus mokymo duomenų, ypač nepakankamai išteklių turinčių kalbų užduočių atžvilgiu. Tinkamo dydžio korporacijos trūkumas trukdo taikyti duomenų pagrindu pagrįstus ir mokymosi būdus, kai kyla didelis nestabilumas. Šiame dokumente parengiame pažangiausius pastangas, skirtas Transformer-based modelių naudojimui, ir siūlome įvertinti šiuos patobulinimus, susijusius su prancūzų kalbos atsakymo į klausimus rezultatais, kurie turi nedaug išteklių. Atsižvelgiame į nestabilumą, susijusį su duomenų trūkumu, tiriame įvairias mokymo strategijas su duomenų didinimu, hiperparatorių optimizavimu ir tarpkalbiniu perdavimu. Taip pat įvedame naują kompaktinį Prancūzijos FrALBERT model į, kuris pasirodo konkurencingas mažai išteklių turinčiose aplinkybėse.', 'mk': 'За многу задачи, се постигнаа најсовремени резултати со трансформските архитектури, што резултираат со парадигматска промена на практиките од употребата на архитектури специфични за задачи до финетизирање на предобучените јазични модели. Тековниот тренд се состои од модели за обука со сé поголема количина податоци и параметри, кои бараат значителни ресурси. Тоа води до силна потрага за подобрување на ефикасноста на ресурсите врз основа на алгоритмички и хардверски подобрувања оценети само за англиски. Ова предизвика прашања во врска со нивната употребливост кога се применуваат на проблемите со малото учење, за кои се достапни ограничени податоци за обука, особено за задачите на јазиците со недоволни ресурси. The lack of appropriately sized corpora is a hindrance to applying data-driven and transfer learning-based approaches with strong instability cases.  Во овој весник, ние воспоставуваме најнови напори посветени на употребливоста на трансформските модели и предложуваме да ги процениме овие подобрувања на изведувањата на францускиот јазик кои одговараат на прашања кои имаат малку ресурси. Ние се справуваме со нестабилноста поврзана со недостатокот на податоци со истрага на различни стратегии за обука со зголемување на податоците, оптимизација на хиперпараметрите и прекујазички трансфер. Исто така, воведуваме нов компактен модел за францускиот ФРАЛБЕРТ кој се покажува дека е конкурентен во услови со ниски ресурси.', 'ms': 'Untuk banyak tugas, keputusan-state-of-the-art telah dicapai dengan arkitektur-berdasarkan Transformer, yang mengakibatkan perubahan paradigmatik dalam praktek dari penggunaan arkitektur-khusus tugas kepada penyesuaian baik model bahasa pra-dilatih. Tenderasi yang berlangsung terdiri dalam model latihan dengan jumlah data dan parameter yang semakin meningkat, yang memerlukan sumber yang besar. It leads to a strong search to improve resource efficiency based on algorithmic and hardware improvements evaluated only for English.  This raises questions about their usability when applied to small-scale learning problems, for which a limited amount of training data is available, especially for under-resourced languages tasks.  Kekurangan perusahaan ukuran yang sesuai adalah penghalang untuk melaksanakan pendekatan berdasarkan data dan pemindahan pendekatan berdasarkan belajar dengan kes ketidakstabilan yang kuat. Dalam kertas ini, kami menetapkan kemajuan usaha yang didedikasikan untuk penggunaan model berdasarkan Transformer dan melamar untuk menilai peningkatan ini pada prestasi jawapan soalan bahasa Perancis yang mempunyai sedikit sumber. Kami mengatasi ketidakstabilan berkaitan dengan kekurangan data dengan menyelidiki pelbagai strategi latihan dengan peningkatan data, peningkatan hyperparameter dan pemindahan saling bahasa. Kami juga memperkenalkan model kompat baru untuk FrALBERT Perancis yang terbukti bersaing dalam tetapan sumber rendah.', 'ml': 'ധാരാളം ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക്, ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dഫിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടുകള്\u200dകൊണ്ട് രാജ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിനാല്\u200d ജോലിയുടെ പ്രത്യേകി ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ നടക്കുന്ന സ്വഭാവം പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉള്ളതാണ്. വിവരങ്ങളും പരാമീറ്ററുകളും കൂടിയിരിക്കുന ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിക്കും ഹാര്\u200dഡ്വെയര്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d അത് ശക്തി ഇത് അവരുടെ ഉപയോഗ്യത്തെപ്പറ്റിയുള്ള ചെറിയ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ പ്രയോഗത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്നു. അതിന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് പഠിക്കുന്ന മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ സ്ഥാനത്ത് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള മോഡലുകളുടെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ശ വ്യത്യസ്ത പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാരാമീറ്ററുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാലും, ക്രിസ്ലിങ ഫ്രെഞ്ച് ഫ്രാല്\u200dബെര്\u200dട്ടിന് ഒരു പുതിയ കോമ്പ്റ്റ് മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ സജ്', 'mt': 'Għal ħafna kompiti, intlaħqu riżultati l-aktar avvanzati bl-arkitetturi bbażati fuq it-Transformer, li rriżultaw f’bidla paradigmatika fil-prattiki mill-użu ta’ arkitetturi speċifiċi għall-kompiti għall-a ġġustament tal-mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel. It-tendenza kontinwa tikkonsisti f’mudelli ta’ taħriġ b’ammont dejjem jiżdied ta’ dejta u parametri, li jeħtieġu riżorsi konsiderevoli. Dan iwassal għal tfittxija qawwija biex titjieb l-effiċjenza tar-riżorsi bbażata fuq titjib algoritmiku u hardware evalwat biss għall-Ingliż. Dan iqajjem mistoqsijiet dwar l-użu tagħhom meta applikati għal problemi ta’ tagħlim fuq skala żgħira, li għalihom hemm disponibbli ammont limitat ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ, speċjalment għal kompiti ta’ lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi. In-nuqqas ta’ korpora ta’ daqs xieraq huwa xkiel għall-applikazzjoni ta’ approċċi bbażati fuq id-dejta u t-trasferiment ta’ approċċi bbażati fuq it-tagħlim b’każijiet qawwija ta’ instabbiltà. In this paper, we establish a state-of-the-art of the efforts dedicated to the usability of Transformer-based models and propose to evaluate these improvements on the question-answering performances of French language which have few resources.  We address the instability relating to data scarcity by investigating various training strategies with data augmentation, hyperparameters optimization and cross-lingual transfer.  Inintroduċu wkoll mudell kompatt ġdid għall-FrALBERT Franċiż li juri li huwa kompetittiv f’ambjenti b’riżorsi baxxi.', 'pl': 'W przypadku wielu zadań osiągnięto najnowocześniejsze wyniki dzięki architekturom opartym na Transformerze, co skutkuje paradygmatycznym przesunięciem praktyk od wykorzystania architektur specyficznych dla zadań do dostosowania wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych. Bieżący trend polega na modelach szkoleniowych o coraz większej ilości danych i parametrów, co wymaga znacznych zasobów. Prowadzi to do silnego poszukiwania poprawy efektywności zasobów w oparciu o usprawnienia algorytmiczne i sprzętowe oceniane tylko w języku angielskim. Rodzi to pytania dotyczące ich użyteczności w przypadku problemów uczenia się na małą skalę, dla których dostępna jest ograniczona ilość danych szkoleniowych, zwłaszcza w przypadku zadań językowych niewyposażonych w niedostateczne zasoby. Brak odpowiedniej wielkości korpusów jest przeszkodą dla stosowania opartego na danych i transferowych podejść opartych na uczeniu się z silnymi przypadkami niestabilności. W niniejszym artykule ustalono stan sztuki wysiłków poświęconych użyteczności modeli opartych na Transformerze i proponujemy ocenę tych ulepszeń w odniesieniu do wydajności języka francuskiego, który ma niewiele zasobów. Zajmujemy się niestabilnością związaną z niedoborem danych poprzez badanie różnych strategii szkoleniowych z powiększeniem danych, optymalizacją hiperparametrów i transferem między językami. Wprowadzamy również nowy kompaktowy model dla francuskiego FrALBERT, który okazuje się konkurencyjny w warunkach niskich zasobów.', 'no': 'For mange oppgåver er det oppnådd status-of-the-art-results med Transformer-baserte arkitektur, som fører til ein paradigmatisk forskyving i praksis frå bruk av oppgåve-spesifikke arkitektur til finnstillinga av før-trengte språk-modeller. Den gjeldande trenden inneheld i øvingsmodeller med ein større mengd data og parametra, som krev stor ressursar. Det fører til ein sterk søk for å forbetra ressurseffektivitet basert på algoritmisk og maskinvare forbetringar som berre er evaluert for engelsk. Dette opnar spørsmål om brukbarheten sine når det er brukt på lite læringsproblemar, for dei som er tilgjengeleg ein begrenset mengd læringsdata, spesielt for underressurserte språksoppgåver. Manglansen på tilsvarande storleik på korpora er ein hindring til å bruka datadrivt og overføra læringsbaserte tilnærmingar med sterke instabilitetsaker. I denne papiret oppretter vi ein tilstand på kunstheten av forsøka spesifisert til brukbarhet av transformeringsbaserte modeller og foreslår vi å evaluere desse forbedringane på spørsmålstandlingane av fransk språk som har få ressursar. Vi adresserer instabiliteten relatert til nedgang av data ved å undersøke ulike opplæringsstrategiar med data augmentasjon, hyperparametrar optimalisering og krysspråk overføring. Vi introduserer også ein ny kompaktmodell for fransk FrALBERT som viser å vera konkurentivt i låg ressursinnstillingar.', 'kk': 'Көптеген тапсырмалар үшін күй- жағдайдың нәтижелері Трансферлер негізінде архитектуралардан жеткізілді, әрекеттерді тапсырмалар архитектуралардың қолдануынан алдын- ала оқылған тіл үлгілерінің жақсы баптауына арналған парадигматты Қолданыстағы тенденциясы өзгертілген деректер мен параметрлердің көптеген мөлшерлері үлгілерінде тұрады. Бұл көптеген ресурстарды талап етеді. Бұл тек ағылшын тілінде бағалатын алгоритм және жабдық жақсартуларына негізделген ресурстардың эффективнігін жақсарту үшін күшті іздеуді жасайды. Бұл кішкентай оқыту мәселелеріне қолданғанда олардың пайдалану мүмкіндігі туралы сұрақтарды жасайды, олар үшін шектелген оқыту мәселелері бар, осымен қатар, әдетте тілдерді Жарамсыз өлшемді корпора жоқ - деректерді бағыттау және оқыту негізінде күшті дұрыс емес болатын жағдайларды қолдануға тырысты. Бұл қағазда, біз түрлендіруші үлгілерінің қолдануға арналған әрекеттердің күйін жасап, көп ресурстар бар француз тілінің сұрақ жауап беру жұмысын бағалау үшін ұсындық. Мәліметтерді көтеру, гиперпараметрлерді оптимизациялау және тілдерді көтеру арқылы бірнеше оқыту стратегияларын зерттеп, деректердің қажеттілігіне қатыстығымен байланысты. Сонымен қатар, французша французша французша французша французша жаңа компакт үлгісін келтіреміз. Бұл көп ресурстар баптауларында әсер еті', 'ro': 'Pentru multe sarcini, au fost obținute rezultate de ultimă oră cu arhitecturile bazate pe Transformer, rezultând o schimbare paradigmatică a practicilor de la utilizarea arhitecturilor specifice sarcinilor la reglarea fină a modelelor lingvistice pre-instruite. Tendința continuă constă în modele de formare cu o cantitate tot mai mare de date și parametri, care necesită resurse considerabile. Aceasta duce la o căutare puternică pentru a îmbunătăți eficiența resurselor bazată pe îmbunătățiri algoritmice și hardware evaluate numai pentru limba engleză. Acest lucru ridică întrebări cu privire la utilizarea lor atunci când sunt aplicate problemelor de învățare la scară mică, pentru care există o cantitate limitată de date privind formarea, în special pentru sarcinile lingvistice cu resurse insuficiente. Lipsa corporelor de dimensiuni corespunzătoare reprezintă un obstacol în aplicarea abordărilor bazate pe date și transferuri bazate pe învățare cu cazuri puternice de instabilitate. În această lucrare, stabilim un stadiu-of-the-art al eforturilor dedicate utilizării modelelor bazate pe Transformer și propunem evaluarea acestor îmbunătățiri privind performanțele de răspuns la întrebări ale limbii franceze care au puține resurse. Abordăm instabilitatea legată de deficitul de date prin investigarea diverselor strategii de instruire cu augmentarea datelor, optimizarea hiperparametrilor și transferul interlingv. De asemenea, introducem un nou model compact pentru FrALBERT francez, care se dovedește a fi competitiv în setări cu resurse reduse.', 'sr': 'Za mnoge zadatke su rezultati umetnosti postignuti sa arhitekturom na transformeru, što je rezultat paradigmatske promene prakse od korištenja arhitektura specifičnih zadataka do finalne prilagodbe predobučenih jezičkih modela. Nastavljajući trend se sastoji u modelima obuke sa povećanjem količine podataka i parametara, koji zahtevaju značajne resurse. To vodi do jake potrebe za poboljšanjem efikasnosti resursa na osnovu algoritmskih i kompjuterskih poboljšanja procjenjena samo za engleski. To podiže pitanja o njihovoj korištenosti kada se primjenjuje na probleme sa malom skalom učenja, zbog kojih je dostupna ograničena količina podataka o obuci, posebno za zadatak sa manjim izvorima jezika. Nedostatak prikladno veličine korporacije je ometanje primjene pristupa na podacima i prenošenju na osnovu učenja sa jakim slučajevima nestabilnosti. U ovom papiru, uspostavljamo državu umjetnosti napora posvećenih korištenju modela na transformeru i predlažemo da procenimo te poboljšanja na izvodima francuskog jezika koji odgovaraju na pitanje koji imaju nekoliko resursa. Rešimo nestabilnost u vezi nedostatka podataka istražujući različite strategije obuke sa povećanjem podataka, optimizacijom hiperparametara i prekograničenjem jezika. Takođe predstavljamo novi kompaktni model za francuski FrALBERT koji dokazuje da je konkurentni u nizim resursima.', 'sv': 'För många uppgifter har state-of-the-art resultat uppnåtts med Transformer-baserade arkitekturer, vilket resulterat i en paradigmatisk förändring i praxis från användning av uppgiftsspecifika arkitekturer till finjustering av förkunskaperade språkmodeller. Den pågående trenden består av utbildningsmodeller med en ständigt ökande mängd data och parametrar, vilket kräver betydande resurser. Det leder till en stark sökning för att förbättra resurseffektiviteten baserat på algoritmiska och hårdvaruförbättringar utvärderade endast för engelska. Detta väcker frågor om deras användbarhet när de tillämpas på småskaliga inlärningsproblem, för vilka en begränsad mängd utbildningsdata finns tillgängliga, särskilt för språkuppgifter med underresurser. Bristen på lämpliga storlekar är ett hinder för att tillämpa datadrivna och överföra inlärningsbaserade tillvägagångssätt med starka instabilitetsfall. I denna uppsats etablerar vi en state-of-the-art av de insatser som ägnas åt användbarheten av Transformer-baserade modeller och föreslår att utvärdera dessa förbättringar av frågeställande prestanda av franska språket som har få resurser. Vi tar itu med instabiliteten i samband med databrist genom att undersöka olika utbildningsstrategier med dataförstärkning, optimering av hyperparametrar och tvärspråklig överföring. Vi introducerar också en ny kompakt modell för franska FrALBERT som visar sig vara konkurrenskraftig i lågresursmiljöer.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් වැඩක් සඳහා, state-of-the-art ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරිස්තූතියක් තියෙන්නේ නිර්මාණකය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විස්තෘතිය සඳහා, ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත භාෂාව ප්\u200dරයෝ දැනටමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් මොඩේල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ දත්ත සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ ව ඒක බලාපොරොත්තු හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය විතරයි, ඇල්ගෝරිත්මික සහ හාවත්\u200dරව්\u200dයාප්\u200dරොත්තික මේක පොඩි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙ අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නැති කොර්පෝරාව තමයි දත්ත ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200d මේ පත්තරේ අපි ස්ථාපිත කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්න භාෂාවේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200d අපි දත්ත අවශ්\u200dයතාවය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ දත්ත අවශ්\u200dයතාවය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් දත්ත විශාලනය සමග පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ විව අපි ප්\u200dරෑන්ස් ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස් ෆ්\u200dරාල්බෙර්ට් වලට අළුත් සම්පූර්ණ නිර්මාණයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්', 'mn': 'Олон даалгаварын хувьд, урлагийн төвшин үр дүн нь Трансформер-д суурилсан архитектуруудын хувьд гарч ирсэн. Үүнээс ажлын төвшин архитектуруудын хэрэглээнээс өмнө сургалтын хэл загваруудыг сайхан тодорхойлох боломжтой болсон. Дараагийн тенденцийг дасгал хөдөлгөөн загварууд нь ихэвчлэн нэмэгддэг өгөгдлийн болон параметрлүүдийн хэмжээтэй байдаг. Энэ нь маш их нөөц хэрэгтэй. Энэ нь зөвхөн Англи хэлний хувьд үнэлдэг алгоритм болон техник хангамжийн сайжруулалтын үр дүнг сайжруулахын тулд хүчтэй хайртай байдаг. Энэ нь жижиг хэмжээний суралцах асуудлуудад хэрэглэх боломжтой талаар асуулт гаргадаг. Энэ нь бага хэмжээний суралцах өгөгдлийн хэмжээнд хязгааргүй хэмжээний талаар, ялангуяа бага хэлний аж Бага зэрэг хэмжээтэй корпора байхгүй байдал нь өгөгдлийн хөдөлгөөн, суралцах сургалтын сургалтын тухай хүчтэй тогтвортой арга зам хэрэглэх зорилго юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Трансфер суурилсан загваруудыг ашиглах боломжтой зориулсан урлагийн төлөө байгуулж, хэдэн нөөц боломжтой Французын хэлний асуулт хариулах үйл ажиллагааны сайжруулалтыг үнэлэхээр санал болгоно. Бид өгөгдлийн хамааралтай байдлыг судалж, өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт, гиперпараметр, хэлний шилжүүлэлтийг сайжруулж, олон сургалтын стратегийг судалж өгдөг. Мөн бид Француз Француз Француз Француз Француз-ын шинэ компанийн загварыг танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь бага нөөцийн төвшинд өрсөлдөгч байдаг.', 'ur': 'بہت سی کاموں کے لئے، ترنسفور کی بنیادی معماری کے ساتھ موجود ہو گئے ہیں، اس کے نتیجہ میں تابع-خاص معماری کے استعمال سے پہلے تعلیم کی زبان مدل کے مطابق بہترین تنظیم کرنے کے لئے تغییرات کی تغییر کی جاتی ہے. ادھر رہی ترینڈ موڈل کی ترینڈ میں ایک بڑھنے والی اندازہ ڈیٹا اور پارامیٹر کے ساتھ ہے جو بہت اضافہ سرمایہ کی ضرورت ہے. یہ صرف انگلیسی کے لئے مضبوط آلگوریٹمیک اور هارڈیورڈ سفارش پر بنیاد رکھنے کے لئے مضبوط تلاش کرنے کی وجہ سے ہے. یہ ان کے استعمال کے بارے میں سوال اٹھاتا ہے جب چھوٹی سیکھنے کے مسئلہ پر استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں، جن کے لئے ایک مقدار تعلیم دیٹے موجود ہیں، مخصوصاً کم استعمال کی زبانوں کے لئے. اچھے اندازے کے اندازے کے قابل تعلیم کا غیر منع کرنا ہے کہ ڈاٹا چلنے والی اور تعلیم کے متعلق مضبوط غیر قابل تعلیم کے مطابق طریقے کے ساتھ استعمال کرنا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے فرنس زبان کے سوال جواب دینے کے مطابق ان کی کوشش کی ایک ایسی حالت کی تصویر بنائی ہے جو تغییر پھیلانے والی موڈل کے استعمال کرنے کے لئے مقرر کیے گئے ہیں اور اس کی پیشنهاد کرتی ہے کہ ان تغییرات کو فرانسوی زبان کے سوال جواب دینے کے م ہم ڈیٹا کمزوری کے معاملہ میں غیر قابل استراتژی کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں، ڈیٹا اضافہ کرنے کے ساتھ، ہیپر پارامتر اچھی طرح اور cross-lingual transfer کے ساتھ. ہم نے فرانسوی FrALBERT کے لئے ایک نئی کمپیٹ موڈل کو بھی معرفی کرتا ہے جو کم منبع سٹینٹوں میں مسابقه کرتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'For many tasks, state-of-the-art results have been achieved with Transformer-based architectures, resulting in a paradigmatic shift in practices from the use of task-specific architectures to the fine-tuning of pre-trained language models.  நடப்புக் குறியீடு பயிற்சி மாதிரிகளில் இருக்கிறது, இது தரவு மற்றும் அளபுருக்களுடன் அதிகமாக இருக்கும். இது ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு மட்டும் மதிப்பு மூலத்தை மேம்படுத்த முடிவு செய்ய முடியும். இது சிறிய அளவு கற்றல் பிரச்சனைகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டால் பயன்பாடுகளை பற்றி கேள்விகளை உயர்த்துகிறது, இதில் பயிற்சி தரவு கிடைக்கும்  சரியான அளவு நிறுவனத்தின் குறைவு என்னவென்றால் தரவு இயக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் கற்றல் அடிப்படையான முறைகளை மாற்றுதல் வலிமை நிலைம இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் மாற்றும் அடிப்படையிலான மாதிரிகளின் பயன்பாட்டை செயல்படுத்தும் முயற்சிகளின் நிலையை நிறுவுகிறோம். பிரெஞ்சு மொழியின தரவு மேம்படுத்தல், அதிக அளபுருக்கள் மேம்படுத்தல் மற்றும் மொழிமை மாற்றுதல் மூலம் பல பயிற்சி திட்டங்களை தேடுவதற்காக நாம் தரவு குறி நாம் பிரெஞ்சு FrALBERT புதிய ஒப்பீட்டு மாதிரி குறைந்த மூலத்தின் அமைப்பு', 'so': "Shaqooyin badan dartood waxaa la gaadhay xaalada farshaxanta, taas oo sababtay bedelka meelaha la soo wareejiyey ee la isticmaalo dhismaha shaqada ee gaarka ah iyo tusaalaha afka hore lagu baray. Dalka soo socda waxaa ku jira samooyin tababarid ah oo ay ku jiraan tiro badan oo macluumaad iyo parameters, taasoo u baahan yihiin hanti aad u adag. Waxay ku socotaa raadinta xoogga leh in ay kordhiso awood-lahaanshaha ku saleysan algorithiga iyo horumarinta qalabka qalabka ee lagu qiimeeyo Ingiriiska oo keliya. Taas waxay weydiineysaa su'aalo ku saabsan isticmaalkooda marka lagu codsado dhibaatooyin waxbarasho oo yar, kuwaas oo lagu heli karo macluumaad waxbarasho oo xad ah, khusuusan hawsha luuqadaha ka hooseeya. Lacagta shirkadda si qiimo ah u baahan waa ka hor jeeda codsashada qaababka waxbarashada ee lagu soo wado iyo wareejiyo xaalada taageerada ah. Qoraalkan waxaan ku dhisaynaa xaalad farshaxan oo u gaar ah isticmaalka tusaalayaasha hore ee turjumista, waxaana soo jeedinayaa in lagu qiimeeyo horumarinta sameynta sameynta afka Faranshka ee ay haystaan resources yar. Waxaannu u baahan nahay qalabka waxbarashada oo kala duduwan oo la kordhiyo macluumaadka, optimiska parameters iyo wareejinta luuqadaha kala duduwan. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo bandhignaa model cusub oo u qoran Faraansiis FrALBERT, kaasoo caddaynaya in ay iskutar ku leedahay hababka hoose-nololeed.", 'uz': "Ko'pchilik vazifalar uchun, Shaxsiy natijalar taʼminlovchisi past asosiy maktablar bilan bajarildi. Bu sababda vazifani foydalanish uchun tashqi hodisa arxituvchilardan oldin o'rgangan tillar modellarini yaxshi o'zgartirish mumkin. Davom etiladigan holatda maʼlumot va parametrlar ko'paytirish mumkin. Bu juda qisqarli rasmlar kerak. U faqat ingliz tilida qiymatilgan algorithik va dasturlarning o'zgarishga murakkablarini oshirish uchun qulay qidiriladi. Bu esa kichkina o'rganish muammolarini qoʻllashda ularning foydalanishlari haqida savollar beradi. Bu muammolar uchun juda qisqa taʼminlovchi maʼlumot mavjud, hususan qo'llangan tillar vazifalari uchun juda qisqa maʼlumot mavjud. Koʻrsatilgan ko'pchilik manbalari - maʼlumot drayveri va o'rganish asosida o'rganish usullarini o'zgartirish qo'llaniladi. Bu hujjatda, biz Transformer-based modellarning foydalanishga tayyorlangan jarayonlarning holatini qo'llamiz va bu narsa Fransuz tilning javob beruvchi natijalarini qiymatlashni talab qilamiz. Fransuz tildagi savol natijalariga juda kam Resource bor. Biz maʼlumot bajarayonligiga murojaat qilamiz, maʼlumot soʻzlashtirish, hyperparametrlarni optimiz va bir tillar tarjima qilish orqali boshqa taʼminlovchi strategiyani qidirish mumkin. Biz Fransuzcha FrALBERT uchun yangi kompakt modelini ishlatamiz. Bu bir qanchalik resource moslamalarida rivojlanishini imkoniyat qiladi.", 'vi': 'Trong nhiều nhiệm vụ, đạt được kết quả hiện đại nhờ các kiến trúc transformer, dẫn đến sự chuyển hướng hàng mẫu từ các kiến trúc đặc nhiệm đến việc tinh chỉnh lại các mô hình ngôn ngữ được huấn luyện. Sự tiến bộ liên tục gồm các mô hình huấn luyện với một số lượng dữ liệu và thông số tăng dần, cần rất nhiều nguồn lực. Nó dẫn tới một cuộc tìm kiếm mạnh mẽ nhằm tăng hiệu quả tài nguyên dựa trên thuật to án và cải tiến phần cứng được đánh giá chỉ cho tiếng Anh. Việc này đặt câu hỏi về khả năng sử dụng của họ khi áp dụng vào các vấn đề học tập nhỏ, mà có một lượng ít dữ liệu về huấn luyện, đặc biệt cho các nhiệm vụ ngôn ngữ thiếu nguồn. Sự thiếu hụt cơ thể có kích thước phù hợp là một cản trở cho việc áp dụng các phương pháp dựa trên dữ liệu và truyền tải về học với trường hợp thiếu ổn định mạnh. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi thiết lập một chương trình hiện đại của những nỗ lực nhằm mục đích sử dụng các mô hình transformer và đề nghị đánh giá những cải tiến này về những hiệu ứng trả lời câu hỏi của ngôn ngữ Pháp mà có ít nguồn. Chúng ta giải quyết sự bất ổn liên quan đến việc thiếu dữ liệu bằng cách điều tra các chiến lược đào tạo khác nhau với việc tăng cường dữ liệu, tăng cường tham số và chuyển giao ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Chúng tôi cũng sẽ giới thiệu một mô hình gọn mới cho Pháp FruALBERT, thể hiện mình cạnh tranh trong môi trường ít tài nguyên.', 'bg': 'За много задачи са постигнати най-съвременни резултати с базирани на трансформатори архитектури, което води до парадигматична промяна в практиките от използването на специфични за задачата архитектури към фината настройка на предварително обучените езикови модели. Продължаващата тенденция се състои в модели на обучение с все по-голямо количество данни и параметри, което изисква значителни ресурси. Това води до силно търсене за подобряване на ефективността на ресурсите въз основа на алгоритмични и хардуерни подобрения, оценени само за английски език. Това повдига въпроси относно тяхната използваемост, когато се прилагат при малки образователни проблеми, за които има ограничено количество данни за обучение, особено за задачи с недостатъчно ресурси по езици. Липсата на подходящо големи корпуси е пречка за прилагането на базирани на данни и трансферни подходи, базирани на обучение със силни случаи на нестабилност. В настоящата статия ние установяваме най-съвременните усилия, посветени на използваемостта на базираните на трансформатори модели, и предлагаме да се оценят тези подобрения в изпълнението на отговорите на въпроси на френския език, които имат малко ресурси. Ние се справяме с нестабилността, свързана с недостига на данни, като изследваме различни стратегии за обучение с увеличаване на данните, оптимизация на хиперпараметрите и междуезичен трансфер. Въвеждаме и нов компактен модел за френския който се доказва конкурентен в условия с ниски ресурси.', 'nl': "Voor veel taken zijn state-of-the-art resultaten bereikt met Transformer-gebaseerde architecturen, wat resulteert in een paradigmatische verschuiving in praktijken van het gebruik van taakspecifieke architecturen naar het finetunen van vooraf getrainde taalmodellen. De aanhoudende trend bestaat in trainingsmodellen met een steeds grotere hoeveelheid gegevens en parameters, die aanzienlijke middelen vereisen. Het leidt tot een sterke zoektocht naar het verbeteren van resource efficiency op basis van algoritmische en hardware verbeteringen die alleen voor het Engels worden geëvalueerd. Dit roept vragen op over de bruikbaarheid ervan wanneer ze worden toegepast op kleinschalige leerproblemen, waarvoor een beperkte hoeveelheid opleidingsgegevens beschikbaar is, met name voor onvoldoende gefinancierde taaltaken. Het ontbreken van passende corpora's is een belemmering voor het toepassen van data-driven en transfer learning-based benaderingen met sterke instabiliteit gevallen. In dit artikel stellen we een state-of-the-art van de inspanningen gewijd aan de bruikbaarheid van Transformer-gebaseerde modellen vast en stellen we voor om deze verbeteringen te evalueren op de vraag beantwoordende prestaties van de Franse taal die weinig middelen hebben. We pakken de instabiliteit van dataschaarste aan door verschillende trainingsstrategieën te onderzoeken met data augmentatie, hyperparameters optimalisatie en cross-lingual transfer. We introduceren ook een nieuw compact model voor French FrALBERT dat concurrerend blijkt te zijn in omgevingen met weinig middelen.", 'hr': 'Za mnoge zadatke, rezultati umjetnosti postignuti su s arhitekturom na transformeri, što je dovelo do paradigmatske promjene prakse od korištenja arhitektura specifičnih zadataka do finalne prilagodbe predobučenih jezičkih modela. Nastavljajući trend se sastoji u modelima obuke sa povećanjem količine podataka i parametara, koji zahtijevaju značajne resurse. To vodi do jakog potraga za poboljšanjem učinkovitosti resursa na temelju algoritmskih i naprednih poboljšanja kompjutera procjenjena samo za engleski. To podiže pitanja o njihovoj korištenosti kada se primjenjuje na probleme s malom skalom učenja, zbog kojih je dostupna ograničena količina podataka o obuci, posebno za zadatak s manjim resursima jezika. Nedostatak prikladno veličine korporacije je sprječavanje primjene podataka i prijenosa pristupa na temelju učenja s jakim slučajevima nestabilnosti. U ovom papiru uspostavljamo državu umjetnosti napora posvećenih korištenju modela na transformeri i predlažemo procjenu tih poboljšanja na učinkovima francuskog jezika koji odgovaraju na pitanje koji imaju nekoliko resursa. Mi obraćamo nestabilnost u vezi s nedostatkom podataka istražujući različite strategije obuke s povećanjem podataka, optimizacijom hiperparametara i prebacivanjem međujezika. Također predstavljamo novi kompaktni model francuskog FrALBERT-a koji dokazuje da je konkurentni u području niskih resursa.', 'id': 'Untuk banyak tugas, hasil terbaik telah dicapai dengan arsitektur berdasarkan Transformer, yang menyebabkan perubahan paradigma dalam praktek dari penggunaan arsitektur spesifik tugas ke penyesuaian model bahasa yang terlatih sebelumnya. Tendera yang sedang berlangsung terdiri dari model pelatihan dengan jumlah data dan parameter yang semakin meningkat, yang membutuhkan sumber daya yang konsiderel. It leads to a strong search to improve resource efficiency based on algorithmic and hardware improvements evaluated only for English.  Ini mengakibatkan pertanyaan tentang kemampuan menggunakan mereka ketika diaplikasikan untuk masalah belajar skala kecil, untuk yang jumlah terbatas data pelatihan tersedia, terutama untuk tugas bahasa yang tidak memiliki sumber daya. Kekurangan corpora ukuran yang tepat adalah penghalang untuk menerapkan pendekatan berdasarkan data dan transfer pendekatan berdasarkan belajar dengan kasus instabilitas yang kuat. Dalam kertas ini, kami menetapkan kemajuan dari usaha yang didedikasikan untuk penggunaan model berdasarkan Transformer dan mengusulkan untuk mengevaluasi perbaikan ini pada prestasi menjawab pertanyaan bahasa Perancis yang memiliki sedikit sumber daya. Kami mengatasi ketidakstabilan yang berhubungan dengan kekurangan data dengan menyelidiki berbagai strategi latihan dengan peningkatan data, optimisasi hyperparameter dan transfer saling bahasa. Kami juga memperkenalkan model kompakt baru untuk FrALBERT Perancis yang terbukti kompetitif dalam pengaturan sumber daya rendah.', 'ko': '많은 임무에 대해 Transformer의 체계 구조를 바탕으로 가장 선진적인 성과를 거두었고 실천은 임무에 특정한 체계 구조를 사용하는 것에서 미리 훈련된 언어 모델을 마이크로스피커로 바꾸는 모델로 바뀌었다.현재의 추세는 훈련 모델의 데이터와 파라미터가 끊임없이 증가하는 것이기 때문에 대량의 자원이 필요하다.자원 효율을 높이기 위한 알고리즘과 하드웨어 개선이 영어만 평가하는 강력한 검색을 초래했다.소규모 학습 문제에 적용될 때 이들의 가용성에 대한 문제가 발생했다. 이런 문제에 대해 사용 가능한 훈련 데이터가 제한되어 있고 특히 자원이 부족한 언어 임무에 대한 문제가 있다.적당한 크기의 어료 라이브러리가 부족한 것은 데이터 구동과 이동 학습을 바탕으로 하는 방법의 장애물로 이런 방법은 매우 불안정성을 가진다.본고에서 우리는 변압기 모델의 가용성을 바탕으로 하는 최신 연구 성과를 세웠고 이러한 개선이 자원이 비교적 적은 프랑스어 문답 성능에 미친 영향을 평가할 것을 건의한다.우리는 데이터 확충, 초파라미터 최적화와 다중 언어 이동을 포함한 각종 훈련 전략을 연구함으로써 데이터 희소와 관련된 불안정성을 해결한다.우리는 또 프랑스 프레버트를 위해 새로운 콤팩트형 모델을 도입했는데, 이 모델은 저자원 환경에서 경쟁력을 가진다.', 'sw': 'Kwa kazi nyingi, matokeo ya sanaa yamefanishwa na majengo yaliyoko kwa asili ya zamani, na yanasababisha mabadiliko makubwa ya mazoea kutoka matumizi ya majengo maalum ya kazi hadi kuelekeza mifano ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla. Mtandao unaoendelea ni katika mifano ya mafunzo yenye kuongezeka kwa kiasi cha data na parameters, ambacho kinahitaji rasilimali kubwa. Inapelekea kutafuta nguvu kuboresha ufanisi wa rasilimali kwa kutumia maendeleo ya mialgorithi na vifaa vya vifaa vilivyopitiwa kwa Kiingereza tu. Hii inaibua maswali yanayohusu matumizi yao pale yanapotumiwa kwenye matatizo madogo ya kujifunza, ambayo kwa hiyo idadi kubwa ya taarifa za mafunzo zinapatikana, hususani kwa kazi za lugha zilizo na rasmi. The lack of appropriately sized corpora is a hindrance to applying data-driven and transfer learning-based approaches with strong instability cases.  Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka hali ya sanaa ya juhudi zinazohusisha matumizi ya mifano yenye msingi wa zamani na tunapendekeza kutathmini maendeleo haya kuhusu michoro ya kujibu lugha ya Kifaransa ambayo ina rasilimali chache. Tunaongelea hali ya kutokuwepo kwa ukosefu wa taarifa kwa kuchunguza mbinu mbalimbali za mafunzo kwa kuongezeka kwa takwimu, matumizi ya jumla na uhamishaji wa lugha mbalimbali. Pia tunaonyesha muundo mpya wa makubaliano kwa ajili ya FrALBERT wa Kifaransa ambao unathibitisha kuwa na ushindani katika mazingira ya rasilimali chini.', 'da': 'For mange opgaver er state-of-the-art resultater opnået med Transformer-baserede arkitekturer, hvilket resulterer i et paradigmatisk skift i praksis fra brug af opgavespecifikke arkitekturer til finjustering af forududdannede sprogmodeller. Den igangværende tendens består i uddannelsesmodeller med stadig stigende mængde data og parametre, hvilket kræver betydelige ressourcer. Det fører til en stærk søgning for at forbedre ressourceeffektiviteten baseret på algoritmiske og hardware forbedringer evalueret kun for engelsk. Dette rejser spørgsmål om deres anvendelighed, når de anvendes på små indlæringsproblemer, for hvilke der foreligger en begrænset mængde uddannelsesdata, især til sprogopgaver med underressourcer. Manglen på passende størrelse corpora er en hindring for at anvende data-drevne og overføre læringsbaserede tilgange med stærke ustabilitetstilfælde. I denne artikel etablerer vi en state-of-the-art indsats dedikeret til brugervenligheden af Transformer-baserede modeller og foreslår at evaluere disse forbedringer på spørgsmålstegn præstationer af fransk sprog, som har få ressourcer. Vi løser ustabiliteten i forbindelse med dataknaphed ved at undersøge forskellige træningsstrategier med dataforøgelse, optimering af hyperparametre og tværsproget overførsel. Vi introducerer også en ny kompakt model til franske FrALBERT, som viser sig at være konkurrencedygtig i lav ressource miljøer.', 'de': 'Für viele Aufgaben wurden mit Transformer-basierten Architekturen State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse erzielt, was zu einer paradigmatischen Verschiebung der Praktiken von der Verwendung aufgabenspezifischer Architekturen zur Feinabstimmung vortrainierter Sprachmodelle führt. Der anhaltende Trend besteht in Trainingsmodellen mit immer mehr Daten und Parametern, die erhebliche Ressourcen erfordern. Es führt zu einer starken Suche nach einer Verbesserung der Ressourceneffizienz basierend auf algorithmischen und hardwarebasierten Verbesserungen, die nur für Englisch bewertet werden. Dies wirft Fragen nach ihrer Verwendbarkeit auf, wenn sie auf kleinräumige Lernprobleme angewendet werden, für die eine begrenzte Menge an Schulungsdaten verfügbar ist, insbesondere für unterfinanzierte Sprachaufgaben. Das Fehlen geeigneter Korpora ist ein Hindernis für die Anwendung datengetriebener und transferbasierter Lernansätze mit starken Instabilitätsfällen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen Stand der Bemühungen zur Usability von Transformer-basierten Modellen dar und schlagen vor, diese Verbesserungen hinsichtlich der Frage-Antwort-Leistungen der französischen Sprache zu bewerten, die wenig Ressourcen haben. Wir adressieren die Instabilität im Zusammenhang mit Datenknappheit, indem wir verschiedene Trainingsstrategien mit Datenaugmentation, Hyperparameteroptimierung und sprachübergreifendem Transfer untersuchen. Wir stellen auch ein neues kompaktes Modell für den französischen FrALBERT vor, das sich in ressourcenarmen Umgebungen als wettbewerbsfähig erweist.', 'tr': 'Köp zadyň üçin, resim nokady Transformer tabanly arhitektarlar bilen ýetip geldi. Bu sebäpli işi takyk arhitektarlaryň ullanlygy üçin öňünden öňünden gelen dil nusgalaryny bejermek üçin paradigmatik üýtgedi. Aýratyn çykyş modalarda daýat we parameterler gelip artan hatlary bilen birleştirilýär. Bu möhüm çeşmeleriň gerekli. Bu sistemada diňe iňlisçe deňleýän hasaplamak üçin goloritmik we hatlaryň täsirliklerini geliştirmek üçin güýçli gözlemegini ýok edir. Bu kiçi ölçekli öwrenme meselelerine üýtgedilýän wagtlary barada soraglary çykarýar. Bu sebäpli kiçi ölçekli öwrenme meselelerine mejbur bolýar, ýöne iň azyndaky diller üçin gurnalýar. Dogrumy uly korpora ýok bolmagy data ýüze gidirilýän we öwrenmegi daýanýan ýakynlaşyklary güýçli döwürlenmekde döwürmekdir. Bu kagyzda biz Transformer nusgalarynyň ullanjak üçin üýtgedilen çabalaryň durumyny we bu gürrüňleri Fransuz diliniň jogaplarynyň azajyk çeşmeleri barada çözmek üçin gurnalapdyk. Biz daty ýetişdirmekçilik, hiperparameterler optimizasy we çarp dil transferi bilen daty ýokarylýan eğitim stratejiýalaryny barlap maglumatlaryň ýüzünde görünýär. Biz hem Fransuz FrALBERT üçin täze bir kompakt nusgasyny tanyşdyrýarys we bu nusgasy iň az resurslar düzümlerinde ýakynlaşyklygyny kanıtlaýar.', 'am': 'ለብዙ ስራዎች፣ የ-የ-አርእስት ውጤቶች በTransformer-based መሠረት አካባቢዎች የተደረገ ነው፡፡ በዘላለም የሚጨምረው የዳታ እና አካላት በሚያስፈልጋቸው የሥርዓት ግንኙነት በጭራሽ ሀብት ውስጥ ነው፡፡ በአልጎሪካዊ እና የዌብ አካባቢ እውቀት በተመሳሳይ በንግግሊዝኛ ብቻ የተመሳሳይ የዕድሜን ውጤት ለማሻሻል ኃይለኛ ፈተና ይሄዳል፡፡ ይህ ትንሽ ትምህርት ትምህርት መከራ በተደረገ ጊዜ ጥያቄዎችን ያስጠይቃቸዋል፡፡ ለዚህም የተለየ ጥያቄ ዳታዎችን በተለይ ለቋንቋዎች ስራ የተገኘ ነው፡፡ የኮርፖርት ጉዳይ ማስታወቂያው የዳታ-driven እና የተማረ ደረጃዎችን በመቀላቀል በብርቱ ጥረት ጉዳዮች ላይ ከመከላከል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የፊርቨርስቲው የፊደል ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን ለመጠቀም የተለየውን የልዩ ልዩ አርእስት ሀብትን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የዳታ ድህነት እና የቋንቋ ስርዓት በተጨማሪው፣ የhyperparameter ማቀናቀል እና የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ስርዓት በመፍጠር እናስረዳለን፡፡ ለፈረንሳይ ፍሬልቡERT አዲስ የቁጥጥር ሞዴል እናቀርባታለን፡፡ ይህም ከዋነኛ ሀብት አካባቢዎች ይዋጋሉ፡፡', 'fa': 'برای بسیاری از وظیفه\u200cها، نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت هنری با معماری\u200cهای تغییر\u200cپذیر بر اساس تغییر\u200cپذیر رسیده\u200cاند، و به نتیجه تغییر متفاوتی در تمرین\u200cها از استفاده از معماری\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای برای استفاده از معماری\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای به تغی این ترند در حال حاضر در مدل آموزش با مقدار اطلاعات و پارامترها بیشتر افزایش می کند که نیاز به منابع بسیار زیادی دارد. این به یک جستجوی قوی برای تأثیر فعالیت منابع بر اساس توسعه الگوریتمی و hardware فقط برای انگلیسی ارزش داده می شود. این سؤال در مورد استفاده از آنها در زمانی که به مشکلات یادگیری اندازه کوچک کاربرد می\u200cکند، که مقدار محدودیت داده\u200cهای آموزش در دسترسی دارد، مخصوصا برای وظیفه\u200cهای زبانهای زیر منبع است. ناتوانی از شرکت اندازه\u200cهای مناسب یک بازداشت برای کاربرد روش\u200cهای یادگیری بر روی داده\u200cها و انتقال روش\u200cهای یادگیری با پرونده\u200cهای ثابت شدید است. در این کاغذ، ما یک وضعیت هنر تلاش را برای استفاده از مدل\u200cهای تغییر\u200cپذیر مقرر کردیم و پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم که این تغییرات را بر روی اجرای جواب\u200cدهنده\u200cی سوال\u200cهای زبان فرانسوی ارزش دهیم که کمی منابع دارند. ما با تحقیق استراتژی\u200cهای آموزش مختلف با افزایش داده\u200cها، پارامترهای هیپر\u200cپارامترها و انتقال متفاوت زبان\u200cها به ناتوانی داده\u200cها درباره\u200cی استراتژی استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ما همچنین یک مدل پیمان جدید برای فرانسوی FrALBERT معرفی می کنیم که ثابت می کند در تنظیمات کم منابع رقابت کننده است.', 'hy': 'Շատ առաջադրանքների համար վերջին արդյունքները հասել են տրանսֆերմերների հիմնված ճարտարապետությունների միջոցով, ինչը հանգեցնում է գործողությունների պարադիգմատիկ փոփոխությանը, սկսած գործողություններից հատուկ ճարտարապետությունների օգտագործումից մինչև նախկինում պատրաստված լեզվային մոդելների բարել Անընդհատ տենդենսը կազմված է կրթության մոդելներով, որոնք ունեն անընդհատ աճող տվյալներ և պարամետրեր, ինչը պահանջում է նշանակալի ռեսուրսներ: Այն հանգեցնում է ուժեղ որոնմանը ռեսուրսների արդյունավետության բարելավման համար, հիմնված ալգորիթմական և սարքավորական բարելավումների վրա, որոնք գնահատվում են միայն անգլերենի համար: Սա հարցեր է առաջացնում նրանց օգտագործելիության մասին, երբ կիրառվում են փոքր մասշտաբով ուսուցման խնդիրների վրա, որոնց համար սահմանափակ քանակությամբ ուսուցման տվյալներ հասանելի են, հատկապես թերռեսուրսների լեզուների խնդիրների համար Հասարակ չափսերի բացակայությունը խոչընդոտ է տվյալների հիմնված և փոխանցվող ուսուցման հիմնված մոտեցումների կիրառմանը, որոնք ունեն ուժեղ անկայունության դեպքեր: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ստեղծում ենք վերջին տեխնոլոգիական ջանքերը, որոնք նվիրված են տրանսֆերմերների հիմնված մոդելների օգտագործելիության վրա, և առաջարկում ենք գնահատել այս բարելավումները ֆրանսիացի լեզվի հարցերի պատասխանատվող արտադրությունների վրա, որոնք քիչ ռե Մենք լուծում ենք տվյալների բացակայության հետ կապված անկայունությունը ուսումնասիրելով տարբեր ուսումնասիրություններ տվյալների աճի, հիպերպարամետրերի օպտիմացման և լեզվի փոխանցման հետ: Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք Ֆրանսիական Ֆրալբերտի նոր համակարգչային մոդել, որը պարզվում է, որ մրցակցություն ունի ցածր ռեսուրսների միջավայրում:', 'az': 'Birçox iş üçün, Transformer tabanlı arhitektürlər ilə müəyyən edilmişdir. Bu, işlər müəyyən edilmiş arhitektürlərin istifadəsindən əvvəl təhsil edilmiş dil modellerinin düzəltməsi üçün paradigmatik bir dəyişiklik olaraq. Bu trend çox yüksək məlumatlar və parametrləri olan təhsil modellərdə məlumatlar var, ki buna çox möhkəm resurslar lazımdır. Bu çox qüvvətli bir araştırma olaraq, ancaq İngilizce üçün değerlendirilmiş algoritmik və hardwarlıq düzəltmələrinə dayanan ressurs faydalanılığını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün təşkil edir. Bu, kiçik ölçüdə öyrənmə problemlərinə uyğunlaşdığında onların istifadə edilməsi haqqında suallar yüksəlir. Buna görə də müəyyən edilmiş təhsil məlumatları faydalanır, özellikle də çox qüvvətli dillərin işləri üçün. Əslində böyüklük korporası yoxdur, məlumatlar tərəfindən istifadə edilən və öyrənmə tərəfindən möhkəm döyüşənlər ilə istifadə etməyə maneçilik edir. Bu kağızda, Transformer-tabanlı modellərin istifadə edilməsi üçün müəyyən edilmiş çabaların vəziyyətini təşkil edirik və bu sual-cavab vermək üçün az qüvvət sahibi Fransız dilinin cavab verənlərin tərzini təmin edirik. Biz məlumatları artırmaq, hiperparametru optimizasyonu və çox dil transfer ilə müxtəlif təhsil stratejilərini araşdırmaq üçün məlumatların yoxsulluqları ilə əlaqədar edirik. Biz də Fransızca FrALBERT üçün yeni kompakt modeli təşkil edirik ki, düşük ressurs ayarlarında müqayisədə olduğuna bəyan edir.', 'bn': 'অনেক কাজের জন্য ট্রান্সফারেন ভিত্তিক কাঠামোর সাথে রাষ্ট্রীয়-শিল্পের ফলাফল অর্জন করা হয়েছে, যার ফলে কাজের নির্দিষ্ট কাঠামো ব্যবহার থেকে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষা চলমান ধারার মধ্যে প্রশিক্ষণ মডেলের মধ্যে রয়েছে যার পরিমাণ তথ্য এবং প্যারামিটারের মাধ্যমে বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করা হয়েছে, য এটি একটি শক্তিশালী অনুসন্ধানের কারণে আলগরিদমিক এবং হার্ডওয়্যার উন্নয়নের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে মূল্যের কার্যকলাপ উন্নতি করার এটি তাদের ব্যবহারের ব্যাপারে প্রশ্ন তুলে ধরে, যখন ছোট মাত্র সামান্য পর্যায়ে শিক্ষা সমস্যা প্রয়োগ করা হয়, যার জন্যে সীমিত পরিমাণ প্রশিক যথাযথভাবে আকারের কোর্পোরার অভাব হচ্ছে ডাটা চালানো এবং ভিত্তিক শিক্ষা বিনিময়ের ক্ষেত্রে ক্ষমতাশালী ক্ষেত্রে পরিণত এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ট্রান্সফ্রান্সফার ভিত্তিক মডেলের ব্যবহারের জন্য একটি রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের প্রচেষ্টা স্থাপন করি এবং ফ্রেঞ্চ ভাষার প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রদর্ তথ্য যোগাযোগ, হাইপার্পারামিটার অপ্রতিষ্ঠান এবং বিভিন্ন ভাষাভাষী পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে প্রশিক্ষণ কৌশল তদন্ত করার মাধ্যমে আমরা তথ আমরা ফ্রেঞ্চ ফ্রালবার্টের জন্য একটি নতুন প্রতিযোগিতা মডেল চিহ্নিত করেছি যা নিম্ন সম্পদের প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা করে', 'af': "Vir baie taak is die state-of-the-art resultate bereik met Transformer-gebaseerde arkitektuure, wat resultaat in 'n paradigmatiese verskuif in praksies van die gebruik van taak-spesifieke arkitektuure tot die fin-tuning van vooraf-gevorderde taal modelle. Die voortgaande trend bestaan in onderwerp modele met 'n altyd vergroot hoeveelheid data en parameters, wat bepaalde hulpbronne benodig. Dit lei na 'n sterk soek om hulpbron effektiviteit te verbeter, gebaseer op algoritme en hardware verbeteringe wat slegs vir Engels evalueer is. Hierdie verhoog vrae oor hulle gebruikbaard wanneer gebruik word op klein skaal leer probleme, waarvan 'n beperkte hoeveelheid onderwerp data beskikbaar is, veral vir onderwerp taal taak. Die ontbreek van approeg grootte korpora is 'n hindering om data-gedrywe en oordrag-gebaseerde toegang te doen met sterke instabiliteitsgevalle. In hierdie papier stel ons 'n staat van die kuns van die versoeke wat aan die gebruikbaardigheid van Transformer-gebaseerde modele gespesifiseer is en voorstel ons om hierdie verbeteringe te evalueer op die vraag-antwoordende uitvoerings van Franse taal wat min hulpbronne het. Ons adres die oninstabiliteit wat verwanter met data skande deur verskillende onderwerking strategies met data vergroot, hyperparameters optimaliseer en kruistale oordrag te ondersoek. Ons introduseer ook 'n nuwe kompakte model vir Franse FrALBERT wat bevestig dat gemeenskap is in lae hulpbron instellings.", 'bs': 'Za mnoge zadatke, rezultati stanja umjetnosti postignuti su s arhitekturom baziranim na transformeru, što je dovelo do paradigmatske promjene prakse od korištenja arhitektura specifičnih zadataka do finalnog prilagođenja predobučenih jezičkih modela. Nastavljajući trend se sastoji u modelima obuke sa povećanjem količine podataka i parametara, koji zahtijevaju značajne resurse. To vodi do jake potrebe za poboljšanjem učinkovitosti resursa na osnovu algoritmskih i naprednih poboljšanja kompjutera procjenjena samo za engleski. To podiže pitanja o njihovoj korištenosti kada se primjenjuje na probleme s malom skalom učenja, za koje je dostupna ograničena količina podataka o obuci, posebno za zadatak pod manjim resursima jezika. Nedostatak pristojno veličine korporacije je ometanje primjene pristupa na podacima i prenošenju na učenju s jakim slučajevima nestabilnosti. U ovom papiru uspostavljamo državu umjetnosti napora posvećenih korištenju modela na transformatoru i predlažemo da ocijenimo te poboljšanja na izvodima francuskog jezika koji odgovaraju na pitanje koji imaju nekoliko resursa. Mi obraćamo nestabilnost u vezi s nedostatkom podataka istražujući različite strategije obuke s povećanjem podataka, optimizacijom hiperparametara i preko jezika. Također predstavljamo novi kompaktni model francuskog FrALBERT-a koji dokazuje da je konkurentni u nizim resursima.', 'sq': 'For many tasks, state-of-the-art results have been achieved with Transformer-based architectures, resulting in a paradigmatic shift in practices from the use of task-specific architectures to the fine-tuning of pre-trained language models.  Trendi në vazhdim përbëhet në modelet e trainimit me një sasi në rritje të të dhënave dhe parametrave, që kërkon burime të konsiderueshme. Ajo shpie në një kërkim të fortë për të përmirësuar efektshmërinë e burimeve bazuar në përmirësimet algoritmike dhe hardware të vlerësuara vetëm për anglishtin. Kjo ngre pyetje rreth përdorueshmërisë së tyre kur aplikohet në problemet e mësimit në shkallë të vogël, për të cilat është në dispozicion një sasi e kufizuar e të dhënave të trainimit, veçanërisht për detyrat e gjuhëve të pakufishme. Mungesa e korprave të madhësisë së duhur është një pengesë për zbatimin e metodave të bazuara në të dhëna dhe transferimin e metodave të mësimit me raste të forta paqëndrueshmërie. Në këtë gazetë, ne krijojmë një gjendje më të lartë të përpjekjeve të përkushtuara për përdorueshmërinë e modeleve me bazë në Transformer dhe propozojmë të vlerësojmë këto përmirësime në performancat e përgjigjeve të pyetjeve të gjuhës franceze që kanë pak burime. Ne trajtojmë paqëndrueshmërinë lidhur me mungesën e të dhënave duke hetuar strategji të ndryshme trainimi me rritjen e të dhënave, optimizimin e hiperparametrave dhe transferimin ndërgjuhësor. Ne prezantojmë gjithashtu një model të ri kompakt për FrALBERT francez që provon të jetë konkurrues në rregullime me burime të ulëta.', 'cs': 'U mnoha úkolů bylo dosaženo nejmodernějších výsledků pomocí architektur založených na Transformeru, což vedlo k paradigmatickému posunu praxe od používání architektur specifických pro úkoly k jemnému ladění předškolených jazykových modelů. Pokračující trend spočívá v modelech tréninku s neustále rostoucím množstvím dat a parametrů, což vyžaduje značné zdroje. To vede k silnému hledání zlepšení efektivity zdrojů založenému na algoritmických a hardwarových vylepšeních hodnocených pouze pro angličtinu. To vyvolává otázky týkající se jejich použitelnosti při aplikaci na malé vzdělávací problémy, pro které je k dispozici omezené množství údajů o vzdělávání, zejména pro nedostatečně vybavené jazykové úkoly. Nedostatek vhodně velkých korpusů je překážkou pro aplikaci datově řízených a přenosově založených přístupů se silnými případy nestability. V tomto článku stanovíme nejnovější úsilí věnované použitelnosti modelů založených na Transformeru a navrhujeme vyhodnocení těchto zlepšení na odpovědi na otázky francouzského jazyka, který má málo zdrojů. Instabilitu související s nedostatkem dat řešíme zkoumáním různých tréninkových strategií pomocí rozšíření dat, optimalizace hyperparametrů a přenosu mezi jazyky. Představujeme také nový kompaktní model pro francouzský FrALBERT, který se ukáže být konkurenceschopný v prostředí s nízkými zdroji.', 'fi': 'Monissa tehtävissä Transformer-pohjaisilla arkkitehtuureilla on saavutettu huipputason tuloksia, mikä on johtanut paradigmaattiseen siirtymiseen tehtäväkohtaisten arkkitehtuurien käytöstä esikoulutettujen kielimallien hienosäätöön. Jatkuva suuntaus koostuu koulutusmalleista, joissa on yhä enemmän tietoa ja parametreja, mikä vaatii huomattavia resursseja. Se johtaa vahvaan etsintään resurssitehokkuuden parantamiseen perustuen algoritmi- ja laitteistoparannuksiin, joita arvioidaan vain englanniksi. Tämä herättää kysymyksiä niiden käytettävyydestä, kun niitä sovelletaan pienimuotoisiin oppimisongelmiin, joista on saatavilla vain rajallinen määrä koulutustietoja, erityisesti vajaakäyttöisissä kielitehtävissä. Asianmukaisen kokoluokan corporan puute on este datavetoisten ja siirtooppimiseen perustuvien lähestymistapojen soveltamiselle vahvassa epävakaudessa. Tässä artikkelissa selvitämme Transformer-pohjaisten mallien käytettävyyteen omistautuneista ponnisteluista ja ehdotamme näiden parannusten arviointia ranskan kielen kysymyksiin vastaamisessa, joilla on vähän resursseja. Tutkimme datan niukkuuteen liittyvää epävakautta tutkimalla erilaisia koulutusstrategioita datan lisäämisellä, hyperparametrien optimoinnilla ja kielienvälisellä siirrolla. Esittelemme myös ranskalaiselle FrALBERTille uuden kompaktin mallin, joka osoittautuu kilpailukykyiseksi vähävaraisissa olosuhteissa.', 'ca': "Per a moltes tasques, s'han aconseguit resultats més avançats amb arquitectures basades en Transformer, resultant en un canvi paradigmàtic de pràctiques des de l'ús d'arquitectures específices en tasques fins a l'ajustament de models de llenguatge pré-entrenats. La tendència continua consisteix en models de formació amb una quantitat cada cop més gran de dades i paràmetres, que requereix recursos consideràveis. Això condueix a una forta recerca per millorar l'eficiència dels recursos basada en millors algorítmics i hardware que només es valoren en anglès. Això pose preguntes sobre la seva utilitat quan s'aplica a problemes d'aprenentatge a petita escala, per als quals hi ha una quantitat limitada de dades de formació disponibles, especialment per a tasques de llengües amb pocs recursos. La falta de corpora de mida adequada és un obstacle a l'aplicació d'enfocaments basats en dades i transfer ències basats en l'aprenentatge amb forts casos d'instabilitat. En aquest paper, establezem un avançat esforç dedicat a l'utilitzabilitat de models basats en Transformer i proposem evaluar aquestes millores en les performances de resposta a preguntes de la llengua francesa que tenen pocs recursos. Afectem l'instabilitat relacionada amb l'escassetat de dades investigant diverses estratègies de formació amb augment de dades, optimització de hiperparamètres i transfer ència translingüística. També introduïm un nou model compacte per a French FrALBERT que resulta ser competitiu en condicions de baix recursos.", 'et': 'Paljude ülesannete puhul on Transformer-põhiste arhitektuuridega saavutatud tipptasemel tulemusi, mille tulemuseks on praktika paradigmaatiline nihkumine ülesandepõhiste arhitektuuride kasutamiselt eelõpetatud keelemudelite täpsustamiseni. Jätkuv suundumus seisneb koolitusmudelites, millel on järjest suurem hulk andmeid ja parameetreid, mis nõuavad märkimisväärseid ressursse. See toob kaasa tugeva otsingu ressursitõhususe parandamiseks, mis põhineb algoritmilistel ja riistvara parandustel, mida hinnatakse ainult inglise keeles. See tekitab küsimusi nende kasutatavuse kohta, kui neid rakendatakse väikesemahuliste õppeprobleemide puhul, mille kohta on kättesaadav piiratud hulk koolitusandmeid, eelkõige vähese ressursiga keeleülesannete puhul. Sobiva suurusega korporatsioonide puudumine takistab andmepõhiste ja ülekandepõhiste õppepõhiste lähenemisviiside rakendamist tugeva ebastabiilsuse juhtumitega. Käesolevas dokumendis loome Transformeritel põhinevate mudelite kasutatavusele pühendatud jõupingutuste taseme ja teeme ettepaneku hinnata neid parandusi prantsuse keele küsimustele vastamisel, millel on vähe ressursse. Andmepuudusega seotud ebastabiilsuse lahendamiseks uurime erinevaid koolitusstrateegiaid andmete suurendamise, hüperparameetrite optimeerimise ja keeleülese ülekande abil. Lisaks tutvustame Prantsuse FrALBERT-i uut kompaktset mudelit, mis osutub konkurentsivõimeliseks vähese ressursiga tingimustes.', 'he': 'במשך משימות רבות, התוצאות המאומנות הושגו עם ארכיטקטורות המבוססות בטרנספורס, מה שהוביל לשינוי פרדיגמטי בפרקטיקות משימוש ארכיטקטורות מסויימות למשימות לתאימון של דוגמני שפה מאומנים מראש. המנהל הממשיך מורכב במודלים אימונים עם כמות גדולה ומתמיד של נתונים ופרמטרים, שדורש משאבים משמעותיים. זה מוביל לחיפוש חזק כדי לשפר יעילות משאבים מבוססת על שיפורים אלגוריתמיים וחשמלי שהערכו רק לאנגלית. זה מעלה שאלות על אפשרות השימוש שלהם כאשר הופעלה לבעיות לימוד בקנה מידה קטנה, עבור הן יש כמות מוגבלת של נתוני אימון זמינים, במיוחד עבור משימות שפות מתחת למוצאות. חוסר גופורה בגודל הנכון הוא מחסום להפעיל גישות מבוססות על נתונים ומעבירות עם מקרים חוסר יציבות חזקים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מקבלים את המאמצים המקדשים לשימוש של דוגמנים מבוססים בטרנספורס ולהציע להעריך את השיפורים האלה על ההופעות של השאלות של שפת צרפתית שיש להם מעט משאבים. אנו מתמודדים עם אי יציבות בקשר לחסר נתונים על ידי חקירה אסטרטגיות אימונים שונות עם גיבוי נתונים, אופטימיזציה של היפרפרמטרים ועברת שפתיים. אנחנו גם מציגים מודל חדש לחלוטין עבור פראלברט הצרפתי שמוכיח להיות תחרותי במסגרות משאבים נמוכים.', 'sk': 'Pri številnih nalogah so bili doseženi najsodobnejši rezultati z arhitekturami, ki temeljijo na transformatorju, kar je privedlo do paradigmatičnega premika v praksah z uporabe arhitektur za posamezne naloge na natančno nastavitev vnaprej usposobljenih jezikovnih modelov. Trenutni trend je sestavljen iz modelov usposabljanja z vedno večjo količino podatkov in parametrov, kar zahteva precejšnja sredstva. To vodi do močnega iskanja za izboljšanje učinkovitosti virov na podlagi algoritmskih in strojnih izboljšav, ocenjenih samo za angleščino. To postavlja vprašanja o njihovi uporabnosti pri manjših učnih težavah, za katere je na voljo omejena količina podatkov o usposabljanju, zlasti za naloge jezikov s premalo sredstev. Pomanjkanje ustrezno velikih korpusov ovira uporabo podatkovno usmerjenih pristopov in pristopov, ki temeljijo na učenju prenosa, v primeru velike nestabilnosti. V prispevku smo vzpostavili najsodobnejše prizadevanje, namenjene uporabnosti modelov, ki temeljijo na transformatorjih, in predlagali oceno teh izboljšav glede zmogljivosti francoskega jezika, ki ima malo virov za odgovore na vprašanja. Nestabilnost v zvezi s pomanjkanjem podatkov obravnavamo s preučevanjem različnih strategij usposabljanja s povečanjem podatkov, optimizacijo hiperparametrov in medjezikovnim prenosom. Predstavljamo tudi nov kompaktni model za francoski FrALBERT, ki se izkaže za konkurenčnega v okolju z nizkimi viri.', 'ha': "Ko da yawa, an cika halin-sanar matsalar da aka Transformer-based, yana ƙara musanya cikin aikin da aka yi amfani da matsayin masu ƙayyade wa aikin zuwa mai gyare-tunning wa misãlai na zaman-aka-wa. Hanyar da ke tafiya yana cikin masallaci na ƙara da yawan data da parameteri, wanda yana ƙayyade resource masu girma. Ina ƙara zuwa wata shawarar kwamfyuta mai ƙarfi don ya improve fikanci na rayi, a kan kwamfyutan algoritiki da kwamfyutan kayan-gyaranin kayan aiki na Ingiriya kawai. Wannan yana tambayar su masu amfani da su idan an applied su zuwa masu zartar da za'a sani masu ƙarami, wanda za'a iya sãmun data na amfani da shi mai ƙayyade, kuma da haske ga aikin ayuka da ke ƙaranci. Babu zaranci da shirin firma mai daidai, yana hani daga applied zance-da-danne da aka saka hanyoyin wa-da-da-zane-da-zane-zane da misali mai ƙarfi. Ga wannan takardan, Munã tabbatar da wani halin-sanar na aikin da aka ƙayyade wa amfani da misãlai na Transformer-Based kuma Munã buƙata masu gyarata a kan masu tambayar da ake karɓa na lugha faransa da ma'abũcin rai kaɗan. Ina tambayi musamman masu husũma da haske da data, ko kuma suna tambayi takidaki masu yin amfani da zane-zane-zane-zane-zane da za'a ƙara data, da matuƙar, da shirin parameteri da transfer-na'urar-linguin. Za sami da wani misali na faransa FFILBERT, wanda ke jarraba ta zama mai gauraya a cikin kayan-resource.", 'jv': 'Terus akeh sing nglanggar, state-of-the-arts dadi iki bakal diunting podho transformer-basic architecture, dadi nyimpen ngewih modhak karo praksi sing nguasai architecture sing kelompok nggawe barang kelompok ingkang model sing berarti. Dibudhakan langkung wigatining sistem sing sampeyan ing model sing luwih akeh gawe dadi lan parameter, sing wis dianggap akeh barang sampeyan. FindOK Punika ingkang dipun-ingkang sing paling nggawe barang nggawe sistem sing nggawe gerakan kanggo kelas-kaling kanggo sistem sing, kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe datagram sing wis limiting, ngomong kanggo langkung langkung ora bisa dianggawe Aja nguasai bener-bener yèn wong kuwi tindakan nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilanggar data-urip lan ijol-urip kuwi diandelak kanggo ngerasai perusahaan Nang paper iki, awak dhéwé iso nggawe stadu-pernik karo perbudhakan kanggo ngejaraké kanggo ngerasai model sing basa Transformer karo nggunakaé kanggo ngerasai perusahaan iki ning masalah langkung weruh sing rumangsa gerakan karo perusahaan langkung banjuré cetha dadi. We Address the instable connected to data shortness by testing Variable Learning Sittings with data amputation, guierparameters Optimisation and inter-language transfer. Awak dhéwé éntuk nglebok model komplit sing gak nggo Franês Franês Franês Franês sadéwé wis empatan kanggo nguasakno sing wis ana', 'bo': 'འདི་ལྟ་བུ The ongoing trend consists in training models with an ever-increasing amount of data and parameters, which requires considerable resources. དེ་ནི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་རྩིས་དང་མཉེན་ཆས་ཆེན་ཡོད་པའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ཆས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་ནི་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་ཐ འདིས་མང་ཆུང་ལ་སློབ་ནུས་པ་ཆུང་བའི་དཀའ་ངལ་སྐོར་གྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རུང་བའི་དོན་དག ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་ཟེར་བ་ཡིན་པའི་སྒུལ་གཙོ་རིམ་དེ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་པའི་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་བོ་ཞིག་ཡོད། We address the instability relating to data scarcity by investigating various training strategies with data augmentation, hyperparameters optimization and cross-lingual transfer. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཉུང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མཉམ་འབྲེལ་བ་གསརཔ་ཞིག་ངེས་འཛིན་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'Character-based Thai Word Segmentation with Multiple Attentions', 'ar': 'تجزئة الكلمات التايلاندية القائمة على الأحرف مع عدة اهتمامات', 'pt': 'Segmentação de palavras tailandesas baseada em caracteres com múltiplas atenções', 'fr': 'Segmentation de mots thaïlandais basée sur des caractères avec des attentions multiples', 'es': 'Segmentación de palabras tailandesas basada en caracteres con múltiples atenciones', 'ja': '複数の注意を払う文字ベースのタイ語の単語セグメンテーション', 'zh': '基于字符之泰语分词,多所关注', 'hi': 'एकाधिक ध्यान के साथ वर्ण-आधारित थाई वर्ड विभाजन', 'ru': 'Сегментация тайского слова на основе символов с множественным вниманием', 'ga': 'Deighilt Focal Téalainnis atá bunaithe ar charachtair le hIlairdí', 'ka': 'სიმბოლოების დაბათი რაიდენური სიტყვა სეგენტაცია, რამდენიმე ატრუქციებით', 'hu': 'Karakteralapú thai szószegmentáció többszörös figyelemmel', 'el': 'Κατατμηματοποίηση λέξεων της Ταϊλανδίας με βάση χαρακτήρες με πολλαπλές προσοχές', 'it': 'Segmentazione delle parole tailandesi basata sui caratteri con più attenzioni', 'lt': 'Tailando žodžių segmentacija, pagrįsta simboliais, su keliais dėmesiais', 'kk': 'Таңбаларға негізделген Тайландық сөз сегментациясы бірнеше қатынау', 'mk': 'Сегментација на тајландски зборови базирана на знаци со повеќе вниманија', 'ms': 'Segmentasi Kata Thai berdasarkan aksara dengan Perhatian berbilang', 'ml': 'പല ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചു് കൊണ്ടു് അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ തായി വാക്കുകളുടെ വിഭാഗമെന്റേഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Segmentazzjoni tal-kliem Tajlandiż ibbażata fuq il-karattri b’Attenzjonijiet Multipli', 'mn': 'Тайланд суурилсан Тайландын үг хэвлэлт олон ухаантай', 'no': 'Teiknbasert Thai ord- segmentasjon med fleire funksjonar', 'pl': 'Segmentacja tajskiego słowa oparta na znakach z wieloma uwagami', 'ro': 'Segmentarea cuvintelor thailandeze bazată pe caractere cu atenții multiple', 'sr': 'Сегментација Тајландских речи на бриковима са множестним вниманијем', 'so': 'Segmentation of Thai Word Segmentation with Multiple Attentions', 'sv': 'Teckenbaserad thailändsk ordsegmentering med flera uppmärksamheter', 'ta': 'பலவிதமான கவனத்துடன் தாய் வார்த்தை பிரிப்பு', 'ur': 'Character-based Thai Word Segmentation with Multiple Attentions', 'si': 'අක්ෂර- ආධාරිත තායින් වචන සෙග්මෙන්ටම් එක්ක විශේෂය සඳහා', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'nl': 'Op tekens gebaseerde Thaise woordsegmentatie met meerdere aandacht', 'da': 'Tegnbaseret Thai Word Segmentering med flere opmærksomheder', 'bg': 'Сегментация на думи на тайландски език с множество внимания', 'hr': 'Tajlandska segmentacija riječi na znakovima s višestrukim pažnjom', 'id': 'Segmentasi Kata Thai berdasarkan aksara dengan Perhatian Berbilang', 'de': 'Zeichenbasierte Thailändische Wortsegmentierung mit mehreren Aufmerksamkeiten', 'ko': '문자 기반 다주의 태국어 단어', 'fa': 'جداگاهی کلمه\u200cهای تایید بر اساس شخصیت\u200cها با توجه\u200cهای چندین', 'sw': 'Mgawanyo wa neno la Thailand kwa hisia nyingi', 'sq': 'Segmentacioni i Fjalëve Tailandeze bazuar në karaktere me shumë vëmendje', 'af': 'Karakter- gebaseerde Thai Woord Segmentasie met Veelvuldige Aangaande', 'tr': 'Karakter-esasy Taýça Kelimiň Segmentation', 'am': 'Character-based Thai Word Segmentation with Multiple Attentions', 'hy': 'Սեմպերի վրա հիմնված թայլանդական բառերի սեգրմացիա բազմաթիվ ուշադրություն դարձնելով', 'az': 'Karakter-tabanlı Tayland Kelimi Segmentasyonu', 'bn': 'অনেক মনোযোগ দিয়ে থাই শব্দ বিভিন্ন অক্ষরের ভিত্তিক বিভাগ', 'bs': 'Tajlandska segmentacija riječi na karakterima s višestrukim pažnjom', 'cs': 'Segmentace thajských slov na základě znaků s více pozorností', 'et': 'Märgipõhine Tai sõna segmenteerimine mitme tähelepanuga', 'fi': 'Merkkipohjainen thai-sanasegmentointi usealla huomiolla', 'ca': 'Segmentació de paraules tailandeses basada en caràcters amb molta atenció', 'sk': 'Segmentacija besed tajske na podlagi znakov z več pozornostmi', 'jv': 'Caret-basic', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཡིག་འབྲུ་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་Thai Word Segmentation with Multiple Attentions', 'he': 'מילים תאילנדיות מבוססת על סמלים עם תשומת לב רבה'}
{'en': 'Character-based word-segmentation models have been extensively applied to agglutinative languages, including Thai, due to their high performance. These models estimate word boundaries from a character sequence. However, a character unit in sequences has no essential meaning, compared with word, subword, and character cluster units. We propose a Thai word-segmentation model that uses various types of information, including words, subwords, and character clusters, from a character sequence. Our model applies multiple attentions to refine segmentation inferences by estimating the significant relationships among characters and various unit types. The experimental results indicate that our model can outperform other state-of-the-art Thai word-segmentation models.', 'ar': 'تم تطبيق نماذج تجزئة الكلمات المستندة إلى الأحرف على نطاق واسع على اللغات التراصية ، بما في ذلك التايلاندية ، نظرًا لأدائها العالي. تقدر هذه النماذج حدود الكلمات من تسلسل الأحرف. ومع ذلك ، فإن وحدة الأحرف في التسلسل ليس لها معنى أساسي ، مقارنة بوحدات مجموعة الكلمات والكلمات الفرعية والحروف. نقترح نموذجًا لتجزئة الكلمات التايلاندية الذي يستخدم أنواعًا مختلفة من المعلومات ، بما في ذلك الكلمات والكلمات الفرعية ومجموعات الأحرف ، من تسلسل الأحرف. يطبق نموذجنا العديد من الاهتمامات لتحسين استدلالات التجزئة من خلال تقدير العلاقات المهمة بين الشخصيات وأنواع الوحدات المختلفة. تشير النتائج التجريبية إلى أن نموذجنا يمكن أن يتفوق على أحدث نماذج تجزئة الكلمات التايلاندية.', 'pt': 'Modelos de segmentação de palavras baseados em caracteres têm sido amplamente aplicados a idiomas aglutinantes, incluindo o tailandês, devido ao seu alto desempenho. Esses modelos estimam os limites das palavras a partir de uma sequência de caracteres. No entanto, uma unidade de caractere em sequências não tem significado essencial, em comparação com palavras, subpalavras e unidades de agrupamento de caracteres. Propomos um modelo de segmentação de palavras tailandês que usa vários tipos de informações, incluindo palavras, subpalavras e grupos de caracteres, a partir de uma sequência de caracteres. Nosso modelo aplica várias atenções para refinar as inferências de segmentação, estimando as relações significativas entre caracteres e vários tipos de unidades. Os resultados experimentais indicam que nosso modelo pode superar outros modelos de segmentação de palavras tailandeses de última geração.', 'fr': "Les modèles de segmentation de mots basés sur des caractères ont été largement appliqués aux langues agglutinantes, y compris le thaï, en raison de leurs performances élevées. Ces modèles estiment les limites des mots à partir d'une séquence de caractères. Cependant, une unité de caractère dans les séquences n'a pas de signification essentielle, par rapport aux unités de mots, de sous-mots et de groupes de caractères. Nous proposons un modèle de segmentation de mots thaïlandais qui utilise différents types d'informations, notamment des mots, des sous-mots et des groupes de caractères, à partir d'une séquence de caractères. Notre modèle applique plusieurs attentions pour affiner les inférences de segmentation en estimant les relations significatives entre les personnages et les différents types d'unités. Les résultats expérimentaux indiquent que notre modèle peut surpasser d'autres modèles de segmentation de mots thaïlandais de pointe.", 'es': 'Los modelos de segmentación de palabras basados en caracteres se han aplicado ampliamente a las lenguas aglutinantes, incluido el tailandés, debido a su alto rendimiento. Estos modelos estiman los límites de las palabras de una secuencia de caracteres. Sin embargo, una unidad de caracteres en las secuencias no tiene un significado esencial, en comparación con las unidades de palabras, subpalabras y grupos de caracteres. Proponemos un modelo de segmentación de palabras en tailandés que utiliza varios tipos de información, incluidas palabras, subpalabras y grupos de caracteres, de una secuencia de caracteres. Nuestro modelo aplica múltiples atenciones para refinar las inferencias de segmentación mediante la estimación de las relaciones significativas entre los personajes y varios tipos de unidades. Los resultados experimentales indican que nuestro modelo puede superar a otros modelos de segmentación de palabras tailandesas de última generación.', 'zh': '盖字符之分词,其高性能而已广泛应用于凝集性语,盖泰语也。 从字符序度单词界。 然与单词、子单词比字符单元,序中之符单元无本义。 我作泰语分词模,用自字符序列各种类型,单词子词符簇。 度字符以优化分理。 实验结果表明,我可以先秦分词。', 'ja': '文字ベースのワードセグメンテーションモデルは、その高いパフォーマンスにより、タイ語を含む凝集言語に広く適用されています。これらのモデルは、文字シーケンスから単語の境界を推定します。しかし、シーケンス内の文字単位は、単語、サブワード、および文字クラスタ単位と比較して、本質的な意味を持たない。文字シーケンスから、単語、サブワード、文字クラスタなど、さまざまな種類の情報を使用したタイ語ワードセグメンテーションモデルを提案します。私たちのモデルは、文字と様々な単位タイプの間の有意な関係を推定することによって、セグメンテーションの推論を絞り込むために複数の注意を払います。実験結果は、当社のモデルが他の最先端のタイ語ワードセグメンテーションモデルを上回ることができることを示しています。', 'hi': 'चरित्र-आधारित शब्द-विभाजन मॉडल को उनके उच्च प्रदर्शन के कारण थाई सहित एग्लूटीनेटिव भाषाओं पर बड़े पैमाने पर लागू किया गया है। ये मॉडल एक चरित्र अनुक्रम से शब्द सीमाओं का अनुमान लगाते हैं। हालांकि, अनुक्रमों में एक चरित्र इकाई का कोई आवश्यक अर्थ नहीं है, शब्द, उपशब्द और चरित्र क्लस्टर इकाइयों की तुलना में। हम एक थाई शब्द-विभाजन मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक चरित्र अनुक्रम से शब्दों, उप-शब्दों और चरित्र समूहों सहित विभिन्न प्रकार की जानकारी का उपयोग करता है। हमारा मॉडल वर्णों और विभिन्न इकाई प्रकारों के बीच महत्वपूर्ण संबंधों का अनुमान लगाकर विभाजन अनुमानों को परिष्कृत करने के लिए कई ध्यान लागू करता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से संकेत मिलता है कि हमारा मॉडल अन्य अत्याधुनिक थाई शब्द-विभाजन मॉडल को मात दे सकता है।', 'ru': 'Модели сегментации слов на основе символов широко применялись к агглютинативным языкам, включая тайский, благодаря их высокой производительности. Эти модели оценивают границы слов из последовательности символов. Однако единица символа в последовательностях не имеет существенного значения по сравнению с единицами кластера слов, подсловов и символов. Мы предлагаем тайскую модель сегментации слов, которая использует различные типы информации, включая слова, подслова и кластеры символов, из последовательности символов. Наша модель применяет многократное внимание для уточнения выводов сегментации путем оценки значимых отношений между символами и различными типами единиц. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель может превосходить другие современные тайские модели сегментации слов.', 'ga': 'Tá múnlaí deighilte focal carachtar-bhunaithe curtha i bhfeidhm go forleathan ar theangacha glutinative, an Téalainnis san áireamh, mar gheall ar a ardfheidhmíocht. Measann na samhlacha seo teorainneacha focal ó sheicheamh carachtar. Mar sin féin, níl aon bhrí riachtanach ag aonad carachtair i seichimh, i gcomparáid le haonaid focal, fo-focail, agus braislí carachtar. Molaimid múnla deighilte focal Téalainnis a úsáideann cineálacha éagsúla faisnéise, lena n-áirítear focail, fofhocail, agus braislí carachtar, as seicheamh carachtar. Baineann ár múnla aird iolrach chun tátail deighilte a bheachtú trí na gaolmhaireachtaí suntasacha idir carachtair agus cineálacha éagsúla aonad a mheas. Tugann na torthaí turgnamhacha le fios gur féidir lenár múnla sárobair a dhéanamh ar mhúnlaí deighleogacha focal Téalainnis eile atá ar thús cadhnaíochta.', 'hu': 'A karakterek alapú szószegmentációs modelleket nagy teljesítményük miatt széles körben alkalmazzák agglutináló nyelvekre, beleértve a thait is. Ezek a modellek egy karaktersorozatból becsülik meg a szóhatárokat. A szekvenciákban lévő karakteregységnek azonban nincs lényeges jelentése a szó-, alszó- és karakterhasználati egységekhez képest. Egy thai szószegmentációs modellt javasolunk, amely különböző típusú információkat használ fel, beleértve a szavakat, alszavakat és karakterhasztereket egy karaktersorozatból. Modellünk több figyelmet fordít a szegmentációs következtetések finomítására a karakterek és a különböző egységtípusok közötti jelentős kapcsolatok becslésével. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk képes felülmúlni más korszerű thai szószegmentációs modelleket.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα κατάτμησης λέξεων με βάση τους χαρακτήρες έχουν εφαρμοστεί εκτενώς σε συγκολλητικές γλώσσες, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των ταϊλανδέζικων, λόγω της υψηλής απόδοσης τους. Αυτά τα μοντέλα εκτιμούν τα όρια λέξεων από μια ακολουθία χαρακτήρων. Ωστόσο, μια μονάδα χαρακτήρων σε ακολουθίες δεν έχει ουσιαστικό νόημα, σε σύγκριση με τις μονάδες λέξεων, υπολέξεων και συμπλέγματος χαρακτήρων. Προτείνουμε ένα ταϊλανδικό μοντέλο κατάτμησης λέξεων που χρησιμοποιεί διάφορους τύπους πληροφοριών, συμπεριλαμβανομένων λέξεων, υπολέξεων και ομαδοποιημένων χαρακτήρων, από μια ακολουθία χαρακτήρων. Το μοντέλο μας εφαρμόζει πολλαπλές προσοχές για να βελτιώσει τα συμπεράσματα τμηματοποίησης εκτιμώντας τις σημαντικές σχέσεις μεταξύ χαρακτήρων και διαφόρων τύπων μονάδων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας μπορεί να ξεπεράσει άλλα σύγχρονα ταϊλανδέζικα μοντέλα κατάτμησης λέξεων.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების სიტყვების მოდელები აგლუტინატიური ენებისთვის, включая რაილადის, მათი უფრო დიდი გამოყენება. ეს მოდელები სიტყვების დროები სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების შემდეგ. მაგრამ, სიტყვის, საბეჭდვას და სიტყვის კლასტერის ერთეულებებით სიტყვის ერთეულება არ აქვს მნიშვნელოვანი ნიშვნელოვანი. ჩვენ ვაპირებთ რაიდენური სიტყვების სეგმენტაციის მოდელი, რომელიც გამოყენებს განსხვავებული ინფორმაციის ტიპები, რომელიც სიტყვები, სებსიტყვები და სიტყვების კლა ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო მეტად დააყენებს სექმენტაციის ინფრენციების შესახებ, რომლებიც სიმბოლოების და განსხვავებული ერთეულების ტიპის შორის მნიშვნელოვანი შესახე ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები გვეჩვენებს, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ სხვა სახელსაწარმოდგენების მოდელები.', 'it': "I modelli di segmentazione delle parole basati sui caratteri sono stati ampiamente applicati alle lingue agglutinative, incluso il Thai, a causa delle loro elevate prestazioni. Questi modelli stimano i confini delle parole da una sequenza di caratteri. Tuttavia, un'unità di caratteri in sequenze non ha alcun significato essenziale, rispetto alle unità di parole, sottoparole e cluster di caratteri. Proponiamo un modello tailandese di segmentazione delle parole che utilizza vari tipi di informazioni, tra cui parole, sottoparole e cluster di caratteri, provenienti da una sequenza di caratteri. Il nostro modello applica molteplici attenzioni per affinare le inferenze di segmentazione stimando le relazioni significative tra caratteri e vari tipi di unità. I risultati sperimentali indicano che il nostro modello può superare altri modelli di segmentazione delle parole tailandesi all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Žymekliais pagrįsti žodžių segmentacijos modeliai buvo plačiai taikomi aglutinuojančioms kalboms, įskaitant tailandų kalbą, dėl jų didelio veiksmingumo. Šie modeliai apskaičiuoja žodžių ribas pagal simbolių seką. Tačiau simbolių vienetas sekose neturi esminės reikšmės, palyginti su žodžiu, paražodžiu ir simbolių grupių vienetais. Siūlome Tailando žodžių segmentacijos model į, kuriame naudojama įvairių tipų informacija, įskaitant žodžius, parašus ir simbolių grupes, iš simbolių sekos. Mūsų modelis skiria daug dėmesio apibrėžiant segmentacijos išvadas, vertinant reikšmingus ryšius tarp simbolių ir įvairių vienetų tipų. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis gali viršyti kitus naujausius Tailando žodžių segmentavimo modelius.', 'kk': 'Таңбаларға негізделген сөздерді сегментациялау үлгілері, тайландық тілдерге қолданылады. Олардың жоғары істеу үшін, тайландық тілдерге қолданылады. Бұл үлгілер сөздің шектерін таңбалар ретінде бағалады. Бірақ, реттегі таңбалардың бірлігі сөз, субсөз және таңбалардың бірлігімен салыстырылған мағынасы жоқ. Біз түрлі мәліметтерді қолданатын тайландық сөздерді сегментациялау үлгісін ұсынамыз, сөздерді, субсөздерді және таңбаларды таңбалар ретінде қолданатын. Өзіміздің үлгіміз бірнеше қатынасын таңбалар мен бірлік бірліктер түрлерінің маңызды қатынасын бағалап сегментациялық қатынасын рефинизациялау үшін көптеген қатынасы Тәжірибелік нәтижелері біздің моделіміз басқа түрлі тайландық сөз-сегментациялық үлгілерін жасай алады.', 'mk': 'Моделите за сегментација на зборови базирани на карактери се широко применети на аглутинативните јазици, вклучително и на Тајландски, поради нивната висока резултатност. Овие модели ги проценуваат границите на зборовите од секвенца на знаци. Сепак, единица на знаци во секвенции нема суштинско значење, во споредба со единиците на зборот, подзбор и кластер на знаци. Предложуваме тајландски модел за сегментација на зборови кој користи различни видови информации, вклучително и зборови, подзборови и групи на карактери, од секвенца на карактери. Нашиот модел применува повеќе внимание за рафинирање на инференциите за сегментација со проценка на значителните односи меѓу ликовите и различните типови на единици. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел може да ги надмине другите најсовремени тајландски модели на зборови.', 'ms': 'Model segmentasi perkataan berdasarkan aksara telah dilaksanakan secara ekstensif pada bahasa agglutinative, termasuk Thai, disebabkan prestasi tinggi mereka. Model ini menghargai sempadan perkataan dari urutan aksara. Namun, unit aksara dalam jujukan tidak mempunyai makna penting, dibandingkan dengan unit kata, subkata, dan kumpulan aksara. Kami cadangkan model segmen perkataan Thailand yang menggunakan berbagai jenis maklumat, termasuk perkataan, subkata, dan kumpulan aksara, dari urutan aksara. Model kami melaksanakan perhatian berbilang untuk menyempurnakan kesimpulan segmentasi dengan menghargai hubungan yang signifikan diantara aksara dan berbeza jenis unit. The experimental results indicate that our model can outperform other state-of-the-art Thai word-segmentation models.', 'mt': "Il-mudelli ta’ segmentazzjoni tal-kliem ibbażati fuq il-karatteristiċi ġew applikati b’mod estensiv għal-lingwi agglutinattivi, inkluż it-Tajlandiż, minħabba l-prestazzjoni għolja tagħhom. These models estimate word boundaries from a character sequence.  Madankollu, unit à ta’ karattri f’sekwenzi m’għandha l-ebda tifsira essenzjali, meta mqabbla ma’ unitajiet ta’ klassifikazzjoni tal-kelma, subkelma u karattri. Aħna nipproponu mudell Tajlandiż ta' segmentazzjoni tal-kliem li juża diversi tipi ta' informazzjoni, inklużi kliem, subkliem, u raggruppamenti ta' karattri, minn sekwenza ta' karattri. Il-mudell tagħna japplika attenzjoni multipla għar-raffinar tal-inferenzi tas-segmentazzjoni billi jistma r-relazzjonijiet sinifikanti fost il-karattri u tipi varji ta’ unitajiet. Ir-riżultati sperimentali jindikaw li l-mudell tagħna jista’ jaqbeż mudelli oħra ta’ segmentazzjoni tal-kliem l-aktar avvanzati fit-Tajlandja.", 'ml': 'അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള വാക്ക്- സെഗ്മെന്റേഷന്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d വിശാലമായി പ്രയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. തായിയ ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ അതിരുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും അക്ഷരസഞ്ചരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും, സെക്കന്\u200dസിലെ ഒരു അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിന്\u200dറെ യൂണിറ്റ് ആവശ്യമില്ല, വാക്ക്, സബ്\u200cവേര്\u200dഡ്, അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിന്\u200dറെ ക്ലൌസ്റ് We propose a Thai word-segmentation model that uses various types of information, including words, subwords, and character clusters, from a character sequence.  നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന് പല ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്, വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന രോഗങ്ങള്\u200d പുതുക്കുന്നതിനു വേണ്ടിയാണ്, അക് പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മറ്റു സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് ആര്\u200dട്ട് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് തായി വാര്\u200dഡ', 'mn': 'Хараагуудын үндсэн үг хэлбэрийн загваруудын загварууд нь тайланд хамгийн өндөр үйл ажиллагааны шалтгаан дамжуулагч хэл дээр их ашиглана. Эдгээр загварууд харилцааны дарааллаас үг хязгаарыг тооцож байна. Гэвч дарааллаар дүрслэгдсэн харьцаа нэгж үг, суб үг, харьцаа кластер нэгжтэй харьцуулахад чухал утгагүй. Бид өөр төрлийн мэдээллийг ашигладаг Тайланд үг хэмжээний загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Яг л үг, суб үг, хариу хэмжээний хэлбэрээс ашигладаг. Бидний загвар нь хэлбэрийн харилцааны чухал харилцаа, хэлбэрийн төрлийн нэгжүүдийн хоорондоо тооцоолж хэдэн төрлийн загварыг сайжруулахын тулд олон анхаарлыг ашигладаг. Ингээд туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар нь өөр уламжлалтай Тайландын үг хэмжээний загварыг дамжуулж чадна.', 'no': 'Teiknbaserte ordsegmenteringsmodeller har blitt utvida brukt til agglutinativ språk, inkludert Thai, på grunn av dei høge utviklingane. Desse modelane vurderer ordgrensene frå ei teiknkombinasjon. Men ein teiknenamn i sekvensar har ingen nødvendig betydning, samanlikna med ordet, underordet og teiknenamn. Vi foreslår eit Thaisk ordsegmenteringsmodell som brukar ulike typar informasjon, inkludert ord, underord og teiknkolassar, frå ei teiknkombinasjon. Modellen vårt bruker fleire oppmerkingar for å refinera segmenteringsinferensen ved å estimere dei signifikante forholdene mellom teikn og ulike einingstypar. Eksperimentale resultatet tyder på at modellen vårt kan utføre andre modeller for ordsegmentasjon i Thailand.', 'pl': 'Ze względu na ich wysoką wydajność modele segmentacji słów oparte na znakach zostały szeroko stosowane w językach aglutynatywnych, w tym tajskich. Modele te oszacowują granice słów z sekwencji znaków. Jednak jednostka znaków w sekwencjach nie ma istotnego znaczenia w porównaniu z jednostkami słowa, podsłowa i klastra znaków. Proponujemy tajski model segmentacji słów, który wykorzystuje różne rodzaje informacji, w tym słów, podsłów i klastrów znaków, z sekwencji znaków. Nasz model stosuje wiele uwag w celu udoskonalenia wniosków segmentacji poprzez oszacowanie istotnych relacji między znakami i różnymi typami jednostek. Wyniki eksperymentalne wskazują, że nasz model może przewyższyć inne najnowocześniejsze tajskie modele segmentacji słów.', 'ro': 'Modelele de segmentare a cuvintelor bazate pe caractere au fost aplicate pe scară largă limbilor aglutinative, inclusiv thailandeză, datorită performanțelor ridicate. Aceste modele estimează limitele cuvintelor dintr-o secvență de caractere. Cu toate acestea, o unitate de caractere în secvențe nu are nici un sens esențial, în comparație cu unitățile de cuvânt, subcuvânt și grup de caractere. Propunem un model thailandez de segmentare a cuvintelor care utilizează diferite tipuri de informații, inclusiv cuvinte, subcuvinte și grupuri de caractere, dintr-o secvență de caractere. Modelul nostru aplică mai multe atenții pentru a rafina inferențele segmentării prin estimarea relațiilor semnificative dintre caractere și diferite tipuri de unități. Rezultatele experimentale indică faptul că modelul nostru poate depăși alte modele de segmentare a cuvintelor thailandeze de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Modeli segmentacije reèi na karakterima su se široko primjenjivali na agglutinativne jezike, ukljuèujuæi Tajlandske, zbog njihove visoke funkcije. Ovi modeli procjenjuju granice rijeèi iz redoslijede karaktera. Međutim, jedinica karaktera u sekvenciji nema ključnog značenja u usporedbi sa riječima, podriječima i jedinicama za skupljanje karaktera. Predlažemo tajlandski model segmentacije riječi koji koristi različite vrste informacija, uključujući riječi, podriječi i skupove karaktera, iz reda karaktera. Naš model primjenjuje višestruku pažnju na refiniranje inferencija segmentacije procjenom značajnih odnosa među likovima i različitim tipovima jedinica. Eksperimentalni rezultati ukazuju na to da naš model može izvršiti druge modele tajanske reči segmentacije.', 'si': 'අක්ෂර අධාරිත වචන සැකසුම් මොඩේල්ස් ගොඩක් විශාල භාෂාවට, තායි වලින්, ඔවුන්ගේ උත්සත්වය නිසා විශාල භ මේ මෝඩේල් වචන සීමාව අනුමාන කරනවා අක්ෂර ක්\u200dරමයක් වලින්. නමුත්, අක්ෂර යුනිට්ටුවක් වෙනුවෙන් අදහසක් නැහැ, වචන, සබ්වර්ඩ් සහ අක්ෂර ක්\u200dලාස්ටර් යුනිට්ටුවක අපි තායින් වචන සැකසුම් නිර්මාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වෙනස් වර්ගයක් තොරතුරු භාවිත කරනවා, වචන, සබ්වචන, සබ්වචන්  අපේ මොඩල් අවධානය වඩා අවධානයක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ සෙගෙම්ජෙන්ස් අවධානය සහ විවිධ යුනිට් වර්ගයක් අනුමා පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක අනිත් තායින් වචන විශේෂණ විශේෂණ මදු', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha qeybinta ee ku saleysan xarafka waxaa si badan loo codsaday luuqadaha aad u degan, kuwaas oo ah Thai, sababtoo ah sameyntooda aad u weyn. Tusaaladan waxay ku qiimeeyaan xuduudaha hadalka Si kastaba ha ahaatee qeybta xarafka ee ku qoran xilliyada ma leh macnah muhiim ah, isbarbarbardhig hadal, subword iyo xarunta xarunta. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tusaale ahaan hadalka kala duduwan ee Thailand, kaas oo isticmaalaya macluumaad kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ah hadal, hadal hoose ah, iyo xaraf ku qoran. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu qabanqaabiyaa dareemo badan oo ku hagaajiya cudurada galmada, si loo qiimeeyo xiriirka muhiimka ah ee ku dhex jira xaraf iyo noocyo kala duduwan. Imtixaanka waxaa loola jeedaa in modellkayagu uu sameyn karo tusaale kale oo ah xaaladda farshaxanka ah ee Thailand.', 'sv': 'Teckenbaserade ordsegmenteringsmodeller har tillämpats i stor utsträckning på agglutinativa språk, inklusive thailändska, på grund av deras höga prestanda. Dessa modeller uppskattar ordgränser från en teckensekvens. En teckenenhet i sekvenser har dock ingen väsentlig betydelse jämfört med ord-, underord- och teckenklustrenheter. Vi föreslår en thailändsk ordsegmenteringsmodell som använder olika typer av information, inklusive ord, underord och teckenkluster, från en teckensekvens. Vår modell tillämpar flera uppmärksamheter för att förfina segmenteringsslutsatser genom att uppskatta signifikanta relationer mellan tecken och olika enhetstyper. De experimentella resultaten indikerar att vår modell kan överträffa andra toppmoderna thailändska ordsegmenteringsmodeller.', 'ta': 'எழுத்து அடிப்படையில் உள்ள வார்த்தை- பிரிவு மாதிரிகள் அதிக செயல்பாட்டினால் தாய் உள்ள மொழிகளுக்கு விரிவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட் இந்த மாதிரிகள் எழுத்து வரிசையில் இருந்து வார்த்தை எல்லைகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறது. ஆனால், தொடர்களில் உள்ள எழுத்து அலகு முக்கியமான அர்த்தம் இல்லை, சொல், துணை வார்த்தை நாம் ஒரு தாய் வார்த்தை - பிரிவு மாதிரி முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். அது வார்த்தைகள், துணை வார்த்தைகள், மற்றும் எழுத்து குறிப துண்டு நோய்களை புதுப்பிக்க நம் மாதிரி பல கவனத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறது எழுத்துகள் மற்றும் பல அலகு வகைகளுக்கும் முக்கியமான உறவு சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'Character-based word segmentation models have been extensively applied to agglutinative languages, including Thai, due to their high performance. یہ موڈل لغات کی حد ایک شخصت سطح سے ہے۔ However, a character unit in sequences has no essential meaning, compared with word, subword, and character cluster units. ہم ایک ٹائی لفظ سیگنٹ موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو مختلف طریقے معلومات کا استعمال کرتا ہے، لفظ، سوب لفظ، اور شخصت کلسٹر، ایک شخصت سطح سے۔ ہمارا مدل بہت سی توجه کرتا ہے جگہ سیگنٹ کفارنس کو دفع کرنے کے لئے، اور کسروں اور مختلف یونیٹ کے طریقوں کے معتبر رابطہ کا مطالبہ کرتا ہے۔ آزمائش نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل دوسرے ایٹیٹ کے ٹائی کلمات-سیگنٹ موڈل سے کام سکتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Ushbu modellar harfning chegarasini qiymatish. Lekin, chegaralarda belgi birlik muhim ma'nosi emas, so'z, tub soʻz va belgi cluster birikmasi bilan birlashtirish mumkin. Biz Tay soʻzni ajratish modelini tahlil qilamiz, har xil tarkibida turli maʼlumot turlaridan foydalanadigan so'zlar, tub soʻzlar, va harflar tuzuvlaridan foydalanadi. Bizning modelimizning bir necha taqdimot qo'llanmalarni o'zgartirish uchun qo'llanmalar va har xil bir xil bir xil bir xil turlarini hisoblash mumkin. Tekshirish natijalari esa, modelimizning boshqa shaxsiy soʻzning boshqa holatni Tay soʻzning qismlash modellarini bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Cách chế tạo chữ ký được áp dụng rộng rãi cho các ngôn ngữ đậm đặc, kể cả Thái, do khả năng cao. Những mẫu này ước lượng ranh giới từ từ từ một chuỗi ký tự. Tuy nhiên, một đơn vị ký tự trong các chuỗi không có ý nghĩa thiết yếu, so với các đơn vị cụm từ, chữ phụ, và ký tự. Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình chia cách từ Thái, dùng các loại thông tin khác nhau, bao gồm từ, chữ phụ, và phân tích ký tự, từ một chuỗi ký tự. Mẫu của chúng tôi đặt nhiều sự chú ý vào luận hướng lọc bằng cách đánh giá quan hệ quan trọng giữa các nhân vật và các dạng đơn vị khác nhau. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta có thể đạt được giới hạn các mô tả chữ.', 'bg': 'Моделите за сегментация на думи, базирани на знаци, са широко приложени към аглутинационни езици, включително тайландски, поради високата им производителност. Тези модели изчисляват границите на думите от последователност от знаци. Въпреки това, единицата от символи в последователности няма съществено значение в сравнение с единиците дума, поддума и символен клъстер. Предлагаме тайландски модел на сегментация на думи, който използва различни видове информация, включително думи, поддуми и символни клъстери, от поредица от знаци. Нашият модел прилага многократно внимание, за да усъвършенства заключенията за сегментация чрез оценка на значимите взаимоотношения между символите и различните типове единици. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел може да надмине други съвременни тайландски модели за сегментация на думи.', 'da': 'Tegnbaserede ordsegmenteringsmodeller er blevet udbredt anvendt på agglutinative sprog, herunder thailandsk, på grund af deres høje ydeevne. Disse modeller estimerer ordgrænser ud fra en tegnsekvens. En tegnenhed i sekvenser har imidlertid ingen væsentlig betydning sammenlignet med ord-, underord- og tegnklyngenheder. Vi foreslår en thailandsk ordsegmenteringsmodel, der bruger forskellige typer oplysninger, herunder ord, underord og tegnklynger, fra en tegnsekvens. Vores model anvender flere opmærksomheder for at forbedre segmenteringskonklusioner ved at estimere de signifikante relationer mellem tegn og forskellige enhedstyper. De eksperimentelle resultater indikerer, at vores model kan overgå andre state-of-the-art thailandske ordsegmenteringsmodeller.', 'nl': 'Tekengebaseerde woordsegmentatiemodellen zijn uitgebreid toegepast op agglutinatieve talen, waaronder Thais, vanwege hun hoge prestaties. Deze modellen schatten woordgrenzen op basis van een tekenreeks. Een tekeneenheid in sequenties heeft echter geen essentiële betekenis, vergeleken met woord-, subwoord- en tekenclustereenheden. We stellen een Thais woordsegmentatiemodel voor dat verschillende soorten informatie gebruikt, waaronder woorden, subwoorden en karakterclusters, uit een tekenreeks. Ons model past meerdere aandacht toe om segmentatie-conclusies te verfijnen door de significante relaties tussen karakters en verschillende eenheidstypen te schatten. De experimentele resultaten geven aan dat ons model andere state-of-the-art Thaise woordsegmentatiemodellen kan overtreffen.', 'hr': 'Modeli segmentacije riječi na karakterima su se široko primjenjivali na agglutinativne jezike, uključujući Tajlanske, zbog njihove visoke funkcije. Ovi modeli procjenjuju granice riječi iz sekvence karaktera. Međutim, jedinica karaktera u sekvenciji nema ključnog značenja u usporedbi s riječima, podriječjem i jedinicama skupljanja karaktera. Predlažemo tajlandski model segmentacije riječi koji koristi različite vrste informacija, uključujući riječi, podriječi i skupine karaktera iz redoslijede karaktera. Naš model primjenjuje višestruku pažnju na refiniranje inferencija segmentacije procjenom značajnih odnosa među likovima i različitim tipovima jedinica. Eksperimentalni rezultati ukazuju na to da naš model može izvršiti druge modele stanja umjetnosti Tajlandske riječi segmentacije.', 'id': 'Model segmentasi kata berdasarkan karakter telah diterapkan secara ekstensif untuk bahasa agglutinatif, termasuk Thailand, karena prestasi tinggi mereka. Model ini memperkirakan batas kata dari urutan karakter. However, a character unit in sequences has no essential meaning, compared with word, subword, and character cluster units.  Kami mengusulkan model segmen kata Thailand yang menggunakan berbagai jenis informasi, termasuk kata, subkata, dan kumpulan karakter, dari urutan karakter. Model kami menerapkan perhatian berbilang untuk menyempurnakan inferensi segmentasi dengan memperkirakan hubungan signifikan antara karakter dan berbagai jenis unit. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita dapat melampaui model-segmentasi kata-kata Thailand yang terbaik lainnya.', 'de': 'Zeichen-basierte Wortsegmentierungsmodelle wurden aufgrund ihrer hohen Leistung weitgehend auf agglutinative Sprachen, einschließlich Thai, angewendet. Diese Modelle schätzen Wortgrenzen aus einer Zeichenfolge ab. Eine Zeicheneinheit in Sequenzen hat jedoch im Vergleich zu Wort-, Unterwort- und Zeichenclustereinheiten keine wesentliche Bedeutung. Wir schlagen ein thailändisches Wortsegmentierungsmodell vor, das verschiedene Arten von Informationen verwendet, einschließlich Wörter, Unterwörter und Zeichencluster, aus einer Zeichenfolge. Unser Modell wendet mehrere Aufmerksamkeit an, um Segmentierungsfolgerungen zu verfeinern, indem die signifikanten Beziehungen zwischen Zeichen und verschiedenen Einheitentypen geschätzt werden. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell andere state-of-the-art thailändische Wortsegmentierungsmodelle übertreffen kann.', 'ko': '문자 기반의 단어 모델은 고성능으로 인해 태국어를 포함한 접착 언어에 광범위하게 응용된다.이 모델들은 문자 서열에 따라 단어의 경계를 추정한다.그러나 단어, 하위 단어, 문자 묶음 단원에 비해 서열의 문자 단원은 본질적인 의미가 없다.우리는 태국 분사 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 문자 서열에서 나온 다양한 유형의 정보를 사용하는데 단어, 하위 단어와 문자 묶음을 포함한다.우리의 모델은 문자와 각종 단원 유형 간의 중요한 관계를 추정함으로써 여러 가지 주의를 세분화 분할 추정에 응용한다.실험 결과, 우리의 모델은 다른 가장 선진적인 태국 분사 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'مدلهای جدا کردن کلمه بر اساس شخصیت\u200cها به وسیله عملکرد بزرگی به زبانهای گرانگیزی، شامل تائیل، کاربرد شده\u200cاند. این مدل مرزهای کلمه را از یک دستور شخصیت تقریبا می\u200cکند. با این حال، یک واحد شخصیت در ترکیب معنی اصلی ندارد، در مقایسه با کلمه، زیر کلمه و واحدهای کلاستر شخصیت. ما یک مدل جدا کردن کلمات تایید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از نوع اطلاعات مختلف استفاده می\u200cکند، شامل کلمات، زیر کلمات و کلمات شخصیت، از یک رده شخصیت. مدل ما با ارزیابی رابطه\u200cهای مهم بین شخصیت\u200cها و نوع واحد\u200cهای متفاوت چندین توجه را برای تغییر کردن کاهش\u200cهای قطعه\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکند. نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که مدل ما می تواند مدل های دیگر استفاده از کلمات جدا کردن تایید را انجام دهد.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa kutengeneza maneno yenye msingi wa alama umetumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa katika lugha za asili, ikiwa ni pamoja na Thailand, kutokana na utendaji wao wa juu. Mifano hii inakadiria mipaka ya maneno kutoka kwa mfululizo wa tabia. Hata hivyo, kituo cha wahusika katika mfululizo hakuna maana ya muhimu, ukilinganishwa na neno, maneno ya chini, na viungo vya viungo vya wahusika. Tunapendekeza muundo wa kujitenga maneno ya Thailand unaotumia aina mbalimbali za taarifa, ikiwa ni pamoja na maneno, maneno ya chini, na viungo vya tabia, kutoka kwa mfululizo wa tabia. Mfano wetu unatumia hatua mbalimbali za kutathmini magonjwa ya kutengwa kwa kutathmini mahusiano muhimu kati ya wahusika na aina mbalimbali za viungo. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu unaweza kutengeneza mifano mingine ya hali ya sanaa ya neno la Thailand.', 'tr': 'Karakter-segmentasiýa nusgalary yükselen ukyplaryna görä golaýat dillere üýtgedildi. Bu nusgalar karakter sahypalaryny ça şyrýar Ýöne, karakterler arasynda hatlaryň birimi ýok. sözler, subsözler we karakterler kluster birimleri bilen karşılaştyrylýar. Biz Taýça söz segmentasiýasynyň nusgasyny görkezýäris ki, sözler, subsözler we karakter sanlaryndan ullanýar. Biziň modelimiz karakterler we çeşitli birlikler arasynda wajyp baglaýyşlary hasaplamak üçin birnäçe üns çekiştir Deneysel netijeler biziň nusgamyzyň Taýça-sanat söz segmentasy nusgalaryndan başga bir şekilde çykyp biler diýip görkezilýär.', 'af': "Karakter-gebaseerde woord-segmentasie modele is uitbreidig aanwend na aglutinatiewe tale, insluitend Thai, vanweë hulle hoë prestasie. Hierdie modele vurdering woord grense van 'n karakter volgorde. Maar 'n karaktereenheid in sekwensies het geen nuwe betekening nie, vergelyk met woord, subwoord en karakterklester eenhede. Ons voorstel 'n Taïese woord-segmentasie model wat verskillende tipes inligting gebruik, insluitend woorde, subwoorde en karakterklasters, van 'n karakterreeks. Ons model applies multiple attention to refine segmentation inferences by estimating the significant relationships among characters and various unit types. Die eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons model ander staat-van-die-kunste Thai woord-segmentasie modele kan uitvoer.", 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ቃላት-መግለጫ ምሳሌዎች፣ ታይኛ ደግሞ ከፍተኛ ስርዓታቸው ምክንያት በአካባቢ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡ እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች የቃላትን ዳርቻ ከ ፊደል ግንኙነት ይቆጥራሉ። ምንም እንኳን፣ የፊደል ብሔራዊ ግንኙነት በቁጥር የሚያስፈልገው ማድረግ የለውም፣ ቃላት፣ ዝግጅት ቃላት እና የፊደል ግንኙነት አይስተካከልም፡፡ በተለያዩ ዓይነቶች፣ ቃላት፣ ደብዳቤ ቃላት እና የሥርዓት ጉዳይ እና የፊደል ግንኙነት የሚጠቀም የታይያ ቃላት አካባቢ ሞዴል እናሳስባለን፡፡ Our model applies multiple attentions to refine segmentation inferences by estimating the significant relationships among characters and various unit types.  የሞከሩ ውጤቶች ሞዴላዎቻችን ከታይያ ቃላት-መግለጫ ዓይነቶችን ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Նույնիսկ թայլանդացի լեզուների, ներառյալ իրենց բարձր արտադրողականության պատճառով, բառերի սեգմետրացիայի մոդելները լայնորեն կիրառվել են: Այս մոդելները հաշվարկում են բառերի սահմանները հերոսների հաջորդականությունից: Այնուամենայնիվ, հաջորդականություններում գծերի միավորը չի ունենում կարևոր իմաստ, համեմատած բառերի, ենթաբառերի և գծերի միավորների հետ: Մենք առաջարկում ենք թայլանդական բառերի սեգմետրացիայի մոդել, որը օգտագործում է տարբեր տեսակի տեղեկատվություն, ներառյալ բառերը, ենթաբառերը և բնավորական խմբերը, բնավորության հաջորդականությունից: Our model applies multiple attentions to refine segmentation inferences by estimating the significant relationships among characters and various unit types.  Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կարող է գերազանցել այլ լավագույն թայլանդական բառերի սեգմենցիայի մոդելներ:', 'az': 'Karakter-tabanlı söz segmentasiyası modelləri yüksək performanslarına görə, Tayland dahil olaraq agglutinativ dillərə çox uyğunlaşdırılmışdır. Bu modellər bir karakter sıralarından söz sınırlarını təmin edir. Lakin, sıralar içində bir karakter birimi sözləri, altsözləri və karakter cluster birimləri ilə qarşılaşdığı əsas anlamı yoxdur. Biz təşkil edirik ki, hər cür məlumatları istifadə edir, sözlər, alt sözlər və karakter klasterlərindən istifadə edir. Bizim modellərimiz seçmə dəyişikliklərinə çoxlu təsirlərə uyğun verir, karakterlər və müxtəlif birim növlərinin əlaqələrini hesablayaraq. Müxtəlif sonuçlar, modellərimizin başqa mövcuddur Tayland söz segmentasyonu modellərindən daha üstün olar.', 'bs': 'Modeli segmentacije riječi na karakterima su se široko primjenjivali na agglutinativne jezike, uključujući Tajlance, zbog njihove visoke funkcije. Ovi modeli procjenjuju granice riječi iz sekvence karaktera. Međutim, jedinica karaktera u sekvenciji nema ključnog značenja u usporedbi sa riječima, podriječima i jedinicama za skupljanje karaktera. Predlažemo tajlandski model segmentacije riječi koji koristi različite vrste informacija, uključujući riječi, podriječi i skupine karaktera, iz redoslijede karaktera. Naš model primjenjuje višestruku pažnju na refiniranje inferencija segmentacije procjenom značajnih odnosa među likovima i različitim tipovima jedinica. Eksperimentalni rezultati ukazuju na to da naš model može izvršiti druge modele stanja umjetnosti Tajlandske riječi segmentacije.', 'bn': 'অক্ষরের ভিত্তিক শব্দ-বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক মডেল তাদের উচ্চকর্মের কারণে ব্যাপক ভাষায় প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে। এই মডেলগুলো একটি অক্ষরের সীমানা থেকে শব্দের সীমানা হিসেব করে। তবে সেকেন্সের একটি অক্ষর ইউনিটের মানে কোন গুরুত্বপূর্ণ মান নেই, শব্দ, সাবওয়ার্ড এবং অক্ষর ক্লাস্টার ইউনিটের তু আমরা একটি থাই শব্দ বিভিন্ন ধরনের তথ্য ব্যবহার করার প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করছি, যার মধ্যে থাই শব্দ, সাবওয়ার্ড এবং অক্ষরের ক্লাস্টার থেকে ব আমাদের মডেল বেশ কিছু মনোযোগ প্রয়োগ করে যাতে বিভিন্ন ধরনের অক্ষর এবং বিভিন্ন ইউনিটের মধ্যে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সম্পর্কের মাধ্যমে  পরীক্ষার ফলাফল নির্দেশ করছে যে আমাদের মডেল অন্যান্য রাষ্ট্র-অফ-আর্ট থাই শব্দ-বিভক্তি মডেল বাড়িয়ে দিতে পারে।', 'cs': 'Modely segmentace slov založené na znaku byly rozsáhlě aplikovány na aglutinativní jazyky, včetně thajštiny, kvůli jejich vysokému výkonu. Tyto modely odhadují hranice slov z posloupnosti znaků. Nicméně znaková jednotka v sekvencích nemá žádný zásadní význam ve srovnání s jednotkami slova, podslova a skupiny znaků. Navrhujeme thajský model segmentace slov, který využívá různé typy informací, včetně slov, podslov a skupin znaků, z posloupnosti znaků. Náš model uplatňuje více pozorností k upřesnění segmentačních závěrů odhadem významných vztahů mezi znaky a různými typy jednotek. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model dokáže překonat ostatní moderní thajské slovní segmentační modely.', 'et': 'M채rgip천hiseid s천nasegmenteerimismudeleid on nende k천rge j천udluse t천ttu laialdaselt rakendatud aglutinaatsetele keeltele, sealhulgas Tai keeltele. Need mudelid hindavad s천napiiri m채rkide jadast. Kuid j채rjestustes oleval m채rgi체ksusel ei ole olulist t채hendust v천rreldes s천na-, alams천na- ja m채rgiklastri체ksustega. Pakume v채lja Tai s천nasegmenteerimismudeli, mis kasutab erinevat t체체pi teavet, sealhulgas s천nu, alams천nu ja m채rgiklastreid, m채rkide jadast. Meie mudel rakendab mitut t채helepanu segmenteerimise j채relduste t채psustamiseks, hinnates m채rkide ja erinevate 체hikut체체pide olulisi seoseid. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused n채itavad, et meie mudel suudab 체letada teisi kaasaegseid Tai s천nasegmenteerimismudeleid.', 'fi': 'Merkkipohjaisia sanasegmentointimalleja on sovellettu laajasti agglutinaatteihin, mukaan lukien thai, niiden korkean suorituskyvyn vuoksi. Nämä mallit arvioivat sanarajat merkkijonosta. Sarjassa olevalla merkkiyksiköllä ei kuitenkaan ole olennaista merkitystä sana-, alasana- ja merkkiryhmittymäyksiköihin verrattuna. Ehdotamme thaimaalaista sanasegmentointimallia, joka käyttää erityyppisiä tietoja, kuten sanoja, alasanoja ja merkkiryppäitä, merkkijonosta. Mallimme soveltaa useita huomioita segmentointipäättelyjen tarkentamiseen arvioimalla merkkien ja eri yksikkötyyppien välisiä merkittäviä suhteita. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme pystyy suoriutumaan paremmin kuin muut nykyaikaiset thaimaalaiset sanasegmentointimallit.', 'sq': 'Modelet e segmentimit të fjalëve të bazuar në karaktere janë aplikuar në mënyrë të gjerë në gjuhët aglutinative, duke përfshirë Tailandezën, për shkak të performancës së tyre të lartë. Këto modele vlerësojnë kufijtë e fjalëve nga një sekuencë karakteresh. However, a character unit in sequences has no essential meaning, compared with word, subword, and character cluster units.  Ne propozojmë një model Tailandez të segmentimit të fjalëve që përdor lloje të ndryshme informacioni, duke përfshirë fjalë, nënfjalë dhe grupe karakteresh, nga një sekuencë karakteresh. Modeli ynë aplikon vëmendje të shumta për të rafinuar përfundimet e segmentimit duke vlerësuar marrëdhëniet e rëndësishme midis karaktereve dhe llojeve të ndryshme të njësisë. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë mund të mbizotërojë modele të tjera më të larta të segmentimit të fjalëve tailandez.', 'ca': "Els models de segmentació de paraules basats en caràcters s'han aplicat ampliament a llengües aglutinatives, incloent la tailandesa, a causa del seu alt rendiment. Aquests models estimen límits de paraules a partir d'una seqüència de caràcters. No obstant això, una unitat de caràcter en seqüències no té cap significat essencial, comparada amb les unitats de cluster de paraules, subparaules i caràcters. We propose a Thai word-segmentation model that uses various types of information, including words, subwords, and character clusters, from a character sequence.  El nostre model aplica múltiples atencions a refinar les inferències de segmentació estimant les relacions significatives entre caràcters i diversos tipus d'unitat. Els resultats experimentals indican que el nostre model pot superar altres models de segmentació de paraules tailandeses més avançats.", 'jv': 'Karakter-sampeyan model sing wis nggawe kanggo kalah-sampeyan luwih dumaten kanggo langgar an luwih dumateng, lan basa sing tarjamahan, ngenggo akeh lanjut cara-sampeyan. Laptop" and "Desktop politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé nambah akeh sistem sing sampeyan kelas-segmentation, yen sampeyan karo informasi model Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'דוגמני סגרת מילים מבוססים על אופיינים הופעו באופן רחב לשפות אגלוטינטיביות, כולל תאילנדית, בגלל ההופעה הגבוהה שלהם. הדוגמנים האלה מעריכים גבולות מילים מרצף אופיים. בכל אופן, יחידת אופי בשורות אין משמעות חיונית, בהשוואה למילה, תחת מילה, יחידות קבוצת אופיים. אנו מציעים מודל מילים תאילנדי שמשתמש בסוגים שונים של מידע, כולל מילים, תחת מילים, וקבוצות אופיים, מרצף אופיים. הדוגמא שלנו משתמשת במספר תשומת לב למעטפת התחלוקות על ידי הערכה של מערכות היחסים המשמעותיות בין הדמויות וסוגי יחידות שונים. התוצאות הניסיונייות מצביעות על כך שהדוגמא שלנו יכולה להעביר דוגמאות מילים תאילנדיות חדשות.', 'sk': 'Modeli segmentacije besed, ki temeljijo na znakih, so bili obsežno uporabljeni v aglutinatnih jezikih, vključno s tajščino, zaradi njihove visoke zmogljivosti. Ti modeli ocenjujejo meje besed iz zaporedja znakov. Vendar pa enota znakov v zaporedjih nima bistvenega pomena v primerjavi z enotami besed, podbesed in skupine znakov. Predlagamo tajski model segmentacije besed, ki uporablja različne vrste informacij, vključno z besedami, podbesedami in skupinami znakov, iz zaporedja znakov. Naš model uporablja več pozornosti za izboljšanje segmentacijskih sklepov z oceno pomembnih odnosov med znaki in različnimi vrstami enot. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da lahko naš model presega druge najsodobnejše tajske modele segmentacije besed.', 'ha': "An amfani da misãlai masu segment na cikin takardar-salon maganar-faɗi mai girma zuwa harshen aggulutinati, tare da Shi, saboda fassararsu mai girma. These models estimate word boundaries from a character sequence.  Babu kasa, wani nau'in rubutu da aka saka, bã ya da wani muhimu, kuma a daidaita da magana, subword, da sune na salo. Tuna goyyar da wani misali da kalma-segmentation na Tailai wanda ke amfani da wasu nau'i masu yiwuwa, kamar maganar, masu ƙarfafa da masu hushi, daga wani sequence. Tuduniyarmu na amfani da sauri masu yawa dõmin ya canza wata cutar sigar jini-segment, ana ƙaddara danganta masu muhimmi a tsakanin karatun da nau'i-nau'i. Matarin da ke jarraba, yana nũna cewa misalinmu yana iya samar da wasu misãlai na-halin-mai-sanar-kalmar-tsohon-Tai.", 'bo': 'ཡིག་འབྲུ་གཞི་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཆ་ཤས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚིགས་དེ་ཚོ་ནི་སྣ་ཚུལ་མཐོ་ཤིག་ཏུ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་པ་ཡིན། དཔེ་གཞུང་འདིས་ཡིག་འབྲུ་གི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ལས་ཐིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལྟར་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། དབྱེ་རིམ་ནང་གི་ཡིག་འབྲུ་གཅིག་ལ་གལ་ཆེན་པ་མིན་འདུག་པས་ཡིག་དང་། གསལ་བཤད་དང་། ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་དབ We propose a Thai word-segmentation model that uses various types of information, including words, subwords, and character clusters, from a character sequence. ང་ཚོའི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་ཡིག་འབྲུ་དང་དབྱེ་རིགས་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་མཐུན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་རེད། The experimental results indicate that our model can outperform other state-of-the-art Thai word-segmentation models.'}
{'en': 'Are Language-Agnostic Sentence Representations Actually Language-Agnostic?', 'es': '¿Las representaciones de oraciones independientes del idioma son realmente independientes del idioma?', 'ar': 'هل تمثيلات الجمل الحيادية اللغوية في الواقع لا أدري اللغة؟', 'fr': 'Les représentations de phrases indépendantes de la langue sont-elles réellement agnostiques\xa0?', 'pt': 'As representações de sentenças agnósticas de linguagem são realmente agnósticas de linguagem?', 'zh': '语言不可知者,言实不可知乎?', 'ja': '言語-認知表現は実際には言語-認知表現ですか？', 'hi': 'क्या भाषा-अज्ञेयवादी वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व वास्तव में भाषा-अज्ञेयवादी हैं?', 'ru': 'Действительно ли языково-агностические представления предложений являются языково-агностическими?', 'ga': 'An Teanga-Agnóiseach iad Léirithe Pianbhreithe Teanga-Agnóiseach i ndáiríre?', 'ka': 'ენვგური-ადნოსტიული სიტყვების გამოსახულებები არიან?', 'it': 'Le rappresentazioni linguistiche-agnostiche delle frasi sono realmente linguistiche-agnostiche?', 'el': 'Είναι οι γλωσσικές αναπαραστάσεις των προτάσεων στην πραγματικότητα γλωσσικές;', 'hu': 'A nyelv-Agnosztikai mondat-reprezentációk valójában nyelv-Agnosztikai?', 'mk': 'Дали претставувањата на јазикот-агностичките реченици всушност јазикот-агностични?', 'lt': 'Ar kalbos-agnostinio sakinio atstovavimai iš tiesų kalbos-agnostiniai?', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ-ആഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥത്തില്\u200d ഭാഷ-ആഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക് പ്രതിനിധികളാണോ?', 'ms': 'Adakah Perwakilan Perkataan Bahasa-Agnostik Sebenarnya Bahasa-Agnostik?', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ хэл-агностик үгийн үзүүлэлт үнэндээ хэл-агностик уу?', 'pl': 'Czy reprezentacje językowo-agnostyczne zdań są rzeczywiście językowo-agnostyczne?', 'mt': 'Are Language-Agnostic Sentence Representations Actually Language-Agnostic?', 'sr': 'Da li su predstavnici jezika-Agnostičke kazne zapravo jezik-Agnostički?', 'ro': 'Sunt reprezentanţele lingvistice ale sentinţei agnostice de fapt lingvistice agnostice?', 'so': 'Macluumaadka afka-Agnostika ma u soo jeeda xuquuqda maxkamadda afka?', 'no': 'Er språk-Agnostiske setningar representasjonar faktisk språk-Agnostiske?', 'ta': 'மொழி- குழந்தையான வாக்குறுப்புகள் உண்மையில் மொழி- குழந்தை?', 'sv': 'Är språkAgnostiska meningsrepresentationer faktiskt språkAgnostiska?', 'si': 'භාෂා-අග්නොස්ටික් වචන ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය ඇත්තටම භාෂා-අග්නොස්ටික්?', 'ur': 'آیا زبان-اگنوٹیک سنٹنس معجزات حقیقت میں زبان-اگنوٹیک ہیں؟', 'kk': 'Тіл- агностикалық сөздердің суреттері шынымен тіл- агностикалық пе?', 'uz': 'Til-Agnostik maxsus taqdimlari haqiqida til-Agnostik?', 'vi': 'Có phải Ngôn ngữ-Tình Hiện đại Ngôn ngữ-Tình?', 'bg': 'Дали езиковото-агностичното представяне на присъдата действително е езиково-агностично?', 'de': 'Sind sprachlich-agnostische Satzrepräsentationen tatsächlich sprachlich-agnostisch?', 'hr': 'Da li su predstavnici jezika-Agnostičke kazne zapravo jezik-Agnostički?', 'id': 'Apakah Perwakilan Perkataan Bahasa-Agnostik Sebenarnya Bahasa-Agnostik?', 'da': 'Er sprog-Agnostiske sætningsrepræsentationer faktisk sprog-Agnostiske?', 'nl': 'Zijn taal-agnostische zinnen representaties eigenlijk taal-agnostisch?', 'ko': '언어가 알 수 없는 문장의 표징은 실제로 언어가 알 수 없는 것입니까?', 'sw': 'Je, maoni ya hukumu ya lugha ya Ki-Agnostic ni ya lugha?', 'sq': 'A janë përfaqësimet e gjykimeve gjuhë-agnostike në të vërtetë gjuhë-agnostike?', 'af': 'Is taal-Agnostiese voorstellings Regtig Taal-Agnostiese?', 'tr': 'Dil-Agnostik sözler Wasplaýyşlarymy Aslynda Dil-Agnostik?', 'fa': 'آیا نماینده\u200cهای جمله\u200cی زبان-اگناستیک در واقع زبان-اگناستیک هستند؟', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք լեզու-ագնոստիկ դատողությունների ներկայացումները իրականում լեզու-ագնոստիկ են:', 'az': 'Dil-Agnostik Sözü Representations Actually Language-Agnostic Are?', 'am': 'ቋንቋ-Agnostic የፍርድ ድምፅ-ቋንቋ-Agnostic ተሟጋቾች ናቸውን?', 'bs': 'Da li su predstavnici jezika-Agnostičke kazne zapravo jezik-Agnostički?', 'et': 'Kas keele-agnostilised kohtuotsused on tegelikult keele-agnostilised?', 'bn': 'ভাষা-আগনোস্টিক শাস্তির প্রতিনিধি কি আসলে ভাষা-আগনোস্টিক?', 'fi': 'Ovatko kieliaggressiiviset lauseet todella kieliaggressiivisia?', 'cs': 'Jsou jazykově-agnostické reprezentace vět skutečně jazykově-agnostické?', 'ca': 'Les representacions de la sentencia lingüística-agnòstica són realment lingüística-agnòstica?', 'jv': 'Apane ?', 'sk': 'Ali so jezikovno-agnostične kazenske reprezentacije dejansko jezikovno-agnostične?', 'he': 'Are Language-Agnostic Sentence Representations Actually Language-Agnostic?', 'ha': 'Shin, Jalalar-Agnostic ne Mataimakin Lugha-Agnostic?', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་སྙན་ཚོའི་ངོ་མ་དེ་དངོས་ཡིག་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་མཚོན་ན།'}
{'en': 'With the emergence of pre-trained multilingual models, multilingual embeddings have been widely applied in various natural language processing tasks. Language-agnostic models provide a versatile way to convert linguistic units from different languages into a shared vector representation space. The relevant work on multilingual sentence embeddings has reportedly reached low error rate in cross-lingual similarity search tasks. In this paper, we apply the pre-trained embedding models and the cross-lingual similarity search task in diverse scenarios, and observed large discrepancy in results in comparison to the original paper. Our findings on cross-lingual similarity search with different newly constructed multilingual datasets show not only correlation with observable language similarities but also strong influence from factors such as translation paths, which limits the interpretation of the language-agnostic property of the LASER model.', 'es': 'Con la aparición de modelos multilingües previamente entrenados, las incorporaciones multilingües se han aplicado ampliamente en diversas tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Los modelos independientes del idioma proporcionan una forma versátil de convertir unidades lingüísticas de diferentes idiomas en un espacio de representación vectorial compartido. Según se informa, el trabajo relevante sobre la incorporación de oraciones multilingües ha alcanzado una baja tasa de error en las tareas de búsqueda de similitud entre idiomas En este artículo, aplicamos los modelos de incrustación previamente entrenados y la tarea de búsqueda de similitud multilingüe en diversos escenarios, y observamos una gran discrepancia en los resultados en comparación con el artículo original. Nuestros hallazgos sobre la búsqueda de similitudes entre idiomas con diferentes conjuntos de datos multilingües recién construidos muestran no solo una correlación con similitudes lingüísticas observables, sino también una fuerte influencia de factores como las rutas de traducción, que limitan la interpretación de la propiedad independiente del lenguaje del LASER modelo. %', 'fr': "Avec l'émergence de modèles multilingues pré-entraînés, les intégrations multilingues ont été largement utilisées dans diverses tâches de traitement du langage naturel. Les modèles indépendants de la langue constituent un moyen polyvalent de convertir des unités linguistiques de différentes langues en un espace de représentation vectorielle partagé. Les travaux pertinents sur les intégrations de phrases multilingues auraient atteint un faible taux d'erreur dans les tâches de recherche de similarité entre langues. Dans cet article, nous appliquons les modèles d'intégration pré-entraînés et la tâche de recherche de similarité interlinguistique dans divers scénarios, et nous avons observé une grande différence dans les résultats par rapport à l'article original. Nos résultats sur la recherche de similitudes interlinguistiques avec différents ensembles de données multilingues nouvellement construits montrent non seulement une corrélation avec des similitudes linguistiques observables, mais également une forte influence de facteurs tels que les chemins de traduction, ce qui limite l'interprétation de la propriété agnostique de la langue du LASER modèle. %", 'ar': 'مع ظهور نماذج متعددة اللغات مدربة مسبقًا ، تم تطبيق حفلات الزفاف متعددة اللغات على نطاق واسع في العديد من مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. توفر النماذج الحيادية للغة طريقة متعددة الاستخدامات لتحويل الوحدات اللغوية من لغات مختلفة إلى مساحة تمثيل متجه مشتركة. وبحسب ما ورد وصل العمل ذي الصلة في حفلات الزفاف متعددة اللغات إلى معدل خطأ منخفض في مهام البحث عن التشابه عبر اللغات. في هذه الورقة ، نطبق نماذج التضمين المدربة مسبقًا ومهمة البحث عن التشابه عبر اللغات في سيناريوهات متنوعة ، ولاحظنا وجود تباين كبير في النتائج مقارنة بالورقة الأصلية. النتائج التي توصلنا إليها في البحث عن التشابه عبر اللغات مع مجموعات بيانات متعددة اللغات تم إنشاؤها حديثًا لا تظهر فقط الارتباط مع أوجه التشابه اللغوي التي يمكن ملاحظتها ولكن أيضًا تأثيرًا قويًا من عوامل مثل مسارات الترجمة ، مما يحد من تفسير الخاصية الحيادية للغة لنموذج الليزر. ٪', 'pt': 'Com o surgimento de modelos multilíngues pré-treinados, os embeddings multilíngues têm sido amplamente aplicados em várias tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural. Os modelos agnósticos de linguagem fornecem uma maneira versátil de converter unidades linguísticas de diferentes idiomas em um espaço de representação vetorial compartilhado. O trabalho relevante sobre a incorporação de sentenças multilíngues atingiu uma baixa taxa de erro em tarefas de pesquisa de similaridade em vários idiomas. Neste artigo, aplicamos os modelos de embedding pré-treinados e a tarefa de busca de similaridade entre idiomas em diversos cenários, e observamos uma grande discrepância nos resultados em comparação com o artigo original. Nossas descobertas sobre a busca de similaridade entre idiomas com diferentes conjuntos de dados multilíngues recém-construídos mostram não apenas correlação com semelhanças linguísticas observáveis, mas também forte influência de fatores como caminhos de tradução, o que limita a interpretação da propriedade agnóstica de linguagem do modelo LASER. %', 'ja': '事前に訓練された多言語モデルの出現に伴い、多言語埋め込みは様々な自然言語処理タスクに広く適用されてきた。言語非言語モデルは、異なる言語からの言語単位を共有ベクトル表現空間に変換するための汎用的な方法を提供する。多言語の文章埋め込みに関する関連作業は、クロスリンガルの類似性検索タスクで低いエラー率に達したと報告されている。本稿では，事前に訓練された埋め込みモデルと言語間の類似性探索タスクを多様なシナリオに適用し，元の論文と比較して大きな結果の乖離を観察した．異なる新たに構築された多言語データセットとのクロスリンガル類似性検索に関する私たちの調査結果は、観察可能な言語類似性との相関関係だけでなく、翻訳パスなどの要因からの強い影響を示しており、レーザーモデルの言語非推論的特性の解釈を制限しています。%', 'ru': 'С появлением предварительно обученных многоязычных моделей многоязычные вставки широко применяются в различных задачах обработки естественного языка. Языко-диагностические модели обеспечивают универсальный способ преобразования лингвистических единиц из разных языков в общее векторное пространство представления. Соответствующая работа по внедрению многоязычных предложений, как сообщается, достигла низкого уровня ошибок в задачах поиска межязычного сходства. В этой статье мы применяем предварительно обученные модели встраивания и задачу поиска кросс-лингвистического сходства в различных сценариях и наблюдаем большое расхождение в результатах по сравнению с первоначальной работой. Наши результаты по поиску кросс-лингвистического сходства с различными вновь построенными многоязычными наборами данных показывают не только корреляцию с наблюдаемыми языковыми сходствами, но и сильное влияние таких факторов, как пути перевода, что ограничивает интерпретацию языково-агностического свойства ЛАЗЕРНОЙ модели. %', 'zh': '随所习多言模形,多言嵌广泛应用诸自然语言处。 无关言语多功能法,转语单元为共矢量空。 据报道,多语言句嵌相关事相似性跨语搜索,至于卑错误率。 于本文中,将预练的嵌入模形和跨语相似性搜索应用不同,并观察到与原始论文较大差异。 余等于用新造多语言数据集相似性跨语搜索,不特与可观言语相似性相关,又受译路等因素之强烈,此限于LASER形之言不可知性也。 %', 'hi': 'पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित बहुभाषी मॉडल के उद्भव के साथ, बहुभाषी एम्बेडिंग को विभिन्न प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों में व्यापक रूप से लागू किया गया है। भाषा-अज्ञेयवादी मॉडल विभिन्न भाषाओं से भाषाई इकाइयों को एक साझा वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व स्थान में परिवर्तित करने का एक बहुमुखी तरीका प्रदान करते हैं। बहुभाषी वाक्य एम्बेडिंग पर प्रासंगिक कार्य कथित तौर पर क्रॉस-लिंगुअल समानता खोज कार्यों में कम त्रुटि दर तक पहुंच गया है। इस पेपर में, हम विभिन्न परिदृश्यों में पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित एम्बेडिंग मॉडल और क्रॉस-लिंगुअल समानता खोज कार्य को लागू करते हैं, और मूल पेपर की तुलना में परिणामों में बड़ी विसंगति देखते हैं। विभिन्न नवनिर्मित बहुभाषी डेटासेट के साथ क्रॉस-भाषी समानता खोज पर हमारे निष्कर्ष न केवल अवलोकन योग्य भाषा समानताओं के साथ सहसंबंध दिखाते हैं, बल्कि अनुवाद पथ जैसे कारकों से भी मजबूत प्रभाव दिखाते हैं, जो लेजर मॉडल की भाषा-अज्ञेयवादी संपत्ति की व्याख्या को सीमित करता है। %', 'ga': 'Le teacht chun cinn samhlacha ilteangacha réamhoilte, cuireadh leabaithe ilteangacha i bhfeidhm go forleathan i dtascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha éagsúla. Soláthraíonn samhlacha agnostic teanga bealach ilúsáideach chun aonaid theangeolaíocha ó theangacha éagsúla a thiontú go spás ionadaíochta veicteoirí roinnte. Tuairiscítear go bhfuil ráta íseal earráide bainte amach ag an obair ábhartha ar leabú abairtí ilteangacha i dtascanna cuardaigh cosúlachta tras-teangacha. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid na samhlacha leabaithe réamhoilte agus an tasc cuardaigh cosúlachtaí tras-teanga i bhfeidhm i gcásanna éagsúla, agus breathnaítear neamhréireacht mhór sna torthaí i gcomparáid leis an bpáipéar bunaidh. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí ar chuardach cosúlachtaí tras-teangacha le tacair shonraí ilteangacha nuathógtha éagsúla ní hamháin comhghaol le cosúlachtaí teanga inbhraite ach freisin tionchar láidir ó fhachtóirí ar nós conairí aistriúcháin, a chuireann srian le léirmhíniú airí teanga-agnóiseach na samhla LASER. %', 'hu': 'Az előre képzett többnyelvű modellek megjelenésével a többnyelvű beágyazásokat széles körben alkalmazzák a különböző természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatokban. A nyelv-agnosztikus modellek sokoldalú módot nyújtanak a különböző nyelvek nyelvi egységeinek átalakítására egy közös vektoros reprezentációs térré. A többnyelvű mondatbeágyazásokkal kapcsolatos releváns munka állítólag alacsony hibaarányt ért el a többnyelvű hasonlóságkeresési feladatokban. Ebben a tanulmányban az előre képzett beágyazási modelleket és a többnyelvű hasonlóságkeresési feladatot alkalmazzuk különböző forgatókönyvekben, és nagy eltérést figyeltünk meg az eredményekben az eredeti tanulmányhoz képest. A különböző újonnan kialakított, többnyelvű adatkészletekkel való kereséssel kapcsolatos eredményeink nemcsak a megfigyelhető nyelvhasonlóságokkal való összefüggést mutatják, hanem olyan tényezők, mint a fordítási útvonalak, amelyek korlátozzák a LASER modell nyelvi-agnosztikus tulajdonságának értelmezését.%', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური მოდელების შესახებ მრავალენგური მოდელების შესახებ, მრავალენგური შესახებ განსხვავებული სახელსახური ენის პროცესი დავალებში გააყენებულია. ენის- ადნოსტიკური მოდელები განსხვავებული ენებიდან ენგოსტიკური ერთეულების გადაცვლა განსხვავებული ვექტორის გარემოსაზღვრების ადგილი. შესაბამისი მრავალენგური სიტყვების შესაბამისათვის მუშაობელი სამუშაო სამუშაო სიტყვების შესაბამისათვის შეცდომა სიტყვების გადასვლა. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ დავყენებთ წინ შესწავლობული მოდელები და მრავალური განსხვავებული სინარიოში საძებლობა მოდელები, და დავხედავთ დიდი განსხვავებულობა პირველური დოკუნეზე შემდეგ. ჩვენი მონაცემები მრავალური განსხვავებული მრავალური განსხვავებული მრავალური განსხვავებული მონაცემების შესაძლებლობაზე არა მხოლოდ დააჩვენებელი ენის განსხვავებებით, მაგრამ მხოლოდ ძალიან გრძნობა ფაქტორებისგან, რომელიც LASER მოდელის ენ', 'el': 'Με την εμφάνιση προ-εκπαιδευμένων πολύγλωσσων μοντέλων, οι πολυγλωσσικές ενσωματώσεις έχουν εφαρμοστεί ευρέως σε διάφορες εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Τα γλωσσικά-αγνωστικά μοντέλα παρέχουν έναν ευέλικτο τρόπο μετατροπής γλωσσικών μονάδων από διαφορετικές γλώσσες σε έναν κοινόχρηστο διανυσματικό χώρο αναπαράστασης. Σύμφωνα με πληροφορίες, η σχετική εργασία σχετικά με την ενσωμάτωση πολυγλωσσών προτάσεων έχει επιτύχει χαμηλό ποσοστό σφαλμάτων σε εργασίες αναζήτησης ομοιοτήτων μεταξύ γλωσσών. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εφαρμόζουμε τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης και την εργασία αναζήτησης γλωσσικής ομοιότητας σε διάφορα σενάρια, και παρατηρούμε μεγάλη διαφορά στα αποτελέσματα σε σύγκριση με την αρχική εργασία. Τα ευρήματά μας σχετικά με τη διερεύνηση γλωσσικών ομοιοτήτων με διαφορετικά νεοδομημένα πολύγλωσσα σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν όχι μόνο συσχέτιση με παρατηρήσιμες γλωσσικές ομοιότητες αλλά και ισχυρή επιρροή από παράγοντες όπως οι μεταφραστικές διαδρομές, οι οποίες περιορίζουν την ερμηνεία της γλωσσικής-αγνωστικής ιδιότητας του μοντέλου%', 'lt': 'Atsiradus iš anksto parengtiems daugiakalbiams modeliams, įvairiose gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduotyse buvo plačiai taikomi daugiakalbiai įterpimai. Kalbos-agnostiniai modeliai suteikia įvairiapusį būdą keisti kalbinius vienetus iš skirtingų kalbų į bendrą vektorių atstovavimo erdvę. Atitinkamas darbas daugiakalbių sakinių įtraukimo srityje, kaip teigiama, pasiekė mažą klaidų lygį atliekant tarpkalbines panašumo paieškas. Šiame dokumente taikome iš anksto parengtus įterpimo modelius ir tarpkalbinį panašumo paiešką įvairiais scenarijais ir pastebėjome didelius rezultatų neatitikimus palyginti su originaliniu dokumentu. Mūsų išvados dėl tarpkalbinio panašumo paieškos su skirtingais naujai sukurtais daugiakalbiais duomenų rinkiniais rodo ne tik koreliaciją su pastebimais kalbos panašumais, bet ir didelę įtaką veiksniams, pvz., vertimo keliais, kurie apriboja LASER modelio kalbos ir agnostinės savybės aiškinimą. %', 'it': "Con l'emergere di modelli multilingue pre-formati, le incorporazioni multilingue sono state ampiamente applicate in vari compiti di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. I modelli linguistici-agnostici forniscono un modo versatile per convertire unità linguistiche di lingue diverse in uno spazio di rappresentazione vettoriale condiviso. Secondo quanto riferito, il lavoro relativo all'incorporazione di frasi multilingue ha raggiunto un basso tasso di errore nelle attività di ricerca di somiglianza tra lingue. In questo articolo, applichiamo i modelli di incorporazione pre-addestrati e il compito di ricerca di somiglianza cross-lingual in diversi scenari, e abbiamo osservato grandi discrepanze nei risultati rispetto al paper originale. I nostri risultati sulla ricerca di somiglianza tra lingue con diversi set di dati multilingue di nuova costruzione mostrano non solo la correlazione con somiglianze linguistiche osservabili, ma anche una forte influenza da fattori come i percorsi di traduzione, che limitano l'interpretazione della proprietà linguistica-agnostica del modello LASER.%", 'ml': 'മുമ്പ് പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട പല ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ ഉയര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പല ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോല ഭാഷ- ആഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക് മോഡലുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പങ്കുള്ള വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ  പല ഭാഷയിലുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ അകത്തേക്കുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയാണ് ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ക് തെരച്ചിലുള്ള തെരച്ചിലുകള ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലന മോഡലുകളും ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ തെരച്ചിലുകളും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ സാധാരണങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വലിയ വിവേക ലാസെര്\u200d മോഡലിന്റെ ഭാഷയുടെ ഭാഷ അഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട പല ഭാഷയുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുമായി കണക്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d മാത', 'mt': 'Bil-ħolqien ta’ mudelli multilingwi mħarrġa minn qabel, l-inkorporazzjonijiet multilingwi ġew applikati b’mod wiesa’ f’diversi kompiti ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Il-mudelli lingwistiċi-agnostiċi jipprovdu mod versatili biex l-unitajiet lingwistiċi jiġu konvertiti minn lingwi differenti fi spazju ta’ rappreżentazzjoni tal-vetturi komuni. Il-ħidma rilevanti dwar l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ sentenzi multilingwi allegatament laħqet rata baxxa ta’ żball f’kompiti ta’ tiftix ta’ similarità translingwi. F’dan id-dokument, aħna applikaw il-mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni mħarrġa minn qabel u l-kompitu ta’ tfittxija ta’ similarità bejn il-lingwi f’xenarji differenti, u osservajna diskrepanza kbira fir-riżultati meta mqabbla mal-karta oriġinali. Is-sejbiet tagħna dwar it-tiftix ta’ similarità translingwi ma’ settijiet ta’ dejta multilingwi ġodda differenti juru mhux biss korrelazzjoni ma’ similaritajiet lingwistiċi osservabbli iżda wkoll influwenza qawwija minn fatturi bħal mogħdijiet ta’ traduzzjoni, li jillimitaw l-interpretazzjoni tal-proprjetà lingwistika-agnostika tal-mudell LASER. %', 'mk': 'With the emergence of pre-trained multilingual models, multilingual embeddings have been widely applied in various natural language processing tasks.  Моделите на јазик-агностика обезбедуваат широк начин да се претворат јазичните единици од различни јазици во заеднички простор за претставување на векторите. Релевантната работа на повеќејазичните вградувања на реченици, наводно, достигна ниска стапка на грешки во задачите за пребарување на меѓујазични сличности. Во овој весник, ги применуваме предобучените модели за вградување и задачата за пребарување на меѓујазични сличности во различни сценарија, и забележавме голема дискрепанција во резултатите во споредба со оригиналниот весник. Нашите откритија за прекујазичното пребарување на сличност со различни ново изградени мултијазични податоци покажуваат не само корелација со набљудливи јазични сличности, туку и силно влијание од фактори како што се трансформациските патишта, кои ја ограничуваат интерпретацијата на јазикото-агностичката сопственост на модел', 'kk': 'Алдын- ала оқылған көп тіл үлгілерінде көп тілді ендіру әртүрлі тілді өңдеу тапсырмаларында көптеген қолданылады. Тіл- агностикалық үлгілер тілдерден тіл бірліктерін ортақтастырған вектордың түріндіру бос орынға аудару үшін әртүрлі мәліметті келтіреді. Көптілік сөздерді ендіру жұмысының көптілік ұқсас іздеу тапсырмаларында қате жылдамдығы төмен болды. Бұл қағазда біз алдын- ала оқылған ендіру үлгілерін және көптеген тілді ұқсастық іздеу тапсырмасын әртүрлі сценарияларда қолданып, бастапқы қағазға салыстырып, үлкен бөлігін көрдік. Біздің тілдердің бірнеше тілдердің ұқсас іздеу үшін бірнеше жаңа құрылған көптілік деректер жиындары тек көрінетін тілдердің ұқсас қасиеттеріне қатынау емес, сондай-ақтау жолдары секілді факторлардан күшті әсер етеді. Бұл LASER моделінің тілд', 'ms': 'Dengan muncul model berbilang bahasa yang dilatih, pelbagai bahasa telah dilaksanakan secara luas dalam pelbagai tugas pemprosesan bahasa alam. Model bahasa-agnostik menyediakan cara bergerak untuk menukar unit bahasa dari bahasa berbeza ke ruang mewakili vektor terkongsi. Kerja yang berkaitan dengan penyampaian kalimat berbilang bahasa telah melaporkan telah mencapai kadar ralat rendah dalam tugas carian persamaan saling bahasa. Dalam kertas ini, kami melaksanakan model penyambungan terlatih dan tugas pencarian persamaan saling bahasa dalam skenario-skenario berbeza, dan mengamati ketidaksamaan besar dalam keputusan dalam perbandingan dengan kertas asal. Our findings on cross-lingual similarity search with different newly constructed multilingual datasets show not only correlation with observable language similarities but also strong influence from factors such as translation paths, which limits the interpretation of the language-agnostic property of the LASER model. %', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын олон хэл загваруудын тулд олон хэл загварууд нь олон байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх үйл ажиллагаанд маш их хэрэглэгдсэн. Хол-агностик загварууд өөр хэл дээр хэлний нэгжүүдийг хуваалцах векторын төсөөлөлтийн орон зай руу шилжүүлэх боломжтой арга гаргадаг. Ихэнх хэл хэлний өгүүлбэрүүдийн тухай чухал ажил нь олон хэл хэлний ижил төстэй хайлтын ажлын хувьд алдаа хугацаанд бага байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өмнө сургалтын хөгжүүлэх загваруудыг, олон хэл төстэй хайх ажил олон төрлийн хувилбаруудыг ашиглаж, эхний цаасан дээр харьцуулахад маш олон ялгааг анзаарсан. Бидний олон хэл төстэй судалгааны олон шинэ бүтээгдэхүүний олон хэл өгөгдлийн сангууд нь зөвхөн харагдах хэл төстэй харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны үр дүнг илэрхийлж чаддаг. Энэ нь LASER загвар', 'pl': 'Wraz z pojawieniem się wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli wielojęzycznych, wielojęzyczne osadzenia zostały szeroko stosowane w różnych zadaniach przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Modele agnostyczne zapewniają wszechstronny sposób konwersji jednostek językowych z różnych języków na wspólną przestrzeń reprezentacji wektorowej. Podobno odpowiednie prace nad osadzaniem zdań wielojęzycznych osiągnęły niski wskaźnik błędów w zadaniach wyszukiwania podobieństwa wielojęzycznego. W niniejszym artykule stosujemy wstępnie przeszkolone modele osadzania i zadanie wyszukiwania podobieństwa między językami w różnych scenariuszach i zaobserwowano duże rozbieżności w wynikach w porównaniu z oryginalnym artykułem. Nasze ustalenia dotyczące poszukiwania podobieństwa między językami z różnymi nowo skonstruowanymi wielojęzycznymi zbiorami danych pokazują nie tylko korelację z obserwowalnymi podobieństwami językowymi, ale także silny wpływ czynników takich jak ścieżki tłumaczeniowe, które ograniczają interpretację właściwości językowo-agnostycznej modelu LASER.%', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාවික විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණා ව භාෂාව- agnoistic මොඩේල් වෙනස් භාෂාවෙන් වෙනස් භාෂාවෙන් භාෂාවෙන් භාෂාවික වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිශ් ගොඩක් භාෂාවික වාක්ය සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ වැඩය විදියට වාර්තාවෙන් විදියට වාර්තාවෙන් විදියට ව මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සොයාගන්න විවිධ සිද්ධ සිද්ධ වැඩ අපේ හොයාගැනීම් විවිධ භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සොයාගැනීමේ විවිධ අලුත් භාෂාවක් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධතාවක් නෙවෙයි පරික්ෂා භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් ස', 'no': 'Med utviklinga av fleirspråk- modeller har fleirspråk innbygging brukt i ulike naturspråk- handsamingsoppgåver. Språk- agnostiske modeller gjev ein versatibelt måte å konvertera lingviske einingar frå ulike språk til eit delt vektorrepresentasjonsmessig. Det relevante arbeidet på innbygging av fleirspråk setningar har rapportert nådd låg feilrate i søkjeoppgåver med fleirspråk. I denne papiret bruker vi den først trengte innbyggingsmodellen og søkjeoppgåva for krysspråk liknande på ulike scenarior, og observerte store forskjellighet i resultatet i sammenligning med den opprinnelige papiren. Finningane våre på krysspråkssøk med ulike nykonstruerte fleirspråkslager viser ikkje berre korrelasjon med observarbare språkssimilaritet, men også sterk påvirkning frå faktorene som omsetjingstigar, som grenser tolkinga av språk-agnostiske eigenskapen til LASER-modellen. %', 'ro': 'Odată cu apariția unor modele multilingve pre-instruite, încorporările multilingve au fost aplicate pe scară largă în diverse sarcini de procesare a limbilor naturale. Modelele lingvistice agnostice oferă o modalitate versatilă de a converti unitățile lingvistice din diferite limbi într-un spațiu comun de reprezentare vectorială. Lucrările relevante privind încorporarea frazelor multilingve au ajuns la o rată scăzută de eroare în sarcinile de căutare a similitudinii între limbi. În această lucrare, aplicăm modelele de încorporare pre-instruite și sarcina de căutare a similitudinii în diverse scenarii și am observat discrepanțe mari în rezultate în comparație cu lucrarea originală. Rezultatele noastre privind căutarea similarității interlingve cu diferite seturi de date multilingve nou construite arată nu numai corelația cu similaritățile lingvistice observabile, ci și influența puternică a factorilor precum traseele de traducere, ceea ce limitează interpretarea proprietății lingvistice a modelului LASER.%', 'sr': 'S obzirom na izazov predobučenih multijezičkih modela, većina jezičkih integracija je široko primjenjena u različitim prirodnim zadacima obrade jezika. Jezik-agnostički modeli pružaju versatilni naèin da preobratimo jezičke jedinice iz različitih jezika u prostor za predstavljanje vektora. Odgovarajući rad o integraciji multijezičkih rečenica, navodno, postigao je nisku stopu greške u zadatkima pretraživanja međujezičkih sličnosti. U ovom papiru, primjenjujemo predobučene ugrađene modele i zadatak pretraživanja preko jezika sličnosti u raznim scenarijama, i posmatramo veliku diskreciju u rezultatima usporedbe s originalnim papirom. Naši nalazi o pretraživanju međujezičkih sličnosti sa različitim novim konstruiranim multijezičkim podacima pokazuju ne samo korelaciju sa sličnostima na primedbi jezika, već i jakim uticajem od faktora kao što su putevi prevođenja, koji ograničava interpretaciju jezika-agnostičke imovine modela LASER. %', 'so': 'Markii ay soo baxdo samooyin luuqado kala duduwan oo horay loo tababaray, waxaa lagu codsaday goobaha baaritaanka luuqadaha kala duduwan oo kala duduwan. Tusaalada afka-agnostika waxaad ka heleysaa qaab kala duduwan in laga beddelo noocyada luuqadaha luuqadaha oo kala duduwan, si loo beddelo goob qeyb ah oo qeyb ka dhiga vector. Shaqo la xiriira ku saabsan qeybaha luuqadaha kala duduwan waxay gaadhay heer khalad ah oo ku saabsan shaqooyinka raadinta luuqadaha oo isku mid ah. In this paper, we apply the pre-trained embedding models and the cross-lingual similarity search task in diverse scenarios, and observed large discrepancy in results in comparison to the original paper.  Shaqooyinkayada ku saabsan baaritaanka luuqadaha kala duwan ee cusub ee la dhisay macluumaad luuqadaha kala duduwan waxay muuqataa xiriir la xiriira luuqadaha la arki karo oo kaliya, laakiin waxaa kaloo saameyn u leh saameyn ka mid ah tusaale ahaan wadooyinka turjumaanka, kaas oo xadidan fasirka hantida luqada-agnostic ee modelka LASER.%', 'ur': 'پہلے تعلیم کی بہت سی زبان کی موڈل کی اضطراری کے ساتھ، بہت سی زبان انڈینگ مختلف طبیعی زبان پردازی کے کاموں میں پھیرے گئے ہیں۔ Language-agnostic models provide a versatile way to convert linguistic units from different languages to a shared vector representation space. بہت سی زبان ویڈینگ کے مطابق اپنا معاملہ کاروبار کرسی زبان ویڈینٹی جستجو کے کاموں میں کم خطا رے تک پہنچ گیا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلے تدریس کیے ہوئے انڈینگ موڈل اور مختلف سناریوں میں کروس زبان کی برابری تلاش کا کام لازم کرتے ہیں اور نتیجے میں بہت بڑی اختلاف دیکھتے ہیں اصلی کاغذ کے مقابلہ میں۔ ہمارے معلومات مختلف زبان مثالی جگہ کے بارے میں مختلف نئی مثالی زبان ڈاٹ سٹ کے ساتھ نہیں صرف نظر آور زبان مثالی کے ساتھ تعلق کرتی ہیں بلکہ اس کے ساتھ بھی مضبوط تغییر کے مطابق فاکتوروں سے بھی مضبوط تغییر کرتی ہے جو LASER موڈل کی زبان-agnostic ویژ', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட பல மொழி மாதிரிகளின் வெளியேறும் பொழுது, பல மொழிக்குறிப்புகள் வித்தியாசமான இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பா மொழி- agnostic மாதிரிகள் வேறு மொழிகளிலிருந்து மொழிகளின் அலகுகளை பகிர்ந்த நெக்டர் பிரிவின் இடத்தில் மாற்ற முடியும் ஒரு  The relevant work on multilingual sentence embeddings has reportedly reached low error rate in cross-lingual similarity search tasks.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் கிரும்ப மொழியின் ஒத்திசையான தேடும் செயலை பல காட்சிகளில்  மொழி போன்ற தேடுதலின் கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் மற்றும் புதிய பல மொழி தகவல் அமைப்பு', 'sv': 'I och med uppkomsten av förutbildade flerspråkiga modeller har flerspråkiga inbäddningar använts i stor utsträckning i olika naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter. Språkagnostiska modeller ger ett mångsidigt sätt att konvertera språkliga enheter från olika språk till ett gemensamt vektorrepresentationsutrymme. Det relevanta arbetet med flerspråkiga meningsinbäddningar har enligt uppgift nått låg felfrekvens i flerspråkiga liknande sökuppgifter. I den här uppsatsen tillämpar vi de färdigutbildade inbäddningsmodellerna och den tvärspråkiga likhetssökningsuppgiften i olika scenarier, och observerade stora skillnader i resultat jämfört med originaluppsatsen. Våra resultat på korsspråklig liknelsessökning med olika nyskapade flerspråkiga datauppsättningar visar inte bara korrelation med observerbara språklikheter utan också starkt inflytande från faktorer som översättningsvägar, vilket begränsar tolkningen av LASER-modellens språkagnostiska egenskaper.%', 'uz': "Ko'rib o'rganilgan multili modellardan foydalanishda, har xil tilda ko'pchilik qismlari boshqa tilni boshqarish vazifalarda ko'plab qo'llangan. Til- agnostik modellari turli tillardan tillardan bir xil tillardan bogʻliq vektor representation фазiga aylantirish uchun versatik usuli. Name Bu qogʻozda, biz birinchi taʼminlov qilingan modellarni va har xil tildagi bir xil qidirish vazifalarini qo'llashmiz, va asl qogʻozga kamaytirish natijalarini ko'rib turamiz. @ info: status", 'vi': 'Với sự xuất hiện của các mô- đun đa dạng được đào tạo trước, sự gia nhập đa dạng đã được áp dụng rộng rãi trong các công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Các một bị biết ngôn ngữ đã cung cấp một cách đáng sẵn để biến mất các đơn vị ngôn ngữ từ cách khác để thành một không gian biển biểu động Theo báo cáo thì công việc liên quan đến việc ghép câu đa dạng đã đạt tới tỉ lệ lỗi trong các công việc tìm kiếm chung ngôn ngữ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi áp dụng các mô hình ghép được đào tạo và công việc tìm kiếm nét chung ngôn ngữ khác nhau trong các tình huống khác nhau, và thấy sự khác biệt lớn trong kết quả so với tờ giấy gốc. Những phát hiện của chúng tôi về việc tìm kiếm nét chung ngôn ngữ với các tập tin đa dạng mới xây dựng khác nhau không chỉ cho thấy sự tương quan với ngôn ngữ có thể quan sát, mà còn ảnh hưởng mạnh từ các yếu tố như đường dẫn dịch, hạn chế sự hiểu biết của tài sản ngôn ngữ học của mô hình LAERR.', 'nl': "Met de opkomst van voorgetrainde meertalige modellen, meertalige inbeddingen zijn op grote schaal toegepast in verschillende natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken. Taalagnostische modellen bieden een veelzijdige manier om taaleenheden uit verschillende talen om te zetten in een gedeelde vectorrepresentatieruimte. Het relevante werk aan meertalige zinsinbeddingen heeft naar verluidt een laag foutenpercentage bereikt bij zoektaken voor meertalige overeenkomsten. In dit artikel passen we de voorgetrainde inbeddingsmodellen en de cross-lingual similarity search taak toe in verschillende scenario's, en waargenomen grote discrepantie in resultaten ten opzichte van het oorspronkelijke document. Onze bevindingen over cross-lingual similarity search met verschillende nieuw geconstrueerde meertalige datasets tonen niet alleen correlatie met waarneembare taalovereenkomsten, maar ook een sterke invloed van factoren zoals vertaalpaden, die de interpretatie van de taal-agnostische eigenschap van het LASER model beperkt.%", 'bg': 'С появата на предварително обучени многоезични модели многоезичните вграждания са широко приложени в различни задачи по обработка на естествени езици. Езиково-агностичните модели осигуряват универсален начин за преобразуване на езикови единици от различни езици в споделено векторно пространство за представяне. Съответната работа по вграждането на многоезични изречения е достигнала нисък процент грешки при задачите за търсене на междуезични сходства. В тази статия прилагаме предварително обучените модели за вграждане и задачата за търсене на междуезични сходства в различни сценарии и наблюдаваме голямо несъответствие в резултатите в сравнение с оригиналната статия. Нашите открития за търсене на междуезична сходство с различни новопостроени многоезични набори от данни показват не само корелация с наблюдавани езикови сходства, но и силно влияние на фактори като преводните пътища, което ограничава интерпретацията на езиково-агностичното свойство на модела.', 'hr': 'S obzirom na izazov predobučenih multijezičkih modela, višejezičkih integracija se široko primjenjivala u različitim zadacima prirodnog obradivanja jezika. Jezik-agnostički modeli pružaju versatilni način da se lingvističke jedinice preobraćaju iz različitih jezika u dijeljeno prostor predstavljanja vektora. Odgovarajući rad o integraciji multijezičkih rečenica, navodno, postigao je nisku stopu greške u zadatkima pretraživanja međujezičkih sličnosti. U ovom papiru primjenjujemo predobučene ugrađene modele i zadatak pretraživanja međujezičkih sličnosti u različitim scenarijama i promatramo veliku nesporaznost u rezultatima usporedbe s originalnim papirom. Naši nalazi o pretraživanju međujezičkih sličnosti s različitim novim konstruiranim multijezičkim podacima pokazuju ne samo korelaciju sa sličnostima praćenih jezika, već i jakim utjecajem od faktora poput prevodnih puteva, koji ograničava interpretaciju jezičkog agnostičkog vlasništva modela LASER. %', 'da': 'Med fremkomsten af forududdannede flersprogede modeller er flersprogede indlejringer blevet anvendt i vid udstrækning i forskellige opgaver til behandling af natursprog. Sprog-agnostiske modeller giver en alsidig måde at konvertere sproglige enheder fra forskellige sprog til et fælles vektorrepræsentationsrum. Det relevante arbejde med flersprogede sætningsindlejringer har angiveligt nået lav fejlfrekvens i tværsprogede lighedssøgeopgaver. I denne artikel anvender vi de prætrænede embedding modeller og den tværsprogede lighedssøgeopgave i forskellige scenarier, og observerede store uoverensstemmelser i resultater i forhold til det oprindelige papir. Vores resultater af tværsproget lighedssøgning med forskellige nyopbyggede flersprogede datasæt viser ikke kun korrelation med observerbare sprogligheder, men også stærk indflydelse fra faktorer som oversættelsesveje, som begrænser fortolkningen af LASER-modellens sprogagnostiske egenskab.%', 'de': 'Mit dem Aufkommen von vortrainierten mehrsprachigen Modellen wurden mehrsprachige Einbettungen in verschiedenen natürlichen Sprachverarbeitungsaufgaben weit verbreitet angewendet. Sprachagnostische Modelle bieten eine vielseitige Möglichkeit, linguistische Einheiten aus verschiedenen Sprachen in einen gemeinsamen Vektor-Darstellungsraum umzuwandeln. Die einschlägigen Arbeiten zu mehrsprachigen Satzbedlungen haben Berichten zufolge eine niedrige Fehlerquote bei crosslingualen Ähnlichkeitssuchaufgaben erreicht. In diesem Beitrag wenden wir die vortrainierten Einbettungsmodelle und die sprachübergreifende Ähnlichkeitssuche in verschiedenen Szenarien an und beobachten große Diskrepanzen in den Ergebnissen im Vergleich zum Originalpapier. Unsere Ergebnisse zur sprachübergreifenden Ähnlichkeitssuche mit verschiedenen neu konstruierten mehrsprachigen Datensätzen zeigen nicht nur Korrelationen mit beobachtbaren sprachlichen Ähnlichkeiten, sondern auch starken Einfluss von Faktoren wie Übersetzungspfaden, was die Interpretation der sprachagnostischen Eigenschaft des LASER-Modells einschränkt.%', 'id': 'Dengan muncul model berbagai bahasa yang terlatih sebelumnya, pembangunan berbagai bahasa telah diterapkan secara luas dalam berbagai tugas proses bahasa alam. Model bahasa-agnostik menyediakan cara berbeda untuk mengubah unit bahasa dari bahasa berbeda ke ruang representation vektor berbagi. Pekerjaan yang relevan pada pembangunan kalimat berbilang bahasa telah dilaporkan mencapai tingkat kesalahan rendah dalam tugas pencarian persamaan saling bahasa. Dalam kertas ini, kami menerapkan model embedding yang dilatih-dilatih dan tugas pencarian persamaan saling bahasa dalam berbagai skenario, dan mengamati perbedaan besar dalam hasil dibandingkan dengan kertas asli. Penemuan kami dalam pencarian persamaan saling bahasa dengan set data berbagai bahasa yang baru dibuat berbeda menunjukkan tidak hanya korelasi dengan persamaan bahasa yang dapat diperhatikan tetapi juga pengaruh kuat dari faktor seperti jalur terjemahan, yang membatasi interpretasi properti bahasa-agnostik model LASER. %', 'ko': '미리 훈련된 다언어 모델이 등장함에 따라 다언어 삽입은 각종 자연 언어 처리 임무에 광범위하게 응용되었다.언어 불가지 모델은 서로 다른 언어의 언어 단위를 공유 벡터로 바꾸어 공간을 나타내는 통용적인 방법을 제공한다.보도에 따르면 다중 언어 유사성 검색 작업에서 다중 언어 문장에 삽입된 관련 작업은 이미 비교적 낮은 오류율에 이르렀다고 한다.본고에서 우리는 미리 훈련된 삽입 모델과 다중 언어 유사성 검색 임무를 서로 다른 장면에 응용하고 그 결과가 원시 논문에 비해 큰 차이가 있음을 관찰할 것이다.우리가 서로 다른 새로 구축된 다중 언어 데이터 집합에 대해 다중 언어 유사성 검색을 실시한 결과 관찰할 수 있는 언어 유사성과 관련이 있을 뿐만 아니라 번역 경로 등 요소의 강렬한 영향을 받아 레이저 모델 언어의 불가지성에 대한 해석을 제한했다.', 'fa': 'با اضطراری از مدل\u200cهای چند زبان پیش آموزش داده شده، انجمن\u200cهای زیادی زبان در کار\u200cهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی مختلف عملکرد می\u200cشوند. مدل\u200cهای زبان-agnostic یک راه متفاوتی برای تبدیل کردن واحدهای زبان\u200cشناسی از زبان\u200cهای متفاوت به فضای نمایش ویکتور مشترک می\u200cدهد. کاری مربوط به جمله\u200cهای زیادی زبان گزارش می\u200cشود که در دنبال\u200cهای جستجوی شبیه\u200cهای زیادی خطای کم رسیده است. در این کاغذ، ما مدلهای پیش آموزش آموزش آموزش داده شده\u200cایم و کار جستجوی شبیه زبان\u200cهای متفاوتی را در سناریو مختلف انجام می\u200cدهیم، و اختلاف بزرگی را در نتیجه\u200cهای مقایسه با کاغذ اصلی مشاهده می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما در جستجوی شبیه\u200cسازی از زبان\u200cهای متفاوتی با مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متفاوتی جدید ساخته شده نشون می\u200cدهند نه تنها ارتباطی با شبیه\u200cسازی زبان\u200cهای مشاهده\u200cای بلکه تاثیر قوی از faktورهای مانند مسیرهای ترجمه\u200cسازی، که تعبیر ویژه\u200cهای زبان-agnostic مدل LASE', 'sw': 'Kutokana na kuongezeka kwa mifano mingi ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla, viungo vya lugha vingi vimetumiwa vizuri katika kazi mbalimbali za utaratibu wa lugha za asili. Mradi wa lugha-agnostic huweka njia tofauti ya kubadilisha vitengo vya lugha kutoka lugha tofauti katika nafasi ya uwakilishaji vector. The relevant work on multilingual sentence embeddings has reportedly reached low error rate in cross-lingual similarity search tasks.  Katika gazeti hili, tunatumia mifano ya vifaa vilivyojifunza kabla na kazi za kutafuta katika lugha tofauti katika mitazamo mbalimbali, na kuona ubaguzi mkubwa na matokeo yanayolinganisha na makaratasi ya asili. Matokeo yetu kuhusu kutafuta usawa wa lugha tofauti na seti mpya zilizojengwa kwa lugha za lugha zinaonyesha uhusiano pekee na usawa wa lugha zinazoonekana lakini pia ushawishi mkubwa kutoka kwa sababu kama vile njia za kutafsiri, ambazo zinazuia tafsiri ya utafsiri wa mali ya lugha-agnostic ya model ya LASER.%', 'af': "Met die uitbreiding van vooraf-onderwerp multitaalse modele, het multitaalse inbêdings in verskillende natuurlike taal-verwerking opdragte uitgewend. Taal- agnostiese modelles verskaf 'n verskillende manier om lingvisiese eenhede van verskillende tale te omskakel na 'n gedeelde vektorvoorstelling spasie. Die relevante werk op multitaalse setinge inbêring het verkondig die lae fout rate in kruistale gelykenis soektog opdragte bereik. In hierdie papier, ons toewend die vooraf-onderwerpende inbetering modele en die kruistale gelykenis soektog taak in verskillende scenarios, en ons het groot verskilligheid aangesien in resultate in vergelyking met die oorspronklike papier. Ons gevinde op kruistale gelykenis soek met verskillende nuwe konstrukteerde multitaalse datastelle vertoon nie slegs korrelasie met aansigbare taal gelykenisse nie, maar ook sterk influens van faktore soos vertaling paaie, wat beperk die uitlegging van die taal- agnostiese eienskap van die LASER model. %", 'tr': 'Öň-öňünden bilim sistemasy örän bilim nusgalarynyň döredilmesi bilen, birnäçe tiller tebigy dillerde işleýän işlerinde köp diller ulanyldyr. Diller agnostik modelleri farklı dillerden lingwistiki bir vektör represije alanına çevirilmek üçin kuwsatly bir şekilde temin ediyor. Birnäçe dilli sözler içinde möhüm eserler ýaly çykyş dillerde ahtaryş täzelikleri ýok hasaplanýar. Bu kagyzda, öňünden öňünden bilim taýýarlanan nusgalary we çaslaşdyrylyk meňzeş senarylarda gözleýän nusgalary uygulapdyk we başlangyç kagytlara görä uly täsirleýänligi gözledik. Biziň tapylşymyz görä dillerden meňzeş görä meňzeş ýagdaýa hasaplanýan çoxly diller bilen diňe göz görülen diller meňzeşlikleri bilen täsirli däl, terjime yollarynyň ýaly faktorlardan güýçli täsiri görkeýär. Bu LASER nusgynyň dili agnostik hasaplanyň terjimesini çykarýar. %', 'sq': 'Me shfaqjen e modeleve shumëgjuhësore të paratrajnuar, përfshirjet shumëgjuhësore janë aplikuar gjerësisht në detyra të ndryshme të procesimit natyror të gjuhës. Modelet gjuhë-agnostike ofrojnë një mënyrë versatile për të konvertuar njësitë gjuhësore nga gjuhë të ndryshme në një hapësirë të përbashkët përfaqësimi vektor. Puna e rëndësishme mbi përfshirjen e fjalëve shumëgjuhëse thuhet se ka arritur normën e ulët të gabimeve në detyrat e kërkimit të ngjashmërisë ndërgjuhësore. Në këtë letër, ne aplikojmë modelet e paratrajnuara të përfshirjes dhe detyrën e kërkimit të ngjashmërisë ndërgjuhësore në skenarë të ndryshme dhe vëzhguam mospërputhje të madhe në rezultatet në krahasim me letrën origjinale. Gjetjet tona mbi kërkimin e ngjashmërisë ndërgjuhësore me të dhëna të ndryshme të ndërtuara sapo më parë shumëgjuhësore tregojnë jo vetëm korrelacion me ngjashmëritë e vëzhgueshme gjuhësh, por gjithashtu ndikim të fortë nga faktorë të tillë si rrugët e përkthimit, që kufizojnë interpretimin e pronës gjuhë-agnostike të modelit LASER. %', 'am': 'የቀድሞው የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች በተለየ ውጤት፣ ብዙ ቋንቋዎች በሥልጣዊ ቋንቋ ተሟጋቾች ላይ በተለየ ስራ ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡ ቋንቋ-አጎናስቲክ ዓይነቶች የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎችን ከልዩ ቋንቋዎች ወደተካፈለ vector መልዕክት ለመለወጥ የሚተካክሉ መንገድን የሚያደርጉ ናቸው፡፡ በተለያዩ ቋንቋ በተለያዩ ልዩ ቋንቋዎች ላይ የተጠቃሚ ሥራ የስህተት ቁጥር በመስመር ስራቶች ውስጥ ጥቂት ደርሶአል፡፡ In this paper, we apply the pre-trained embedding models and the cross-lingual similarity search task in diverse scenarios, and observed large discrepancy in results in comparison to the original paper.  የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች በተለያዩ ልዩ ቋንቋዎች ዳታዎችን በመፍጠር ላይ ግንኙነታችንን በአዲስ ቋንቋ ላይ በተለየ ቋንቋ ማተሚያ ብቻ አይደለም ነገር ግን እንደትርጓም መንገዶች፣ ይህም የLASER model ቋንቋ-agnostic የግንኙነት መተርጓሜን ይግለጽበታል፡፡', 'hy': 'Երբ նախապատրաստված բազմալեզու մոդելներ են առաջացել, բազմալեզու ներդրումները լայնորեն կիրառվել են տարբեր բնական լեզուների վերամշակման խնդիրներում: Լեզու-ագնոստիկ մոդելները տարբեր լեզուներից լեզվական միավորների փոխակերպելու տարբեր տարածքներ են տրամադրում: Բազլեզու նախադասությունների ներդրման հարաբեր աշխատանքը, ըստ հայտարարության, հասել է ցածր սխալների արագությանը երկլեզու նմանության որոնման խնդիրներում: In this paper, we apply the pre-trained embedding models and the cross-lingual similarity search task in diverse scenarios, and observed large discrepancy in results in comparison to the original paper.  Մեր հայտնաբերությունները լեզվային նմանության որոնման միջև տարբեր նոր կառուցված բազլեզու տվյալների համակարգերի հետ ցույց են տալիս ոչ միայն կապվածությունը լեզվային նմանությունների հետ, այլ նաև ուժեղ ազդեցություն այնպիսի գործոնների վրա, ինչպիսիք են թարգմանման ճանապարհները, որոնք սահմանափակում են LASER մոդե', 'bn': 'পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত বহুভাষার মডেলের উৎপাদনের পর, বিভিন্ন প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজে বহুভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষার প্রক ভাষা-অ্যাগনোস্টিক মডেল বিভিন্ন ভাষা থেকে ভাষার ভাষায় ভাষার ইউনিট পরিবর্তন করার একটি ভেক্টর প্রতিনিধিত্বের স্থানে  সংবাদ প্রদান করা হয়েছে যে মাল্টিভাষায় বাক্যের প্রসঙ্গ কাজ করা হয়েছে সংবাদ প্রদান করা হয়েছে যে সমস্ত ভাষায় একই ধরনের অনুসন্ধ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত এমডেডিং মডেল এবং ক্রস-ভাষায় অনুসন্ধানের কাজের প্রয়োগ করি বিভিন্ন দৃশ্যের মধ্যে অনুসন্ধানের কাজ এবং মূল কাগজের নতুন ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষার তথ্য সংক্রান্ত অনুসন্ধানে আমাদের খুঁজে পাওয়া সমাধান শুধুমাত্র দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিত ভাষার সমতুল্যের সাথে সম্পর্ক নয়, কিন্তু অনুবাদ পাথের মতো অনুবাদে', 'az': 'Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş çoxlu dil modellərin təsiri ilə, çoxlu dil inbingləri müxtəlif təbiətli dil işləməsi işlərində çoxlu istifadə edilmişdir. Dil-agnostik modelləri fərqli dillərdən dil ünvanlarını paylaşıb vektör göstəricisi alanına çevirmək üçün müxtəlif bir yol sağlar. Çoxlu dilli cümlələr içərisində olan məhz işləri çoxlu dillərlə bənzər arama işlərində düşük xəta hüquqlarına çatdı. Bu kağızda, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş in şa modelləri və çoxlu dillərlə bənzərlik arama işlərini müxtəlif senaryolarda uygulayıq və başlangıç kağızlara qarşı böyük müxtəlif növbələri görürdük. Bizim çətinliklərimiz yeni inşa edilmiş çoxlu dil verilənləri araştırmaq barəsində yalnız görünür dillərin similaritələri ilə birlikdə deyil, lakin həmçinin çeviriş yolları kimi faktörlərdən də güclü təsir edir. Bu, LASER modelinin dillərin agnostik özelliğinin yorumlarını qurtara bilər. %', 'ca': "With the emergence of pre-trained multilingual models, multilingual embeddings have been widely applied in various natural language processing tasks.  Els models lingüístics-agnòstics proporcionen una manera versàtil de convertir unitats lingüístices de diferents llengües en un espai compartit de representació de vectors. La feina pertinenten l'incorporació de frases multilingües ha arribat a una baixa tasa d'errors en tasques de cerca de similitud translingües. En aquest paper, aplicam els models d'incorporació pré-entrenats i la tasca de cerca de similitud translingüística en diversos escenaris, i observem grans discrepancies en els resultats en comparació amb el paper original. Els nostres descobriments sobre la cerca de similitud translingüística amb diferents conjunts de dades multilingües recentment construïts mostran no només correlació amb similituds observables de llenguatge, sinó també forta influència de factors com el camí de traducció, que limita l'interpretació de la propietat lingüística-agnòstica del model LASER. %", 'cs': 'Se vznikem předškolených vícejazyčných modelů byly vícejazyčné vložení široce aplikovány v různých úkolech zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Jazykově-agnostické modely poskytují univerzální způsob, jak převést jazykové jednotky z různých jazyků do sdíleného vektorového reprezentačního prostoru. Příslušná práce na vícejazyčném vkládání vět údajně dosáhla nízké míry chyb v úlohách vyhledávání podobnosti mezi jazyky. V tomto článku aplikujeme předškolené modely vkládání a úlohu vyhledávání podobnosti v různých scénářích a pozorovali jsme ve výsledcích velké nesrovnalosti oproti původnímu článku. Naše zjištění o hledání podobnosti mezi jazyky s různými nově sestavenými mnohojazyčnými daty ukazují nejen korelaci s pozorovatelnými jazykovými podobnostmi, ale také silný vliv faktorů, jako jsou překladové cesty, které omezují interpretaci jazykově-agnostické vlastnosti modelu LASER.%', 'bs': 'S obzirom na izazov predobučenih multijezičkih modela, višejezičkih integracija se široko primjenjivala u različitim zadacima prirodnog obradivanja jezika. Jezik-agnostički modeli pružaju versatilni način da se lingvističke jedinice preobraćaju iz različitih jezika u prostor predstavljanja zajedničkog vektora. Odgovarajući rad o integraciji multijezičkih rečenica, navodno, postigao je nisku stopu greške u zadatkima pretraživanja međujezičkih sličnosti. U ovom papiru primjenjujemo predobučene ugrađene modele i zadatak pretraživanja međujezičkih sličnosti u različitim scenarijama, i posmatramo veliku neslaganost u rezultatima u usporedbi s originalnim papirom. Naši nalazi o pretraživanju međujezičkih sličnosti sa različitim novim konstruiranim multijezičkim podacima pokazuju ne samo korelaciju sa sličnostima jezika, već i jakim utjecajem od faktora kao što su putevi prevođenja, koji ograničava interpretaciju jezičkog agnostičkog vlasništva modela LASER. %', 'et': 'Eelkoolitud mitmekeelsete mudelite tekkimisel on mitmekeelseid manustamisi laialdaselt rakendatud erinevates looduskeelte töötlemise ülesannetes. Keeleagnostilised mudelid pakuvad mitmekülgset võimalust teisendada erinevate keelte keeleüksused ühiseks vektorikujundusruumiks. Mitmekeelsete lausete manustamisega seotud asjakohane töö on väidetavalt jõudnud madalale veamäärale keeleülese sarnasuse otsingute puhul. Käesolevas töös rakendame eelnevalt koolitatud manustamismudeleid ja keeleülest sarnasuse otsingu ülesannet erinevates stsenaariumides ning täheldame, et tulemused erinevad võrreldes algse tööga. Meie tulemused erinevate hiljuti ehitatud mitmekeelsete andmekogumite keeleülese sarnasuse otsingu kohta näitavad mitte ainult seost jälgitavate keeleliste sarnasustega, vaid ka tugevat mõju sellistele teguritele nagu tõlketeed, mis piiravad LASER-mudeli keelelise agnostilise omaduse tõlgendamist.%', 'fi': 'Esikoulutettujen monikielisten mallien myötä monikielisiä upotuksia on sovellettu laajasti erilaisissa luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävissä. Kieliagnostiset mallit tarjoavat monipuolisen tavan muuntaa eri kielten kielelliset yksiköt yhteiseksi vektoriesitystilaksi. Monikielisiä lauseiden upotuksia koskevassa työssä on raportoitu saavuttaneen alhaisen virhetason monikielisissä samankaltaisuushakutehtävissä. Tässä työssä sovellamme esikoulutettuja upotusmalleja ja kielienvälistä samankaltaisuushakua erilaisissa skenaarioissa ja havaitsimme suuria eroja tuloksissa verrattuna alkuperäiseen artikkeliin. Tuloksemme monikielisestä samankaltaisuushausta eri monikielisten aineistojen kanssa osoittavat korrelaation havaittavissa olevien kielisamankaltaisuuksien lisäksi myös vahvan vaikutuksen tekijöillä, kuten käännösreiteillä, mikä rajoittaa LASER-mallin kieliagnostisen ominaisuuden tulkintaa.%', 'ha': 'With the emergence of pre-trained multilingual models, multilingual embeddings have been widely applied in various natural language processing tasks.  Motolin-agnostic na samar da wata hanya mai motsa wa ka motsa sunayen linguistic daga harshen daban-daban zuwa wani filin mai nuna shiryarwa. @ info: whatsthis Ga wannan takardan, Munã amfani da misãlai masu yin shirin da aka yi wa zaman-tunkuɗawa da kuma aikin search na masu daidaita lugha a cikin masu motsi dabam-daban, kuma munã ganin buƙata mai girma matsayin ta sami da takardar farko. @ info: status', 'sk': 'Z nastankom vnaprej usposobljenih večjezičnih modelov so se večjezične vdelave široko uporabljale pri različnih nalogah obdelave naravnega jezika. Jezikovno-agnostični modeli zagotavljajo vsestranski način pretvorbe jezikovnih enot iz različnih jezikov v skupni vektorski predstavitveni prostor. Pri ustreznem delu na področju večjezičnih vdelav stavkov naj bi doseglo nizko stopnjo napak pri opravilih iskanja podobnosti med jeziki. V tem prispevku smo uporabili vnaprej usposobljene modele vgradnje in nalogo iskanja medjezične podobnosti v različnih scenarijih ter opazili veliko razliko v rezultatih v primerjavi z originalnim prispevkom. Naše ugotovitve o medjezičnem iskanju podobnosti z različnimi novozgrajenimi večjezičnimi nabori podatkov ne kažejo le korelacije z opaznimi jezikovnimi podobnostmi, temveč tudi močan vpliv dejavnikov, kot so prevajalske poti, kar omejuje interpretacijo jezikovno-agnostične lastnosti modela LASER.%', 'he': 'עם התפתחות של דוגמנים רבות שפות מאומנים מראש, תוכניות רבות שפות הופעו באופן רחב במשימות עיבוד שפות טבעיות שונות. דוגמנים שפתיים-אגנוסטיים מספקים דרך רבה להפוך יחידות שפתיים משונות לשפה שונה לחלל מייצג ווקטורים משותף. העבודה הרלוונטית על תוספות משפטים רבות שפויות הגיעה לקצב שגיאות נמוך במשימות חיפוש בדומות. בעיתון הזה, אנו משתמשים בדוגמנים של קישום מאומנים מראש ומשימת החיפוש של דמיון דרך שפתיים בתסריטים מגוונים, והצפינו בהפרעה גדולה בתוצאות בהשוואה לעיתון המקורי. הממצאים שלנו על חיפוש דמיון בין שפות עם קבוצות נתונים רבות שפות חדשות שונות מראים לא רק תקשורת עם דמיונים שפות נצפים, אלא גם השפעה חזקה מגורמים כמו דרכים תרגום, שמגבלים את הפרשנות של רכוש האגנוסטי שפות של מודל LASER. %', 'jv': 'Ing nganggo akeh akeh model sing sampeyan luwih dumateng, akeh multilanggar sampeyan nguasar tentang ing sakjane ing sakjane winih. Name Attribute Nang kuwi iki, kita aplikasi model sing wis rak cara-cara ngon sampek bantuan karo perusahaan langkung sampek karo akeh lansangan sampek karo akeh seneng gawe, lan padha biasane sampek luwih apik lan padha sampek sing wis ana FindOK', 'bo': 'སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་དཔེ་གཞུང་དང་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཡིག སྐད སྐད་རིགས་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་ཆོག་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བྱ་རིམ་ནང་དུ་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བྱུང་བ་མང་ཙམ་འབྱུང་བ་ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པའི་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་དང་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ཆ་མཐུན་པ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་འཚོལ་བཤེར་གྱི་བྱ་བ་སྣ་ཚོར་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་ Our findings on cross-lingual similarity search with different newly constructed multilingual datasets show not only correlation with observable language similarities but also strong influence from factors such as translation paths, which limits the interpretation of the language-agnostic property of the LASER model. %'}
{'en': 'Towards an Etymological Map of Romanian', 'ar': 'نحو خريطة أصلانية للرومانية', 'es': 'Hacia un mapa etimológico del rumano', 'pt': 'Rumo a um mapa etimológico do romeno', 'fr': 'Vers une carte étymologique du roumain', 'ru': 'На пути к этимологической карте румынского языка', 'ja': 'ルーマニア語の語彙地図に向けて', 'hi': 'रोमानियाई के एक व्युत्पत्ति मानचित्र की ओर', 'zh': '迈向罗马尼亚语词源地图', 'ga': 'I dTreo Léarscáil Fhíoreolaíochta na Rómáine', 'el': 'Προς έναν Ετυμολογικό Χάρτη της Ρουμανίας', 'hu': 'A román etimológiai térkép felé', 'ka': 'რომენეთის ეტემოლოგიური კაპტაზე', 'it': 'Verso una mappa etimologica della Romania', 'kk': 'Румынша етимологиялық картасына қарсы', 'lt': 'Rumunijos etimologinio žemėlapio link', 'ml': 'റൊമാനിയയുടെ എറ്റിമോളജിക്കല്\u200d മാപ്പിലേക്കു്', 'mt': 'Lejn Mapa Etimoloġika tar-Rumen', 'no': 'Til ein Etimologisk kart av rumensk', 'mn': 'Румыны Etymological Map руу', 'pl': 'W kierunku etymologicznej mapy rumuńskiej', 'ms': 'Menuju Peta Etymologi Rumania', 'mk': 'За етимологичка карта на романците', 'ro': 'Către o hartă etimologică a româniei', 'so': 'Towards an Etymological Map of Romanian', 'sr': 'ka Etimologičkoj mapi rumunskog', 'sv': 'Mot en etimologisk karta över rumänska', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'رومین کی Etymological Map کی طرف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tới một bản đồ Etymological của Rumani', 'nl': 'Naar een etymologische kaart van Roemeens', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu einer etymologischen Karte des Rumänischen', 'bg': 'Към етимологична карта на румънския език', 'da': 'På vej mod et etymologisk kort over rumænsk', 'hr': 'ka Etimologičkoj mapi rumunskog', 'id': 'Towards an Etymological Map of Romanian', 'fa': 'به سمت نقشه اتمولوژیک رومانی', 'tr': 'Etymologik Mapi(Etymological Map of Romanian)', 'ko': '루마니아어의 어원도', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mpaka Ramani ya Kiethiolojia ya Romania', 'am': 'የሮማኒያን የኢትዮሎጂ ካርታ ላይ', 'sq': 'Për një hartë etimologjike rumune', 'az': 'Rumun Etimolojik HaritasńĪ t…ôr…ôfind…ô', 'hy': 'Ռոմանացի էթիմոլոգիական քարտեզի ուղղությամբ', 'bs': 'ka Etimologičkoj mapi rumunskog', 'bn': 'রোমানিয়ান একটি ইথিমোলজিক ম্যাপের উপর', 'ca': 'cap a un mapa etimològic de rumun', 'et': 'Rumeenia etümoloogilise kaardi suunas', 'fi': 'Kohti romanian etimologista karttaa', 'cs': 'K etymologické mapě rumunského jazyka', 'jv': 'Tulungan EtMethodal Map of romian', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Na poti k etimološkemu zemljevidu romunščine', 'he': 'לכיוון מפה אטימולוגית של רומנית', 'bo': 'རོ་མ་ནི་ཡིག་གི་ཨེ་མ་ལི་འགྱུར་བ་ཞིག་ཏུ་'}
{'en': 'In this paper we investigate the etymology of Romanian words. We start from the Romanian lexicon and automatically extract information from multiple etymological dictionaries. We evaluate the results and perform extensive quantitative and qualitative analyses with the goal of building an etymological map of the language.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة نتحرى أصل الكلمات الرومانية. نبدأ من المعجم الروماني ونستخرج المعلومات تلقائيًا من قواميس اشتقاقية متعددة. نقوم بتقييم النتائج وإجراء تحليلات كمية ونوعية مكثفة بهدف بناء خريطة اشتقاقية للغة.', 'es': 'En este artículo investigamos la etimología de las palabras rumanas. Partimos del léxico rumano y extraemos automáticamente información de múltiples diccionarios etimológicos. Evaluamos los resultados y realizamos análisis cuantitativos y cualitativos exhaustivos con el objetivo de construir un mapa etimológico del idioma.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo investigamos a etimologia das palavras romenas. Partimos do léxico romeno e extraímos automaticamente informações de vários dicionários etimológicos. Avaliamos os resultados e realizamos extensas análises quantitativas e qualitativas com o objetivo de construir um mapa etimológico da língua.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous étudions l'étymologie des mots roumains. Nous partons du lexique roumain et extrayons automatiquement les informations de plusieurs dictionnaires étymologiques. Nous évaluons les résultats et effectuons des analyses quantitatives et qualitatives approfondies dans le but de construire une carte étymologique de la langue.", 'ja': '本稿では、ルーマニア語の語源学について検討する。ルーマニア語の辞書から始め、複数の辞書から自動的に情報を抽出します。私たちは結果を評価し、言語のエティモロジーマップを構築することを目標に、広範な定量的および定性的分析を行います。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम रोमानियाई शब्दों की व्युत्पत्ति की जांच करते हैं। हम रोमानियाई शब्दकोश से शुरू करते हैं और स्वचालित रूप से कई व्युत्पत्ति संबंधी शब्दकोशों से जानकारी निकालते हैं। हम परिणामों का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और भाषा के व्युत्पत्ति मानचित्र के निर्माण के लक्ष्य के साथ व्यापक मात्रात्मक और गुणात्मक विश्लेषण करते हैं।', 'zh': '本文中,究罗马尼亚语单词词源。 自罗马尼亚语词典始,自取数词源词典。 论定定性分析,立言词源图。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы исследуем этимологию румынских слов. Мы начинаем с румынского лексикона и автоматически извлекаем информацию из нескольких этимологических словарей. Мы оцениваем результаты и проводим обширный количественный и качественный анализ с целью построения этимологической карты языка.', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid imscrúdú ar fhaitíos na bhfocal Rómáinis. Tosaímid ó fhoclóir na Rómáine agus bainimid eolas go huathoibríoch ó fhoclóirí iolrachasacha. Déanaimid measúnú ar na torthaí agus déanaimid anailís chainníochtúil agus cháilíochtúil fhairsing d'fhonn léarscáil eisimeolaíoch den teanga a thógáil.", 'ka': 'ამ წიგნაში ჩვენ პრომინაური სიტყვების ეტილოგიას შევხედავთ. ჩვენ რომენეთის ლექსიკონიდან დავიწყებთ და ავტომატურად ინფორმაციას რამდენიმე ეტემოლოგიური დიქსიკონიდან გამოყენებთ. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ შედეგი და გავაკეთებთ განსაზღვრებული კოლუტატიური და კვალიტატიური ანალიზების მიზეზით, რომ ენერგიის etymological map შექმნა.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban a román szavak etimológiáját vizsgáljuk. A román lexikonból indulunk, és automatikusan több etimológiai szótárból nyerünk információt. Az eredményeket értékeljük és kiterjedt mennyiségi és kvalitatív elemzéseket végzünk azzal a céllal, hogy etimológiai térképet készítsünk a nyelvről.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία ερευνούμε την ετυμολογία των ρουμανικών λέξεων. Ξεκινάμε από το ρουμανικό λεξικό και εξάγουμε αυτόματα πληροφορίες από πολλά ετυμολογικά λεξικά. Αξιολογούμε τα αποτελέσματα και διενεργούμε εκτενείς ποσοτικές και ποιοτικές αναλύσεις με στόχο τη δημιουργία ενός ετυμολογικού χάρτη της γλώσσας.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз Румындық сөздердің етмологиясын зерттеп отырмыз. Біз Румыниялық лекциондан бастап, бірнеше етмологиялық сөздіктерден мәліметті автоматты түрде тартып алдық. Нәтижелерді оқу және тілдің етмологикалық картасын құру мақсатымен көптеген санативті және квалификациялық анализ жасаймыз.', 'it': "In questo articolo indaghiamo l'etimologia delle parole rumene. Partiamo dal lessico rumeno e estraiamo automaticamente informazioni da più dizionari etimologici. Valutiamo i risultati ed eseguiamo ampie analisi quantitative e qualitative con l'obiettivo di costruire una mappa etimologica della lingua.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник ја истражуваме етимологијата на романските зборови. Почнуваме од романскиот лексикон и автоматски извлекуваме информации од повеќе етимолошки речници. Ги проценуваме резултатите и спроведуваме екстремни квантитивни и квалитетни анализи со цел да изградиме етимолошка мапа на јазикот.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d റോമാനിയന്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ എടീമോളജിയെ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d റോമാനിയന്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കോണില്\u200d നിന്ന് തുടങ്ങുന്നു. ഒരുപാട് എട്ടിമോളജിക്കല്\u200d നിഘണ്ടികളില്\u200d നിന്നും  നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുകയും വിശാലമായ പരിശോധന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഭാഷയുടെ ഒരു എറ്റിമോളജിക്കല്\u200d മാപ്', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente tiriame rumunų žodžių etimologiją. Pradedame iš Rumunijos leksikono ir automatiškai ištraukiame informaciją iš kelių etimologinių žodynų. Vertiname rezultatus ir atliekame išsamias kiekybines ir kokybines analizes siekiant sukurti etimologinį kalbos žemėlapį.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menyelidiki etimologi kata-kata Romania. Kita mula dari leksikon Romania dan secara automatik mengekstrak maklumat dari kamus etimologik berbilang. Kami menilai keputusan dan melakukan analisis kuantitatif dan kualitatif yang luas dengan tujuan untuk membina peta etimologik bahasa.', 'no': 'I denne papiret undersøker vi etymologien av rumenske ord. Vi startar frå Romansk leksikon og ekstraherer automatisk informasjon frå fleire etymologiske ordbokar. Vi evaluerer resultatene og utfører ekstra kvantitative og kvalitative analyser med målet å bygge eit etymologisk kart på språket.', 'mt': 'In this paper we investigate the etymology of Romanian words.  Aħna nibdew mill-lexicon Rumen u nieħdu awtomatikament informazzjoni minn diversi dikjararji etimoloġiċi. Aħna nivvalutaw ir-riżultati u nagħmlu analiżi kwantitattiva u kwalitattiva estensiva bil-għan li nibnu mappa etimoloġika tal-lingwa.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Румын үгнүүдийн etymology-г судалж байна. Бид Ромын хэл хэлэлцээс эхлээд олон этмологичдын өгүүлбэрээс автоматаар мэдээллийг гаргадаг. Бид үр дүнг үнэлдэг, хэлний етмологик газрын зураг бүтээх зорилгоор маш их хэмжээтэй, квалифицийн шинжилгээ хийдэг.', 'pl': 'W artykule zbadamy etymologię rumuńskich słów. Zaczynamy od słownika rumuńskiego i automatycznie wyodrębniamy informacje z wielu etymologicznych słowników. Oceniamy wyniki i przeprowadzamy obszerne analizy ilościowe i jakościowe w celu zbudowania etymologicznej mapy języka.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare investigăm etimologia cuvintelor românești. Pornim de la lexiconul românesc și extragem automat informații din mai multe dicționare etimologice. Evaluăm rezultatele și efectuăm analize cantitative și calitative extinse cu scopul de a construi o hartă etimologică a limbii.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru istražujemo etimologiju rumunskih reèi. Počinjemo od rumunskog leksikona i automatski izvlačimo informacije iz višestrukih etimologijskih diktorija. Procjenjujemo rezultate i izvršavamo ogromne kvantitativne i kvalitativne analize sa ciljem izgradnje etymologske mape jezika.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි රෝමානියාන් වචන වගේ පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. අපි රෝමානියාන් ලෙක්සිකන් වලින් පටන් ගන්නවා සහ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් තොරතුරු ගොඩක් භාෂා අපි ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා භාෂාවේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරත', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ரோமானியன் வார்த்தைகளின் இட்டிமியல் ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். நாங்கள் ரோமானியன் லெக்சிகோனிலிருந்து துவங்குகிறோம் மற்றும் தானாகவே பல்வேறு இலக்கல் அகராதிகளிலிருந் முடிவுகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் நாம் விரிவான அளவு மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட ஆராய்ச்சிகளை செய்கிறோம் மொழியின் இட்ட', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaynu baaraynaa fikradda hadallada Romaniyan. Waxaynu ka bilaabaynaa leksiga Romaniyanka, macluumaadkana waxaan ka soo saarnaa luqadaha fikradda badan. We evaluate the results and perform extensive quantitative and qualitative analyses with the goal of building an etymological map of the language.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats undersöker vi etimologin av rumänska ord. Vi utgår från det rumänska lexikonet och extraherar automatiskt information från flera etymologiska ordböcker. Vi utvärderar resultaten och utför omfattande kvantitativa och kvalitativa analyser med målet att bygga en etymologisk karta över språket.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم رومانی کلمات کی مثال کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں۔ ہم رومانی لکھائی سے شروع کرتے ہیں اور بہت سی ایٹمنولوژیک لکھائی سے اطلاعات اٹھاتے ہیں۔ ہم نتیجے کا ارزش کرتے ہیں اور زبان کی ایک ایٹمنولوژیک نقشه بنانے کے مطابق وسیع مقدار اور کیلوٹیٹی تحلیل کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa, biz Romaniya so'zlarining etymologini o'rganamiz. Biz Romaniya leksikadan boshlanamiz va bir nechta etymologik lugʻatlaridan maʼlumotni avtomatik olib tashlamiz. Biz natijalarni qiymatimiz va tilning etymologik kartasini yaratish maqsadi bilan kengaytirish va qualitativ analytikni bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi điều tra về các từ ngữ Romani. Chúng tôi khởi động từ ngôn ngữ ngôn ngữ Romania và tự động lấy thông tin từ các từ ngữ tự động. Chúng tôi đánh giá kết quả và thực hiện các phân tích về số lượng và chất lượng rộng lớn với mục đích xây dựng một bản đồ về ngôn ngữ.', 'da': 'I denne artikel undersøger vi ætymologien af rumænske ord. Vi starter fra det rumænske leksikon og automatisk udtrækker oplysninger fra flere etymologiske ordbøger. Vi evaluerer resultaterne og udfører omfattende kvantitative og kvalitative analyser med det formål at opbygge et etymologisk kort over sproget.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel onderzoeken we de etymologie van Roemeense woorden. We beginnen met het Roemeense lexicon en halen automatisch informatie uit meerdere etymologische woordenboeken. We evalueren de resultaten en voeren uitgebreide kwantitatieve en kwalitatieve analyses uit met als doel een etymologische kaart van de taal op te bouwen.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir die Etymologie rumänischer Wörter. Wir beginnen mit dem rumänischen Lexikon und extrahieren automatisch Informationen aus mehreren etymologischen Wörterbüchern. Wir werten die Ergebnisse aus und führen umfangreiche quantitative und qualitative Analysen mit dem Ziel durch, eine etymologische Karte der Sprache zu erstellen.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru istražujemo etimologiju rumunskih riječi. Počinjemo od rumunskog leksikona i automatski izvlačimo informacije iz višestrukih etimoloških riječi. Procjenjujemo rezultate i izvršavamo ogromne kvantitativne i kvalitativne analize s ciljem izgradnje etymologske mape jezika.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما اثمولوژی کلمات رومانی را تحقیق می کنیم. ما از زبان رومانی شروع می\u200cکنیم و اطلاعات را به طور خودکار از زبان\u200cهای متعدد اتمولوژیک خارج می\u200cکنیم. ما نتیجه\u200cها را ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم و با هدف ساختن نقشه\u200cی etمنولوژیک زبان تحلیل\u200cهای بسیار محدودیت و کیفیت را انجام می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili tunachunguza mtizamo wa maneno ya Romania. Tunaanza kutoka lexico la Romania na kujitoa taarifa kutoka katika lugha nyingi za mitolojia. Tutathmini matokeo na kufanya uchambuzi wa kiasi kikubwa na sifa kwa lengo la kujenga ramani ya uchunguzi ya lugha.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menyelidiki etimologi kata-kata Rumania. Kita mulai dari leksikon Rumania dan secara otomatis mengekstrak informasi dari kata-kata etimologi berbilang. Kami mengevaluasi hasilnya dan melakukan analisis kuantitatif dan kualitatif ekstensif dengan tujuan membangun peta etimologis bahasa.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz Rumyn sözleriniň etymologiýasyny bardyk. Biz Rumynça lingüňden başlap we birnäçe etymologik sözlerinden maglumatlary awtomatik gaýşart. Netijileri çykarýan we çykyş şeklinde etymologik mapini düzenlemek maksady bilen çykarýan we çykyş şeklinde çykarýan.', 'ko': '본문에서 우리는 루마니아어의 어원을 조사했다.우리는 루마니아 사전부터 여러 어원 사전에서 자동으로 정보를 추출한다.우리는 결과에 대해 평가를 하고 광범위한 정량과 정성 분석을 하는데 그 목적은 이 언어의 어원도를 구축하는 것이다.', 'af': "In hierdie papier ondersoek ons die etymology van Romaniese woorde. Ons begin van die Romaniese lexikon en automaties inligting uit veelvuldige etymologiese woordeboeke uitpak. Ons evalueer die resultate en uitvoer uitbreidige kvantitatiewe en kwalitatiewe analiseer met die doel om 'n etymologiese kaart van die taal te bou.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne hetojmë etimologjinë e fjalëve rumune. Fillojmë nga leksikoni rumun dhe nxjerrim automatikisht informacionin nga fjalorët e shumta etimologjikë. Ne vlerësojmë rezultatet dhe kryejmë analiza të gjera kuantitative dhe kualitative me qëllim të ndërtimit të një harte etimologjike të gjuhës.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ռոմանական բառերի էթիմոլոգիան: We start from the Romanian lexicon and automatically extract information from multiple etymological dictionaries.  Մենք գնահատում ենք արդյունքները և կատարում էտիմոլոգիական քարտեզի և որակային վերլուծություններ, որպեսզի կառուցենք լեզվի էթիմոլոգիական քարտեզ:', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪtda biz RomalńĪ s√∂zl…ôrin etymologiyini incidirik. Biz RomalńĪ dilind…ôn baŇülayńĪrńĪq v…ô √ßoxlu etymologik s√∂zl…ôrd…ôn m…ôlumatlarńĪ avtomatik olaraq √ßńĪxarńĪrńĪq. Biz sonu√ßlarńĪ deńüerl…ôŇüdiririk v…ô dilin etymologik haritasńĪnńĪ inŇüa etm…ôk m…ôqs…ôdil…ô geniŇü kvantitatlńĪ v…ô kvalitativ analizi ed…ôrik.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ የሮማኒያን ቃላት የኢትዮሎጂን እናሳይቃለን፡፡ ከሮማኒያን ሊክሲን ጀምረን እና ብዙ የኢትዮሎጂ መዝገብ እናወጣለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቹን እናሳውቃለን እና የቋንቋውን የኢትዮሎጂ ካርታ ለመሥራት ስፋት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা রোমানিয়ান শব্দের নৈতিকতার তদন্ত করি। আমরা রোমানিয়ান লেক্সিকোন থেকে শুরু করি এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বেশ কিছু নৈতিক অভিভাবক থেকে তথ্য বের করে আনি। আমরা ফলাফলের মূল্য পরিমাণ এবং বিস্তারিত পরিমাণ এবং পরিমাণ বিশ্লেষণ করি ভাষার একটি নৈতিক মানচিত্র তৈরি করার লক্ষ্যে।', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru istražujemo etimologiju rumunskih riječi. Počinjemo od rumunskog leksikona i automatski izvlačimo informacije iz višestrukih etimoloških diktorija. Procjenjujemo rezultate i izvršavamo ogromne kvantitativne i kvalitativne analize sa ciljem izgradnje etymologske mape jezika.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku zkoumáme etymologii rumunských slov. Začínáme z rumunského slovníku a automaticky extrahujeme informace z několika etymologických slovníků. Výsledky vyhodnocujeme a provádíme rozsáhlé kvantitativní a kvalitativní analýzy s cílem vytvořit etymologickou mapu jazyka.', 'et': 'Selles raamatus uurime rumeenia sõnade etümoloogiat. Alustame rumeenia leksikonist ja ekstraheerime automaatselt teavet mitmest etümoloogilisest sõnastikust. Hindame tulemusi ning teostame ulatuslikke kvantitatiivseid ja kvalitatiivseid analüüse eesmärgiga ehitada keele etümoloogiline kaart.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme romanialaisten sanojen etymologiaa. Aloitamme romanian sanastosta ja poimimme automaattisesti tietoja useista etymologisista sanakirjoista. Arvioimme tuloksia ja teemme laajoja kvantitatiivisia ja laadullisia analyysejä, joiden tavoitteena on rakentaa kielen etymologinen kartta.', 'ca': "En aquest article investigam l'etimologia de les paraules rumuneses. We start from the Romanian lexicon and automatically extract information from multiple etymological dictionaries.  Evaluam els resultats i fem grans an àlisis quantitatives i qualitatives amb l'objectiu de construir un mapa etimològic del llenguatge.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия изследваме етимологията на румънските думи. Започваме от румънския лексикон и автоматично извличаме информация от множество етимологични речници. Оценяваме резултатите и извършваме обширни количествени и качествени анализи с цел изграждане на етимологична карта на езика.', 'jv': 'Nang pepul iki, awak dh챕w챕 ujug-ujug etlogi kuwi rumani. Awak dh챕w챕 mulai ing Leksikan rumane lan tambah nggawe informasi sithik karo diktualisan etlogik. Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk dh챕w챕 챕ntukno karo akeh kantor lan cualit챗t sampeyan karo nggawe aturan kanggo nggawe mapa ethmoskopi kanggo langga', 'ha': 'Ga wannan takardan da Muke karatun tamkar maganar Rumori. Tuna fara daga leksiya na Romoniya kuma ke sami takardar bayani daga dictionary masu yawa. Tuna ƙaddara matsalan kuma Muke cika rabo mai ƙayyade da gwargwadon, da goani ya gina wani ramani na etymogi na harshen.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנחנו חוקרים את האטימולוגיה של מילים רומניות. אנחנו מתחילים מהלקסיקון הרומני ונוציא אוטומטית מידע ממילונים אטימולוגיים רבים. We evaluate the results and perform extensive quantitative and qualitative analyses with the goal of building an etymological map of the language.', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku raziskujemo etimologijo romunskih besed. Začnemo iz romunskega leksikona in samodejno izvlečemo informacije iz več etimoloških slovarjev. Ocenjujemo rezultate in izvajamo obsežne kvantitativne in kvalitativne analize s ciljem izdelave etimološkega zemljevida jezika.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རོ་མ་ཡིག་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རོ་མ་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ལས་འགོ་བཙུགས་ནས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཐུབ་པ་ལས། ང་ཚོས་འབྲས་འབོར་བ་དང་གྲངས་འབོར་ལྡན་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་གནང་བ་ཡིན་པའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དེ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Event Prominence Extraction Combining a Knowledge-Based Syntactic Parser and a BERT Classifier for Dutch', 'es': 'Extracción de prominencia de eventos que combina un analizador sintáctico basado en el conocimiento y un clasificador BERT para holandés', 'ar': 'استخراج بروز الحدث يجمع بين محلل نحوي قائم على المعرفة ومصنف BERT للغة الهولندية', 'fr': 'Extraction de la proéminence des événements combinant un analyseur syntaxique basé sur la connaissance et un classificateur BERT pour le néerlandais', 'pt': 'Extração de proeminência de evento combinando um analisador sintático baseado em conhecimento e um classificador BERT para holandês', 'ja': 'ナレッジベースの構文解析器とオランダ語のBERT分類子を組み合わせたイベントプロミネンス抽出', 'zh': '事出提合语法解析器与荷兰语BERT分器', 'ru': 'Экстракция выраженности события, объединяющая синтаксический парсер на основе знаний и классификатор BERT для голландского языка', 'hi': 'घटना प्रमुखता निष्कर्षण एक ज्ञान-आधारित वाक्यात्मक पार्सर और डच के लिए एक BERT क्लासिफायर का संयोजन', 'ga': 'Eastóscadh Feiceálachta Imeachtaí a Chomhcheanglaíonn Parsálaí Comhréire Eolasbhunaithe agus Aicmitheoir BERT don Ollainnis', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Συνδυασμός μιας συνεκτικής ανάλυσης βασισμένης στη γνώση και ενός ταξινομητή για τα ολλανδικά', 'hu': 'Esem챕ny Prominence Extraction A tud찼salap첬 szintaktikus elemz흷 챕s a BERT oszt찼lyoz처 철tv철z챕se holland sz찼m찼ra', 'it': "Combinando un parser sintattico basato sulla conoscenza e un classificatore BERT per l'olandese", 'mk': 'Event Prominence Extraction Combining a Knowledge-Based Syntactic Parser and a BERT Classifier for Dutch', 'kk': 'Оқиғаларды түсіру, білім негіздеген синтактикалық талдаушысы мен нелландша BERT классификаторы', 'lt': 'Event Prominence Extraction derinant žiniomis pagrįstą sintaktinį analizatorių ir olandų BERT klasifikatorių', 'ms': 'Event Prominence Extraction Combining a Knowledge-Based Syntactic Parser and a BERT Classifier for Dutch', 'ml': 'അറിവ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു സിന്റാക്റ്റിക് പാര്\u200dസര്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രോമിനെന്റ് പുറത്താക്കുക', 'mt': 'Event Prominence Extraction Combining a Knowledge-Based Syntactic Parser and a BERT Classifier for Dutch', 'mn': 'Хүмүүс мэдлэг үндсэн синтактик судлаач болон БЕРТ Классификатор холбоотой', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Połączenie opartego na wiedzy parsera syntaktycznego i klasyfikatora BERT dla holenderskiego', 'sr': 'Izvlačenje događaja, povezanje sintaktičkog razmatrača na osnovu znanja i BERT klasifikatora nizozemskog', 'ro': 'Combinarea unui analizor sintattic bazat pe cunoștințe și a unui clasificator BERT pentru olandezi', 'si': 'Comment', 'so': 'Dhacdooyinka ka soo bixinta ee la xiriira aqoonta-Based Syntactic and a BERT klassifier for Holand', 'sv': 'Event Prominence Extraktion Kombinera en kunskapsbaserad syntaktisk parser och en BERT-klassificerare för nederländska', 'ta': 'நிகழ்வு வெளியேறுதல் அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படையான ஒத்திசைவு தொகுப்பாளர் மற்றும் டெச்சிக்கான ஒரு BERT வகைப்பாட்டாளர்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đại ý sự kiện Sắp xếp kết hợp một thầy pháp pháp tâm pháp có ý thức và một mê mê hoặc BERT cho Hà Lan', 'da': 'Event Prominence Extraction Kombinerer en videnbaseret syntaksisk fortolker og en BERT-klassificering til hollandsk', 'hr': 'Izvlačenje događaja, povezanje sintaktičkog razmatrača na osnovu znanja i BERT klasifikatora nizozemskog', 'nl': 'Een combinatie van een kennisgebaseerde syntactische parser en een BERT Classifier voor Nederlands', 'bg': 'Събитие Извличане на популярност Комбиниране на базиран на знанието синтактичен анализ и класификатор за холандски език', 'id': 'Ekstraksi Prominence Peristiwa Mengkombinasi Parser Sintaktik Berdasarkan Pengetahuan dan Klasifikasi BERT untuk Belanda', 'de': 'Kombination eines wissensbasierten Syntaktik-Parsers und eines BERT-Klassifikators für Niederländisch', 'ko': '지식 기반의 문법 분석기와 BERT 분류기를 결합한 이벤트 현저성 추출', 'tr': 'Vaktiýa tanaýyşlygyny bilen tabanly sintaktik tanaýyşlygyny birleştirilýär we bir BERT klassifatçy nişanlary', 'fa': 'اخراج پیشنهاد اتفاقی که یک پزشک سنتاکتیک بر اساس علم و یک کلاس BERT برای هلندی متصل می\u200cشود', 'sw': 'Event Prominence Extraction Combining a Knowledge-Based Syntactic Parser and a BERT Classifier for Dutch', 'sq': 'Ekstraktimi i shfaqjes së ngjarjeve duke kombinuar një analizues sintaktik të bazuar në njohuri dhe një klasifikues BERT për hollandezën', 'af': 'Event Prominence Extraction Combining a Knowledge-Based Syntactic Parser and a BERT Classifier for Dutch', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'የአውቀት-Based Syntactic Parser እና BERT Classifier for Dutch', 'az': 'Bilim-tabanlı Sintaktik Parser və Hollandi üçün BERT Klasifəçi', 'bs': 'Izvlačenje događaja, povezanje sintaktičkog razmatrača na osnovu znanja i klasifikatora BERT za holandski', 'bn': 'জ্ঞান-ভিত্তিক সিন্ট্যাক্টিক পার্সার এবং ডাচের জন্য বিবের্ট ক্লাসিকার', 'ca': "Extracció de prominença d'eventos combinant un analitzador sintàtic basat en el coneixement i un classificador BERT per holandès", 'cs': 'Kombinace syntaktického parseru založeného na znalostech a klasifikátoru BERT pro nizozemštinu', 'fi': 'Event Prominence Extraction Yhdistämällä osaamispohjaisen synteettisen parserin ja BERT-luokituksen hollantilaisille', 'et': 'Ürituse silmapaistvuse ekstraheerimine teadmistepõhise süntaktika parseri ja BERT klassifikaatori kombineerimine hollandi keelele', 'sk': 'Združevanje sintaktičnega razčlenjevalnika na znanju in BERT klasifikatorja za nizozemščino', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'bo': 'Event Prominence Extraction Combining a Knowledge-Based Syntactic Parser and a BERT Classifier for Dutch', 'he': 'מציאת התרחשות שילוב מעבד סינטקטי מבוסס על ידע ומסדר BERT עבור הולנדי'}
{'en': 'A core task in information extraction is event detection that identifies event triggers in sentences that are typically classified into event types. In this study an event is considered as the unit to measure diversity and similarity in news articles in the framework of a news recommendation system. Current typology-based event detection approaches fail to handle the variety of events expressed in real-world situations. To overcome this, we aim to perform event salience classification and explore whether a transformer model is capable of classifying new information into less and more general prominence classes. After comparing a Support Vector Machine (SVM) baseline and our transformer-based classifier performances on several event span formats, we conceived multi-word event spans as syntactic clauses. Those are fed into our prominence classifier which is fine-tuned on pre-trained Dutch BERT word embeddings. On top of that we outperform a pipeline of a Conditional Random Field (CRF) approach to event-trigger word detection and the BERT-based classifier. To the best of our knowledge we present the first event extraction approach that combines an expert-based syntactic parser with a transformer-based classifier for Dutch.', 'ar': 'تتمثل المهمة الأساسية في استخراج المعلومات في اكتشاف الأحداث التي تحدد مشغلات الأحداث في الجمل التي يتم تصنيفها عادةً في أنواع الأحداث. في هذه الدراسة ، يعتبر الحدث كوحدة لقياس التنوع والتشابه في المقالات الإخبارية في إطار نظام توصية الأخبار. تفشل مناهج الكشف عن الأحداث الحالية القائمة على التصنيف في التعامل مع مجموعة متنوعة من الأحداث المعبر عنها في مواقف العالم الحقيقي. للتغلب على هذا ، نهدف إلى إجراء تصنيف بروز الأحداث واستكشاف ما إذا كان نموذج المحولات قادرًا على تصنيف المعلومات الجديدة إلى فئات بروز أقل وأكثر عمومية. بعد مقارنة خط الأساس لـ Support Vector Machine (SVM) وأداء المصنف المعتمد على المحولات على العديد من تنسيقات امتداد الحدث ، قمنا بتصور أحداث متعددة الكلمات تمتد على شكل جمل نحوية. يتم إدخالها في المصنف البارز الخاص بنا والذي تم ضبطه بدقة على حفلات الزفاف الهولندية بكلمة BERT المدربة مسبقًا. علاوة على ذلك ، فقد تفوقنا في الأداء على خط أنابيب لنهج الحقل العشوائي المشروط (CRF) لاكتشاف الكلمات المشغلة بالحدث والمصنف المستند إلى BERT. على حد علمنا ، نقدم نهج الاستخراج الأول للحدث الذي يجمع بين محلل نحوي قائم على الخبراء ومصنف قائم على المحولات للغة الهولندية.', 'pt': 'Uma tarefa central na extração de informações é a detecção de eventos que identifica gatilhos de eventos em sentenças que normalmente são classificadas em tipos de eventos. Neste estudo, um evento é considerado como a unidade de medida de diversidade e similaridade em artigos de notícias no âmbito de um sistema de recomendação de notícias. As atuais abordagens de detecção de eventos baseadas em tipologia não conseguem lidar com a variedade de eventos expressos em situações do mundo real. Para superar isso, pretendemos realizar a classificação de saliência de eventos e explorar se um modelo de transformador é capaz de classificar novas informações em classes de proeminência menos e mais gerais. Depois de comparar uma linha de base de Support Vector Machine (SVM) e nosso desempenho de classificador baseado em transformador em vários formatos de extensão de evento, concebemos extensões de evento de várias palavras como cláusulas sintáticas. Esses são alimentados em nosso classificador de destaque que é ajustado em incorporações de palavras BERT holandesas pré-treinadas. Além disso, superamos um pipeline de uma abordagem de campo aleatório condicional (CRF) para detecção de palavras de gatilho de evento e o classificador baseado em BERT. Até onde sabemos, apresentamos a primeira abordagem de extração de eventos que combina um analisador sintático baseado em especialista com um classificador baseado em transformador para holandês.', 'es': 'Una tarea fundamental en la extracción de información es la detección de eventos, que identifica los desencadenantes de eventos en oraciones que normalmente se clasifican en tipos de eventos. En este estudio, se considera que un evento es la unidad para medir la diversidad y similitud en los artículos de noticias en el marco de un sistema de recomendación de noticias. Los enfoques actuales de detección de eventos basados en la tipología no manejan la variedad de eventos expresados en situaciones del mundo real. Para superar esto, nuestro objetivo es realizar una clasificación de prominencia de eventos y explorar si un modelo de transformador es capaz de clasificar nueva información en clases de prominencia cada vez más generales. Después de comparar una línea base de máquina de vectores de soporte (SVM) y el rendimiento de nuestro clasificador basado en transformadores en varios formatos de intervalo de eventos, concebimos los intervalos de eventos de varias palabras como cláusulas sintácticas. Estos se introducen en nuestro clasificador de prominencia, que está ajustado en incrustaciones de palabras BERT holandesas previamente entrenadas. Además de eso, superamos una canalización de un enfoque de campo aleatorio condicional (CRF) para la detección de palabras activadas por eventos y el clasificador basado en BERT. Hasta donde sabemos, presentamos el primer enfoque de extracción de eventos que combina un analizador sintáctico basado en expertos con un clasificador basado en transformadores para holandés.', 'fr': "L'une des tâches principales de l'extraction d'informations est la détection d'événements qui identifie les déclencheurs d'événements dans des phrases généralement classées en types d'événements. Dans cette étude, un événement est considéré comme l'unité permettant de mesurer la diversité et la similitude dans les articles de presse dans le cadre d'un système de recommandation d'actualités. Les approches actuelles de détection d'événements basées sur la typologie ne permettent pas de gérer la variété d'événements exprimés dans des situations réelles. Pour surmonter cela, nous visons à effectuer une classification de la saillance des événements et à étudier si un modèle de transformateur est capable de classer de nouvelles informations dans des classes de prééminence de moins en plus générales. Après avoir comparé une ligne de base de machine à vecteurs de support (SVM) et les performances de notre classificateur basé sur un transformateur sur plusieurs formats de durée d'événements, nous avons conçu des plages d'événements multi-mots comme des clauses syntaxiques. Ceux-ci sont introduits dans notre classificateur de proéminence qui est affiné sur les intégrations de mots BERT néerlandais pré-entraînées. En plus de cela, nous surpassons un pipeline d'approche de champ aléatoire conditionnel (CRF) pour la détection de mots déclenchés par un événement et le classificateur basé sur BERT. À notre connaissance, nous présentons la première approche d'extraction d'événements qui combine un analyseur syntaxique basé sur des experts avec un classificateur basé sur un transformateur pour le néerlandais.", 'ja': '情報抽出におけるコアタスクは、通常、イベントタイプに分類される文章内のイベントトリガを識別するイベント検出です。 本研究では、ニュース推奨システムの枠組みにおいて、ニュース記事の多様性と類似性を測定する単位として事象を考慮する。 現在のタイプに基づくイベント検出アプローチは、現実の状況で表現されるさまざまなイベントを処理できません。 これを克服するために、事象顕著性分類を行い、変圧器モデルが新しい情報をより一般的な注目度の低いクラスに分類できるかどうかを探ることを目指します。 サポートベクターマシン（ SVM ）のベースラインと、いくつかのイベントスパンフォーマットでの変圧器ベースの分類子のパフォーマンスを比較した後、構文句としてマルチワードイベントスパンを構想しました。 これらは、事前にトレーニングされたオランダ語のBERT単語の埋め込みで微調整されたプロミネンス分類子にフィードされます。 さらに、イベントトリガー単語検出およびBERTベースの分類子に対する条件付きランダムフィールド（ CRF ）アプローチのパイプラインを上回るパフォーマンスを発揮します。 私たちの知る限りでは、専門家ベースの構文解析器とオランダ語用の変圧器ベースの分類器を組み合わせた最初のイベント抽出アプローチを提示します。', 'hi': 'सूचना निष्कर्षण में एक मुख्य कार्य ईवेंट डिटेक्शन है जो वाक्यों में ईवेंट ट्रिगर्स की पहचान करता है जिन्हें आमतौर पर ईवेंट प्रकारों में वर्गीकृत किया जाता है। इस अध्ययन में एक घटना को एक समाचार सिफारिश प्रणाली के ढांचे में समाचार लेखों में विविधता और समानता को मापने के लिए इकाई के रूप में माना जाता है। वर्तमान टाइपोलॉजी-आधारित घटना का पता लगाने के दृष्टिकोण वास्तविक दुनिया की स्थितियों में व्यक्त की गई घटनाओं की विविधता को संभालने में विफल रहते हैं। इसे दूर करने के लिए, हम घटना का वर्गीकरण करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं और यह पता लगाते हैं कि क्या एक ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल नई जानकारी को कम और अधिक सामान्य प्रमुखता वर्गों में वर्गीकृत करने में सक्षम है। एक समर्थन वेक्टर मशीन (एसवीएम) बेसलाइन और कई घटना अवधि प्रारूपों पर हमारे ट्रांसफार्मर-आधारित क्लासिफायर प्रदर्शन की तुलना करने के बाद, हमने बहु-शब्द घटना की कल्पना की जो वाक्यात्मक खंडों के रूप में फैली हुई है। उन हमारे प्रमुखता क्लासिफायर में खिलाया जाता है जो पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित डच BERT शब्द एम्बेडिंग पर ठीक-ठाक है। इसके शीर्ष पर हम घटना-ट्रिगर शब्द का पता लगाने और BERT-आधारित क्लासिफायर के लिए सशर्त रैंडम फील्ड (CRF) दृष्टिकोण की पाइपलाइन को मात देते हैं। हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए हम पहली घटना निष्कर्षण दृष्टिकोण है कि डच के लिए एक ट्रांसफार्मर आधारित क्लासिफायर के साथ एक विशेषज्ञ आधारित वाक्यात्मक पार्सर को जोड़ती है प्रस्तुत करते हैं.', 'zh': '信息提取的核心事检,所以识句中事触发器,此触发器常分为事类。 于本研中,事视为新闻荐统框架内量新闻文章多样性与相似性等。 方今类型学事检法,不可处世。 所以克此者,行事显著性分,而求变压器形之能以新信息为益少异类也。 较向量机 (SVM) 基线与转换器之类跨度格式之后,将多字事跨度设想句法子句。 输我突分类器中,分器荷兰语BERT词嵌。 太上优随机字段(CRF)管道,事触发词检BERT器。 以吾所知,举一事以取之,其法将基于专家之句法解析器,与转换器荷兰语分类器合。', 'ru': 'Основной задачей в извлечении информации является обнаружение событий, которое идентифицирует триггеры событий в предложениях, которые обычно классифицируются по типам событий. В этом исследовании событие рассматривается как единица измерения разнообразия и сходства в новостных статьях в рамках системы рекомендаций по новостям. Современные типологические подходы к обнаружению событий не справляются с различными событиями, выраженными в реальных ситуациях. Чтобы преодолеть это, мы стремимся выполнить классификацию значимости событий и исследовать, способна ли модель трансформатора классифицировать новую информацию на менее и более общие классы значимости. После сравнения базовой линии машины с вектором поддержки (SVM) и производительности нашего классификатора на основе трансформатора в нескольких форматах диапазона событий, мы задумали многословные диапазоны событий в качестве синтаксических условий. Они подаются в наш классификатор выраженности, который точно настраивается на предварительно обученных вложениях голландских слов BERT. Кроме того, мы превосходим по производительности конвейерный подход условного случайного поля (CRF) к обнаружению слова триггера события и классификатор на основе BERT. Насколько нам известно, мы представляем первый подход к извлечению событий, который сочетает в себе синтаксический парсер на основе эксперта с классификатором на основе трансформатора для голландского языка.', 'ga': 'Tasc lárnach in eastóscadh faisnéise is ea braite teagmhais a shainaithníonn truicear imeachtaí in abairtí a aicmítear go hiondúil i gcineálacha teagmhais. Sa staidéar seo breathnaítear ar imeacht mar an t-aonad chun éagsúlacht agus cosúlachtaí in ailt nuachta a thomhas faoi chuimsiú córas molta nuachta. Teipeann ar chur chuige braite teagmhais atá bunaithe ar thíopeolaíocht atá ann faoi láthair éagsúlacht na n-imeachtaí a chuirtear in iúl i gcásanna sa saol fíor a láimhseáil. Chun é seo a shárú, tá sé mar aidhm againn aicmiú suntasacht imeachtaí a dhéanamh agus iniúchadh a dhéanamh an bhfuil samhail claochladáin in ann faisnéis nua a rangú i ranganna feiceálachta níos lú agus níos ginearálta. Tar éis comparáid a dhéanamh idir bonnlíne Meaisín Veicteoir Tacaíochta (SVM) agus ár léirithe aicmitheora bunaithe ar chlaochladán ar roinnt formáidí réise imeachtaí, cheapamar réisí imeachta ilfhoclacha mar chlásail chomhréire. Cuirtear iad sin san áireamh inár n-aicmitheoir feiceálach a dhéantar mionchoigeartú ar leabú focal Ollainnis BERT réamh-oilte. Ina theannta sin éirímid níos fearr ná píblíne de chur chuige Réimse Randamach Coinníollach (CRF) maidir le braite focal a spreagann imeachtaí agus an t-aicmitheoir bunaithe ar BERT. Chomh fada agus is eol dúinn cuirimid an chéad chur chuige eastósctha imeachta i láthair a chomhcheanglaíonn parsálaí comhréire atá bunaithe ar shaineolaithe le haicmitheoir claochladán-bhunaithe don Ollainnis.', 'ka': 'ინფორმაციის ექსტრექციაში მნიშვნელოვანი რაოდენობა არის მოვლენების განსახულება, რომელიც მოვლენების განსახულება მოვლენების სიტყვებში, რომელიც ტიპულად კლასიფიკ ამ კვლევაში მოვლენა როგორც ერთეულია განსხვავებას და განსხვავებას ახალგაზომის ახალგაზომის სისტემის კონფიგურაციაში. მიმდინარე ტიპოლოგიური მოვლენების განახლების მიღება შეუძლებელია რეალური მსოფლიოში გამოსახულებული მოვლენების განსხვავება. ჩვენ უნდა გადავიწყენოთ ეს, რომ მოვლენების კლასიფიკაცია და განსხვავება თუ ტრანფორმეტრის მოდელი შეუძლებელია ახალი ინფორმაციის კლასიფიკაცია ცოტა და უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად მნი მხოლოდ მხოლოდ ვექტორის მაქსინის (SVM) ფესტილის და ჩვენი ტრანფორმაციის კლასიფიკაციის გამოსახულების გამოსახულების შემდეგ რამდენიმე მოვლენტის სპორმატების ფორმატებში, ჩვენ ვიფიქრეთ მრავა ისინი ჩვენი მნიშვნელოვანი კლასიფიკაცია, რომელიც უფრო სწორედ განაკეთებული ჰონდენური ბერტის სიტყვების შემდეგებაში. დამატებით ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ კონდიციონალური კონდიციონალური ფორმა (CRF) დაწყება მოვლენების განვიცემებისთვის და BERT-ის კლასიფიკაციას. ჩვენი უკეთესი მეცნიერებისთვის, ჩვენ ჩვენ ახლა პირველი მოვლენტის ექსპექციის მიღება, რომელიც ექსპერტური სინტექტიკური პასუტერი დაბათებული იქნება, რომელი', 'hu': 'Az információkinyerés egyik legfontosabb feladata az eseményfelismerés, amely azonosítja az eseménykiváltókat a jellemzően eseménytípusokra osztott mondatokban. Ebben a tanulmányban egy esemény tekinthető a hírek sokszínűségének és hasonlóságának mérésére egy híradó ajánlási rendszer keretében. A jelenlegi tipológiai alapú eseményfelismerési megközelítések nem képesek kezelni a valós helyzetekben kifejezett események sokféleségét. Ennek leküzdése érdekében törekszünk az események kiemelkedő osztályozására és annak feltárására, hogy egy transzformátor modell képes-e új információkat egyre általánosabb kiemelkedő osztályokba sorolni. Miután összehasonlítottuk a Support Vector Machine (SVM) alapját és a transzformátor alapú osztályozónk teljesítményét több eseménytartomány formátumban, többszós eseménytartományt fogalmaztunk meg szintaktikus záradékként. Ezeket kiemelkedő osztályozónkba tápláljuk, amely az előre képzett holland BERT szóbeágyazásokra finomhangolt. Ezen túlmenően a feltételes véletlenszerű mező (CRF) megközelítésének csatornáját teljesítjük az eseménykiváltó szó felismerésére és a BERT alapú osztályozásra. Legjobb tudásunk szerint bemutatjuk az első eseményextrakciós megközelítést, amely egy szakértői alapú szintaktikus elemzőt ötvöz egy transzformátor alapú holland osztályozóval.', 'el': 'Μια βασική εργασία στην εξαγωγή πληροφοριών είναι η ανίχνευση συμβάντων που προσδιορίζει τα πυροδοτικά συμβάντα σε προτάσεις που ταξινομούνται συνήθως σε τύπους συμβάντων. Στην παρούσα μελέτη ένα γεγονός θεωρείται η μονάδα μέτρησης της ποικιλομορφίας και ομοιότητας σε ειδησεογραφικά άρθρα στο πλαίσιο ενός συστήματος σύστασης ειδήσεων. Οι τρέχουσες προσεγγίσεις ανίχνευσης συμβάντων βασισμένες στην τυπολογία δεν μπορούν να χειριστούν την ποικιλία των γεγονότων που εκφράζονται σε πραγματικές καταστάσεις. Για να το ξεπεράσουμε αυτό, στοχεύουμε να εκτελέσουμε ταξινόμηση σημαντικότητας συμβάντων και να διερευνήσουμε αν ένα μοντέλο μετασχηματιστή είναι ικανό να ταξινομήσει νέες πληροφορίες σε όλο και πιο γενικές κατηγορίες προβολής. Αφού συγκρίνουμε μια γραμμή βάσης διανυσματικής μηχανής υποστήριξης (και τις επιδόσεις ταξινομητών με βάση τον μετασχηματιστή μας σε διάφορες μορφές έκτασης συμβάντων, σχεδιάσαμε τα πολλαπλά διαστήματα συμβάντων ως συντακτικές ρήτρες. Αυτά τροφοδοτούνται στον καταλληλότερο ταξινομητή μας, ο οποίος είναι συντονισμένος με προ-εκπαιδευμένες ολλανδικές ενσωματώσεις λέξεων BERT. Επιπλέον, ξεπερνάμε έναν αγωγό προσέγγισης τυχαίου πεδίου υπό όρους για την ανίχνευση λέξεων ενεργοποίησης συμβάντος και τον ταξινομητή βασισμένο στο BERT. Από ό,τι γνωρίζουμε, παρουσιάζουμε την πρώτη προσέγγιση εξαγωγής συμβάντων που συνδυάζει έναν συντακτικό αναλυτή βασισμένο σε εμπειρογνώμονες με έναν ταξινομητή βασισμένο στον μετασχηματιστή για τα ολλανδικά.', 'it': "Un'attività principale nell'estrazione delle informazioni è il rilevamento di eventi che identifica i trigger di eventi nelle frasi che sono tipicamente classificate in tipi di eventi. In questo studio un evento è considerato come l'unità per misurare la diversità e la somiglianza negli articoli di notizie nel quadro di un sistema di raccomandazione di notizie. Gli attuali approcci di rilevamento degli eventi basati sulla tipologia non riescono a gestire la varietà di eventi espressi nelle situazioni del mondo reale. Per ovviare a questo, miriamo a eseguire la classificazione della salienza degli eventi ed esplorare se un modello di trasformatore è in grado di classificare le nuove informazioni in classi di preminenza sempre più generali. Dopo aver confrontato una linea di base di Support Vector Machine (SVM) e le prestazioni del nostro classificatore basato su trasformatori su diversi formati di ampiezza degli eventi, abbiamo concepito intervalli di eventi multi-parola come clausole sintattiche. Questi vengono inseriti nel nostro classificatore di spicco, che è ottimizzato su incorporazioni di parole BERT olandesi pre-addestrate. Inoltre, superiamo una pipeline di un approccio CRF (Conditional Random Field) per il rilevamento di parole trigger di eventi e il classificatore basato su BERT. Al meglio delle nostre conoscenze presentiamo il primo approccio di estrazione di eventi che combina un parser sintattico basato su esperti con un classificatore basato su trasformatori per olandese.", 'kk': 'Мәліметті тарқату үшін негізгі тапсырма - оқиға тапсырмасын анықтау. Оқиға әдетте оқиға түрлеріне бөлінген сөздерде басталады. Бұл зерттеулерде жаңалық рекомендациялардың жүйесіндегі жаңалық мақалаларының айырмашылығын өлшеу және ұқсастығын бірліктіру үшін оқиға деп ойлайды. Қолданыстағы типологиялық оқиғаларды анықтау әрекеттері шын әлемдегі жағдайда көрсетілген оқиғалардың әртүрлі әрекеттерін басқаруға болмайды. Бұл үшін біз оқиғалардың сәлемдік классификациясын орындап, түрлендіруші үлгісінің жаңа мәліметті төмендету және көп әлемдік класстарда классификациялау мүмкіндігін анықтап Қолдау вектор машинасының (SVM) негізгі сызығын және түрлендіру негізгі классификациялық пішімдерінде бірнеше оқиға сәйкесті пішімдеріне салыстырып, біз бірнеше сөз оқиғаларды синтактикалық Бұлар біздің керемет классификациямызға жіберілген, олар алдында оқылған Нидерландық BERT сөздерді ендіру үшін дұрыс түзетілген. Жоғарында біз кездейсоқ өрік (CRF) қатынасын оқиға жегішті сөздерді анықтау және BERT негіздеген классификациясына жеткіземіз. Біздің біліміміздің ең жақсы жағдайда бірінші оқиға тарқату тәсілігін таңдаймыз. Бұл эксперттердің негізінде синтактикалық талдаушысы болып, Нидерландша түрлендір', 'lt': 'Pagrindinė informacijos gavimo užduotis yra įvykių aptikimas, kuriame nurodomi įvykio sukėlėjai sakiniuose, kurie paprastai klasifikuojami į įvykių tipus. Šiame tyrime renginys laikomas vienetu, skirtu įvertinti žinių straipsnių įvairovę ir panašumą pagal naujienų rekomendacijų sistemą. Current typology-based event detection approaches fail to handle the variety of events expressed in real-world situations.  Siekdami įveikti šį klausimą, siekiame atlikti įvykio sūdymo klasifikaciją ir ištirti, ar transformatoriaus model is gali klasifikuoti naują informaciją į mažiau ir labiau bendrus pažangos klases. Palyginę paramos vektoriaus mašinos (SVM) pradinę vertę su mūsų transformatoriumi pagrįstu klasifikatoriaus rezultatais keliuose renginių intervalo formatuose, mes kaip sintaksinės sąlygos suprojektavome daugialypius renginių intervalus. Those are fed into our prominence classifier which is fine-tuned on pre-trained Dutch BERT word embeddings.  On top of that we outperform a pipeline of a Conditional Random Field (CRF) approach to event-trigger word detection and the BERT-based classifier.  Mes geriausiai žinome, kad pristatome pirmąjį renginių gavybos metodą, kuris jungia ekspertų pagrįstą sintaksinį analizatorių su transformatoriumi pagrįstu holandų klasifikatoriumi.', 'mk': 'Главна задача во извлекувањето на информации е детекција на настани кои идентификуваат активатори на настани во реченици кои се обично класификувани во типови на настани. In this study an event is considered as the unit to measure diversity and similarity in news articles in the framework of a news recommendation system.  Current typology-based event detection approaches fail to handle the variety of events expressed in real-world situations.  За да го надминеме ова, ние имаме за цел да ја извршиме класификацијата на славноста на настаните и да истражуваме дали моделот на трансформатор е способен да класификува нови информации во помалку и поопшта класи на истакнување. По споредувањето на основната вредност на Векторната машина за поддршка (SVM) и нашите класификатори базирани на трансформатори на неколку формати на размер на настани, ние ги концептиравме размерите на настаните со повеќе зборови како синтактички клаузули. Тие се внесени во нашиот класификатор на истакнување кој е фино наместен на претренирани холандски BERT зборови вложување. Покрај тоа ние го надминуваме нафтоводот на пристапот на условно случајно поле (CRF) до детекција на зборови за активирање на настаните и класификаторот базиран на BERT. To the best of our knowledge we present the first event extraction approach that combines an expert-based syntactic parser with a transformer-based classifier for Dutch.', 'ms': 'A core task in information extraction is event detection that identifies event triggers in sentences that are typically classified into event types.  Dalam kajian ini peristiwa dianggap sebagai unit untuk mengukur kebanyakan dan persamaan dalam artikel berita dalam kerangka sistem rekomendasi berita. pendekatan pengesan peristiwa berdasarkan tipologi semasa gagal mengendalikan pelbagai peristiwa yang diungkapkan dalam situasi dunia nyata. To overcome this, we aim to perform event salience classification and explore whether a transformer model is capable of classifying new information into less and more general prominence classes.  After comparing a Support Vector Machine (SVM) baseline and our transformer-based classifier performances on several event span formats, we conceived multi-word event spans as syntactic clauses.  Those are fed into our prominence classifier which is fine-tuned on pre-trained Dutch BERT word embeddings.  Di atas itu, kita melebihi garis paip pendekatan Medan Rawak Bersyarat (CRF) kepada pengesan perkataan peristiwa-pemicu dan klasifikasi berdasarkan BERT. To the best of our knowledge we present the first event extraction approach that combines an expert-based syntactic parser with a transformer-based classifier for Dutch.', 'ml': '@ info ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു സംഭവത്തെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസവും സമനവും അളന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു യൂണിറ്റായി വിചാരിക്കുന്ന നിലവിലുള്ള ടൈപ്പോളജി അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തില്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കു To overcome this, we aim to perform event salience classification and explore whether a transformer model is capable of classifying new information into less and more general prominence classes.  ഒരു പിന്തുണയുള്ള വെക്റ്റര്\u200d യന്ത്രം (SVM) ബേസ്ലൈനും നമ്മുടെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളും സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കിയ ശേ ഇത് നമ്മുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കറിലേക്ക് ഭക്ഷണം നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലനം നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ട ഡ അതിന്\u200dറെ മുകളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സാഹചര്യത്തില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഫീല്\u200dഡിന്\u200dറെ പൈപ്പിളൈന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. സംഭവ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ തു നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ലതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യ സംഭവത്തിന്റെ പുറത്തേക്ക് കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അത് ഒരു വിശേഷമായ സിന്\u200dടാക്ടിക് പരി', 'mt': 'Kompitu ewlieni fl-estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni huwa l-identifikazzjoni ta’ avvenimenti li jidentifikaw l-attivaturi ta’ avvenimenti f’sentenzi li tipikament huma kklassifikati f’tipi ta’ avvenimenti. In this study an event is considered as the unit to measure diversity and similarity in news articles in the framework of a news recommendation system.  L-approċċi attwali ta’ individwazzjoni ta’ avvenimenti bbażati fuq it-tipoloġija jonqsu milli jimmaniġġjaw il-varjetà ta’ avvenimenti espressi f’sitwazzjonijiet tad-dinja reali. Biex tingħeleb dan, għandna l-għan li nagħmlu klassifikazzjoni tas-salinċja tal-avvenimenti u nesploraw jekk mudell ta’ trasformatur huwiex kapaċi jikklassifika informazzjoni ġdida fi klassijiet ta’ prominenza inqas u aktar ġenerali. Wara li tqabblu linja bażi tal-Magna tal-Vetturi ta’ Appoġġ (SVM) u l-prestazzjonijiet tal-klassifikatur tagħna bbażati fuq it-trasformatur fuq diversi formati ta’ firxa ta’ avvenimenti, a ħna nħolqu firxa ta’ avvenimenti b’ħafna kliem bħala klawżoli sintattiċi. Dawk huma mdaħħla fil-klassifikatur ta’ prominenza tagħna li huwa rfinut fuq inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem BERT Olandiżi mħarrġa minn qabel. Barra minn hekk a ħna nieħdu aktar minn pajp ta’ approċċ Conditional Random Field (CRF) għall-identifikazzjoni tal-kelmiet li jiskattaw l-avvenimenti u l-klassifikatur ibbażat fuq il-BERT. Għall-a ħjar għarfien tagħna nippreżentaw l-ewwel approċċ ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ avvenimenti li jgħaqqad parser sintetiku bbażat fuq esperti ma’ klassifikatur ibbażat fuq trasformatur għall-Olandiż.', 'mn': 'Мэдээлэл хадгалах үндсэн үйл ажиллагаа бол үйл явдлыг тодорхойлох үйл явдлын тодорхойлолт нь үйл явдлын төрлийн хэлбэрээр хуваалцагдаж буй өгүүлбэрүүд юм. Энэ судалгаанд нэг үйл явдал мэдээллийн зөвлөлтийн системийн хувьд олон янз бүрийг хэмжих болон тэнцүү байдлыг хэмжих нэгж гэж үздэг. Одоогийн бичлэг дээр суурилсан үйл явдлын ойлголт бодит ертөнцийн нөхцөлд илэрхийлж буй олон үйл явдлыг удирдахгүй. Үүнийг давхарлахын тулд бид үйл явдлын шинжлэх ухааны хэлбэрийг хийж, шинэ мэдээллийг бага болон ихэвчлэн чухал хичээлд ангилах боломжтой эсэхийг судалдаг. Хамгаалах вектор машин (SVM) суурь шулууныг харьцуулсны дараа бид олон үйл явдлын хэлбэр дээр шилжүүлэгчийн ангилалын үзүүлэлтийг олон үг үйл явдлыг синтактик хэлбэрүүд гэж үзсэн. Эдгээр нь бидний хамгийн чухал хэлбэрт хүргэж байгаа Нидерландын өмнө сургалтын БЕРТ үгийг бий болгож тайлбарладаг. Үүнээс гадна бид үйл явдал үүсгэгч үгийг мэдэх болон BERT-д суурилсан ангилалын шалтгаан санамсаргүй өргөний хоолойн шулууныг хийдэг. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй нь бид анхны үйл явдал гаргах арга зам өгдөг. Энэ нь мэргэжилтэн дээр суурилсан синтактик шинжлэх ухаанттай Нидерландын хувьд шинжлэх ухаантэй хуваалцагч юм.', 'no': 'Ein kjerneoppgåve i utpakking av informasjon er oppdaging av hendingar som identifiserer hendinga som utløyser i setningar som normalt er klassifisert i hendingstypar. I denne studien vert eit hendelse kalla som eininga for å måle mangfoldighet og liknande i nyttikler i rammeområdet av eit nyhetsverkningssystem. Gjeldande typologisk oppdaging av hendingar kan ikkje handtera ulike hendingar uttrykket i verkeleg situasjonar. For å overføra dette, må vi utføra hendingsklassifikasjon og utforske om ein transformeringsmodell er i stand til å klassifisera nye informasjon til mindre og meir generelle viktige klasser. Etter samanlikning av ein støtte vektormaskin (SVM) baseline og vår transformeringsbasert klassifiseringar på fleire hendingsformater, fikk vi fleire ord- hendingar som syntaktiske klausar. Dette er fed inn i vårt viktig klassifiserer som er fint oppsett på føretrainerte nederlandske BERT- ordinnbygging. I det øvst utfører vi ein røyrlinje av ein tilfeldig tilfeldig (CRF) tilnærming til oppdaging av ord som utløysar hendingar og BERT-basert klassifisering. I det beste veit vi presenterer den første tilnærminga for hendingar som kombinerer ein ekspertbasert syntaksisk tolkar med ein transformeringsbasert klassifiserer for nederlandsk.', 'pl': 'Podstawowym zadaniem w ekstrakcji informacji jest wykrywanie zdarzeń, które identyfikuje wyzwalacze zdarzeń w zdaniach, które są zwykle klasyfikowane na typy zdarzeń. W niniejszym opracowaniu wydarzenie uważane jest za jednostkę pomiaru różnorodności i podobieństwa artykułów wiadomościowych w ramach systemu rekomendacji wiadomości. Obecne metody wykrywania zdarzeń oparte na typologii nie są w stanie poradzić sobie z różnorodnością zdarzeń wyrażonych w rzeczywistych sytuacjach. Aby to przezwyciężyć, staramy się przeprowadzić klasyfikację saliencji zdarzeń i zbadać, czy model transformatora jest w stanie klasyfikować nowe informacje na coraz bardziej ogólne klasy promienicyjności. Po porównaniu bazy podstawowej maszyny wsparcia wektorowego (SVM) i klasyfikatora opartego na transformatorze w kilku formatach rozpiętości zdarzeń, pomyśleliśmy wielosłowne rozpięcia zdarzeń jako klauzule składni. Są one wprowadzane do naszego klasyfikatora prominentności, który jest dostosowany do wstępnie przeszkolonych holenderskich osadzeń słów BERT. Ponadto przewyższamy rurociąg warunkowego pola losowego (CRF) do wykrywania słów wyzwalających zdarzenia i klasyfikatora opartego na BERT. Według naszej najlepszej wiedzy prezentujemy pierwsze podejście ekstrakcji zdarzeń, które łączy oparty na ekspertach parser składni z klasyfikatorem opartym na transformatorze dla holenderskiego.', 'ro': 'O activitate de bază în extragerea informațiilor este detectarea evenimentelor care identifică declanșatorii evenimentelor în propoziții care sunt clasificate în mod obișnuit în tipuri de evenimente. În acest studiu, un eveniment este considerat ca unitatea de măsurare a diversității și similarității articolelor de știri în cadrul unui sistem de recomandare a știrilor. Abordările actuale bazate pe tipologie de detectare a evenimentelor nu reușesc să gestioneze varietatea evenimentelor exprimate în situații din lumea reală. Pentru a depăși acest lucru, ne propunem să efectuăm clasificarea salienței evenimentelor și să explorăm dacă un model de transformator este capabil să clasifice noi informații în clase de proeminență din ce în ce mai puțin general. După ce am comparat o bază de referință a Support Vector Machine (SVM) și performanțele clasificatorului nostru bazat pe transformator pe mai multe formate de interval de evenimente, am conceput intervale de evenimente multi-cuvânt ca clauze sintactice. Acestea sunt introduse în clasificatorul nostru de proeminență, care este reglat fin pe încorporările de cuvinte BERT olandeze pre-instruite. Pe lângă asta, depășim performanța unei abordări de câmp aleatoriu condiționat (CRF) pentru detectarea cuvintelor declanșatoare de evenimente și clasificatorul bazat pe BERT. Din cele mai bune cunoștințe ale noastre vă prezentăm prima abordare de extracție a evenimentelor care combină un parser sintactic bazat pe experți cu un clasificator bazat pe transformator pentru olandeză.', 'si': '@ info: whatsthis මේ අධ්\u200dයානයේ අධ්\u200dයානයට අවස්ථානයක් විවිධානයක් හා වගේම අවස්ථානයක් පද්ධතියේ වාර්තාවක් පද්ධතියේ  ප්\u200dරස්තූත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරවේශය සඳහා සොයාගන්න අවස්ථාවක් නැහැ ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ ස්ථානයේදී ප්\u200dරවේශනය විද මේක ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, අපි අදහස් කරනවා සිද්ධ විශේෂ විශේෂණය කරන්න සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න සක්ෂිය කරනවා නැත්නම් අලුත් තොරතුරු අඩු සහය වෙක්ටර් මැෂින් එක (SVM) මූලප්\u200dරමාණය සහ අපේ වෙනස්ථාපිත විශේෂකය සඳහා අපේ වෙනස්ථාපිත විශේෂකය සම්පූර්ණය විශේෂකයේ වි ඒවා අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂකයෙන් පිළිගන්න ඇති. ඒක ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂකයෙන් හොඳින් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ  ඒ වගේම අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක (CRF) වලට පායිප්ලින් එකක් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරනවා සිද්ධියක් පරීක්ෂ අපේ දන්නවගේ හොඳම දන්නවට අපි පළමුවෙන් සිද්ධ විස්තරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් සිද්ධ විස්තරයෙක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ඩො', 'sv': 'En viktig uppgift i informationsutvinning är händelsedetektering som identifierar händelseutlösare i meningar som vanligtvis klassificeras i händelsetyper. I denna studie betraktas en händelse som enheten för att mäta mångfald och likhet i nyhetsartiklar inom ramen för ett nyhetsrekommendationssystem. Nuvarande typologiska metoder för händelsedetektering klarar inte av att hantera de olika händelser som uttrycks i verkliga situationer. För att övervinna detta strävar vi efter att utföra händelsesaliens klassificering och undersöka om en transformatormodell kan klassificera ny information i mindre och mer allmänna prominensklasser. Efter att ha jämfört en baslinje för Support Vector Machine (SVM) och våra transformatorbaserade klassificerare prestanda på flera händelsespann format, tänkte vi multi-word händelsespann som syntaktiska satser. Dessa matas in i vår framstående klassificerare som är finjusterad på pre-utbildade holländska BERT ord inbäddningar. Dessutom överträffar vi en pipeline av ett Conditional Random Field (CRF) tillvägagångssätt för händelsetrigger word detection och BERT-baserad klassificering. Så vitt vi vet presenterar vi den första händelseutvinningsmetoden som kombinerar en expertbaserad syntaktisk parser med en transformatorbaserad klassificerare för holländska.', 'so': 'Shaqo ku saabsan soo saarista macluumaadka aasiga ah waa suurtagalka, kaas oo aqoonsan dhacdooyinka uu ku dhaco oo ku qoran qaababka dhacdooyinka. Dhacdooyinkan waxbarashadan waxaa looga tiriyaa qayb ay ku qiyaasaan waxyaabaha kala duduwan iyo isku mid ah oo ku qoran qoraalka warqadaha warqada ee nidaamka warbixinta. Dhacdooyinka dhaqdhaqaalaha ah ee ku qoran qaababka dhaqdhaqaalaha hada ah ma xambaaran dhacdooyinka kala duduwan ee xaaladaha halista ah. Si aan taas uga adkayso, waxaan ku daynaa in aan sameyno fasalka dhacdooyinka iyo baaritaanno in uu sameyn karo qaababka beddelinta oo uu macluumaad cusub u kala qaybsan karo fasalka hoose iyo kuwa badan. Markaad isbarbardhigno qoraalka qofka kaalmada ah (SVM) iyo tababaridayada kooxaha isbedelka ah oo ku saabsan qaab badan oo dhacdooyin badan, waxaynu u sameynay dhacdooyin badan oo kaleemeysan ah sida bandhigyada syntactic. Kuwaas waxaa lagu quudiyey fasaxeena sharafta leh oo si fiican looga bartay hadalka hore ee Dutch BERT. Taas korkiisa waxaynu ka samaysanaynaa baarlamada xaalada ah ee xaaladaha ah ee Random Field (CRF). Tan ugu wanaagsan aqoonteenna waxaynu keenaynaa dhaqdhaqaaqa dhacda ee ugu horeeya, taasoo isugu qabsata koox-xarunta ku saleysan koontaroolka isbedelka Dutch.', 'ta': '@ info: whatsthis இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில் செய்தி பரிந்துரைப்பு அமைப்பின் சட்டத்தில் உள்ள செய்தி கட்டுரைகளில் பல்வேறு மற்றும் ஒத்த தற்போதைய வகைப்பட்டியல் அடிப்படையிலான நிகழ்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு நெருங்குதல் தோல்வியுற்றது உண்மையான- உலக நிலைம இதை வெற்றி பெற நாம் நிகழ்வு வாய்ப்பாடு வகுப்பை செய்ய நேர்ந்துள்ளோம் மற்றும் ஒரு மாற்று மாற்றும் மாதிரி மாதிரி புதிய தகவலை  ஒரு ஆதரவு வெக்டர் இயந்திரம் (SVM) அடிப்படையில் மற்றும் எங்கள் மாற்றம் அடிப்படையான வகுப்பாட்டாளர் செயல்பாடுகளை பல நிகழ்வு வடிவங்களில் ஒப்பிடும் பிறகு, நா அவர்கள் எங்கள் பெரிய வகுப்பாளருக்கு உணவளிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது முன் பயிற்சி பிரெட் வார்த்தைகள் மீது நன்றாக உள்ளது. மேலே நாம் ஒரு நிகழ்ச்சி குறிப்பில்லா புலத்தின் (CRF) நெருங்கும் சொல்லை கண்டறிதல் மற்றும் BERT-அடிப்படையில் வகைப்பாட்டாளரின் ப எங்கள் அறிவின் சிறந்த நிகழ்வு பிரிப்பு முறையை நாம் கொண்டுவருகிறோம். இது ஒரு விசிறந்த ஒத்திசைவு பார்வையை சேர்க்கிறது என்', 'ur': 'اطلاعات اضافہ کے ذریعہ ایک اصلی تابع ہے ایڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ جو ایڈیٹ ڈیٹ کرتا ہے کہ ویڈیٹ میں ٹریگ کرتا ہے جو عمدہ طور پر ایڈیٹ ٹائیٹ کی طرح کے اس مطالعہ میں ایک حادثہ کو ایک نیویس سٹم کی روشنی کے اندازے کے لئے ایک یونیٹ سمجھا جاتا ہے۔ موجود ٹائیپولوژی بنیادی ایڈیٹ شناسیٹ کے قریب آتے ہیں کہ حقیقی دنیا کی موقعیت میں کھول دیئے ہوئے مختلف ایڈیٹوں کو تحت نظر نہیں پہنچا سکتے۔ اس سے غالب ہونے کے لئے ہم نے ایڈیونس سیلینس کلاسی کرنا کا ارادہ کیا ہے اور دیکھنا چاہتے ہیں کہ کوئی تبدیل کرنے والا موڈل نیا معلومات کم اور زیادہ عمومی کلاس میں کلاسی کرسکتا ہے۔ اس کے بعد ہم نے بہت سی ویکتور ماشین (SVM) بنسٹ لین اور ہمارے تغییر دینے والی کلیسٹر کی اجرائیں چند ایڈینٹ اسپین فرموٹوں پر مقایسہ کیا، ہم نے بہت سی ویٹ ایڈینٹ ایڈینٹ کو سینٹکتیک کلاس کے طور پر سمجھا۔ یہ ہمارے عظیم کلیسٹر میں کھایا جاتا ہے جو پہلے تعلیم دیے ہوئے ڈرچ BERT کلیز پر مضبوط ہے۔ اس کے اوپر ہم ایک محدودیت رنڈم فیلڈ (CRF) کے پیپ لین کو ایڈینٹ-ٹریگر لغات شناسایی اور BERT-بنیادی کلاسیٹر کی تقریبا کے لئے انجام دیتے ہیں. ہمارے سب سے بہترین علم کے لئے ہم پہلی حادثہ اٹھانے کے طریقے کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو ایک متخصص بنیاد سینٹکتیک پارچر کو ڈچ کے لئے تغییر پھیلانے کی بنیاد رکھنے والی کلاسیر کے ساتھ ترکیب کرتا ہے.', 'sr': 'Glavni zadatak u izvlačenju informacija je otkrivanje događaja koji identifikuje događaj koji pokreće rečenice koje su obično klasifikovane u vrste događaja. U ovoj studiji se smatra da je događaj jedinica za mjerenje raznolikosti i sličnosti novinskih članaka u okviru sustava preporuke novina. Trenutni pristupi otkrivanju događaja na tipologiji nisu uspeli da se rešimo raznolikosti događaja izraženih u situacijama stvarnog svijeta. Da bi to prevarili, mi ciljamo da izvedemo klasifikaciju salijencije događaja i istražimo da li je transformatorski model sposoban da klasifikuje nove informacije u manje i više općeg predavanja. Nakon usporedbe početne linije podrške vektorske mašine (SVM) i naše klasifikacije na transformaciji na nekoliko formata razdoblja događaja, smatrali smo višeriječnim događajima kao sintaktične klauzule. Oni su nahranjeni u našu veliku klasifikaciju koja je dobro napravljena na predobučenoj holandskoj BERT reči. Na vrhu toga izvršavamo cijev slučajnog polja (CRF) pristupa detekciji reči koji okidaju događaje i klasifikaciji na BERT-u. Najbolje od našeg znanja predstavljamo prvi pristup izvlačenja događaja koji kombinira sintaktički analizator na osnovu stručnjaka sa klasifikatorom na osnovu transformer a za holandski.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Name @ info Buni oshirish uchun, biz tashkilotlar darajasini bajarish va o'zgartirish modeli yangi maʼlumotni kichkina va katta katta katta katta darajaga qarshi mumkin deb o'rganamiz. Name Ularning birinchi o'rganilgan Dutch BERT so'zlari bilan yaxshi darajaga keladi. Bu yerda biz hozir boshqaruvchi so'zni aniqlash va BERT asosida sinfni bajaramiz. Bizning eng yaxshi tajribamiz uchun birinchi hodisa uchrashuv usuli bilan birinchi ko'rinishimiz mumkin, bu ekspert-asosiy syntactik parametrlarini birlashtiradi va Dutch uchun o'zgartirish asosida darajasini birlashtiradi.", 'vi': 'Một nhiệm vụ cốt lõi trong việc trích thông tin là phát hiện sự kiện để xác định kích hoạt các sự kiện theo câu thường được phân loại thành dạng sự kiện. Trong nghiên cứu này, một sự kiện được xem là đơn vị đo đạc đa dạng và nét giống trong các bài báo trong hệ thống thông báo. Các phương pháp phát hiện sự kiện dựa vào loại học hiện thời không giải quyết được sự kiện diễn ra trong thế giới thực. Để vượt qua chuyện này, chúng tôi muốn thực hiện phân tích nổi tiếng sự kiện và tìm hiểu xem mô hình người biến đổi có thể phân loại thông tin mới vào các lớp nổi bật ngày càng phổ biến không. Sau khi so sánh một đường cơ cấu hình cỗ máy (SVM) và các trình độ phân loại dựa vào máy biến đổi của chúng tôi trên một số định dạng bao sóng sự kiện, chúng tôi đã nghĩ ra các sự kiện đa từ được bao gồm các điều hoà. Chúng được đưa vào các nhà phân loại nổi bật của chúng tôi, chỉnh sửa cẩn thận những từ trồng trọt ở Hà Lan. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi sử dụng một đường ống dẫn đến trường tình báo Ngẫu nhiên (CRF) tiếp cận việc phát hiện các từ kích hoạt sự kiện và phân loại dựa trên BERT. Theo kiến thức tốt nhất chúng tôi giới thiệu phương pháp khai thác sự kiện đầu tiên kết hợp một nhà phân tích cú pháp chuyên gia với một nhà phân loại máy biến đổi cho Hà Lan.', 'bg': 'Основна задача при извличането на информация е откриването на събития, което идентифицира задействащите събития в изречения, които обикновено са класифицирани в типове събития. В настоящото изследване събитие се разглежда като единица за измерване на разнообразието и сходството в новинарските статии в рамките на система за препоръки за новини. Настоящите типологични подходи за откриване на събития не успяват да се справят с разнообразието от събития, изразени в реални ситуации. За да преодолеем това, ние се стремим да извършим класификация на събитието и да проучим дали един трансформаторен модел е способен да класифицира нова информация в все по-малко и по-общи класове на популярност. След сравняване на базовата линия на машината за вектори за поддръжка (СВМ) и представянето на нашите класификатори на базата на трансформатори в няколко формата за диапазон на събития, ние замислихме диапазони на събития с няколко думи като синтактични клаузи. Те се подават в нашия класификатор за популярност, който е фино настроен на предварително обучени холандски вграждания на думи. Освен това ние надминаваме тръбопровод от подхода на условно случайно поле (КРФ) за откриване на думи със задействане на събития и базирания класификатор. Доколкото знаем, представяме първия подход за екстракция на събития, който съчетава експертен синтактичен анализатор с трансформаторно базиран класификатор за холандски език.', 'nl': 'Een kerntaak bij het extraheren van informatie is gebeurtenisdetectie die gebeurtenistriggers identificeert in zinnen die meestal worden ingedeeld in gebeurtenistypen. In deze studie wordt een event beschouwd als de eenheid om diversiteit en gelijkenis in nieuwsberichten te meten in het kader van een nieuwsaadvraagsysteem. De huidige typologie-gebaseerde benaderingen voor gebeurtenisdetectie kunnen niet omgaan met de verscheidenheid van gebeurtenissen die tot uiting komen in real-world situaties. Om dit te overwinnen, willen we event salience classificatie uitvoeren en onderzoeken of een transformator model in staat is nieuwe informatie te classificeren in steeds meer algemene prominentie klassen. Na het vergelijken van een Support Vector Machine (SVM) baseline en onze transformatorgebaseerde classificator prestaties op verschillende gebeurtenisspanformaten, hebben we multi-word event spans ontworpen als syntactische clausules. Deze worden ingevoerd in onze prominentie classifier die is afgestemd op voorgetrainde Nederlandse BERT woord embeddings. Bovendien presteren we beter dan een pijplijn van een Conditional Random Field (CRF) benadering voor event-trigger woorddetectie en de BERT-gebaseerde classificator. Voor zover we weten presenteren we de eerste event extraction aanpak die een expert based syntactische parser combineert met een transformator based classifier voor Nederlands.', 'da': 'En kerneopgave i informationsudvinding er hændelsesdetektering, der identificerer hændelsesudløsere i sætninger, der typisk klassificeres i hændelsestyper. I denne undersøgelse betragtes en begivenhed som enheden til at måle mangfoldighed og lighed i nyhedsartikler inden for rammerne af et nyhedsanbefalingssystem. Nuværende typologiske tilgange til registrering af hændelser undlader at håndtere de forskellige begivenheder, der udtrykkes i virkelige situationer. For at overvinde dette har vi til formål at udføre hændelsesfremstillingsklassificering og undersøge, om en transformermodel er i stand til at klassificere nye oplysninger i mindre og mere generelle fremtrædende klasser. Efter at have sammenlignet en Support Vector Machine (SVM) baseline og vores transformer-baserede klassificeringsydelser på flere hændelsesspan formater, udtænkte vi multi-word event spans som syntaktiske sætninger. Disse indsættes i vores fremtrædende klassificering, som er finjusteret på forududdannede hollandske BERT-ord indlejringer. Derudover overgår vi en pipeline af en Conditional Random Field (CRF) tilgang til hændelsesudløser ordregistrering og BERT-baseret klassificering. Så vidt vi ved, præsenterer vi den første tilgang til eventudvinding, der kombinerer en ekspertbaseret syntaktisk fortolker med en transformerbaseret klassificering til hollandsk.', 'hr': 'Osnovni zadatak u izvlačenju informacija je otkrivanje događaja koji identificira događaj koji pokreće rečenice koje su obično klasifikirane u vrste događaja. U ovom ispitivanju smatra se događaj jedinica za mjerenje raznolikosti i sličnosti novinskih članaka u okviru sustava preporuke vijesti. Trenutni pristupi otkrivanju događaja na temelju tipologije nisu riješili raznolikost događaja izraženih u situacijama stvarnog svijeta. Da bi to prevazili, ciljevi smo izvršiti klasifikaciju salijencije događaja i istražiti je li model transformer a sposoban klasifikaciji novih informacija u manje i više općeg klasa prednosti. Nakon usporedbe početne linije podrške vektorskog stroja (SVM) i naših klasifikacija na transformatorskom temelju na nekoliko formata razdoblja događaja, zamislili smo višeriječne mjere događaja kao sintaktične klauzule. Oni su nahranjeni u našu veliku klasifikaciju koja je dobro napravljena na predobučenoj holandskoj BERT riječi. Nadalje, izvršavamo cijevi uslovnog slučajnog polja (CRF) pristupa otkrivanju riječi koji pokreću događaje i klasifikaciji na BERT-u. Najbolje od naših znanja predstavljamo prvi pristup izvlačenja događaja koji kombinira sintaktički analizač na stručnim temeljima sa klasifikatorom na transformaciji za nizozemske.', 'de': 'Eine Kernaufgabe in der Informationsextraktion ist die Ereigniserkennung, die Ereignisauslöser in Sätzen identifiziert, die typischerweise in Ereignistypen klassifiziert werden. In dieser Studie wird ein Event als Einheit zur Messung von Diversität und Ähnlichkeit von Nachrichtenartikeln im Rahmen eines Nachrichtenempfehlungssystems betrachtet. Aktuelle typologiebasierte Ereigniserkennungsansätze können die Vielfalt der Ereignisse, die in realen Situationen zum Ausdruck kommen, nicht bewältigen. Um dies zu überwinden, wollen wir eine Event Salience Klassifizierung durchführen und untersuchen, ob ein Transformatormodell in der Lage ist, neue Informationen in immer weniger allgemeine Prominenz Klassen einzuordnen. Nach dem Vergleich einer Support Vector Machine (SVM)-Baseline und unserer transformatorbasierten Klassifikator-Performance auf mehreren Event-Spann-Formaten konzipierten wir Multi-Word-Event-Spanns als syntaktische Klauseln. Diese werden in unseren Prominenz-Klassifikator eingespeist, der auf vorgetrainierten niederländischen BERT-Wort-Einbettungen fein abgestimmt ist. Darüber hinaus übertreffen wir eine Pipeline eines Conditional Random Field (CRF)-Ansatzes zur Ereignistrigger-Worterkennung und den BERT-basierten Klassifikator. Nach bestem Wissen präsentieren wir den ersten Ansatz zur Ereignisextraktion, der einen expertenbasierten syntaktischen Parser mit einem transformatorbasierten Klassifikator für Niederländisch kombiniert.', 'id': 'Tugas utama dalam ekstraksi informasi adalah deteksi peristiwa yang mengidentifikasi pemicu peristiwa dalam kalimat yang biasanya diklasifikasikan ke jenis peristiwa. In this study an event is considered as the unit to measure diversity and similarity in news articles in the framework of a news recommendation system.  Pendekatan deteksi peristiwa tipologi saat ini gagal menangani berbagai peristiwa yang diungkapkan dalam situasi dunia nyata. Untuk mengatasi hal ini, kita bermaksud untuk melakukan klasifikasi saliensi peristiwa dan mengeksplorasi apakah model transformer mampu klasifikasi informasi baru ke kelas promiensi yang lebih rendah dan lebih umum. Setelah membandingkan dasar mesin vektor dukungan (SVM) dan pertunjukan klasifikasi kami berdasarkan transformer pada beberapa format jangkauan peristiwa, kami merancang jangkauan peristiwa multi-kata sebagai klausul sintaksi. Mereka dimakan ke dalam klasifikasi prominence kami yang disesuaikan dengan baik pada praselatih Belanda BERT kata embedding. Di atas itu kita melebihi saluran pipa dari pendekatan Conditional Random Field (CRF) untuk deteksi kata event-trigger dan klasifikasi berdasarkan BERT. Menurut pengetahuan terbaik kita memperkenalkan pendekatan ekstraksi peristiwa pertama yang menggabungkan parser sintaksi berbasis ahli dengan klasifikasi berbasis transformer untuk Belanda.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya msingi katika utoaji wa habari ni kutambua tukio linalotambua tukio hilo linaleta katika hukumu ambazo kwa kawaida huwekwa katika aina ya tukio. Katika utafiti huu, tukio hili linachukuliwa kama kituo cha kupima utofauti na usawa katika makala za habari katika mfumo wa mapendekezo ya habari. Kugundua matukio yanayotokana na mtindo wa sasa yanashindwa kukabiliana na matukio mbalimbali yanayooneshwa katika hali halisi ya dunia. Kwa kushinda hili, tunalenga kutekeleza darasa la usambazaji wa tukio na kutambua kama mtindo wa mabadiliko una uwezo wa kutangaza taarifa mpya katika darasa ndogo na kubwa zaidi. Baada ya kulinganisha msingi wa mashine ya mkono (SVM) na michoro yetu ya usambazaji wa mabadiliko kwa namna kadhaa za matukio, tulianzisha matukio mengi ya maneno kama makubaliano ya ushirikiano. Vile vinaendelewa kwenye mwandishi wetu maarufu ambao unaonyeshwa vizuri kwa neno lililofunzwa kabla la Uholanzi BERT. Zaidi ya hilo tunatengeneza picha ya msimamo wa hali ya kawaida (CRF) ili kupata uchunguzi wa maneno yanayotokea na mwangazaji wa BERT. Kwa maarifa bora zaidi tunailetea mbinu ya kwanza ya kutengeneza matukio ambayo inaunganisha mchanganyiko wa usambazaji wenye asili ya wataalam na mfanyakazi wa mabadiliko kwa ajili ya Uholanzi.', 'ko': '정보 추출의 핵심 임무는 이벤트 검출이다. 문장의 이벤트 트리거를 식별할 수 있으며, 이 문장들은 일반적으로 이벤트 유형으로 구분된다.본 연구에서 뉴스 추천 시스템의 구조에서 사건은 뉴스 문장의 다양성과 유사성을 평가하는 단위로 간주된다.현재 유형학을 바탕으로 하는 사건 검출 방법은 현실 세계에서 표현된 각종 사건을 처리할 수 없다.이를 극복하기 위해 우리의 목표는 사건의 현저성 분류를 하고transformer모델이 새로운 정보를 점점 적어지는 일반적인 현저성 분류로 분류할 수 있는지를 탐색하는 것이다.벡터 머신 (SVM) 기선을 지원하는 분류기와 변환기를 기반으로 하는 분류기가 몇 가지 이벤트 광도 형식에서의 성능을 비교한 후, 우리는 다사 이벤트 광도를 문장법으로 구상할 것이다.이러한 정보는 우리의 현저성 분류기에 입력되고, 이 분류기는 미리 훈련된 네덜란드어 단어에 따라 삽입되어 미세하게 조정된다.그 밖에 우리는 이벤트 트리거어 검출에 있어서 조건랜덤장(CRF) 방법과 버트 기반 분류기보다 우수하다.우리가 알기로는 전문가를 바탕으로 하는 문법 분석기와 변환기를 바탕으로 하는Dutch분류기를 결합시키는 첫 번째 이벤트 추출 방법을 제시했다.', 'tr': 'Maglumaty tapmakda esasy täblisasy evet tanamakdır. hatlary düýbünden tertiblendirilýan eserler hillerde tanamakdır. Bu aramda täzelikler täzelikleri we meňzeşlik sistemasynda täzelikleri we meňzeşliklerini ölçürmek üçin bir hereket diýip kabul edilýär. Häzirki tipologiýa daýanýan çykyş açylyp başarmady çykyş çykyşlary çykyp bilmeýär. Bu üstüne çykmak üçin biz çykyş taýýarlaryň klasifikasyny ýerine ýetirmek we üýtgetmek üçin bir nusgasyň täze informasiýa azak we umumy wajyp synplara klasifikasyny başarap bilmeýändigini gözlemäge maksat edýäris. Bir destek vektör makinesini (SVM) baseline ve transformatörümizdeki klassifik eserlerini birnäçe olar şeklinde karşılaştıran soňra, birnäçe kelime evelleri sintaktik klawuslar olarak kabul etdik. Olar biziň uly klasifikatymyza süýtgedilýär. Olar öňünden okuwçy Holandiýa BERT sözlerimizde süýtgedilýär. Üst üstünde olara tetikleyici söz tanımlaması we BERT tabanlı klasifikatçylara bir kara çizgisini çykardık. Bilgimiziň iň gowurak üçin, Hollanda üçin örnekli tabanly sintaktik çözümlerini birleştirip, birinji olar çıkarma metodumuzu sunuyoruz.', 'fa': 'یک کار اصلی در اخراج اطلاعات، شناسایی رویداد است که رویداد را شناسایی می\u200cکند در جمله\u200cها که معمولاً به نوع رویداد راهنمایی می\u200cشوند. در این مطالعه یک رویداد به عنوان واحد برای اندازه گوناگونی و شباهت در مجموعه های خبری در چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار شناسایی حادثه\u200cهای فعلی بر اساس تایپولوژی فعلی در موقعیت جهانی واقعی به دست بردن مختلف حادثه\u200cها شکست خورد. برای تغییر این کار، ما هدف می\u200cگیریم که کلاس تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cها را انجام دهیم و بفهمیم آیا یک مدل تغییر\u200cدهنده قادر است که اطلاعات جدید را به کلاس\u200cهای تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cهای کمتر و بیشتر کلاس\u200cهای عمومی کلاس\u200cهای بزرگ بعد از مقایسه کردن یک ماشین پشتیبانی ویکتور (SVM) پایین خط و اجرای classifier بر اساس تغییر دهنده ما در چندین شکل\u200cهای طول برنامه\u200cهای رویداد، رویداد چندین کلمه را به عنوان کلمه\u200cهای سنتاکتیک تصور کردیم. اونا به محرمانه ي بزرگ ما غذا داده ميشن که در کلمه هاي قبل آموزش داده شده هلندي برت تغيير داده ميشه بالای آن، ما یک لوله از طریق تصادفی (CRF) به شناسایی کلمات فشار رویداد و کلمات فشار بر روی BERT اجرا می\u200cکنیم. برای بهترین دانش ما اولین روش اخراج رویداد را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک متخصص سنتاکتیک بر اساس متخصص با یک متخصص\u200cگر بر اساس تغییر دهنده برای هلندی را ترکیب می\u200cکند.', 'af': "@ info: whatsthis In hierdie studie is 'n gebeurtenis aangesien as die eenheid om verskeidigheid en gelykheid te maak in nuusartikels in die raamwerk van 'n nuusrekening stelsel. Huidige tipologie-gebaseerde gebeurtenis beskrywing toegang het misluk om die verskillende gebeurtenis in reël- wêreld situasies te hanteer. Om hierdie oorwinning te doen, doen ons doel om gebeurtenis saliensklassifikasie te doen en te ondersoek of 'n transformeermodel kan klassifiseer nuwe inligting in minder en meer algemene prominens klasse. Na vergelyking van 'n ondersteunde vektor masjien (SVM) basislien en ons transformer- gebaseerde klassifiseerder uitvoerings op verskeie gebeurtenis spans formate, het ons multiwoord gebeurtenis spans as sintaktieke klauses geneem. Dit is gevoer in ons prominence klassifiseerder wat is fyn-tuned op vooraf-onderwerp Dutch BERT woord inbêding. Op daardie bo ons uitvoer 'n pyplyn van' n Voorkeure Lukrake Veld (CRF) toegang na gebeurtenis- trigger woord beskrywing en die BERT- gebaseerde klassifiseerder. Op die beste van ons kennis, voorsien ons die eerste gebeurtenis uittrekking toegang wat 'n ekspertiseerde-gebaseerde sintakteel ontwerker kombinieer met 'n transformer-gebaseerde klassifiseerder vir Nederland.", 'sq': 'A core task in information extraction is event detection that identifies event triggers in sentences that are typically classified into event types.  Në këtë studim një ngjarje konsiderohet si njësi për të matur diversitetin dhe ngjashmërinë në artikujt e lajmeve në kuadrin e një sistemi rekomandimi të lajmeve. Përqasjet aktuale të zbulimit të ngjarjeve bazuar në tipologji dështojnë të trajtojnë ndryshimin e ngjarjeve të shprehura në situatat e botës reale. Për të kapërcyer këtë, ne synojmë të kryejmë klasifikimin e ngjarjeve të rëndësishme dhe të eksplorojmë nëse një model transformues është i aftë të klasifikojë informacion të ri në klasa më të vogla dhe më të përgjithshme të rëndësishme. Pas krahasimit të një baze të një Makinë Vektorore të Mbështetjes (SVM) dhe shfaqjeve tona të klasifikuesve të bazuar në transformuesit në disa formate të fushës së ngjarjeve, ne krijuam fushë ngjarjesh me shumë fjalë si klauzula sintaktike. Ato janë ushqyer në klasifikuesin tonë të shquar i cili është i përshtatur në fjalë të paratrajnuara hollandeze BERT. Përveç kësaj ne kryejmë një tubacion të një qasje të fushës së rastësishme kushtuese (CRF) për zbulimin e fjalëve ngjarje-shkaktuese dhe klasifikuesin bazuar në BERT. Për më të mirën e njohurive tona ne paraqesim qasjen e parë të nxjerrjes së ngjarjeve që kombinon një analizues sintaktik bazuar në ekspertë me një klasifikues bazuar në transformues për hollandezët.', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር በዚህ ትምህርት ጉዳዩ የዜና ጉዳይ ስርዓት ውጤት በዜና ቃላት ውስጥ ልዩ ልዩነት እና ብጤነት እንዲመስል ተያየዋል፡፡ Current typology-based event detection approaches fail to handle the variety of events expressed in real-world situations.  ይህንን ለማሸንፍ አዲስ መረጃዎችን ወደ ታናሹ እና አብዛኛዎቹ ክፍሎች ለመለየት የሚችል እንደሆነ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የድጋፍ ሜክሮር መኪን (SVM) መሳሳይ እና የtransformer-based classifier ፍሬዎችን በብዙ ሁኔታ ሳን ፎርማት ካስተያየን በኋላ የብዙ ቃላት ግንኙነታችንን እንደ Syntactic ክፍሎች አቀረብን፡፡ እነዚህም አስቀድሞ ተማሪ የዳርቻ BERT ቃላት በመጠቀም ወደሚሰጡት ለታላቁ ክፍላፊያችን ናቸው፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የኢንተርኔት ቃላትን ለማግኘት እና የBERT-based መግለጫ ለመጠየቅ የሚደረገውን የሥልጣን መሬት መክፈቻን እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተሻለ እውቀታችን የፊተኛውን የውጤት ውጤት ማቀናቀል እናቀርባታለን፡፡ ለኬልክ በተለወጠው የስንታታክ ተሳታፊውን እናስገድዳለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Ինֆորմացիայի վերացման հիմնական խնդիրը իրադարձությունների հայտնաբերումն է, որը հայտնաբերում է իրադարձությունների սկիզբները նախադասություններում, որոնք սովորաբար դասակարգում են իրադարձությունների տեսակների մեջ: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մի իրադարձություն համարվում է բազմազանությունը և նմանությունը չափելու միավոր նորությունների հոդվածներում նորությունների խորհուրդների համակարգի շրջանակներում: Current typology-based event detection approaches fail to handle the variety of events expressed in real-world situations.  Այս ամենը հաղթահարելու համար մենք նպատակում ենք կատարել իրադարձությունների արտահայտության դասակարգման և ուսումնասիրել, արդյոք վերափոխողի մոդելը կարող է դասակարգել նոր տեղեկատվություն ավելի ու ավելի ընդհանուր արտահայտության դասերի: Համեմատելուց հետո, երբ համեմատեցինք աջակցության մեքենայի (VVM) հիմնական արտահայտությունը և մեր վերափոխողի հիմնական դասակարգման արտահայտությունները մի քանի իրադարձությունների տարածման ֆորմատների վրա, մենք բազմաբառ արտահայտությունների տարածումները ստեղծեցինք որ Նրանք կերակրում են մեր հայտնի դասակարգչի մեջ, որը լավ կազմակերպված է նախապատրաստված հոլանդական BERT բառերի ներգրավման վրա: Ավելին, մենք գերազանցում ենք անհրաժեշտ պատահական դաշտի (ՀԿՀ) խողովակաշարը իրադարձությունների-խթանիչ բառերի հայտնաբերման և BER-ի հիմնված դասակարգչի համար: Մեր լավագույն գիտելիքներից մենք ներկայացնում ենք առաջին իրադարձությունների դուրս բերման մոտեցումը, որը համադրում է մասնագետների հիմնված սինտակտիկ վերլուծողը հոլանդացիների վերլուծողի հիմնված դասակարգչի հետ:', 'bn': 'তথ্য বিনিময়ে একটি মূল কাজ হচ্ছে ইভেন্ট সনাক্ত করা যায় যা সাধারণত অনুষ্ঠানের ধরনে বিভিন্ন ধরনে সংশ্লিষ্ট করা হয়। এই গবেষণায় একটি অনুষ্ঠান হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা হচ্ছে একটি সংবাদ সুপারিশ সিস্টেমের ফ্রেমে সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের বৈচিত্র্য এব বর্তমান টাইপোলিজি ভিত্তিক অনুষ্ঠানের সনাক্তি ব্যর্থ হয়েছে বাস্তব বিশ্বের পরিস্থিতিতে প্রকাশিত বিভিন্ন ঘটন এই বিষয়টিকে জয়ী করার জন্য আমরা উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছি অনুষ্ঠানের ব্যবসায়ীদের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ক্লাস করা এবং পরীক্ষা করা যাচ্ছি যে একটি  একটি সমর্থন ভেক্টর মেশিন (এসভিএম) বেসারে তুলনা করার পর এবং বেশ কয়েকটি অনুষ্ঠানের স্পেন ফরম্যাটে আমাদের পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক ক ক্লাসিফারের প্রদর্শনের পর এগুলো আমাদের বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের মধ্যে খাওয়ানো হয়েছে যা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ডাচ বিরেট শব্দের বিভিন্ন ভাষায় ভালোভাব এর উপরে আমরা একটি পরিস্থিতির স্থানান্তরিক ক্ষেত্রের (সিএসএফ) পাইপেলাইন ব্যবহার করি অনুষ্ঠান-ট্রিগার শব্দ আবিষ্কার এবং বিবেরেট-ভিত্ আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালোভাবে আমরা প্রথম অনুষ্ঠান নির্বাচনের ক্ষেত্রে উপস্থিত করছি যা এক বিশেষজ্ঞ ভিত্তিক সিন্ট্যাকটিক', 'az': 'Malümatı çıxartmaqda olan məqsədil işi olaraq tanımlayan olaraq, olaraq olaraq cümlələrdə sıralanmış olaraq başlayır. Bu təcrübədə xəbər tövsiyə sistemində xəbər məsələlərində müxtəlif və bənzər məsələləri ölçürmək üçün bir təcrübə kimi hesab edilir. Hazırkı tipologiya tabanlı olaraq tanıtma yaxınlıqları gerçek dünya şəkilində ifadə edilən müxtəlif olaraq istifadə edilmədi. Bunu üstün etmək üçün, olaraq salinci klasifikasyonu təyin etmək və bir transformer modeli yeni məlumatları daha az və daha genel ünvanlı sınıflara dəyişə biləcəyini keşfetmək istəyirik. Əməl Vektör Makinesini (SVM) sintaktik clausu olaraq qarşılaşdırdıqdan sonra, bir çox-söz olaraq sintaktik clausu olaraq, transformer-tabanlı klassifik performanslarımızı müəyyən etdik. Bunlar bizim böyük klasifikatımıza verilmişdir. Bunlar öyrənmiş Hollandi BERT sözlərində müəyyən edilmişdir. Üstündə də olaraq təhlükəsizlik alanın (CRF) tərəfindən və BERT tabanlı sözləri keşfetməyə yaxınlaşmasının boru çizgisini a şırıq. Bizim elmimizin ən yaxşısına ilk olaraq çıxartma approach göstəririk ki, ekspertlər-tabanlı sintaktik ayırıcı ilə dülandırıcı-tabanlı klasifikatçı ilə birləşdirir.', 'cs': 'Hlavním úkolem v extrakci informací je detekce událostí, která identifikuje spouštěče událostí ve větách, které jsou typicky klasifikovány do typů událostí. V této práci je akce považována za jednotku měření diverzity a podobnosti ve zpravodajských článcích v rámci systému doporučení zpravodajství. Současné přístupy k detekci událostí založené na typologii nedokážou zvládnout rozmanitost událostí vyjádřených v reálných situacích. Abychom to překonali, usilujeme o klasifikaci událostí a zkoumání, zda je transformátorový model schopen klasifikovat nové informace do méně obecných tříd prominence. Po porovnání základního principu SVM (Support Vector Machine) a výkonu klasifikátoru založeného na transformátoru na několika formátech rozpětí událostí jsme koncipovali víceslovné rozpětí událostí jako syntaktické klauzule. Ty jsou přiváděny do našeho významného klasifikátoru, který je jemně vyladěn na předškolených nizozemských vloženích slov BERT. Navíc překonáme potrubí podmíněného náhodného pole (CRF) pro detekci slov spouštějících události a klasifikátor založený na BERT. Podle našich nejlepších znalostí představujeme první přístup extrakce událostí, který kombinuje syntaktický parser založený na expertech s klasifikátorem založeným na transformátoru pro Dutch.', 'bs': 'Glavni zadatak u izvlačenju informacija je otkrivanje događaja koji identificira događaj koji pokreće rečenice koje su obično klasifikirane u vrste događaja. U ovom ispitivanju se smatra da je događaj jedinica za mjerenje raznolikosti i sličnosti novinskih članaka u okviru sustava preporuke novina. Trenutni pristupi otkrivanju događaja na tipologiji nisu uspjeli riješiti razne događaje izražene u situacijama realnog svijeta. Da bi to prevarili, ciljamo izvršiti klasifikaciju salijencije događaja i istražiti je li model transformer a sposoban da klasifikuje nove informacije u manje i više općeg klasa prednosti. Nakon usporedbe početne linije podrške vektorske mašine (SVM) i naše klasifikacije na transformaciji na nekoliko formata razdoblja događaja, zamislili smo da se višeriječni događaji šire kao sintaktične klauzule. Oni su nahranjeni u našu veliku klasifikaciju koja je dobro napravljena na predobučenoj holandskoj BERT riječi. Nadalje, izvršavamo cijev uslovnog slučajnog polja (CRF) pristupa otkrivanju riječi koji pokreću događaje i klasifikaciji na BERT-u. Najbolje od naših znanja predstavljamo prvi pristup izvlačenja događaja koji kombinira sintaktički analizač na osnovu stručnjaka sa klasifikatorom na transformatoru za holandski.', 'et': 'Teabe hankimise põhiülesanne on sündmuste tuvastamine, mis tuvastab sündmuste käivitajad lausetes, mis on tavaliselt klassifitseeritud sündmuste tüüpidesse. Uuringus käsitletakse sündmust kui uudisteartiklite mitmekesisuse ja sarnasuse mõõtmise üksust uudistesoovitussüsteemi raames. Praegused tüpoloogiapõhised sündmuste tuvastamise meetodid ei suuda käsitleda reaalsetes olukordades väljendatud sündmuste mitmekesisust. Selle ületamiseks püüame läbi viia sündmuste silmapaistvuse klassifitseerimine ja uurida, kas trafomodel suudab klassifitseerida uut infot üha vähem üldistesse silmapaistvuse klassidesse. Pärast tugivektori masina (SVM) algväärtuse ja meie trafopõhise klassifikaatori jõudluste võrdlemist mitmes sündmuste ulatuse vormingus kujundasime mitmesõnalised süntaktilised laused. Need sisaldavad meie silmapaistvat klassifikaatorit, mis on täpselt häälestatud eelnevalt koolitatud Hollandi BERT sõna manustamisel. Lisaks sellele ületame tingimusliku juhusväli (CRF) lähenemisviisi sündmuste käivitamise sõna tuvastamiseks ja BERT-põhise klassifikaatori. Parimate teadmiste kohaselt tutvustame esimest sündmuste ekstraheerimise lähenemisviisi, mis ühendab ekspertpõhise süntaktilise parseri ja Hollandi trafopõhise klassifikaatoriga.', 'ca': "Una tasca central en l'extracció d'informació és la detecció d'esdeveniments que identifica els desencadenants d'esdeveniments en frases que són típicament classificades en tipus d'esdeveniments. En aquest estudi, un esdeveniment es considera l'unitat per mesurar la diversitat i la similitud en els articles de notícies en el marc d'un sistema de recomendació de notícies. Current typology-based event detection approaches fail to handle the variety of events expressed in real-world situations.  Per superar això, volem fer la classificació de saliència d'eventos i explorar si un model de transformador és capaç de classificar la nova informació en classes de prominença cada cop més generals. Després de comparar la base d'una màquina de Suport Vector (SVM) i la nostra actuació de classificador basada en transformadors en diversos formats d'ampliació d'eventos, vam concebir l'ampliació d'eventos de múltiples paraules com clàusules sinàctiques. Aquests són alimentats en el nostre classificador de prominença que està perfeccionat en embediments de paraules neerlandeses BERT. A més d'això, superem un gasoduc d'un enfocament Condicional Random Field (CRF) a la detecció de paraules que provoquen esdeveniments i el classificador basat en BERT. En el millor dels nostres coneixements presentem el primer enfocament d'extracció d'eventos que combina un analitzador sinàctic basat en experts amb un classificador basat en transformadors per holandès.", 'fi': 'Tiedonhankinnan ydintehtävä on tapahtumantunnistus, joka tunnistaa tapahtumalaukaisijat lauseissa, jotka luokitellaan tyypillisesti tapahtumatyyppeihin. Tässä tutkimuksessa tapahtuma katsotaan uutisten monimuotoisuutta ja samankaltaisuutta mittaavaksi yksiköksi uutissuositusjärjestelmän puitteissa. Nykyiset typologiaan perustuvat tapahtumantunnistusmenetelmät eivät pysty käsittelemään todellisten tilanteiden moninaisuutta. Tämän ratkaisemiseksi pyrimme suorittamaan tapahtumasalienssin luokittelun ja selvittämään, pystyykö muuntajamalli luokittelemaan uuden tiedon yhä yleisemmiin näkyvyysluokkoihin. Verrattuamme SVM (Support Vector Machine) -perusarvoa muuntajapohjaiseen luokittelijaamme useissa tapahtumaväliformaateissa, kehitimme monisanaiset tapahtumaalueet syntaktisiksi lauseiksi. Ne syötetään näkyvään luokitukseemme, joka on hienosäädetty valmiiksi koulutetuissa hollantilaisissa BERT-sanaupotuksissa. Tämän lisäksi suoritamme paremmin kuin ehdollisen satunnaiskentän (CRF) menetelmän (Conditional Random Field) -menetelmän (Event-trigger word Detection) ja BERT-pohjaisen luokittelijan. Parhaan tietomme mukaan esittelemme ensimmäisen tapahtumauuttoprosessin, jossa yhdistyy asiantuntijapohjainen syntaktinen jäsentäjä muuntajapohjainen luokittelija hollannille.', 'ha': "Wani aikin da ke ƙari cikin shirin zartar da information is an gane event that na gane event take fara cikin azãba waɗanda aka typically rarraba su cikin nau'in event. A cikin wannan lõkaci, an ƙaddara wani tukio kamar shirin ya ƙaddara masu yin motsi da masu daidaita cikin cikin sunan na lãbãra cikin bakin wani na'urar da aka shawarar da shi. @ info Ga mu rinjãya wannan, za mu yi amfani da su sami fasalin alama masu aikin ayuka kuma mu gane ko an iya iya iya iya sami-motsi da za'a iya rarraba zane-yanzu zuwa darafõfi mafi ƙaranci kuma mafi girma. @ info Those are fed into our prominence classifier which is fine-tuned on pre-trained Dutch BERT word embeddings.  Bayan wannan, Munã tafiyar da wata pipilin na wata Fifield na Kwamfyuta wanda ya ƙayyade (CRF) zuwa gano-gane magana na-fara da fassarar BERT-based. Ga mafi kyaun sanyinmu, ba mu halatar da hanyarwa na farkon aikin aiki wanda ke haɗa wani na masu bastarwa na sami da wani daraja mai shigewa a kan Dukkan.", 'sk': 'Glavna naloga pri pridobivanju informacij je zaznavanje dogodkov, ki identificira sprožilce dogodkov v stavkih, ki so običajno razvrščeni v vrste dogodkov. V tej študiji se dogodek obravnava kot enota za merjenje raznolikosti in podobnosti novinarskih člankov v okviru sistema priporočil novic. Trenutni pristopi za odkrivanje dogodkov, ki temeljijo na tipologiji, ne obvladujejo različnih dogodkov, izraženih v realnih situacijah. Da bi to premagali, želimo izvesti klasifikacijo dogodkovne izpostavljenosti in raziskati, ali je transformatorski model sposoben klasificirati nove informacije v vse manj splošne razrede prepoznavnosti. Po primerjavi osnovne osnove podpornega vektorskega stroja (SVM) in učinkovitosti klasifikatorja na podlagi transformatorjev na več formatih razpona dogodkov smo zasnovali večbesedne razpone dogodkov kot sintaktične klavzule. Ti so vključeni v naš razvrščevalnik uglednosti, ki je natančno nastavljen na vnaprej usposobljene nizozemske besede BERT. Poleg tega smo izboljšali cevovod pristopa pogojnega naključnega polja (CRF) za zaznavanje besed s sprožilcem dogodkov in klasifikator, ki temelji na BERT. Po našem najboljšem znanju predstavljamo prvi pristop ekstrakcije dogodkov, ki združuje strokovno osnovan sintaktični razčlenjevalec s transformatorskim klasifikatorjem za nizozemščino.', 'jv': 'task Nang kuwi jenis iki, meh sawetara sistem kanggo kuwi nggawe sistem sing berarti karo kalih lan gambaran ning artik balêh kanggo nggawe sistem kuturangan barang dhéwé. Digawe Type Sing ngelarane iki, awak dhéwé aksi kanggo kelas alih dumadhi akéwé lan gewusegno balé transformer model sing bisa gabung nggawe informasi empya kanggo mbalk ilegal gawe nguasai luwih dumadhi iki. After conversing a supported vector Device (SVM) basic line and the transformer-supported Pas barêng-barêng langkung winih kanggo kelas-barêng sing dibêngé awak dhéwé. Drongen kuwi perintah sing dibêngé awak dhéwé, sing titingé awak dhéwé beraksi sing perangé BERT kuwi. Learn Mode Awak dhéwé, ngéwé ngerasakno kanggo awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo ngono dodol sing katêpakan karo seneng pisar sing paling ngregani acara dhéwé', 'bo': 'གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ལས་ཀར་བ་ཞིག་ནི་བྱ་འགུལ་བཤད་རྟོགས་བྱུང་ལས་ངོས་འཛིན་ཏེ། ལྟ་བ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བྱ་ཚིག་ཞིག་དག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་མཐུན་པ་ཚོ་རྩིས་ཅན་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན་པས། Current typology-based event detection approaches fail to handle the variety of events expressed in real-world situations. To overcome this, we aim to perform event salience classification and explore whether a transformer model is able to classify new information into less and more general prominence classes. After comparing a Support Vector Machine (SVM) baseline and our transformer-based classifier performances on several event span formats, we conceived multi-word event spans as syntactic clauses. འདི་དག་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་གཙོ་ཅན་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་འཇུག་སྟེ། On top of that we outperform a pipeline of a Conditional Random Field (CRF) approach to event-trigger word detection and the BERT-based classifier. ང་ཚོའི་ཤེས་ཚོའི་གྲངས་ཤེས་ཚད་དགའ་པོ་ལ་ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་གསལ་རྗེས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དང་མཉམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་གྱི་དབ', 'he': 'משימה בעיקרית בהוציאת מידע היא גילוי אירועים שמזהים את הפעילים של אירועים במשפטים שמסוגרים בדרך כלל לסוגי אירועים. במחקר הזה אירוע נחשב כיחידה למדוד מגוון ודומה במאמרים חדשות במסגרת מערכת המלצות חדשות. הגישות הנוכחיות של גילוי אירועים מבוססים בטיפולוגיה לא מסוגלות להתמודד עם מגוון האירועים המוביעים במצבים בעולם האמיתי. To overcome this, we aim to perform event salience classification and explore whether a transformer model is capable of classifying new information into less and more general prominence classes.  לאחר שיווה ביקור של מכונת Vector תמיכה (SVM) והמופעות המסגרת המבוססת על המעבר שלנו על מספר פורמטים מגוון אירועים, קיבלנו מגוון אירועים רבים מילים כקלאסים סינטקטיים. אלה מואכילים לתוך מסגרת הבהירות שלנו אשר מעודכנת על מילים בהולנדית ברט מאומנת מראש. On top of that we outperform a pipeline of a Conditional Random Field (CRF) approach to event-trigger word detection and the BERT-based classifier.  למיטב הידע שלנו אנחנו מציגים את הגישה הראשונה להוציא אירוע שמשולבת מעבד סינטקטי מבוסס מומחה עם מעבד מסומם על מעבר להולנדי.'}
{'en': 'Automatic Detection and Classification of Mental Illnesses from General Social Media Texts', 'fr': 'Détection et classification automatiques des maladies mentales à partir de textes généraux sur les réseaux sociaux', 'ar': 'الاكتشاف التلقائي وتصنيف الأمراض العقلية من نصوص وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي العامة', 'es': 'Detección y clasificación automática de enfermedades mentales a partir de textos generales de redes sociales', 'pt': 'Detecção automática e classificação de doenças mentais a partir de textos gerais de mídia social', 'ja': '一般的なソーシャルメディアテキストからの精神疾患の自動検出と分類', 'zh': '自社交媒体文本自动检测类精神疾病', 'ru': 'Автоматическое обнаружение и классификация психических заболеваний из общих текстов социальных сетей', 'hi': 'सामान्य सोशल मीडिया ग्रंथों से मानसिक बीमारियों का स्वचालित पता लगाना और वर्गीकरण', 'ga': 'Aimsiú Uathoibríoch agus Aicmiú Tinnis Meabhrach ó Théacsanna Ginearálta na Meáin Shóisialta', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედია ტექსტიდან მენტალური დაავადება და კლასიფიკაცია', 'el': 'Αυτόματη ανίχνευση και ταξινόμηση ψυχικών παθήσεων από τα γενικά κείμενα κοινωνικών μέσων', 'hu': 'Mentális betegségek automatikus felismerése és osztályozása általános közösségi média szövegekből', 'kk': 'Жалпы социалдық медиа мәтіндерінің мәтіндерінен мәзірлік ауруларын автоматты түрде анықтау және классификациялау', 'it': 'Rilevazione automatica e classificazione delle malattie mentali da testi generali sui social media', 'lt': 'Automatinis psichikos ligų nustatymas ir klasifikavimas iš bendrosios socialinės žiniasklaidos tekstų', 'ml': 'സാമൂഹിക മെഡിയാ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള മെന്റല്\u200d അപകടത്തിന്റെ സ്വയം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Automatic Detection and Classification of Mental Illnesses from General Social Media Texts', 'ms': 'Pengesanan dan Klasifikasi Automatik Kesakitan Mental dari Teks Media Sosial Umum', 'pl': 'Automatyczne wykrywanie i klasyfikacja chorób psychicznych z ogólnych tekstów mediów społecznościowych', 'no': 'Automatisk oppdaging og klassifisering av menylige illegale frå generelle sosiale mediatekstar', 'ro': 'Detectarea automată și clasificarea bolilor mintale din textele generale de social media', 'mn': 'Олон нийгмийн Мэдээлэл Мэдээлэл Мэдээлэл Мэдээлэл', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම පාළුවෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පරීක්ෂණය සහ ක්\u200dලාසිකය', 'mk': 'Автоматско детектирање и класификација на ментални болести од генералните социјални медиуми', 'sv': 'Automatisk upptäckt och klassificering av psykiska sjukdomar från allmänna texter på sociala medier', 'sr': 'Automatski otkrivanje i klasifikacija mentalnih bolesti iz tekstova generala socijalnih medija', 'ur': 'جنرال سوسیل میڈیا متکسٹ سے ذهنی بیماریوں کی آگاہ اور کلسیفن', 'ta': 'பொது சமூக ஊடக உரைகளிலிருந்து தானாகவே கண்டறிதல் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'so': 'Automatic detection and Classification of mental ills from General Social Media Texts', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện và phân tích tâm thần từ Văn bản phương tiện chung', 'bg': 'Автоматично откриване и класифициране на психични заболявания от общи текстове в социалните медии', 'hr': 'Automatski otkrivanje i klasifikacija mentalnih bolesti iz teksta općeg socijalnog medija', 'nl': 'Automatische detectie en classificatie van psychische aandoeningen uit algemene sociale media teksten', 'da': 'Automatisk påvisning og klassificering af psykiske sygdomme fra almindelige tekster på sociale medier', 'id': 'Deteksi dan Klasifikasi Otomatis Penyakit Mental dari Teks Media Sosial Umum', 'de': 'Automatische Erkennung und Klassifizierung psychischer Erkrankungen aus allgemeinen Social Media Texten', 'tr': 'Umumy Sosyal Medýdançalaryň Metinlerinden Aýratyn we Taýýarlamak', 'ko': '일반 소셜 미디어 텍스트에서 정신질환을 자동으로 검출하고 분류하다', 'fa': 'شناسایی و کلاس\u200cسازی بیماری روانی از متن رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی عمومی', 'af': 'Outomatiese Opdekking en Klassifikasie van Mental Illnesses van Algemene Sosiale Media Teks', 'sw': 'Kugundua na Kutangaza Ugonjwa wa Kiakili kutoka Makala ya Mitandao ya Kijamii', 'am': 'አውቶማቲክ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ጽሑፎች', 'hy': 'Հոգեկան հիվանդությունների ավտոմատ հայտնաբերումը և դասակարգումը ընդհանուր սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տեքստներից', 'bn': 'সাধারণ সোশ্যাল মিডিয়া টেক্সট থেকে মানসিক অস্থিরতার স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সনাক্ত এবং পরিস্থিতি', 'sq': 'Zbulimi automatik dhe klasifikimi i sëmundjeve mentale nga tekstet e përgjithshme të medias sociale', 'bs': 'Automatski otkrivanje i klasifikacija mentalnih bolesti iz teksta generalnih socijalnih medija', 'az': 'General Social Media Textl톛rin Mental Hasarlar캼n캼n Avtomatik Tan캼ma v톛 Klasifikl톛nm톛si', 'cs': 'Automatická detekce a klasifikace duševních onemocnění z obecných textů sociálních médií', 'et': 'Vaimsete haiguste automaatne tuvastamine ja klassifitseerimine üldistest sotsiaalmeedia tekstidest', 'ca': 'Detecció automàtica i classificació de malalties mentals a partir de textos generals dels mitjans socials', 'fi': 'Mielenterveysalan sairauksien automaattinen havaitseminen ja luokittelu yleisistä sosiaalisen median teksteistä', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'גילוי אוטומטי וסימון מחלות נפש מתוך טקסטים של מדיה חברתית כללית', 'sk': 'Samodejno odkrivanje in klasifikacija duševnih bolezni iz splošnih besedil socialnih medijev', 'jv': 'Menu', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གནས་ཚུལ་ཐོག་གི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྣམ་པ་ལ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་འཛིན་གྱིས་'}
{'en': 'Mental health is getting more and more attention recently, depression being a very common illness nowadays, but also other disorders like anxiety, obsessive-compulsive disorders, feeding disorders, autism, or attention-deficit / hyperactivity disorders. The huge amount of data from social media and the recent advances of deep learning models provide valuable means to automatically detecting mental disorders from plain text. In this article, we experiment with state-of-the-art methods on the SMHD mental health conditions dataset from Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Our contribution is threefold : using a dataset consisting of more illnesses than most studies, focusing on general text rather than mental health support groups and classification by posts rather than individuals or groups. For the automatic classification of the diseases, we employ three deep learning models : BERT, RoBERTa and XLNET. We double the baseline established by Cohan et al. (2018), on just a sample of their dataset. We improve the results obtained by Jiang et al. (2020) on post-level classification. The accuracy obtained by the eating disorder classifier is the highest due to the pregnant presence of discussions related to calories, diets, recipes etc., whereas depression had the lowest F1 score, probably because depression is more difficult to identify in linguistic acts.', 'ar': 'تحظى الصحة النفسية باهتمام متزايد في الآونة الأخيرة ، والاكتئاب مرض شائع جدًا في الوقت الحاضر ، ولكن أيضًا اضطرابات أخرى مثل القلق أو اضطرابات الوسواس القهري أو اضطرابات التغذية أو التوحد أو اضطرابات نقص الانتباه / فرط النشاط. توفر الكمية الهائلة من البيانات من وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي والتطورات الحديثة لنماذج التعلم العميق وسائل قيمة لاكتشاف الاضطرابات العقلية تلقائيًا من النص العادي. في هذه المقالة ، نجرب أحدث الأساليب على مجموعة بيانات حالات الصحة العقلية SMHD من Reddit (Cohan et al. ، 2018). مساهمتنا ثلاثية الأبعاد: استخدام مجموعة بيانات تتكون من أمراض أكثر من معظم الدراسات ، مع التركيز على النص العام بدلاً من مجموعات دعم الصحة العقلية والتصنيف حسب المنشورات بدلاً من الأفراد أو المجموعات. من أجل التصنيف التلقائي للأمراض ، نستخدم ثلاثة نماذج للتعلم العميق: BERT و RoBERTa و XLNET. نضاعف خط الأساس الذي وضعه Cohan et al. (2018) ، على عينة فقط من مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بهم. نقوم بتحسين النتائج التي حصلنا عليها بواسطة Jiang et al. (2020) بشأن تصنيف ما بعد المستوى. الدقة التي حصل عليها مُصنِّف اضطرابات الأكل هي الأعلى بسبب حضور الحامل للمناقشات المتعلقة بالسعرات الحرارية والوجبات الغذائية والوصفات وما إلى ذلك ، في حين أن الاكتئاب حصل على أقل درجة F1 ، ربما بسبب صعوبة التعرف على الاكتئاب في الأفعال اللغوية.', 'pt': 'A saúde mental está recebendo cada vez mais atenção recentemente, sendo a depressão uma doença muito comum hoje em dia, mas também outros transtornos como ansiedade, transtornos obsessivo-compulsivos, transtornos alimentares, autismo ou transtornos de déficit de atenção/hiperatividade. A enorme quantidade de dados das mídias sociais e os recentes avanços dos modelos de aprendizado profundo fornecem meios valiosos para detectar automaticamente transtornos mentais a partir de texto simples. Neste artigo, experimentamos métodos de última geração no conjunto de dados de condições de saúde mental SMHD do Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Nossa contribuição é tripla: usando um conjunto de dados que consiste em mais doenças do que a maioria dos estudos, focando em texto geral em vez de grupos de apoio à saúde mental e classificação por postagens em vez de indivíduos ou grupos. Para a classificação automática das doenças, empregamos três modelos de deep learning: BERT, RoBERTa e XLNET. Dobramos a linha de base estabelecida por Cohan et al. (2018), em apenas uma amostra de seu conjunto de dados. Melhoramos os resultados obtidos por Jiang et al. (2020) sobre classificação pós-nível. A acurácia obtida pelo classificador de transtorno alimentar é a maior devido à presença grávida de discussões relacionadas a calorias, dietas, receitas etc.', 'fr': "La santé mentale fait l'objet d'une attention croissante ces derniers temps, la dépression étant une maladie très courante de nos jours, mais aussi d'autres troubles tels que l'anxiété, les troubles obsessionnels compulsifs, les troubles de l'alimentation, l'autisme ou les troubles déficitaires de l'attention/hyperactivité. L'énorme quantité de données provenant des médias sociaux et les récentes avancées des modèles d'apprentissage profond fournissent des moyens précieux pour détecter automatiquement les troubles mentaux à partir de texte brut. Dans cet article, nous expérimentons des méthodes de pointe sur l'ensemble de données sur les troubles de santé mentale SMHD de Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Notre contribution est triple\xa0: utiliser un ensemble de données comprenant plus de maladies que la plupart des études, mettant l'accent sur le texte général plutôt que sur les groupes de soutien en santé mentale et la classification par postes plutôt que par individus ou groupes. Pour la classification automatique des maladies, nous utilisons trois modèles de deep learning\xa0: BERT, Roberta et XLNET. Nous doublons la base de référence établie par Cohan et al. (2018), uniquement sur un échantillon de leur ensemble de données. Nous améliorons les résultats obtenus par Jiang et al. (2020) sur la classification post-niveau. La précision obtenue par le classificateur des troubles de l'alimentation est la plus élevée en raison de la présence enceinte de discussions liées aux calories, aux régimes alimentaires, aux recettes, etc., alors que la dépression avait le score F1 le plus bas, probablement parce que la dépression est plus difficile à identifier dans les actes linguistiques.", 'es': 'La salud mental está recibiendo cada vez más atención recientemente, siendo la depresión una enfermedad muy común hoy en día, pero también otros trastornos como la ansiedad, los trastornos obsesivo-compulsivos, los trastornos de la alimentación, el autismo o los trastornos por déficit de atención e hiperactividad. La enorme cantidad de datos de las redes sociales y los avances recientes de los modelos de aprendizaje profundo proporcionan medios valiosos para detectar automáticamente los trastornos mentales a partir del texto sin formato. En este artículo, experimentamos con métodos de última generación en el conjunto de datos de condiciones de salud mental de SMHD de Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Nuestra contribución es triple: usar un conjunto de datos que consiste en más enfermedades que la mayoría de los estudios, centrándose en el texto general en lugar de en grupos de apoyo de salud mental y la clasificación por publicaciones en lugar de individuos o grupos. Para la clasificación automática de las enfermedades, utilizamos tres modelos de aprendizaje profundo: BERT, ROBerta y XLNET. Duplicamos la línea base establecida por Cohan et al. (2018), en solo una muestra de su conjunto de datos. Mejoramos los resultados obtenidos por Jiang et al. (2020) en la clasificación posterior al nivel. La precisión obtenida por el clasificador de trastornos alimentarios es la más alta debido a la presencia embarazada de discusiones relacionadas con calorías, dietas, recetas, etc., mientras que la depresión tuvo la puntuación F1 más baja, probablemente porque la depresión es más difícil de identificar en los actos lingüísticos.', 'ja': '最近、精神的な健康がますます注目されています。うつ病は非常に一般的な病気ですが、不安、強迫性障害、摂食障害、自閉症、注意欠如/多動性障害などの他の障害もあります。 ソーシャルメディアからの膨大な量のデータとディープラーニングモデルの最近の進歩は、プレーンテキストから精神障害を自動的に検出するための貴重な手段を提供します。 この記事では、Reddit （ Cohan et al., 2018 ）のSMHDメンタルヘルスコンディションデータセットに関する最先端の方法を実験しました。 私たちの貢献は3つあります。ほとんどの研究よりも多くの疾患からなるデータセットを使用し、メンタルヘルスサポートグループではなく一般的なテキストに焦点を当て、個人またはグループではなく投稿で分類します。 疾患の自動分類には、BERT、RoBERTa、XLNETの3つのディープラーニングモデルを採用しています。 Cohan et al .( 2018)によって確立されたベースラインを、彼らのデータセットのサンプルに基づいて2倍にします。 Jiang et al .( 2020)で得られたポストレベル分類の結果を改善している。 摂食障害分類器によって得られた精度は、カロリー、食事、レシピなどに関連する議論が妊娠しているために最も高く、抑うつはF 1スコアが最も低く、おそらく言語行為において抑うつの識別がより困難であるためである。', 'zh': '心理健康近益见关注,抑郁症是当今常见之病,然亦有他病,如焦虑,强迫症养障碍,自闭症意缺陷/多动障碍。 社交媒体之大数,深学模形最新进展为纯文本自动检测精神障碍资其直术。 本文中,于RedditSMHD心健康状况数集上试最先进之法(Cohan等,2018)。 所献有三:用多于多病之数,专注于众文本而非心理健康支小组,及按帖非私团体之类也。 病之自分,吾三深学之:BERT,RoBERTaXLNET。 吾将Cohan等(2018)立之基线翻了一番,但针其数集之样本。 臣等改进Jiang等(2020)于后级分类得之。 由存卡路里饮食,食谱等论议,食碍分器得准确性最高,而抑郁症F1评分最卑,盖抑郁症言语行为难识也。', 'hi': 'मानसिक स्वास्थ्य हाल ही में अधिक से अधिक ध्यान दिया जा रहा है, अवसाद आजकल एक बहुत ही आम बीमारी है, लेकिन चिंता, जुनूनी-बाध्यकारी विकारों, खिला विकारों, आत्मकेंद्रित, या ध्यान-घाटे / अतिसक्रियता विकारों जैसे अन्य विकार भी हैं। सोशल मीडिया से डेटा की बड़ी मात्रा और डीप लर्निंग मॉडल की हालिया प्रगति सादे पाठ से मानसिक विकारों का स्वचालित रूप से पता लगाने के लिए मूल्यवान साधन प्रदान करती है। इस लेख में, हम Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018) से SMHD मानसिक स्वास्थ्य स्थितियों डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक तरीकों के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं। हमारा योगदान तीन गुना है: अधिकांश अध्ययनों की तुलना में अधिक बीमारियों से युक्त डेटासेट का उपयोग करना, मानसिक स्वास्थ्य सहायता समूहों के बजाय सामान्य पाठ पर ध्यान केंद्रित करना और व्यक्तियों या समूहों के बजाय पोस्ट द्वारा वर्गीकरण। बीमारियों के स्वचालित वर्गीकरण के लिए, हम तीन गहरे सीखने के मॉडल को नियोजित करते हैं: BERT, RoBERTa और XLNET। हम कोहान एट अल द्वारा स्थापित बेसलाइन को दोगुना करते हैं (2018), उनके डेटासेट के सिर्फ एक नमूने पर। हम जियांग एट अल द्वारा प्राप्त परिणामों में सुधार करते हैं (2020) पोस्ट-लेवल वर्गीकरण पर। खाने के विकार क्लासिफायर द्वारा प्राप्त सटीकता कैलोरी, आहार, व्यंजनों आदि से संबंधित चर्चाओं की गर्भवती उपस्थिति के कारण सबसे अधिक है, जबकि अवसाद में सबसे कम एफ 1 स्कोर था, शायद इसलिए कि अवसाद भाषाई कृत्यों में पहचानना अधिक कठिन है।', 'ru': 'В последнее время психическому здоровью уделяется все больше внимания, депрессия является очень распространенным заболеванием в настоящее время, но также и другие расстройства, такие как тревожность, обсессивно-компульсивные расстройства, нарушения питания, аутизм или синдром дефицита внимания/гиперактивности. Огромное количество данных из социальных сетей и недавние достижения моделей глубокого обучения предоставляют ценные средства для автоматического обнаружения психических расстройств из обычного текста. В этой статье мы экспериментируем с современными методами на наборе данных психических расстройств SMHD от Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Наш вклад носит тройственный характер: мы используем набор данных, включающий больше заболеваний, чем большинство исследований, сосредоточивая внимание на общем тексте, а не на группах поддержки психического здоровья и классификации по постам, а не на отдельных лицах или группах. Для автоматической классификации заболеваний мы используем три модели глубокого обучения: BERT, RoBERTa и XLNET. Мы удваиваем базовый уровень, установленный Cohan et al. (2018), только на выборке их набора данных. Мы улучшаем результаты, полученные Jiang et al. (2020) по классификации должностей. Точность, полученная классификатором расстройств пищевого поведения, является самой высокой из-за беременных дискуссий, связанных с калориями, диетами, рецептами и т. д., тогда как депрессия имела самый низкий балл F1, вероятно, потому что депрессию труднее идентифицировать в лингвистических актах.', 'ga': 'Tá níos mó airde ag teacht ar mheabhairshláinte le déanaí, tinneas an-choitianta é an dúlagar sa lá atá inniu ann, ach freisin neamhoird eile cosúil le imní, neamhoird obsessive-compulsive, neamhoird chothaithe, uathachas, nó neamhoird aird-easnaimh/hipirghníomhaíochta. Soláthraíonn an t-uafás sonraí ó na meáin shóisialta agus an dul chun cinn atá déanta le déanaí ar shamhlacha domhainfhoghlama bealaí luachmhara chun neamhoird mheabhrach a bhrath go huathoibríoch ó ghnáththéacs. San Airteagal seo, déanaimid triail le modhanna úrscothacha ar thacar sonraí coinníollacha meabhairshláinte SMHD ó Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Tá trí ghné againn: ag baint úsáide as tacar sonraí ina bhfuil níos mó tinnis ná an chuid is mó de na staidéir, ag díriú ar théacs ginearálta seachas ar ghrúpaí tacaíochta meabhairshláinte agus ar aicmiú de réir post seachas daoine aonair nó grúpaí. Chun na galair a aicmiú go huathoibríoch, bainimid úsáid as trí mhúnla domhainfhoghlama: BERT, RoBERTa agus XLNET. Déanaimid an bonnlíne a bhunaigh Cohan et al. (2018), ar shampla amháin dá dtacar sonraí. Feabhsaítear na torthaí a fhaigheann Jiang et al. (2020) maidir le haicmiú iar-leibhéil. Is é an cruinneas a fhaigheann an t-aicmitheoir neamhord itheacháin an ceann is airde mar gheall ar láithreacht torrach na bplé a bhaineann le calraí, aistí bia, oidis etc., ach bhí an scór F1 is ísle ag an dúlagar, is dócha toisc go bhfuil sé níos deacra an dúlagar a aithint i ngníomhartha teanga.', 'hu': 'A mentális egészség az utóbbi időben egyre nagyobb figyelmet kap, a depresszió manapság nagyon gyakori betegség, de más betegségek is, mint a szorongás, rögeszmés-kényszerzavar, táplálkozási zavarok, autizmus, figyelemhiány/hiperaktivitás zavarok. A közösségi médiából származó hatalmas mennyiségű adat és a mélytanulási modellek közelmúltbeli fejlődése értékes eszközöket biztosít a mentális zavarok automatikus felismerésére egyszerű szövegből. Ebben a cikkben a Reddit SMHD mentális egészségügyi állapotáról szóló legkorszerűbb módszerekkel kísérletezünk (Cohan et al., 2018). Hozzájárulásunk háromszoros: a legtöbb tanulmánynál több betegségből álló adatkészlet használata, az általános szövegre összpontosítva, mint a mentális egészségügyi támogató csoportokra, valamint a beosztások szerinti osztályozásra, nem pedig egyénekre vagy csoportokra. A betegségek automatikus osztályozásához három mélytanulási modellt alkalmazunk: BERT, RoBERTa és XLNET. Megduplázzuk a Cohan et al. (2018) által meghatározott kiindulási értéket, csupán egy mintán az adatkészletükből. Javítjuk Jiang et al. (2020) által elért eredményeket a posztszintű osztályozás terén. Az étkezési zavarok osztályozója által elért pontosság a legnagyobb a kalóriákkal, étrendekkel, receptekkel kapcsolatos viták terhes jelenléte miatt, míg a depresszió volt a legalacsonyabb F1 pontszám, valószínűleg azért, mert a depresszió nehezebb azonosítani a nyelvi aktusokban.', 'it': "La salute mentale sta ricevendo sempre più attenzione ultimamente, la depressione è una malattia molto comune al giorno d'oggi, ma anche altri disturbi come ansia, disturbi ossessivo-compulsivi, disturbi alimentari, autismo o disturbi da deficit di attenzione / iperattività. L'enorme quantità di dati provenienti dai social media e i recenti progressi dei modelli di deep learning forniscono strumenti preziosi per rilevare automaticamente i disturbi mentali dal testo semplice. In questo articolo, sperimentiamo metodi all'avanguardia sul set di dati sulle condizioni di salute mentale SMHD di Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Il nostro contributo è triplice: utilizzare un set di dati composto da più malattie rispetto alla maggior parte degli studi, concentrandosi sul testo generale piuttosto che sui gruppi di sostegno alla salute mentale e classificazione per post piuttosto che per singoli o gruppi. Per la classificazione automatica delle malattie utilizziamo tre modelli di deep learning: BERT, RoBERTa e XLNET. Raddoppia la base stabilita da Cohan et al. (2018), solo su un campione del loro set di dati. Miglioriamo i risultati ottenuti da Jiang et al. (2020) sulla classificazione post-livello. L'accuratezza ottenuta dal classificatore dei disturbi alimentari è la più alta a causa della presenza incinta di discussioni relative a calorie, diete, ricette ecc., mentre la depressione ha avuto il punteggio F1 più basso, probabilmente perché la depressione è più difficile da identificare negli atti linguistici.", 'ka': 'მენტალური ჯანმრთელობა ახლა უფრო მეტი დაახლოებია, დეპრესია ახლა მნიშვნელოვანი დაავადება, მაგრამ ასევე სხვა დაავადებები, როგორც ძალიან მეტი დაავადება, როგორც ძალიან მეტი დაავადება, დაახლოების/ჰიპერაკტივის სოციალური მედიატიდან დიდი მონაცემების ზომა და საბოლოო სწავლების მოდელების გარეშე უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი სინამდვილეების შესაძლებლობად სოციალური ტექსტიდან მე ამ პექტიკში, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებით სტატიური მეტოვებით SMHD ფექტიური სისტემის მონაცემებით Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). ჩვენი დამატება სამხოლოდ არის: სამხოლოდ მონაცემების სექტის გამოყენება, რომელიც უფრო მეტი სექტის შემდეგ დაავადებულია, რომელიც უფრო მეტი ტექსტზე, უფრო მეტიური ჯგუფის ავტომატური კლასიფიკაციაში, ჩვენ სამი დიდი სწავლების მოდელეების გამოყენება: BERT, RoBERTa და XLNET. ჩვენ კოჰან et al(2018) დავიწყეთ ბაზი ხაზი, რომელიც მათი მონაცემების მაგალითვის. ჩვენ ჯიანგი და ალ(2020) მიღებული წარმოდგენების უფრო მეტია კლასიფიკაციაში. მართლა, რომელიც საჭირო განსხვავებულების კლასიფიკაციაში მიღებულია, უფრო მეტი მართლა იქნება, რადგან დეპრესია უფრო ნაკლები F1 წერტილი იყო, რადგან დეპრესია უფრო რთული იყო, რადგან ენგლიგური აქციებში განსაზღვრე', 'el': 'Η ψυχική υγεία αποκτά όλο και περισσότερη προσοχή πρόσφατα, η κατάθλιψη είναι μια πολύ συχνή ασθένεια στις μέρες μας, αλλά και άλλες διαταραχές όπως το άγχος, οι ψυχαναγκαστικές διαταραχές, οι διαταραχές σίτισης, ο αυτισμός ή οι διαταραχές ελλείμματος προσοχής/υπερδραστηριότητας. Η τεράστια ποσότητα δεδομένων από τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης και οι πρόσφατες εξελίξεις των μοντέλων βαθιάς μάθησης παρέχουν πολύτιμα μέσα για την αυτόματη ανίχνευση ψυχικών διαταραχών από απλό κείμενο. Σε αυτό το άρθρο, πειραματιζόμαστε με σύγχρονες μεθόδους σχετικά με το σύνολο δεδομένων ψυχικής υγείας από το Reddit (κ.α., 2018). Η συνεισφορά μας είναι τριπλή: χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σύνολο δεδομένων που αποτελείται από περισσότερες ασθένειες από τις περισσότερες μελέτες, εστιάζοντας στο γενικό κείμενο και όχι σε ομάδες υποστήριξης ψυχικής υγείας και ταξινόμηση κατά θέσεις και όχι σε άτομα ή ομάδες. Για την αυτόματη ταξινόμηση των ασθενειών, χρησιμοποιούμε τρία μοντέλα βαθιάς μάθησης: και XLNET. Διπλασίζουμε τη γραμμή βάσης που καθορίστηκαν από τον κ.λ. (2018), σε ένα μόνο δείγμα του συνόλου δεδομένων τους. Βελτιώνουμε τα αποτελέσματα που επιτεύχθηκαν από τον κ.λ. (2020) σχετικά με την ταξινόμηση μετά το επίπεδο. Η ακρίβεια που επιτυγχάνεται από τον ταξινομητή διατροφικών διαταραχών είναι η υψηλότερη λόγω της έγκυος παρουσίας συζητήσεων σχετικά με θερμίδες, δίαιτες, συνταγές κ.λπ., ενώ η κατάθλιψη είχε τη χαμηλότερη βαθμολογία, πιθανώς επειδή η κατάθλιψη είναι πιο δύσκολο να εντοπιστεί σε γλωσσικές πράξεις.', 'kk': 'Соңғы уақытта міндетті саулық саулық көбірек көбірек болып, депрессия көбірек аурулар болып жатқан, сондай-ақ басқа аурулар, көбірек-көпшілікті болып жатқан, көпшілікті-көпшілікті болып жатқан, аутизм,  Жалпы мәтіннен психикалық белсендіктерді автоматты түрде анықтау үшін әлемдік медиақтардың көп саны және жаңа оқыту үлгілерінің көп жағдайларының көп жағдайл Бұл мақалада, біз Редиттен SMHD психикалық саулық шарттарының деректерін (Cohan et al., 2018). Біздің көпшілігіміз үш есепті: бағдарламалардың көпшілігінен арналған деректер жиынын қолдану, психикалық саулық қолдау топтарының орнына, адамдар не топтардың орнына, жалпы мәтінде Олардың автоматты түрде ауруларды бағалау үшін үш түсті оқыту үлгісін қолданамыз: BERT, RoBERTa және XLNET. Біз Cohan et al-ның негізгі жолын екі рет қайталадық. (2018), олардың деректер жиынының үлгісін қайталадық. Біз Jiang et al. (2020) деңгейіндегі классификациясының нәтижесін жақсартық. Имеу белсендіктерінің дұрыстығы - калориялар, диеттер, рецептер және т. б. және депрессияның ең төменгі F1 нөмірі бар, мүмкін депрессияның лингвистикалық әрекеттерінде анықтау үшін ең жақсы.', 'ms': 'Kesihatan mental semakin banyak perhatian akhir-akhir ini, depresi menjadi penyakit yang sangat umum hari ini, tetapi juga gangguan lain seperti ketakutan, gangguan obsesif-kompulsif, gangguan makan, autisme, atau gangguan kekurangan perhatian/hiperaktif. Jumlah besar data dari media sosial dan kemajuan baru-baru ini model belajar dalam menyediakan cara yang berharga untuk mengesan secara automatik gangguan mental dari teks biasa. Dalam artikel ini, kami eksperimen dengan kaedah-kaedah terbaik pada set data syarat kesehatan mental SMHD dari Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Kontribusi kami adalah tiga kali ganda: menggunakan set data yang terdiri daripada lebih banyak penyakit daripada kebanyakan kajian, fokus pada teks umum daripada kumpulan sokongan kesehatan mental dan klasifikasi oleh pos daripada individu atau kumpulan. Untuk klasifikasi automatik penyakit, kami menggunakan tiga model belajar dalam: BERT, RoBERTa dan XLNET. Kita gandakan asas yang ditetapkan oleh Cohan et al. (2018), pada sampel dari set data mereka. Kami meningkatkan keputusan yang diperoleh oleh Jiang et al. (2020) pada kelasukan selepas aras. Ketepatan yang diperoleh oleh pengklasifikasi gangguan makan adalah tertinggi disebabkan kehamilan pembicaraan berkaitan dengan kalori, dieta, resep dll., sementara depresi mempunyai skor F1 tertinggi, mungkin kerana depresi lebih sukar untuk dikenali dalam tindakan bahasa.', 'lt': 'Pastaruoju metu vis daugiau dėmesio skiriama psichikos sveikatai, depresija šiandien yra labai dažna liga, bet taip pat kiti sutrikimai, pvz., nerimas, obsesiniai kompulsiniai sutrikimai, mitybos sutrikimai, autizmas arba dėmesio trūkumas / hiperaktyvumo sutrikimai. Didelis socialinių žiniasklaidos duomenų kiekis ir pastarojo meto gilaus mokymosi modelių pažanga yra vertingos priemonės automatiškai nustatyti protinius sutrikimus iš paprasto teksto. Šiame straipsnyje eksperimentuojame su naujausiais metodais dėl SMHD psichikos būklės duomenų rinkinio Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Mūsų indėlis yra trigubas: naudojant duomenų rinkinį, kurį sudaro daugiau ligų nei dauguma tyrimų, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant bendrajam tekstui, o ne psichikos sveikatos paramos grupėms, ir klasifikavimui pagal pareigas, o ne asmenis ar grupes. Automatinei ligų klasifikacijai naudojame tris gilaus mokymosi modelius: BERT, RoBERTa ir XLNET. Dvigubuojame Cohan et al. nustatytą bazinę vertę (2018 m.), remiantis tik jų duomenų rinkinio pavyzdžiu. Geriname Jiang et al. (2020) rezultatus dėl klasifikavimo po lygio. Maisto sutrikimų klasifikatoriaus gautas tikslumas yra didžiausias dėl nėščių diskusijų, susijusių su kalorijomis, mityba, receptais ir t. t., o depresija turėjo mažiausią F1 rezultatą, tikriausiai dėl to, kad depresija yra sunkiau nustatyti kalbiniuose veiksmuose.', 'mn': 'Өнөөдөр сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн сэтгэл хөдлөл ихэвчлэн анхаарлаа хандуулж байна. Өнөөдөр депресси нь ихэвчлэн өвчин болж байна. Мөн өөр өвчин, сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл хөдлөл өвчин, хооллох өвчин, аутизм, анхаарлаа төвлөр Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчдийн их хэмжээний мэдээлэл болон гүн гүнзгий суралцах загваруудын саяхан хөгжлийн давхар нь үнэ цэнэтэй арга замбарааг энгийн текстээс автоматаар сэтгэ Энэ баримт бид Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018) ээс гарсан SMHD сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн нөхцөл өгөгдлийн талаар туршилт хийдэг. Бидний үр дүнд гурван дахь: ихэнх судалгаанаас илүү өвчинтэй өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглаж, сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн дэмжих бүлгүүд болон хувийн, бүлгүүдийн оронд нийтийн текст дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлсэн. Өвчнүүдийн автоматжуулалтын хуваалтын тулд бид 3 гүнзгий суралцах загварыг ашигладаг: BERT, RoBERTa, XLNET. Бид Cohan et al-ын үндсэн шулууныг хоёр дахин давхарлаа. (2018) өгөгдлийн сангийн жишээ. Бид Jiang et al. (2020) дээр дараагийн түвшинд гарсан үр дүнг сайжруулж байна. Хоосон эмгэгтэй хуваалцагчийн зөв байдал нь калори, хоол, рецепт гэх мэт харилцааны хамгийн бага хэмжээний тухай ярилцлагуудын тухай хамгийн өндөр байна. Гэхдээ депресси F1 хэмжээнд хамгийн бага хэмжээний тоо байсан ч, хэлний үйлдэл дээр депресси илүү', 'ml': 'മാനസിക വ്യാപാരോഗ്യത്തിന്റെ അടുത്ത് കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രാപിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്, ഇന്നത്തെ ദുഃഖം വളരെ സാധാരണമായ രോഗമാണ്, പക്ഷെ വിഷമം, അസ്വസ്ഥതയുള് സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയയില്\u200d നിന്നും അടുത്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളുടെ മുന്\u200dഗണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വിലയേറെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണ വ ഈ ലേഖനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d എസ്എംഎംഎഡി മാനസിക സ്വാഭാവികാര്യങ്ങളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണം നടത്തുന്നു. റെഡിഡിറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും ക ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഗം മൂന്നു തവണ: വ്യക്തികളെക്കാളും കൂടുതല്\u200d രോഗങ്ങളെക്കാളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, മാനസിക ആശ്വാസത്തി രോഗങ്ങളുടെ സ്വയമായ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്ന് ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു; ബെര്\u200dട്ടി, റോബെര We double the baseline established by Cohan et al. (2018), on just a sample of their dataset.  ജിയാങ്ങ് എറ്റ് അല്\u200d ലഭിച്ചതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തും. ഭക്ഷിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യാസവിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്ററികള്\u200d, ഭക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d, റെസിപ്പികളുമായി സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിന്റെ ഗര്\u200dഭിണിയില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും വലുതായിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാ', 'mt': 'Is-saħħa mentali qed tikseb aktar u aktar attenzjoni reċentement, id-depressjoni hija marda komuni ħafna llum, iżda wkoll disturbi oħra bħall-ansjetà, disturbi obsessivi-kompulsivi, disturbi fl-għalf, awtiżmu, jew disturbi fid-defiċit tal-attenzjoni/attività eċċessiva. L-ammont enormi ta’ dejta mill-midja soċjali u l-avvanzi riċenti ta’ mudelli ta’ tagħlim profond jipprovdu mezzi ta’ valur biex jiġu identifikati awtomatikament disturbi mentali minn test sempliċi. F’dan l-artikolu, qed nagħmlu esperimenti b’metodi l-aktar avvanzati dwar is-sett ta’ dejta dwar il-kundizzjonijiet tas-saħħa mentali SMHD minn Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Il-kontribuzzjoni tagħna hija tripla: l-użu ta’ sett ta’ dejta li jikkonsisti f’aktar mard mill-biċċa l-kbira tal-istudji, li jiffoka fuq test ġenerali minflok fuq gruppi ta’ appoġġ għas-saħħa mentali u klassifikazzjoni skont il-karigi minflok individwi jew gruppi. Għall-klassifikazzjoni awtomatika tal-mard, aħna nużaw tliet mudelli ta’ tagħlim profond: BERT, RoBERTa u XLNET. Iddoppjaw il-linja bażi stabbilita minn Cohan et al. (2018), fuq kampjun biss tas-sett tad-dejta tagħhom. Aħna ntejbu r-riżultati miksuba minn Jiang et al. (2020) dwar il-klassifikazzjoni ta’ wara l-livell. Il-preċiżjoni miksuba mill-klassifikatur tad-disturbi tal-ikel hija l-ogħla minħabba l-preżenza tqal ta’ diskussjonijiet relatati mal-kaloriji, id-dieti, ir-riċetti eċċ., filwaqt li d-depressjoni kellha l-inqas punteġġ F1, probabbilment minħabba li d-depressjoni hija aktar diffiċli biex tiġi identifikata fl-atti lingwistiċi.', 'no': 'Mentalhelse får meir og meir oppmerksomhet nyleg, depresjon er ein svært vanleg sykdom i dag, men også andre forstyrrelsar som anviklingar, obsesive-kompulsiv forstyrrelsar, kjeldeforstyrrelsar, autisme, eller oppmerksomhet-deficit/hyperaktivitetsforstyrrelsar. Den store mengda data frå sosiale media og den siste avanserte av dype læringsmodeller gjev verdileg måtar å automatisk oppdaga mentalske forskjeller frå vanleg tekst. I denne artikkelen eksperimenterer vi med kunstmetodar på SMHD-mentale helseforhold dataset frå Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Bidraget vårt er tre gamle: å bruka ein dataset som inneheld fleire sykdommer enn dei fleste studier, fokuserer på generelle tekst i staden for psykiske helsegrupper og klassifikasjon etter postar i staden for individuer eller grupper. For automatisk klassifikasjon av sykdommane bruker vi tre dype læringsmodeller: BERT, RoBERTa og XLNET. Vi dobbeltar baselinja som er oppretta av Cohan et al. (2018) på bare eit prøve av datasettet sine. Vi forbedrar resultatet som går av Jiang et al. (2020) på postnivåklassifikasjonen. Den nøyaktigheten som er oppteken av ettsforskjellingsklassifiseren er det høgste på grunn av å vere grønne for diskusjonar relaterte til kalorier, diet, recepter osv., mens depresjon hadde den lågaste F1- poeng, sannsynlegvis fordi depresjon er vanskeleg å identifisera i lingviske handlingar.', 'mk': 'Mental health is getting more and more attention recently, depression being a very common illness nowadays, but also other disorders such as anxiety, obsessive-compulsive disorders, feeding disorders, autism, or attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorders. Големата количина на податоци од социјалните медиуми и неодамнешните напредоци на моделите за длабоко учење обезбедуваат вредни средства за автоматско детектирање на ментални пореметувања од обичен текст. Во оваа статија, експериментираме со најсовремени методи на податоците на СМХД за менталното здравје од Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Нашиот придонес е трипати: користење на податоци составени од повеќе болести отколку повеќето студии, фокусирајќи се на генерален текст наместо групи за поддршка за менталното здравје и класификација по постови наместо поединци или групи. За автоматска класификација на болестите, користиме три модели за длабоко учење: BERT, RoBERTa и XLNET. We double the baseline established by Cohan et al. (2018), on just a sample of their dataset.  Ние ги подобруваме резултатите постигнати од Џанг и други (2020) за пост-нивната класификација. Прецизноста добиена од класификаторот на харчувањето е највисока поради бременото присуство на дискусии поврзани со калории, диета, рецепти итн., додека депресијата имаше најниска оценка Ф1, најверојатно поради тоа што депресијата е потешка да се идентификува во јазичките акти.', 'ro': 'Sănătatea mintală primește din ce în ce mai multă atenție recent, depresia fiind o boală foarte frecventă în zilele noastre, dar și alte tulburări precum anxietate, tulburări obsesiv-compulsive, tulburări de hrănire, autism sau tulburări de deficit de atenție / hiperactivitate. Cantitatea uriașă de date de pe rețelele de socializare și progresele recente ale modelelor de învățare profundă oferă mijloace valoroase de detectare automată a tulburărilor mentale din text simplu. În acest articol, experimentăm metode de ultimă generație privind setul de date privind afecțiunile de sănătate mintală SMHD de la Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Contribuția noastră este triplă: utilizarea unui set de date format din mai multe boli decât majoritatea studiilor, concentrându-se pe text general mai degrabă decât pe grupuri de sprijin pentru sănătatea mintală și clasificarea pe posturi, mai degrabă decât pe indivizi sau grupuri. Pentru clasificarea automată a bolilor, folosim trei modele de învățare profundă: BERT, RoBERTa și XLNET. Dublăm nivelul de referință stabilit de Cohan et al. (2018), doar pe un eșantion din setul lor de date. Îmbunătățim rezultatele obținute de Jiang et al. (2020) privind clasificarea post-nivel. Precizia obținută de clasificatorul tulburărilor alimentare este cea mai mare datorită prezenței gravide a discuțiilor legate de calorii, diete, rețete etc., în timp ce depresia a avut cel mai mic scor F1, probabil pentru că depresia este mai dificil de identificat în actele lingvistice.', 'pl': 'Zdrowie psychiczne zyskuje ostatnio coraz większą uwagę, depresja jest obecnie bardzo powszechną chorobą, ale również inne zaburzenia, takie jak lęk, zaburzenia obsesyjno-kompulsywne, zaburzenia karmienia, autyzm czy zaburzenia deficytu uwagi/nadaktywności. Ogromna ilość danych z mediów społecznościowych i ostatnie osiągnięcia modeli głębokiego uczenia stanowią cenne środki do automatycznego wykrywania zaburzeń psychicznych z tekstu zwykłego. W tym artykule eksperymentujemy z najnowocześniejszymi metodami na zbiorze danych dotyczących stanów zdrowia psychicznego SMHD z Redditu (Cohan et al., 2018). Nasz wkład jest trzykrotny: wykorzystanie zbioru danych składającego się z większej liczby chorób niż większość badań, koncentrującego się raczej na ogólnym tekście niż na grupach wspierających zdrowie psychiczne oraz klasyfikacji według stanowisk, a nie indywidualnych lub grup. Do automatycznej klasyfikacji chorób stosujemy trzy modele głębokiego uczenia: BERT, RoBERTa i XLNET. Podwoimy bazę podstawową ustaloną przez Cohana i wszystkich. (2018), tylko na próbce ich zbioru danych. Poprawiamy wyniki uzyskane przez Jiang et al. (2020) w zakresie klasyfikacji poziomowej. Dokładność uzyskana przez klasyfikator zaburzeń odżywiania jest najwyższa ze względu na obecność w ciąży dyskusji związanych z kaloriami, dietami, recepturami itp., natomiast depresja miała najniższy wynik F1, prawdopodobnie dlatego, że depresja jest trudniejsza do zidentyfikowania w aktach językowych.', 'sr': 'Mentalno zdravlje nedavno dobija sve više pažnje, depresija je danas veoma česta bolest, ali i drugi poremećaji poput anksije, opsesivnih-kompulzivnih poremećaja, poremećaja hrane, autizma, ili poremećaja pažnje-deficit a/hiperaktivnosti. Velika količina podataka iz društvenih medija i nedavnih napreda dubokog modela učenja pružaju vrijedne sredstva za automatsko otkrivanje mentalnih poremećaja iz prostog teksta. U ovom članku eksperimentiramo sa metodama umjetnosti o podacima SMHD mentalnog zdravlja iz Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Naš doprinos je trostruki: korištenje kompleta podataka koja se sastoji od više bolesti nego većina studija, fokusiranje na općem tekstu umjesto grupa podrške mentalnog zdravlja i klasifikaciju postima umjesto pojedinaca ili grupa. Za automatsku klasifikaciju bolesti, koristimo tri modela dubokog učenja: BERT, RoBERTa i XLNET. Udvostručili smo početnu liniju koju je utvrdio Cohan et al. (2018), na samo uzorak njihovog seta podataka. Mi poboljšamo rezultate koje je dobio Jiang et al. (2020) na klasifikaciji post nivoa. Tačnost koju je dobio klasifikator poremećaja jedenja najviša je zbog trudnoće prisutnosti diskusija povezanih sa kalorijama, dijetom, receptima itd., dok je depresija imala najniži rezultat F1, verovatno zato što je depresija teže identificirati u jezičkim djelima.', 'ta': 'மருத்துவ உடல் இன்று இன்று அதிகமாக கவனம் பெறுகிறது, கவலை ஒரு பொதுவான நோயாக இருக்கும், ஆனால் கவலை, துவாக்கியமான நோய்கள் போன்ற மற்ற நோய்களும், தேவையான நோய்கள், உணவு நோய்கள், ஆட சமூக ஊடகங்களிலிருந்து மிகப்பெரிய தரவுகள் மற்றும் சமீபத்திய ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ள மாதிரிகளின் முன்னேற்றங்கள் விருப்பமான மு இந்த கட்டுரையில், நாங்கள் SMHD மாதிரி முறைமைகளில் சோதனைப்படுத்துகிறோம் Reddit (கோஹான் et al., 2018) இருந்து மாதிரி சூழல் முறைகள எங்கள் பங்கு மூன்று முறை: மேலும் படிப்புகளை விட அதிகமான நோயாளிகளை பயன்படுத்தி, மனநோய் ஆதரவு குழுக்களை விட பொதுவான உரையை கவனம் செலுத்தி தன நோய்களின் தன்னியக்கமாக வகுப்புகளுக்கு, நாம் மூன்று ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொள்ள மாதிரிகளை வேலை செய்கிறோம்: BERT, ரோபிரேடா மற் நாம் கோஹான் மற்றும் அல் நிறுவப்பட்ட அடிப்படைக்கோட்டை இரட்டிப்போம். 2018, அவர்கள் தகவல் அமைப்பின் மாதிரிய ஜியாங் மற்றும் அல் கிடைத்த முடிவுகளை மேம்படுத்துகிறோம். உணவு குழப்பத்தை வகைப்பாட்டாளரால் கிடைத்துள்ள சரிபார்ப்பு அதிகமாகும் காரணம் கலோரி, உணவு, மற்றும் கிடைக்கும் விவாதத்தின் கலப்பு இருப்பதால் அதிகமாகும், ஆனால் depression கு', 'so': 'Caafimaadka maskaxda iyo daryeelka dhimirku waxay u baahan yihiin ilaa maantadan, depressu waa cuduro aad u caadi ah, laakiin sidoo kale cudurooyin kale sida welwel, cudurooyin qasab ah oo qasab ah, quudinta cudurada caafimaadka, autisme, ama cudurada daryeelka ah/cudurada dhaqaalaha. Macluumaadyo badan oo ka yimid shabakadda bulshada iyo qaababka ugu dambeeya ee waxbarashada mool dheer waxay ka helaan qaab qiimo leh si ay automatic ka ogaato cudurada dhimirka oo ka soo baxaan text fudud. In this article, we experiment with state-of-the-art methods on the SMHD mental health conditions dataset from Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018).  Warbixiyadayadu waa saddex jeer: isticmaalka kooxda macluumaadku waxay ka kooban yihiin cudurooyin ka badan waxbarashada intooda badan, boostada ku kalsoonaaneysa qoraalka caafimaadka dhimirka iyo kooxaha kooxaha caafimaadka dhimirka iyo kala qaybsashada boostada ayadoo aan aheyn qof ama kooxo. Qoraalka iskuulka ah ee cudurada ayaannu u shaqaynaynaa saddex qaabab waxbarasho oo dheer ah: BERT, RoBERTA iyo XLNET. Qohan et al (2018), waxaan labanlaab u dhignay samooyin kamid ah sameynta macluumaadkooda. Waxaannu horumarinaynaa fasalka dabaqa ee Jiang et al. (2020). Si saxda ah oo loo helo qalabka cuntada ee ugu sarreeya waxaa laga yaabaa in ay jiraan xaajooyinka uurka leh oo la xiriira kalorioriyada, cuntada, cuntada, xisaabta, xisaabta waxay leedahay koox F1-ka ugu hooseeya, sababtoo ah dhibaatadu waa ka adag tahay in loo caddeeyo falimaha luuqadaha.', 'sv': 'Psykisk hälsa får mer och mer uppmärksamhet på senare tid, depression är en mycket vanlig sjukdom nuförtiden, men också andra störningar som ångest, tvångsstörningar, matstörningar, autism eller uppmärksamhetsbrist/hyperaktivitet störningar. Den enorma mängden data från sociala medier och de senaste framstegen av djupinlärningsmodeller ger värdefulla medel för att automatiskt upptäcka psykiska störningar från vanlig text. I den här artikeln experimenterar vi med toppmoderna metoder på SMHD:s dataset för psykiska tillstånd från Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Vårt bidrag är tredubblat: att använda en datauppsättning bestående av fler sjukdomar än de flesta studier, med fokus på allmän text snarare än stödgrupper för psykisk hälsa och klassificering efter post snarare än individer eller grupper. För automatisk klassificering av sjukdomarna använder vi tre djupinlärningsmodeller: BERT, RoBERTa och XLNET. Vi fördubblar baseline som fastställts av Cohan et al. (2018), på bara ett urval av deras dataset. Vi förbättrar resultaten av Jiang et al. (2020) på postnivåklassificering. Den noggrannhet som erhållits av klassificeraren av ätstörningar är den högsta på grund av gravid närvaro av diskussioner relaterade till kalorier, dieter, recept etc., medan depression hade lägst F1 poäng, troligen för att depression är svårare att identifiera i språkliga handlingar.', 'si': 'මනුෂ්\u200dය ස්වාස්ත්වය දැනටමත් වැඩිය හා වැඩිය අවධානයක් ලැබෙනවා, අවධානය අවධානයක් වෙනවා, ඒත් අනිත් අවධානයක් වගේ, අවධානයක්, අවධානයක්, අවධානයක සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයෙන් ගොඩක් දත්ත සහ ගොඩක් ඉගෙනීම් මෝඩේල්ස් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ස්වය මේ ලේඛනයේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ SMHD මානසික ස්වාස්ත්\u200dය ස්ථානයේ තොරතුරු තොරතුරු තොරතුරු රෙඩිට් වලින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරිය අපේ භාවිතා තුනක් තුනක්: බොහෝ අධ්\u200dයානයට වඩා ගොඩක් රෝගියක් තියෙන දත්ත සෙට් භාවිත කරනවා, මානසික ස්වාස්ත්වය සහ කණ්ඩාය රෝගයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණ තුනක් භාවිත කරනවා: BERT, RoBERTa සහ XLNET. අපි කෝහාන් ට් අල් නිර්මාණය කරපු ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200d අපි ජියාන්ග් ට් ල් එකෙන් ගත්ත ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරමාණය විස්තර කරනවා. The correctness got by the eat disorder classifier is the tallest cause of the belly presents of chatting with calories, Diets, Recripts etc., whilst Depression had the low F1 score, may be that Depression is more diffuse to ID in language act.', 'ur': 'ذهن سلامتی اخیر سے زیادہ اور زیادہ توجه ہوتی ہے، افسردگی آج بہت عام بیماری ہوتی ہے، لیکن اچانک اور دوسرے اختلافات جیسے اچانک، مضبوط-مجبور اختلافات، غذا کھانا، اٹیسم، یا اچانک-نافذر/اچانک-فعالیت اختلافات. سوسیل میڈیا سے بہت بڑی اندازہ ڈیٹا اور عمیق سیکھنے کی مدلکوں کی اخیر پیشرفت کے ذریعے مطابق مصنوعی اختلافات کو صریح ٹیکسٹ سے آگاہ کرنے کے لئے ارزش دار وسیع دیتے ہیں. اس مقالہ میں ہم SMHD روانی سلامتی شرایطوں کے ذریعہ سے ریڈیٹ (Cohan et al., 2018) سے آزمائش کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارا حصہ تین پورے ہے: اکثر مطالعہ سے زیادہ بیماری کے ساتھ ایک ڈاٹ سٹ کا استعمال کرنا، ذهنی سلامتی کے گروپ کے بغیر ذهنی کی حمایت کے گروپ اور گروپ کے بغیر پوسٹ کے ذریعہ تفریق کے ذریعہ سے بیماریوں کی آٹوٹی کلاسپیٹ کے لئے ہم تین عمیق سیکھنے کی مدل استعمال کرتے ہیں: BERT, RoBERTa اور XLNET. ہم نے Cohan et al (2018) کے ذریعے بنیس لین کو دوگنا بنایا ہے، صرف ان کے ڈیٹ سٹ کے ایک نمونہ پر۔ ہم نے جینگ و ال (2020) کے نتیجے کو پوسٹ سطح کے کلاسیفوں پر بہتر کر دیا۔ کھانے والی اختلاف کے ذریعہ سے حاصل ہونے والی دقیقیت یہ ہے کہ کالوریوں، کھانے والی، رستیاں اور اگلے بحث کے باردار موجود ہونے کے باعث سب سے بالاتر ہے، حالانکہ افسردگی کے ذریعہ سب سے کم F1 اسکور تھا، شاید اس لئے کہ افسردگی زبان انصاف کے اعمال میں بہت مشکل ہے۔', 'uz': "O'sha paytda o'smirlar sog'lomi ko'p paydo bo'ladi, balki u hozir juda umumiy kasallik bo'ladi, lekin boshqa kasalliklar, eng'izlik kasalliklari, qanday qanday qandaydir kasalliklar, autisme, ko'paylik, ko'paylik qobiliyat/hyperaktivlik kasalliklari kabi. Bu ko'pchilik jamiyat media va eng yaqinda o'rganish modellarining eng katta maʼlumotlar esa oddiy matnning oddiy matnning miya kasalliklarni avtomatik aniqlash uchun qiymati yordam beradi. Bu maqolada, biz Reddit (Cohan et, 2018) томонидан SMHD mental tibbiy holatlari haqida saqlash usulining holatini tajriba qilamiz. Bizning qandaydir uchta doim: ko'pchilik o'qituvchidan ko'proq kasalliklar bo'lgan maʼlumotlar tarkibini ishlatishda, ma'lumotni qoidalar yoki guruhlardan tasdiqlash uchun umumiy matnni o'zgartirish mumkin. Sichqonchalarning avtomatik darajalashtirish uchun biz uchta o'rganish modellarini ishlaymiz: BERT, RoBERTA va XLNET. Biz Cohan et al (2018) yaratilgan asosiy satrini ikki marta ko'paymiz, ularning maʼlumotlar satrining misollarida. Biz bir darajadan keyin darajadagi darajada Jiang et al (2020) natijalarni bajaramiz. Ko'rib chiqish kasalliklarini ajratishga aniqlangan aniqlik, kalori, diet, reciplar bilan bog'liq talabatlarning eng yuqori sabablarga sabab. Chunki o'zgarishning eng chingi F1 scori ko'paytirish mumkin, chunki o'zgarishni tillarda aniqlash qiyin qiyin.", 'vi': 'Bệnh tâm thần ngày càng ngày càng được chú ý hơn, trầm cảm là một bệnh rất phổ biến ngày nay, nhưng cũng có những loại rối loạn như lo âu, rối loạn ám ảnh cưỡng bức, rối loạn ăn uống, tự kỷ, hay rối loạn chứng mất tập trung/siêu hành. Số lượng dữ liệu khổng lồ từ các phương tiện truyền thông xã hội và những bước tiến gần đây của các mô hình học sâu mang lại giá trị để tự động phát hiện những rối loạn tâm thần từ văn bản. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi thử nghiệm các phương pháp hiện đại về môi trường sức khỏe tinh thần của SMB từ Reddit (Cohaagen et al., 208). Chúng tôi đóng góp gấp ba lần: sử dụng một tập tin gồm nhiều bệnh tật hơn hầu hết các nghiên cứu, tập trung vào văn bản thông thường hơn là các nhóm hỗ trợ sức khỏe tinh thần và phân loại cho mỗi người thay vì nhóm người. Để phân loại các bệnh tự động, chúng tôi sử dụng ba mô hình học sâu: BERT, RoBERTa và Xylonet. Chúng ta sẽ gấp đôi so sánh được thiết lập bởi Cohaagen et al. (thẩm tê), chỉ trên một mẫu dữ liệu của họ. Chúng tôi cải tiến kết quả của Giang một al. (2020) trong việc phân loại sau mức độ. Sự chính xác được thu được bởi người phân loại rối loạn ăn uống là cao nhất do có thai sự có mặt của các cuộc thảo luận về năng lượng, ăn kiêng, thức ăn, công thức, vân vân, trong khi trầm cảm có điểm F1 thấp nhất, có lẽ vì trầm cảm khó xác định hơn trong các hành vi ngôn ngữ.', 'nl': 'Psychische gezondheid krijgt de laatste tijd meer en meer aandacht, depressie is tegenwoordig een veel voorkomende ziekte, maar ook andere aandoeningen zoals angst, obsessief-compulsieve stoornissen, voedingsstoornissen, autisme of aandachtstekort/hyperactiviteit stoornissen. De enorme hoeveelheid gegevens van sociale media en de recente vooruitgang van deep learning modellen bieden waardevolle middelen om psychische stoornissen automatisch te detecteren vanuit gewone tekst. In dit artikel experimenteren we met state-of-the-art methoden op de SMHD dataset mentale gezondheidsaandoeningen van Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Onze bijdrage is drievoudig: gebruik maken van een dataset die bestaat uit meer ziekten dan de meeste studies, gericht op algemene tekst in plaats van ondersteunende groepen voor geestelijke gezondheid en classificatie per post in plaats van per persoon of groep. Voor de automatische classificatie van de ziekten maken we gebruik van drie deep learning modellen: BERT, RoBERTa en XLNET. We verdubbelen de door Cohan et al. (2018) vastgestelde baseline op slechts een voorbeeld van hun dataset. We verbeteren de resultaten verkregen door Jiang et al. (2020) op post-level classificatie. De nauwkeurigheid die wordt verkregen door de classificatie van eetstoornissen is de hoogste vanwege de zwangere aanwezigheid van discussies over calorieën, diëten, recepten enz., terwijl depressie de laagste F1 score had, waarschijnlijk omdat depressie moeilijker te identificeren is in taalkundige handelingen.', 'bg': 'Психичното здраве получава все повече внимание напоследък, депресията е много често срещано заболяване в днешно време, но също така и други разстройства като тревожност, обсесивно-компулсивни разстройства, хранителни разстройства, аутизъм или нарушения на дефицита на вниманието/хиперактивността. Огромното количество данни от социалните медии и последните постижения на моделите за дълбоко обучение предоставят ценни средства за автоматично откриване на психични разстройства от обикновен текст. В тази статия експериментираме с най-съвременни методи върху набора от данни за състоянието на психичното здраве от Редит (Кохан и др., 2018). Нашият принос е троен: използване на набор от данни, състоящ се от повече заболявания, отколкото повечето проучвания, съсредоточен върху общ текст, а не върху групи за подкрепа на психичното здраве, и класификация по постове, а не по индивиди или групи. За автоматичната класификация на болестите използваме три модела за дълбоко обучение: БЕРТ, РоБЕРТА и XLNET. Удвояваме базовата база, установена от Кохан и др. (2018), само въз основа на извадка от техния набор от данни. Подобряваме резултатите, получени от Дзян и др. (2020) по отношение на класификацията след ниво. Точността, получена от класификатора на хранителните разстройства, е най-висока поради бременното присъствие на дискусии, свързани с калории, диети, рецепти и др., докато депресията има най-нисък резултат вероятно защото депресията е по-трудна за идентифициране в лингвистичните действия.', 'hr': 'Mentalno zdravlje nedavno dobija sve više pažnje, depresija je danas veoma češća bolest, ali i drugi poremećaji poput anksije, opsesivnih-kompulzivnih poremećaja, poremećaja hrane, autizma ili poremećaja pažnje-deficita/hiperaktivnosti. Velika količina podataka iz društvenih medija i nedavnih napreda dubokih modela učenja pružaju vrijedno sredstva za automatsko otkrivanje mentalnih poremećaja iz prostog teksta. U ovom članku eksperimentiramo s metodama umjetnosti o podacima SMHD mentalnog zdravlja iz Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Naš doprinos je trostruki: koristiti komplet podataka koji se sastoji od više bolesti nego većina ispitivanja, fokusirajući se na općem tekstu umjesto skupina podrške mentalnog zdravlja i klasifikaciju postima umjesto pojedinaca ili skupina. Za automatsku klasifikaciju bolesti, koristimo tri modela dubokog učenja: BERT, RoBERTa i XLNET. Udvostručili smo početnu liniju koju je utvrdio Cohan et al. (2018), na samo uzorak njihovog seta podataka. Mi poboljšamo rezultate koje je dobio Jiang et al. (2020) o klasifikaciji post nivoa. Tačnost koju je dobio klasifikator poremećaja jedenja najviša je zbog trudnoće prisutnosti rasprava povezanih s kalorijama, dijetom, receptima itd., dok je depresija imala najniži rezultat F1, vjerojatno zato što je depresija teže identificirati u jezičkim djelima.', 'de': 'Psychische Gesundheit gewinnt in letzter Zeit immer mehr Aufmerksamkeit, Depressionen sind heutzutage eine sehr häufige Krankheit, aber auch andere Störungen wie Angst, Zwangsstörungen, Ernährungsstörungen, Autismus oder Aufmerksamkeitsdefizit/Hyperaktivitätsstörungen. Die riesige Datenmenge aus sozialen Medien und die jüngsten Fortschritte von Deep Learning Modellen bieten wertvolle Mittel, psychische Störungen automatisch aus Klartext zu erkennen. In diesem Artikel experimentieren wir mit State-of-the-Art Methoden auf dem SMHD-Datensatz von Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Unser Beitrag ist dreifach: Wir verwenden einen Datensatz, der mehr Krankheiten enthält als die meisten Studien, konzentrieren uns auf allgemeinen Text anstatt auf Gruppen zur Unterstützung der psychischen Gesundheit und Klassifizierung nach Posten statt nach Einzelpersonen oder Gruppen. Für die automatische Klassifizierung der Krankheiten setzen wir drei Deep Learning Modelle ein: BERT, RoBERTa und XLNET. Wir verdoppeln die von Cohan et al. (2018) festgelegte Basislinie nur für eine Stichprobe ihres Datensatzes. Wir verbessern die von Jiang et al. (2020) erzielten Ergebnisse bei der Klassifizierung nach der Ebene. Die Genauigkeit, die der Klassifikator für Essstörungen erhält, ist am höchsten aufgrund der schwangeren Anwesenheit von Diskussionen über Kalorien, Diäten, Rezepte usw., während Depressionen den niedrigsten F1-Score hatten, wahrscheinlich weil Depressionen in sprachlichen Handlungen schwieriger zu identifizieren sind.', 'id': 'Kesehatan mental semakin memperhatikan akhir-akhir ini, depresi menjadi penyakit yang sangat umum saat ini, tetapi juga gangguan lain seperti kecemasan, gangguan obsesif-kompulsif, gangguan makan, autisme, atau gangguan gangguan perhatian/hiperaktif. Jumlah besar data dari media sosial dan kemajuan baru-baru ini dari model belajar dalam menyediakan cara berharga untuk secara otomatis mendeteksi gangguan mental dari teks biasa. Dalam artikel ini, kami eksperimen dengan metode terbaik pada SMHD kondisi kesehatan mental dataset dari Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Our contribution is threefold: using a dataset consisting of more illnesses than most studies, focusing on general text rather than mental health support groups and classification by posts rather than individuals or groups.  Untuk klasifikasi otomatis penyakit, kami menggunakan tiga model belajar dalam: BERT, RoBERTa dan XLNET. Kami menggandakan dasar dasar yang ditetapkan oleh Cohan et al. (2018), hanya pada sampel dari dataset mereka. Kami meningkatkan hasil yang diperoleh oleh Jiang et al. (2020) pada klasifikasi post-level. Akurati yang diperoleh oleh klasifikasi gangguan makan adalah yang tertinggi karena kehadiran hamil diskusi berkaitan dengan kalori, dieta, resep dll., sementara depresi memiliki skor F1 tertinggi, mungkin karena depresi lebih sulit untuk dikenal dalam tindakan bahasa.', 'da': 'Psykisk sundhed får mere og mere opmærksomhed for nylig, depression er en meget almindelig sygdom i dag, men også andre lidelser som angst, tvangsforstyrrelser, fodringsforstyrrelser, autisme eller opmærksomhedsbrist/hyperaktivitetsforstyrrelser. Den enorme mængde data fra sociale medier og de seneste fremskridt inden for deep learning modeller giver værdifulde midler til automatisk at detektere psykiske lidelser fra almindelig tekst. I denne artikel eksperimenterer vi med state-of-the-art metoder på SMHD-datasættet for psykiske sundhedsforhold fra Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Vores bidrag er tredobbelt: at bruge et datasæt bestående af flere sygdomme end de fleste undersøgelser, der fokuserer på generel tekst snarere end støttegrupper for mental sundhed og klassificering efter stillinger snarere end enkeltpersoner eller grupper. Til den automatiske klassificering af sygdommene anvender vi tre deep learning modeller: BERT, RoBERTa og XLNET. Vi fordobler baseline etableret af Cohan et al. (2018) på blot en prøve af deres datasæt. Vi forbedrer resultaterne opnået af Jiang et al. (2020) på post-level klassificering. Nøjagtigheden opnået af spiseforstyrrelsesklassifikationen er den højeste på grund af gravid tilstedeværelse af diskussioner relateret til kalorier, diæter, opskrifter osv., mens depression havde den laveste F1 score, sandsynligvis fordi depression er sværere at identificere i sproglige handlinger.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 심리 건강이 갈수록 중시되고 있다. 우울증은 매우 흔히 볼 수 있는 질병이지만 초조, 강박증, 양육장애, 자폐증 또는 주의결함/다동장애 등 다른 장애도 있다.소셜 미디어의 대량 데이터와 딥러닝 모델의 최신 진전은 순수한 텍스트에서 정신장애를 자동으로 감지하는 데 가치 있는 수단을 제공했다.본고에서 우리는 Reddit(Cohan 등, 2018년)의 SMHD 심리 건강 상태 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 방법을 시험했다.우리의 공헌은 세 가지가 있다. 대부분의 연구보다 더 많은 질병을 포함하는 데이터 집합을 사용하고, 심리 건강 지원 그룹이 아닌 일반 텍스트에 주목하고, 개인이나 단체가 아닌 게시물에 따라 분류하는 것이다.질병의 자동 분류에 대해 우리는 세 가지 심도 있는 학습 모델을 채택했다. 그것이 바로 BERT, RoBERTA와 XLNET이다.우리는 코한 등(2018년)이 세운 기선을 두 배로 늘려 그들의 데이터 집합 샘플만 분석했다.우리는 Jiang 등(2020년)의 직위 등급 분류 결과를 개선했다.칼로리, 음식, 식단 등과 관련한 논의가 있는 반면 우울증의 F1 점수가 가장 낮은 것은 언어 행동에서 우울증이 더 식별하기 어려웠기 때문으로 음식장애 분류법이 가장 정확도를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Afya ya akili inazidi kuongezeka zaidi na zaidi hivi karibuni, msongo wa mawazo ni ugonjwa wa kawaida wa kawaida leo, lakini pia magonjwa mengine kama hofu, magonjwa yanayolazimika, kulisha magonjwa, ubaguzi wa rangi, au ugonjwa wa kutoa makini/ugonjwa wa umeme. Kiwango kikubwa cha taarifa kutoka mitandao ya kijamii na maendeleo ya hivi karibuni ya mitindo ya kujifunza ya kina yanatoa njia ya thamani ya kutambua ugonjwa wa akili kutoka kwa ujumbe wa wazi. Katika makala hii, tunajaribu na mbinu za hali ya sanaa kuhusu hali ya afya ya akili ya SMHD zilizotengenezwa na Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Mchango wetu ni mara tatu: kwa kutumia seti ya taarifa zinazojumuisha magonjwa zaidi ya masomo mengi, wakijikita kwenye maandishi ya jumla badala ya makundi ya usaidizi wa afya ya akili na kutangazwa kwa makala badala ya watu binafsi au makundi. For the automatic classification of the diseases, we employ three deep learning models: BERT, RoBERTa and XLNET.  Tumezidishia mistari ya msingi iliyoanzishwa na Cohan et al. (2018), kwa mfano tu wa seti zao za taarifa. Tunaweza kuboresha matokeo yaliyopatikana na Jiang et al. (2020) katika kutangazwa kwa daraja baada ya ngazi. Ukweli uliopatikana na ugonjwa wa chakula ni mkubwa zaidi kutokana na uwepo wa mimba wa mijadala yanayohusiana na kalori, chakula, wapitiaji etc, wakati msongo wa mawazo ulikuwa na vipimo vya chini kabisa vya F1, pengine kwa sababu mawazo yanakuwa vigumu kutambua katika vitendo vya lugha.', 'fa': 'سالم ذهنی اخیراً بیشتر و بیشتر توجه می\u200cکند، افسردگی امروز یک بیماری بسیار معمول است، اما همچنین بیماری دیگر مثل اندوهگین، بیماری\u200cهای مضبوط\u200cکننده، بیماری\u200cهای غذا، اوتیسم، یا بیماری\u200cهای دچار توجه/افسردگی. مقدار بزرگی از داده های رسانه های اجتماعی و پیشرفت های اخیر از مدل های یادگیری عمیق به وسیله های ارزشمندی برای خودکار شناسایی اختلالات روانی از متن معمولی می دهد. در این مقاله، ما با روش های وضعیت هنری در مورد شرایط سلامتی روانی SMHD از Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018) آزمایش می کنیم. کمک ما سه ساله است: از استفاده از مجموعه داده\u200cای که از بیماری بیشتر از بیشتر مطالعه می\u200cباشد، تمرکز به متن عمومی به جای گروه\u200cهای پشتیبانی سلامتی روانی و گروه\u200cهای مختلف به جای فردی یا گروه\u200cها است. برای کلیسازی اتوماتیک بیماری، ما سه مدل یادگیری عمیق را استفاده می کنیم: BERT, RoBERTa و XLNET. ما پایین پایین را دوبرابر کردیم که توسط کوهان و الی ساخته شده است. (۲۰۱۸) فقط یک نمونه از مجموعه داده\u200cهای آنها. ما نتیجه\u200cهایی را که توسط جیانگ و ال. (۲۰۰۲) در کلیسازی سطح بعد گرفته\u200cایم بهتر می\u200cکنیم. دقیقاتی که توسط مختلف غذایی دریافت شده، بالاترین بخاطر حامله\u200cای از بحث\u200cهایی که مربوط به کالوریها، طعام، رسیده\u200cها و غیره\u200cها هستند، است. در حالی که افسردگی پایین\u200cترین امتیاز F1 داشت، احتمالا زیرا افسردگی در عمل زبان\u200cشناسی سخت\u200cتر است.', 'sq': 'Shëndetësia mentale është duke marrë gjithnjë e më shumë vëmendje kohët e fundit, depresioni është një sëmundje shumë e zakonshme sot, por gjithashtu shqetësime të tjera si ankthi, shqetësime obsesive-kompulsive, shqetësime ushqimore, autizmi, apo shqetësime të vëmendjes-defiçit/hiperaktiviteti. Shumica e madhe e të dhënave nga media sociale dhe përparimet e fundit të modeleve të mësimit të thellë ofrojnë mjete të vlefshme për të zbuluar automatikisht çrregullime mentale nga teksti i thjeshtë. Në këtë artikull, ne eksperimentojmë me metodat më të mëdha mbi kushtet e shëndetit psikologjik të SMHD nga Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Kontributi ynë është i trefishtë: përdorimi i një grupi të dhënash që përbëhet nga më shumë sëmundje se shumica e studimeve, duke u përqëndruar në tekstin e përgjithshëm në vend të grupeve të mbështetjes për shëndetin mendor dhe klasifikimin nga posti në vend të individëve apo grupeve. Për klasifikimin automatik të sëmundjeve, ne përdorim tre modele mësimi të thellë: BERT, RoBERTa dhe XLNET. Ne dyfishojmë bazën e ngritur nga Cohan et al. (2018), vetëm në një mostër të të dhënave të tyre. We improve the results obtained by Jiang et al. (2020) on post-level classification.  Drejtësia e fituar nga klasifikuesi i çrregullimeve ushqimore është më e larta për shkak të pranisë shtatzënë të diskutimeve lidhur me kaloritë, dietat, recetat etj., ndërsa depresioni kishte rezultatin më të ulët F1, ndoshta sepse depresioni është më i vështirë të identifikohet në veprimet gjuhësore.', 'tr': 'Mensiýe saglygyny günlerde has hem üns berip otyrýar, depresiýa häzirki wagtda örän orta ýarawsyzlyk bolup geçýär, ýöne başga hem gaharlyk, egzibilik-döwürelik näsazlyklar, iýetmeler, awtisam ýa-da üns-ýeterlik/hiperaktiwelik näsazlyklar bolup durýar. Sosyal medýdanlardan örän uly maglumatlar we iň soňky derin öwrenmek nusgalarynyň bejerilmesini aňsatlyk bilen düzgün metinden aýratyn näsazlary otomatik aňlamak üçin berer. Bu makaleda, SMHD garşy saglygyň durumynda Reddit (Kohan et al., 2018) tarapyndan çykyş hasaplanjaň durumynda synanyşýarys. Biziň gaýşartymyz üç gadyry: adamlaryň we gruplaryň ýerine seretseler we sazlaryň köpüsi ýagdaýda hasaplanýan dataset ullanýar. Hastalaryň otomatik klasifikasy üçin 3 derin öwrenmek nusgasyny ulanýarys: BERT, RoBERTa we XLNET. Biz Kohan et al tarapyndan döredilen esasy çyzgyny iki gezek goýýarys. Jiang et al tarapyndan berilen netijeleri geliştirip ýöredýäris. (2020) soňky düzeyde klasifikasynda. Iýmek azyklamasynyň klasifikatynda alan dogrylyk isleýän zady caloriýa, diýmek, recipe we bölegi ýagdaýynda çabalamak üçin iñ gowydyr. Bu arada depresiýanyň iň azyk F1 sany bardy, belki-de depresiýa lingwistiki hereketlerde tanamak kyn däldir.', 'af': "Mental gesondheid word onlangs meer en meer aandag gekom, depresiër is vandag 'n baie gemeenskaplike siekte, maar ook ander onderwerpe soos anxiety, opsesiewe-kompulsieve disorders, fees-disorders, autisme of aandag-deficit/hyperaktiviteit-disorders. Name In hierdie artikel eksperimenteer ons met staat-van-die-kunstensmetode op die SMHD mentale gesondige voorwaardes datastel van Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Ons bydraai is driefoud: gebruik 'n datastel wat bestaan van meer siektes as meeste studie, fokus op algemene teks eerder as menslike gesondige ondersteuningsgruppe en klasifikasie deur pos eerder as individue of groepe. Vir die outomatiese klasifikasie van die siektes, gebruik ons drie diep leer modele: BERT, RoBERTa en XLNET. Ons dubbel die basisline wat deur Cohan et al geïnstalleer is. (2018), op net 'n voorbeeld van hul datastel. Ons verbeter die resultate wat deur Jiang et al. (2020) ontvang word op post-vlak klasifikasie. Die presisie wat deur die eetdisorder klassifiseerder ontvang is is die hoogste vanweë die bevroudige voorsiening van diskusies wat verwanter is met kalories, diete, recepte ensfh., terwyl depresiër die laagste F1 punt gehad het, waarskynlik omdat depresiër meer moeilik is om in lingvisse werke te identifiseer.", 'am': 'አካባቢ ፈቃድ፣ ዛሬ ድምፅ እጅግ የተለየ ደዌ ነው፣ ነገር ግን ሌሎች ተጨናቂዎች፣ አስቸጋሪ፣ አስገዳቢ ሽብር፣ ማብላት፣ አሽሽታም፣ ወይም ትኩረት፣ አፍሪካዊነት፣ ደካማነት፣ ተቃውሞ/ተኩራቾች ክስሎች ነው፡፡ ከማኅበራዊ አውታር እና የቀድሞው የጥልቅ ትምህርት ዓይነቶች የዳታ ብዛት ከጥልቅ ጽሑፍ ማሳየት ማቀናቀል የሚያስፈልገውን ሀብት ማግኘት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ጽሑፍ ውስጥ ከሬድድ (Cohan et al, 2018) የSMHD የmental ጤና አካላት ዳታዎችን የሥልጣን ሥርዓት ሥርዓት እናሞክራለን፡፡ አካሄዳችን ሦስት እጥፍ ነው፤ ከብዙ ትምህርት ይልቅ ደዌዎችን በመቀበል የዳታ setup በመጠቀም፣ በአካባቢው ወይም በክፍለ ጉዳዮች ላይ ከመጠቀም በአካባቢው የጤና ፈቃድ ደብዳቤዎችን በመጠቀም እና በተለያየ ጽሑፎችን በመጠቀም እና በመደብዳቤዎች ላይ በመክ ለደዌዎቹ በራሱ መፍታት ሦስትን ጥልቅ ትምህርት modelዎችን እንሠራለን፤ BERT፣ ሮብERTa እና XLNET። በኮሐን እና አል የተደረገውን የዜና መስመር አበዛን ። የጅና እና አል (2020) ፍሬዎችን በpost-level classification ላይ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የመብል ክፍል በተለያየው እርግጠት ከካሌories፣ ምግብ፣ ደቂቃዎች እና ተጨማሪዎች ጋር የሚደረገው የፀነሰች ውይይት ምክንያት ትልቅ ነው፡፡', 'hy': "Հոգեկան առողջությունը վերջերս ավելի ու ավելի ուշադրություն է դարձնում, դեպրեսիան այսօր շատ հաճախ հիվանդություն է, բայց նաև այլ շեղումներ, ինչպիսիք են անհանգստությունը, մոլեկտիվ-պարտադրողական շեղումները, սննդի շեղումները, աուտիզմը կամ ուշադրության պակաս- Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների հսկայական տվյալները և խորը ուսումնասիրության մոդելների վերջին զարգացումները արժեքավոր միջոցներ են տալիս, որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար հայտնաբերեն մտավոր խանգարումներ պարզ տե Այս հոդվածի մեջ մենք փորձում ենք SMHD հոգեկան առողջապահության պայմանների մասին վերջին մեթոդների օգնությամբ Ռեդիթից (Կոհան և այլն., 2018 թ․․․․։ Մեր ներդրումը երեք անգամ նշանակում է. օգտագործելով ավելի շատ հիվանդություններից կազմված տվյալներ, քան ուսումնասիրությունների մեծ մասը, կենտրոնացնելով ընդհանուր տեքստի վրա, քան հոգեկան առողջության աջակցության խմբերի վրա և դասակարգում պա Հիվանդությունների ավտոմատիկ դասակարգման համար մենք օգտագործում ենք երեք խորը ուսուցման մոդել' BER, ROBERta և XLNet: Մենք կրկնապատկեցինք Կոհոն և այլների կողմից ստացված հիմքը 2018 թվականին, նրանց տվյալների մի նմուշի վրա: Մենք բարելավում ենք արդյունքները, որոնք ստացել են Ջանգ և այլն (2020 թ․-ին) հետմակարդակի դասակարգում: Սննդի խանգարումների դասակարգման արդյունքը ամենաճշգրիտ է, որովհետև հղի քննարկումները կապված են կալորիաների, սննդի, բաղադրատոմսերի և այլն, մինչդեռ դեպրեսիան ուներ ամենացածր F1-ի գնահատականը, հավանաբար որովհետև դեպրեսիան ավելի դժվար է", 'bn': 'মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য সম্প্রতি আরো বেশী মনোযোগ পাচ্ছে যে চিন্তার সাধারণ রোগ হচ্ছে, কিন্তু অন্যান্য দুর্ভোগ, উদ্বেগ, বাধ্যতামূলক-বাধ্যতামূলক রোগ, খাবার খাওয়ানোর ব্ সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের বিশাল তথ্য এবং সাম্প্রতিক গভীর শিক্ষা মডেলের উন্নয়নের মূল্যবান মানে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মানসিক অসু এই প্রবন্ধটিতে আমরা এসএমএইচডি মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য পরিস্থিতি নিয়ে পরীক্ষা করছি (কোহান এন্ট আল ২০১৮)। আমাদের অবদান তিন বার: বেশীরভাগ গবেষণার চেয়ে বেশী রোগের একটি ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে, মানসিক স্বাস্থ্যের সমর্থন গ্রুপের পরিবর্তে পোস্টের দ্ রোগের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বাভাবিক বিভাগের জন্য আমরা তিনটি গভীর শিক্ষা মডেল চালনা করি: বের্ট, রোবের্তা এবং এক্সলেনেট। আমরা তাদের ডাটাসেটের একটা নমুনামে প্রতিষ্ঠিত কহান এন্ট আল (২০১৮)। জিয়াং এন্ট আল (২০২০) এর ফলাফল আমরা উন্নত করি। খাবার বিপর্যয়ের কারণে গর্ভবতী ক্যালোরি, খাবার, রেসিপি ইত্যাদি নিয়ে আলোচনার সাথে সম্পর্কিত আলোচনার কারণে খাবারের ব্যাপারে যে সঠিকভাবে পাওয়া গেছে তা হলো সবচেয়ে বেশি', 'bs': 'Mentalno zdravlje nedavno dobija sve više pažnje, depresija je danas veoma česta bolest, ali i drugi poremećaji poput anksije, opsesivnih-kompulzivnih poremećaja, poremećaja hrane, autizma ili poremećaja pažnje-deficit a/hiperaktivnosti. Velika količina podataka iz društvenih medija i nedavnih napreda dubokog modela učenja pružaju vrijedne sredstva za automatsko otkrivanje mentalnih poremećaja iz prostog teksta. U ovom članku eksperimentiramo s metodama umjetnosti o podacima SMHD mentalnog zdravlja iz Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018). Naš doprinos je trostruki: korištenje kompleta podataka koja se sastoji od više bolesti nego većina ispitivanja, fokusiranje na općem tekstu umjesto grupa podrške mentalnog zdravlja i klasifikaciju postima umjesto pojedinaca ili grupa. Za automatsku klasifikaciju bolesti, koristimo tri modela dubokog učenja: BERT, RoBERTa i XLNET. Udvostručimo početnu liniju koju je utvrdio Cohan et al. (2018), na samo uzorak njihovog seta podataka. Mi poboljšamo rezultate koje je dobio Jiang et al. (2020) na klasifikaciji post nivoa. Tačnost koju je dobio klasifikator poremećaja jedenja najviša je zbog trudnoće prisutnosti diskusija povezanih sa kalorijama, dijetom, receptima itd., dok je depresija imala najniži rezultat F1, vjerojatno zato što je depresija teže identificirati u jezičkim djelima.', 'az': 'Mensiyyət sağlamlığı daha çox və daha çox gözləyir, depresiyyət bu günlərdə çox orta xəstəlik olaraq, lakin başqa xəstəlik kimi başqa xəstəlik, təhlükəsizlik, təhlükəsizlik təhlükəsizlik, autizm, ya da dikkat-deficit/hiperaktivit xəstəliyi. Sosyal media tərəfindən böyük məlumatlar və qeyri-adi öyrənmək modellerinin çox yüksək dəyişiklikləri açıq məlumatdan ruhsal xəstəliklərini avtomatik təşkil etmək üçün qiymətli bir vasitə verir. Bu məlumatda, Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018) ilə SMHD mental sağlamlıq şərtlərinin məlumatlarını təşviq edirik. Bizim səbəbimiz üç keçmişdir: çox təhsil etməkdən daha çox xəstəlik olan verilən qurbanları istifadə edir, insan və qruplardan əvvəl təhsil sağlamlıq dəstəklərinin dəstəklərinin dəstəklərinin dəstəklərinin dəstəklərinin dəstəklərinin dəstəklərinin dəst Hastalıqların otomatik klasifikasyonu üçün üç derin öyrənmə modeli istifadə edirik: BERT, RoBERTa və XLNET. Biz Cohan et al tərəfindən qurulmuş baseline iki dəfə çəkirik. Biz Jiang et al. (2020) ilə sonrakı səviyyə klasifikasiyasından qazanmış sonuçlarını yaxşılaşdırırıq. Yemək xəstəliyi klasifikatçısı ilə əlaqələnmiş doğruluğu kalorilərlə, diyətlərlə, receptilərlə əlaqələnmiş müzakirələrin hamilə olmasına görə ən yüksək dəyişiklikdir. Halbuki depresiya ən düşük F1 dəyişiklikdir, muhtemelen çünki depresiya dilində tanıtmaq daha çətindir.', 'ca': "La salut mental s'està fent cada cop més atenció fa poc, la depressió és una malaltia molt comú avui en dia, però també altres trastorns com l'ansietat, trastorns obsessius-compulsius, trastorns alimentaris, autisme, o trastorns de déficit d'atenció/hiperactivitat. L'enorme quantitat de dades dels mitjans socials i els avanços recents de models d'aprenentatge profund proporcionen valorosos mitjans per detectar automàticament trastorns mentals a partir de text senzill. In this article, we experiment with state-of-the-art methods on the SMHD mental health conditions dataset from Reddit (Cohan et al., 2018).  La nostra contribució és tripla: utilitzar un conjunt de dades compost de més malalties que la majoria d'estudis, centrant-se en text general en comptes de grups de suport a la salut mental i classificant-se per posts en comptes d'individus o grups. Per a la classificació automàtica de les malalties, utilitzem tres models d'aprenentatge profund: BERT, RoBERTa i XLNET. El doble de la base estabelecida per Cohan et al. (2018), només en una mostra del seu conjunt de dades. millorem els resultats obtenits per Jiang et al. (2020) en la classificació post-nivell. La precisió obtenida pel classificador de trastorns alimentaris és la més alta degut a la presença embarassada de debats relacionats amb calories, dietes, recetes, etc., mentre que la depressió tenia la puntuació F1 més baixa, probablement perquè la depressió és més difícil d'identificar en actes lingüístics.", 'cs': 'Duševní zdraví je v poslední době stále více a více pozornosti, deprese je dnes velmi běžným onemocněním, ale také dalšími poruchami jako úzkost, obsesivně-kompulzivní poruchy, poruchy krmení, autismus nebo poruchy pozornosti/hyperaktivity. Obrovské množství dat ze sociálních médií a nedávné pokroky modelů hlubokého učení poskytují cenné prostředky k automatické detekci duševních poruch z prostého textu. V tomto článku experimentujeme s nejmodernějšími metodami na datové sadě SMHD duševních zdravotních stavů z Redditu (Cohan et al., 2018). Náš příspěvek je trojnásobný: používáme datovou sadu sestávající z více onemocnění než většina studií, se zaměřením na obecný text spíše než skupiny podpory duševního zdraví a klasifikaci podle pracovních míst než jednotlivců či skupin. Pro automatickou klasifikaci onemocnění používáme tři modely hlubokého učení: BERT, RoBERTa a XLNET. Zdvojnásobíme základní hodnotu stanovenou Cohanem et al. (2018), pouze na ukázku jejich datové sady. Zlepšujeme výsledky získané Jiangem a al. (2020) na post-level klasifikaci. Přesnost získaná klasifikátorem poruch potravy je nejvyšší kvůli těhotné přítomnosti diskusí týkajících se kalorií, diet, receptů atd., zatímco deprese měla nejnižší skóre F1, pravděpodobně proto, že deprese je obtížnější identifikovat v jazykových aktech.', 'et': 'Vaimne tervis on viimasel ajal järjest rohkem tähelepanu saanud, depressioon on tänapäeval väga levinud haigus, kuid ka muud häired nagu ärevus, obsessiivne-kompulsiivne häire, toitumishäired, autism või tähelepanu puudujäägi/hüperaktiivsuse häired. Sotsiaalmeedia tohutu andmete hulk ja sügavõppe mudelite hiljutine areng pakuvad väärtuslikke vahendeid vaimsete häirete automaatseks tuvastamiseks lihtsalt tekstist. Selles artiklis eksperimenteerime Redditi (Cohan et al., 2018) SMHD vaimse tervise seisundite andmekogumi uusimaid meetodeid. Meie panus on kolmekordne: kasutada andmekogumit, mis koosneb rohkem haigusi kui enamik uuringuid, keskenduda pigem üldisele tekstile kui vaimse tervise tugirühmadele ning liigitada ametikohtade järgi, mitte üksikisikute või rühmade järgi. Haiguste automaatseks klassifitseerimiseks kasutame kolme sügavõppe mudelit: BERT, RoBERTa ja XLNET. Kahekordistame Cohan et al. (2018) kehtestatud lähtetaseme vaid nende andmekogumi valimi põhjal. Parandame Jiang et al. (2020) poolt saadud tulemusi taseme järgse klassifikatsiooni kohta. Söömishäirete klassifitseerija saavutatud täpsus on kõige suurem tänu rasedatele kalorite, dieetide, retseptide jms aruteludele, samas kui depressioonil oli madalaim F1 skoor, tõenäoliselt seetõttu, et depressiooni on keelelistes toimingutes raskem tuvastada.', 'fi': 'Mielenterveys on viime aikoina saamassa yhä enemmän huomiota, masennus on nykyään hyvin yleinen sairaus, mutta myös muut häiriöt, kuten ahdistus, pakkomielteinen-kompulsiivinen häiriö, ruokintahäiriöt, autismi tai huomiovaje/hyperaktiivisuus häiriöt. Sosiaalisen median valtava määrä dataa ja syväoppimismallien viimeaikainen kehitys tarjoavat arvokkaita keinoja tunnistaa mielenterveyshäiriöt automaattisesti pelkästä tekstistä. Tässä artikkelissa kokeilemme viimeisimpiä menetelmiä Redditin SMHD-mielenterveysolosuhteiden aineistosta (Cohan et al., 2018). Vastauksemme on kolminkertainen: käytetään aineistoa, joka sisältää enemmän sairauksia kuin useimmat tutkimukset, keskittyy yleiseen tekstiin mielenterveyden tukiryhmien sijaan ja luokitellaan viran mukaan yksilöiden tai ryhmien sijaan. Tautien automaattiseen luokitteluun käytämme kolmea syväoppimismallia: BERT, RoBERTa ja XLNET. Kaksinkertaistamme Cohan et al. (2018) asettaman lähtötilanteen vain otoksella niiden aineistosta. Parannamme Jiangin ja muiden (2020) tuloksia jälkitason luokituksesta. Syömishäiriöluokituksen tarkkuus on korkein siksi, että raskaana on kaloreita, ruokavalioita, reseptejä jne. koskevia keskusteluja, kun taas masennuksen F1-pisteet olivat alhaisimmat, todennäköisesti siksi, että masennusta on vaikeampi tunnistaa kielitoimissa.', 'ha': "Mental health is getting more and more attention recently, depression being a very common illness nowadays, but also other disorders like anxiety, obsessive-compulsive disorders, feeding disorders, autism, or attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorders.  Kida yawan data daga mitandai na jamii da ƙarami masu motsi na sanarwa masu ƙari, suna da ma'anar amfani da yin ganin a kanana farat-gane kasar cikin littãfin na rubutu. Daga wannan makala, munã jarraba da metoden-the-art kan mazaɓa na SMHD da data na tsari daga Rededit (Cohe et al., 2018). Ana amfani da matsayinmu sau uku: Ana yi amfani da wani matsayi na danganta ta wanda ke ƙara jiran mafiya yawa daga karatun, yana yin makini ga matsayin gaba ɗaya musamman mataimaki ga mutane da ƙarami mataimaki ya ƙara mataimaki ga mutane da kuma a rarraba matsayi na musamman ko jama'a. Yana yin amfani da misãlai uku masu ƙaranci: BERT, RoBERTA da XLNET. Tuna dubu misalin kohe et al. 2018, kan misãlai na danne. Mu ƙarfafa matsalan da Jiang et et al. (2020) a kan fassarar-daraja. Ga gaskiyar da ya sami cũtarwa mai ci, shi ne mafi ɗaukaka matsayin mazan jãyayya da magana masu husũma na kalori, abinci, da fatauci, ko da kuma taƙaitaccen ya kasance da mafi ƙasƙanci na F1, ko kuwa, fafa ya kamata, don haka, cewa, cewa, ma'anarsa yana da tsananin gannai cikin aikin linguistic.", 'he': 'בריאות נפשית מקבלת יותר ויותר תשומת לב לאחרונה, הדיכאון הוא מחלה נפוצה ביותר בימים אלה גם הפרעות אחרות כמו לחרדה, הפרעות אובססיביות-כפייתיות, הפרעות האכילה, אוטיזם, או הפרעות תקופת תשומת לב-deficit/היפרפקטיביות. כמות עצומה של נתונים מהתקשורת החברתית וההתקדמות האחרונות של דוגמני למידה עמוקה מספקות אמצעים יקרים לגלות אוטומטית הפרעות נפשיות מהטקסט פשוט. במאמר הזה, אנו מנסים עם שיטות חדשות על המידע על תנאי בריאות נפשית SMHD מרדיט (Cohan et al., 2018). התרומה שלנו היא שלושה: להשתמש במערכת נתונים שמכילה יותר מחלות מאשר רוב המחקרים, להתמקד בטקסט כללי במקום קבוצות תמיכה לבריאות נפשית עבור ההקלטה האוטומטית של המחלות, אנחנו משתמשים בשלושה דוגמנים למידה עמוקה: BERT, RoBERTa ו XLNET. אנחנו כפולים את המרכז הנוסף על ידי כהן ואל. (2018), רק על דגימה של קבוצת המידע שלהם. אנחנו משתפרים את התוצאות שנקבלו ע"י ג\'יאנג ו.ל. (2020) על מסווג לאחר רמה. הדיוקן שנקבל על ידי מסווג הפרעות האוכל הוא הגבוה ביותר בגלל הנוכחות בהריון של דיון שקשור לקלוריות, דיאטה, מתכונים וכו"כ, בעוד הדיכאון היה נקודת F1 נמוכה ביותר, כנראה בגלל הדיכאון קשה יותר לזהות במעשים שפתיים.', 'sk': 'Duševno zdravje je v zadnjem času vedno bolj pozorno, depresija je danes zelo pogosta bolezen, pa tudi druge motnje, kot so anksioznost, obsesivno-kompulzivne motnje, motnje hranjenja, avtizem ali motnje pozornosti/hiperaktivnosti. Velika količina podatkov iz družbenih omrežij in nedavni napredek modelov globokega učenja zagotavljajo dragocena sredstva za samodejno odkrivanje duševnih motenj iz preprostega besedila. V tem članku bomo eksperimentirali z najsodobnejšimi metodami na naboru podatkov o stanjih duševnega zdravja SMHD iz Reddita (Cohan et al., 2018). Naš prispevek je trojni: uporaba nabora podatkov, ki vsebuje več bolezni kot večina študij, osredotočenost na splošno besedilo in ne na skupine za podporo duševnemu zdravju ter razvrstitev po delovnih mestih in ne posameznikih ali skupinah. Za avtomatsko klasifikacijo bolezni uporabljamo tri modele globokega učenja: BERT, RoBERTa in XLNET. Podvojimo osnovno vrednost, ki so jo določili Cohan et al. (2018), samo na vzorcu njihovega nabora podatkov. Izboljšujemo rezultate, ki so jih pridobili Jiang et al. (2020) o klasifikaciji po stopnji. Natančnost, ki jo doseže klasifikator prehranjevalnih motenj, je najvišja zaradi nosečnosti prisotnosti razprav o kalorijah, dietah, receptih itd., medtem ko je imela depresija najnižjo oceno F1, verjetno zato, ker je depresijo težje identificirati v jezikovnih dejanjih.', 'bo': 'ད་ལྟོའི་ནང་དུ་ཉམས་ཆེན་སྒོ་སྒྲིག་ཀྱིས་གནད་དོན་མ་ཟད་པ་ཞིག་དག་གི་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་དེ་ཡང་བསླབས་པའི་སྒོ་སྒྲིག་གཞན་ཡང་བསླབས་པའི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གཞན་ཡང་བསླབས་ཀྱི་སྒོ་སྒྲིག་གཞན་པས སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་ལས་ཆེ་བའི་ཚད་གཞི་དང་མཐོ་རིམ་གྱི་མཐོ་རིམ་མཐུན་གྱི་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་དེ་ནི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྣམས་ནད་ཅིག་ ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་SMHD་ནང་གི་ཕྱོགས་སྐྱོན་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་དགོས ང་ཚོའི་གོ་སྐབས་འགའ་བྱ་ཚུལ་གསུམ་པ་རེད། ການສེར་ཞིག་གི་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་ཚིག་ལས་བརྟེན་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་སྒྲིག To the automatic classification of the diseases, we employ three deep learning models: BERT, RoBERTa and XLNET. ང་ཚོ་རྒྱ་ནག་ལྟ་བུའི་གཞུང་ཚབ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་འཛུགས་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ༢༠༠་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཇི་ཡཱན་ཨལ་གྱིས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚད་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད། The accuracy obtained by the eating disorder classifier is the highest due to the pregnant presence of discussions related to calories, diets, recipes etc., whereas depression had the lowest F1 score, probably because depression is more difficult to identify in linguistic acts.', 'jv': 'Mentalne kaleh luwih akeh lan ijol-ijol sing kulang nggambar, njuk-ijol kaleh saben karo sakjane kanggo kalagayet terêng, ngono kalagayet terêng seneng kalagayet kapungot, irengkuyung kapungot, irengkuyung, otositis, yaku kanggo ndelokkno-pok kanggo maneh Text Nang artiklé iki, kita surumutan karo sistem-kanggo ngaturanan-karo seni banjure dataset sing dadi kanggo Kemerdekaan SMHD (Kohan et al, 2008). Ngomongé awak dhéwé kuwi weweh-weh: nggunaké dataset sing berarti kanggo masalah luwih dumateng, ingkang teka-ingkang teka-ingkang kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno sing susahé isi alam lan kelompok sing paling dhéwé. Ngawe kudu kelas automatik sing karo sakjane, awak dhéwé iso ngubah model telu lagi nggambar: BERT, RBERT lan XLnetT. Awak dhéwé durung-duwé éntuk sing nggawe barang Kohan et al (2008), ning sampek dadi sing nyoto dadi nggawe dataset Two Dheke awak dhéwé sing luwih nêmên karo perbudhakan langgar nggawe karo hal-hal sing gak bênêr kuwi karo hal wartané karo kalorori, dié, réaksi, itl.'}
{'en': 'A Pre-trained Transformer and CNN Model with Joint Language ID and Part-of-Speech Tagging for Code-Mixed Social-Media Text', 'ar': 'نموذج محول وشبكة CNN مدرب مسبقًا مع معرف لغة مشترك وعلامات جزء من الكلام للنص المختلط في الوسائط الاجتماعية', 'es': 'Un modelo de Transformer y CNN previamente entrenado con identificación de idioma conjunta y etiquetado de parte del habla para texto de redes sociales con código mixto', 'pt': 'Um modelo pré-treinado de transformador e CNN com ID de idioma conjunto e marcação de parte da fala para texto de mídia social com código misto', 'hi': 'संयुक्त भाषा आईडी और कोड-मिश्रित सामाजिक मीडिया पाठ के लिए पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच टैगिंग के साथ एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित ट्रांसफॉर्मर और सीएनएन मॉडल', 'fr': 'Un transformateur pré-formé et un modèle CNN avec identification de la langue commune et marquage de partie de discours pour le texte de médias sociaux à code mixte', 'zh': '先训 Transformer CNN ,有以代码合社交媒体文本之言 ID 与词性志', 'ja': 'コードミックスされたソーシャルメディアテキストのための共同言語IDと音声の一部タグ付けを備えた事前訓練されたトランスフォーマーとCNNモデル', 'ga': 'Múnla Claochladáin agus CNN Réamh-oilte le Comhaitheantas Teanga agus Clibeáil Pháirt-de-Caint le haghaidh Téacs Meáin Shóisialta Cód-mheasctha', 'ru': 'Предварительно обученный трансформатор и модель CNN с совместным идентификатором языка и тегированием части речи для кодово-смешанного текста в социальных сетях', 'el': 'Ένα προσχεδιασμένο μοντέλο μετασχηματιστή και με κοινό γλωσσικό αναγνωριστικό και σήμανση μέρους ομιλίας για μικτό κείμενο κοινωνικών μέσων', 'hu': 'Előre képzett transzformátor és CNN modell közös nyelvi azonosítóval és beszédrészes címkézéssel a kódkeverett közösségi média szöveghez', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Код- араластырылған социалдық медиа мәтінінің біріктірілген тіл ID мен сөйлеу бөлшегі тегтері', 'it': 'Un Transformer e Modello CNN pre-addestrato con ID linguistico congiunto e tag part-of-speech per il testo dei social media misti in codice', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Trasformatur u CNN imħarreġ minn qabel b’Identifikazzjoni Konġunta tal-Lingwa u Tagging tal-Parti tal-Kellem għal Test tal-Midja Soċjali Mħallat bil-Kodiċi', 'mn': 'Код-холбогдсон нийгмийн-медиа текстүүдэд хамтдаа хэл ID болон хэлэлцээний хэсэг', 'lt': 'Iš anksto apmokytas transformatorius ir CNN modelis su bendra kalbos identifikavimo ir kalbos dalies ženklinimo kodu mišriu socialinės žiniasklaidos tekstu', 'mk': 'Name', 'no': 'Name', 'ml': 'കോഡ്- മിക്സെഡ് സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയാ പദാവലിയുമായി മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫെര്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കും സിഎന്\u200dഎന്\u200d മോഡെ', 'pl': 'Wstępnie przeszkolony model transformatora i CNN ze wspólnym identyfikatorem językowym i tagowaniem części mowy dla kodu mieszanego tekstu w mediach społecznościowych', 'sr': 'Preobučeni transformator i CNN model sa zajedničkim jezikom identifikacijom i dijelom govornog etiketa za kodirani socijalni medijski tekst', 'so': 'A pre-trained Transfer and CNN Model with Joint language ID and Part of-speech Tagging for Code-Mixed Social-Media Text', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En färdigutbildad Transformer- och CNN-modell med gemensamt språk-ID och Part-of-Speech Tagging för kodblandad social media-text', 'ur': 'Name', 'ro': 'Un model de transformator și CNN pre-instruit cu ID-ul lingvistic comun și etichetare Part-of-Speech pentru text social-media amestecat cu coduri', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một mô hình biến hình đã được rèn luyện trước và CNN với ID ngôn ngữ chung và phần mềm phát biểu cho Văn bản giao tiếp đa dạng giữa mã', 'nl': 'Een vooraf getraind Transformer- en CNN-model met gezamenlijke taal-ID en part-of-speech tagging voor code-mixed social media tekst', 'da': 'En forududdannet Transformer- og CNN-model med fælles sprog-ID og Part-of-Speech Tagging til kode-blandet social medietekst', 'hr': 'Preobučeni transformator i CNN model s zajedničkim jezikom identifikacijom i dijelom govornog oznake za kodeks pomiješan socijalni mediji', 'de': 'Ein vortrainiertes Transformer- und CNN-Modell mit gemeinsamer Sprach-ID und Part-of-Speech-Tagging für Code-Mixed Social-Media-Text', 'id': 'Model Transformer dan CNN yang dilatih-terlatih dengan ID Bahasa Bersama dan Tagging Bagian-dari-Bicara untuk Teks Social-Media Bercampur Kode', 'ko': '코드가 혼합된 소셜 미디어 텍스트를 위한 사전 훈련된 Transformer와 CNN 모델', 'bg': 'Предварително обучен трансформатор и модел със съвместен езиков идентификационен номер и маркиране на част от речта за кодово смесен текст в социалните медии', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Öňlerden Taýdalanýan Çaltylyk we CNN Modeli bilen Ýabşyr Dil ID we Ýabşyr-de-Sözler Taýgy', 'sq': 'A Pre-trained Transformer and CNN Model with Joint Language ID and Part-of-Speech Tagging for Code-Mixed Social-Media Text', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'A Pre-trained Transformer and CNN Model with Joint Language ID and Part-of-Speech Tagging for Code-Mixed Social-Media Text', 'sw': 'A Pre-trained Transformer and CNN Model with Joint Language ID and Part-of-Speech Tagging for Code-Mixed Social-Media Text', 'bn': 'কোড- মিশ্রিত সামাজিক-মিডিয়া টেক্সটের জন্য পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ট্রান্সফার্নার এবং সিএনএন মডেল', 'hy': 'Նախապատրաստված տրանֆորմատոր և CNN մոդել, որն ունի ընդհանուր լեզվի ID և խոսքի մի մասի նշան կոդի խառնված սոցիալական մեդիայի տեքստի համար', 'bs': 'Preobučeni transformator i CNN model sa zajedničkim jezikom identifikacijom i dijelom govornog etiketa za kodeks pomiješan socijalni mediji', 'cs': 'Předškolený transformátor a CNN model se společným jazykovým ID a značením části řeči pro kódový smíšený text sociálních médií', 'az': 'Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş Transformer və CNN Modeli Kod-Karıştırılmış Sosyal-Media Metni üçün Joint Dil ID və Söz Etiketi', 'fi': 'Esikoulutettu muuntaja ja CNN-malli, jossa on yhteinen kielitunnus ja puheen osa-tunniste koodisekoitettuun sosiaalisen median tekstiin', 'ca': 'Un model de transformador pré-entrenat i CNN amb ID de llenguatge conjunt i etiqueta part-of-speech per text de mitjans socials mixts amb codi', 'et': 'Eelkoolitud transformaator ja CNN mudel, millel on ühine keele ID ja kõneosa märgistus koodisegatud sotsiaalmeedia teksti jaoks', 'sk': 'Vnaprej usposobljen transformator in CNN model s skupnim jezikovnim ID-jezikom in označevanjem dela govora za besedilo v družbenih medijih, mešano s kodami', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་འགྱུར་ཆས་དང་CNN རྣམ་གྲངས', 'he': 'Name'}
{'en': 'Code-mixing (CM) is a frequently observed phenomenon that uses multiple languages in an utterance or sentence. There are no strict grammatical constraints observed in code-mixing, and it consists of non-standard variations of spelling. The linguistic complexity resulting from the above factors made the computational analysis of the code-mixed language a challenging task. Language identification (LI) and part of speech (POS) tagging are the fundamental steps that help analyze the structure of the code-mixed text. Often, the LI and POS tagging tasks are interdependent in the code-mixing scenario. We project the problem of dealing with multilingualism and grammatical structure while analyzing the code-mixed sentence as a joint learning task. In this paper, we jointly train and optimize language detection and part of speech tagging models in the code-mixed scenario. We used a Transformer with convolutional neural network architecture. We train a joint learning method by combining POS tagging and LI models on code-mixed social media text obtained from the ICON shared task.', 'es': 'La mezcla de códigos (CM) es un fenómeno que se observa con frecuencia y que utiliza varios idiomas en un enunciado u oración. No se observan restricciones gramaticales estrictas en la mezcla de códigos, y consiste en variaciones no estándar de la ortografía. La complejidad lingüística resultante de los factores anteriores hizo que el análisis computacional del lenguaje de código mixto fuera una tarea desafiante. La identificación del idioma (LI) y el etiquetado de parte del habla (POS) son los pasos fundamentales que ayudan a analizar la estructura del texto con código mixto. A menudo, las tareas de etiquetado de LI y POS son interdependientes en el escenario de mezcla de códigos. Proyectamos el problema de tratar con el multilingüismo y la estructura gramatical mientras analizamos la oración con código mixto como una tarea de aprendizaje conjunta. En este artículo, entrenamos y optimizamos conjuntamente la detección del idioma y parte de los modelos de etiquetado de voz en el escenario de código mixto. Utilizamos un transformador con arquitectura de red neuronal convolucional. Entrenamos un método de aprendizaje conjunto mediante la combinación de modelos de etiquetado de PDV y LI en texto de redes sociales con código mixto obtenido de la tarea compartida de ICON.', 'fr': "Le mélange de codes (CM) est un phénomène fréquemment observé qui utilise plusieurs langues dans un énoncé ou une phrase. Aucune contrainte grammaticale stricte n'est observée dans le mélange de codes, et il s'agit de variations orthographiques non standard. La complexité linguistique résultant des facteurs ci-dessus a fait de l'analyse informatique du langage codé une tâche difficile. L'identification de la langue (LI) et le marquage de la partie de la parole (POS) sont les étapes fondamentales qui aident à analyser la structure du texte codé. Souvent, les tâches de marquage LI et POS sont interdépendantes dans le scénario de mixage de code. Nous projetons le problème de la gestion du multilinguisme et de la structure grammaticale tout en analysant la phrase codée en tant que tâche d'apprentissage conjointe. Dans cet article, nous formons et optimisons conjointement la détection de la langue et une partie des modèles de marquage vocal dans le scénario de mélange de code. Nous avons utilisé un Transformer avec une architecture de réseau neuronal convolutif. Nous formons une méthode d'apprentissage conjointe en combinant le marquage POS et les modèles LI sur du texte de médias sociaux à code mixte obtenu à partir de la tâche partagée ICON.", 'ar': 'خلط الشفرات (CM) هو ظاهرة يتم ملاحظتها بشكل متكرر وتستخدم لغات متعددة في الكلام أو الجملة. لا توجد قيود نحوية صارمة لوحظت في خلط الشفرات ، وهي تتكون من اختلافات غير قياسية في التهجئة. جعلت التعقيد اللغوي الناتج عن العوامل المذكورة أعلاه التحليل الحسابي للغة مختلطة التعليمات البرمجية مهمة صعبة. يعد تحديد اللغة (LI) وجزء من علامات الكلام (POS) من الخطوات الأساسية التي تساعد في تحليل بنية النص المختلط بالشفرات. غالبًا ما تكون مهام وضع علامات LI و POS مترابطة في سيناريو خلط التعليمات البرمجية. نحن نتوقع مشكلة التعامل مع التعددية اللغوية والبنية النحوية أثناء تحليل الجملة المختلطة من الكود كمهمة تعلم مشتركة. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بتدريب وتحسين اكتشاف اللغة بشكل مشترك وجزء من نماذج تمييز الكلام في السيناريو المختلط بالشفرات. استخدمنا محولًا بهندسة شبكة عصبية تلافيفية. نقوم بتدريب طريقة تعلم مشتركة من خلال الجمع بين علامات نقاط البيع ونماذج LI على نصوص وسائط اجتماعية مختلطة برموز تم الحصول عليها من مهمة ICON المشتركة.', 'ja': 'コードミキシング（ CM ）は、発話や文章で複数の言語を使用する頻繁に観察される現象です。 コード混合には厳密な文法的制約はなく、標準的ではないスペルのバリエーションで構成されています。 上記の要因から生じる言語の複雑さは、コード混合言語の計算分析を困難な課題とした。 言語識別（ ＬＩ ）及び音声の一部（ ＰＯＳ ）タグ付けは、コード混合テキストの構造を分析するのに役立つ基本的なステップである。 多くの場合、LIとPOSタグ付けタスクは、コード混合シナリオで相互依存しています。 コード混合文を共同学習課題として分析しながら、多言語化と文法構造を扱う問題を投影する。 本稿では、コードミックスシナリオにおける言語検出と音声タグ付けモデルの一部を共同で訓練し、最適化する。 畳み込みニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを備えたトランスフォーマーを使用しました。 アイコンの共有タスクから得られたコードミックスされたソーシャルメディアテキストにPOSタグ付けとLIモデルを組み合わせることで、共同学習方法をトレーニングします。', 'pt': 'A mistura de códigos (CM) é um fenômeno frequentemente observado que usa vários idiomas em um enunciado ou frase. Não há restrições gramaticais estritas observadas na mistura de códigos e consiste em variações não padronizadas de ortografia. A complexidade linguística resultante dos fatores acima tornou a análise computacional da linguagem code-mixed uma tarefa desafiadora. A identificação de idioma (LI) e a marcação de parte da fala (POS) são as etapas fundamentais que ajudam a analisar a estrutura do texto misto de código. Muitas vezes, as tarefas de marcação LI e POS são interdependentes no cenário de combinação de códigos. Projetamos o problema de lidar com o multilinguismo e a estrutura gramatical ao analisar a frase de código misto como uma tarefa de aprendizagem conjunta. Neste artigo, treinamos e otimizamos em conjunto a detecção de linguagem e parte dos modelos de marcação de fala no cenário de código misto. Usamos um Transformer com arquitetura de rede neural convolucional. Treinamos um método de aprendizado conjunto combinando a marcação POS e os modelos LI em texto de mídia social de código misto obtido da tarefa compartilhada ICON.', 'zh': '代码混 (CM) 者,常察之象也,一言句多种语言。 代码混合,不见其语法约束,非标准之拼写变体成也。 此言复杂性使代码合言为一挑战性也。 言语识 (LI) 词性 (POS) 标记者代码助析文本也。 常,LI 、 POS 标记代码混方相赖也。 多言与语法构,合代码为合学。 本文共练优化代码混合词性标模。 我有卷积神经网络架构之变形金刚。 以 ICON 共功代码合社交媒体文本 POS 表 LI 以教习之。', 'hi': 'कोड-मिक्सिंग (सीएम) एक अक्सर देखी जाने वाली घटना है जो एक उच्चारण या वाक्य में कई भाषाओं का उपयोग करती है। कोड-मिश्रण में कोई सख्त व्याकरणिक बाधाएं नहीं देखी जाती हैं, और इसमें वर्तनी के गैर-मानक भिन्नताएं शामिल हैं। उपर्युक्त कारकों के परिणामस्वरूप भाषाई जटिलता ने कोड-मिश्रित भाषा के कम्प्यूटेशनल विश्लेषण को एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य बना दिया। भाषा पहचान (LI) और भाषण का हिस्सा (POS) टैगिंग मौलिक चरण हैं जो कोड-मिश्रित पाठ की संरचना का विश्लेषण करने में मदद करते हैं। अक्सर, LI और POS टैगिंग कार्य कोड-मिश्रण परिदृश्य में अन्योन्याश्रित होते हैं। हम एक संयुक्त सीखने के कार्य के रूप में कोड-मिश्रित वाक्य का विश्लेषण करते हुए बहुभाषावाद और व्याकरणिक संरचना से निपटने की समस्या को प्रोजेक्ट करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम संयुक्त रूप से कोड-मिश्रित परिदृश्य में भाषा का पता लगाने और भाषण टैगिंग मॉडल के हिस्से को प्रशिक्षित और अनुकूलित करते हैं। हम convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क वास्तुकला के साथ एक ट्रांसफॉर्मर का इस्तेमाल किया. हम ICON साझा कार्य से प्राप्त कोड-मिश्रित सोशल मीडिया पाठ पर पीओएस टैगिंग और LI मॉडल के संयोजन से एक संयुक्त सीखने की विधि को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Смешивание кода (CM) - это часто наблюдаемое явление, которое использует несколько языков в высказывании или предложении. В смешивании кода не наблюдается строгих грамматических ограничений, и он состоит из нестандартных вариаций орфографии. Из-за лингвистической сложности, обусловленной вышеуказанными факторами, проведение вычислительного анализа языка со смешанным кодом стало сложной задачей. Идентификация языка (LI) и тегирование части речи (POS) являются фундаментальными шагами, которые помогают анализировать структуру смешанного текста кода. Часто задачи маркировки LI и POS взаимозависимы в сценарии смешивания кода. Мы проецируем проблему работы с многоязычием и грамматической структурой, анализируя кодо-смешанное предложение как совместную учебную задачу. В этой статье мы совместно обучаем и оптимизируем распознавание языка и часть моделей тегирования речи в сценарии со смешанным кодом. Мы использовали трансформатор со сверточной архитектурой нейронной сети. Мы тренируем метод совместного обучения, комбинируя маркировку POS и модели LI на кодово-смешанном тексте в социальных сетях, полученном из совместной задачи ICON.', 'ga': "Feiniméan a bhreathnaítear go minic is ea códmheascadh (CM) a úsáideann iltheangacha i gcaint nó in abairt. Níl aon srianta dochta gramadaí le sonrú sa chómheascadh, agus is éard atá ann éagsúlachtaí neamhchaighdeánacha litrithe. Mar gheall ar chastacht theangeolaíoch na bhfachtóirí thuas ba thasc dúshlánach anailís ríomhaireachtúil na teanga cód-mheasctha. Is iad sainaithint teanga (LI) agus clibeáil chuid cainte (POS) na céimeanna bunúsacha a chuidíonn le hanailís a dhéanamh ar struchtúr an téacs cód-mheasctha. Go minic, bíonn tascanna clibeála LI agus POS idirspleách sa chás códmheasctha. Déanaimid an fhadhb a bhaineann le déileáil leis an ilteangachas agus struchtúr gramadaí a mheas agus anailís á déanamh againn ar an abairt chóidmheasctha mar thasc comhfhoghlama. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid comhthraenáil agus barrfheabhsú ar bhrath teanga agus mar chuid de mhúnlaí clibeála cainte sa chás cód-mheasctha. D'úsáideamar Trasfhoirmeoir le hailtireacht líonra conbhlóideach néarúil. Cuirimid oiliúint ar mhodh comhfhoghlama trí chlibeáil POS agus samhlacha LI a chomhcheangal ar théacs meán sóisialta cód-mheasctha a fhaightear ó thasc roinnte ICON.", 'el': 'Η ανάμειξη κώδικα (CM) είναι ένα συχνά παρατηρούμενο φαινόμενο που χρησιμοποιεί πολλές γλώσσες σε μια ομιλία ή πρόταση. Δεν υπάρχουν αυστηροί γραμματικοί περιορισμοί που παρατηρούνται στην ανάμειξη κώδικα και αποτελείται από μη τυποποιημένες παραλλαγές ορθογραφίας. Η γλωσσική πολυπλοκότητα που προκύπτει από τους παραπάνω παράγοντες έκανε την υπολογιστική ανάλυση της μικτής γλώσσας κώδικα ένα δύσκολο έργο. Η αναγνώριση γλωσσών και η επισήμανση μέρους ομιλίας είναι τα θεμελιώδη βήματα που βοηθούν στην ανάλυση της δομής του μικτού κώδικα κειμένου. Συχνά, οι εργασίες επισήμανσης είναι αλληλεξάρτητες στο σενάριο ανάμειξης κώδικα. Προβλέπουμε το πρόβλημα της αντιμετώπισης της πολυγλωσσίας και της γραμματικής δομής ενώ αναλύουμε την πρόταση ως κοινό μαθησιακό έργο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εκπαιδεύουμε και βελτιστοποιούμε από κοινού την ανίχνευση γλωσσών και τα μοντέλα σήμανσης ομιλίας στο σενάριο μικτού κώδικα. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε έναν μετασχηματιστή με αρχιτεκτονική νευρικού δικτύου. Εκπαιδεύουμε μια κοινή μέθοδο μάθησης συνδυάζοντας την επισήμανση και τα μοντέλα σε κείμενο κοινωνικών μέσων μικτού κώδικα που λαμβάνεται από την κοινή εργασία.', 'ka': 'Name არსებობს სტრუქტური გრამიკალური ზომილები, რომელიც კოდის შემთხვევაში დააჩვენებულია, რომელიც კოდის შემთხვევაში არსებობს სტანდარტური გარიაციებისგან. ლენგურისტიკური კომპლექსიტება, რომელიც გამოიყენებული ფაქტორებიდან გამოიყენება კომპუტაციალური ანალიზაციის კომპუტაციალური ანალიზაციას, რო ენის ინდიდინტიფიკაცია (LI) და სიტყვის (POS) ფაილი არის ფუნდამეტური ნაწილები, რომელიც კოდის შესაბამისი ტექსტის სტრუქტურაციას ანალიზებს. LI და POS მონიშნული დავალებები საშუალებელი კოდის შემთხვევაში იყოს. ჩვენ პროექტირებთ მულტილენგურისმის და გრამიმატიკური სტრუქტურის გარეშე პრობლემები, რომელიც კოდის შემთხვევაში გარეშე, როგორც ერთადერთი სწავლების საქ ჩვენ ერთადერთად ვაგრძნობთ და აპტიმიზეთ ენის განახლება და სიტყვის მოდელების ნაწილი, რომელიც კოდის შემთხვევა სინარიოში. ჩვენ კონტრანფორმაციული ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტურის გამოყენეთ. ჩვენ ერთადერთი სწავლების მეტი გავსწავლით, რომელიც POS-მაგრამების და LI-მაგრამების შეერთებაში კოდის შეერთებული სოციალური მედიაზე ტექსტის შესახებ, რომელიც ICON-ის გაყო', 'kk': 'Кодты араластыру (CM) көбірек көрсетілген панелі, бірнеше тілді сөйлемемен не сөйлемеде қолданылады. Код араластыруында көрсетілген грамматикалық шектеулері жоқ және ол үлгілеу стандартты түрлендірілмейді. Жоғардағы факторлардың лингвистикалық комплексілігі код араластырылған тілдің компьютерлік анализиясын жасады. Тіл идентификациясы (LI) және сөздің (POS) бөлігі - код араластырылған мәтіннің құрылымын талдау көмектесетін негізгі қадамдары. Көбінде LI және POS тапсырмалары код араластыру сценариясында байланысты. Біз көп лингвизмдік және грамматикалық құрылыммен қатынау мәселесін код арасындағы сөзді біріктіру тапсырмасы ретінде анализ етеді. Бұл қағазда біріктіріп, тілді анықтау және сөйлеу үлгілерінің бөлігін код араластырылған сценариясында оқу және оптимизациялау. Қосымша неврал желінің архитектурасы бар түрлендірушісін қолдандық. Біз ICON ортақ тапсырмасынан алған код араластырылған социалдық медиа мәтіндерінің POS тегтерін және LI моделдерін біріктіріп біріктіру әдісін үйренеміз.', 'it': "Il code-mixing (CM) è un fenomeno frequentemente osservato che utilizza più lingue in una pronuncia o frase. Non ci sono vincoli grammaticali rigorosi osservati nel code-mixing, e consiste in variazioni non standard di ortografia. La complessità linguistica risultante da questi fattori ha reso l'analisi computazionale del linguaggio misto un compito impegnativo. Identificazione linguistica (LI) e tag di parte del discorso (POS) sono i passaggi fondamentali che aiutano ad analizzare la struttura del testo misto di codice. Spesso, le attività di tagging LI e POS sono interdipendenti nello scenario di code-mixing. Proiettiamo il problema del multilinguismo e della struttura grammaticale analizzando la frase code-mixed come compito di apprendimento congiunto. In questo articolo, addestriamo e ottimizziamo congiuntamente i modelli di rilevamento del linguaggio e parte dei tag vocali nello scenario code-mixed. Abbiamo usato un Transformer con architettura di rete neurale convoluzionale. Formiamo un metodo di apprendimento congiunto combinando POS tagging e modelli LI su testi di social media misti codificati ottenuti dall'attività condivisa ICON.", 'hu': 'A kódkeverés (CM) egy gyakran megfigyelt jelenség, amely több nyelvet használ egy kimondásban vagy mondatban. A kódkeverés során nincsenek szigorú nyelvtani korlátozások, és nem szabványos helyesírási változatokból áll. A fenti tényezőkből eredő nyelvi összetettség kihívást jelentett a kódkevert nyelv számítástechnikai elemzése. A nyelvazonosítás (LI) és a beszédrész (POS) címkézés az alapvető lépések, amelyek segítenek elemezni a kódkeverékes szöveg szerkezetét. Gyakran az LI és POS címkézési feladatok kölcsönösen függnek a kódkeverési forgatókönyvben. A többnyelvűség és a nyelvtani struktúra kezelésének problémáját vetítjük ki, miközben a kódkeverék mondatot közös tanulási feladatként elemezzük. Ebben a tanulmányban közösen képzünk és optimalizáljuk a nyelvfelismerést és a beszédcímkézési modellek egy részét a kódkevert forgatókönyvben. Egy transzformátort használtunk konvolúciós neurális hálózati architektúrával. Egy közös tanulási módszert képzünk azzal, hogy kombináljuk a POS címkézést és az LI modelleket az ICON megosztott feladatból származó kódkevert közösségi média szövegen.', 'mk': 'Код- мешање (CM) е често забележан феномен кој користи повеќе јазици во израз или реченица. Нема строги граматички ограничувања забележани во мешањето на кодови и се состои од нестандардни варијации на правопис. Лингвистичката комплексност што резултира од наведените фактори ја направи компјутативната анализа на код-мешаниот јазик предизвикувачка задача. Идентификацијата на јазикот (LI) и дел од означувањето на говорот (POS) се основните чекори кои помагаат во анализата на структурата на текстот мешан со код. Често, задачите за означување на LI и POS се меѓусебно зависни од сценариото за мешање кодови. Проектираме проблем со справувањето со мултијазизмот и граматичката структура, истовремено анализирајќи ја комбинираната реченица како заедничка задача за учење. Во овој весник заедно тренираме и оптимизираме детекција на јазикот и дел од моделите за означување на говорот во мешаниот сценарио. We used a Transformer with convolutional neural network architecture.  We train a joint learning method by combining POS tagging and LI models on code-mixed social media text obtained from the ICON shared task.', 'lt': 'Kodų derinimas (CM) yra dažnai pastebėtas reiškinys, kuriame žodžiais arba sakiniais vartojamos kelios kalbos. Kodų maišymo metu nenustatyta griežtų gramatinių apribojimų ir juos sudaro nestandartiniai rašybos variantai. Dėl pirmiau nurodytų veiksnių atsiradusio kalbos sudėtingumo skaičiavimo analizė su mišriąja kalba tapo sudėtinga užduotis. Kalbos identifikavimas (LI) ir kalbos žymėjimas (POS) yra pagrindiniai žingsniai, padedantys analizuoti mišraus kodo teksto struktūrą. Dažnai LI ir POS ženklinimo užduotys tarpusavyje priklauso nuo kodų derinimo scenarijaus. Mes projektuojame daugiakalbystės ir gramatinės struktūros problem ą analizuojant kodų mišrų sakinį kaip bendrą mokymosi užduotį. Šiame dokumente bendrai mokome ir optimizuojame kalbų aptikimą ir kalbos ženklinimo modelių dalį pagal mišrų kodų scenarijų. Mes naudojome konvoliucinio nervinio tinklo architektūrą. Mokome bendrą mokymosi metodą derindami POS žymėjimą ir LI modelius kodų mišraus socialinės žiniasklaidos tekste, gautame iš ICON bendros užduoties.', 'ml': 'ഒരു വാക്കോ വാക്കോ വാക്കോ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന കോഡ്- മിക്കിങ്ങ്( സിഎം) അധികമായി നോക്കിയിരിക്കുന്ന സ്വഭാവം  കോഡ്- മിങ്ങിങില്\u200d കാണുന്ന ക്രാഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d നിയന്ത്രണങ്ങളില്ല, അക്ഷരസഞ്ചയത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥാനമില്ലാത്ത വേര The linguistic complexity resulting from the above factors made the computational analysis of the code-mixed language a challenging task.  ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതു് (LI) പിന്നെ സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഭാഗങ്ങളുടെയും ഭാഗമാണു് കോഡ് മിഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റിന് എപ്പോഴും ലിയും പോസും ടാഗിങ്ങ് ജോലികളും കോഡ്- മിങ്ങ് സിനേരിയോയില്\u200d ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. കോഡ്-mixed വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഒരു യൂണ്ട് പഠിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയായി അന്വേഷിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെയും ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d കൃത്രിമ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ച് ട്രെയിന്\u200d ചെയ്യുകയും, ഭാഷ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുകയും, സംസാരം ടാഗിങ് മോഡലുകളില്\u200d ഒരു ഭാഗവും കോഡ്  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരുന്നു പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ നെറുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്റര്\u200d ശൂന പോഎസ് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങും ലി മോഡലുകളും കോഡ് മിക്കിഡ് മെഡിക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്ന സാമൂഹ്യ മെഡിയാ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും കിട്ടി', 'ms': 'Pencampuran-kod (CM) adalah fenomena yang sering dilihat yang menggunakan bahasa berbilang dalam ungkapan atau kalimat. Tiada keterangan grammatik ketat yang dilihat dalam campuran-kod, dan ia terdiri dari variasi ejaan bukan piawai. Kekompleksiti bahasa yang berasal dari faktor di atas membuat analisis komputasi bahasa-campuran kod tugas yang mencabar. Pengenalan bahasa (LI) dan sebahagian dari tag ucapan (POS) adalah langkah asas yang membantu menganalisis struktur teks campuran-kod. Biasanya, tugas penanda LI dan POS bergantung antara satu sama lain dalam skenario campuran kod. We project the problem of dealing with multilingualism and grammatical structure while analyzing the code-mixed sentence as a joint learning task.  In this paper, we jointly train and optimize language detection and part of speech tagging models in the code-mixed scenario.  Kami menggunakan Transformer dengan arkitektur rangkaian saraf konvolusi. Kami melatih kaedah pembelajaran kongsi dengan menggabungkan tag POS dan model LI pada teks media sosial bercampur kod yang diperoleh dari tugas kongsi ICON.', 'no': 'Kodefeksing (CM) er ein ofte observert fenomen som brukar fleire språk i eit uttale eller setning. Det finst ingen strikt grammatiske begrensningar som er observert i kodmeldinga, og det inneheld ikkje standard variasjonar av staving. Den lingviske kompleksiteten som resulterer frå dei øvste faktorene gjorde dataanalysen av kodemekserte språket ein vanskeleg oppgåve. Språk- identifikasjon (LI) og ein del av talemerking (POS) er dei grunnleggjande stegane som hjelper til å analysera strukturen av teksten mellom koden. Ofte er LI- og POS- merkingsprogrammene avhengige i scenarioen med kodmeldingar. Vi prosjektar problemet med å handtere med fleirlingvisse og grammatiske struktur medan analyserer setninga mellom koden som ei kopla læringsoppgåve. I denne papiret treng vi saman og optimaliserer språk-oppdaging og del av språk-merking-modeller i scenarioen med kode-blandet. Vi brukte ein transformer med konvolusjonell neuralnettverksarkitektur. Vi treng ein felles læringsmetode ved å kombinere POS-merkingar og LI-modeller på kodeflikte sosiale media-tekst som er henta frå ICON-delt oppgåve.', 'mt': "Code-mixing (CM) is a frequently observed phenomenon that uses multiple languages in an utterance or sentence.  There are no strict grammatical constraints observed in code-mixing, and it consists of non-standard variations of spelling.  Il-kumplessità lingwistika li rriżultat mill-fatturi ta’ hawn fuq għamlet l-analiżi komputattiva tal-lingwa mħallta bil-kodiċi kompitu ta’ sfida. L-identifikazzjoni tal-lingwa (LI) u parti mit-tikkettar tad-diskors (POS) huma l-passi fundamentali li jgħinu fl-analiżi tal-istruttura tat-test imħallat bil-kodiċi. Ħafna drabi, il-kompiti tat-tikkettar LI u POS huma interdipendenti fix-xenarju tat-taħlit tal-kodiċijiet. Aħna nipproġettaw il-problem a tat-trattament tal-multilingwiżmu u l-istruttura grammatika filwaqt li nianalizzaw is-sentenza mħallta bil-kodiċi bħala kompitu konġunt ta’ tagħlim. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nħarrġu flimkien u noptimizzaw id-detezzjoni tal-lingwi u parti mill-mudelli tat-tikkettar tad-diskors fix-xenarju mħallat bil-kodiċi. Użajna Transformer b’arkitettura tan-netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali. Aħna nħarrġu metodu konġunt ta' tagħlim billi ngħaqdu l-mudelli tal-ittikkettjar POS u LI fuq test tal-midja soċjali mħallat bil-kodiċi miksub mill-kompitu konġunt tal-ICON.", 'sr': 'Pomješavanje kodova (CM) je često posmatrano fenomeno koji koristi višestruke jezike u govoru ili rečenici. Nema striktnih gramatičkih ograničenja koje su primijećene u kombinaciji koda, i sastavlja se od neostandardnih varijacija pisanja. Lingistička kompleksnost koja je rezultirala od iznad faktora napravila je računalnu analizu jezika mešanog koda izazovnom zadatkom. Identifikacija jezika (LI) i deo govora (POS) označavanja su osnovni koraci koji pomažu analizirati strukturu teksta mešanog koda. Često su zadaci označavanja LI i POS međuovisni u scenariju miješanja kodova. Projektiramo problem rješavanja multilingvisma i gramatičke strukture dok analiziramo rečenicu mešanu kod kao zajednički zadatak učenja. U ovom papiru zajedno treniramo i optimiziramo detekciju jezika i deo modela oznake govora u scenariju mešanog koda. Koristili smo transformer sa konvolucionalnom neuralnom mrežnom arhitekturom. Mi treniramo zajedničku metodu učenja kombiniranjem POS etiketa i LI modela na tekstu socijalnih medija koji su pomiješani kod dobili od zajedničkog zadatka ICON-a.', 'pl': 'Mieszanie kodów (CM) jest często obserwowanym zjawiskiem, które używa wielu języków w wypowiedzi lub zdaniu. Nie ma ścisłych ograniczeń gramatycznych obserwowanych w mieszaniu kodu i składa się ona z niestandardowych wariantów pisowni. Złożoność językowa wynikająca z powyższych czynników sprawiła, że analiza obliczeniowa języka mieszanego kodem stała się trudnym zadaniem. Identyfikacja języka (LI) i tagowanie części mowy (POS) to podstawowe kroki, które pomagają analizować strukturę tekstu mieszanego w kodzie. Często zadania oznaczania LI i POS są współzależne w scenariuszu mieszania kodu. Projektujemy problem radzenia sobie z wielojęzycznością i strukturą gramatyczną analizując zdanie mieszane kodem jako wspólne zadanie uczenia się. W niniejszym artykule wspólnie trenujemy i optymalizujemy wykrywanie języków i część modeli tagowania mowy w scenariuszu mieszanego kodem. Użyliśmy Transformera z architekturą konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej. Szkolimy wspólną metodę uczenia się, łącząc tagowanie POS i modele LI na kodowym tekście mediów społecznościowych uzyskanym z zadania wspólnego ICON.', 'ro': 'Amestecarea codurilor (CM) este un fenomen observat frecvent care folosește mai multe limbi într-o pronunțare sau propoziție. Nu există constrângeri gramaticale stricte observate în amestecarea codurilor și constă în variații non-standard de ortografie. Complexitatea lingvistică rezultată din factorii de mai sus a făcut analiza computațională a limbajului mixt de coduri o sarcină dificilă. Identificarea limbii (LI) și etichetarea unei părți din vorbire (POS) sunt pașii fundamentali care ajută la analizarea structurii textului amestecat de coduri. Adesea, sarcinile de etichetare LI și POS sunt interdependente în scenariul de amestecare a codurilor. Proiectăm problema abordării multilingvismului și structurii gramaticale în timp ce analizăm propoziția mixtă de cod ca o sarcină comună de învățare. În această lucrare, instruim și optimizăm împreună detectarea limbii și o parte a modelelor de etichetare a vorbirii în scenariul mixt de coduri. Am folosit un Transformer cu arhitectura reţelei neuronale convoluţionale. Instruim o metodă comună de învățare prin combinarea etichetării POS și modelelor LI pe text social media mixt de cod obținut din sarcina comună ICON.', 'si': 'කෝඩ් මික්ස් එක (CM) සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් බලන්න ප්\u200dරදේශයක් වගේම භාෂාව භාවිත කරනවා. කෝඩ් මික්ස් එක්ක ස්ට්\u200dරික්ට් ගර්මාටික් සීමාවක් නැහැ, ඒ වගේම ඒක ස්ථාවිත වෙනස් නැහැ වාර්තාවක් වගේ භාෂාවික සංශ්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ උඩින් විශ්ලේෂණයේ කෝඩ් මික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය (LI) සහ භාෂාව (POS) ටැග් කොටස් තමයි පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න උදව් කරන මූ සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්, LI සහ POS ටැග් කරන වැඩේ කෝඩ් මිශ්රණය සිනාරියෝ වලට සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා. අපි ගොඩක් භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක සහ ග්\u200dරමාත්මක සංස්කරණය සමග වැඩ කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරික්ෂා කරනවා කෝඩ් මික්ස්  මේ පැත්තට, අපි එක්කෙන් කාර්යාන්ත්\u200dරිය කරනවා භාෂාව හොයාගන්න සහ කතා පරීක්ෂණයේ කොටස් ටැග් කරනවා මොඩේල් එක් අපි ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලය සංවිධානය සමග. අපි සම්බන්ධ ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ POS ටැග් ගන්න සහ LI මොඩල් එකතු කරනවා ICON එකතු වැඩක් වලින් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ලැබු', 'so': 'Qoriga isku xirashada (CM) waa xaalad marar badan oo lagu fiiriyey, kaasoo ku isticmaala luqado ama luqad badan. Ma jiraan qasab aad u adag oo grammatika ah oo ku qoran kooxda, waxaana ka mid ah isbedelka kalajarida oo aan caadi aheyn. Kaalmada luuqada ee ka soo jeeda waxyaabaha sare waxaa lagu sameeyay baaritaanka xisaabinta ee luqada kooxda lagu isku daray shaqada dhibaataysan. Aqoonsiga luqada (LI) iyo qeyb ka mid ah warqada (POS) waa tallaabooyinka aasaasiga ah oo caawinaya in la sawiraa dhismaha qoraalka kooxda lagu isku xiray. Inta badan shaqooyinka tagitaanka ee LI iyo POS waxay ku xiran yihiin muuqashada isku xiran. Dhibaatada ku saabsan dhaqanka luuqadaha kala duduwan iyo dhismaha grammatika, marka aan u baarayno xukunka kooxda isku xiran sida shaqada waxbarashada wadajirka ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku tababarinnaa islamarkaasna si wada jir ah u baranaynaa aqoonsiga luqada iyo qeyb ka mid ah muuqashada calaamadda hadalka ee muuqashada codsiga isku qasan. Waxaynu isticmaalnay turjubaal oo leh dhismaha shabakadda neurada. Waxaannu ku tababarinnaa qaab waxbarasho wadajir ah oo lagu soo bandhigi karo boostada POS iyo modellada LI oo ku qoran qoraalka macluumaadka bulshada ee kooxda isku xiran ee ka helay shaqo qayb ah ICON.', 'sv': 'Kodblandning (CM) är ett ofta observerat fenomen som använder flera språk i ett yttrande eller mening. Det finns inga strikta grammatiska begränsningar observerade vid kodblandning, och det består av icke-standardvariationer av stavning. Den språkliga komplexiteten som härrör från ovanstående faktorer gjorde beräkningsanalysen av det kodblandade språket till en utmanande uppgift. Språkidentifiering (LI) och en del av tal (POS) märkning är de grundläggande stegen som hjälper till att analysera strukturen i kodblandad text. Ofta är LI- och POS-märkningsuppgifterna beroende av varandra i kodblandningsscenariot. Vi projicerar problemet med att hantera flerspråkighet och grammatisk struktur samtidigt som vi analyserar den kodblandade meningen som en gemensam inlärningsuppgift. I den här uppsatsen utbildar och optimerar vi tillsammans språkdetektering och delar av talmärkningsmodeller i det kodblandade scenariot. Vi använde en Transformer med konvulutionell neural nätverksarkitektur. Vi tränar en gemensam inlärningsmetod genom att kombinera POS taggning och LI modeller på kodblandad social media text som erhållits från ICON delade uppgift.', 'mn': 'Код-холбоотой (CM) бол олон хэл эсвэл өгүүлбэрт хэрэглэдэг ихэвчлэн анзаарсан үзэгдэл юм. Код холбогдохдоо хэцүү грамматикийн хязгаар байхгүй. Энэ нь бичлэгийн стандарт биш өөрчлөлт байдаг. Үүний дээрх хүчин зүйлээс гарсан хэлний цогц цогц нь кодын холбогдсон хэлний тооны шинжилгээг бүтээсэн юм. Холны тодорхойлолт (LI) болон ярианы нэг хэсэг (POS) маркинг нь кодын цуглуулсан текстийн бүтэц шинжилгээнд тусалдаг үндсэн алхам юм. Ихэнх үед LI болон POS-ийн тэмдэглэх үйл ажиллагаа кодын холбоотой хувилбарт харилцаа хамааралтай. Бид олон хэлний болон грамматикийн бүтэцтэй ажиллах асуудлыг шинжилгээд кодын холбоотой өгүүлбэрийг нийлбэртэй суралцах үйл ажиллагаа гэж шинжилдэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид холбоотой хэлний мэдэх, илтгэлийн загварын нэг хэсэг нь кодын холбоотой хувилбарын хувилбарыг дасгалжуулдаг. Бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектуртай Трансформерийг ашигласан. Бид POS маркинг болон LI загваруудыг ICON-ын хуваалтын ажлын тухай холбогдсон нийгмийн хэвлэлийн текстүүдийг нэгтгэхэд хамтран суралцах аргыг суралцаж байна.', 'ta': 'குறியீட்டு கலக்கம் (CM) ஒரு வாக்கியத்தில் அல்லது வாக்கியத்தில் பல மொழிகளை பயன்படுத்தும் பொருளாக பார்க்கப்பட்டுள குறியீடு கலவைப்பில் கடினமான வரைப்பட தடைப்புகள் எதுவும் பார்க்கப்படவில்லை, மற்றும் அது எழுத்துக்களின் நிலையான மாறி மேலுள்ள காரணிகளிலிருந்து மொழி சிக்கல் சிக்கல் மொழி அடையாளம் (LI) மற்றும் பேச்சு குறியீட்டின் பகுதி என்பது குறியீட்டு கலக்கப்பட்ட உரையின் அமைப்பை ஆய்வு செய்யும் அடிப்பட Often, the LI and POS tagging tasks are interdependent in the code- mixing scenario. நாம் பல மொழிமாற்றம் மற்றும் குறிமுறை அமைப்புடன் சேர்க்கும் பிரச்சனையை ஒரு இணைய கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பணியாக ஆராய்ந்து கொண இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒன்றாக பயிற்சி மற்றும் மொழி கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் பேச்சு ஒட்டு மாதிரிகளின் பகுதி நாங்கள் ஒரு மாற்று மாற்றி பயன்படுத்தினோம் முழுமையான நரம்பு வலைப்பின்னல் கட்டுப்பாடுகள். POS ஒட்டுதல் மற்றும் LI மாதிரிகளை குறியீடு கலக்கப்பட்ட சமூக ஊடக உரையில் சேர்ந்து கொண்டு ஒரு இணையான கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் முறைய', 'ur': 'کڈ میکسنگ (CM) ایک اغلب نظر آتا ہے جو کلام یا کلام میں بہت سی زبانیں استعمال کرتا ہے. کوڈ میکسنگ میں کبھی مضبوط گراماتیکی محدودیت نہیں ہیں، اور یہ بات ایسی غیر استاندارڈ کی مختلف باتوں میں سے ہے۔ زبان کی پیچیدگی اوپر کی فکتوروں سے نتیجہ ہوئی کوڈ میکسٹ زبان کی کمپیوٹریشن تحلیل کو ایک چالٹ کام بنایا۔ زبان شناسایی (LI) اور زبان (POS) ٹاگ کی حصہ یہ اصلی قدم ہیں جن کی مدد کرتی ہے کہ کوڈ میکس ٹیکسٹ کی ساختاری شناسایی کرتی ہے. اکثر، LI اور POS ٹاگ کرنے کے کام کوڈ میکسنگ سناریو میں متفاوت ہیں. ہم multilingualism اور grammatical structure کے بارے میں مشکل کی تدبیر کریں گے جب کڈ مmixed sentence کو ایک جوڑی تعلیم کا کام بناتے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک دوسرے سے زبان کا پیدا کرنا اور بات کا ٹیگ نمونڈل کا حصہ کوڈ میکس سناریو میں ترین کریں۔ ہم نے ایک ترنسفورٹ استعمال کیا تھا جہاں انورل نیورل نیٹ ورک معماری کے ساتھ۔ ہم ایک جوڑی سیکھنے کا طریقہ تطالب کرتے ہیں اس طرح کہ POS ٹاگ اور LI موڈل کو کڈ میکس میڈیا متکس پر پیدا کیا گیا ہے جو ICON شریک کام سے حاصل کیا گیا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Mã trộn lẫn (CM) là một hiện tượng thường được quan sát mà sử dụng nhiều ngôn ngữ bằng ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Không có giới hạn ngôn ngữ nghiêm ngặt trong việc pha trộn mã, và nó bao gồm các biến đổi độ chính tả không tiêu chuẩn. Sự phức tạp ngôn ngữ nhờ những nhân tố trên làm cho việc phân tích tính toán ngôn ngữ phân phối mã trở nên khó khăn. Nhận dạng ngôn ngữ (LI) và một phần của câu nói (POS) là những bước cơ bản giúp phân tích cấu trúc của đoạn mã trộn. Thông thường, các nhiệm vụ định vị trong bộ phận phân phối mã gồm nhau. Chúng tôi đề xuất vấn đề liên quan đến ngôn ngữ và cấu trúc ngữ pháp phân tích câu chữ hỗn hợp thành một nhiệm vụ học chung. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi cùng nhau huấn luyện và tối ưu hóa việc phát hiện ngôn ngữ và một phần của mô hình bài diễn văn trong kịch bản mã trộn. Chúng tôi đã sử dụng một transformer với hệ thống thần kinh rối loạn. Chúng tôi đào tạo phương pháp học chung bằng cách kết hợp kết hợp kết hợp các mô hình POS và Ll trên một đoạn mạng xã hội mã trộn lấy từ nhiệm vụ của ICO.', 'uz': "Code-mixing (CM) is a frequently observed phenomenon that uses multiple languages in an utterance or sentence.  @ info: whatsthis Yuqori murakkablar uchun lingʻlik murakkablik qoidagi kompyuterdagi tillarni qiyin qiladi. Tilni aniqlash (LI) va soʻzning qismlari (POS) qoʻyish matnning tuzusini aniqlash mumkin. Odatda, LI va POS yorliq vazifalar kodmixing koʻrinishida murakkab boʻladi. Biz bir necha tillik va grammatik tizimni birlashtirilgan so'zni o'rganish vazifasi sifatida aniqlashda muammo qilamiz. Bu qogʻozda biz tillarni aniqlash va gapirish modellarining qismini ko'paytirish mumkin. Biz muvaffaqiyatli tarmoq maktablari bilan tarmoq tarmoqni ishlatdik. Biz ICON bilan birlashtirilgan vazifa bilan qoʻyilgan jamiyat media matnlarini birlashtirish uchun POS tagging va LI modellarini birlashtirish usulini o'rganamiz.", 'bg': 'Смесването на кодове е често наблюдавано явление, което използва множество езици в изказване или изречение. Няма строги граматически ограничения, наблюдавани при смесването на кодове и се състои от нестандартни вариации на правописа. Лингвистичната сложност, произтичаща от горепосочените фактори, прави изчислителния анализ на кодово смесения език трудна задача. Езиковата идентификация (ЛИ) и маркирането на част от речта (ПОС) са основните стъпки, които помагат да се анализира структурата на текста, смесен с кодове. Често задачите за маркиране на ЛИ и ПОС са взаимозависими в сценария за смесване на кодове. Проектираме проблема за справяне с многоезичието и граматическата структура, като анализираме кодово смесеното изречение като съвместна учебна задача. В тази статия съвместно обучаваме и оптимизираме откриването на езика и част от моделите за маркиране на речта в сценария със смесен код. Използвахме трансформатор с конволюционна нервна мрежа. Обучаваме съвместен метод на обучение чрез комбиниране на ПОС маркиране и модели на кодово смесен текст в социалните медии, получен от споделената задача.', 'hr': 'Pomješavanje kodova (CM) je često primijetljen fenomen koji koristi višestruke jezike u govoru ili rečenici. Nema striktnih gramatičkih ograničenja koje su primijećene u mješavanju kodova, i sastoje se od neostandardnih varijacija pisanja. Lingistička kompleksnost koja je rezultirala od iznad faktora napravila je računalnu analizu jezika mešanog koda izazovnom zadatku. Identifikacija jezika (LI) i dio govora (POS) označavanja su temeljni koraci koji pomažu analizirati strukturu teksta pomiješanog kod. Često su zadaci označavanja LI i POS međuovisni u scenariju mješanja kodova. Projektiramo problem rješavanja multijezičkih i gramatičkih struktura dok analiziramo rečenicu pomiješanu kod kao zajednički zadatak učenja. U ovom papiru zajedno treniramo i optimiziramo detekciju jezika i dijelom modela označavanja govora u scenariju kombiniranog kod. Koristili smo transformer sa konvolucionalnom arhitekturom neuralne mreže. Uvježbamo zajedničku metodu učenja kombinirajući modele oznake POS-a i LI-a na tekstu socijalnih medija koji su pomiješani kod koda dobili iz zajedničkog zadatka ICON-a.', 'da': 'Kodeblanding (CM) er et hyppigt observeret fænomen, der bruger flere sprog i en udtalelse eller sætning. Der er ingen strenge grammatiske begrænsninger observeret i kodeblanding, og det består af ikke-standard variationer af stavning. Den sproglige kompleksitet som følge af ovenstående faktorer gjorde den beregningsmæssige analyse af det kodeblandede sprog til en udfordrende opgave. Sprogidentifikation (LI) og en del af tale (POS) tagging er de grundlæggende trin, der hjælper med at analysere strukturen af den kodeblandede tekst. Ofte er LI- og POS-mærkningsopgaverne indbyrdes afhængige i kodeblandingsscenariet. Vi projicerer problemet med at håndtere flersprogethed og grammatisk struktur samtidig med at vi analyserer den kodeblandede sætning som en fælles læringsopgave. I denne artikel træner og optimerer vi i fællesskab sprogdetektering og dele af talemærkningsmodeller i det kodeblandede scenarie. Vi brugte en Transformer med konvulutiv neural netværksarkitektur. Vi træner en fælles læringsmetode ved at kombinere POS tagging og LI modeller på kodeblandet social medietekst opnået fra ICON delte opgave.', 'nl': 'Code-mixing (CM) is een veelvuldig waargenomen fenomeen dat meerdere talen gebruikt in een uitspraak of zin. Er zijn geen strikte grammaticale beperkingen waargenomen in code-mixen, en het bestaat uit niet-standaard variaties van spelling. De linguïstische complexiteit als gevolg van bovenstaande factoren maakte de computationele analyse van de code-gemengde taal een uitdagende taak. Language identification (LI) en part of speech (POS) tagging zijn de fundamentele stappen die helpen de structuur van de code-gemengde tekst te analyseren. Vaak zijn de LI- en POS-taggingtaken onderling afhankelijk in het codemengscenario. We projecteren het probleem van het omgaan met meertaligheid en grammaticale structuur terwijl we de code-gemengde zin analyseren als een gezamenlijke leertaak. In dit artikel trainen en optimaliseren we gezamenlijk taaldetectie en een deel van spraaktagging modellen in het code-mixed scenario. We gebruikten een Transformer met convolutionele neurale netwerkarchitectuur. We trainen een gezamenlijke leermethode door POS tagging en LI modellen te combineren op code-mixed social media tekst verkregen uit de gedeelde ICON taak.', 'de': 'Code-Mixing (CM) ist ein häufig beobachtetes Phänomen, das mehrere Sprachen in einer Äußerung oder einem Satz verwendet. Es gibt keine strengen grammatischen Einschränkungen beim Code-Mischen, und es besteht aus nicht standardisierten Variationen der Rechtschreibung. Die sprachliche Komplexität, die sich aus den oben genannten Faktoren ergibt, machte die rechnerische Analyse der Code-Mixed-Sprache zu einer herausfordernden Aufgabe. Die Sprachidentifikation (LI) und das Tagging (POS) sind die grundlegenden Schritte, um die Struktur des Code-Mixed-Textes zu analysieren. Häufig sind die LI- und POS-Tagging-Aufgaben im Code-Mix-Szenario voneinander abhängig. Wir projizieren das Problem des Umgangs mit Mehrsprachigkeit und grammatikalischer Struktur während wir den Code-Mixed-Satz als gemeinsame Lernaufgabe analysieren. In diesem Beitrag trainieren und optimieren wir gemeinsam Spracherkennung und Sprachtagging-Modelle im Code-Mixed-Szenario. Wir verwendeten einen Transformer mit convolutionaler neuronaler Netzwerkarchitektur. Wir trainieren eine gemeinsame Lernmethode, indem wir POS-Tagging und LI-Modelle auf Code-Mixed Social Media Text kombinieren, der aus der ICON Shared Task gewonnen wird.', 'id': 'Code-mixing (CM) is a frequently observed phenomenon that uses multiple languages in an utterance or sentence.  Tidak ada batasan grammatik ketat yang dilihat dalam campuran kode, dan terdiri dari variasi ejaan yang tidak standar. Kompleksitas bahasa yang berasal dari faktor di atas membuat analisis komputasi bahasa kode-campuran menjadi tugas yang menantang. Identifikasi bahasa (LI) dan bagian dari tagging pidato (POS) adalah langkah dasar yang membantu menganalisis struktur teks-kode-campuran. Biasanya, tugas penanda LI dan POS bergantung antara satu sama lain dalam skenario campuran kode. Kami memproyeksikan masalah berurusan dengan multibahasa dan struktur gramatika sementara menganalisis kalimat kode-campuran sebagai tugas belajar bersama. In this paper, we jointly train and optimize language detection and part of speech tagging models in the code-mixed scenario.  Kami menggunakan Transformer dengan arkitektur jaringan saraf konvolusi. Kami melatih metode belajar bersama dengan menggabungkan tagging POS dan model LI pada teks kode-campuran media sosial yang diperoleh dari tugas bersama ICON.', 'fa': 'پیوند\u200cگیری (CM) یک پدیده\u200cای است که اغلب مشاهده می\u200cشود که از زبان\u200cهای زیادی در یک کلمه یا جمله استفاده می\u200cکند. هیچ محدودیت گراماتیکی سخت در ترکیب کد مشاهده نشده و از تغییرات غیر استاندارد نوشته شده است. پیچیدگی زبان\u200cشناسی که به نتیجه از عوامل بالا می\u200cرسد تحلیل کامپیوتری زبان\u200cترکیب\u200cشده\u200cی کد یک کار سخت\u200cکننده ساخته است. شناسایی زبان (LI) و بخشی از برچسب سخنرانی (POS) قدم\u200cهای بنیادی هستند که کمک می\u200cکنند ساختار متن مختلف کد را تحلیل کند. اغلب، کارهای نقاشی LI و POS در سناریو مخلوط کد بستگی دارند. ما مشکل حل کردن با بسیاری زبان\u200cشناسی و ساختاری گراماتیکی را پروژه می\u200cدهیم در حالی که جمله\u200cای متصل شده\u200cی کد را به عنوان یک کار یادگیری مشترک تحلیل می\u200cکنیم. در این کاغذ، ما با همدیگر کشف زبان و بخشی از مدلهای نقاشی سخنرانی در سناریو مختلف کد را تمرین می کنیم و بهترین می کنیم. ما از یک تبدیل کننده با معماری شبکه عصبی معمولی استفاده کردیم. ما روش یادگیری مشترک را آموزش می\u200cدهیم با ترکیب نقاشی POS و مدل LI بر متن رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی متصل شده که از کار مشترک ICON گرفته شده است.', 'ko': '코드 혼합(CM)은 하나의 말이나 문장에 다양한 언어를 사용하는 흔한 현상이다.코드 혼합에는 엄격한 문법 제약이 없고 맞춤법의 비표준 변체로 구성되어 있다.상술한 요소로 인한 언어 복잡성 때문에 코드 혼합 언어의 계산 분석은 도전적인 임무가 되었다.언어인식(LI)과 단어성 표시(POS)는 코드의 혼합 텍스트 구조를 분석하는 데 도움을 주는 기본 절차다.코드 혼합 장면에서 LI와 단어 표기 작업은 일반적으로 서로 의존한다.우리는 다중 언어와 문법 구조의 문제를 처리하는 것을 연합 학습 임무로 삼고 코드 혼합문을 분석할 것이다.본고에서 우리는 코드 혼합 장면에서 언어 검측과 어성 표기 모델을 연합하여 훈련하고 최적화한다.우리는 권적 신경 네트워크 구조를 가진 변압기를 사용했다.우리는 아이콘 공유 작업에서 얻은 코드를 소셜 미디어 텍스트와 혼합하여 단어 표기와 LI모델을 결합시켜 연합 학습 방법을 훈련한다.', 'sw': 'Code-mixing (CM) is a frequently observed phenomenon that uses multiple languages in an utterance or sentence.  Hakuna vizuizi vikali vya grammani vilivyoonekana katika mchanganyiko wa kodi, na inajumuisha mabadiliko yasiyo ya kawaida ya uandishi. Ukatili wa lugha unaotokana na sababu za juu ulifanya uchambuzi wa kompyuta wa lugha inayochanganyika kwa lugha hiyo ni kazi yenye changamoto. Utambulisho wa lugha (LI) na sehemu ya alama za hotuba (POS) ni hatua za msingi ambazo zinasaidia kuchambua muundo wa maandishi yanayochanganyika. Mara nyingi, kazi za kupiga bango la LI na POS zinategemea katika eneo la mchanganyiko wa kodi. Tunajaribu tatizo la kushughulikia lugha mbalimbali na muundo wa takwimu wakati tunachambua hukumu inayochanganyika kama kazi ya kujifunza pamoja. Katika gazeti hili, tunafundisha pamoja na kubainisha utambuzi wa lugha na sehemu ya mifano ya kupiga maneno katika eneo lililochanganyika na kodi. Tulitumia Transfer mwenye ujenzi mkubwa wa mtandao wa neura. Tunafunza mbinu za kujifunza pamoja kwa kuunganisha ujumbe wa POS na mifano ya LI kuhusu ujumbe wa mitandao ya kijamii uliohusishwa na mfumo wa ICON uliotumiwa.', 'tr': 'Kod karışmasy (CM) sözleri ýa-da sözleriň içinde köp dilleri ulanan örän gözlenen parça. Ködleme karışmasynda bellenilýän gramatik çykyşlar ýok we bu ymlanyň standart üýtgeşmeleri bar. Ýakyndaky faktörlerden gelen lingwistiki karmaşgalar ködler karmaşgalan çykyş şeklinde hasaplanýar. Dil identifikaçy (LI) we sözläniň bir parçasy (POS) tägleme edilen esasy adımlar kömek edip kodyň karmaşgalan metiniň strukturyny çözmesine kömek edýär. Köplenç, LI we POS taglamak zadlary köd karışmasynyň senaryýanynda baglanýar. Biz multilingüjilik we gramatik strukturyň çykmasynyň meselelerini köp öwrenmek täblisasy hökmünde çykyp çykarýarys. Bu kagyzda, biz bilelikde dil tanyşyny we gürrüňleýän çykyş nusgalarynyň bir bölegini ködleşdirip, kellämizi karmaşdyran senaryýada tanyşdyrýarys. Biz köpürli näyral şebek arhitektura bilen bir terjimeçi ulandyk. Biz POS taglamasyny we LI modellerini ICON paylaşyk işinden alan sosyal medýdanlaryň metini birleştirerek birleşik öwrenme yöntemini öwredýäris.', 'af': "Kode- menger (Cm) is 'n dikwels aansigte fenomen wat veelvuldige tale gebruik in 'n uitspraak of seting. Daar is geen strikte grammatiese beheinings wat in kode- gemeng aangesien word nie, en dit bestaan van nie- standaard veranderinge van speletjie. Die lingwisiese kompleksiteit wat van die bo-faktore gevaal het, het die rekenaarse analisie van die kode gemengde taal 'n pragtige taak gemaak. Taal identifikasie (LI) en deel van woord (POS) merking is die fundamentale stappe wat help analyseer die struktuur van die kode gemengde teks. Often, die LI en POS-merking-opdragte is interdependent in die kode-menger scenario. Ons projek die probleem om met multilingvisme en grammatiese struktuur te behandel terwyl die kode gemengde seting as 'n joint leer taak analyseer word. In hierdie papier, ons saamstig trein en optimaliseer taal opdekking en deel van spraak merking modele in die kode gemengde scenario. Ons het 'n Transformer gebruik met konvolusionele neuralnetwerk-arkitektuur. Ons tref 'n joint leer metode deur die kombinasie van POS tagging en LI modele op kode gemengde sosiale media teks wat van die ICON gedeelde taak ontvang is.", 'sq': 'Përzierja e kodeve (CM) është një fenomen i vëzhguar shpesh që përdor gjuhë të shumta në një shprehje ose fjalim. There are no strict grammatical constraints observed in code-mixing, and it consists of non-standard variations of spelling.  Kompleksia gjuhësore që rezulton nga faktorët e lartë bëri analizën llogaritare të gjuhës së përzier me kod një detyrë sfiduese. Identifikimi i gjuhës (LI) dhe pjesë e etiketave të fjalimit (POS) janë hapat themelore që ndihmojnë në analizimin e strukturës së tekstit të përzier me kod. Shpesh, detyrat e etiketave LI dhe POS janë ndërvarur në skenarin e përzierjes së kodeve. Ne projektojmë problemin e trajtimit me shumëgjuhësinë dhe strukturën gramatike ndërsa analizojmë fjalën e përzier me kod si një detyrë të përbashkët mësimi. Në këtë letër, ne së bashku trajnojmë dhe optimizojmë zbulimin e gjuhës dhe pjesë të modeleve të etiketave të fjalimit në skenarin e përzier me kode. Ne përdorëm një Transformues me arkitekturën e rrjetit nervor konvolutiv. Ne trajnojmë një metodë mësimi të përbashkët duke kombinuar etiketat POS dhe modelet LI mbi tekstin e kodit të përzier të medias sociale të fituar nga detyra e përbashkët ICON.', 'hy': 'Կոդի խառնուրդը հաճախ դիտարկված երևույթ է, որը բազմաթիվ լեզուներ է օգտագործում արտահայտության կամ նախադասության մեջ: Չկան խիստ գրամատիկ սահմանափակումներ, որոնք դիտարկվում են կոդի խառնման մեջ, և դրանք կազմում են ոչ ստանդարտ բառեր գրելու համար: Լեզվաբանական բարդությունը, որը առաջացել է վերևի գործոններից, դարձրեց կոդի-խառնված լեզու հաշվարկների վերլուծումը դժվար խնդիր: Լեզու հայտնաբերումը և խոսքի (POS) նշանները հիմնական քայլերն են, որոնք օգնում են վերլուծել կոդի խառնված տեքստի կառուցվածքը: Հաճախ, Լիի և POS-ի նշանները փոխկապակցված են կոդի խառնման սցենարիայում: We project the problem of dealing with multilingualism and grammatical structure while analyzing the code-mixed sentence as a joint learning task.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք միասին վարժեցնում ենք և օպտիմացնում լեզվի հայտնաբերումը և խոսքի նշանների մի մասը կոդի խառնված սցենարիայում: We used a Transformer with convolutional neural network architecture.  Մենք պատրաստում ենք ընդհանուր ուսուցման մեթոդ, համադրելով POS-ի նշանները և Li-ի մոդելները կոդի խառնված սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տեքստի վրա, որը ստացվում է ԻԿոնի ընդհանուր խնդրից:', 'am': 'Code-mixing (CM) በንግግር ወይም ፍርድ ላይ በብዙ ቋንቋዎች የሚጠቅመው አካባቢ ነው፡፡ በኮድ-ማቀናቀል ውስጥ ብርቱ grammatical ግንኙነት አይገኙም እና በጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል የጽሑፍ መለወጫ ነው፡፡ ከላይኛው ጉዳይ የቋንቋው አካባቢነት የቆዳ ቋንቋውን የተቀላቀለ ትክክለኛ ስራ ነው፡፡ ቋንቋ ምረጡ (LI) እና የንግግር ማቀናጃ (POS) መሠረት የኮድ-mixed ጽሑፍ መሠረትን የሚያስተምር የመሠረት ደረጃዎች ናቸው። ብዙ ጊዜ የ.ሊ እና የፖስስ ተቃውሞ ስራዎችን በcode-mixing scenario ይታመካሉ። ብዙ ቋንቋዎች እና የgrammatik ሥርዓት መቆጣጠርን በተቀራረበ ቁጥጥር እንደ ተማሪ ስራ በማስተካከል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ቋንቋን ማግኘት እና የንግግር ማተሚያ ሞዴላዎችን በኮድ ተለይተን እናስተማርናለን፡፡ የናቡር መረብ መሠረት ሀብት የተጠቀምን ትርጓሜ የPOS ማተማር እና LI ሞዴላዎችን ከICON የተካፈሉት ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ጽሑፍ በመቀላቀል እናስተማርናለን፡፡', 'bn': 'কোড মিশ্রণ (সিএম) প্রায়শই দেখা যায় একটি বাক্য বা বাক্যে বেশ কয়েকটি ভাষা ব্যবহার করে। There are no strict grammatical constraints observed in code-mixing, and it consists of non-standard variations of spelling.  উপরের কারণগুলোর ফলে ভাষার জটিলতা কোড-মিশ্রিত ভাষার গণনা বিশ্লেষণ একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ কর্মসূচী করেছে। ভাষার পরিচয় (LI) এবং ভাষণের অংশ (POS) ট্যাগিং হচ্ছে মৌলিক পদক্ষেপ যা কোড মিশ্রিত লেখার কাঠামো বিশ্লেষণ করে সাহায্য করে। প্রায়শই লি এবং পোস ট্যাগিং কাজ কোড মিশ্রণের দৃশ্যে নির্ভর করে। আমরা মাল্টিভুয়ালিজম এবং গ্রামাটিক কাঠামোর সাথে বিচার করার সমস্যা প্রকল্প করি যেখানে কোড মিশ্রিত বাক্যের একটি যৌথ শিক্ষা ক এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একসাথে ট্রেন এবং ভাষা সনাক্তি এবং বক্তৃতা ট্যাগিং মডেলের একটি অংশ কোড মিশ্রিত দৃশ্যের মধ্যে। আমরা একটা ট্রান্সফার্ন ব্যবহার করেছিলাম যেটা নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামোর সাথে। আইসিওন শেয়ার কর্মসূচি থেকে পেয়েছে কোড মিশ্রিত সামাজিক মিডিয়া টেক্সটের মাধ্যমে আমরা পোস ট্যাগিং এবং লি মডেল সম্পর্কে একটি', 'ca': "La combinació de codis (CM) és un fenomen observat sovint que utilitza múltiples llengües en una frase o frase. No hi ha restriccions gramàtiques estrictes observades en la combinació de codis, i consisteix en variacions no estándar d'ortografia. La complexitat lingüística resultant dels factors anteriors va fer que l'anàlisi computacional del llenguatge combinat de codis sigui una tasca desafiadora. L'identificació lingüística (LI) i una part de l'etiqueta de la paraula (POS) són les etapes fonamentals que ajuden a analitzar l'estructura del text mixte. Sovint, les tasques d'etiqueta LI i POS són interdependent en l'escenari de combinació de codis. Projectem el problem a de tractar amb el multilingüisme i l'estructura gramàtica mentre analitzem la frase combinada com una tasca d'aprenentatge conjunta. En aquest article, entrenem i optimizem conjuntament la detecció del llenguatge i part de models d'etiqueta de la vosaltra en l'escenari combinat de codis. Vam utilitzar un Transformer amb arquitectura convolucional de xarxa neuronal. We train a joint learning method by combining POS tagging and LI models on code-mixed social media text obtained from the ICON shared task.", 'az': 'Kod karışması (CM) çoxlu dilləri sözlərdə və cümlələrdə istifadə edir. Kod karıştırılmasında müəyyən edilən qrammatik səbəbi yoxdur, və bu imzalamanın standart olmayan dəyişikliklərindən olub. Yuxarıdaki faktörlərdən gələn dil kompleksitəsi kodu karışmış dilin hesablama analizi çətin bir iş etdi. Dil tanımlaması (LI) və sözlərin bir parçası (POS) etiketi kodu karıştırılmış metinin quruluğunu analizə yardım edən fundamental adımlardır. Genellikle, LI və POS etiketləmə işləri kodu karıştırma senaryosunda bağlıdır. Biz çoxlu dilli və gramatik strukturlarla çəkilmək problemlərini, kodla karışmış cümləyi birlikdə öyrənmək işləri kimi analiz edirik. Bu kağızda, biz birlikdə dil keşfetməsini və còd karıştırılmış senaryonun bir parçasını təhsil edirik. Biz konvolucional nöral a ğ arhitektarıyla Transformer kullandıq. Biz POS etiketlərini və LI modellərini ICON paylaşıb işindən alınan kodlarda karışmış sosyal media metinlərini birləşdirərək birləşdiririk.', 'bs': 'Pomješavanje kodova (CM) je često posmatrano fenomeno koji koristi višestruke jezike u govoru ili rečenici. Nema striktnih gramatičkih ograničenja koje su primijećene u mješanju koda, i sastavlja se od neostandardnih varijacija pisanja. Lingistička kompleksnost koja je rezultirala od iznad faktora napravila je računalnu analizu jezika mešanog koda izazovnom zadatku. Identifikacija jezika (LI) i dio govora (POS) označavanja su osnovni koraci koji pomažu analizirati strukturu teksta pomiješanog kod. Često su zadaci označavanja LI i POS međuovisni u scenariju mješanja kodova. Projektiramo problem rješavanja multilingvisma i gramatičke strukture dok analiziramo rečenicu mešanu kod kao zajednički zadatak učenja. U ovom papiru zajedno treniramo i optimiziramo detekciju jezika i deo modela označavanja govora u scenariju mešanog koda. Koristili smo Transformer sa konvolucionalnom arhitekturom neuralne mreže. Učimo zajedničku metodu učenja kombinirajući POS etikete i LI modele na tekstu socijalnih medija koji su pomiješani kod dobili iz zajedničkog zadatka ICON-a.', 'cs': 'Mixování kódu (CM) je často pozorovaný jev, který používá více jazyků v projevu nebo větě. Neexistují žádná přísná gramatická omezení pozorovaná při míchání kódu a skládá se z nestandardních variant pravopisu. Jazyková složitost vyplývající z výše uvedených faktorů činila výpočetní analýzu kódově smíšeného jazyka náročným úkolem. Jazyková identifikace (LI) a značení části řeči (POS) jsou základními kroky, které pomáhají analyzovat strukturu textu smíšeného kódem. Úlohy značení LI a POS jsou často vzájemně závislé ve scénáři míchání kódu. Projektujeme problém řešení mnohojazyčnosti a gramatické struktury při analýze kódově smíšené věty jako společného učebního úkolu. V tomto článku společně trénujeme a optimalizujeme detekci jazyka a část modelů tagování řeči v kódovém smíšeném scénáři. Použili jsme transformátor s konvoluční architekturou neuronové sítě. Společnou metodu učení trénujeme kombinací POS tagingu a LI modelů na textu sociálních médií s kódem smíšeném ze sdíleného úkolu ICON.', 'et': 'Koodide segamine (CM) on sageli täheldatav nähtus, mis kasutab väljenduses või lauses mitut keelt. Koodi segamisel ei täheldata rangeid grammatilisi piiranguid ja see koosneb mittestandardsetest õigekirjavariatsioonidest. Eespool nimetatud teguritest tulenev keeleline keerukus muutis koodisegakeele arvutusliku analüüsi keeruliseks ülesandeks. Keele identifitseerimine (LI) ja kõne osa sildistamine (POS) on peamised sammud, mis aitavad analüüsida koodisegatud teksti struktuuri. Sageli sõltuvad LI ja POS sildistamise ülesanded koodide segamise stsenaariumis omavahel. Projekteerime mitmekeelsuse ja grammatilise struktuuriga tegelemise probleemi, analüüsides koodisegatud lauset ühise õppeülesandena. Käesolevas töös koolitame ja optimeerime ühiselt keeletuvastust ja osa kõne sildistamise mudelitest koodisega stsenaariumis. Me kasutasime konvolutsioonivõrgu arhitektuuriga Transformerit. Koolitame ühist õppemeetodit, kombineerides POS sildistamist ja LI mudeleid koodisegatud sotsiaalmeedia tekstil, mis saadakse ICON jagatud ülesandest.', 'fi': 'Koodien sekoittaminen (CM) on usein havaittu ilmiö, joka käyttää useita kieliä lauseessa tai lauseessa. Koodien sekoittamisessa ei ole havaittavissa tiukkoja kieliopillisia rajoituksia, ja se koostuu epätavallisista oikeinkirjoitusvariaatioista. Edellä mainituista tekijöistä johtuva kielellinen monimutkaisuus teki koodisekoitetun kielen laskennallisesta analyysistä haastavan tehtävän. Kielen tunnistus (LI) ja puheen osa (POS) tagaukset ovat keskeisiä vaiheita, jotka auttavat analysoimaan koodisekoitetun tekstin rakennetta. Usein LI- ja POS-tunnisteet ovat toisistaan riippuvaisia koodien sekoitusskenaariossa. Projektimme monikielisyyden ja kieliopillisen rakenteen käsittelemisen ongelman samalla kun analysoimme koodisekoitettua lausetta yhteisenä oppimistehtävänä. Tässä työssä koulutamme ja optimoimme yhdessä kielen tunnistuksen ja osan puheentunnistusmalleista koodisekoitetussa skenaariossa. Käytimme muuntajaa, jolla on konvolutionaalinen neuroverkkoarkkitehtuuri. Harjoittelemme yhteistä oppimismenetelmää yhdistämällä POS-tagging- ja LI-mallit ICON-jaetusta tehtävästä saatuun koodisekoitettuun sosiaalisen median tekstiin.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Babu taƙaitaccen grammati mai tsanani cikin kodi-blendin, kuma yana ƙunsa da variantun da ba'a daidaita matsayin. Yagon harshenka na'urar da ke ƙara daga factori da ke saman, ya sanya anayyar lissafi na ƙidãya wa lugha-da-haɗe ta zama mai gauraya. Language identification (LI) and part of speech (POS) tagging are the fundamental steps that help analyze the structure of the code-mixed text.  Koda yawa, ana ƙayyade aikin tagogi na LI da PS cikin tsarin koda-haɗing. Munã jarraba ma'anar masu husũma da multilinguralism da matsayin grammatisk a lokacin da Muke anayi salon da salon da aka haɗa shi kamar wani aikin da za'a sani. Daga wannan takardan, muna tafiyar da shirin haɗi kuma muna ƙayyade ganin harshen da rabon sigogi cikin zanen kodi-da-haɗe. Mun yi amfani da wani Transformer wanda ke da bakin tarakiki na neura. Tuna kõre wata hanyar da za'a sani kodi da za'a haɗa tagogi na PS da misãlai na LI a kan kode-da-haɗe matsayin mitandai masu jamii da aka samu daga aikin da aka raba shi.", 'sk': 'Mešanje kod (CM) je pogosto opažen pojav, ki uporablja več jezikov v izgovoru ali stavku. Pri mešanju kod ni nobenih strogih slovničnih omejitev in sestavljajo nestandardne variacije črkovanja. Zaradi jezikovne kompleksnosti, ki je posledica zgoraj navedenih dejavnikov, je bila računalniška analiza kodno mešanega jezika zahtevna naloga. Identifikacija jezika (LI) in označevanje dela govora (POS) sta temeljna koraka, ki pomagata analizirati strukturo besedila z mešanimi kodami. Opravila označevanja LI in POS so pogosto medsebojno odvisna pri scenariju mešanja kod. Projiciramo problem obravnavanja večjezičnosti in slovnične strukture ter analiziramo kodno mešani stavek kot skupno učno nalogo. V tem prispevku skupaj usposabljamo in optimiziramo zaznavanje jezika in del modelov označevanja govora v scenariju mešanih kod. Uporabili smo transformator s konvolucijsko nevronsko arhitekturo. Usposabljamo skupno metodo učenja z združevanjem POS označevanja in LI modelov na kodno mešanih besedilih družbenih omrežij, pridobljenih iz skupne naloge ICON.', 'jv': 'Cdroming LanguagesLanguage Pirak ingkang dipunanggé liyané sing paling nggambar nggo wong kuwi nggambar kelangan Language politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé nggawe perbudhakan kanggo nggawe multi-lenguangkapuristik lan nggawe barang urip nggawe barang-urip kuwi nggawe kudu urip sistem Where is the language Nang pepulan iki, kita jêmênêmêr suarané lan ngêmêr suarané ngêmêr suarané karo model sing pisan mrogram kuwi ngêmêr. Kernel Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sing nggawe barang-sistem sing nggambar SMS tagging lan model LI nang kode-Mixed media text sing oleh nggambar nggawe perusahaan SMS', 'he': 'מערבב קודים (CM) הוא תופעה שנצפה לעתים קרובות שמשתמשת בשפות רבות במילה או משפט. אין מגבלות גרמטיות גבוהות מתבוננות בערבוב קודים, והיא מורכבת מ-וירציות לא סטנדרטיות של איתוי. המורכבות השפתית שנוצאה מהגורמים העליונים עשתה את הניתוח החישובי של שפת הקוד מעורבת משימה מאתגרת. זיהוי שפה (LI) וחלק מהתגים של הנאום (POS) הם צעדים בסיסיים שעוזרים לנתח את מבנה הטקסט המערבב בקוד. לעתים קרובות, משימות התג של LI ו POS תלויות ביחד בתרחיש הערבוב קודים. We project the problem of dealing with multilingualism and grammatical structure while analyzing the code-mixed sentence as a joint learning task.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מאמן וביחד לאופטימיזם את זיהוי שפה וחלק ממודלים של תג הנאום בתרחיש המערב של קודים. השתמשנו בטרנספורטר עם ארכיטקטורת רשת עצבית משתנה. אנחנו מאמן שיטת לימוד משותפת על ידי שילוב תוויות POS ודוגמנים LI על טקסט תקשורת חברתית מעורבת קוד שנקבל מהמשימה המשותפת ICON.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་འདི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཞིག་ཡིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས། grammatical constraints observed in code-mixing, and it consists of non-standard variations of spelling. སྐད་རིགས་གྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དེ་ལས་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་རྩིས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཡིན་ཏེ། སྐད་ཡིག་དམིགས་འཛུགས་དང་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས(POS)རྟགས་བཀོད་མིན་འདུག སྤྱིར་བཏང་ན། LI་དང་POS་ཡིག་བཀོད་པའི་བྱ་རིམ་དེ་རྣམས་ཨང་འདྲེན་བྱེད་སྟངས་ནང་དུ་མཉམ་འབྲེལ་བ། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་བ་དང་ལས་རྩིས་ཆ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་བ་དང་མཐུན་གྲངས་ཀ་ཡིན་པའི་ཚིག་རྩིས་གཏོང་གི་དཀའ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱིས་སྐད་རིགས་བཙལ་བཤེར་དང་ཆེ་རུ་གཏོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མིང་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་སྣང་བ ང་ཚོས་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་སྦྱིར་ཡོད་པའི་དབུས་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ་ཞིག་སྤྱོད་བྱས་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡད་ནས་POS tagging་རིམ་པ་དང་LI མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཁྱབ་ཡོད་པའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ'}
{'en': 'Knowledge Discovery in COVID-19 Research Literature', 'ar': 'اكتشاف المعرفة في الأدب البحثي لـ COVID-19', 'fr': 'Découverte des connaissances dans la littérature de recherche sur la', 'pt': 'Descoberta de conhecimento na literatura de pesquisa COVID-19', 'es': 'Descubrimiento de conocimientos en la literatura de investigación', 'ja': 'COVID -19研究文献の知識発見', 'ru': 'Открытие знаний в исследовательской литературе о COVID-19', 'zh': 'COVID-19ń®Čµ¢ćńī«', 'hi': 'कोविड-19 अनुसंधान साहित्य में ज्ञान की खोज', 'ga': 'Fionnachtain Eolais i Litríocht Taighde COVID-19', 'hu': 'Tudás felfedezése a COVID-19 kutatási irodalomban', 'el': 'Ανακάλυψη γνώσης στην ερευνητική λογοτεχνία του COVID-19', 'ka': 'COVID-19 სწავლობის ლიტერტურაში მეცნიერება', 'it': 'Scoperta della conoscenza nella letteratura di ricerca COVID-19', 'kk': 'COVID-19 зерттеу әдебиетінің білім табуы', 'lt': 'Knowledge Discovery in COVID-19 Research Literature', 'ms': 'Penemuan pengetahuan dalam Literatur kajian COVID-19', 'ml': 'COVID-19 പരിശോധന സാഹചര്യം', 'mn': 'COVID-19 судалгааны зохиолын мэдлэг нээлт', 'no': 'Kvitning oppdaging i COVID-19 forskningsliteratur', 'ro': 'Descoperirea cunoștințelor în literatura de cercetare COVID-19', 'pl': 'Odkrycie wiedzy w literaturze badawczej nad COVID-19', 'sr': 'Discovery znanja u istraživačkoj literaturi COVID-19', 'si': 'COVID-19 පරීක්ෂණ සාක්ෂිත සිද්ධියේ දැනගන්න', 'mk': 'Knowledge Discovery in COVID-19 Research Literature', 'so': 'Aqoonta aqoonta ee qoraalka baaritaanka COVID-19', 'sv': 'Kunskapsupptäckt i COVID-19 forskningslitteratur', 'ur': 'COVID-19 Research Literature میں علم Discovery', 'mt': 'Skoperta tal-Għarfien fil-Litteratura tar-Riċerka COVID-19', 'ta': 'COVID-19 ஆராய்ச்சி மாதிரியில் அறிவு கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tìm hiểu về Văn học Nghiên cứu COVID-19', 'bg': 'Откриване на знания в научноизследователската литература', 'hr': 'Discovery znanja u istraživačkoj literaturi COVID-19', 'da': 'Vidensopdagelse i COVID-19 forskningslitteratur', 'nl': 'Kennisonderzoek in COVID-19 Onderzoeksliteratuur', 'de': 'Wissensentdeckung in der COVID-19 Forschungsliteratur', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن دانش در ادبیات تحقیقات COVID-19', 'id': 'Penemuan pengetahuan di Literatur Penelitian COVID-19', 'ko': '코로나 연구 문헌 속의 지식 발견', 'sq': 'Knowledge Discovery in COVID-19 Research Literature', 'af': 'Knowledge Discovery in COVID-19 Research Literature', 'tr': 'COVID-19 araşdyrma edebiýatynda Bilgi Discovery', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa maarifa katika Fasihi ya Utafiti ya COVID-19', 'az': 'COVID-19 Araştırma Edebiyatının Bilgi Discovery', 'hy': 'Գիտությունների բացահայտումը COVID-19 հետազոտության գրականության մեջ', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'COVID-19 গবেষণা সাহিত্যে জ্ঞান ডিসার্ভার', 'ca': 'Descobrir coneixements a la literatura de recerca COVID-19', 'cs': 'Znalostní objevy v literatuře výzkumu COVID-19', 'et': 'Teadmiste avastamine COVID-19 teaduskirjanduses', 'bs': 'Discovery znanja u istraživačkoj literaturi COVID-19', 'fi': 'Knowledge Discovery in COVID-19 Research Literature', 'jv': 'Bilih Diskutèni kanggo kowé-19 Pengarang Digitalian', 'bo': 'Knowledge Discovery in COVID-19 Research Literature', 'he': 'גילוי ידע בספרות מחקר COVID-19', 'sk': 'Odkrivanje znanja v raziskovalni literaturi COVID-19', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'This paper presents the preliminary results of an ongoing project that analyzes the growing body of scientific research published around the COVID-19 pandemic. In this research, a general-purpose semantic model is used to double annotate a batch of 500 sentences that were manually selected from the CORD-19 corpus. Afterwards, a baseline text-mining pipeline is designed and evaluated via a large batch of 100,959 sentences. We present a qualitative analysis of the most interesting facts automatically extracted and highlight possible future lines of development. The preliminary results show that general-purpose semantic models are a useful tool for discovering fine-grained knowledge in large corpora of scientific documents.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة النتائج الأولية لمشروع مستمر يحلل المجموعة المتزايدة من البحث العلمي المنشور حول جائحة COVID-19. في هذا البحث ، يتم استخدام نموذج دلالي للأغراض العامة لإضافة تعليق توضيحي مزدوج لمجموعة من 500 جملة تم اختيارها يدويًا من مجموعة CORD-19. بعد ذلك ، تم تصميم خط أساسي لتعدين النصوص وتقييمه عبر مجموعة كبيرة من 100،959 جملة. نقدم تحليلاً نوعيًا للحقائق الأكثر إثارة للاهتمام المستخرجة تلقائيًا ونسلط الضوء على خطوط التنمية المستقبلية المحتملة. تظهر النتائج الأولية أن النماذج الدلالية للأغراض العامة هي أداة مفيدة لاكتشاف المعرفة الدقيقة في مجموعة كبيرة من الوثائق العلمية.', 'fr': "Cet article présente les résultats préliminaires d'un projet en cours qui analyse le nombre croissant de recherches scientifiques publiées autour de la pandémie de COVID-19. Dans cette recherche, un modèle sémantique à usage général est utilisé pour annoter deux fois un lot de 500 phrases qui ont été sélectionnées manuellement à partir du corpus CORD-19. Ensuite, un pipeline d'exploration de texte de base est conçu et évalué via un grand lot de 100 959 phrases. Nous présentons une analyse qualitative des faits les plus intéressants extraits automatiquement et soulignons les pistes de développement futures possibles. Les résultats préliminaires montrent que les modèles sémantiques à usage général sont un outil utile pour découvrir des connaissances précises dans de vastes corpus de documents scientifiques.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta los resultados preliminares de un proyecto en curso que analiza el creciente número de investigaciones científicas publicadas en torno a la pandemia de COVID-19. En esta investigación, se utiliza un modelo semántico de propósito general para anotar dos veces un lote de 500 oraciones que se seleccionaron manualmente del corpus CORD-19. Posteriormente, se diseña y evalúa una línea de base de extracción de textos mediante un lote grande de 100,959 frases. Presentamos un análisis cualitativo de los hechos más interesantes extraídos automáticamente y destacamos posibles líneas futuras de desarrollo. Los resultados preliminares muestran que los modelos semánticos de uso general son una herramienta útil para descubrir conocimientos detallados en grandes corpus de documentos científicos.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta os resultados preliminares de um projeto em andamento que analisa o crescente corpo de pesquisas científicas publicadas em torno da pandemia de COVID-19. Nesta pesquisa, um modelo semântico de propósito geral é usado para anotar duas vezes um lote de 500 sentenças que foram selecionadas manualmente do corpus CORD-19. Depois, um pipeline de mineração de texto de linha de base é projetado e avaliado por meio de um grande lote de 100.959 frases. Apresentamos uma análise qualitativa dos fatos mais interessantes extraídos automaticamente e destacamos possíveis linhas de desenvolvimento futuras. Os resultados preliminares mostram que os modelos semânticos de propósito geral são uma ferramenta útil para descobrir conhecimento refinado em grandes corpora de documentos científicos.', 'ja': '本稿では、COVID -19のパンデミックをめぐり発表された科学的研究の成長を分析する進行中のプロジェクトの予備的な結果を紹介する。この研究では、汎用意味モデルを使用して、CORD -19コーパスから手動で選択された500の文章のバッチをダブルアノテーションします。その後、ベースラインテキストマイニングパイプラインが設計され、100,959文の大きなバッチを介して評価されます。私たちは、自動的に抽出された最も興味深い事実の定性的分析を提示し、将来可能な開発ラインを強調します。予備的な結果は、汎用的な意味モデルが、科学的文書の大規模な体で細かい知識を発見するための有用なツールであることを示している。', 'zh': '本文引一项目初定,其目析绕COVID-19大行发表者益科学研究。 于是通用语义模对从CORD-19语料库中手动择句500重注。 既而大100,959句意评估基线文本掘管道。 吾定性分析取至趣,而显未来之路。 初结果表明,通语义于大科学文献库之中细粒度有用之具。', 'hi': 'यह पत्र एक चल रही परियोजना के प्रारंभिक परिणामों को प्रस्तुत करता है जो कोविड -19 महामारी के आसपास प्रकाशित वैज्ञानिक अनुसंधान के बढ़ते शरीर का विश्लेषण करता है। इस शोध में, एक सामान्य उद्देश्य के शब्दार्थ मॉडल का उपयोग 500 वाक्यों के एक बैच को डबल एनोटेट करने के लिए किया जाता है जो मैन्युअल रूप से कॉर्ड -19 कॉर्पस से चुने गए थे। इसके बाद, एक बेसलाइन टेक्स्ट-माइनिंग पाइपलाइन को 100,959 वाक्यों के एक बड़े बैच के माध्यम से डिज़ाइन और मूल्यांकन किया जाता है। हम स्वचालित रूप से निकाले गए सबसे दिलचस्प तथ्यों का एक गुणात्मक विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करते हैं और विकास की संभावित भविष्य की रेखाओं को उजागर करते हैं। प्रारंभिक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि सामान्य उद्देश्य के शब्दार्थ मॉडल वैज्ञानिक दस्तावेजों के बड़े कॉर्पोरेट में ठीक-ठाक ज्ञान की खोज के लिए एक उपयोगी उपकरण हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлены предварительные результаты текущего проекта, в котором анализируется растущий объем научных исследований, опубликованных вокруг пандемии COVID-19. В этом исследовании используется семантическая модель общего назначения для двойной аннотации партии из 500 предложений, которые были выбраны вручную из корпуса CORD-19. После этого разрабатывается и оценивается базовый конвейер для майнинга текстов, состоящий из большой партии из 100 959 предложений. Представляем качественный анализ наиболее интересных автоматически извлекаемых фактов и выделяем возможные будущие направления развития. Предварительные результаты показывают, что семантические модели общего назначения являются полезным инструментом для обнаружения мелкозернистых знаний в крупных корпусах научных документов.', 'ga': "Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair na réamhthorthaí ar thionscadal leanúnach a dhéanann anailís ar an taighde eolaíoch atá ag dul i méid agus a foilsíodh ar an bpaindéim COVID-19. Sa taighde seo, úsáidtear samhail shéimeantach ilchuspóra chun anótáil a dhéanamh faoi dhó ar bhaisc 500 abairt a roghnaíodh de láimh as corpas CORD-19. Ina dhiaidh sin, déantar píblíne mianadóireachta téacs bonnlíne a dhearadh agus a mheasúnú trí bhaisc mhór 100,959 abairt. Cuirimid i láthair anailís cháilíochtúil ar na fíricí is suimiúla a bhaintear go huathoibríoch agus leagaimid béim ar línte forbartha a d'fhéadfadh a bheith ann amach anseo. Léiríonn na réamhthorthaí gur uirlis úsáideach iad samhlacha shéimeantacha ilchuspóireacha chun eolas mín a aimsiú i gcorpas mór doiciméad eolaíochta.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει τα προκαταρκτικά αποτελέσματα ενός τρέχοντος έργου που αναλύει το αυξανόμενο σώμα επιστημονικής έρευνας που δημοσιεύεται γύρω από την πανδημία του COVID-19. Στην έρευνα αυτή, ένα σημασιολογικό μοντέλο γενικής χρήσης χρησιμοποιείται για να διπλασιάσει μια παρτίδα 500 προτάσεων που επιλέχθηκαν χειροκίνητα από το σώμα CORD-19. Στη συνέχεια, ένας αγωγός εξόρυξης κειμένου βάσης σχεδιάζεται και αξιολογείται μέσω μιας μεγάλης δέσμης προτάσεων 100,959. Παρουσιάζουμε μια ποιοτική ανάλυση των πιο ενδιαφέρουσων γεγονότων που εξάγονται αυτόματα και επισημαίνουμε πιθανές μελλοντικές γραμμές ανάπτυξης. Τα προκαταρκτικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι σημασιολογικά μοντέλα γενικής χρήσης είναι ένα χρήσιμο εργαλείο για την ανακάλυψη λεπτόκοκκης γνώσης σε μεγάλα σώματα επιστημονικών εγγράφων.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy folyamatban lévő projekt előzetes eredményeit mutatja be, amely elemzi a COVID-19 járvány körül publikált tudományos kutatások egyre növekvő mennyiségét. Ebben a kutatásban egy általános célú szemantikai modellt használunk arra, hogy megkétszerezzük a CORD-19 korpuszból kézzel kiválasztott 500 mondatot. Ezt követően egy alapvető szövegbányászati csővezetéket terveznek és értékelnek 100 959 mondattal. Bemutatjuk az automatikusan kivont legérdekesebb tények minőségi elemzését és kiemeljük a lehetséges jövőbeli fejlődési vonalakat. Az előzetes eredmények azt mutatják, hogy az általános célú szemantikai modellek hasznos eszközök a finomszemcsés tudás felfedezésére a tudományos dokumentumok nagy tömegeiben.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს წინასწარმოდგენებული პროექტის წინასწარმოდგენება, რომელიც COVID-19 პონდემიკის გარეშე განსხვავებული მეცნიერო სწავლობას განსხვავებული ფო ამ შესწავლობაში, საერთო მიზეზი სემონტიკი მოდელი გამოყენება 500 წესების ნაწილად, რომლებიც პირად მონიშნულია CORD-19 კორპუსდან. შემდეგ, ტექსტის მინდომის კონფლინტის შესახებ 100 959 წესების დიდი ნაწილად განაზღვრება და განაზღვრება. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ უფრო საინტერესო ფაქტების კვალიტატიური ანალიზაციას ავტომატურად გამოგექტირებული და განვითარების შესაძლებელი მომავალე ხაზების ოპვეგთენთრვ პვჱსლრართ ოჲკაჱგარ, ფვ ჟვმანრთფნთ მჲევლთ ჟა ოჲლსზვნ თჟრჲპ ჱა ჲრკპთგანვ ნა ეჲბპთრვ ჱნანთწ გ დჲლწმარა კჲპოა ნა ნასფნთრვ ეჲკსმვნრთ.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta i risultati preliminari di un progetto in corso che analizza il crescente corpus di ricerca scientifica pubblicata intorno alla pandemia COVID-19. In questa ricerca, un modello semantico generico viene utilizzato per annotare due volte un lotto di 500 frasi che sono state selezionate manualmente dal corpus CORD-19. Successivamente, una pipeline di mining di testo di base viene progettata e valutata tramite un grande lotto di 100.959 frasi. Presentiamo un'analisi qualitativa dei fatti più interessanti estratti automaticamente e evidenziamo possibili linee di sviluppo future. I risultati preliminari mostrano che i modelli semantici di uso generale sono uno strumento utile per scoprire conoscenze a grana fine in grandi corpora di documenti scientifici.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз COVID-19 пандемиясында шығарылған ғылыми зерттеулер денесін анализ етіп тұрған жобаның алдындағы нәтижелерін көрсетеді. Бұл зерттеулерде, CORD- 19 корпусынан қолмен таңдалған 500 сөздерді қолдану үшін жалпы мақсатты семантикалық модель қолданылады. Содан кейін, негізгі мәтін бағыттау жолы 100 959 сөздердің үлкен бөлігімен құрылады. Біз ең қызықтық факттардың квалитативті анализ автоматты түрде жасау және болашақ жолдарды таңдап береміз. Алдыңғы нәтижелер жалпы мақсатты семантикалық үлгілер - ғылыми құжаттардың үлкен білімдерін табу үшін пайдалы құралы.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiami preliminarūs tebevykstančio projekto, kuriame analizuojami augantys moksliniai tyrimai, paskelbti apie COVID-19 pandemiją, rezultatai. Šiuose tyrimuose naudojamas bendras semantinis model is, skirtas dvigubai anotuoti 500 sakinių partiją, rankiniu būdu atrinktą iš CORD-19 korpuso. Po to pradinis teksto gavybos vamzdynas suprojektuojamas ir vertinamas didele 100 959 sakinių partija. Pateikiame kokybinę labiausiai įdomių faktų, gautų automatiškai, analizę ir pabrėžiame galimas būsimas vystymosi kryptis. Išankstiniai rezultatai rodo, kad bendro pobūdžio semantiniai modeliai yra naudinga priemonė, kuria galima rasti smulkių grūdų žinias daugelyje mokslinių dokumentų.', 'mk': 'Овој документ ги претставува прелиминарните резултати на тековниот проект кој го анализира растечкото тело на научно истражување објавено околу пандемијата COVID-19. Во ова истражување, семантичен модел со генерална цел се користи за двојно анотирање на парче од 500 реченици кои беа рачно избрани од корпусот CORD-19. Потоа, основниот гасовод за рудање текст е дизајниран и оценет преку голема партија од 100.959 реченици. Презентираме квалитетна анализа на најинтересните факти автоматски извадени и истакнуваме можни идни линии на развој. Прелиминарните резултати покажуваат дека семантичките модели со генерална цел се корисна алатка за откривање на фино-зелено знаење во голема корпора научни документи.', 'ms': 'This paper presents the preliminary results of an ongoing project that analyzes the growing body of scientific research published around the COVID-19 pandemic.  Dalam kajian ini, model semantik tujuan umum digunakan untuk menggandakan batch 500 kalimat yang dipilih secara manual dari CORD-19 corpus. Kemudian, saluran paip teks-tambang asas dirancang dan diteliti melalui batch besar 100,959 kalimat. Kami mempersembahkan analisis kualitatif fakta yang paling menarik yang secara automatik dikekstrak dan menyatakan garis kemungkinan pembangunan masa depan. Keputusan awal menunjukkan bahawa model semantik-tujuan umum adalah alat yang berguna untuk menemukan pengetahuan berwarna gandum dalam korpora besar dokumen saintifik.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഒരു പദ്ധതിയുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. കോവിഡി-19 പാന്\u200dഡെമിക്ക് ചുറ്റും പ്രസിദ്ധമായ ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d, ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്ന സെമാന്റിക് മോഡല്\u200d കോര്\u200dഡി-19 കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നിന്ന് കൈകാര്യം തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത 500 വാക്കു അതിനുശേഷം, ഒരു ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ്- മൈനിംഗ് പൈപ്പെലിന്\u200d ഡിസൈന്\u200d ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്നു. 100,959 വാക്കുകളുടെ വലിയ ബാച നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയമായി പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഏറ്റവും രസകരമായ സത്യത്തെപ്പറ്റിയുള്ള ഒരു ക്വാലിറ്റീവ്യാന ആദ്യ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ജനറല്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്ന സെമാന്റിക് മോഡലുകള്\u200d വലിയ ശാസ്ത്ര ര രേഖകളില്\u200d നല്ല വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta r-riżultati preliminari ta’ proġett li għaddej li janalizza l-korp dejjem jikber ta’ riċerka xjentifika ppubblikat madwar il-pandemija COVID-19. F’din ir-riċerka, jintuża mudell semantiku ta’ skop ġenerali biex jiġi annotat darbtejn lott ta’ 500 sentenza li ntgħa żlu manwalment mill-CORD-19 corpus. Wara dan, pipeline tal-minjieri tat-test fil-linja bażi huwa ddisinjat u evalwat permezz ta’ lott kbir ta’ 100,959 sentenza. We present a qualitative analysis of the most interesting facts automatically extracted and highlight possible future lines of development.  Ir-riżultati preliminari juru li mudelli semantiċi għal skopijiet ġenerali huma għodda utli biex jiġi skopert l-għarfien ta’ ħbub fin f’korpura kbira ta’ dokumenti xjentifiċi.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас COVID-19 салбарын эргэн тойронд хэвлэгдсэн шинжлэх ухааны судалгааны биеийг шинжилгээ хийдэг төслийн эхний үр дүнг харуулдаг. Энэ судалгаанд CORD-19 корпус гараар сонгогдсон 500 өгүүлбэрийг хоёр дахин нэвтрэхэд хэрэглэгддэг. Дараа нь суурь шугам хөдөлгөөний хоолойн шугам 100.959 өгүүлбэрээр дүгнэж, үнэлдэг. Бид хамгийн сонирхолтой жинхэнээс автоматаар ирээдүйн хөгжлийн шулууныг автоматаар гаргаж, тодорхойлж чадна. Эхний үр дүн нь олон шинжлэх ухааны баримт бичиг баримтуудын томоохон мэдлэгийг олж мэдэх хэрэгтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono wstępne wyniki trwającego projektu analizującego rosnące badania naukowe publikowane wokół pandemii COVID-19. W tym badaniu używany jest ogólnodostępny model semantyczny do podwojenia adnotacji partii 500 zdań, które zostały ręcznie wybrane z korpusu CORD-19. Następnie zaprojektowany i oceniany jest bazowy rurociąg eksploracji tekstu za pomocą dużej partii zdań 100,959. Przedstawiamy jakościową analizę najciekawszych faktów automatycznie ekstrahowanych i podkreślamy możliwe przyszłe linie rozwoju. Wstępne wyniki pokazują, że ogólnodostępne modele semantyczne są użytecznym narzędziem do odkrywania drobnoziarnistej wiedzy w dużych korpusach dokumentów naukowych.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja preliminarne rezultate projekta koji analizira rastuće tijelo naučnih istraživanja objavljeno oko pandemije COVID-19. U ovom istraživanju, semantički model generalne svrhe se koristi za duplo annotiranje serije od 500 rečenica koje su ručno odabrane iz korpusa CORD-19. Nakon toga, početna kanalizacija za rudarstvo teksta je dizajnirana i procjenjena putem velike serije od 100.959 rečenica. Predstavljamo kvalitativnu analizu najinteresantnijih činjenica automatski izvlačenih i naglašavajući moguće buduće linije razvoja. Preliminarni rezultati pokazuju da su semantički modeli generalne svrhe korisni alat za otkrivanje fino zrno znanja u velikom telu naučnih dokumenta.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser det første resultatet av eit gjeldande prosjekt som analyserer den voksende kroppen av vitenskapelige forskning utgjeven rundt COVID-19 pandemikk. I denne forskningen vert eit generell semantisk modell brukt for å dobbelt oppmerke eit gruppe av 500 setningar som vart manuelt valt frå CORD- 19 korpusen. Etter denne blir eit grunnlinje med tekstminingsrøyr designert og evaluert med ein stor gruppe av 100 959 setningar. Vi presenterer ein kvalitativ analyse av dei mest interessante faktane som automatisk ekstraherer og markerer moglege framtidige utviklingslinjer. Dette første resultatet viser at generelle semantiske modeller er eit nyttig verktøy for å oppdaga kjenninga i stor korpora av vitenskapelige dokument.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරණය කරපු විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයා මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, සාමාන්\u200dය අදහසක් සෙමාන්ටික් මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා CORD-19 කොර්පුස් වලින් අතිරීක්ෂණය කරලා ප්\u200dරය ඊට පස්සේ, මූලික පාට්ස් මනින් පායිප්ලින් සිද්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ 100,959 වාක්ෂාවක් ලොකු බැට්ටුවෙන් විශ අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විශ්ලේෂණ මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය අරමුණ සෙමාන්ටික් මොඩේල්ස් එක ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විද්\u200dයාපිත ව', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă rezultatele preliminare ale unui proiect în curs de desfășurare care analizează corpul tot mai mare de cercetări științifice publicate în jurul pandemiei COVID-19. În această cercetare, un model semantic general este folosit pentru a adnota dublu un lot de 500 de propoziții care au fost selectate manual din corpul CORD-19. Ulterior, o conductă de mining text de bază este proiectată și evaluată printr-un lot mare de 100.959 de propoziții. Prezentăm o analiză calitativă a celor mai interesante fapte extrase automat și evidențiem posibilele linii viitoare de dezvoltare. Rezultatele preliminare arată că modelele semantice de uz general sunt un instrument util pentru descoperirea cunoștințelor fine în corpuri mari de documente științifice.', 'so': 'Kanu warqaddan wuxuu keenaa midhihii hore oo ku socda project, kaas oo analyeysa jidhka koraya oo cilmi-cilmi ah oo la soo daabacay cudurka COVID-19. Baaritaankaas waxaa loo isticmaalaa tusaale ahaan caadiga ah oo labanlaab ah oo 500 xafiis ah oo qofka gacanta loo doortay CORD-19 korpus. Dabadeedna waxaa lagu qoray qoraal-qori-miniin ah oo lagu qiimeeyo boqol badan oo 100,959 imtixaan ah. Anagaa keenaynaa baaritaanka qiimeeya waxyaabaha ugu xiisaysan ee si automatic ah loo soo saaray iyo tusino sawirada horumarinta suurtagalka ah. Midhaha ugu horeeya waxay muujiyaan in tusaale-qaabka caadiga ah ay yihiin qalabka faa’iidada si aad u hesho aqoonta fiican ee shirkad faro badan oo cilmi leh.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar de preliminära resultaten av ett pågående projekt som analyserar den växande mängden vetenskaplig forskning som publiceras kring COVID-19-pandemin. I denna forskning används en generell semantisk modell för att dubbelkommentera en sats av 500 meningar som valdes manuellt från CORD-19 korpus. Därefter utformas och utvärderas en baslinje för textutvinning via en stor sats på 100 959 meningar. Vi presenterar en kvalitativ analys av de mest intressanta fakta som automatiskt extraheras och belyser möjliga framtida utvecklingslinjer. De preliminära resultaten visar att generella semantiska modeller är ett användbart verktyg för att upptäcka finkornig kunskap i stora mängder vetenskapliga dokument.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் நடக்கும் திட்டத்தின் முன்னிருப்பு முடிவுகளை கூட்டுகிறது இது COVID-19 துன்பந்தத்தை சுற்றி வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட அறிவ இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், ஒரு பொதுவான-இலக்கு மாதிரி கோர்டி-19 கோர்பாஸில் இருந்து தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட 500 வாக்குகளை இரட்டிப்பதற் பின்னர், 100,959 வாக்கியங்களின் மூலம் ஒரு பெரிய பாக்கில் உரையை குறைக்கும் பைப்பேலின் வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டு மதிப்பிடும். தானாகவே வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட மற்றும் சாத்தியமான எதிர்காலத்தின் வரிகளை முன்னோக்குகிறது. முதல் முடிவுகள் அறிவியல் ஆவணங்களின் பெரிய நிறுவனத்தில் நன்றாக கிடைக்கப்பட்ட அறிவை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு பயனுள்ள மாதிரிகள் என்பதை காட்', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ایک ادھر رہنے والی پروژہ کی پہلی نتیجے بیان کرتے ہیں جو COVID-19 pandemic کے اطراف طرح طرح طرح کے علم تحقیقات کی جسم کو تحقیق کرتا ہے. اس تحقیقات میں، ایک عمومی مقصد سیمانٹی موڈل کو دوگنا مشورہ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے 500 جماعتوں کا جو CORD-19 کورپوس سے manually منتخب کیے گئے تھے. اس کے بعد، ایک بنیس لین ٹیکسٹ مینینگ پائیپ لین طراحی کی گئی ہے اور ایک بڑی جماعت کے ذریعے 100,959 جماعت کی ارزش کی گئی ہے. ہم نے بہترین علاقمند حقیقت کا ایک کیلوٹیٹی تحلیل پیش کرتا ہے جو اپنے ساتھ اٹھایا جاتا ہے اور تقویم کی ممکن مستقبل خطوط کو ہلاک کرتا ہے۔ اولین نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ عمومی مطابق سیمانٹی موڈل ایک فائدہ تولید ہے کہ بہت سے سائنس دفتروں کی عمومی دانش کو کھولنے کے لئے بہت اچھے دانے کا علم ہے.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa COVID-19 pandemik orqali nashriyotgan ilmiy tafʼiy tarkibini aniqlab qolgan loyihaning asosiy natijalarini beradi. Bu taʼminotda, umumiy qanday semantik modeli CORD-19 corpusdan qoʻlbola tanlangan 500 ta bir necha so'zlarni qo'lbola tanlash uchun ishlatiladi. Keyin esa, asosiy matnning mining pipelining asosiy chizib qo'yiladi va 100,959 sentencening katta kichik qiymati. We present a qualitative analysis of the most interesting facts automatically extracted and highlight possible future lines of development.  Birinchi darajali natijalar esa, umumiy qanday semantik modellari katta ilmiy hujjatlarning ajoyib ilmiyni aniqlash uchun foydalanuvchi asbobi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đưa ra kết quả sơ bộ của một dự án đang được tiến hành, phân tích tập thể nghiên cứu khoa học phát triển quanh đại dịch COVID-19. Trong nghiên cứu này, một mô hình chữ mẫu phổ biến sẽ được dùng để phóng to gấp đôi một phần ghi chú 500 câu đã được chọn tự tay từ tập thể giây-19. Sau đó, một đường ống khai thác văn bản được thiết kế và đánh giá qua một lượng lớn các câu 100,959. Chúng tôi đưa ra một bài phân tích chất lượng về những dữ kiện thú vị nhất tự động rút ra và nhấn mạnh khả năng phát triển tương lai. Những kết quả sơ bộ cho thấy các mô hình ngữ pháp phổ biến là một công cụ hữu ích cho việc tìm hiểu kiến thức sắc sảo trong những tài liệu khoa học lớn.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя предварителните резултати от текущ проект, който анализира нарастващия набор от научни изследвания, публикувани около пандемията. В това изследване се използва семантичен модел с общо предназначение за двойно анотиране на партида от 500 изречения, които са ръчно подбрани от корпуса. След това основният тръбопровод за извличане на текст се проектира и оценява чрез голяма партида от 100 959 изречения. Представяме качествен анализ на най-интересните факти, извлечени автоматично и подчертаваме възможните бъдещи линии на развитие. Предварителните резултати показват, че семантичните модели с общо предназначение са полезен инструмент за откриване на фини знания в големи корпуси от научни документи.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer de foreløbige resultater af et igangværende projekt, der analyserer den voksende del af videnskabelig forskning offentliggjort omkring COVID-19 pandemien. I denne forskning anvendes en generel semantisk model til dobbeltanmærkning af 500 sætninger, der blev manuelt udvalgt fra CORD-19 korpus. Derefter designes og evalueres en basislinje til tekstmining via en stor batch på 100.959 sætninger. Vi præsenterer en kvalitativ analyse af de mest interessante fakta automatisk udvundet og fremhæver mulige fremtidige udviklingslinjer. De foreløbige resultater viser, at generelle semantiske modeller er et nyttigt redskab til at opdage finkornet viden i store korpora af videnskabelige dokumenter.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert de voorlopige resultaten van een lopend project dat de groeiende hoeveelheid wetenschappelijk onderzoek rond de COVID-19 pandemie analyseert. In dit onderzoek wordt een algemeen semantisch model gebruikt om een batch van 500 zinnen te verdubbelen die handmatig werden geselecteerd uit het CORD-19 corpus. Daarna wordt een basislijn text-mining pipeline ontworpen en geëvalueerd via een grote batch van 100.959 zinnen. We presenteren een kwalitatieve analyse van de meest interessante feiten automatisch geëxtraheerd en belichten mogelijke toekomstige ontwikkelingslijnen. De voorlopige resultaten tonen aan dat algemene semantische modellen een nuttig hulpmiddel zijn voor het ontdekken van fijnkorrelige kennis in grote corpora van wetenschappelijke documenten.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja preliminarne rezultate nastavljajućeg projekta koji analizira rastuće tijelo znanstvenih istraživanja objavljenog oko pandemije COVID-19. U ovom istraživanju, semantički model generalne svrhe se koristi za dvostruku annotaciju serije od 500 rečenica koje su ručno odabrane iz korpusa CORD-19. Nakon toga je početna cijevina za rudarstvo teksta dizajnirana i procjenjena putem velike serije od 100 959 rečenica. Predstavljamo kvalitativnu analizu najinteresantnijih činjenica automatski izvlačenih i naglašavajući moguće buduće linije razvoja. Preliminarni rezultati pokazuju da su semantički modeli generalne svrhe korisni alat za otkrivanje fino zrno znanja u velikoj tijelu znanstvenih dokumenta.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan hasil awal dari proyek yang sedang berlangsung yang menganalisis tubuh tumbuh penelitian ilmiah yang diterbitkan disekitar pandemia COVID-19. Dalam penelitian ini, model semantis tujuan umum digunakan untuk menggandakan jumlah 500 kalimat yang dipilih secara manual dari CORD-19 corpus. Setelah itu, pipa penambangan teks dasar dirancang dan dievaluasi melalui batch besar dari 100.959 kalimat. We present a qualitative analysis of the most interesting facts automatically extracted and highlight possible future lines of development.  Hasil awal menunjukkan bahwa model semantis tujuan umum adalah alat yang berguna untuk menemukan pengetahuan gandum dalam korpora besar dokumen ilmiah.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag werden die vorläufigen Ergebnisse eines laufenden Projekts vorgestellt, das die wachsende Zahl wissenschaftlicher Forschung analysiert, die rund um die COVID-19-Pandemie veröffentlicht wurde. In dieser Forschung wird ein allgemeines semantisches Modell verwendet, um eine Reihe von 500 Sätzen zu verdoppeln, die manuell aus dem CORD-19 Korpus ausgewählt wurden. Anschließend wird eine Basistext-Mining-Pipeline entworfen und über einen großen Batch von 100.959 Sätzen ausgewertet. Wir präsentieren eine qualitative Analyse der interessantesten automatisch extrahierten Fakten und zeigen mögliche zukünftige Entwicklungslinien auf. Die vorläufigen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass allgemeine semantische Modelle ein nützliches Werkzeug sind, um feinkörniges Wissen in großen Korpora wissenschaftlicher Dokumente zu entdecken.', 'ko': '본고는 코로나 팬데믹(세계적 대유행)을 둘러싼 점점 더 많은 과학 연구를 분석한 진행 중인 프로젝트의 초보적인 결과를 소개한다.본 연구는 유니버설 의미 모델을 사용하여CORD-19 자료 라이브러리에서 수동으로 선택한 500개의 문장을 이중 주석으로 한다.그리고 대량의 100959개의 문장을 통해 기선 텍스트 발굴 파이프를 설계하고 평가했다.우리는 자동으로 추출된 가장 재미있는 사실에 대해 정성 분석을 하고 미래의 발전 방향을 강조한다.초보적인 결과에 의하면 유니버설 의미 모델은 대형 과학 문헌 어료 라이브러리에서 세립도 지식을 발견하는 유용한 도구이다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ نتایج اولیه یک پروژه در حال حاضر را نشان می دهد که جسد رشد تحقیقات علمی در اطراف پاندوم COVID-19 را تحلیل می کند. در این تحقیقات، یک مدل طبیعی عمومی برای دو برابر نشان دادن گروهی از ۵۰۰ جمله که به طور دستی از کورپوس CORD-۱۹ انتخاب شده استفاده می\u200cشود. بعدش، یک لوله\u200cی پایین\u200cخط\u200cبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی متن\u200cبندی از خط\u200cبندی\u200cهای پایین طراحی می\u200cشود و با یک گروه بزرگ از جمله ۱۰۰،۵۹۹ جمله ارزیابی می\u200cشود. ما یک تحلیل کیفیت از بهترین حقیقت جالب را به طور خودکار اخراج می\u200cکنیم و خطوط آینده\u200cای ممکن توسعه را مشخص می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه اولیه نشان می دهد که مدل\u200cهای semantic عمومی برای کشف دانش\u200cهای دانه\u200cهای خوب در شرکت بزرگ از مدل\u200cهای علمی است.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha matokeo ya awali ya mradi unaoendelea kinachochambua mwili wa utafiti wa kisayansi uliochapishwa katika ugonjwa wa COVID-19. Katika utafiti huu, mtindo wa semanti wa jumla unatumiwa kuchangaza kikundi cha sentenca 500 ambacho kilichaguliwa kwa mikononi kutoka kwenye makampuni ya CORD-19. Baada ya hayo, pipeline ya maandishi yenye uchimbaji madini ya msingi imeundwa na kutathmini kupitia betri kubwa ya hukumu 100,959. Tunajaribu uchambuzi wa kina wa ukweli wa kusisimua na kuonyesha mistari inayowezekana ya maendeleo. Matokeo ya awali yanaonyesha kuwa mifano ya sekondari kwa lengo la ujumla ni zana yenye manufaa ya kutambua maarifa mazuri katika makampuni makubwa ya nyaraka za kisayansi.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel die voorste resultate van 'n voortgaande projek wat die groei liggaam van wetenskaplike ondersoek wat rondom die COVID-19 pandemiek gepubliseer is. In hierdie ondersoek word 'n algemene-doel semantiese model gebruik om 'n groot 500 setnings te dubbel wat hand gekies is van die CORD- 19 corpus. Daarna word 'n basisline teksmeining pyplyn ontwerp en evalueer deur 'n groot groot groot groot groot groot 100,959 setinge. Ons stel 'n kwaliteit analiseer van die mees interessante fakte outomaties uitpak en verlig moontlik toekomstige lyn van ontwikkeling. Die voorste resultate wys dat algemene-doel semantiese modele is 'n nuttige hulpmiddel vir die ontdekking van fyn-koring kennis in groot korpora van wetenskaplike dokumente.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet rezultatet paraprake të një projekti në vazhdim që analizon trupin në rritje të kërkimit shkencor botuar rreth pandemisë COVID-19. Në këtë kërkim, një model semantik me qëllim të përgjithshëm përdoret për të shënuar dyfishtë një seri 500 fjalësh që u zgjodhën manualisht nga korpusi CORD-19. Pas kësaj, një tubacion bazë për minierën e tekstit është projektuar dhe vlerësuar nëpërmjet një serie të madhe prej 100,959 fjalësh. We present a qualitative analysis of the most interesting facts automatically extracted and highlight possible future lines of development.  Rezultatet paraprake tregojnë se modelet semantike me qëllim të përgjithshëm janë një mjet i dobishëm për zbulimin e njohurive të hollësishme në një korpor të madh dokumentesh shkencore.', 'am': 'ይህም ፕሮግራም በCOVID-19 ደዌብ ላይ የተለየውን የሳይንቀፍ ምርምር አካል የሚያስተምር የመጀመሪያውን የፕሮጀክት ፍሬቶች ያሳያል፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ፣ አዋጅ አካባቢ የsemantic ሞዴል ከCORD-19 ኮርፓስ የተመረጡትን 500 የፍርድ ክፍሎች እጥፍ ለመቀበል ይጠቅማል፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ በ100,959 ክፍሎች በታላቅ ቡድን የተመሳሳይ የጽሑፍ ማነሻ ፖሊስ አግኝቷል፡፡ የአጠቃሚ ውነቶች በራስነት አውጥቷል እና የሚቻለውን የፍጻሜውን የመረጃ መስረጃዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ውጤቶች የ-አቀማመጥ ስሜናዊ ዓይነቶች በብዙ የሳይንቀሳዊ ሰነዶች እውቀትን ለማግኘት የሚጠቅሙ መሣሪያዎች ናቸው፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu häzirki COVID-19 pandemiýanyň daşynda esasy ýokary ylmy barlamasynyň önüm netijesini çykýar. Bu araştyrymda, CORD-19 korpusdan elimizden seçilen 500 sözleri iki gezek duýdurmak üçin umumy maksady semantik nusgasy ullanýar. Sonra, 100,959 sözler arasındaki temel çizgi tasarlanmış ve değerlendirildi. Iň gyzykly faktlaryň üstüni öz-özüne ýitirýär we gelejekde gelişme hatlaryny ýagtylaşdyrýarys. Öňki netijeler ýagdaýda umumy maksady semantik nusgalar uly bir bilim bilen täzeden ukyp bilmek üçin faydaly bir araçdyr.', 'bn': 'This paper presents the preliminary results of an ongoing project that analyzes the growing body of scientific research published around the COVID-19 pandemic.  এই গবেষণায় একটি সাধারণ উদ্দেশ্যের সেমেন্টিক মডেল ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে যারা কোর্ডি-১৯ কোর্পাস থেকে নির্বাচিত হয়েছে ৫০০ টি ব্যাঙ্ এর পরে একটি বেসেলাইন টেক্সট-মিনিয়িং পাইপেলাইন গঠন করা হয়েছে এবং মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে ১০০,৯৫৯ শাস্তি দিয়ে। আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে উদ্ধার করা এবং সম্ভাব্য ভবিষ্যতের উন্নয়নের ভবিষ্যৎ লাইনের বিশ্লেষণের কৌতূহলীয় বিশ্লে প্রাথমিক ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে সাধারণ উদ্দেশ্যের সেমেন্টিক মডেল বিশাল কোর্পোরায় বিজ্ঞানিক নথিগুলোতে সুন্দর জ্ঞান খুঁজ', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja preliminarne rezultate projekta koji analizira rastuće tijelo naučnih istraživanja objavljeno oko pandemije COVID-19. U ovom istraživanju, semantički model generalne svrhe se koristi za dvostruku annotaciju serije od 500 rečenica koje su ručno odabrane iz korpusa CORD-19. Nakon toga je početna cijevina za rudarstvo teksta dizajnirana i procjenjena putem velike serije od 100.959 rečenica. Predstavljamo kvalitetnu analizu najinteresantnijih činjenica automatski izvlačenih i naglašavajući moguće buduće linije razvoja. Preliminarni rezultati pokazuju da su semantički modeli generalne svrhe korisni alat za otkrivanje fino zrno znanja u velikom tijelu naučnih dokumenta.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt COVID-19 pandemisinin ətrafında yayınlanan bilimsel araştırmaların vücudunu analiz edən sürəkli proyektin ilk sonuçlarını göstərir. Bu araştırma içində, CORD-19 korpusdan əlində seçilmiş 500 cümlələrdən ikiqat işaretlənmək üçün general-purpose semantic modeli kullanılır. Sonra, təklif çizgi mətn minik boru çizgi 100.959 cümlənin böyük bir dəstəsi ilə müəyyən edilir. Biz ən maraqlı faktların mümkün gələcək sətirlərini avtomatik təkrarlayır və təkrarlayır. Əvvəlki sonuçlar genel məqsədilə semantik modellərin böyük bilimsel belələrin dəyişiklik bilgi tapmaq üçün faydalı bir vasitədir.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta els resultats preliminars d'un projecte en curs que analitza el creixent cos de recerca científica publicat al voltant de la pandèmia COVID-19. En aquesta recerca, un model semàntic de propòsit general s'utilitza per anotar el doble de 500 frases seleccionates manualment del corps CORD-19. Després, un tub de base de mineria de text es dissenya i s'evalua a través d'un gran lotde 100.959 frases. Presentam una anàlisi qualitativa dels fets més interessants extraïts automàticament i destaquem les possibles línies futures de desenvolupament. Els resultats preliminars mostren que els models semàntics de propòsit general són una eina útil per descobrir coneixements fins a grans grans en gran corpora de documents científics.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis esitatakse käimasoleva projekti esialgsed tulemused, milles analüüsitakse COVID-19 pandeemia ümber avaldatud kasvavat teadusuuringute hulka. Käesolevas uurimistöös kasutatakse üldotstarbelist semantilist mudelit 500 lause partii topeltannoteerimiseks, mis valiti käsitsi CORD-19 korpusest. Seejärel kavandatakse ja hinnatakse tekstikaevandamise algväärtus suure 100 959 lausega partii kaudu. Esitame kvalitatiivse analüüsi kõige huvitavamatest faktidest automaatselt välja toodud ning toome esile võimalikud tulevased arengusuunad. Esialgsed tulemused näitavad, et üldotstarbelised semantilised mudelid on kasulik vahend peenete teadmiste avastamiseks teaduslike dokumentide suurtes korpustes.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje předběžné výsledky probíhajícího projektu analyzujícího rostoucí soubor vědeckého výzkumu publikovaného kolem pandemie COVID-19. V tomto výzkumu je použit univerzální sémantický model pro dvojité anotování dávky 500 vět, které byly ručně vybrány z korpusu CORD-19. Následně je navržen a vyhodnocen základní potrubí pro dolování textu prostřednictvím velké dávky 100,959 vět. Představujeme kvalitativní analýzu nejzajímavějších faktů automaticky extrahovaných a upozorňujeme na možné budoucí linie vývoje. Předběžné výsledky ukazují, že všeobecné sémantické modely jsou užitečným nástrojem pro objevování jemnozrnných znalostí ve velkých korpusech vědeckých dokumentů.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään alustavat tulokset meneillään olevasta hankkeesta, jossa analysoidaan COVID-19-pandemian ympärillä julkaistua kasvavaa tieteellistä tutkimusta. Tässä tutkimuksessa käytetään yleiskäyttöistä semanttista mallia kaksinkertaistamaan 500 lauseen erä, jotka on valittu käsin CORD-19-korpusesta. Tämän jälkeen tekstinkäsittelyputki suunnitellaan ja arvioidaan suurella 100 959 lauseen erällä. Esitämme laadullisen analyysin kiinnostavimmista automaattisesti poimituista tosiasioista ja korostamme mahdollisia tulevaisuuden kehityslinjoja. Alustavat tulokset osoittavat, että yleiskäyttöiset semanttiset mallit ovat hyödyllinen työkalu hienorakeisen tiedon löytämiseen suurista tieteellisistä asiakirjoista.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է մի ընթացիկ ծրագիր առաջին արդյունքները, որը վերլուծում է COVID-19 համաճարակի շուրջ հրատարակված գիտական հետազոտությունների աճող մարմինը: Այս հետազոտության մեջ ընդհանուր նպատակի սեմանտիկ մոդելը օգտագործվում է կրկնակի նշում անելու 500 նախադասություններ, որոնք ձեռքով ընտրվել են CORD-19 կորպոսից: Afterwards, a baseline text-mining pipeline is designed and evaluated via a large batch of 100,959 sentences.  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ամենահետաքրքիր փաստերի որակային վերլուծությունը, որը ինքնաբերաբար դուրս է գալիս և նշել զարգացման հնարավոր ապագա գծերը: Առաջնական արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ընդհանուր նպատակի սեմանտիկ մոդելները օգտակար գործիք են, որպեսզի հայտնաբերեն գեղեցիկ գիտելիքներ գիտական փաստաթղթերի մեծ կառուցվածքում:', 'jv': 'Gambar iki bakal ngewehke perusahaan anyari perusahaan kanggo ngilangutan kanggo nguasal mripat anyari istrawih Sayensi sing paling nggambar candem corid-19. Nang barêng-barêng iki, sampeyan semanti kuwi nggawe sistem kuwi banjuré supoyo supoyatan kanggo masara supoyatan kanggo limangatus soko dolanan sing diputara manut kanggo kelas corD-19. Awak dhéwé, kotak sing dibejuhan kelompok nggo ngwala macem kuwi nggawe lan ujarane neng ujaran mulasah sing titimpen mat narik, limangasane mbuh cara-titimpen mat narik limangasane Awak dhéwé éntuk panelusik karo akeh basa sing perusahaan kanggo nguasai perusahaan lan nguasai nggawe barang dumadhi iki seneng nggawe ngubah Pametuné sing apik perusahaan nambah kuwi, model semanti kuwi nggawe barang kelas kuwi nggawe kesempatan kanggo awak dhéwé éntuk kedokumen sing apik dhéwé.', 'sk': 'V prispevku so predstavljeni predhodni rezultati tekočega projekta, ki analizira naraščajoče število znanstvenih raziskav, objavljenih okoli pandemije COVID-19. V raziskavi uporabljamo splošni semantični model za dvojno označevanje serije 500 stavkov, ki so bili ročno izbrani iz korpusa CORD-19. Nato je načrtovan in ocenjen osnovni plinovod za rudarjenje besedila z veliko serijo 100.959 stavkov. Predstavljamo kvalitativno analizo najbolj zanimivih dejstev, ki so avtomatično pridobljena, in poudarjamo možne prihodnje smeri razvoja. Predhodni rezultati kažejo, da so splošni semantični modeli koristno orodje za odkrivanje drobnozrnatega znanja v velikih korpusih znanstvenih dokumentov.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה את התוצאות הקדמיות של פרויקט מתקיים שמנתח את גוף הגדול של מחקר מדעי שפורסם סביב הפנדמיה COVID-19. במחקר הזה, מודל סמנטי למטרה כללית משתמש כדי להצביע כפול במחלקה של 500 משפטים שנבחרו באופן ידני מהקורפוס CORD-19. לאחר מכן, צינור מינוי טקסט בסיסי מתכנן ומעריך באמצעות חבורה גדולה של 100,959 משפטים. אנחנו מציגים ניתוח איכותי של העובדות המעניינות ביותר שמוציאות באופן אוטומטי ומדגישים קווי התפתחות העתידיים אפשריים. התוצאות הקדמיות מראות שדוגמנים סמנטיים למטרה כללית הם כלי שימושי לגלות ידע מעורפל בגודל גדול של מסמכים מדעיים.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da fassarar farko na ƙarshen wata wata Projed wanda ke iya tafiya yana analyza mai ƙaranci na littafan da aka sanar da shi a tsakanin COV-19. A cikin wannan research, an yi amfani da wani misalin mai amfani da shi ga ya nuna wani bataki na zartar da nau'in watanni biyu wanda aka zãɓi hannun CORD-19. Ga bayan haka, an design kuma an evaluce wani pipe na rubutun rubutun-ƙaranci a bakin rubutun. Tuna halatar da wani anayya na sifati a kan mafiya masu sha'awa farat ɗaya da ke nuna linjeri masu yiwuwa a gaba. Matarin da ya farko na nuna cewa misalin-misalin na jumla ya zama mai amfani da wa'anar gane zance a cikin makampuni mai girma na takardar masu sani.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་COVID-19ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་མཐོང་བའི་ཚན་རིག་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་ལས་འགུལ འཚོལ་ཞིབ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་ཚོར་བ་སྔོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་ལག་ནས་གདམ་པ་ཞིག་གི་ཚིག་རྩལ་ཆ་ལྔའ དེ་རྗེས་སུ། རྨང་གཞིའི་ཡིག་གེ་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་མིང་གྲངས་ཞིག་འཇུག་བྱས་པ་ལྟར་བཟོ་བཅོས་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ གནད་དོན་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་མཁན་དག་གི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་མིག་རྣམས་ལས་ཕན་འབྲས་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Online Learning over Time in Adaptive Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'التعلم عبر الإنترنت بمرور الوقت في الترجمة الآلية العصبية التكيفية', 'es': 'Aprendizaje en línea con el tiempo en la traducción automática neuronal adaptativa', 'pt': 'Aprendizado on-line ao longo do tempo na tradução automática neural adaptativa', 'fr': "L'apprentissage en ligne dans le temps en traduction automatique neuronale adaptative", 'zh': '自适神经机器翻译中随时推移在线学', 'ja': '適応神経機械翻訳における時間の経過とともにオンライン学習', 'hi': 'अनुकूली तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में समय के साथ ऑनलाइन सीखना', 'ru': 'Онлайн-обучение с течением времени в адаптивном нейронном машинном переводе', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Ar Líne thar Am san Aistriúchán Inneall Néarach Oiriúnaitheach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Online tanulás idővel az adaptív neurális gépi fordításban', 'el': 'Ηλεκτρονική μάθηση με την πάροδο του χρόνου στην προσαρμοστική νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'it': 'Apprendimento online nel tempo nella traduzione automatica neurale adattiva', 'lt': 'Mokymasis internetu laikui bėgant adaptacinės neurologinės mašinos vertimo metu', 'kk': 'Адаптивті невралдық машинаның аудармасында онлайн уақыт бойынша оқыту', 'mk': 'Онлајн учење преку времето во адаптивна превод на неврална машина', 'mt': 'Tagħlim onlajn maż-żmien fit-Traduzzjoni Adattattiva tal-Magna Newrali', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Dalam Talian Dalam Masa dalam Terjemahan Mesin Neural Adaptif', 'mn': 'Онлайн суралцах цаг хугацаанд Адаптив сэтгэл мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэхэд', 'ro': 'Învățarea online de-a lungul timpului în traducerea automată adaptivă neurală', 'ml': 'അഡാപ്റ്റീവ് നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന സമയത്തില്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'pl': 'Uczenie się online w czasie w adaptacyjnym neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym', 'no': 'Læring på nettverk over tid i tilpassande neuralmaskinsomsetjing', 'so': 'Turjumista shabakadda ee waqtiga Adaptive Neural Machine', 'ta': 'மொழிபெயர்ப்பு இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் நேரத்திற்கு மேல் கற்றுக் கொள்கிறது', 'sr': 'Online učenje preko vremena u adaptivnoj neurološkoj prevodi', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'اڈپٹیٹ نیورال ماشین ترجمہ میں وقت پر آنلاین کی تعلیم', 'sv': 'Online lärande över tid i adaptiv neural maskinöversättning', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chương trình học trực tuyến qua thời gian Dịch sang hình thần kinh', 'bg': 'Онлайн обучение с течение на времето в адаптивен неврален машинен превод', 'da': 'Online læring over tid i adaptiv neural maskinoversættelse', 'nl': 'Online Leren in de loop van de tijd in Adaptieve Neurale Machine Translation', 'hr': 'Online učenje tijekom vremena u adaptivnoj neurološkoj prevodi', 'de': 'Online-Lernen im Zeitverlauf in der adaptiven neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung', 'id': 'Pelajaran Dalam Talian Dalam Perjemahan Mesin Neural Adaptif', 'ko': '적응 신경 기계 번역 중의 온라인 학습', 'fa': 'یادگیری آنلاین در طول زمان در ترجمه ماشین عصبی اخلاقی', 'sw': 'Kusoma Mtandaoni kwa muda katika Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Nguvu', 'tr': 'Taýpli Neural Maşynyň terjimesinde Çaltylyk Öwrenmesi Zamany Aralygy', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Mësimi online gjatë kohës në përkthimin adaptues të makinës nervore', 'am': 'Interpolation', 'bn': 'অ্যাডপেটিভ নেউরাল মেশিনের অনুবাদে অনলাইন শিক্ষা শিক্ষা', 'bs': 'Online učenje tijekom vremena u adaptivnoj neurološkoj prevodi', 'hy': 'Օնլայն սովորելը ժամանակի ընթացքում համապատասխանող նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մեջ', 'az': '쿮laq톛tli N칬ral Makina 칂evirm톛sind톛 online 칬yr톛nm톛', 'ca': 'Aprendre en línia amb el temps en una traducció adaptativa de màquines neuronales', 'et': 'Online-õpe aja jooksul kohanduva neuroalse masintõlke alal', 'fi': 'Online Learning over Time in Adaptive Neural Machine Translation', 'cs': 'Online učení v průběhu času v adaptivním neuronovém strojovém překladu', 'jv': 'online', 'sk': 'Spletno učenje skozi čas v prilagodljivem nevralnem strojnem prevajanju', 'he': 'לימוד באינטרנט במהלך הזמן בתרגום המכונה הנוירולית המתאימת', 'ha': 'Online Learning over Time in Adaptive Neural Machine Translation', 'bo': 'དྲ་བ་དང་འཛུལ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས་བའི་དུས་ཚོད་དང་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Adaptive Machine Translation purports to dynamically include user feedback to improve translation quality. In a post-editing scenario, user corrections of machine translation output are thus continuously incorporated into translation models, reducing or eliminating repetitive error editing and increasing the usefulness of automated translation. In neural machine translation, this goal may be achieved via online learning approaches, where network parameters are updated based on each new sample. This type of adaptation typically requires higher learning rates, which can affect the quality of the models over time. Alternatively, less aggressive online learning setups may preserve model stability, at the cost of reduced adaptation to user-generated corrections. In this work, we evaluate different online learning configurations over time, measuring their impact on user-generated samples, as well as separate in-domain and out-of-domain datasets. Results in two different domains indicate that mixed approaches combining online learning with periodic batch fine-tuning might be needed to balance the benefits of online learning with model stability.', 'pt': 'A tradução automática adaptável pretende incluir dinamicamente o feedback do usuário para melhorar a qualidade da tradução. Em um cenário de pós-edição, as correções do usuário da saída da tradução automática são continuamente incorporadas aos modelos de tradução, reduzindo ou eliminando a edição de erros repetitivos e aumentando a utilidade da tradução automática. Na tradução automática neural, esse objetivo pode ser alcançado por meio de abordagens de aprendizado online, onde os parâmetros da rede são atualizados com base em cada nova amostra. Esse tipo de adaptação normalmente requer maiores taxas de aprendizado, o que pode afetar a qualidade dos modelos ao longo do tempo. Alternativamente, configurações de aprendizado online menos agressivas podem preservar a estabilidade do modelo, ao custo de adaptação reduzida às correções geradas pelo usuário. Neste trabalho, avaliamos diferentes configurações de aprendizado online ao longo do tempo, medindo seu impacto em amostras geradas pelo usuário, bem como conjuntos de dados separados no domínio e fora do domínio. Os resultados em dois domínios diferentes indicam que abordagens mistas que combinam aprendizado online com ajustes periódicos em lote podem ser necessárias para equilibrar os benefícios do aprendizado online com a estabilidade do modelo.', 'ar': 'تهدف الترجمة الآلية التكيفية إلى تضمين ملاحظات المستخدم ديناميكيًا لتحسين جودة الترجمة. في سيناريو ما بعد التحرير ، يتم دمج تصحيحات المستخدم لمخرجات الترجمة الآلية بشكل مستمر في نماذج الترجمة ، مما يقلل أو يلغي تحرير الأخطاء المتكررة ويزيد من فائدة الترجمة الآلية. في الترجمة الآلية العصبية ، يمكن تحقيق هذا الهدف من خلال مناهج التعلم عبر الإنترنت ، حيث يتم تحديث معلمات الشبكة بناءً على كل عينة جديدة. يتطلب هذا النوع من التكيف عادةً معدلات تعلم أعلى ، والتي يمكن أن تؤثر على جودة النماذج بمرور الوقت. بدلاً من ذلك ، قد تحافظ إعدادات التعلم عبر الإنترنت الأقل شدة على استقرار النموذج ، على حساب تقليل التكيف مع التصحيحات التي ينشئها المستخدم. في هذا العمل ، نقوم بتقييم تكوينات التعلم عبر الإنترنت المختلفة بمرور الوقت ، وقياس تأثيرها على العينات التي ينشئها المستخدم ، وكذلك مجموعات البيانات المنفصلة داخل المجال وخارج النطاق. تشير النتائج في مجالين مختلفين إلى أن الأساليب المختلطة التي تجمع بين التعلم عبر الإنترنت والضبط الدقيق للدفعات الدورية قد تكون ضرورية لتحقيق التوازن بين فوائد التعلم عبر الإنترنت واستقرار النموذج.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique adaptative prétend inclure de manière dynamique les commentaires des utilisateurs afin d'améliorer la qualité de la traduction. Dans un scénario de post-édition, les corrections utilisateur des résultats de traduction automatique sont ainsi intégrées en permanence dans les modèles de traduction, ce qui réduit ou élimine les modifications d'erreurs répétitives et augmente l'utilité de la traduction automatisée. Dans la traduction automatique neuronale, cet objectif peut être atteint via des approches d'apprentissage en ligne, dans lesquelles les paramètres réseau sont mis à jour en fonction de chaque nouvel échantillon. Ce type d'adaptation nécessite généralement des taux d'apprentissage plus élevés, ce qui peut affecter la qualité des modèles au fil du temps. Par ailleurs, des configurations d'apprentissage en ligne moins agressives peuvent préserver la stabilité du modèle, au prix d'une adaptation réduite aux corrections générées par l'utilisateur. Dans ce travail, nous évaluons différentes configurations d'apprentissage en ligne au fil du temps, en mesurant leur impact sur les échantillons générés par les utilisateurs, ainsi que sur des ensembles de données distincts dans le domaine et hors domaine. Les résultats obtenus dans deux domaines différents indiquent que des approches mixtes combinant l'apprentissage en ligne et des ajustements périodiques par lots peuvent être nécessaires pour équilibrer les avantages de l'apprentissage en ligne et la stabilité du modèle.", 'es': 'La traducción automática adaptativa pretende incluir dinámicamente los comentarios de los usuarios para mejorar la calidad de la traducción. En un escenario posterior a la edición, las correcciones del usuario de la traducción automática se incorporan continuamente en los modelos de traducción, lo que reduce o elimina la edición repetitiva de errores y aumenta la utilidad de la traducción automática. En la traducción automática neuronal, este objetivo se puede lograr mediante enfoques de aprendizaje en línea, en los que los parámetros de red se actualizan en función de cada nueva muestra. Este tipo de adaptación normalmente requiere tasas de aprendizaje más altas, lo que puede afectar la calidad de los modelos a lo largo del tiempo. Alternativamente, las configuraciones de aprendizaje en línea menos agresivas pueden preservar la estabilidad del modelo, a costa de una menor adaptación a las correcciones generadas por el usuario. En este trabajo, evaluamos diferentes configuraciones de aprendizaje en línea a lo largo del tiempo, midiendo su impacto en las muestras generadas por los usuarios, así como en conjuntos de datos separados dentro y fuera del dominio. Los resultados en dos dominios diferentes indican que podrían ser necesarios enfoques mixtos que combinen el aprendizaje en línea con el ajuste periódico por lotes para equilibrar los beneficios del aprendizaje en línea con la estabilidad del modelo.', 'ja': '適応機械翻訳は、翻訳品質を向上させるためにユーザーのフィードバックを動的に含めることを目的としています。 したがって、ポストエディットシナリオでは、機械翻訳出力のユーザー修正が翻訳モデルに継続的に組み込まれ、繰り返しエラー編集を削減または排除し、自動翻訳の有用性を高めます。 ニューラルマシン翻訳では、この目標は、ネットワークパラメータが各新しいサンプルに基づいて更新されるオンライン学習アプローチを介して達成され得る。 このタイプの適応は通常、より高い学習率を必要とし、時間の経過とともにモデルの質に影響を与える可能性がある。 あるいは、あまり積極的でないオンライン学習設定は、ユーザが生成した補正への適応を低減する代償として、モデルの安定性を維持し得る。 この研究では、時間の経過とともに異なるオンライン学習構成を評価し、ユーザーが生成したサンプルへの影響を測定するとともに、別々のドメイン内およびドメイン外データセットを評価します。 2つの異なるドメインでの結果は、オンライン学習の利点とモデルの安定性のバランスをとるために、オンライン学習と定期的なバッチ微調整を組み合わせた混合アプローチが必要になるかもしれないことを示している。', 'zh': '自应机器翻译旨动含用户反馈以崇译质。 是以译后辑场中,用户机器翻译输者更入译模,以损益重复性非,增其自译之实用性。 神经机器翻译之中,可以在线学,网络参数因新样本而新之。 此应常须更高学习率,或随时推移。 不然,激进之在线学设可以持模稳定性,而代价减用户成之应也。 于此之中,估其异时在线学,量其用户生之样本,及独域域数集之渐。 两域之终表明,或将在线学与期会批量微调相合之法,以平在线学之利稳定性。', 'ru': 'Адаптивный машинный перевод направлен на динамическое включение отзывов пользователей для улучшения качества перевода. Таким образом, в сценарии постредактирования пользовательские исправления выходных данных машинного перевода непрерывно включаются в модели перевода, уменьшая или устраняя повторяющееся редактирование ошибок и повышая полезность автоматического перевода. В нейронном машинном переводе эта цель может быть достигнута с помощью подходов к онлайн-обучению, где сетевые параметры обновляются на основе каждой новой выборки. Этот тип адаптации обычно требует более высоких темпов обучения, что может повлиять на качество моделей с течением времени. В качестве альтернативы, менее агрессивные настройки онлайн-обучения могут сохранить стабильность модели, за счет снижения адаптации к пользовательским поправкам. В этой работе мы оцениваем различные конфигурации онлайн-обучения с течением времени, измеряя их влияние на пользовательские выборки, а также отдельные наборы данных в домене и вне домена. Результаты в двух различных областях показывают, что могут потребоваться смешанные подходы, сочетающие онлайн-обучение с периодической пакетной доработкой, чтобы сбалансировать преимущества онлайн-обучения со стабильностью модели.', 'hi': 'अनुकूली मशीन अनुवाद गतिशील रूप से अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता में सुधार करने के लिए उपयोगकर्ता प्रतिक्रिया को शामिल करने का इरादा रखता है। पोस्ट-एडिटिंग परिदृश्य में, मशीन अनुवाद आउटपुट के उपयोगकर्ता सुधारों को इस प्रकार अनुवाद मॉडल में लगातार शामिल किया जाता है, दोहराए जाने वाले त्रुटि संपादन को कम करने या समाप्त करने और स्वचालित अनुवाद की उपयोगिता को बढ़ाने के लिए। न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद में, इस लक्ष्य को ऑनलाइन सीखने के दृष्टिकोण के माध्यम से प्राप्त किया जा सकता है, जहां नेटवर्क पैरामीटर प्रत्येक नए नमूने के आधार पर अपडेट किए जाते हैं। इस प्रकार के अनुकूलन के लिए आमतौर पर उच्च सीखने की दर की आवश्यकता होती है, जो समय के साथ मॉडल की गुणवत्ता को प्रभावित कर सकती है। वैकल्पिक रूप से, कम आक्रामक ऑनलाइन लर्निंग सेटअप उपयोगकर्ता-जनित सुधारों के लिए कम अनुकूलन की कीमत पर, मॉडल स्थिरता को संरक्षित कर सकते हैं। इस काम में, हम समय के साथ विभिन्न ऑनलाइन लर्निंग कॉन्फ़िगरेशन का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, उपयोगकर्ता-जनित नमूनों पर उनके प्रभाव को मापते हैं, साथ ही साथ अलग-अलग इन-डोमेन और आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन डेटासेट भी। दो अलग-अलग डोमेन में परिणाम इंगित करते हैं कि आवधिक बैच फाइन-ट्यूनिंग के साथ ऑनलाइन सीखने के संयोजन वाले मिश्रित दृष्टिकोणों को मॉडल स्थिरता के साथ ऑनलाइन सीखने के लाभों को संतुलित करने की आवश्यकता हो सकती है।', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le hAistriúchán Meaisín Oiriúnaitheach aiseolas ó úsáideoirí a chur san áireamh go dinimiciúil chun cáilíocht an aistriúcháin a fheabhsú. I gcás iar-eagarthóireachta, déantar ceartúcháin úsáideoirí ar aschur meaisín-aistriúcháin a ionchorprú go leanúnach i múnlaí aistriúcháin, rud a laghdaíonn nó a chuireann deireadh le hearráidí athchleachtacha agus a mhéadaíonn úsáideacht an aistriúcháin uathoibrithe. I néaraistriúchán meaisín, féadfar an sprioc seo a bhaint amach trí chur chuige foghlama ar líne, ina ndéantar paraiméadair líonra a nuashonrú bunaithe ar gach sampla nua. De ghnáth teastaíonn rátaí foghlama níos airde den chineál seo oiriúnaithe, rud a d’fhéadfadh cur isteach ar cháilíocht na múnlaí le himeacht ama. De rogha air sin, d’fhéadfadh socruithe foghlama ar líne nach bhfuil chomh ionsaitheach sin cobhsaíocht na samhla a chaomhnú, ar chostas oiriúnaithe laghdaithe do cheartúcháin arna nginiúint ag úsáideoirí. San obair seo, déanaimid meastóireacht ar chumraíochtaí foghlama éagsúla ar líne le himeacht ama, ag tomhas a dtionchar ar shamplaí arna nginiúint ag úsáideoirí, chomh maith le tacair shonraí ar leith laistigh den fhearann agus lasmuigh den fhearann. Léiríonn torthaí in dhá réimse dhifriúla go bhféadfadh go mbeadh gá le cineálacha cur chuige measctha a chomhcheanglaíonn foghlaim ar líne le mionchoigeartú tréimhsiúil chun buntáistí na foghlama ar líne a chothromú le cobhsaíocht na samhla.', 'ka': 'Name შემდეგ რედაქტირების სენარიოში მაქინის გადაწყვეტის მომხმარებელი რედაქტირებები შემდეგ გადაწყვეტილების მოდელში მუშაობით, შემცირება ან გამოწმება შეცდომის რედაქტირებაში და ავტომატიური გადაწ ნეიროლური მაქინის გაგრძელებაში, ეს მიზეზი შეიძლება იქნება online learning approaches, სადაც ქსელის პარამეტრები ყველა ახალი მაგალითან ახალგაზრდება. ამ ტიპის ადაპტიფიკაციის შესაბამისი უფრო მეტი სწავლების სიმაღლე, რომელიც შეიძლება მოდელების კავილეტის შესახებ დროში. Alternatively, less aggressive online learning settings may preserve model stability, at the cost of reduced adaptation to user-generated corrections. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ განსხვავებული online learning კონფიგურაციების განსაზღვრება დროში, მათი გამოიყენებული მომხმარების მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა, და განსხვავებული დიომინში და გარეშე დიომინში. შემდეგ ორი განსხვავებული დიომენში მოჩვენება, რომ მოდელური სტაბილიტებით შეიძლება იგივე მოჭირდება, რომ მოდელური სტაბილიტებით გასწავლების გამოსახულებების შესაძლებლობად შეიძლება მორწ', 'el': 'Η προσαρμοστική μηχανική μετάφραση ισχυρίζεται ότι περιλαμβάνει δυναμικά σχόλια των χρηστών για τη βελτίωση της ποιότητας της μετάφρασης. Σε ένα σενάριο μετά την επεξεργασία, οι διορθώσεις των εξόδων μηχανικής μετάφρασης ενσωματώνονται συνεχώς στα μοντέλα μετάφρασης, μειώνοντας ή εξαλείφοντας την επαναλαμβανόμενη επεξεργασία σφαλμάτων και αυξάνοντας τη χρησιμότητα της αυτοματοποιημένης μετάφρασης. Στην νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση, ο στόχος αυτός μπορεί να επιτευχθεί μέσω διαδικτυακών προσεγγίσεων μάθησης, όπου οι παράμετροι του δικτύου ενημερώνονται με βάση κάθε νέο δείγμα. Αυτός ο τύπος προσαρμογής συνήθως απαιτεί υψηλότερα ποσοστά μάθησης, τα οποία μπορούν να επηρεάσουν την ποιότητα των μοντέλων με την πάροδο του χρόνου. Εναλλακτικά, λιγότερο επιθετικές διαδικτυακές ρυθμίσεις μάθησης μπορούν να διατηρήσουν τη σταθερότητα του μοντέλου, με κόστος μειωμένης προσαρμογής στις διορθώσεις που δημιουργούνται από τους χρήστες. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αξιολογούμε διαφορετικές διαμορφώσεις μάθησης στο διαδίκτυο με την πάροδο του χρόνου, μετρώντας τον αντίκτυπο τους σε δείγματα που παράγονται από τους χρήστες, καθώς και ξεχωριστά σύνολα δεδομένων εντός και εκτός τομέα. Τα αποτελέσματα σε δύο διαφορετικούς τομείς δείχνουν ότι οι μικτές προσεγγίσεις που συνδυάζουν τη διαδικτυακή μάθηση με την περιοδική ομαδική τελειοποίηση μπορεί να είναι απαραίτητες για να εξισορροπηθούν τα οφέλη της διαδικτυακής μάθησης με τη σταθερότητα του μοντέλου.', 'hu': 'Az Adaptive Machine Translation célja, hogy dinamikusan beépítse a felhasználói visszajelzéseket a fordítási minőség javítása érdekében. Az utólagos szerkesztési forgatókönyvben a gépi fordítás kimenetének felhasználói javításai így folyamatosan beépülnek a fordítási modellekbe, csökkentve vagy kiküszöbölve az ismétlődő hibaszerkesztést és növelve az automatizált fordítás hasznosságát. Az idegi gépi fordításban ez a cél online tanulási megközelítésekkel érhető el, ahol a hálózati paraméterek frissítése minden új minta alapján történik. Az ilyen típusú alkalmazkodás jellemzően magasabb tanulási arányt igényel, ami idővel befolyásolhatja a modellek minőségét. Alternatívaként a kevésbé agresszív online tanulási beállítások megőrizhetik a modellstabilitást, a felhasználók által generált korrekciókhoz való csökkentett alkalmazkodás árán. Ebben a munkában idővel értékeljük a különböző online tanulási konfigurációkat, mérjük a felhasználók által generált mintákra gyakorolt hatásukat, valamint külön domain belüli és domain kívüli adatkészleteket. Két különböző területen végzett eredmények azt mutatják, hogy az online tanulás és az időszakos köteges finomhangolás kombinációját kombináló vegyes megközelítésekre lehet szükség ahhoz, hogy az online tanulás előnyeit és a modellstabilitást egyensúlyozzák.', 'it': "Adaptive Machine Translation intende includere dinamicamente il feedback degli utenti per migliorare la qualità della traduzione. In uno scenario post-editing, le correzioni degli utenti dell'output della traduzione automatica sono quindi continuamente incorporate nei modelli di traduzione, riducendo o eliminando l'editing ripetitivo degli errori e aumentando l'utilità della traduzione automatica. Nella traduzione automatica neurale, questo obiettivo può essere raggiunto attraverso approcci di apprendimento online, in cui i parametri di rete vengono aggiornati in base a ogni nuovo campione. Questo tipo di adattamento richiede tipicamente tassi di apprendimento più elevati, che possono influenzare la qualità dei modelli nel tempo. In alternativa, configurazioni di apprendimento online meno aggressive possono preservare la stabilità del modello, a costo di un ridotto adattamento alle correzioni generate dagli utenti. In questo lavoro valutiamo nel tempo diverse configurazioni di apprendimento online, misurandone l'impatto sui campioni generati dagli utenti, oltre a set di dati separati in-domain e out-of-domain. I risultati ottenuti in due domini diversi indicano che potrebbero essere necessari approcci misti che combinano l'apprendimento online con la regolazione periodica dei lotti per bilanciare i benefici dell'apprendimento online con la stabilità del modello.", 'lt': 'Adaptavimo mašinų vertimo tikslai dinamiškai įtraukti naudotojo grįžtamąją informaciją vertimo kokybei gerinti. Taigi po redakcijos scenarijuje automatinio vertimo išvesties korekcijos vartotojams nuolat įtraukiamos į vertimo modelius, mažinant arba panaikinant pakartotinį klaidų redakciją ir didinant automatinio vertimo naudą. Vertant nervinius aparatus šis tikslas gali būti pasiektas naudojant internetinius mokymosi metodus, kuriuose tinklo parametrai atnaujinami remiantis kiekvienu nauju pavyzdžiu. Toks pritaikymas paprastai reikalauja aukštesnio mokymosi lygio, kuris gali turėti įtakos modelių kokybei laikui bėgant. Be to, mažiau agresyvios mokymosi internetu sistemos gali išlaikyti modelio stabilumą ir sumažinti prisitaikymą prie naudotojų sukeltų korekcijų. Šiame darbe laikui bėgant vertiname skirtingas mokymosi internetu konfigūracijas, vertiname jų poveikį naudotojų gautiems mėginiams, taip pat atskirus domeninius ir ne domeninius duomenų rinkinius. Iš dviejų skirtingų sričių gautų rezultatų matyti, kad siekiant suderinti internetinio mokymosi naudą su modelio stabilumu gali prireikti įvairių metodų, derinančių internetinį mokymąsi su periodiniu partijų patobulinimu.', 'kk': 'Компьютердің аудармаларының сапасын жақсарту үшін пайдаланушының қайталануын динамикалық түрде қолдануға мүмкіндік беру керек. Ескерту сценариясынан кейін, машинаның аудармалардың шығысын түзету үлгілеріне, қайталанатын қатені өзгерту және автоматты аудармалардың пайдаланушылығын өзгерту және өзгерту үлгілеріне енгізіледі. Невралдық компьютердің аудармасында, бұл мақсатты онлайн оқыту арқылы желік параметрлері әрбір жаңа үлгісіне негіздеп жаңартылады. Бұл адаптацияның түрі кәдімгі уақытта үлгілердің сапасына әсер етеді. Әйтпесе, онлайн оқыту баптаулары үлгілер дұрыстығын сақтауға мүмкін, пайдаланушының құрылған түзетулеріне көшірмелейтін адаптациялауының мәселесі. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, онлайн оқыту баптауларын уақыт бойынша, пайдаланушылардың құрылған үлгілеріне, доменде және доменде бөлек деректер жиындарына әсер етеді. Екі әртүрлі домендегі нәтижелер онлайн оқыту үшін онлайн оқыту үшін онлайн оқыту мүмкіндіктерінің артықшылығын балансировау үшін онлайн оқыту мүмкіндіктерінің артықшылығын балансировау ү', 'mk': 'Адаптивен машински превод има за цел динамично да вклучи реакција на корисникот за подобрување на квалитетот на преводот. Во постуредувачкиот сценарио корекциите на корисниците на машинскиот превод се континуирано вклучени во преводните модели, намалувајќи или елиминирајќи ги повторните грешки во уредувањето и зголемувајќи ја корисноста на автоматизираниот превод. Во преводот на невропските машини, оваа цел може да се постигне преку онлајн пристапи на учење, каде што мрежните параметри се ажурираат врз основа на секој нов примерок. Овој тип на адаптација обично бара повисоки стапки на учење, што може да влијае на квалитетот на моделите со текот на времето. Алтернативно, помалку агресивните онлајн наставувања за учење може да ја зачуваат стабилноста на моделот, за цена на намалена адаптација на корекциите генерирани од корисниците. Во оваа работа, ги проценуваме различните онлајн конфигурации на учење со текот на времето, мерејќи го нивното влијание на примероците генерирани од корисникот, како и одделни податоци во домен и надвор од домен. Резултатите во две различни домени покажуваат дека може да бидат потребни мешани пристапи кои комбинираат онлајн учење со периодично финетизирање на партиите за да се балансираат бенефициите од онлајн учењето со стабилноста на моделот.', 'ml': '@ info: whatsthis പിന്നീട് ചിട്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുശേഷം മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപൂട്ടിന്റെ ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200d തുടര്\u200dച്ചയായി ചേര്\u200dക്കു ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷയില്\u200d, ഈ ലക്ഷ്യം ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d മുഖേന പ്രാപിക്കുന്നതായിരിക്കാം, അവിടെ ന ഈ തരം അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d സാധാരണമായി കൂടുതല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഹേറ്റ് ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്, അത് സമയത്തിനുമുമ്പ് മോഡലുകളു Alternatively, less aggressive online learning setups may preserve model stability, at the cost of reduced adaptation to user-generated corrections.  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, സമയത്തിനുമുമ്പ് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ക്രമീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. ഉപയോക്താവ് സൃഷ്ടിച രണ്ടു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡോമെനുകളിലെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, മോഡല്\u200d സ്ഥിരമായി ഓണ്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മികച്ച വഴികള', 'no': 'Tilpassande maskineomsetjingspurport som dynamisk inneheld brukaren for å forbetra omsetjingskvalitet. I ein post- redigeringsscenario vert brukararkorregingar av maskineoversettelsutdata derfor kontinuerleg inkluderte i omsetjingsmodular, reduserer eller eliminerer gjentakelige feil ved redigering av og øker nyttigheten av automatisk oversettelse. I omsetjinga av neuralmaskinen kan dette målet oppnå ved å lære tilnærmingar på nettverket, der nettverksparametrar vert oppdatert basert på kvar ny prøve. Denne typen adaptasjonen krev vanlegvis høgare læringsrate, som kan påvirka kvaliteten på modelane over tid. Alternativ kan mindre aggressiv innstillingar for læring på nettverk beholde modellestabilitet, ved kostnad for redusert tilpassing til korrigeringar som er generert i brukaren. I dette arbeidet evaluerer vi ulike innstillingar for læring på nettverket over tid, og målar sine påvirkning på brukaren genererte prøver, også separe i domene og ut-domenedatasett. Resultat i to ulike domene tyder på at blandede tilnærmingar som kombinerer læring på nettverket med periodisk finnstilling av batch kan vera nødvendig for å balansera fordelene til læring på nettverket med modellestabilitet.', 'ms': 'Laporan Terjemahan Mesin Adaptif untuk termasuk balas balik pengguna secara dinamik untuk meningkatkan kualiti terjemahan. Dalam skenario pos-edisi, perbaikan pengguna output terjemahan mesin secara terus-menerus disertai ke dalam model terjemahan, mengurangi atau menghapuskan penyuntingan ralat berulang dan meningkatkan kegunaan terjemahan automatik. Dalam terjemahan mesin saraf, tujuan ini mungkin dicapai melalui pendekatan pembelajaran online, di mana parameter rangkaian dikemaskini berdasarkan setiap sampel baru. Jenis penyesuaian ini biasanya memerlukan kadar belajar yang lebih tinggi, yang boleh mempengaruhi kualiti model melalui masa. Alternatively, less aggressive online learning settings may preserve model stability, at the cost of reduced adaptation to user-generated corrections. In this work, we evaluate different online learning configurations over time, measuring their impact on user-generated samples, as well as separate in-domain and out-of-domain datasets.  Results in two different domains indicate that mixed approaches combining online learning with periodic batch fine-tuning might be needed to balance the benefits of online learning with model stability.', 'mn': 'Компьютерийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хувьд хэрэглэгчийн хөгжлийн хариу гаргах боломжтой. Дараагийн загварын хувилбарт машины орчуулалтын хэрэглэгчийн зөвхөн хөгжүүлэх загварууд үргэлж орчуулалт загварууд, давтамжлалтын алдаа загваруудыг багасгаж, устгаж, автоматжуулсан орчуулалтын хэрэгцээ нэмэгдүүл Энэ зорилго онлайн суралцах ойлголтын арга хэмжээнд шинэ жишээ бүр дээр шинэ сүлжээний параметрлүүд шинэчлэх боломжтой болно. Энэ төрлийн адилтгалыг ихэвчлэн өндөр суралцах хурдтай хэрэгтэй. Энэ нь загварын сайн чанарыг цаг хугацаанд нөлөөлж чадна. Эсвэл, онлайн суралцах сургалтын бага хүчирхэг байгууллагууд хэрэглэгчийн гаргасан зөв загварын үнэтэй багасгах загварын тогтвортой байдлыг хадгалах боломжтой. Энэ ажил дээр бид цаг хугацаанд олон онлайн суралцах загварыг үнэлдэг. Хэрэглэгчийн үйлдвэрлэгдсэн үлгээний нөлөөлөлийг хэмжээгээр, холбоотой холбоотой, холбоотой мэдээллийн загваруудыг өөр өөр өөр Харин хоёр өөр хэсэгт харагдаж байгаа зүйл нь онлайн суралцааны төвөгтэй ойлголт нь загварын тогтвортой тогтвортой онлайн суралцааны үр дагаварыг баланслахын тулд хэрэгтэй байж болно.', 'mt': 'L-iskopijiet tat-Traduzzjoni Adattiva tal-Magni biex jinkludi b’mod dinamiku r-rispons tal-utent biex itejjeb il-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni. F’xenarju ta’ wara l-edizzjoni, il-korrezzjonijiet tal-utent tal-output tat-traduzzjoni bil-magna huma għalhekk inkorporati kontinwament fil-mudelli tat-traduzzjoni, li jnaqqsu jew jeliminaw l-edizzjoni ta’ żbalji ripetittivi u jżidu l-utilità tat-traduzzjoni awtomatizzata. Fit-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali, dan l-għan jista’ jinkiseb permezz ta’ approċċi ta’ tagħlim onlajn, fejn il-parametri tan-netwerk jiġu aġġornati abbażi ta’ kull kampjun ġdid. Dan it-tip ta’ adattament tipikament jeħtieġ rati ogħla ta’ tagħlim, li jistgħu jaffettwaw il-kwalità tal-mudelli maż-żmien. Alternatively, less aggressive online learning setups may preserve model stability, at the cost of reduced adaptation to user-generated corrections.  F’dan ix-xogħol, aħna jevalwaw konfigurazzjonijiet differenti tat-tagħlim onlajn maż-żmien, billi tkejlu l-impatt tagħhom fuq kampjuni ġġenerati mill-utent, kif ukoll settijiet ta’ dejta separati fid-dominju u barra mid-dominju. Riżultati f’żewġ oqsma differenti jindikaw li jistgħu jkunu meħtieġa approċċi mħallta li jikkombinaw it-tagħlim onlajn ma’ aġġustament perjodiku tal-lott biex jibbilanċjaw il-benefiċċji tat-tagħlim onlajn mal-istabbiltà tal-mudell.', 'pl': 'Adaptive Machine Translation ma na celu dynamiczne uwzględnienie opinii użytkowników w celu poprawy jakości tłumaczenia. W scenariuszu post-edycyjnym korekty użytkowników wyników tłumaczenia maszynowego są zatem stale włączane do modeli tłumaczeń, zmniejszając lub eliminując powtarzalną edycję błędów i zwiększając użyteczność tłumaczenia automatycznego. W neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym cel ten można osiągnąć za pomocą podejść do uczenia się online, gdzie parametry sieci są aktualizowane na podstawie każdej nowej próby. Ten rodzaj adaptacji zazwyczaj wymaga wyższych wskaźników uczenia się, co może mieć wpływ na jakość modeli z biegiem czasu. Alternatywnie mniej agresywne konfiguracje nauki online mogą zachować stabilność modelu, kosztem zmniejszenia adaptacji do korekt generowanych przez użytkownika. W niniejszej pracy oceniamy różne konfiguracje uczenia się online w czasie, mierząc ich wpływ na próbki generowane przez użytkownika, a także oddzielne zbiory danych wewnątrz domeny i poza domeną. Wyniki w dwóch różnych dziedzinach wskazują, że w celu zrównoważenia korzyści płynących z uczenia się online ze stabilnością modelu potrzebne może być mieszane podejście łączące naukę online z okresowym dostosowaniem partii.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată adaptivă intenționează să includă dinamic feedback-ul utilizatorilor pentru a îmbunătăți calitatea traducerii. Într-un scenariu post-editare, corecțiile utilizatorilor ale rezultatelor traducerii automate sunt astfel încorporate continuu în modelele de traducere, reducând sau eliminând editarea repetitivă a erorilor și sporind utilitatea traducerii automate. În traducerea automată neurală, acest obiectiv poate fi atins prin abordări de învățare online, unde parametrii rețelei sunt actualizați pe baza fiecărui eșantion nou. Acest tip de adaptare necesită, de obicei, rate mai mari de învățare, care pot afecta calitatea modelelor în timp. Alternativ, setările de învățare online mai puțin agresive pot păstra stabilitatea modelului, cu costul reducerii adaptării la corecțiile generate de utilizatori. În această lucrare, evaluăm diferite configurații de învățare online în timp, măsurând impactul acestora asupra eșantioanelor generate de utilizatori, precum și seturi de date separate în domeniu și în afara domeniului. Rezultatele din două domenii diferite indică faptul că abordările mixte care combină învățarea online cu ajustarea fină periodică a loturilor ar putea fi necesare pentru a echilibra beneficiile învățării online cu stabilitatea modelului.', 'sr': 'Prilagođene pratnje za prevod mašine u dinamički uključuju povratak korisnika za poboljšanje kvalitete prevoda. U scenariju nakon redakcije korisničke korekcije rezultata prevoda mašine se tako stalno uključuju u modele prevoda, smanjuje ili eliminiše redakcije ponovnih grešaka i povećava korisnost automatskog prevoda. U prevodu neuralne mašine, ovaj cilj može biti postignut putem pristupa online učenja, gde se mrežni parametri aktualizuju na temelju svakog novog uzoraka. Ova vrsta adaptacije obično zahteva veće stope učenja, što može uticati na kvalitet modela tijekom vremena. Alternativno, manje agresivne online nastave za učenje mogu sačuvati model stabilnost, po troškovi smanjene adaptacije korisničkim korekcijama. U ovom poslu procjenjujemo različite konfiguracije online učenja tijekom vremena, mjerenje njihovog utjecaja na uzorke koji su stvorili korisnike, kao i odvojene u domenu i izvan domena podataka. Rezultati u dva različita domena ukazuju na to da bi mogli biti potrebni mješavi pristupi kombinacije internetskog učenja sa periodičnim finalizacijama serije kako bi balancirali koristi internetskog učenja s modelom stabilnošću.', 'so': "Tilmaamaha tarjumaadda ee Adaptive Machine si aad u dynamically u turjumto waxaa ku jira feedback isticmaalaha si uu u kordhiyo qiimaha turjumaadda. In a post-editing scenario, user corrections of machine translation output are thus continuously incorporated into translation models, reducing or eliminating repetitive error editing and increasing the usefulness of automated translation.  Waxbarashada shabakadda ee neurada ah waxaa lagu heli karaa qaababka lagu barto ee internetka, kaas oo lagu barbaariyey heerarka shabakadda oo lagu saleynayo sameyn kasta oo cusub. Sida caadiga ah waxaa loo baahan yahay qiimaha waxbarashada sare, taas oo saameyn ku yeelan kara qiimaha modellada waqtiga dheer. Inta kale waxaa laga yaabaa in kooxaha waxbarashada ee iskuulka ka yar ee internetka lagu barto uu ilaaliyo qallafsanaanshaha modellka, kharashka lagaga dhigo hagitaanka isticmaalka. Markaas waxan ayaannu qiimeynaynaa koonfureed waxbarasho oo kala duduwan waqtiga dheer, si aan u qiyaasno saameyntooda samooyinka isticmaalayaasha, sidoo kale gooni ahaanshaha internetka iyo samooyinka macluumaadka ee domain-ka. Dhacdooyinka labada meelood oo kala duduwan waxay ka muuqan karaan in iskuullada internetka lagu xiriirayo oo la xiriira barashada iyo bandhigyada cayimanta ah ee waqtiga joogtada ah loola baahan yahay in la balansiyo faa'iidada barashada internetka ee ku saabsan stabilnaanta modellka.", 'ta': 'Name பின்தொகுப்பு திருத்தும் காட்சியில், இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு வெளியீட்டின் பயனர் திருத்தம் தொடர்ந்து மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரிகளாக உள்ளடக்கப் புதிய கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பில், ஒவ்வொரு புதிய மாதிரியை அடிப்படையில் பிணைய அளபுருக்கள் புதிய முறைமையில் புதுப்பிக்கப இந்த வகையான ஒதுக்கீடு வழக்கமாக மேலும் நேரத்தில் மாதிரிகளின் தரம் பாதிக்கலாம். மாற்றாக, குறைந்த தேவையான மாதிரியான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் அமைப்புகள் மாதிரி நிலையைப் பாதுகாக்கலாம், பயனர் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட த இந்த வேலையில், நாம் நேரத்திற்கு மேல் வேறு வித்தியாசமான கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் வடிவமைப்புகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், பயனர் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள்  Results in two different domains indicate that mixed approaches combining online learning with periodic batch fine-tuning might be needed to balance the benefits of online learning with model stability.', 'si': 'පරිවර්තනය විශේෂතාවක් වැඩ කරන්න භාවිතාකාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න. පස්ස- සංපාදනය සිනාරියෝ වලින්, පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක් න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාව, මේ අරක්ෂණය අන්තර්ජාලයේ ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට, ජාලය ප්\u200dරමාණය අවස්ථ මේ වර්ගයක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා, ඒකෙන් වෙලාවෙන් මොඩේලන්ගේ වර්ගය ප්\u200d වෙනස්ථානයෙන්, අඩුවෙන් අන්තර්ජාතික ඉගෙන ගන්න සැකසුම් ප්\u200dරමාණය ස්ථිරතාවක් ආරක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන්, ප්\u200dර මේ වැඩේ අපි වෙනස් ඇන්ලයින් ඉගෙන ගන්න විදිහට පරීක්ෂණයක් වෙනස් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, ඔවුන්ගේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරභාවිත විද වෙනස් ඩෝමේන් දෙකට ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා තියෙනවා කියලා ඇන්ලයින් ඉගෙනගන්න අවස්ථාවක් සමග සංවිධා', 'ur': 'مشین ترجمہ پورپورٹ کے ساتھ اڈپٹیٹ میسین ترجمہ پورپورٹ ڈینامی کے ساتھ کارساز فیڈبک شامل ہوتے ہیں ترجمہ کیلوٹ کے ساتھ۔ پیسٹ ویڈینگ سیناریو میں، ماشین ترجمہ آوتپٹ کے کارساز اصلاح اس طرح ہمیشہ ترجمہ موڈل میں شامل ہوتے ہیں، دوبارہ تغییر یا دوبارہ تغییر یا مٹا دیتے ہیں اور اپنی ترجمہ کے فائدہ اضافہ کرتے ہیں. نیورال ماشین کی ترجمہ میں، یہ موقعہ آنلاین کی تعلیم کے مطابق پہنچ سکتا ہے، جہاں نیورک پارامیٹر ہر نئی نمبر پر آدٹر کی جاتی ہیں. اس طرح کی اضافہ معمولاً زیادہ تعلیم کے درجے کی ضرورت ہے، جو مدلوں کی کیفیت پر زمانہ کے لئے اثر کر سکتا ہے. اور بدلہ سے، کم گرسنگی آنلاین یادگیری سیکھنے کے ساتھ مدل ثابت کی حفاظت کرسکتی ہے، کارساز کے پیدا کئے ہوئے اصلاح کے مطابق کم ترتیب کے مطابق۔ ہم اس کام میں مختلف آنلاین کی تعلیم کی سازمانوں کا ارزش کرتے ہیں، ان کے اثر کارساز کے پیدا کئے ہوئے نمونے پر اندازہ لیتے ہیں، اور ڈومین میں مختلف اور ڈومین کے خارج ڈیٹسٹ میں مختلف ہیں. دو مختلف ڈومین کے نتائج نشان دیتے ہیں کہ موڈل ثابت کے ساتھ آنلاین کی تعلیم کو ترکیب کرنے کے لئے مختلف طریقے کے مطابق موجود ہیں۔', 'sv': 'Adaptive Machine Translation syftar till att dynamiskt inkludera användarfeedback för att förbättra översättningskvaliteten. I ett efterredigeringsscenario införlivas därför användarkorrigeringar av maskinöversättning kontinuerligt i översättningsmodeller, vilket minskar eller eliminerar repetitiv felredigering och ökar användbarheten av automatiserad översättning. Inom neural maskinöversättning kan detta mål uppnås genom onlineinlärningsmetoder, där nätverksparametrarna uppdateras baserat på varje nytt prov. Denna typ av anpassning kräver vanligtvis högre inlärningsgrad, vilket kan påverka kvaliteten på modellerna över tid. Alternativt kan mindre aggressiva onlineinlärningsinställningar bevara modellstabiliteten, på bekostnad av minskad anpassning till användargenererade korrigeringar. I detta arbete utvärderar vi olika onlineinlärningskonfigurationer över tid och mäter deras påverkan på användargenererade prover samt separata in- och out-of-domain dataset. Resultat från två olika domäner indikerar att blandade tillvägagångssätt som kombinerar online-lärande med periodisk batch finjustering kan behövas för att balansera fördelarna med online-lärande med modellstabilitet.', 'vi': 'Dịch cỗ máy thích nghi có mục đích bao gồm từ người dùng phản hồi để cải thiện chất lượng dịch. Theo kịch bản sau phiên bản, các sửa chữa phiên bản dịch máy sẽ được tiếp tục nhập vào các mô hình dịch, giảm hay loại bỏ việc sửa lỗi lặp lại và tăng thêm sự hữu dụng của phiên dịch tự động. Trong phiên dịch máy thần kinh, mục tiêu này có thể được đạt qua các phương pháp học trực tuyến, nơi các thông số mạng được cập nhật dựa trên mỗi mẫu mới. Kiểu sửa đổi này thường đòi hỏi tỉ lệ học cao hơn, có thể ảnh hưởng đến chất lượng của mô-đun theo thời gian. Thay vào đó, cài đặt học trực tuyến ít hung hăng có thể bảo vệ sự ổn định của mô-đun bằng cách thích nghi với các sửa chữa do người dùng tạo ra. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đánh giá các cấu hình học trực tuyến khác nhau qua thời gian, đo lường tác động của chúng lên các mẫu người dùng, cũng như các tập tin riêng trong và ngoài miền. Kết quả trong hai khu vực khác nhau cho thấy khả năng kết hợp học trực tuyến với việc sản xuất hàng loạt đều có thể cần thiết để cân bằng lợi ích học trực tuyến với ổn định mô hình.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis In neural machine translation, this goal may be achieved via online learning approaches, where network parameters are updated based on each new sample.  Ushbu tugmalar tartibi odatda o'rganish foizlari kerak, bu modellarning sifatini ko'proq vaqtdan foydalanishi mumkin. Alternativ, tarmoq o'rganish o'rganish moslamalari modelni stabilishni saqlab qolishi mumkin, foydalanuvchi yaratilgan to ʻgʻri taʼminlovchiga kamaytirish qiymatida. Bu ishda biz har xil vaqtda o'rganish uchun boshqa o'rganish moslamalarini qiymatimiz, foydalanuvchi yaratilgan misollarning muammolari va domen va domen maʼlumotlar tarkibini o'zgartirishimiz mumkin. Ikki xil domenadagi natijalar bilan bir xil o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganish uchun bir qanchalik o'rganishni o'rganish kerak. Online o'rganishning foydalanishi model stabiliyati bilan o'rganish imkoniyatlarini birlashtirish kerak.", 'hr': 'Prilagodite pratnje za prevod strojeva dinamički uključuju povratak korisnika kako bi se poboljšala kvalitet prevoda. U scenariju nakon redakcije korisničke korekcije proizvoda prevođenja strojeva stoga se stalno uključuju u modele prevođenja, smanjenje ili eliminiranje redakcije ponovnih grešaka i povećanje korisnosti automatskog prevođenja. U prevodu neuralnih strojeva, ovaj cilj se može postići putem pristupa online učenja, gdje se mrežni parametri aktualizuju na temelju svakog novog uzoraka. Ovaj tip adaptacije obično zahtijeva višu stopu učenja, što može utjecati na kvalitet modela tijekom vremena. Alternativno, manje agresivne nastave online učenja mogu sačuvati stabilnost modela na troškovi smanjene prilagodbe korisnicima. U ovom poslu procjenjujemo različite konfiguracije online učenja tijekom vremena, mjerenje njihovog utjecaja na uzorke koji su proizvedeni korisnicima, kao i odvojeno u domenu i izvan domena podataka. Rezultati u dvije različite domene ukazuju na to da bi mogli biti potrebni mješavi pristupi kombiniranjem online učenja s periodičnim finaliziranjem serije kako bi se balancirali koristi online učenja s modelom stabilnošću.', 'bg': 'Адаптивният машинен превод се стреми динамично да включва обратна връзка от потребителите, за да подобри качеството на превода. По този начин в сценарий след редактиране корекциите на изхода от машинния превод от потребителя непрекъснато се включват в моделите на превод, намалявайки или елиминирайки повтарящите се грешки при редактирането и увеличавайки полезността на автоматизирания превод. В невронния машинен превод тази цел може да бъде постигната чрез онлайн учебни подходи, при които мрежовите параметри се актуализират въз основа на всяка нова извадка. Този тип адаптация обикновено изисква по-високи нива на обучение, което може да повлияе на качеството на моделите с течение на времето. Алтернативно, по-малко агресивни настройки за онлайн обучение могат да запазят стабилността на модела за сметка на намалената адаптация към генерирани от потребителите корекции. В тази работа оценяваме различни конфигурации на онлайн обучение с течение на времето, измервайки тяхното въздействие върху генерирани от потребителите образци, както и отделни домейнни и извъндомейнни набори от данни. Резултатите в две различни области показват, че смесени подходи, съчетаващи онлайн обучение с периодично фина настройка на партидите, може да са необходими за балансиране на ползите от онлайн ученето със стабилността на модела.', 'da': 'Adaptive Machine Translation sigter mod dynamisk at inkludere brugerfeedback for at forbedre oversættelseskvaliteten. I et efterredigeringsscenario indarbejdes brugerrettelser af maskinoversættelsesprodukter således løbende i oversættelsesmodeller, hvilket reducerer eller eliminerer gentagne fejlredigeringer og øger nytten af automatiseret oversættelse. I neural maskinoversættelse kan dette mål opnås via online læringsmetoder, hvor netværksparametre opdateres baseret på hver ny prøve. Denne type tilpasning kræver typisk højere læringsrate, hvilket kan påvirke kvaliteten af modellerne over tid. Alternativt kan mindre aggressive online læringsopsætninger bevare modelstabiliteten på bekostning af reduceret tilpasning til brugergenererede korrektioner. I dette arbejde evaluerer vi forskellige online læringskonfigurationer over tid og måler deres indflydelse på brugergenererede prøver samt separate in-domæne og out-of-domæne datasæt. Resultater fra to forskellige domæner indikerer, at blandede tilgange, der kombinerer online læring med periodisk batch finjustering, kan være nødvendige for at balancere fordelene ved online læring med modelstabilitet.', 'nl': 'Adaptive Machine Translation probeert gebruikersfeedback dynamisch op te nemen om de vertaalkwaliteit te verbeteren. In een post-editing scenario worden gebruikerscorrecties van machinevertaaloutput dus continu opgenomen in vertaalmodellen, waardoor repetitieve foutbewerking wordt verminderd of geëlimineerd en het nut van geautomatiseerde vertaling wordt vergroot. Bij neurale machinevertaling kan dit doel worden bereikt via online leerbenaderingen, waarbij netwerkparameters worden bijgewerkt op basis van elke nieuwe steekproef. Dit type aanpassing vereist doorgaans hogere leerpercentages, wat de kwaliteit van de modellen in de loop van de tijd kan beïnvloeden. Als alternatief kunnen minder agressieve online leeropstellingen de stabiliteit van het model behouden, ten koste van minder aanpassing aan door de gebruiker gegenereerde correcties. In dit werk evalueren we verschillende online leerconfiguraties in de loop van de tijd, waarbij we hun impact meten op door gebruikers gegenereerde samples, evenals afzonderlijke in-domein en out-of-domein datasets. Resultaten in twee verschillende domeinen wijzen erop dat gemengde benaderingen die online leren combineren met periodieke batch finetuning nodig kunnen zijn om de voordelen van online leren in evenwicht te brengen met modelstabiliteit.', 'de': 'Adaptive Machine Translation zielt darauf ab, Benutzerfeedback dynamisch einzubeziehen, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern. In einem Post-Editing-Szenario werden Benutzerkorrekturen der maschinellen Übersetzungsausgabe so kontinuierlich in Übersetzungsmodelle integriert, wodurch wiederholte Fehlerbearbeitung reduziert oder eliminiert wird und die Nützlichkeit der automatisierten Übersetzung erhöht wird. In der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung kann dieses Ziel durch Online-Lernansätze erreicht werden, bei denen Netzwerkparameter basierend auf jeder neuen Stichprobe aktualisiert werden. Diese Art der Anpassung erfordert in der Regel höhere Lernraten, die sich im Laufe der Zeit auf die Qualität der Modelle auswirken können. Alternativ können weniger aggressive Online-Lern-Setups die Modellstabilität auf Kosten einer reduzierten Anpassung an benutzergenerierte Korrekturen bewahren. In dieser Arbeit evaluieren wir verschiedene Online-Lernkonfigurationen im Zeitverlauf und messen deren Auswirkungen auf nutzergenerierte Stichproben sowie getrennte In-Domain- und Out-of-Domain-Datensätze. Ergebnisse in zwei verschiedenen Bereichen deuten darauf hin, dass gemischte Ansätze erforderlich sein könnten, die Online-Lernen mit periodischer Batch-Feinabstimmung kombinieren, um die Vorteile des Online-Lernens mit Modellstabilität auszugleichen.', 'id': 'Adaptif Machine Translation purport untuk dinamik termasuk feedback pengguna untuk meningkatkan kualitas terjemahan. Dalam skenario setelah penyuntingan, koreksi pengguna dari output terjemahan mesin secara terus-menerus didalam model terjemahan, mengurangi atau menghapuskan penyuntingan kesalahan ulang dan meningkatkan kegunaan terjemahan otomatis. Dalam terjemahan mesin saraf, tujuan ini mungkin dicapai melalui pendekatan belajar online, di mana parameter jaringan diperbaiki berdasarkan setiap sampel baru. Tipe adaptasi ini biasanya membutuhkan tingkat belajar yang lebih tinggi, yang dapat mempengaruhi kualitas model melalui waktu. Alternatively, less aggressive online learning setups may preserve model stability, at the cost of reduced adaptation to user-generated corrections. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengevaluasi konfigurasi belajar online yang berbeda sepanjang waktu, mengukur dampak mereka pada sampel yang dihasilkan oleh pengguna, serta dataset terpisah dalam domain dan luar domain. Hasil dalam dua domain yang berbeda menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan campuran yang menggabungkan belajar online dengan penyesuaian periodik batch mungkin diperlukan untuk menyeimbangkan keuntungan belajar online dengan stabilitas model.', 'sw': 'Kifaa cha Tafsiri cha Kifaa cha Adaptive (Machine) kinachotarajiwa kuwa na umuhimu ikiwa ni pamoja na mwitikio wa mtumiaji ili kuboresha kiwango cha tafsiri. Katika kituo cha baada ya kuhariri, uharibifu wa matumizi ya utafsiri wa mashine unaendelea kuingizwa katika mifano ya kutafsiri, kupunguza au kuondoa uhariri wa makosa ya mara kwa mara na kuongeza matumizi ya tafsiri ya kujitegemea. Katika tafsiri ya mashine ya kijamii, lengo hili linaweza kufanikiwa kupitia njia za kujifunza mtandaoni, ambapo parameters mpya za mitandao zinapatikana kwa kutumia kila sampuli mpya. aina hii ya kuboresha kwa kawaida inahitaji kiwango kikubwa cha kujifunza, ambacho kinaweza kuathiri ubora wa mifano kwa muda. mbadala, vikosi vingi vya kujifunza mtandaoni vya kibaguzi vinaweza kuhifadhi utulivu wa model, kwa gharama ya kupunguza mabadiliko ya mabadiliko yanayozaliwa kwa watumiaji. Katika kazi hii, tunatathmini maendeleo tofauti ya kujifunza mtandaoni kwa muda mrefu, wakipima athari zao kwenye sampuli zilizotengenezwa kwa watumiaji, pamoja na kutengana kwa ndani na seti za data za ndani. Matokeo katika maeneo mawili tofauti yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu tofauti za kujifunza mtandaoni zinazochanganya na kujifunza kwa mfumo wa kawaida unaweza kuhitajika ili kulinganisha faida za kujifunza mtandaoni kwa utulivu wa model.', 'ko': '자동 적응 기계 번역은 사용자의 피드백을 동태적으로 포함하여 번역의 질을 향상시키는 데 목적을 둔다.편집된 장면에서 기계 번역과 출력의 사용자 수정은 번역 모델에 끊임없이 포함되고 중복된 오류 편집을 감소하거나 제거하며 자동 번역의 유용성을 증가시킨다.신경기계번역에서 이 목표는 온라인 학습 방법을 통해 실현할 수 있고 온라인 학습 방법은 모든 새로운 견본에 따라 네트워크 파라미터를 업데이트할 수 있다.이런 유형의 적응은 통상적으로 더욱 높은 학습률을 필요로 하는데 시간의 추이에 따라 모델의 질에 영향을 줄 수 있다.또는 그렇게 급진적이지 않은 온라인 학습 설정은 모델의 안정성을 유지할 수 있지만 그 대가로 사용자가 생성한 정정에 대한 적응성을 줄일 수 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 서로 다른 온라인 학습 설정이 시간에 따라 변화하는 것을 평가하고 사용자가 샘플을 생성하는 데 미치는 영향과 독립된 역내와 역외 데이터 집합을 측정했다.두 분야의 결과에 따르면 온라인 학습과 주기적인 대량 변조를 결합한 혼합 방법으로 온라인 학습의 장점과 모델 안정성을 균형 있게 해야 할 것으로 보인다.', 'sq': 'Adaptive Machine Translation synon të përfshijë dinamikisht feedback të përdoruesit për të përmirësuar cilësinë e përkthimit. Në një skenar pas redigimit, korreksionet e përdoruesve të daljes së përkthimit të makinës janë kështu përfshirë vazhdimisht në modelet e përkthimit, duke reduktuar apo eleminuar gabimet e përsëritura të redigimit dhe duke rritur përdorueshmërinë e përkthimit automatik. Në përkthimin nervor të makinave, ky qëllim mund të arrihet nëpërmjet metodave të mësimit online, ku parametrat e rrjetit përditësohen bazuar në çdo mostër të ri. Ky lloj adaptimi tipikisht kërkon norma më të larta mësimi, që mund të ndikojë në cilësinë e modeleve gjatë kohës. Alternatively, less aggressive online learning setups may preserve model stability, at the cost of reduced adaptation to user-generated corrections. Në këtë punë, ne vlerësojmë konfigurimet e ndryshme të mësimit online gjatë kohës, duke matur ndikimin e tyre në mostrat e gjeneruara nga përdoruesit, si dhe të dhënat e ndara në domeni dhe jashtë domeni. Rezultatet në dy fusha të ndryshme tregojnë se metodat e përziera që kombinojnë mësimin në internet me rregullimin periodik të partive mund të jenë të nevojshme për të ekuilibruar përfitimet e mësimit në internet me stabilitetin e modelit.', 'tr': 'Ullançy terjime etmek üçin dynamik terjime etmek üçin nusgasyny görkez. Taýdan Edit senaryýasynda maşynyň terjime edilen çykyşynyň üýtgewleri hemişe terjime modellerine dahil edildi, gaýtalanany faýllary editlemek we otomatik terjime etmek üçin ullanýar. Näyral maşynyň terjimesinde, bu maksady online öwrenmek golaýlaryndan ýetip biler, nirede şeýle parameterleri her täze öräne daýanýar. Bu ýagdaý adaptasy adatça ýokary ukyp derejesi gerek, bu nusgalaryň häsiýetini wagtyň üstünde täsirleýär. Üýtgeşikde, online öwrenme düzümleri iň az agressiv süýtgewler ahmal edip, ullançy tarapyndan düşürilen düzeltmelere süýtgedip biler. Bu işde, zamanda farklı internet öwrenme yapılandırmalarını değerlendiririz. Kullanıcı üretilen örneklerine etkisini ölçüp, domenin ve out-of-domain veri setirlerine ayrı. Näme üçin iki dürli sahyda bolan netijeler online öwrenmegi periyodik topar bilen birleşdirmek üçin karışık golaýlaryň modal stabilitýa bilen online öwrenmeniň faydalaryny çykarmak üçin gerekli bolmagyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Aangepas Masjien Vertaling-pos na dynamiese gebruiker terugvoer om vertaling-kwaliteit te verbeter. In 'n post- redigeering scenario word gebruiker korreksies van masjien vertaling uitvoer so voortdurend ingesluit in vertaling modele, reduseer of elimineer herhaalde fout redigeer en vermeerder die gebruikerheid van outomatiese vertaling. In neurale masjien vertaling, is hierdie doel dalk bereik deur aanlyn leer toegang, waar netwerk parameters opgedateer word gebaseer op elke nuwe voorbeeld. Hierdie tipe aanpassing benodig tipes hoër leer tempo, wat kan invloek die kwaliteit van die modele oor tyd. Alternatiewe, minder aggressive online leerinstellings kan model stabiliteit bewaar, op die koste van verduur aanpassing na gebruiker genereerde korreksies. In hierdie werk, ons evalueer verskillende aanlyn leer konfigurasies oor tyd, met die gemeet van hul invloek op gebruiker genereerde voorbeelde, as ook aparte in-domein en uit-domein datastelle. Resultate in twee verskillende domeine aandui dat gemengde toegange aanlyn leer kombinieer met periodiese batch fintuning dalk benodig kan word om die voordele van online leer te balanse met model stabiliteit.", 'fa': 'پارپورتهای ترجمه ماشین مناسب برای تغییر دادن به عنوان تغییر دادن کاربر برای بهتر کیفیت ترجمه شامل می\u200cشود. در یک سناریو بعد از ویرایش، اصلاح کاربر از خروج ترجمه ماشین همیشه در مدل ترجمه، کاهش یا پاک کردن خطای تکرار و افزایش کاربردی ترجمه\u200cهای خودکار است. در ترجمه ماشین عصبی، این هدف ممکن است از طریق رسیدن به یادگیری آنلاین رسیده شود، جایی که پارامترهای شبکه بر اساس هر نمونه جدید آغاز می شوند. این نوع تغییرات معمولاً میزان یادگیری بالاتر نیاز دارد که می تواند کیفیت مدل را در طول زمان تأثیر دهد. در عوض، تنظیمات یادگیری آنلاین کمتر حمله\u200cکننده می\u200cتواند ثابت مدل را محافظت کند، با هزینه تغییر کاهش دادن به اصلاح\u200cهای تولید شده از کاربر. در این کار، ما پیکربندی\u200cهای یادگیری آنلاین متفاوت را در طول زمان ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، تاثیر آنها را بر نمونه\u200cهای ساخته شده از کاربر، همچنین در دامنه\u200cهای متفاوت و خارج از دامنه\u200cهای دومین اندازه می\u200cگیریم. نتیجه\u200cهای دو دامنه مختلف نشان می\u200cدهد که روش\u200cهای مختلف پیوند یادگیری آنلاین با تنظیم مجموعه\u200cهای عمومی برای تعادل منافع یادگیری آنلاین با استواری مدل نیاز دارد.', 'am': 'መግለጫ በpost-edit scenario, user corrections of machine translation models are so continually incorporated into translation models, reducing or eliminating recurrence error editing and increasing the useful use of automatically translation. በኔውራዊ መሣሪያን ትርጉም፣ ይህ goal በየአዲስ ምሳሌ በመጠቀም የመረጃ ምርጫዎች ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ ይሄ ዓይነት አቀማመጥ በተለየ ጊዜ ይጨመር ዘንድ የሚችል የትምህርት ቁጥር ይሻላል፡፡ በተለይ፣ የበረታች የኢንተርኔት ትምህርት ግንኙነቶች የሞዴል ድካማነት እንዲጠብቅ ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ በተለየ መረብ ትምህርት ምርጫዎችን ለጊዜው እናሳውቃለን፡፡ Results in two different domains indicate that mixed approaches combining online learning with periodic batch fine-tuning might be needed to balance the benefits of online learning with model stability.', 'hy': 'Ադապտիվ մեքենայի թարգմանման նպատակն է դինամիկ ներառել օգտագործողի արձագանքը թարգմանման որակի բարելավման համար: Այսպիսով, մեքենայի թարգմանման արտադրության հետխմբագրման սցենարիայում օգտագործողների կարգավորումները շարունակաբար ներառվում են թարգմանման մոդելների մեջ, նվազեցնելով կամ վերացնելով կրկնվող սխալներ խմբագրելը և աճելով ավտոմատի Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման դեպքում այս նպատակը կարող է հասնել առցանց ուսուցման մոտեցումների միջոցով, որտեղ ցանցի պարամետրերը վերականգնվում են յուրաքանչյուր նոր նմուշի վրա: Այս տեսակի ադապտացիան սովորաբար պահանջում է ավելի բարձր ուսուցման արագություններ, որոնք կարող են ազդել մոդելների որակի վրա ժամանակի ընթացքում: Alternatively, less aggressive online learning setups may preserve model stability, at the cost of reduced adaptation to user-generated corrections.  Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք գնահատում ենք տարբեր ինտերնետային ուսումնասիրության կառուցվածքները ժամանակի ընթացքում, չափում ենք նրանց ազդեցությունը օգտագործողների կողմից ստեղծված նմուշների վրա, ինչպես նաև առանձին տիեզերքում և տիեզերքում բացառո Արդյունքները երկու տարբեր ոլորտներում ցույց են տալիս, որ առցանց ուսումնասիրությունը համադրելու խառնաշփոթ մոտեցումներ կարող են անհրաժեշտ լինել, որպեսզի առցանց ուսումնասիրության առավելությունները հավասարակշռվի մոդելի կայուն', 'az': 'Tərcümə keyfiyyətini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün istifadəçilərin reaksiyasını dinamik olaraq daxil etmək üçün maşın tərcümə purportları uyğunlaşdırır. Əvvəlcə düzəltmə senaryosunda maşın çeviri çıxışının istifadəçi düzəltməsi, bu səbəbdə təkrarlama modellerinə daxil olunur, təkrarlama və təkrarlama xətasını düzəltmək və avtomatik təkrarlama faydalanılığını artırar. Nəyral maşın çevirində, bu məqsəd online öyrənmə yaxınlıqları vasitəsilə başarılanabilir. Ağ parametrləri hər yeni nümunə görə yenilənir. Bu tür adaptasiya genellikle daha yüksək öyrənmə dərəcələri lazımdır, ki modellərin keyfiyyətinə müvafiq olar. Alternativ olaraq, daha az agresif online öyrənmə qurğuları, istifadəçilərin yaratdığı düzelmələrə düşürülmüş uyğunlaşdırmaların müqabilində modellərin istiqamətlığını qoruya bilər. Bu işdə müxtəlif online öyrənmə yapılandırmalarını zaman boyunca değerlendiririk, istifadəçilərin yaratdığı nümunələrə təsirlərini ölçürük, domena və domena veri qurularına ayrı-ayrı təsirlərini ölçürük. İki fərqli domenin sonuçları belə göstərir ki, online öyrənməsini periyodik batch fin-tuning ilə birləşdirmək üçün onlayn öyrənməsinin faydalarını modellə istiqamətlə çəkmək üçün müxtəlif fikirləri olar.', 'ca': "La traducció adaptativa de màquines pretend incloure dinàmicament el feedback dels usuaris per millorar la qualitat de la traducció. En un escenari posterior a l'edició, les correccions d'usuari de la traducció màquina s'incorporan continuament en models de traducció, reduint o eliminant errors repetitius d'edició i augmentant l'utilitat de la traducció automatitzada. En la traducció neuromàquina, aquest objectiu es pot aconseguir a través d'enfocaments d'aprenentatge en línia, on els paràmetres de xarxa es actualitzen basant-se en cada nova mostra. Aquest tipus d'adaptació normalment requereix nivells d'aprenentatge més alts, que poden afectar la qualitat dels models amb el temps. Alternativament, configuracions d'aprenentatge en línia menys agressives poden preservar l'estabilitat del model, al cost de reduir l'adaptació a les correccions generades pels usuaris. In this work, we evaluate different online learning configurations over time, measuring their impact on user-generated samples, as well as separate in-domain and out-of-domain datasets.  Els resultats en dos dominys diferents indican que es podrien necessitar enfocaments mixtes combinant l'aprenentatge en línia amb ajustes periòdics de lots per equilibrar els beneficis de l'aprenentatge en línia amb l'estabilitat del model.", 'bs': 'Prilagođene pratnje za prevod strojeva dinamički uključuju povratak korisnika kako bi poboljšala kvalitet prevoda. U scenariju nakon redakcije, korisnice korisnika proizvoda prevođenja strojeva se tako stalno uključuju u modele prevođenja, smanjenje ili eliminisanje redakcije ponovnih grešaka i povećanje korisnosti automatskog prevođenja. U prevodu neuralnih strojeva, ovaj cilj se može postići putem pristupa online učenja, gdje se mrežni parametri aktualizuju na temelju svakog novog uzoraka. Ovaj tip adaptacije obično zahtijeva višu stopu učenja, koja može utjecati na kvalitet modela tijekom vremena. Alternativno, manje agresivne online nastave za učenje mogu sačuvati stabilnost modela, po troškovi smanjene adaptacije korištenih korisnika. U ovom poslu procjenjujemo različite konfiguracije online učenja tijekom vremena, mjerenje njihovog utjecaja na uzorke koji su proizvedeni korisnicima, kao i odvojeno u domenu i izvan domena podataka. Rezultati u dva različita domena ukazuju na to da bi mogli biti potrebni mješavi pristupi kombinacije internetskog učenja sa periodičnim finalizacijama serije kako bi balancirali koristi internetskog učenja s modelom stabilnošću.', 'bn': '@ info: whatsthis পোস্ট সম্পাদনের পরিস্থিতিতে মেশিন অনুবাদ আউটপুটের ব্যবহারকারীর সংশোধনের ফলে অনুবাদ মডেলে অনলাইন করা হয়, পুনরাবৃত্তিক ত্রুটির সম্পাদনা কমিয়ে দেয় অথব নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদে এই লক্ষ্য অনলাইনে শিক্ষা প্রবেশ করা যাবে, যেখানে প্রতি নতুন নমুনাল ভিত্তিতে নেটওয়ার্ক প্যারামিটার আ এই ধরনের অ্যাপাপটেশন সাধারণত আরও বেশী শিক্ষার হার প্রয়োজন, যা সময়ের মধ্যে মডেলের মান প্রভাবিত করতে পারে। Alternatively, less aggressive online learning setups may preserve model stability, at the cost of reduced adaptation to user-generated corrections.  এই কাজে আমরা সময়ের মধ্যে বিভিন্ন ধরনের অনলাইন শিক্ষা কনফিগারেশনের মূল্য দিচ্ছি, ব্যবহারকারীদের জন্য তাদের প্রভাব পরিমাপ করি, আর ডোমেইনের মধ্যে আলাদ দুই ভিন্ন ডোমেনের ফলাফল নির্দেশ করে যে অনলাইন শিক্ষার মিশ্রিত পদক্ষেপ নিয়মিত ব্যাচ শিক্ষার সাথে সংযুক্ত করার প্রয়োজন হতে পারে মডে', 'fi': 'Adaptiivinen konek채채nn철s pyrkii sis채llytt채m채채n k채ytt채j채palautteen dynaamisesti k채채nn철ksen laadun parantamiseksi. J채lkimeditointiskenaariossa konek채채nn철ksen tuotoksen k채ytt채j채korjaukset sis채llytet채채n siten jatkuvasti k채채nn철smalleihin, mik채 v채hent채채 tai poistaa toistuvia virheit채 ja lis채채 automaattisen k채채nn철ksen hy철dyllisyytt채. Neurokonek채채nt채misess채 t채m채 tavoite voidaan saavuttaa verkko-oppimismenetelmill채, joissa verkkoparametrit p채ivitet채채n jokaisen uuden n채ytteen perusteella. T채llainen sopeutuminen edellytt채채 yleens채 korkeampaa oppimisastetta, mik채 voi vaikuttaa mallien laatuun ajan mittaan. Vaihtoehtoisesti v채hemm채n aggressiiviset verkko-oppimisasetukset voivat s채ilytt채채 mallin vakauden, jolloin k채ytt채jien tekemiin korjauksiin sopeutuminen v채henee. T채ss채 ty철ss채 arvioimme eri verkko-oppimiskonfiguraatioita ajan mittaan ja mittaamme niiden vaikutusta k채ytt채jien tuottamiin n채ytteisiin sek채 erillisi채 toimialueen sis채isi채 ja ulkopuolisia aineistoja. Kahdella eri osa-alueella saadut tulokset osoittavat, ett채 verkkooppimisen ja s채채nn철llisen er채hienos채채t철n yhdist채minen saattavat olla tarpeen verkkooppimisen hy철tyjen ja mallien vakauden tasapainottamiseksi.', 'et': 'Kohanduv masintõlge püüab dünaamiliselt kaasata kasutajate tagasisidet tõlkekvaliteedi parandamiseks. Järeltöötluse stsenaariumis integreeritakse masintõlke väljundi kasutaja parandused pidevalt tõlkemudelitesse, vähendades või kõrvaldades korduvat vigade redigeerimist ja suurendades automatiseeritud tõlke kasulikkust. Neuraalse masintõlke puhul võib seda eesmärki saavutada veebipõhise õppe meetodite abil, kus iga uue näidise põhjal uuendatakse võrguparameetreid. Seda tüüpi kohanemine nõuab tavaliselt kõrgemat õppimismäära, mis võib mõjutada mudelite kvaliteeti aja jooksul. Teise võimalusena võivad vähem agressiivsed veebipõhised õppeseadistused säilitada mudeli stabiilsuse, vähendades kohanemist kasutaja loodud parandustega. Selles töös hindame aja jooksul erinevaid online-õppe konfiguratsioone, mõõtes nende mõju kasutaja loodud näidistele ning eraldi domeenisiseseid ja -väliseid andmekogumeid. Kahes erinevas valdkonnas saadud tulemused näitavad, et võib olla vaja siduvaid lähenemisviise, mis kombineerivad veebiõppe perioodilise täpsustamisega, et tasakaalustada veebiõppe eeliseid mudeli stabiilsusega.', 'cs': 'Adaptivní strojový překlad se snaží dynamicky zahrnout zpětnou vazbu uživatelů pro zlepšení kvality překladu. V posteditačním scénáři jsou tak uživatelské opravy výstupu strojového překladu průběžně začleněny do překladových modelů, čímž snižuje nebo eliminuje opakované úpravy chyb a zvyšuje užitečnost automatizovaného překladu. V neuronovém strojovém překladu lze tohoto cíle dosáhnout prostřednictvím online učení, kde jsou síťové parametry aktualizovány na základě každého nového vzorku. Tento typ adaptace obvykle vyžaduje vyšší míru učení, což může mít vliv na kvalitu modelů v průběhu času. Alternativně mohou méně agresivní online učební nastavení zachovat stabilitu modelu za cenu snížení adaptace na opravy generované uživatelem. V této práci hodnotíme různé konfigurace online učení v průběhu času, měříme jejich dopad na uživatelsky generované vzorky, stejně jako samostatné in-domain a mimo domain datové sady. Výsledky ve dvou různých oblastech naznačují, že smíšené přístupy kombinující online učení s pravidelným dávkovým jemným laděním mohou být zapotřebí k vyvážení výhod online učení se stabilitou modelu.', 'sk': 'Prilagodljivi strojni prevod naj bi dinamično vključevali povratne informacije uporabnikov za izboljšanje kakovosti prevajanja. V scenariju po urejanju se uporabniški popravki strojnega prevajanja tako stalno vključujejo v prevajalske modele, kar zmanjšuje ali odpravlja ponavljajoče se napake in povečuje uporabnost avtomatiziranega prevajanja. V nevronskem strojnem prevajanju je ta cilj mogoče doseči s pristopi spletnega učenja, kjer se omrežni parametri posodabljajo na podlagi vsakega novega vzorca. Ta vrsta prilagajanja običajno zahteva višje stopnje učenja, kar lahko sčasoma vpliva na kakovost modelov. Alternativno lahko manj agresivne spletne nastavitve učenja ohranijo stabilnost modela na račun manjšega prilagajanja popravkom, ki jih ustvarijo uporabniki. V tem delu ocenjujemo različne konfiguracije spletnega učenja skozi čas, merimo njihov vpliv na uporabniške vzorce ter ločujemo domenske in zunajdomenske nabore podatkov. Rezultati na dveh različnih področjih kažejo, da bodo morda potrebni mešani pristopi, ki združujejo spletno učenje in periodično natančno prilagajanje serij, da bi uravnotežili koristi spletnega učenja s stabilnostjo modela.', 'he': 'התרגשות מכונות מתאימות לכלול באופן דינמי תגובת משתמש כדי לשפר את איכות התרגשות. בתרחיש לאחר העורה, תיקונים משתמשים של תוצאת התרגום המכונה משותפים כל הזמן לדוגמאות התרגום, מפחידים או מחסלים את העוררת שגיאות חוזרות וגבילים את השימוש של התרגום האוטומטי. בתרגום מכונת עצבית, המטרה הזאת ניתן להשיג באמצעות גישות לימוד באינטרנט, שם פרמטרים רשת מתעדכנים בהתבסס על כל דגימה חדשה. סוג זה של התאמה בדרך כלל דורש שיעורי לימוד גבוהים יותר, אשר יכול להשפיע על איכות הדוגמנים במהלך הזמן. Alternatively, less aggressive online learning settings may preserve model stability, at the cost of reduced adaptation to user-generated corrections. בעבודה הזו, אנו מעריכים סדרות למידה באינטרנט שונות במהלך הזמן, למדוד את השפעה שלהם על דגימות שנgenerו ע"י המשתמש, כמו גם קבוצות נתונים נפרדות בתחום וחוץ לתחום. תוצאות בשני תחומות שונים מצביעות כי גישות מעורבות שמשולבות את הלימודים באינטרנט עם התאימון המפקדי של המחלקה עשויות להיות צורכות כדי לאזן את היתרונות של הלימודים באינטרנט עם יציבות מודל.', 'ha': "Adaptive Machine Translation purports to dynamically include user feedback to improve translation quality.  @ info: whatsthis In translation of mashine neural, this goa can be achieved by an sami'a-kwamfyuta masu karanta na Online, a inda za'a samar da parameters na watin tarayya a kan kõwane misali na daban. Wannan nau'in adaptation ya ƙayyade a yi amfani da tsakanin da za'a iya ƙara wa lõkaci, kan ta yi amfani da tsarin motel a lokacin. Alternat, kayan tsari masu ƙaranci da ana ƙidida sanar da kwamfyutan ta zama masu tsari ga motel, ko da kyauta mai ƙara adadi zuwa shiryoyin da aka ƙididdige shi mai amfani da shi. Daga wannan aikin, Munã ƙaddara canza tsarin da aka karanta masu shawara na ɗayan lokaci, ko za'a ƙaddara matsayinsu a kan misãlai da aka ƙididdige shi, da kuma daban-daban cikin-Domen da ba'a-Domen. Natamata cikin biyu guda guda guda sun nuna cewa ana buƙata hanyõyin da aka haɗa wa masu karanta na Online da tsari mai daidai a yi amfani da amfani da amfani da za'a sanar da kwamfyuta masu motsi.", 'jv': 'Attribute section Nang tresjamahan, bukun punika ingkang sampeyan online Ketoke iki ngono alam-alam kuwi mesthi akeh luwih apik, seneng iso ngubah kuwi quality sampek karo nakos Alternate In this job, we assess new online Learning configurations about time, measurementing their effect on user-generated samples, as and separate in-domain and out-of-domain dataset. Ngombol-ngobro sing gawe domain ulih sing ngomong nik nggawe dolanan karo perusahaan sing dibuturan online', 'bo': 'ནུས་པ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནུས་མེད་པའི་འགྱུར་མཁན་གཙང་དག་གཙོ་རིམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ In a post-editing scenario, user corrections of machine translation output are thus continuously incorporated into translation models, reducing or eliminating repetitive error editing and increasing the usefulness of automated translation. In neural machine translation, this goal may be achieved via online learning approaches, where network parameters are updated based on each new sample. དབྱེ་སེལ་གྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་འདི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ཚད་ལྡན་ཚད་མཐོ་ཤོས་མཁན་དགོས། Alternatively, less aggressive online learning setups may preserve model stability, at the cost of reduced adaptation to user-generated corrections. In this work, we evaluate different online learning configurations over time, measuring their impact on user-generated samples, as well as separate in-domain and out-of-domain datasets. Results in two different domains indicate that mixed approaches combining online learning with periodic batch fine-tuning might be needed to balance the benefits of online learning with model stability.'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual Offensive Language Identification for Low Resource Languages : The Case of Marathi', 'es': 'Identificación de idiomas ofensivos multilingües para idiomas de escasos recursos: el caso del marathi', 'ar': 'تحديد اللغة الهجومية عبر اللغات للغات منخفضة الموارد: حالة المهاراتية', 'fr': 'Identification des langues offensives interlinguistiques pour les langues à faibles ressources\xa0: le cas du marathi', 'pt': 'Identificação de línguas ofensivas multilíngues para línguas de poucos recursos: o caso de Marathi', 'ja': '低リソース言語のためのクロスリンガル攻撃的言語識別：マラティのケース', 'ru': 'Межязыковая оскорбительная идентификация языка для языков с ограниченными ресурсами: пример маратхи', 'zh': '低资源语跨语攻击性语识:马拉地语例', 'hi': 'कम संसाधन भाषाओं के लिए क्रॉस-भाषी आक्रामक भाषा पहचान: मराठी का मामला', 'ga': 'Aitheantas Teanga Ionsaitheach Trastheangach do Theangacha Ísealcmhainne: Cás na Maraitis', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű offenzív nyelvi azonosítás alacsony forrású nyelvek esetében: a marathi esete', 'ka': 'მარტიური რესურსის ენებისთვისებისთვისტიფიკაცია: მარატიური შემთხვევაName', 'it': 'Identificazione multilingue del linguaggio offensivo per lingue a basso contenuto di risorse: il caso del marathi', 'el': 'Διγλωσσική Προσβολή Γλωσσών για Γλώσσες Χαμηλού Πόρου: Η περίπτωση του Μαραθί', 'kk': 'Төменгі ресурс тілдерінің көпшілік тілдер идентификациясы: The Case of Marathi', 'lt': 'Tarpkalbis žalingos kalbos identifikavimas mažų išteklių kalboms: Maratijos atvejis', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Bahasa Tersinggung Selasa Bahasa untuk Bahasa Sumber Terrendah: Kasus Marathi', 'mt': 'Identifikazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva għal-Lingwa b’Riżorsi Bażi: Il-Każ tal-Marati', 'mk': 'Идентификација на меѓујазички навреден јазик за јазици со ниски ресурси: случајот на марати', 'mn': 'Хоёр боловсролын хэл дээр олон хэлний оффицист хэл мэдлэг: The Case of Marathi', 'no': 'Name', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ഭാഷ ഓഫെന്\u200dസിവ് ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുക: The Case of Marathi', 'si': 'The case of MaratiName', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczna identyfikacja języka ofensywnego dla języków niskich zasobów: przypadek Marathi', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga luqada iskuulka ah ee luuqadaha hoose: Case of Marathi', 'ro': 'Identificarea limbajului ofensiv interlingv pentru limbile cu resurse reduse: cazul Marathi', 'sr': 'Prejezička identifikacija jezika za manje resurse: slučaj Maratija', 'ur': 'کم رسورس زبانوں کے لئے کروس زبان اوفنسیو زبان شناسایی: The Case of Marathi', 'ta': 'குறைந்த மொழி அடையாளம் குறைந்த மூலத்திற்கு: The Case of Marathi', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig offensiv språkidentifiering för lågresursspråk: fallet med Marathi', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhận diện ngôn ngữ rộng vượt cấp cho các ngôn ngữ thấp có sẵn: Vụ án Marath', 'da': 'Tværsproget offensiv sprogidentifikation for lav ressource sprog: Tilfældet med Marathi', 'bg': 'Междуезична офанзивна езикова идентификация за нискоресурсни езици: случаят на маратите', 'nl': 'Cross-lingual offensieve taal identificatie voor lage hulpbronnen talen: het geval van Marathi', 'hr': 'Prejezička identifikacija neposlušnog jezika za jezike niskih resursa: slučaj Marathija', 'de': 'Mehrsprachige Offensive Spracherkennung für ressourcenarme Sprachen: Der Fall Marathi', 'id': 'Identifikasi Bahasa Meninggal Selasa Bahasa untuk Bahasa Sumber Sumber Terrendah: Kasus Marathi', 'fa': 'شناسایی زبان زیادی برای زبانهای منابع کم: Case of Marathi', 'ko': '저자원 언어의 다중 언어 공격적 언어 식별: 마라톤어를 예로 들면', 'sw': 'Cross-lingual Offensive Language Identification for Low Resource Languages: The Case of Marathi', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i gjuhës ndërgjuhësore ofensive për gjuhët me burime të ulëta: rasti i marathisë', 'tr': 'Az Ressurat Dilleri üçin Ullanyş Diller: Maratiň Kiçisi', 'am': 'ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Մարաթիի դեպքում', 'az': 'AŇüńĪq ressurs dill…ôrinin √ßoxlu dil t…ôŇükil edilm…ôsi: The Case of Marathi', 'bn': 'ক্রস-ভাষার অফেনসেন্ট ভাষার পরিচয় নিম্নলিখিত ভাষা: মারাথির মামলা', 'cs': 'Mezijazyčná identifikace útočného jazyka pro nízké zdroje jazyků: případ marathi', 'bs': 'Prejezična identifikacija jezika za jezike niskih resursa: slučaj Marathija', 'fi': 'Monikielinen hyökkäävä kielitunnistus vähävaraisille kielille: Marathin tapaus', 'ca': 'Identificació de llengües translingües ofensives per llengües de baix recursos: El cas de maratí', 'et': 'Keeleülene ründav keele identifitseerimine vähese ressursiga keeltele: marathi juhtum', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Cross-lingual Offensive Language Identification for Low Resource Languages: The Case of Marathi', 'sk': 'Medjezična ofenzivna identifikacija jezikov z nizkimi viri: primer maratščine', 'bo': 'མཐུན་རིམ་ཆུང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་Cross-lingual Offensive Language Identification for Low Resource Languages: The Case of Marathi', 'jv': 'Language'}
{'en': 'The widespread presence of offensive language on social media motivated the development of systems capable of recognizing such content automatically. Apart from a few notable exceptions, most research on automatic offensive language identification has dealt with English. To address this shortcoming, we introduce MOLD, the Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD is the first dataset of its kind compiled for Marathi, thus opening a new domain for research in low-resource Indo-Aryan languages. We present results from several machine learning experiments on this dataset, including zero-short and other transfer learning experiments on state-of-the-art cross-lingual transformers from existing data in Bengali, English, and Hindi.', 'fr': "La présence généralisée de langage offensant sur les réseaux sociaux a motivé le développement de systèmes capables de reconnaître automatiquement ce type de contenu. Hormis quelques exceptions notables, la plupart des recherches sur l'identification automatique des langues offensantes ont porté sur l'anglais. Pour remédier à cette lacune, nous introduisons MOLD, le jeu de données sur le langage offensif marathi. MOLD est le premier ensemble de données de ce type compilé pour le marathi, ouvrant ainsi un nouveau domaine de recherche sur les langues indo-aryennes à faibles ressources. Nous présentons les résultats de plusieurs expériences d'apprentissage automatique sur cet ensemble de données, y compris des expériences d'apprentissage par transfert et d'autres expériences d'apprentissage par transfert sur des transformateurs multilingues de pointe à partir de données existantes en bengali, anglais et hindi.", 'es': 'La presencia generalizada de lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales motivó el desarrollo de sistemas capaces de reconocer dicho contenido automáticamente. Aparte de algunas excepciones notables, la mayoría de las investigaciones sobre la identificación automática de idiomas ofensivos se han centrado en el inglés. Para abordar esta deficiencia, presentamos MOLD, el conjunto de datos del lenguaje ofensivo marathi. MOLD es el primer conjunto de datos de este tipo compilado para marathi, lo que abre un nuevo campo para la investigación en lenguas indo-arias de bajos recursos. Presentamos los resultados de varios experimentos de aprendizaje automático en este conjunto de datos, incluidos experimentos de aprendizaje corto cero y otros experimentos de aprendizaje de transferencia en transformadores multilingües de última generación a partir de datos existentes en bengalí, inglés e hindi.', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアに不快な言葉が広く存在することは、そのようなコンテンツを自動的に認識できるシステムの開発を動機づけた。いくつかの注目すべき例外を除いて、自動不快言語識別に関するほとんどの研究は英語を扱ってきた。この欠点に対処するために、MOLD、Marathi Offensive Language Datasetを導入します。カビはマラーティー語のために編纂された最初のデータセットであるため、低資源のインド・アーリア語族の言語で研究するための新しい領域を開いた。私たちは、ベンガル語、英語、ヒンディー語の既存のデータからの最先端のクロスリンガル変換器のゼロショートおよびその他の転送学習実験を含む、このデータセットに関するいくつかの機械学習実験の結果を提示します。', 'ar': 'حفز الوجود الواسع للغة الهجومية على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي على تطوير أنظمة قادرة على التعرف على هذا المحتوى تلقائيًا. بصرف النظر عن بعض الاستثناءات الملحوظة ، فإن معظم الأبحاث حول التعرف التلقائي على اللغة الهجومية قد تعاملت مع اللغة الإنجليزية. لمعالجة هذا القصور ، نقدم MOLD ، مجموعة بيانات اللغة الماراثية الهجومية. MOLD هي مجموعة البيانات الأولى من نوعها التي تم تجميعها للماراثى ، وبالتالي فتح مجال جديد للبحث في اللغات الهندية الآرية منخفضة الموارد. نقدم نتائج من العديد من تجارب التعلم الآلي على مجموعة البيانات هذه ، بما في ذلك تجارب التعلم غير المختصرة وتجارب نقل التعلم الأخرى على أحدث المحولات متعددة اللغات من البيانات الموجودة باللغات البنغالية والإنجليزية والهندية.', 'pt': 'A presença generalizada de linguagem ofensiva nas redes sociais motivou o desenvolvimento de sistemas capazes de reconhecer tais conteúdos de forma automática. Além de algumas exceções notáveis, a maioria das pesquisas sobre identificação automática de linguagem ofensiva tratou do inglês. Para resolver essa deficiência, apresentamos o MOLD, o conjunto de dados de linguagem ofensiva Marathi. O MOLD é o primeiro conjunto de dados desse tipo compilado para Marathi, abrindo assim um novo domínio para pesquisa em línguas indo-arianas de poucos recursos. Apresentamos os resultados de vários experimentos de aprendizado de máquina neste conjunto de dados, incluindo zero-short e outros experimentos de aprendizado de transferência em transformadores multilíngues de última geração a partir de dados existentes em bengali, inglês e hindi.', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया पर आक्रामक भाषा की व्यापक उपस्थिति ने ऐसी सामग्री को स्वचालित रूप से पहचानने में सक्षम प्रणालियों के विकास को प्रेरित किया। कुछ उल्लेखनीय अपवादों के अलावा, स्वचालित आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान पर अधिकांश शोध ने अंग्रेजी से निपटा है। इस कमी को दूर करने के लिए, हम MOLD, मराठी आक्रामक भाषा डेटासेट पेश करते हैं। मोल्ड मराठी के लिए संकलित अपनी तरह का पहला डेटासेट है, इस प्रकार कम संसाधन वाली इंडो-आर्यन भाषाओं में अनुसंधान के लिए एक नया डोमेन खोलता है। हम इस डेटासेट पर कई मशीन लर्निंग प्रयोगों के परिणाम प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जिसमें बंगाली, अंग्रेजी और हिंदी में मौजूदा डेटा से अत्याधुनिक क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफॉर्मर पर शून्य-लघु और अन्य स्थानांतरण सीखने के प्रयोग शामिल हैं।', 'ga': 'Spreag láithreacht forleathan na teanga maslacha ar na meáin shóisialta forbairt na gcóras a bhí in ann a leithéid d’ábhar a aithint go huathoibríoch. Seachas roinnt eisceachtaí suntasacha, is leis an mBéarla a dhéileáil an chuid is mó den taighde ar shainaithint uathoibríoch teanga maslach. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an easnamh seo, tugaimid isteach MOLD, Tacar Sonraí Teanga Ionsaitheach na Maratai. Is é MOLD an chéad tacar sonraí dá leithéid a tiomsaíodh don Maraitis, agus mar sin osclaítear fearann nua le haghaidh taighde ar theangacha Ind-Ariacha a bhfuil acmhainní ísle acu. Cuirimid i láthair torthaí ó roinnt turgnamh meaisínfhoghlama ar an tacar sonraí seo, lena n-áirítear turgnaimh foghlama aistrithe nialasach agus eile ar chlaochladáin thrastheangacha den scoth ó shonraí atá ann cheana i mBeangáilis, Béarla agus Hiondúis.', 'ru': 'Широкое распространение оскорбительных формулировок в социальных сетях стимулировало развитие систем, способных распознавать такой контент автоматически. За исключением нескольких заметных исключений, большинство исследований по автоматической идентификации оскорбительных языков касались английского языка. Чтобы устранить этот недостаток, мы вводим MOLD, набор данных о наступательном языке маратхи. MOLD - это первый в своем роде набор данных, составленный для маратхи, что открывает новую область для исследований на малоресурсных индоарийских языках. Мы представляем результаты нескольких экспериментов по машинному обучению на этом наборе данных, включая эксперименты с нулевым сокращением и другие эксперименты по обучению переносу на современных кросс-лингвистических трансформаторах из существующих данных на бенгальском, английском и хинди.', 'zh': '社交媒体上博有犯言,使人开自动识别其统。 自值得注意例外,多自犯性言语知识皆及英语。 为此一病,引入马拉地语冒犯性语数MOLD。 MOLD为马拉地语编译首集,为资源匮乏 - 雅利安语究开一新域。 于此数集上展数机器学实验之实,盖出于孟加拉语,英语、印地语见数之最先进者转换器其零短及他迁学实验。', 'hu': 'A sértő nyelv széles körű jelenléte a közösségi médiában motiválta az ilyen tartalmak automatikus felismerésére alkalmas rendszerek kialakítását. Néhány figyelemre méltó kivételtől eltekintve az automatikus sértő nyelvazonosítással kapcsolatos kutatások többsége angolul foglalkozott. Ennek a hiányosságnak a kezelésére bemutatjuk a MOLD-ot, a Marathi Offensive Language Adatkészletet. A MOLD az első ilyen adatkészlet, melyet Marathi számára állítottunk össze, így új területet nyitott meg az alacsony erőforrású indoárja nyelvek kutatására. Számos gépi tanulási kísérlet eredményeit mutatjuk be ezen az adatkészleten, beleértve a nulla rövid és egyéb transzfer tanulási kísérleteket a legkorszerűbb, többnyelvű transzformátorokon végzett, bengáli, angol és hindi nyelvű adatokból.', 'it': "La diffusa presenza di linguaggio offensivo sui social media ha motivato lo sviluppo di sistemi capaci di riconoscere automaticamente tali contenuti. A parte alcune eccezioni notevoli, la maggior parte delle ricerche sull'identificazione automatica delle lingue offensive si è occupata dell'inglese. Per ovviare a questa lacuna, presentiamo MOLD, il Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD è il primo dataset del suo genere compilato per Marathi, aprendo così un nuovo dominio per la ricerca nelle lingue indo-ariane a basso contenuto di risorse. Presentiamo i risultati di diversi esperimenti di apprendimento automatico su questo set di dati, inclusi esperimenti di apprendimento zero-short e altri esperimenti di trasferimento su trasformatori cross-lingual all'avanguardia da dati esistenti in bengalese, inglese e hindi.", 'el': 'Η διαδεδομένη παρουσία προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης παρακίνησε την ανάπτυξη συστημάτων ικανών να αναγνωρίζουν αυτόματα τέτοιο περιεχόμενο. Εκτός από μερικές αξιοσημείωτες εξαιρέσεις, η περισσότερη έρευνα για την αυτόματη ταυτοποίηση προσβλητικών γλωσσών έχει ασχοληθεί με τα αγγλικά. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το έλλειμμα, εισάγουμε το σύνολο δεδομένων για την προσβλητική γλώσσα του Μαραθί. Το MOLD είναι το πρώτο σύνολο δεδομένων του είδους του που συντάχθηκε για το Μαραθί, ανοίγοντας έτσι ένα νέο πεδίο για έρευνα σε ινδο-άριες γλώσσες χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας. Παρουσιάζουμε αποτελέσματα από διάφορα πειράματα μηχανικής μάθησης σε αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων πειραμάτων μάθησης μηδενικού σύντομου χρόνου και άλλων πειραμάτων μάθησης μεταφοράς σε υπερσύγχρονους γλωσσικούς μετασχηματιστές από υπάρχοντα δεδομένα στα Βεγγαλικά, τα Αγγλικά και τα Χίντι.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიაში სოციალური სახელის უფრო დიდი სახელის მოქმედება სისტემების განვითარება, რომელიც ასეთი სახელის ავტომატურად აღმოჩნენ. რამდენიმე მარტივი განსხვავებების დამატებით, უფრო მეტი ავტომატური განსხვავებული ენის განსხვავებაზე ინგლისური განსხვავება გადავუკეთება. ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ MOLD-ს, მარატის უფრო მუშაობელი ენის მონაცემები. MOLD არის მისი ტიპის პირველი მონაცემების საქაღალდე, რომელიც მარატისთვის კომპიოლირებულია, ამიტომ ახალი დიომინის გახსნა ინდო- არიანი ენების პასუხში. ჩვენ ამის მონაცემების განსწავლებელი ექსპერიმენტების შემდეგ მონაცემების განსწავლებელი ექსპერიმენტების შემდეგ ნულ კრეტური და სხვა განსწავლებელი ექსპერიმენტების განსწავლებელი განსწავლებ', 'kk': 'Осы мазмұнын автоматты түрде анықтауға мүмкіндік болатын жүйелерді жасау үшін көпшілікті тілдердің көпшілікті болуы мүмкіндік берді. Кейбір таңдамалы тапсырмалардан басқа, автоматты түрлі тіл идентификациясының көпшілігі ағылшын тіліне сәйкес келді. Бұл қысқарту үшін біз MOLD- ті, Марати официалдық тіл деректер бағдарламасын таңдаймыз. MOLD - Марати үшін компиляцияланған түрінің алғашқы деректер жиыны, сондықтан Индо- Ария тілдерінде зерттеу үшін жаңа домені ашу. Біз бұл деректер жиынында бірнеше компьютерді оқыту тәжірибенің нәтижелерін таңдаймыз. Бұл бағдарламаның, ағылшын және хиндидегі мәліметтерден бар мәліметтерінің күй- жай тілді аудару тәж', 'mk': 'Широкото присуство на офанзивниот јазик на социјалните медиуми го мотивираше развојот на системи способни за автоматско препознавање на ваквата содржина. Освен неколку значајни исклучоци, повеќето истражувања за автоматска офанзивна идентификација на јазикот се однесуваат на англиски. За да го решиме ова недостаток, го претставуваме MOLD, Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD е првиот податок од ваков вид компилиран за Марати, отворајќи нов домен за истражување на индуарски јазици со ниски ресурси. Презентираме резултати од неколку експерименти за машинско учење на овој компјутер податоци, вклучувајќи нула-кратки и други експерименти за учење на трансфер на најсовремените крстојазични трансформатори од постојните податоци на бенгали, англиски и хиндиски', 'ms': 'Kehadiran luas bahasa serangan pada media sosial mendotivasikan pembangunan sistem yang mampu mengenali kandungan tersebut secara automatik. Selain beberapa pengecualian tertentu, kebanyakan kajian mengenai pengenalan bahasa serangan automatik telah berurusan dengan bahasa Inggeris. Untuk mengatasi kekurangan ini, kami memperkenalkan MOLD, Dataset Bahasa Tersinggung Marathi. MOLD adalah set data pertama jenisnya dikompil untuk Marathi, jadi membuka domain baru untuk kajian dalam bahasa Indo-Aryan sumber rendah. Kami memperkenalkan hasil dari beberapa eksperimen pembelajaran mesin pada set data ini, termasuk eksperimen pembelajaran pendek-sifar dan eksperimen pembelajaran lainnya pada pembelajaran salib bahasa terbaik dari data yang wujud dalam bahasa Bengali, Inggeris, dan Hindi.', 'lt': 'The widespread presence of offensive language on social media motivated the development of systems capable of recognizing such content automatically.  Išskyrus keletą pastebimų išimčių, dauguma mokslinių tyrimų dėl automatinio užpuolimo kalbos identifikavimo buvo susiję su anglų kalba. Siekiant išspręsti šį trūkumą, pristatysime MOLD, Marathi žalingų kalbų duomenų rinkinį. MOLD is the first dataset of its kind compiled for Marathi, thus opening a new domain for research in low-resource Indo-Aryan languages.  Mes pristatome rezultatus iš kelių su šiuo duomenų rinkiniu susijusių mašininio mokymosi eksperimentų, įskaitant nulinius trumpalaikius ir kitus naujausių tarpkalbinių transformatorių perdavimo eksperimentus iš esamų duomenų bengalų, anglų ir hindų kalbomis.', 'ml': 'സാമൂഹിക മാധ്യമങ്ങളിലെ വിശാലമായ ഭാഷയുടെ സാമൂഹ്യത്തിന്റെ വിശാലമായ സ്ഥിതികങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് സ്വയം അത്തരം ഉള്ളടക്ക കുറച്ചു പ്രശ്നമുള്ള വിഷയങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഒഴിവാകുന്നു, സ്വയമേയുള്ള അക്രമമായ ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതില To address this shortcoming, we introduce MOLD, the Marathi Offensive Language Dataset.  മാരാത്തിയുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റാണ്, അതുകൊണ്ട് ഒരു പുതിയ ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d തുറക്കുന്നത് ഇന്തോ ആരിയന്\u200d ഭാഷകള ഈ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പല യന്ത്രങ്ങളുടെയും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള ഡേറ്റാസ്റ്റാര്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ബാങ്കാലി,', 'mt': 'Il-preżenza mifruxa ta’ lingwa offensiva fuq il-midja soċjali mmotivat l-iżvilupp ta’ sistemi li kapaċi jirrikonoxxu tali kontenut awtomatikament. Minbarra ftit eċċezzjonijiet notevoli, il-biċċa l-kbira tar-riċerka dwar l-identifikazzjoni awtomatika tal-lingwa offensiva ttrattat bl-Ingliż. Biex nindirizzaw dan in-nuqqas, nintroduċu MOLD, il-Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD huwa l-ewwel sett ta’ dejta tat-tip tiegħu miġbur għall-Marathi, u b’hekk jinfetaħ dominju ġdid għar-riċerka f’lingwi Indo-Arjani b’riżorsi baxxi. Aħna nippreżentaw riżultati minn bosta esperimenti ta’ tagħlim bil-magni fuq dan is-sett ta’ dejta, inklużi esperimenti ta’ tagħlim ta’ trasferiment żero-qosra u esperimenti oħra ta’ tagħlim ta’ trasferiment fuq trasformaturi translingwi l-aktar avvanzati minn dejta eżistenti fil-Bengali, l-Ingliż u l-Indjan.', 'no': 'Den breidde presentasjonen av offensivspråk på sosiale medier motiverte utviklinga av systemar som kan gjenkjenne slike innhaldet automatisk. I staden for nokre merkelige unntak har dei fleste forskningar om automatisk offensiv språk- identifikasjon betre med engelsk. For å handtera denne kortvaringa, introduserer vi MOLD, Marathi Offensive Language Data. MOLD er den første datasetten av sitt type kompilert for Marathi, slik at det opnar eit ny domene for forskning i låg ressurs Indo-Aryan languages. Vi presenterer resultat frå fleire maskinelæringseksperimenter på denne datasettet, inkludert null kort og andre læringseksperimenter på tilstanden av kunsten krysspråk-transformerande frå eksisterande data i Bengali, engelsk og hindi.', 'ro': 'Prezența largă a limbajului ofensator pe rețelele de socializare a motivat dezvoltarea unor sisteme capabile să recunoască automat acest conținut. În afară de câteva excepții notabile, majoritatea cercetărilor privind identificarea automată a limbii ofensive s-au ocupat de limba engleză. Pentru a aborda această deficiență, introducem MOLD, setul de date pentru limbajul ofensiv Marathi. MOLD este primul set de date de acest gen compilat pentru Marathi, deschizând astfel un nou domeniu pentru cercetare în limbile indo-ariane cu resurse reduse. Prezentăm rezultatele mai multor experimente de învățare automată pe acest set de date, inclusiv experimente de învățare zero-short și alte experimente de transfer pe transformatoare cross-lingvistice de ultimă generație din datele existente în bengali, engleză și hindi.', 'pl': 'Szeroka obecność obraźliwego języka w mediach społecznościowych motywowała do rozwoju systemów zdolnych automatycznie rozpoznawać takie treści. Oprócz kilku znaczących wyjątków, większość badań nad automatyczną identyfikacją języka obraźliwego dotyczyła angielskiego. Aby rozwiązać tę niedociągnięcie, wprowadzamy MOLD, zestaw danych językowych Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD jest pierwszym tego rodzaju zbiorem danych opracowanym dla Marathi, otwierając tym samym nową domenę badań nad niskimi zasobami językami indoaryjskimi. Przedstawiamy wyniki kilku eksperymentów uczenia maszynowego na tym zbiorze danych, w tym zero-short i innych eksperymentów uczenia się transferowego na najnowocześniejszych transformatorach wielojęzycznych z istniejących danych w języku bengalskim, angielskim i hindi.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн мэдээлэл дээрх хүчирхийлэлтэй хэлний өргөн байдал нь үүнийг автоматаар таних боломжтой системийн хөгжлийг урам зориулсан. Хэдэн тодорхой тодорхойлолтоос гадна ихэнх автоматжуулалтын хэлний тодорхойлолтын судалгаа Англи хэлний хэлбэртэй тулгарсан. Энэ тохиолдолд бид MOLD, Марати хэлний мэдээлэл өгөгдлийг танилцуулна. MOLD бол Марати-д зохион байгуулагдсан анхны өгөгдлийн хэлбэрүүд юм. Ингээд Индо-Арийн хэлний судалгаанд шинэ зохион нээж байна. Бид энэ өгөгдлийн сангийн олон машин суралцах туршилтын үр дүнг тайлбарлаж байна. Бангали, Англи, Хинди улс төрөлхтний хэлний шилжүүлэгчдийн туршилтаас хамгийн богино болон бусад шилжүүлэлтийн туршилтуудыг харуулж байна.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මිඩියාවට අපරාධ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරසාරණ කරපු භාෂාව ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් අඳින්න පුළුවන් පද ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය ගැන ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා. මේ අඩුවෙන් වෙන්න විදිහට, අපි MOLD, මාරාතියේ අධික භාෂා දත්ත සංඥානය කරනවා. MOLD තමයි මාරාති වලට සම්පූර්ණ කරපු පළමු දත්ත සෙට්, ඉතින් අඩු සම්පූර්ණ භාෂාවට පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා අළුත් ඩො අපි මේ දත්ත සැටේ පරීක්ෂණයක් ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණයක් තියෙන්නේ මැෂින් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, බෙන්ගාලි, ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ හින්ද', 'so': 'Dhinaca afka xadgudubka ah ee ku jira shabakadda bulshada ayaa horumarinta nidaamka awoodi kara inuu aqoonsado waxyaabahaas oo kale. Apart from a few notable exceptions, most research on automatic offensive language identification has dealt with English.  Si aan ugu sheekeyno soo gaaban, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa MOLD oo ah macluumaadka afka Marathi. MOLD waa marka ugu horeysa macluumaadka ee noocyadiisa oo loo soo koobay Marathi, sidaa darteed wuxuu furan karaa domain cusub oo lagu baran karo luqadaha hoose-resource Indo-Aryan. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa arimahan waxbarashada machineedka qaarkood, kuwaas oo ku jira imtixaanka waxbarashada zero gaaban iyo waxbarashada kale oo ku saabsan beddelinta luuqada farshaxanka kala duwan ee marka lagu jiro labada macluumaad oo ku qoran Bengali, Ingiriis iyo Hindi.', 'sv': 'Den utbredda förekomsten av stötande språk på sociala medier motiverade utvecklingen av system som kan känna igen sådant innehåll automatiskt. Bortsett från några anmärkningsvärda undantag har de flesta undersökningar om automatisk kränkande språkidentifiering handlat om engelska. För att åtgärda denna brist introducerar vi MOLD, Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD är den första datauppsättningen av sitt slag sammanställd för marathi, vilket öppnar en ny domän för forskning i indoariska språk med låg resurs. Vi presenterar resultat från flera maskininlärningsexperiment på denna datauppsättning, inklusive noll-kort och andra överföringsinlärningsexperiment på state-of-the-art korspråkiga transformatorer från befintlig data på bengali, engelska och hindi.', 'sr': 'Prošireno prisustvo ofanzivnog jezika na društvenim medijima motiviralo je razvoj sustava koje su sposobne automatski priznati takav sadržaj. Osim nekoliko poznatih izuzetka, većina istraživanja o automatskoj identifikaciji jezika se bavila engleskim jezicima. Da bi se obratili ovom nedostatku, predstavljamo MOLD, Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD je prva grupa podataka koju je kompilovala za Marathi, tako otvarajući novi domen za istraživanje na jezicima s niskim resursima Indo-Aryan. Predstavljamo rezultate iz nekoliko eksperimenata za učenje mašina na ovom setu podataka, uključujući eksperimente za prebacivanje nule kratkih i drugih prebacivanja na državu umjetnih preko jezika transformatora iz postojećih podataka na Bengaliju, engleskom i hindiju.', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடகங்களின் அகலமான மொழியின் இருக்கையில் விரிவாக்கப்பட்டது இத்தகைய உள்ளடக்கங்களை தானாகவே அடைய முடியும் அமைப்பு சில குறிப்பிட்ட விதிவிலக்குகள் தவிர, பெரும்பாலான தானியங்கு தானாகவே முற்றிலும் மொழி அடையாளத்தை கண் இந்த சுருக்கம் வரும் முகவரிப்பதற்கு, நாம் MOLD, மாராதி தொடர்புடைய மொழி தரவு அமைப்பு. MOLD என்பது மாராதிக்கான வகையான தரவுத்தளத்தின் முதல் அமைப்பு, அதனால் குறைந்த மூலத்தில் உள்ள ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு புதிய களம் திறக்க இந்த தரவுத்தளத்தில் பல இயந்திர கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் சோதனைகளின் முடிவுகளை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம், பெங்காலி, ஆங்கிலத்து, மற்றும் ஹின்டியில் இருந்து உள்ள தகவல்', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا میں فساد کی زبان کی گھیری ہوئی موجودگی نے سیستموں کی توسعہ کو اتنا ہی پہچان سکتا ہے۔ چند معلوم اگلوں کے علاوہ، اکثر انگلیسی زبان شناسایی کی تحقیق انگلیسی کے ساتھ کیا گیا ہے. ہم MOLD کو معلوم کریں گے، ماراتی اوفنسیو زبان ڈاٹیسٹ کو۔ MOLD اس کی مخلوقات کی پہلی ڈاٹ سٹ ہے جو ماراتی کے لئے کامپیل کیا گیا ہے، اسی طرح کم منبع انڈو-آرین زبانوں میں تحقیق کے لئے ایک نئی ڈومین کھولتا ہے. ہم نے اس ڈاٹ سٹ پر بہت سی ماشین سکونت کی آزمائش سے نتیجے پیش کیے ہیں، صفر کوتاہ اور دوسری ترنسیٹ سکونت کی آزمائش کے ساتھ بنگالی، انگلیسی اور ہندی میں موجود ڈاٹ سے متفرق کرنے والوں کی موجود ہے.', 'uz': "Name Ko'pchilik foydalanuvchilar bilan, ko'pchilik avtomatik ravishda aniqlash tili identifikati ingliz tilini boshqaradi. Bu kutilgan soʻzni talab qilish uchun, biz MOLD, Marathi shaxsiy tilning maʼlumotlarini ko'rganamiz. Name We present results from several machine learning experiments on this dataset, including zero-short and other transfer learning experiments on state-of-the-art cross-lingual transformers from existing data in Bengali, English, and Hindi.", 'vi': 'Sự có mặt rộng rãi của ngôn ngữ tấn công trên các phương tiện xã hội thúc đẩy việc phát triển các hệ thống có khả năng tự động nhận dạng nội dung. Ngoài một vài ngoại lệ đáng chú ý, hầu hết các nghiên cứu về nhận diện ngôn ngữ tấn công tự động đã giải quyết tiếng Anh. Để giải quyết thiếu sót này, chúng tôi giới thiệu MOLD, hệ thống dữ liệu ngôn ngữ Marati Bất động. Một nội giáp khoảng đã được tạo ra một bộ trí liệu cuộc nghiên cứu trong hệ thống Indo-Aryan. Chúng tôi đưa ra kết quả từ các thí nghiệm nghiên cứu về máy móc trên bộ dữ liệu này, bao gồm việc không ngắn và nhiều thí nghiệm truyền tải về các biến đổi xuyên ngôn ngữ học hiện đại từ dữ liệu ở Bengali, English và Hindi.', 'da': 'Den udbredte tilstedeværelse af stødende sprog på sociale medier motiverede udviklingen af systemer, der er i stand til automatisk at genkende sådant indhold. Bortset fra nogle få bemærkelsesværdige undtagelser har de fleste undersøgelser om automatisk offensiv sprogidentifikation beskæftiget sig med engelsk. For at løse denne mangel introducerer vi MOLD, Marathi Offensive Language Database. MOLD er det første datasæt af sin art, der er udarbejdet for marathi, og dermed åbner et nyt domæne for forskning i lav-ressource indoariske sprog. Vi præsenterer resultater fra flere maskinlæringseksperimenter på dette datasæt, herunder nul-kort og andre overførsel læringseksperimenter på state-of-the-art tværsprogede transformere fra eksisterende data på bengali, engelsk og hindi.', 'bg': 'Широкото присъствие на офанзивен език в социалните медии мотивира развитието на системи, способни да разпознават такова съдържание автоматично. Освен няколко забележителни изключения, повечето изследвания за автоматична офанзивна езикова идентификация са се занимавали с английски. За да се справим с този недостатък, ние въвеждаме МОЛД, маратски офанзивен езиков набор от данни. МОЛД е първият по рода си съвкупност от данни, съставени за марати, като по този начин отваря нов домейн за изследване на индоарийски езици с нисък ресурс. Представяме резултати от няколко експеримента с машинно обучение върху този набор от данни, включително нулево кратко и други експерименти с трансферно обучение върху най-съвременни трансформатори на междуезици от съществуващи данни на бенгалски, английски и хинди.', 'hr': 'Prošireno prisustvo ofanzivnog jezika na društvenim medijima motiviralo je razvoj sustava koje su sposobne automatski priznati takav sadržaj. Osim nekoliko poznatih izuzetka, većina istraživanja o automatskoj identifikaciji jezika odnosi se na engleski jezik. Za rješavanje ovog nedostatka, predstavljamo MOLD, Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD je prva grupa podataka svojih vrsta kompilacija za Marathi, tako otvarajući novi domet za istraživanje na jezicima s niskim resursima Indo-Aryan. Predstavljamo rezultate iz nekoliko eksperimenata za učenje strojeva na ovom setu podataka, uključujući eksperimente za prebacivanje nule kratke i druge prebacivanje na državu umjetničkih preko jezika transformatora iz postojećih podataka na Bengaliju, engleskom i hindiju.', 'id': 'Kehadiran luas bahasa yang menyerang di media sosial mendotivasi pembangunan sistem yang mampu mengakui isi tersebut secara otomatis. Selain beberapa pengecualian terkenal, kebanyakan penelitian mengenai identifikasi bahasa offensive otomatis telah berurusan dengan bahasa Inggris. Untuk mengatasi kekurangan ini, kami memperkenalkan MOLD, Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD adalah set data pertama dari jenisnya dikompilasi untuk Marathi, sehingga membuka domain baru untuk penelitian dalam bahasa Indo-Aryan sumber daya rendah. Kami mempersembahkan hasil dari beberapa eksperimen pembelajaran mesin pada set data ini, termasuk eksperimen pembelajaran transfer nol-pendek dan eksperimen lainnya pada transformator saling bahasa terbaik dari data yang ada di Bengali, Inggris, dan Hindi.', 'ko': '공격적인 언어가 소셜 미디어에 광범위하게 존재하면서 이런 내용을 자동으로 식별할 수 있는 시스템의 발전을 추진했다.몇 가지 주의할 만한 예외를 제외하고 대다수의 자동 공격적 언어 식별에 관한 연구는 모두 영어와 관련된다.이 단점을 해결하기 위해 Marathi 공격적인 언어 데이터 세트 MOLD를 도입했습니다.MOLD는 마라톤어를 위한 최초의 동종 데이터 집합으로 저자원 인도-아리안어 연구에 새로운 영역을 열었다.우리는 이 데이터 집합에서 진행된 몇 차례의 기계 학습 실험 결과를 보여 주었는데, 이는 제로 short와 기존의 방글라데시, 영어, 인디언 데이터를 바탕으로 한 최첨단 크로스 언어 변형 금강의 이동 학습 실험을 포함한다.', 'nl': 'De wijdverspreide aanwezigheid van aanstootgevende taal op sociale media motiveerde de ontwikkeling van systemen die dergelijke inhoud automatisch kunnen herkennen. Afgezien van een paar opmerkelijke uitzonderingen, heeft het meeste onderzoek naar automatische aanstootgevende taalidentificatie betrekking op Engels. Om deze tekortkoming aan te pakken introduceren we MOLD, de Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD is de eerste dataset in zijn soort samengesteld voor Marathi en opent daarmee een nieuw domein voor onderzoek naar low-resource Indo-Arische talen. We presenteren resultaten van verschillende machine learning experimenten op deze dataset, waaronder zero-short en andere transfer learning experimenten op state-of-the-art cross-lingual transformators van bestaande gegevens in het Bengaals, Engels en Hindi.', 'sw': 'Ukubwa wa lugha ya matusi kwenye mitandao ya kijamii ulihamasisha maendeleo ya mifumo inayoweza kutambua maudhui hayo kwa urahisi. Ukiacha vipengele machache maarufu, tafiti nyingi kuhusu utambulisho wa lugha ya kibinafsi umejadili Kiingereza. Ili kutangaza muda huu, tunautambulisha MOLD, MOLD, MOLD, seti ya Takwimu za Lugha za Marathi. MOLD ni seti ya kwanza ya taarifa za a in a yake iliyohifadhiwa kwa ajili ya Marathi, kwa hiyo inafungua eneo jipya kwa ajili ya utafiti katika lugha ndogo ya Indo-Aryan. We present results from several machine learning experiments on this dataset, including zero-short and other transfer learning experiments on state-of-the-art cross-lingual transformers from existing data in Bengali, English, and Hindi.', 'de': 'Die weit verbreitete Präsenz beleidigender Sprache in den sozialen Medien motivierte die Entwicklung von Systemen, die solche Inhalte automatisch erkennen können. Abgesehen von einigen bemerkenswerten Ausnahmen befasste sich die Forschung hauptsächlich mit Englisch. Um diesen Mangel zu beheben, stellen wir MOLD vor, das Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD ist der erste Datensatz seiner Art, der für Marathi zusammengestellt wurde und damit eine neue Domäne für die Forschung in ressourcenarmen indoarischen Sprachen eröffnet. Wir präsentieren Ergebnisse mehrerer Experimente zum maschinellen Lernen auf diesem Datensatz, einschließlich Zero-Short und anderer Transfer-Lernexperimente an hochmodernen crosslingualen Transformatoren aus bestehenden Daten in Bengali, Englisch und Hindi.', 'fa': 'حضور گسترده زبان تجاوز در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی به توسعه سیستم\u200cهای قادر به شناختن این محتوای خودکار تحریک کرد. به جز چند استثناء مشخص، بیشترین تحقیقات در مورد شناسایی زبان نافرمانی خودکار با انگلیسی مواجه شده است. برای حل این کوتاهی، ما MOLD را معرفی می کنیم، Databases Offensive Language Marathi. MOLD اولین مجموعه داده\u200cها از نوع آن برای ماراتی ساخته شده است، بنابراین یک دامنه جدید برای تحقیقات در زبان\u200cهای کم منابع Indo-Aryan است. ما نتیجه\u200cها را از آزمایش\u200cهای تعلیم ماشین\u200cها در این مجموعه داده\u200cها پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، شامل آزمایش\u200cهای تعلیم\u200cآموزش صفر کوتاه و دیگر در مورد تغییر\u200cآموزش\u200cهای موجود زبان\u200cهای هنری از داده\u200cهای موجود در بنگالی، انگلی', 'af': "Die verspreidige voorsiening van offensivele taal op sosiale media het die ontwikkeling van stelsels wat moontlik om sodanige inhoud outomaties te herken. Behalwe van 'n paar notaabele uitsonderings, het die meeste ondersoek op outomatiese offensive taal identifikasie met Engels gehandel. Om hierdie kortpad te adres, introduseer ons MOLD, die Marathi Offensive Taal Dataset. MOLD is die eerste datastel van sy soort kompileer vir Marathi, sodat die oopmaak van 'n nuwe domein vir ondersoek in lae- hulpbron Indo- Aryan tale. Ons stel resultate van verskeie masjien leer eksperimente op hierdie dataset, insluitend zero kort en ander oordrag leer eksperimente op staat-van-die-kuns kruistale transformeerders van bestaande data in Bengali, Engels en Hindi.", 'am': 'በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የስፋት ቋንቋ በመስፋት ላይ የዚህን መረጃ ማውቀትን በተቻለ ሲስተካከል ሲስተማርን ለመፍታት ያሳስፋል፡፡ ከጥቂት ምርጫዎች በቀር፣ አብዛኛዎቹ በአምባቢነታቸው የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ግንኙነት እንግሊዘኛ ላይ ተማርተዋል፡፡ ይህንን አቋራጭ ለማድረግ ማርታይ የቋንቋ ዳታ ማርታይ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ MOLD ለማርታቲ የዓይነቱ የመጀመሪያ ዳታተር ሰርቨሮች ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም አዲስ ዶሜኔን በዓይኖ-አርyan ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ ለመምርምር ይከፍታል፡፡ በዚህ ዳውተት ላይ በብንጋሊ፣ እንግሊዘኛ እና በኪንዲ ያሉት ዳታ ከሀገር የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ለውጦች የክፍተቶችን ቁጥር እና ሌሎችን ትምህርት ፈተና እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'The widespread presence of offensive language on social media motivated the development of systems capable of recognizing such content automatically.  Përveç disa përjashtimeve të rëndësishme, shumica e kërkimeve mbi identifikimin automatik ofensiv të gjuhës ka trajtuar anglishtin. Për të trajtuar këtë mungesë, ne prezantojmë MOLD, Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD është grupi i parë i të dhënave të llojit të tij i mbledhur për Marathi, duke hapur kështu një fushë të re për kërkim në gjuhët Indo-Aryane me burime të ulëta. Ne paraqesim rezultate nga disa eksperimente mësimi automatik në këtë set të dhënash, duke përfshirë eksperimente zero-shkurtër dhe eksperimente të tjera mësimi transferimi mbi transformuesit ndërgjuhësorë më të lartë nga të dhënat ekzistuese në Bengali, Anglisht dhe Hindi.', 'tr': "Sosyal medýdançalarda owadan diller bolup meýdança sistemleriniň bejermesini otomatik bilen tanap biljek sistemlerden çykyp gitdi. Birnäçe möhüm taýýarlardan başga, awtomatik gaýşartma dilinden ybarat bilen iňlisçe çykdy. Bu gysga çykmak üçin, Marathi öňündeki dil maglumaty MOLD'i tanyşdyrýarys. MOLD Maraty üçin birleştirilen ilkinji data setidir, şonuň üçin Indo-Aryan dillerinde araştyrmalar üçin täze bir domena a çylýar. Biz bu data setinde birnäçe maşynyň öwrenmesi deneylerinden çykýarys, bölegi Bengali ýa, iňlisçe we hindiýada bar maglumatlardan hem bolan mekdepler hakynda 0-gysga we başga transfers öwrenmesi deneylerinden çykýarys.", 'az': 'Sosyal mediyalarda həddi aşan dillərin vasitəsilə görünməsi bu məlumatı öz-özünə tanıyan sistemlərin təhsil etdi. Bir neçə möcüzə istisnalardan istisna olmaqla, çox avtomatik offensive dil kimliğini İngilizce dilindən çəkildi. Bu xəstəliyi çəkmək üçün, MOLD, Marathi Offensive Dil Datasetini tanıyırıq. MOLD Marathi üçün birləşdirilmiş ilk məlumat qutusu idi. Beləliklə, Indo-Aryan dillərində araştırma üçün yeni bir domena a çar. Biz bu veri qutusunda bir neçə maşın öyrənməsi təcrübələrindən sonuçlarını göstəririk, çünki sıfır qısa və başqa transfer öyrənməsi təcrübələrini Bengali, İngilizce və Hindistan məlumatlarından əlavə edilən məlumatlardan istifadə edirik.', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে আক্রান্ত ভাষার ব্যাপক উপস্থিতি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এই বিষয়বস্তুকে স্বীকৃতি জানাতে সক্ষম স কয়েকটি ব্যতিক্রম ছাড়া, বেশীরভাগ গবেষণা স্বয়ংক্রিয় আক্রান্ত ভাষার পরিচয় নিয়ে ইংরেজি নিয়েছে। এই সংক্ষিপ্ত সংক্ষেপের কথা বলার জন্য আমরা মারাথি অফেন্সিভ ভাষা ডাটাসেট পরিচয় করিয়ে দেব। এমওএলডি হচ্ছে মারাথির জন্য এর প্রথম তথ্য সংগ্রহের প্রথম ডাটাসেট, যার ফলে নীচের সম্পদ ইন্দো-আরিয়ান ভাষায় গবেষণার জন্য একটি নতুন ড আমরা এই ডাটাসেটে বেশ কয়েকটি মেশিন শিক্ষা পরীক্ষার ফলাফল উপস্থাপন করছি, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে শূন্যসংক্ষিপ্ত এবং অন্যান্য শিক্ষা পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে বাংল', 'bs': 'Prošireno prisustvo ofanzivnog jezika na društvenim medijima motiviralo je razvoj sustava koje su sposobne automatski priznati takav sadržaj. Osim nekoliko poznatih izuzetka, većina istraživanja o automatskoj identifikaciji jezika se bavila engleskim jezicima. Da bi se riješili ovog nedostatka, predstavljamo MOLD, Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD je prva grupa podataka svojih vrsta kompilovana za Marathi, tako otvarajući novu domenu za istraživanje na niskim resursima Indo-Arjanskim jezicima. Predstavljamo rezultate iz nekoliko eksperimenata za učenje strojeva na ovom setu podataka, uključujući eksperimente za prebacivanje nule kratke i druge prebacivanje na državu umjetničkih preko jezika transformatora iz postojećih podataka na Bengaliju, engleskom i hindiju.', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում զարգացող լեզուների տարածված ներկայությունը խթանեց համակարգերի զարգացումը, որոնք կարող են այդ պարունակությունը ինքնաբերաբար ճանաչել: Ավելին մի քանի նշանակալի բացառություններից, ավտոմատիկ հակառակ լեզվի հայտնաբերման հետազոտությունների մեծ մասը վերաբերվել է անգլերենի հետ: Այս բացակայությունը լուծելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք ՄՕԼԴ-ը, Մարատիի Անվտանգված լեզվի տվյալների համակարգը: ՄՕԼԴ-ն իր տեսակի առաջին տվյալների համակարգը է, որը կազմված է Մարաթիի համար, և այսպես բացում է նոր ոլորտ ցածր ռեսուրսներով հնդարական լեզուների ուսումնասիրության համար: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք որոշ մեքենային ուսումնասիրությունների արդյունքները այս տվյալների համակարգի վրա, ներառյալ զրո-կարճ և այլ փոխանցման ուսումնասիրություններ ամենաբարձր լեզվային փոխակերպողների վրա, որոնք ներկայացված են Բենգալիի, անգլերենի և հինդի տվյա', 'ca': "La gran presença de llenguatge ofensiu als mitjans socials va motivar el desenvolupament de sistemes capaços de reconèixer aquest contingut automàticament. A part d'algunes excepcions notables, la majoria de la recerca sobre l'identificació automàtica de llenguatges ofensius ha tractat amb l'anglès. Per abordar aquest problema, introduïm MOLD, el Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD és el primer conjunt de dades del seu tipus compilat per Marathi, així obrint un nou domini per a la recerca en llengües indoaríes de baix recursos. Presentam resultats de diversos experiments d'aprenentatge automàtic en aquest conjunt de dades, incloent experiments d'aprenentatge de transfer ència de zero i altres experiments d'aprenentatge de transferència en transformadors translingües més moderns a partir de dades existents en bengalí, anglès i hindí.", 'et': 'Laialdane solvava keele esinemine sotsiaalmeedias motiveeris selliste süsteemide arendamist, mis suudavad sellist sisu automaatselt ära tunda. Peale mõne märkimisväärse erandi on enamik automaatse solvava keele identifitseerimise uuringuid käsitlenud inglise keelt. Selle puuduse kõrvaldamiseks tutvustame Marathi rünnakute keele andmekogumit MOLD. MOLD on esimene omataoline marathi jaoks koostatud andmekogum, avades seega uue domeeni madala ressursiga indoaaria keelte uurimiseks. Esitleme mitmete masinõppe eksperimentide tulemusi sellel andmekogumil, sealhulgas nullühikese ja muude siirdeõppe eksperimentide tulemusi kaasaegsete keeleüleste transformaatoritega olemasolevatest andmetest bengali, inglise ja hindi keeles.', 'fi': 'Hyökkäävän kielen yleinen esiintyminen sosiaalisessa mediassa motivoi sellaisten järjestelmien kehittämistä, jotka pystyvät tunnistamaan tällaisen sisällön automaattisesti. Muutamia merkittäviä poikkeuksia lukuun ottamatta suurin osa automaattista loukkaavaa kielitunnistusta koskevista tutkimuksista on käsitellyt englantia. Tämän puutteen korjaamiseksi esittelemme MOLDin, Marathi Offensive Language Datasetin. MOLD on ensimmäinen Marathille koottu aineisto, joka avaa uuden tutkimusalueen vähävaraisten indoarjalaisten kielten tutkimukselle. Tässä aineistossa esitellään tuloksia useista koneoppimiskokeiluista, kuten nollalyhyistä ja muista siirtooppimiskokeiluista, joissa käytetään viimeisimpiä monikielisiä muuntajia, bengalin, englannin ja hindin nykyisistä tiedoista.', 'cs': 'Rozšířená přítomnost urážlivého jazyka na sociálních médiích motivovala k vývoji systémů schopných automaticky rozpoznat tento obsah. Kromě několika pozoruhodných výjimek se většina výzkumů o automatické identifikaci urážlivých jazyků zabývá angličtinou. Abychom tento nedostatek vyřešili, představujeme MOLD, Marathi Offensive Language Dataset. MOLD je první datová sada svého druhu sestavená pro Marathi, čímž otevírá novou doménu pro výzkum indo-árijských jazyků s nízkými zdroji. Představujeme výsledky několika experimentů strojového učení na této datové sadě, včetně nulového krátkého a dalších experimentů transferového učení na nejmodernějších cross-jazyčných transformátorech ze stávajících dat v bengálštině, angličtině a hindštině.', 'he': 'הנוכחות הרחבה של שפה פגיעה בתקשורת חברתית מוטיבציה את התפתחות של מערכות מסוגלות לזהות תוכן כזה באופן אוטומטי. Apart from a few notable exceptions, most research on automatic offensive language identification has dealt with English.  To address this shortcoming, we introduce MOLD, the Marathi Offensive Language Dataset.  MOLD הוא קבוצת המידע הראשונה של סוג זה מורכבת למראתי, כך פותחת תחום חדש למחקר בשפות אינדו-אריות נמוכות משאבים. אנחנו מציגים תוצאות מכמה ניסויים ללמוד מכונות על קבוצת הנתונים הזו, כולל ניסויים ללמוד העברה של אפס קצרים ואחרים על משתנים שפותיים צליבים חדשים ממידע קיים בבנגלית, אנגלית, והינדית.', 'jv': 'Rasané awak dhéwé éntuk ning limu akeh ning media sotiki dadi nggawe ngubah sistem sing iso nggawe barang akeh automatik. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ngawe mendhing nggawe barang iki dadi, awake dhewe nyimpen MOND, dataase Marati Ofensive Language. MOND is the first dataset of their kind Compiled for Marati, so open a new domain for R testing in small-source Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing paling-kelangan karo perusahaan dengané dataset iki, gambar 0 mungkin karo perusahaan kelangan kuwi nggawe barang kelangan karo perusahaan langkung', 'ha': "Ga faɗi da harshen turɓãya a kan mitandaya masu jamii, ta haramta kwamfyuta masu buɗewa na'ura da zai iya gane wannan maɓalli farat ɗaya. Fãce da kaɗan masu ƙidãya, mafi yawansu masu karatun shaidar lugha mai ƙiyayya farat ɗaya sun yi aiki da Ingiriya. Domin da za mu iya amfani da wannan kurs, za'a ƙunsa da MOLD, danne-danne na Marati da ɗabi'a. MOLD is the first set of data that is composed of its kind for Marati, to opened a new Domen for research in lower-resource Indo-Aryan languages. Tuna halatar da matsalar masu amfani da mashine masu ƙaranci kan wannan dataset, kamar jarrabar masu ƙaranci da matsala masu shige da matsayin sanarwa a kan halin-state-of-the-art-transformers daga data masu jira a cikin Bangali, Ingiriya, da Hindiya.", 'sk': 'Razširjena prisotnost žaljivega jezika na družbenih omrežjih je motivirala razvoj sistemov, ki so sposobni samodejno prepoznati takšne vsebine. Razen nekaj opaznih izjem se je večina raziskav o avtomatski žaljivi identifikaciji jezika ukvarjala z angleščino. Za odpravo te pomanjkljivosti predstavljamo MOLD, nabor podatkov o napadalnih jezikih Marathi. MOLD je prvi tovrstni nabor podatkov, zbranih za maratščino, s čimer se odpira nova domena za raziskave v indoarijskih jezikih z nizkimi viri. Predstavljamo rezultate več eksperimentov strojnega učenja na tem naboru podatkov, vključno z ničelno kratkimi in drugimi eksperimenti transfernega učenja na najsodobnejših medjezičnih transformatorjih iz obstoječih podatkov v bengalščini, angleščini in hindijščini.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ འོན་ཀྱང་། དམིགས་བསལ་ཉུང་ཤས་ཀྱི་འགྱུར་བརྗོད་ན། རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡུལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་ན། འོན་ཀྱང་མཐའ་དབུགས་འདི་ལ་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ་ནི་ང་ཚོར་MOLD ལ་ཤུལ་ཡིག་ཆ་སྨོན་གཞུང་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས། MOLD is the first data set of its kind compiled for Marathi, thus opening a new domain for research in low-resource Indo-Aryan languages. ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་འབྱུང་བའི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་གི་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཆ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ཚད་གཞི་ཚོགས་ལས་བརྗོད་བྱས་པའི་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་ལྡན་པའི་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་གཞན'}
{'en': 'Syntax and Themes : How Context Free Grammar Rules and Semantic Word Association Influence Book Success', 'ar': 'بناء الجملة والموضوعات: كيف تؤثر القواعد النحوية الخالية من السياق ورابطة الكلمات الدلالية على نجاح الكتاب', 'es': 'Sintaxis y temas: cómo las reglas gramaticales libres de contexto y la asociación de palabras semánticas influyen en', 'fr': "Syntaxe et thèmes\xa0: comment les règles de grammaire libres de contexte et l'association de mots sémantiques influencent le succès", 'pt': 'Sintaxe e temas: como regras gramaticais livres de contexto e associação semântica de palavras influenciam o sucesso do livro', 'ja': '構文とテーマ：文脈自由文法規則とセマンティックワードの関連性が本の成功に与える影響', 'hi': 'वाक्यविन्यास और थीम्स: कैसे संदर्भ मुक्त व्याकरण नियम और शब्दार्थ शब्द एसोसिएशन प्रभावित पुस्तक सफलता', 'zh': '语法和主题:上下文无关语法则语义词关何书之成?', 'ru': 'Синтаксис и темы: как свободные от контекста грамматические правила и семантическая ассоциация слов влияют на успех книги', 'ga': 'Comhréir agus Téamaí: Mar a Tionchar ag Comhthéacs Rialacha Gramadaí Saor in Aisce agus Comhlachas Focal Séimeantach ar Rathúlacht Leabhar', 'ka': 'სინტაქსი და სემები: როგორ კონტექსტის ბირადი გრამატური წესები და სემანტიკური სიტყვების აციციოციაციაციაციაციაციაციაციაციაციაცი', 'el': 'Συντονισμός και Θέματα: Πώς επηρεάζουν την επιτυχία του βιβλίου οι κανόνες της γραμματικής χωρίς πλαίσιο και η συσχέτιση σημασιολογικών λέξεων', 'it': "Sintassi e temi: come le regole grammaticali senza contesto e l'associazione di parole semantiche influenzano il successo del libro", 'hu': 'Szintaxis és témák: Hogyan befolyásolják a kontextusmentes nyelvtani szabályokat és a szemantikus szótársulást a könyvek sikerére?', 'kk': 'Синтаксис және нақыштар: Контексті бос грамматикалық ережелер және семантикалық сөз ассоциясы үлкен кітапшасы қанша сәтті', 'lt': 'Sintaksas ir temos: kaip sėkmingai sėkmingai įgyvendinti nemokamas konteksto gramatikos taisykles ir Semantinės žodžių asociacijos įtakos knygą', 'mk': 'Синтаксис и теми: Како слободните граматски правила за контекст и семантичката зборска асоцијација имаат успех во книгата за влијание', 'ms': 'Sintaks dan Tema: Bagaimana Peraturan Gram Bebas Konteks dan Persatuan Kata Semantik Berjaya Buku Influensi', 'ml': 'സിന്റാക്സും പ്രമേയങ്ങള്\u200d: എക്സ്റ്റെന്\u200dറ് സ്വതന്ത്രമായ ഗ്രാമാറ്ററുടെ നിയമങ്ങളും സെമാന്റിക് വാക്ക് സംഘട', 'mt': 'Syntax and Themes: How Context Free Grammar Rules and Semantic Word Association Influence Book Success', 'mn': 'Синтаксис болон сэтгэл хөдлөл: Яаж контекст үнэгүй грамматикийн хууль, Semantic Word Association Influence Book Амжилт', 'no': 'Syntaks og tema: Korleis kontekstfri grafikkreglar og semiantisk ordassosisjon', 'pl': 'Składnia i tematy: Jak zasady gramatyki bezkontekstowej i stowarzyszenie słów semantycznych wpływają na sukces książki', 'ro': 'Sintaxa și temele: Cum influențează regulile gramaticale fără context și asociația cuvintelor semantice succesul cărții', 'si': 'වාක්ය සහ තේමා', 'so': 'Waxyaabaha la xiriira qoraalka saameynta ee qofka la xiriira', 'sr': 'Sintaksa i tema: Kako uspešno osloboditi kontekstske pravila i semantička udruženja rijeèi', 'sv': 'Syntax och teman: Hur kontextfria grammatikregler och semantiska ordföreningar påverkar bokens framgång', 'ta': 'ஒத்திசைவு மற்றும் தலைப்புகள்:', 'ur': 'سینٹکس اور ٹیموں: کیسے کنٹکس آزاد گرامر قانون اور سیمانٹیکی کلمات اتصال Influence Book موفقیت ہے', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': '♪syntax and Themes: How Contxen Free Grammar quy tắc and Semantic Word Association influence Book Thành công', 'da': 'Syntaks og temaer: Hvordan kontekstfrie grammatikregler og semantiske ordforeninger påvirker bogens succes', 'bg': 'Синтаксис и теми: Как безконтекстните граматични правила и асоциацията на семантичните думи влияят на успеха на книгата', 'nl': "Syntaxis en thema's: Hoe contextvrije grammaticaregels en semantische woordassociatie het succes van boeken beïnvloeden", 'hr': 'Sintaksa i teme: Kako uspješno osloboditi pravila slobodne gravitacije konteksta i udruženje semantičnih riječi', 'de': 'Syntax und Themen: Wie kontextfreie Grammatikregeln und semantische Wortassoziation den Bucherfolg beeinflussen', 'id': 'Sintaks dan Tema: Bagaimana Context Free Grammar Rules and Semantic Word Association Influence Book Success', 'sw': 'Makala ya Syntax na Maudhui: Namna Sheria za Uhuru wa Mazungumzo na Chama cha Ushirikiano wa Matokeo ya Kijinsia', 'fa': 'سینتکس و عنوان: چگونه قانون گرامی آزاد کنترل و اتحاد کلمات سیمانتیک موفقیت کتاب اثر', 'tr': 'Sentaks we Temalar', 'af': 'Sintaks en tema: Hoe Konteks Vry Grammar Reëls en Semantiese Woord Associasie Influence Book suksesvol', 'am': 'Syntax and Theme: How Context Free Grammar Rules and Semantic Word Association Influence Book Succeeded', 'sq': 'Sintaksa dhe temat: Si suksesi i librit të ndikimit të Gramës së lirë dhe Shoqatës Semantike të Fjalëve', 'hy': 'Սինտաքսին և թեման. Ինչպե՞ս հաջողություն ունենալ անվճար գրամայի կանոնները և սեմանտիկ բառերի կապերը', 'bn': 'সিন্যাক্স এবং থিম: কিভাবে বিষয়বস্তু মুক্ত গ্রামার নিয়ম এবং সিম্যান্টিক শব্দ অ্যাসোসিয়েশন ইনফ্লুয়েন্', 'az': 'Sintaks v…ô Temalar: N…ô q…ôd…ôr Kontekst √Ėzg√ľr Grammar KurallarńĪ v…ô Semantik Kelimi ńįŇükil KitabńĪ ńįŇükil Et', 'bs': 'Sintaksa i tema: Kako uspješno osloboditi pravila slobodne gramatike i udruženje semantičnih riječi', 'ca': "Sintaxi i Temes: Com les Regles Gramàtiques Libres de Context i l'Associació Semàtica de paraules tenen èxit en el llibre d'influència", 'ko': '문법과 주제: 상하문은 문법 규칙과 어의어와 상관없이 책의 성공에 어떻게 영향을 미치는가', 'cs': 'Syntaxe a témata: Jak kontextová gramatická pravidla a sdružení sémantických slov ovlivňují úspěch knihy', 'et': 'Süntaks ja teemad: Kuidas kontekstivaba grammatika reeglid ja semantiline sõna ühendus mõjutavad raamatu edu', 'fi': 'Syntaksi ja teemat: Miten kontekstivapaat kielioppisäännöt ja semanttinen sanayhdistys vaikuttavat kirjan menestykseen', 'jv': 'Sentras lan Temas: ase context Free Gramm Regulars lan semanti Word Association', 'sk': 'Sintaksa in teme: Kako pravila slovnice brez konteksta in združenje semantičnih besed vplivajo na uspeh knjige', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'he': 'Syntax and Themes: How Context Free Grammar Rules and Semantic Word Association Influence Book Success', 'bo': 'Syntax and Themes: How Context Free Grammar Rules and Semantic Word Association Influence Book Success'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we attempt to improve upon the state-of-the-art in predicting a novel’s success by modeling the lexical semantic relationships of its contents. We created the largest dataset used in such a project containing lexical data from 17,962 books from Project Gutenberg. We utilized domain specific feature reduction techniques to implement the most accurate models to date for predicting book success, with our best model achieving an average accuracy of 94.0 %. By analyzing the model parameters, we extracted the successful semantic relationships from books of 12 different genres. We finally mapped those semantic relations to a set of themes, as defined in Roget’s Thesaurus and discovered the themes that successful books of a given genre prioritize. At the end of the paper, we further showed that our model demonstrate similar performance for book success prediction even when Goodreads rating was used instead of download count to measure success.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نحاول تحسين حالة الفن في التنبؤ بنجاح رواية من خلال نمذجة العلاقات الدلالية المعجمية لمحتوياتها. أنشأنا أكبر مجموعة بيانات مستخدمة في مثل هذا المشروع تحتوي على بيانات معجمية من 17962 كتابًا من مشروع جوتنبرج. لقد استخدمنا تقنيات تقليل الميزات الخاصة بالمجال لتنفيذ أكثر النماذج دقة حتى الآن للتنبؤ بنجاح الكتاب ، حيث حقق أفضل نموذج لدينا متوسط دقة 94.0٪. من خلال تحليل معلمات النموذج ، استخلصنا العلاقات الدلالية الناجحة من كتب من 12 نوعًا مختلفًا. لقد قمنا أخيرًا بتعيين تلك العلاقات الدلالية لمجموعة من الموضوعات ، على النحو المحدد في قاموس روجيه المرادفات واكتشفنا الموضوعات التي تعطيها الكتب الناجحة من نوع معين الأولوية. في نهاية البحث ، أظهرنا أيضًا أن نموذجنا يُظهر أداءً مشابهًا لتنبؤ نجاح الكتاب حتى عند استخدام تصنيف Goodreads بدلاً من عدد التنزيلات لقياس النجاح.', 'es': 'En este artículo, intentamos mejorar el estado de la técnica en la predicción del éxito de una novela modelando las relaciones semánticas léxicas de su contenido. Creamos el mayor conjunto de datos utilizado en un proyecto de este tipo que contiene datos léxicos de 17.962 libros del Proyecto Gutenberg. Utilizamos técnicas de reducción de características específicas del dominio para implementar los modelos más precisos hasta la fecha para predecir el éxito de los libros, con nuestro mejor modelo logrando una precisión media del 94,0%. Al analizar los parámetros del modelo, extraemos las relaciones semánticas exitosas de libros de 12 géneros diferentes. Finalmente mapeamos esas relaciones semánticas a un conjunto de temas, tal como se definen en el Tesauro de Roget, y descubrimos los temas que priorizan los libros exitosos de un género determinado. Al final del artículo, demostramos además que nuestro modelo demuestra un rendimiento similar en la predicción del éxito de los libros, incluso cuando se utiliza la calificación de Goodreads en lugar del recuento de descargas para medir el éxito.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous tentons d'améliorer l'état de la technique en matière de prédiction du succès d'un roman en modélisant les relations sémantiques lexicales de son contenu. Nous avons créé le plus grand ensemble de données utilisé dans un tel projet contenant des données lexicales provenant de 17 962 livres du projet Gutenberg. Nous avons utilisé des techniques de réduction des caractéristiques spécifiques au domaine pour mettre en œuvre les modèles les plus précis à ce jour pour prédire le succès des livres, notre meilleur modèle atteignant une précision moyenne de 94,0\xa0%. En analysant les paramètres du modèle, nous avons extrait les relations sémantiques réussies de livres de 12 genres différents. Nous avons finalement cartographié ces relations sémantiques à un ensemble de thèmes, tels que définis dans le Thésaurus de Roget, et nous avons découvert les thèmes prioritaires des livres à succès d'un genre donné. À la fin de l'article, nous avons également montré que notre modèle présentait des performances similaires pour la prédiction du succès des livres, même lorsque l'évaluation Goodreads était utilisée au lieu du nombre de téléchargements pour mesurer le succès.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, tentamos melhorar o estado da arte na previsão do sucesso de um romance, modelando as relações semânticas lexicais de seu conteúdo. Criamos o maior conjunto de dados usado em tal projeto contendo dados lexicais de 17.962 livros do Projeto Gutenberg. Utilizamos técnicas de redução de recursos específicos de domínio para implementar os modelos mais precisos até o momento para prever o sucesso do livro, com nosso melhor modelo atingindo uma precisão média de 94,0%. Ao analisar os parâmetros do modelo, extraímos as relações semânticas bem-sucedidas de livros de 12 gêneros diferentes. Por fim, mapeamos essas relações semânticas para um conjunto de temas, conforme definido no Thesaurus de Roget, e descobrimos os temas que os livros de sucesso de um determinado gênero priorizam. No final do artigo, mostramos ainda que nosso modelo demonstra desempenho semelhante para previsão de sucesso de livros, mesmo quando a classificação do Goodreads foi usada em vez da contagem de downloads para medir o sucesso.', 'ja': '本稿では、小説の内容の語彙的意味関係をモデル化することで、小説の成功を予測する最先端の方法を改善しようと試みる。プロジェクトグーテンベルクの17,962冊の本からの辞書データを含む、このようなプロジェクトで使用される最大のデータセットを作成しました。私たちは、ドメイン固有の機能低減技術を活用して、これまでで最も正確なモデルを実装し、本の成功を予測し、最高のモデルは平均94.0%の精度を達成しました。モデルパラメータを分析することで、12の異なるジャンルの本から成功した意味関係を抽出しました。ロジェのシソーラスで定義されているように、これらの意味関係を一連のテーマにマッピングし、特定のジャンルの成功した本が優先するテーマを発見しました。論文の最後では、成功を測定するためにダウンロード数の代わりにGoodreads評価を使用した場合でも、本の成功予測について同様のパフォーマンスを実証することを示しました。', 'zh': '于本文中,拟小说词汇语义改卜小说成功最新术。 创此一目之大集,而自古腾堡计之17,962本书之词汇数。 吾以特定域减术施迄今为止至正以占书成,吾以平准确率为94.0%。 因分析模型参数,取12种异书以成语义。 终映其语义,如RogetThesaurus之定义,而得给定之成书先虑之题。 论文之末,吾益明之,虽用Goodreads评级而非下载数以准成功,吾形于书成而类能也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम अपनी सामग्री के लेक्सिकल शब्दार्थ संबंधों को मॉडलिंग करके एक उपन्यास की सफलता की भविष्यवाणी करने में अत्याधुनिक सुधार करने का प्रयास करते हैं। हमने इस तरह की परियोजना में उपयोग किए जाने वाले सबसे बड़े डेटासेट का निर्माण किया है जिसमें प्रोजेक्ट गुटेनबर्ग से 17,962 पुस्तकों से लेक्सिकल डेटा शामिल है। हमने पुस्तक की सफलता की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए आज तक के सबसे सटीक मॉडल को लागू करने के लिए डोमेन विशिष्ट सुविधा में कमी तकनीकों का उपयोग किया, जिसमें हमारा सबसे अच्छा मॉडल 94.0% की औसत सटीकता प्राप्त कर रहा है। मॉडल मापदंडों का विश्लेषण करके, हमने 12 विभिन्न शैलियों की पुस्तकों से सफल शब्दार्थ संबंधों को निकाला। हमने अंततः उन शब्दार्थ संबंधों को विषयों के एक सेट के लिए मैप किया, जैसा कि रोगेट के थिसॉरस में परिभाषित किया गया है और उन विषयों की खोज की गई है जो किसी दिए गए शैली की सफल पुस्तकों को प्राथमिकता देते हैं। पेपर के अंत में, हमने आगे दिखाया कि हमारा मॉडल पुस्तक की सफलता की भविष्यवाणी के लिए समान प्रदर्शन का प्रदर्शन करता है, भले ही सफलता को मापने के लिए डाउनलोड गिनती के बजाय गुडरेड्स रेटिंग का उपयोग किया गया था।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы пытаемся улучшить современные методы прогнозирования успеха романа, моделируя лексические семантические отношения его содержания. Мы создали самый большой набор данных, используемый в таком проекте, содержащий лексические данные из 17 962 книг проекта Gutenberg. Мы использовали специфические для домена методы снижения характеристик для реализации самых точных моделей на сегодняшний день для предсказания успеха книги, при этом наша лучшая модель достигает средней точности 94,0%. Анализируя параметры модели, мы извлекали успешные семантические отношения из книг 12 различных жанров. Наконец, мы сопоставили эти семантические отношения с набором тем, как определено в Тезаурусе Роже, и обнаружили темы, которым отдают приоритет успешные книги данного жанра. В конце статьи мы также показали, что наша модель демонстрирует аналогичную эффективность для прогнозирования успеха книги, даже когда для измерения успеха использовался рейтинг Goodreads вместо количества загрузок.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iarracht feabhas a chur ar an úrscothacht maidir le rath an úrscéil a thuar trí shamhaltú a dhéanamh ar na caidrimh shéimeantacha léacsacha ina bhfuil ann. Chruthaíomar an tacar sonraí is mó a úsáidtear i dtionscadal dá leithéid ina bhfuil sonraí foclóireachta ó 17,962 leabhar ó Project Gutenberg. D’úsáideamar teicníochtaí laghdaithe sainghnéithe an fhearainn chun na samhlacha is cruinne go dtí seo a chur i bhfeidhm chun rathúlacht na leabhar a thuar, agus bhain ár múnla is fearr amach meánchruinneas 94.0%. Trí anailís a dhéanamh ar pharaiméadair na samhla, bhaineamar na caidrimh shéimeantacha rathúla as leabhair de 12 seánra éagsúla. Ar deireadh mhapálamar na caidrimh shéimeantacha sin le sraith téamaí, mar atá sainmhínithe i dTeasáras Roget agus fuaireamar amach na téamaí a dtugann leabhair rathúla seánra ar leith tosaíocht dóibh. Ag deireadh an pháipéir, thaispeáin muid freisin go léiríonn ár múnla feidhmíocht chomhchosúil maidir le rathúlacht leabhair a thuar fiú nuair a úsáideadh rátáil Goodreads in ionad an chomhaireamh íoslódála chun rathúlacht a thomhas.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ვცდილობთ წარმოდგენის წარმოდგენისთვის, რომელიც პრომენტის წარმოდგენისთვის მოდელექტიკური სიმენტიკური პირობების შესახებ. ჩვენ შევქმნა ყველაზე დიდი მონაცემების სექტი, რომელიც ამ პროექტიში გამოყენებული ლექსიკალური მონაცემები 17 962 წიგნიდან Gutenberg პროექტიდან. ჩვენ გამოიყენეთ დიომინის განსაკუთრებული განსაკუთრებული ტექნექციების შემცირების ტექნექციები, რომელიც ახლა უფრო დასაკუთრებელი მოდელების შემცირებისთვის წარმატების განსაკუთრებ მოდელური პარამეტრების ანალიზაციით, ჩვენ 12 განსხვავებული გენერების წიგნიდან წარმატების სექსმენტიკური პირობები გამოყენეთ. ბოლოს ჩვენ ამ სემონტიკური პროგენტის ტესასურსში განსაზღვრებული ტემანტიკური პროგენტიკური პროგენტიკური პროგენტიკური პროგენტიკური პროგენტიკური პროგენტიკური პროგენტიკ ჩვენ დავაკეთებდით, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი მოდელურად გამოიყენება წარმატებისთვის წარმატებისთვის წარმატების წარმატების წარმატებისთვის, მაგრამ როდესაც Goodreads რეტინგი გამოყენ', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, επιχειρούμε να βελτιώσουμε την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στην πρόβλεψη της επιτυχίας ενός μυθιστορήματος μοντελοποιώντας τις λεξικές σημασιολογικές σχέσεις των περιεχομένων του. Δημιουργήσαμε το μεγαλύτερο σύνολο δεδομένων που χρησιμοποιήθηκε σε ένα τέτοιο έργο που περιείχε λεξικά δεδομένα από 17,962 βιβλία από το Έργο Γκούντενμπεργκ. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε ειδικές τεχνικές μείωσης χαρακτηριστικών για να εφαρμόσουμε τα πιο ακριβή μοντέλα μέχρι σήμερα για την πρόβλεψη της επιτυχίας του βιβλίου, με το καλύτερο μοντέλο μας να επιτυγχάνει μια μέση ακρίβεια 94.0%. Αναλύοντας τις παραμέτρους του μοντέλου, εξάγουμε τις επιτυχείς σημασιολογικές σχέσεις από βιβλία δώδεκα διαφορετικών ειδών. Τελικά χαρτογραφήσαμε αυτές τις σημασιολογικές σχέσεις σε ένα σύνολο θεμάτων, όπως ορίζονται στον Θησαυρό του Ρότζετ και ανακαλύψαμε τα θέματα που δίνουν προτεραιότητα στα επιτυχημένα βιβλία ενός συγκεκριμένου είδους. Στο τέλος της εργασίας, δείξαμε περαιτέρω ότι το μοντέλο μας επιδεικνύει παρόμοια απόδοση για την πρόβλεψη επιτυχίας βιβλίων ακόμα και όταν χρησιμοποιήθηκε αξιολόγηση αντί για τον αριθμό λήψης για τη μέτρηση της επιτυχίας.', 'it': "In questo articolo, cerchiamo di migliorare lo stato dell'arte nel predire il successo di un romanzo modellando le relazioni semantiche lessicali dei suoi contenuti. Abbiamo creato il più grande set di dati utilizzato in questo progetto contenente dati lessicali provenienti da 17.962 libri del Progetto Gutenberg. Abbiamo utilizzato tecniche di riduzione delle funzionalità specifiche per il dominio per implementare i modelli più accurati finora per prevedere il successo del libro, con il nostro modello migliore che raggiunge una precisione media del 94,0%. Analizzando i parametri del modello, abbiamo estratto le relazioni semantiche di successo da libri di 12 generi diversi. Abbiamo infine mappato queste relazioni semantiche a una serie di temi, come definiti nel Thesaurus di Roget e scoperto i temi che i libri di successo di un dato genere privilegiano. Alla fine dell'articolo, abbiamo inoltre mostrato che il nostro modello dimostra prestazioni simili per la previsione del successo del libro anche quando la valutazione Goodreads è stata utilizzata invece del conteggio dei download per misurare il successo.", 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban megpróbáljuk javítani a regény sikerének előrejelzésének korszerűségét a tartalmának lexikai szemantikai kapcsolatainak modellezésével. Egy ilyen projektben használt legnagyobb adatkészletet hoztuk létre, amely 17 962 könyvből származó lexikális adatokat tartalmaz a Gutenberg Projektből. domain specifikus funkciócsökkentési technikákat alkalmaztunk a könyvek sikerének előrejelzésére eddigi legpontosabb modellek bevezetésére, a legjobb modellünk pedig 94,0%-os átlagos pontosságot ért el. A modell paramétereinek elemzésével 12 különböző műfajú könyvekből kivontuk a sikeres szemantikai kapcsolatokat. Végül feltérképeztük ezeket a szemantikai kapcsolatokat Roget Thezauruszában meghatározott témakészletekhez, és felfedeztük azokat a témákat, amelyeket egy adott műfaj sikeres könyvei priorizálnak. A cikk végén azt is megmutattuk, hogy modellünk hasonló teljesítményt mutat a könyvek sikeres előrejelzésében, még akkor is, ha Goodreads minősítést használtak a letöltések száma helyett a siker mérésére.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз романдың сәттілігін бақылау үшін оның мазмұнының лексикалық семантикалық қатынасын моделдеу үшін өзгерту күйін жақсартып көреміз. Бұл жобада Лексикалық деректер жинағын 17 962 кітаптардан қолданылатын ең үлкен деректер жинағын құрдық. Біз кітаптардың сәттілігін таңдау үшін күнгізгі дұрыс үлгілерді өзгерту үшін доменге арнаулы мүмкіндіктерді азайту техникаларын қолдандық. Біздің ең жақсы үлгіміз 94,0% де Модель параметрлерін анализиялау арқылы 12 жанрлық кітаптардан сәтті семантикалық қатынастарды алып тастадық. Біз соңында осы семантикалық қатынастарды Рогеттің тесаурусында анықталған нақыштардың бірнеше нақыштарына картап, келтірілген жанр артықшылығының сәтті кітаптарын табылдық. Қағаздың соңында, біз үлгіміздің кітаптардың сәттілігін бақылау үшін Goodreads рейтингиясы жүктеу санын өлшеу үшін қолданылған болса да ұқсас істеу үшін көрсетілдік.', 'lt': "In this paper, we attempt to improve upon the state-of-the-art in predicting a novel's success by modeling the lexical semantic relationships of its contents.  We created the largest dataset used in such a project containing lexical data from 17,962 books from Project Gutenberg.  Naudojome konkrečios srities savybių mažinimo metodus, kad iki šiol įgyvendintume tiksliausius modelius knygos sėkmei prognozuoti, o mūsų geriausias modelis pasiekė vidutinį 94,0 proc. tikslumą. Analizuodami modelio parametrus, išėmėme sėkmingus semantinius santykius iš 12 skirtingų genrų knygų. We finally mapped those semantic relations to a set of themes, as defined in Roget's Thesaurus and discovered the themes that successful books of a given genre prioritize.  At the end of the paper, we further showed that our model demonstrate similar performance for book success prediction even when Goodreads rating was used instead of download count to measure success.", 'mk': "Во овој весник се обидуваме да го подобриме најдоброто во предвидувањето на успехот на романот со моделирање на лексикалните семантични односи на неговата содржина. We created the largest dataset used in such a project containing lexical data from 17,962 books from Project Gutenberg.  Користевме техники за намалување на специфичните карактеристики на домените за спроведување на најпрецизните модели досега за предвидување на успехот на книгата, со нашиот најдобар модел постигнувајќи просечна прецизност од 94,0 отсто. Со анализирање на параметрите на моделот, ги извадивме успешните семантични односи од книги од 12 различни генери. We finally mapped those semantic relations to a set of themes, as defined in Roget's Thesaurus and discovered the themes that successful books of a given genre prioritize.  На крајот од весникот, понатаму покажавме дека нашиот модел демонстрира слични резултати за предвидување на успехот на книгата дури и кога беше употребен рејтингот на Goodreads наместо бројот на симнувања за мерење на успехот.", 'ms': "In this paper, we attempt to improve upon the state-of-the-art in predicting a novel's success by modeling the lexical semantic relationships of its contents.  Kami mencipta set data terbesar yang digunakan dalam projek seperti ini mengandungi data leksikal dari 17,962 buku dari Projek Gutenberg. We utilized domain specific feature reduction techniques to implement the most accurate models to date for predicting book success, with our best model achieving an average accuracy of 94.0%.  Dengan menganalisis parameter model, kami mengekstrak hubungan semantik yang berjaya dari buku 12 jenis yang berbeza. Akhirnya kami memetakan hubungan semantik tersebut kepada set tema, seperti yang ditakrif dalam Thesaurus Roget dan menemukan tema yang berhasil buku-buku jenis tertentu memberikan keutamaan. At the end of the paper, we further showed that our model demonstrate similar performance for book success prediction even when Goodreads rating was used instead of download count to measure success.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид зохиолын амжилтыг тодорхойлж зохиолын төвшинд сайжруулахыг хичээдэг. Бид ийм төсөл дээр хэрэглэгдсэн хамгийн том өгөгдлийн санг бүтээсэн. Гутенберг проектийн 17 962 номын лексикийн өгөгдлийг агуулсан. Бид номын амжилтыг тодорхойлох хамгийн тодорхой загварыг хэрэглэсэн. Хамгийн сайн загвар 94.0% дундаж тодорхойлолтой хүртэл 94.0% байдаг. Загварын параметрлүүдийг шинжилгээр бид 12 төрлийн номоос амжилттай семантик харилцаа гаргасан. Эцэст нь бид Роджетын Тесаурус дээр тодорхойлж, тэдгээр семантийн харилцааны газрын зураг зураг зураг зураг авч, өгсөн жанрын анхны номын амжилттай сэдвүүдийг олж мэдсэн. Цагийн төгсгөлд, бидний загвар нь амжилтыг хэмжих үед Goodreads оюутнуудыг ашиглах үедээ ч адилхан үйл ажиллагааг харуулсан.', 'mt': "In this paper, we attempt to improve upon the state-of-the-art in predicting a novel's success by modeling the lexical semantic relationships of its contents.  Ħolqien l-akbar sett ta’ dejta użat f’proġett bħal dan li fih dejta lexika minn 17,962 kotba mill-Proġett Gutenberg. We utilized domain specific feature reduction techniques to implement the most accurate models to date for predicting book success, with our best model achieving an average accuracy of 94.0%.  By analyzing the model parameters, we extracted the successful semantic relationships from books of 12 different genres.  We finally mapped those semantic relations to a set of themes, as defined in Roget's Thesaurus and discovered the themes that successful books of a given genre prioritize.  At the end of the paper, we further showed that our model demonstrate similar performance for book success prediction even when Goodreads rating was used instead of download count to measure success.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു, അതിന്റെ ഉള്ളടക്കങ്ങളുടെ ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d മാതൃകയാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നോവലിന്റെ  പ്രോജക്റ്റ് ഗുട്ടെന്\u200dബര്\u200dഗില്\u200d നിന്നും 17,962 പുസ്തകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാസേറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉള്ള ഒരു പ് We utilized domain specific feature reduction techniques to implement the most accurate models to date for predicting book success, with our best model achieving an average accuracy of 94.0%.  മോഡല്\u200d പരാമീറ്ററുകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിജയിച്ച സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d 12 വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ജീനുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് പു അവസാനം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കൂട്ടം പ്രമേയങ്ങളുടെ സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d മാപ്പ് ചെയ്തു. റോജെറ്റിന്റെ തീസറസില്\u200d വിശദീകരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പിന്ന At the end of the paper, we further showed that our model demonstrate similar performance for book success prediction even when Goodreads rating was used instead of download count to measure success.', 'no': 'I denne papiret prøver vi å forbedra den kunsttilstanden i å forventa ein romans suksess ved å modellere leksiske semantiske forholdet til innhaldet. Vi oppretta den største datasettet som er brukt i slik prosjekt som inneheld leksiske data frå 17 962 bøker frå prosjektet Gutenberg. Vi brukte domenespesifikke funksjonsreduksjonsteknologikar for å implementera dei mest nøyaktige modelane til dag for å foregå boksuksess, med vår beste modellen til å oppnå gjennomsnittlig nøyaktighet med 94,0%. Ved å analysere modellparametrane, tok vi ut de vellykke semantiske forholdene frå boka med 12 ulike gener. Vi har til slutt kartet desse semantiske forholdene til eit sett tema, som definert i Roget s in Thesaurus, og oppdaga dei temaene som suksessfulle bøker med ein gitt sjansprioritet. På slutten av papiret viste vi meir at modellen vårt viser liknande utviklingar for å foreslå boksuksess sjølv når Goodreads-utviklinga vart brukt i staden for å måle suksess.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, încercăm să îmbunătățim stadiul de ultimă oră în prezicerea succesului unui roman prin modelarea relațiilor semantice lexicale ale conținutului său. Am creat cel mai mare set de date utilizat într-un astfel de proiect conținând date lexicale din 17.962 de cărți din Proiectul Gutenberg. Am folosit tehnici de reducere a caracteristicilor specifice domeniului pentru a implementa cele mai precise modele de până în prezent pentru a anticipa succesul cărții, cel mai bun model al nostru atingând o precizie medie de 94,0%. Analizând parametrii modelului, am extras relațiile semantice de succes din cărți de 12 genuri diferite. În cele din urmă am mapat aceste relații semantice la un set de teme, așa cum sunt definite în Tezaurul lui Roget și am descoperit temele pe care cărțile de succes dintr-un anumit gen prioritizează. La sfârșitul lucrării, am arătat în continuare că modelul nostru demonstrează performanțe similare pentru predicția succesului cărților chiar și atunci când evaluarea Goodreads a fost utilizată în loc de numărul de descărcări pentru a măsura succesul.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule próbujemy ulepszyć stan sztuki w przewidywaniu sukcesu powieści poprzez modelowanie leksykalnych relacji semantycznych jej treści. Stworzyliśmy największy zestaw danych wykorzystywany w takim projekcie zawierający dane leksykalne z 17,962 książek Projektu Gutenberg. Wykorzystaliśmy techniki redukcji funkcji specyficznych dla domeny, aby wdrożyć najbardziej dokładne do tej pory modele do przewidywania sukcesu książki, przy czym nasz najlepszy model osiągał średnią dokładność 94,0%. Analizując parametry modelu, wyodrębniliśmy udane relacje semantyczne z książek dwunastu różnych gatunków. Wreszcie odwzorowaliśmy te relacje semantyczne do zestawu tematów, zdefiniowanych w Tezaurze Rogeta i odkryliśmy tematy, którym udane książki danego gatunku stawiają priorytet. Pod koniec artykułu wykazaliśmy, że nasz model wykazuje podobne wyniki w przewidywaniu sukcesu książek nawet wtedy, gdy ocena Goodreads była używana zamiast liczby pobierania do mierzenia sukcesu.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu isku dayaynaa in aan horumarinno xaaladda farshaxanka, in aan horumarinno liibaanka saxda, si aan u sameynno xiriirka leksikalka ah ee ku jira. We created the largest dataset used in such a project containing lexical data from 17,962 books from Project Gutenberg.  We utilized domain specific feature reduction techniques to implement the most accurate models to date for predicting book success, with our best model achieving an average accuracy of 94.0%.  Anaalbaarinta parameteralka modelka, waxaan ka soo bixinay xiriirka saxafka ah oo kala duduwan buugaagta 12 jinni oo kala duduwan. Ugu danbayntii waxaan karnay xiriirkaas semantika ah oo la xiriiray tijaabo, taasoo lagu qoray Roget's Thesaurus, waxaana soo ogaanay maadooyin ku liibaanay buugaagta horumarinta jinsi la siiyey. Dhammaantii warqadda, waxaynu sii muujinnay in modellkayagu uu muujiyo wax u eg tababar u eg si uu u muujiyo wax la sii sheegayo liibaanta kitaabka, xitaa marka la isticmaalay rabshadda Goofears la isticmaali karo xisaabta liibaanka.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats försöker vi förbättra det senaste i att förutsäga en romans framgång genom att modellera de lexikala semantiska relationerna i dess innehåll. Vi skapade den största datauppsättningen som använts i ett sådant projekt innehållande lexikala data från 17 962 böcker från Project Gutenberg. Vi använde domänspecifika funktionsreduktionstekniker för att implementera de mest exakta modellerna hittills för att förutsäga bokframgång, med vår bästa modell uppnådde en genomsnittlig noggrannhet på 94,0%. Genom att analysera modellparametrarna extraherade vi framgångsrika semantiska relationer från böcker av 12 olika genrer. Vi kartlade slutligen dessa semantiska relationer till en uppsättning teman, som definieras i Rogets Thesaurus och upptäckte de teman som framgångsrika böcker av en given genre prioriterar. I slutet av uppsatsen visade vi vidare att vår modell uppvisar liknande prestanda för bokframgångsförutsägelse även när Goodreads rating användes istället för nedladdningsmätning för att mäta framgång.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முயற்சி செய்ய முயற்சிக்கிறோம் அதில் உள்ள உள்ளடக்கத்தின் லெக்சிக்சியல் semantic தொடர்புகளை மாற்றி ஒரு புதையின் வ நாம் திட்டத்தில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட மிகப் பெரிய தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்கினோம், திட்டத்தில் இருந்து 17,962 புத்தகங்கள் க நாங்கள் களம் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பயன்படுத்தி புத்தகத்தின் வெற்றிக்கு தேதியில் சரியான மாதிரிகளை  By analyzing the model parameters, we extracted the successful semantic relationships from books of 12 different genres.  இறுதியாக நாங்கள் ஒரு கூட்டு தலைப்புகளுடன் அந்த அரைப்புருக்களை வரைபடத்தில் வரையப்பட்டோம், ரோஜெட்டின் கருவியில் வரையறுக்கப்பட்டது மற்றும் க காகிதத்தின் முடிவில், நாம் மேலும் காண்பித்தோம் எங்கள் மாதிரி புத்தகத்தின் வெற்றியை முன்வெற்றி முடிவில் காட்டுகிறது', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک کاغذ کی موفقیت کی پیش بینی کے ذریعے اس کے منصوبات کی لکسیکل سیمانٹی رابطہ کی نمونہ بنانے کی کوشش کی ہے. ہم نے اس طرح کے پروژے میں استعمال کیا ہوا سب سے بڑا ڈاٹ سٹ بنایا ہے جو 17 962 کتابوں میں سے لکسیکل ڈاٹ رکھتی ہے ہم نے ڈومین ویسی ویسی ویسی ویسی ویسی ویسی ٹیکنالوں کو استعمال کیا ہے کہ کتاب موفقیت کی پیش بینی کے لئے سب سے دقیق موڈلے کامل کریں، ہمارے سب سے بہترین موڈلہ 94.0% کے متوسط دقیق پہنچ رہے ہیں۔ موڈل پارامیٹروں کی تحقیق کے ذریعہ ہم نے 12 مختلف جنر کی کتابوں سے کامیاب سیمانٹی رابطہ نکالا۔ ہم نے بالاخرہ ان سیمانتی رابطہ کو ایک مجموعہ سے مکانٹ بنایا ہے جس طرح روجت کے تساروس میں تعریف کیا گیا ہے اور ان تہموں کو دیکھا تھا جن کو ایک مجموعہ طریقے سے موفق کتاب دی گئی ہیں۔ کاغذ کے آخر میں ہم نے بھی دکھایا کہ ہماری مدل کتاب کے موفقیت کی پیش بینی کے لئے برابر عمل دکھاتی ہے حتی جب گوڈریڈز ریٹ ڈال ڈال گنٹ کے بدلے کامیابی کے اندازے سے استعمال کیا گیا تھا۔', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru pokušavamo poboljšati stanje umjetnosti u predviđanju uspeha romana modeliranjem leksičkih semantičkih odnosa njegovog sadržaja. Stvorili smo najveći set podataka koji se koristi u takvom projektu koji sadrži leksičke podatke iz 17 962 knjiga iz projekta Gutenberg a. Koristili smo tehnike smanjenja specifičnih karakteristika domena za provedbu najpreciznijih modela do sada za predviđanje uspeha knjige, sa našim najboljim modelom koji postigne prosječnu tačnost od 94,0%. Analizirajući modelne parametre, izvadili smo uspešne semantičke veze iz knjiga od 12 različitih genara. Konačno smo mapirali te semantičke odnose s a setom tema, kao što je definisano u Rogetovom Thesaurusu, i otkrili teme koje su uspešne knjige od određenog prioriteta genre. Na kraju papira, dalje smo pokazali da naš model pokazuje sličnu predviđanju uspeha knjiga čak i kad je rejting Goodreadsa korišćen umjesto preuzimanja broja za mjerenje uspeha.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි උත්සාහ කරනවා කාමරිකාරියක් සාර්ථක සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා කියලා. අපි ප්\u200dරජේක්ට ගුටෙන්බර්ගේ 17,962 පොත් වලින් ලෙක්සිකාල් දත්ත තියෙන ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වලින් භාවිත වැඩි  අපි පොත සාර්ථක විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, අපේ හොඳම මදුල මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරමාණය විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා අපි වෙනස් සාමාන්තික සම්බන්ධයක් පොත්තු 12 වලින් පොත්තු වලින් පිළ අපි අන්තිමේදී ඒ සිමාන්තික සම්බන්ධ විදිහට තේමාවක් තියෙනවා, රෝජෙට්ගේ තේසෝරුස් වල විශේෂ කරලා තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම ස පැත්තේ අවසානයේදී, අපි තව පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පොත්තේ සාර්ථක විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා', 'vi': 'Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi cố gắng cải thiện trạng thái nghệ thuật tiên đoán thành công của một cuốn tiểu thuyết bằng cách mô tả các mối quan hệ văn học theo nội dung của nó. Chúng tôi đã tạo ra bộ dữ liệu lớn nhất được dùng trong dự án này chứa dữ liệu từ sách 17,962 từ dự án Gutenberg. Chúng tôi sử dụng các kỹ thuật giảm đặc trưng miền để thực hiện các mô hình chính xác nhất cho đến nay để dự đoán thành công sách, với mô hình tốt nhất đạt được độ chính xác trung bình của 94.0 Name Phân tích các thông số mô hình, chúng tôi rút ra các mối quan hệ theo ngữ nghĩa thành công từ sách 12. Cuối cùng chúng tôi vẽ những quan hệ ngữ pháp này thành một bộ s ắc thái, như được định nghĩa trong Theseus của Roget và khám phá những sắc thái chủ đề mà sách thành công của một thể loại đã ưu tiên. Ở cuối tờ báo, chúng tôi còn cho thấy mô hình của chúng tôi hiển thị khả năng tương tự cho dự đoán thành công trong sách kể cả khi đánh giá Goodreads đã được dùng thay vì tải số để đo thành công.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz ma'lumotning holatiga muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rib chiqadi. Leksikal semantik munosabatlarini o'zgartirish orqali yordam berishga harakat qilamiz. Bu loyihada ishlatilgan eng katta maʼlumot satrini yaratdik. Loyiha Gutenberg loyihasidagi 17,962 kitobdagi leksikal maʼlumotlar bor. Biz domen uchun foydalanuvchi foydalanamiz, kutilgan kitob muvaffaqiyatli uchun eng yaxshi modellarni bajarish uchun foydalanamiz va eng yaxshi modelmiz 94.0 foizga ega bo'ladi. Model parametrlarini analyzer bilan biz 12 boshqa genlar kitobdagi muvaffaqiyatli semantik huquqlarini chiqardik. Endi biz Roget's Thesaurusda aniqlangan mavzularning semantik huquqlarini yaratdik va bu mavzularni topdik. Koʻrsatilgan gening bir muhim darajasida muvaffaqiyatli kitoblarni topdik. Qogʻozning oxirida, biz modelmiz muvaffaqiyatlarni yozib olish uchun bir xil muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rsatadi.", 'da': 'I denne artikel forsøger vi at forbedre det avancerede niveau i forudsigelse af en romans succes ved at modellere de leksikske semantiske relationer af dens indhold. Vi har skabt det største datasæt, der anvendes i et sådant projekt, indeholdende leksikalske data fra 17.962 bøger fra Project Gutenberg. Vi brugte domænespecifikke funktionsreduktionsteknikker til at implementere de mest præcise modeller til dato til at forudsige bogssucces, hvor vores bedste model opnåede en gennemsnitlig nøjagtighed på 94,0%. Ved at analysere modelparametrene har vi udvundet de succesfulde semantiske relationer fra bøger af 12 forskellige genrer. Vi kortlagde endelig disse semantiske relationer til et sæt temaer, som defineret i Rogets Thesaurus, og opdagede de temaer, som succesrige bøger af en given genre prioriterer. I slutningen af artiklen viste vi endvidere, at vores model viser lignende ydeevne for forudsigelse af bogsucces, selv når Goodreads rating blev brugt i stedet for downloadtal til at måle succes.', 'nl': "In dit artikel proberen we de state-of-the-art in het voorspellen van het succes van een roman te verbeteren door de lexicale semantische relaties van de inhoud ervan te modelleren. We creëerden de grootste dataset die gebruikt wordt in zo'n project met lexicale gegevens uit 17,962 boeken van Project Gutenberg. We gebruikten domeinspecifieke feature reduction technieken om de meest nauwkeurige modellen tot nu toe te implementeren voor het voorspellen van boeksucces, waarbij ons beste model een gemiddelde nauwkeurigheid van 94,0%. Door de modelparameters te analyseren, hebben we de succesvolle semantische relaties geëxtraheerd uit boeken van twaalf verschillende genres. Uiteindelijk brachten we die semantische relaties in kaart met een reeks thema's, zoals gedefinieerd in Rogets Thesaurus en ontdekten we de thema's die succesvolle boeken van een bepaald genre prioriteit geven. Aan het einde van het artikel toonden we verder aan dat ons model vergelijkbare prestaties vertoont voor boeksuccesvoorspellingen, zelfs wanneer Goodreads-rating werd gebruikt in plaats van downloadtelling om succes te meten.", 'bg': 'В тази статия се опитваме да подобрим състоянието на изкуството в предсказването на успеха на романа чрез моделиране на лексикалните семантични взаимоотношения на съдържанието му. Създадохме най-големия набор от данни, използван в такъв проект, съдържащ лексикални данни от 17 962 книги от проект Гутенберг. Използвахме специфични за домейна техники за намаляване на характеристиките, за да внедрим най-точните модели до момента за прогнозиране на успеха на книгите, като най-добрият ни модел постигна средна точност от 94,0%. Чрез анализ на параметрите на модела извличаме успешните семантични взаимоотношения от книги от 12 различни жанра. Накрая картографирахме тези семантични връзки към набор от теми, както са дефинирани в речника на Роже и открихме темите, които успешните книги от даден жанр приоритетизират. В края на доклада показахме, че нашият модел демонстрира сходна производителност за прогнозиране на успеха на книгите дори когато рейтингът е използван вместо броя на изтеглянията, за да измерва успеха.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru pokušavamo poboljšati stanje umjetnosti u predviđanju uspjeha romana modeliranjem leksičkih semantičkih odnosa sadržaja. Stvorili smo najveći set podataka koji se koristi u takvom projektu koji sadrži leksičke podatke iz 17 962 knjiga iz projekta Gutenberg. Koristili smo tehnike smanjenja specifičnih karakteristika domena za provedbu najpreciznijih modela do sada za predviđanje uspjeha knjiga, s našim najboljim modelom postizanjem prosječne tačnosti od 94,0%. Analizirajući modelne parametre, izvadili smo uspješne semantičke veze iz knjiga od 12 različitih genara. Konačno smo mapirali te semantičke odnose s a gomilom tema, kako je definirano u Rogetovom Thesaurusu, i otkrili teme koje su uspješne knjige određene prioritet genre. Na kraju papira, dalje smo pokazali da naš model pokazuje slične učinke za predviđanje uspjeha knjiga čak i kad se Goodreads ocjena koristi umjesto preuzimanja broja za mjerenje uspjeha.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag versuchen wir, den Stand der Technik bei der Vorhersage des Erfolgs eines Romans zu verbessern, indem wir die lexikalischen semantischen Beziehungen seiner Inhalte modellieren. Wir haben den größten Datensatz erstellt, der lexikalische Daten aus 17,962 Büchern des Projekts Gutenberg enthält. Wir haben domänenspezifische Feature Reduction Techniken verwendet, um die genauesten Modelle zur Vorhersage des Bucherfolgs zu implementieren, wobei unser bestes Modell eine durchschnittliche Genauigkeit von 94,0%. Durch die Analyse der Modellparameter extrahierten wir die erfolgreichen semantischen Beziehungen aus Büchern von zwölf verschiedenen Genres. Schließlich haben wir diese semantischen Beziehungen zu einer Reihe von Themen abgebildet, wie sie in Rogets Thesaurus definiert sind und die Themen entdeckt, die erfolgreiche Bücher eines bestimmten Genres priorisieren. Am Ende des Aufsatzes zeigten wir weiter, dass unser Modell eine ähnliche Leistung für die Erfolgsvorhersage von Büchern zeigt, selbst wenn Goodreads-Rating anstelle der Download-Zählung zur Erfolgsmessung verwendet wurde.', 'id': "In this paper, we attempt to improve upon the state-of-the-art in predicting a novel's success by modeling the lexical semantic relationships of its contents.  We created the largest dataset used in such a project containing lexical data from 17,962 books from Project Gutenberg.  Kami menggunakan teknik pengurangan fitur spesifik domain untuk mengimplementasi model yang paling akurat sehari-hari untuk memprediksi sukses buku, dengan model terbaik kami mencapai akurezi rata-rata 94,0%. Dengan menganalisis parameter model, kami mengekstrak hubungan semantis yang sukses dari buku 12 jenis yang berbeda. Akhirnya kami memetakan hubungan semantis tersebut kepada set tema, seperti yang didefinisikan dalam Thesaurus Roget dan menemukan tema yang berhasil buku-buku dari jenis tertentu prioritas. Pada akhir kertas, kami lebih lanjut menunjukkan bahwa model kami menunjukkan prestasi yang sama untuk prediksi sukses buku bahkan ketika nilai Goodreads digunakan daripada menghitung download untuk mengukur sukses.", 'sw': "In this paper, we attempt to improve upon the state-of-the-art in predicting a novel's success by modeling the lexical semantic relationships of its contents.  Tumetengeneza taarifa kubwa zaidi iliyotumika katika mradi huu ikiwa na taarifa za kisaikolojia kutoka vitabu 17,962 kutoka Mradi wa Gutenberg. Tulitumia mbinu maalum za kupunguza kwa ajili ya kutekeleza mifano sahihi zaidi mpaka sasa kwa ajili ya kutabiri mafanikio ya kitabu, na mifano yetu bora zaidi ya kufikia uhakika wa wastani wa asilimia 94.0. Kwa kuchambua parameters za mifano, tulitoa mafanikio ya mahusiano ya kimapenzi kutoka vitabu 12 tofauti. Hatimaye tuliorodhesha mahusiano hayo yanayohusiana na mfululizo wa mada, kama ilivyoelezwa katika Tamko la Roget na tukagundua mada ambazo zilifanikiwa na vitabu vya kipaumbele cha kijinsia. Mwisho wa gazeti hilo, tulionyesha zaidi kuwa mwelekeo wetu umeonyesha utendaji wa mafanikio kama huo kwa kutabiri mafanikio ya kitabu hata pale ambapo Goofear ratiba zilitumika badala ya kupunguza idadi ya kupunguza mafanikio.", 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 소설 내용에 대한 어휘와 의미 관계의 모델링을 통해 소설의 성공을 예측하는 최신 기술을 개선하고자 한다.우리는 이 프로젝트에서 사용된 가장 큰 데이터 집합을 만들었는데, 그 중에는 쿠템버그 프로젝트 17962권의 어휘 데이터가 포함되어 있다.우리는 특정 분야의 특징 축소 기술을 이용하여 지금까지 도서 성공률을 예측한 가장 정확한 모델을 실현했다. 우리의 가장 좋은 모델의 평균 정확도는 94.0%이다.모델 파라미터를 분석함으로써 우리는 12가지 서로 다른 장르의 책에서 성공적인 의미 관계를 추출했다.우리는 로거의 동의어 라이브러리에서 정의한 바와 같이 이러한 의미 관계를 하나의 주제에 비추어 어떤 유형의 성공 서적이 우선적으로 고려하는 주제를 발견했다.논문의 마지막 부분에서 Goodreads 등급을 다운로드 계수가 아닌 Goodreads 등급으로 평가하더라도 Goodreads 모델은 도서의 성공을 예측하는 데 유사한 성능을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما سعی می\u200cکنیم در پیش\u200cبینی موفقیت یک روزنامه را با نمونه\u200cسازی رابطه\u200cهای طبیعی زبان\u200cشناسی از محتویاتش بهتر کنیم. ما بزرگترین مجموعه داده\u200cها را در این پروژه استفاده کرده\u200cایم که از ۱۷.962 کتاب پروژه گوتنبرگ داده شده\u200cاند. ما از فناوری کاهش ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای استفاده کردیم که برای پیش\u200cبینی موفقیت کتاب\u200cها از مدل\u200cهای دقیق\u200cترین مدل\u200cهای دقیق تا الان انجام دهیم، با بهترین مدل\u200cهای ما به رسیدن دقیق متوسط 94.0 درصد. با تحلیل پارامترهای مدل، رابطه های موفقیت semantic را از کتاب های ۱۲ ژنترهای مختلف خارج کردیم. بالاخره ما این رابطه\u200cهای semantic را با یک مجموعه از عنوان\u200cها نقشه\u200cبندی کردیم، همانطور که در تساروس روجت تعریف شده و عنوان\u200cهایی که کتاب\u200cهای موفقیت به عنوان یک اولویت نوع داده شده را کشف کردیم. در پایان کاغذ، ما بیشتر نشان دادیم که مدل ما برای پیش بینی موفقیت کتاب مشابه را نشان می دهد حتی زمانی که مقدار Goodreads به جای عدد دانلود برای اندازه موفقیت استفاده می شود.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, biz bir romanyň başarnygyny örän semantik baglaýyşyny örän döwletlere gelişmäge synanyşýarys. Böyle bir projede ulanylan iň uly sany maglumat setini 17,962 kitaplardan Gutenberg Projesinden ullanýardyk. Kitap başarnygy önlemek üçin iň dogry nusgalary ýüklemek üçin bu domain hilli hasaplamak tekniklerini ulandyk. Biziň iň gowy nusgamyz ortalama dogrylygyny 94.0%-den çykarmak üçin ullanýardyk. Model parametrularyny çözerek, 12 üýtgeşik jam kitaplardan üstünlikli semantik baglaýyşlary çykardyk. Soňunda biz bu semantik ilişkileri Roget'iň Thesaurusynda tanalýan bir tema bilen suratlandyrdyk we muny beýleki ýarym öňüniň üstünlikli kitaplarynyň tapdyk. Gazeteň soňunda, nusgymyzyň kitaplaryň başarylygy öňünden hatda Goodreads derejesi ýüklemek üçin ýüklemek üçin üýtgetmek üçin üýtgeşigini görkezilýändigini görkezdik.", 'sq': "In this paper, we attempt to improve upon the state-of-the-art in predicting a novel's success by modeling the lexical semantic relationships of its contents.  Ne krijuam grupin më të madh të të dhënave të përdorura në një projekt të tillë që përmban të dhëna lexike nga 17,962 libra nga Projekti Gutenberg. Ne përdorëm teknika të reduktimit të karakteristikave specifike në domeni për të zbatuar modelet më të sakta deri tani për parashikimin e suksesit të librit, me modelin tonë më të mirë që arrin një saktësi mesatare prej 94.0%. By analyzing the model parameters, we extracted the successful semantic relationships from books of 12 different genres.  Ne më në fund i hartuam a to marrëdhënie semantike në një s ërë temësh, siç përcaktohen në Tezaurusin e Roget dhe zbuluam temat që librat e suksesshëm të një xheneri të caktuar prioritetin. Në fund të gazetës, ne treguam më tej se modeli ynë demonstron performancë të ngjashme për parashikimin e suksesit të librit edhe kur vlerësimi i Goodreads u përdor në vend të numrit të shkarkimeve për të matur suksesin.", 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የልዩ አካባቢ ሥርዓት አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ከፕሮጀክት ጉቴንበርግ 17,962 መጻሕፍት የሌክሲካ ዳታዎችን በመያዝ ውስጥ የሚጠቀሙትን ትልቁ ዳታተር ሰርሰናል፡፡ ከዶሜን የተለየ የዋጋ አካሄድ መክፈት ስልጣናዎችን ለመቀጠል የመጽሐፉ ፍለጋት ለማድረግ በጣም እውነተኛ ሞዴላዎችን ተጠቀምን፡፡ የሞዴል parameters በማስተያየት፣ የስኬታዊውን የsemantic ግንኙነት ከአሥራ ሁለት ልዩ የሥርዓት መጻሕፍት አወጣን፡፡ በመጨረሻም የሮጌ ቴሶሮስ የተዘጋጀውን የሥርዓት መጻሕፍት የደረሰችውን የሥርዓት ቅድሚያ መጻሕፍት አግኝተናል፡፡ ደብዳቤው ፍጻሜ፣ ሞዴላያችን በመጽሐፉ የድል ውጤት እንዲያሳየው እና ጎፈራ ሽፋት በተጠቀም ጊዜ እንኳ ማድረግ ማሰናከል በተደረገ ጊዜ እንኳ በመጽሐፉ ማድረግ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': "In this paper, we attempt to improve upon the state-of-the-art in predicting a novel's success by modeling the lexical semantic relationships of its contents.  Մենք ստեղծեցինք այնպիսի ծրագրում օգտագործվող ամենամեծ տվյալների համակարգը, որը պարունակում է 17.96 գրքի լեքսիկական տվյալներ Գուտենբերգի ծրագրից: Մենք օգտագործեցինք բնագավառի հատուկ հատկանիշների կրճատման մեթոդներ, որպեսզի ներկայացնենք գրքի հաջողության կանխատեսման ամենաճշգրիտ մոդելները, մեր լավագույն մոդելը հասնելով միջին ճշգրտությունը 94,0 տոկոսի: Մոդելի պարամետրերի վերլուծությամբ մենք հանեցինք հաջողակ սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունները 12 տարբեր գեներով գրքերից: Մենք վերջապես քարտեզագրեցինք այդ սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունները մի շարք թեմաների հետ, ինչպես սահմանվում է Ռոգետի թեզավրուսում, և բացահայտեցինք թեմաները, որոնք հաջողակ գրքերը որոշ գենդերային գերակայություններ են տալիս: Թղթի վերջում մենք նաև ցույց տվեցինք, որ մեր մոդելը ցույց է տալիս գրքի հաջողության կանխատեսման նման արդյունք նույնիսկ այն ժամանակ, երբ Գուդլայդսի գնահատականը օգտագործվել էր հաջողության չափման համար ներբեռնման հաշվարկի փոխարեն", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের উপর উন্নতি প্রচেষ্টা করছি একটি উপন্যাস ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে তার বিষয়বস্তুর লেক্সিক্সিক সেমেন্টিক সম্পর্ক প্রকল্প গুটেনবার্গ থেকে ১৭,৯62 বই থেকে লেক্সিক্যাল ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করা এই প্রকল্পের সবচেয়ে বড় ডাটাসেট আমরা তৈরি  আমরা ডোমেইনের নির্দিষ্ট বৈশিষ্ট্য কমানোর প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করেছি যাতে পূর্ববর্তী বই সফলতার জন্য তারা সবচেয়ে সঠিক মডেল বাস্তবায়িত করার জন্য,  মডেলের প্যারামিটার বিশ্লেষণ করার মাধ্যমে আমরা ১২টি ভিন্ন জিনিসের বই থেকে সফল সেমেন্টিক সম্পর্ক বের করে আনলা শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা রোজেটের থিসোরাসে নির্দিষ্ট বিষয়গুলোর সেমেন্টিক সম্পর্ক ম্যাপ করেছি এবং প্রদত্ত জিনিসের পুরোপুরি পুরোপুরি বিষয়ে কাগজপত্রের শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা আরো দেখিয়েছিলাম যে আমাদের মডেল বুকের সফল ভবিষ্যৎবাণীর জন্য একই ধরনের প্রদর্শন প্রদর্শন করছে, এমনকি যখন গুভর্স রেট', 'az': "Bu kağızda, bir romanın başarıs ızlığını müəyyən etmək üçün məlumatının leksik semantik ilişkilerini modelləşdirmək üçün çalışırıq. Biz bu proqramda kullanılan ən böyük verilən quruluş yaratdıq ki, proqramdan 17 962 kitablardan leksik verilənlər barəsində. Kitab başarısızlığını təmin etmək üçün ən nöqsanlı modelləri müəyyən etmək üçün, ən yaxşı modellərimiz 94.0%-in ortalama doğruluğuna çatdırmaq üçün domain özlərini azaltma tekniklərini istifadə etdik. Model parametrlərini analizə edərək, 12 müxtəlif genr kitablarından müvəffəqi semantik ilişkiləri çıxartdıq. Sonunda bu semantik ilişkiləri Roget's Thesaurus'da tanımlayan məs ələlərə qarşılaşdırdıq və bu məsələləri müvəffəqiyyətli nümunə verilən məsələlərdən öyrəndik. Kağıt sonunda, modellərimizin başarılı ölçü üçün Goodreads qiyməti istifadə edildiyi halda, kitab başarısızlığı üçün bənzər performansını göstərdiyini göstərdik.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru pokušavamo poboljšati stanje umjetnosti u predviđanju uspjeha romana modeliranjem leksičkih semantičkih odnosa njegovog sadržaja. Stvorili smo najveći set podataka koji se koristi u takvom projektu koji sadrži leksičke podatke iz 17 962 knjiga iz projekta Gutenberg. Koristili smo tehnike smanjenja specifičnih karakteristika domena za provedbu najpreciznijih modela do sada za predviđanje uspjeha knjige, s našim najboljim modelom koji postigne prosječnu tačnost od 94,0%. Analizirajući modelne parametre, izvadili smo uspješne semantičke veze iz knjiga od 12 različitih genara. Konačno smo mapirali te semantičke odnose s a setom tema, kako je definisan u Rogetovom Thesaurusu, i otkrili teme koje su uspješne knjige od određenog prioriteta genre. Na kraju papira, dalje smo pokazali da naš model pokazuje sličnu predviđanju uspjeha knjiga čak i kad je rejting Goodreadsa korišćen umjesto preuzimanja broja za mjerenje uspjeha.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku se snažíme zlepšit stav techniky v predikci úspěchu románu modelováním lexikálních sémantických vztahů jeho obsahu. Vytvořili jsme největší datovou sadu používanou v takovém projektu obsahující lexikální data z 17,962 knih Projektu Gutenberg. K implementaci dosud nejpřesnějších modelů pro predikci úspěchu knihy jsme využili techniky redukce funkcí specifických pro doménu, přičemž náš nejlepší model dosahuje průměrné přesnosti 94,0%. Analýzou parametrů modelu jsme extrahovali úspěšné sémantické vztahy z knih dvanácti různých žánrů. Nakonec jsme zmapovali tyto sémantické vztahy k souboru témat, jak je definováno v Rogetově tezauře a objevili témata, která úspěšné knihy daného žánru upřednostňují. Na konci příspěvku jsme dále ukázali, že náš model vykazuje podobný výkon pro predikci úspěšnosti knih, i když byl použit hodnocení Goodreads namísto počtu stahování k měření úspěchu.', 'ca': "En aquest article intentem millorar l'estat d'última generació en predir l'èxit d'una novel modelant les relacions semàntiques lèxices del seu contingut. We created the largest dataset used in such a project containing lexical data from 17,962 books from Project Gutenberg.  Vam utilitzar tècniques de reducció de característiques específices de domini per implementar els models més precisos fins ara per predir l'èxit del llibre, amb el nostre millor model aconseguint una precisió mitjana del 94,0%. Analitzant els paràmetres del model, vam extreure les relacions semàntiques d'èxit de llibres de 12 gèneres diferents. Finalment vam mapejar aquestes relacions semàntiques a un conjunt de temes, com es defineix en el Tesaure de Roget, i vam descobrir els temes que els llibres d'èxit d'un gènere determinat prioritzen. Al final del paper, vam demostrar que el nostre model demostrava un desempeny similar a la predicció de l'èxit del llibre fins i tot quan la puntuació Goodreads va ser utilitzada en lloc del nombre de descargues per mesurar l'èxit.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös püüame parandada romaani edu prognoosimisel kaasaegset arengut, modelleerides selle sisu leksikaalseid semantilisi suhteid. Loosime suurima sellises projektis kasutatava andmekogumi, mis sisaldas leksikaalseid andmeid 17 962 raamatust Project Gutenberg. Kasutasime domeenispetsiifilisi funktsioonide vähendamise meetodeid, et rakendada seni kõige täpsemaid mudeleid raamatute edukuse prognoosimiseks, kusjuures parim mudel saavutas keskmise täpsuse 94,0%. Mudeli parameetrite analüüsimisel ekstraheerisime edukad semantilised seosed 12 eri žanri raamatutest. Lõpuks kaardistasime need semantilised seosed Rogeti Tesauruses määratletud teemadega ning avastasime teemad, mida konkreetse žanri edukad raamatud prioriteediks seavad. Töö lõpus näitasime, et meie mudel näitab sarnast tulemust raamatute eduprognoosimisel isegi siis, kui edu mõõtmiseks kasutati Goodreadsi hinnangut allalaadimiste arvu asemel.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä pyrimme parantamaan romaanin menestystä ennustamalla mallintamalla sen sisällön lexikaalisia semanttisia suhteita. Laadimme suurimman tällaisessa projektissa käytetyn aineiston, joka sisälsi sanastoaineistoa 17 962 teoksesta Project Gutenberg. Käytimme verkkotunnuskohtaisia ominaisuusvähennystekniikoita toteuttaaksemme tähän mennessä tarkimmat mallit kirjan onnistumisen ennustamiseksi, ja paras mallimme saavutti keskimääräisen tarkkuuden 94,0%. Analysoimalla malliparametreja poimimme onnistuneet semanttiset suhteet 12 eri genren kirjoista. Lopuksi kartoitimme semanttiset suhteet Rogetin Thesauruksessa määriteltyihin teemoihin ja löysimme teemoja, jotka tietyn genren menestyksekkäät kirjat priorisoivat. Työn lopussa osoitimme myös, että mallimme osoittaa samanlaista suorituskykyä kirjan onnistumisen ennustamiseen, vaikka Goodreads-luokitusta käytettiin latausmäärän sijaan menestyksen mittaamiseen.', 'af': "In hierdie papier probeer ons om op die staat van die kuns te verbeter in die voorskou van 'n novel se sukses deur die leksiese semantiese verhouding van sy inhoud te modelleer. Ons het die grootste datastel geskep wat gebruik word in so 'n projek bevat leksiese data van 17,962 boeke van Projek Gutenberg. Ons het domein spesifieke funksie verduur teknike gebruik om die mees presies modele tot dag te implementeer vir voorskou van boek sukses, met ons beste model tot 'n gemiddelde presies van 94.0%. Deur die model parameters te analiseer, het ons die suksesvolle semantiese verhouding uit boeke van 12 verskillende genre uitgevoer. Ons het eintlik daardie semantiese verwantings met 'n stel tema gekaarp soos gedefinieerd in Roget se Thesaurus en die tema ontdek wat suksesvol boeke van 'n gegewe genre prioriteit is. Op die einde van die papier het ons verder vertoon dat ons model vergelykbaar presisie vir boek sukses voorskou bevestig selfs wanneer Goodreads rating gebruik word in plaas van aflaai tel om sukses te maak.", 'jv': 'Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno state-of-the-art s kanggo ngerasakno sing luwih apik dhéwé seneng pisan kelas semanti sing perusahaan winih. Awak dhéwé nggawe dataset sing gak barêng wong liyane ning acara proyek sing nganggo data lexèkal sing katêpakan karo We used Kernel Awak dhéwé saiki ngegampang sistem semanti sing gawe lan tema sing bisa gewisaké ning Thesêrusa Rong lan nganggo tema sing luwih apik dhéwé iki ning acara perusahaan winih sing apik dhéwé. FindOK', 'sk': 'V prispevku poskušamo izboljšati najsodobnejše napovedovanje uspeha romana z modeliranjem leksikalnih semantičnih odnosov njegove vsebine. Ustvarili smo največji nabor podatkov, uporabljenih v takem projektu, ki vsebuje leksikalne podatke iz 17.962 knjig projekta Gutenberg. Uporabili smo domensko specifične tehnike zmanjševanja značilnosti za uvedbo najbolj natančnih modelov doslej za napovedovanje uspeha knjig, pri čemer je naš najboljši model dosegel povprečno natančnost 94,0%. Z analizo modelnih parametrov smo uspešne semantične odnose izvlekli iz knjig 12 različnih žanrov. Te semantične odnose smo končno preslikali v nabor teme, kot so opredeljene v Rogetovem slovarju, in odkrili teme, ki jih prednostno obravnavajo uspešne knjige določenega žanra. Na koncu prispevka smo nadalje pokazali, da naš model kaže podobno zmogljivost pri napovedovanju uspešnosti knjig, tudi če je bila uporabljena ocena Goodreads namesto števila prenosov za merjenje uspešnosti.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takarda, Munã jarraba musanyawa ga halin-sanar da ke gabatar mafaniki a riwayan, ko kuma Mu sami danganyen mutane na lakki da ke cikin shi. Mun halitta koka mafi girma da aka yi amfani da cikin wannan birnin da ke ƙunsa da data mai leksiya daga littattafai 17,963 daga Loki Gutanberg. Mun yi amfani da shiryoyin ƙarai masu ƙayyade cikin Domen dõmin a cika masu shiryuwa masu ƙayyade zuwa yanzu wa kwanan kwanza wa muhimmin littãfin na yi basĩri, da kuma da misalinmu mafi kyaun ya sami tsari na 94.0%. Ga ku yi anayya ga parameteri ɗin, sai muka fitar masu cin nasara na semanti daga littattafai 12 dabam-daban. Ga ƙarshen mun karya waɗannan mazaɓa na semanti da wasu maɓallin, kamar da aka bayyana a cikin shirin Ruget's Aiki kuma Muka gane maɓallin waɗanda suka ci littãfin da aka bai wa muhimmin genre. Ga ƙarshen takardan, muka nuna kuwa misalinmu na nuna mai kama da aikin littafin da ake yi wa basĩrin littafin, kuma kõ da idan an yi amfani da rabo na Google don ya cika rabo da babban rabo.", 'bo': 'དེའི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོས་དུས་རམ་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐབས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ལས་འགུལ་ནང་དུ་ཆེ་བའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཆ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས། རྩིས་འགུལ་གྱི་གྲོ We utilized domain specific feature reduction techniques to implement the most accurate models to date for predicting book success, with our best model achieving an average accuracy of 94.0%. We utilized domain specific feature reduction techniques to implement the most accurate models to date for predicting book success, with our best model achieving an average accuracy of 94.0%. By analyzing the model parameters, we extracted the successful semantic relationships from books of 12 different genres. མཐའ་མར་དེ་ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་འདི་དག་གི་སྒྲིག་ཕྱི་ཁོག་གི་ནང་definི ག ཤོག་བྱང་མཇུག་གི་རྗེས་སུ། ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་འདིས་དཔེ་གཞི་གྲངས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག', 'he': "In this paper, we attempt to improve upon the state-of-the-art in predicting a novel's success by modeling the lexical semantic relationships of its contents.  We created the largest dataset used in such a project containing lexical data from 17,962 books from Project Gutenberg.  השתמשנו בטכניקות חיסוך תכונות ספציפיות בתחום כדי להפעיל את הדוגמנים המדויקים ביותר עד היום לחזות הצלחה של ספרים, עם הדוגמנים הטובים ביותר שלנו להשיג מדויקת ממוצעת של 94.0%. על ידי ניתוח הפרמטרים של המודל, הוצאנו את מערכות היחסים הסמנטיות המצליחות מספרים של 12 גנרס שונים. סוף סוף פינו את היחסים הסמנטיים האלה לקבוצה של נושאים, כפי שהגדרנו בתזאורוס של רוג'ט וגילינו את הנושאים שהספרים הצליחים של סוג מסוים מעדיפים. At the end of the paper, we further showed that our model demonstrate similar performance for book success prediction even when Goodreads rating was used instead of download count to measure success."}
{'en': 'Apples to Apples : A Systematic Evaluation of Topic Models', 'ar': 'من التفاح إلى التفاح: تقييم منهجي لنماذج الموضوعات', 'es': 'Manzanas a manzanas: una evaluación sistemática de los modelos temáticos', 'pt': 'Maçãs para maçãs: uma avaliação sistemática de modelos de tópicos', 'fr': 'Des pommes aux pommes\xa0: une évaluation systématique des modèles thématiques', 'ja': 'リンゴからリンゴ：トピックモデルの体系的評価', 'zh': '苹果对苹果:主题模统评估', 'hi': 'सेब के लिए सेब: विषय मॉडल का एक व्यवस्थित मूल्यांकन', 'ru': 'Яблоки к Яблокам: Систематическая Оценка Моделей Темы', 'ga': 'Úlla go Úlla: Meastóireacht Chórasach ar Mhúnlaí Ábhair', 'el': 'Μήλα σε Μήλα: Μια Συστηματική Αξιολόγηση Θεματικών Μοντέλων', 'ka': 'პროგრამებისთვის გამოყენება: ტემიკური მოდელის სისტემალური განსაზღვრება', 'hu': 'Alma az almára: A téma modellek rendszeres értékelése', 'kk': 'Қолданбаларға қолдану: Нақыштар үлгілерін жүйелік оқу', 'it': 'Mele alle mele: una valutazione sistematica dei modelli tematici', 'lt': 'Obuoliai obuoliams: Teminių modelių sisteminis vertinimas', 'mk': 'Јаболка за јаболка: Систематска оценка на тематски модели', 'ms': 'Apples to Apples: A Systematic Evaluation of Topic Models', 'mt': 'Apples to Apples: Evaluation Systematic of Topic Models', 'ml': 'പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Апликт хэрэглэгддэг: Сэтгэл загварын системийн оценка', 'no': 'Applikasjon for applikasjonar: Eit systematisk evaluering av emnemodular', 'pl': 'Jabłka do jabłek: Systematyczna ocena modeli tematycznych', 'ro': 'Mere la mere: o evaluare sistematică a modelelor tematice', 'sr': 'Aplikacije za Aplikacije: sistemska procjena temskih modela', 'si': 'භාවිතාවට භාවිතාවක්: විදේශ මොඩේල්ස් පද්ධතික විශ්ලේෂණය', 'so': 'Applications', 'sv': 'Äpplen på äpplen: En systematisk utvärdering av ämnesmodeller', 'ta': 'பயன்பாடுகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'موضوع موڈل کی سیستماتیک ارزیابی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Táo cho đơn: Đánh giá hệ thống các mẫu vật', 'bg': 'Ябълки към ябълки: Систематична оценка на тематични модели', 'nl': 'Apples to Apples: Een systematische evaluatie van topic modellen', 'da': 'Æbler til æbler: En systematisk evaluering af emnemodeller', 'hr': 'Aplikacije za aplikacije: sistemska procjena temskih modela', 'de': 'Apples to Apples: Eine systematische Bewertung von Themenmodellen', 'ko': '애플의 애플: 테마 모델에 대한 시스템 평가', 'id': 'Apples to Apples: A Systematic Evaluation of Topic Models', 'fa': 'Apples for Apples: A System Evaluation of Topic Models', 'sw': 'Apples to Apples: A Systemic Evaluation of Models of Madagaska', 'tr': 'Applikasy üçin Ullanýar: Täzelikleriň sistem çykyş', 'af': "Toepassing tot toepassings: 'n Sistemiese Evaluering van Onderwerp Modelle", 'sq': 'Apples to Apples: A Systematic Evaluation of Topic Models', 'az': 'Uyƒüulamalara uyƒüulamalar: T…ôrzin Modell…ôrinin sistematik deƒüerlendirm…ôsi', 'am': 'Applications: A Systematic evaluation of Topic Models', 'hy': 'Apples to Apples: A Stematic Արժեքի մոդելների գնահատումը', 'bn': 'অ্যাপলিকেশন- এ অ্যাপ্লিকেশন: বিষয় মোডেলের সিস্টেমিটিক পরীক্ষা', 'bs': 'Aplikacije za Aplikacije: sistemska procjena temskih modela', 'ca': 'Les pomes a les pomes: Una evaluació sistemàtica dels models temàtics', 'cs': 'Jablka do jablka: Systematické hodnocení tématických modelů', 'et': 'Õunad õunadele: teemamudelite süstemaatiline hindamine', 'fi': 'Omenat omenoihin: Aihemallien systemaattinen arviointi', 'jv': 'Aplikasi kanggo Aplikasi: Sistem usuntasi model tema', 'sk': 'Jabolka na jabolka: Sistematično ocenjevanje tematskih modelov', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'he': 'תפוחים לתפוחים: עריכה מערכתית של מודלים נושאים', 'bo': 'ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ལ་བྱ་རིམ། གནད་དོན་མིག་དབྱིབས་ལུགས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'From statistical to neural models, a wide variety of topic modelling algorithms have been proposed in the literature. However, because of the diversity of datasets and metrics, there have not been many efforts to systematically compare their performance on the same benchmarks and under the same conditions. In this paper, we present a selection of 9 topic modelling techniques from the state of the art reflecting a diversity of approaches to the task, an overview of the different metrics used to compare their performance, and the challenges of conducting such a comparison. We empirically evaluate the performance of these models on different settings reflecting a variety of real-life conditions in terms of dataset size, number of topics, and distribution of topics, following identical preprocessing and evaluation processes. Using both metrics that rely on the intrinsic characteristics of the dataset (different coherence metrics), as well as external knowledge (word embeddings and ground-truth topic labels), our experiments reveal several shortcomings regarding the common practices in topic models evaluation.', 'ar': 'من النماذج الإحصائية إلى النماذج العصبية ، تم اقتراح مجموعة متنوعة من خوارزميات نمذجة الموضوعات في الأدبيات. ومع ذلك ، نظرًا لتنوع مجموعات البيانات والمقاييس ، لم يكن هناك الكثير من الجهود لمقارنة أدائها بشكل منهجي على نفس المعايير وتحت نفس الظروف. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم مجموعة مختارة من 9 تقنيات لنمذجة الموضوعات من أحدث ما توصلت إليه التقنية والتي تعكس مجموعة متنوعة من مناهج المهمة ، ولمحة عامة عن المقاييس المختلفة المستخدمة لمقارنة أدائها ، وتحديات إجراء مثل هذه المقارنة. نقوم بتقييم أداء هذه النماذج تجريبيًا على إعدادات مختلفة تعكس مجموعة متنوعة من ظروف الحياة الواقعية من حيث حجم مجموعة البيانات وعدد الموضوعات وتوزيع الموضوعات ، باتباع عمليات المعالجة المسبقة والتقييم المتماثلة. باستخدام كل من المقاييس التي تعتمد على الخصائص الجوهرية لمجموعة البيانات (مقاييس التماسك المختلفة) ، بالإضافة إلى المعرفة الخارجية (تضمين الكلمات وتسميات موضوع الحقيقة الأرضية) ، تكشف تجاربنا العديد من أوجه القصور فيما يتعلق بالممارسات الشائعة في تقييم نماذج الموضوع.', 'pt': 'De modelos estatísticos a neurais, uma grande variedade de algoritmos de modelagem de tópicos tem sido propostos na literatura. No entanto, devido à diversidade de conjuntos de dados e métricas, não houve muitos esforços para comparar sistematicamente seu desempenho nos mesmos benchmarks e nas mesmas condições. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma seleção de 9 técnicas de modelagem de tópicos do estado da arte, refletindo uma diversidade de abordagens para a tarefa, uma visão geral das diferentes métricas usadas para comparar seu desempenho e os desafios de realizar tal comparação. Avaliamos empiricamente o desempenho desses modelos em diferentes configurações, refletindo uma variedade de condições da vida real em termos de tamanho do conjunto de dados, número de tópicos e distribuição de tópicos, seguindo processos idênticos de pré-processamento e avaliação. Usando tanto métricas que dependem das características intrínsecas do conjunto de dados (diferentes métricas de coerência), quanto conhecimento externo (incorporação de palavras e rótulos de tópicos de verdade), nossos experimentos revelam várias deficiências em relação às práticas comuns na avaliação de modelos de tópicos.', 'fr': "Des modèles statistiques aux modèles neuronaux, une grande variété d'algorithmes de modélisation thématique ont été proposés dans la littérature. Cependant, en raison de la diversité des ensembles de données et des métriques, peu d'efforts ont été déployés pour comparer systématiquement leurs performances sur les mêmes points de référence et dans les mêmes conditions. Dans cet article, nous présentons une sélection de neuf techniques de modélisation thématiques issues de l'état de l'art reflétant une diversité d'approches de la tâche, un aperçu des différentes métriques utilisées pour comparer leurs performances et les défis liés à la réalisation d'une telle comparaison. Nous évaluons empiriquement les performances de ces modèles sur différents paramètres reflétant une variété de conditions réelles en termes de taille de l'ensemble de données, de nombre de sujets et de distribution des sujets, en suivant des processus de prétraitement et d'évaluation identiques. En utilisant à la fois des métriques qui s'appuient sur les caractéristiques intrinsèques de l'ensemble de données (différentes métriques de cohérence), ainsi que des connaissances externes (intégration de mots et étiquettes de sujets de vérité de terrain), nos expériences révèlent plusieurs lacunes concernant les pratiques courantes dans l'évaluation des modèles thématiques.", 'es': 'Desde modelos estadísticos hasta modelos neuronales, se ha propuesto en la literatura una amplia variedad de algoritmos de modelado de temas. Sin embargo, debido a la diversidad de conjuntos de datos y métricas, no se han realizado muchos esfuerzos para comparar sistemáticamente su rendimiento en los mismos puntos de referencia y en las mismas condiciones. En este artículo, presentamos una selección de 9 técnicas de modelado de temas del estado del arte que reflejan una diversidad de enfoques de la tarea, una visión general de las diferentes métricas utilizadas para comparar su rendimiento y los desafíos de realizar dicha comparación. Evaluamos empíricamente el rendimiento de estos modelos en diferentes entornos que reflejan una variedad de condiciones de la vida real en términos de tamaño de conjunto de datos, número de temas y distribución de temas, siguiendo procesos idénticos de preprocesamiento y evaluación. Utilizando tanto métricas que se basan en las características intrínsecas del conjunto de datos (diferentes métricas de coherencia), como conocimientos externos (incrustaciones de palabras y etiquetas de temas de verdad fundamental), nuestros experimentos revelan varias deficiencias con respecto a las prácticas comunes en la evaluación de modelos de temas.', 'ja': '統計モデルからニューラルモデルまで、多種多様なトピックモデリングアルゴリズムが文献で提案されている。 しかし、データセットとメトリックの多様性のため、同じベンチマークで同じ条件下でパフォーマンスを体系的に比較する努力はあまりありませんでした。 この論文では、タスクへの多様なアプローチを反映した最先端のトピックモデリング技術の9つの選択、それらのパフォーマンスを比較するために使用されるさまざまな指標の概要、およびそのような比較を行うための課題を提示する。 私たちは、データセットのサイズ、トピックの数、およびトピックの分布という点で、同一の前処理および評価プロセスに従って、さまざまな現実の条件を反映して、さまざまな設定におけるこれらのモデルのパフォーマンスを実証的に評価します。 データセットの固有の特性（異なるコヒーレンス指標）に依存する両方の指標と、外部知識（単語埋め込みと真実のトピックラベル）を使用して、私たちの実験は、トピックモデル評価の一般的なプラクティスに関するいくつかの欠点を明らかにします。', 'zh': '自统计学至神经模形,文献已有题建模算法。 然则数集指标之多样性,同准同资,无多力以系统地较其性也。 于本文之中,吾见9种主题建模术,见任之多样性,概述以较性能之指标,与此类挑战。 臣等参预处理评事,集大小、题数、题数、题数,各以其经验性质之。 用依数据集内指标(不同一致性指标)及外知识(词嵌与本事主题标),臣等实验揭主题模形估中常见受持数病。', 'hi': 'सांख्यिकीय से लेकर तंत्रिका मॉडल तक, साहित्य में विभिन्न प्रकार के विषय मॉडलिंग एल्गोरिदम प्रस्तावित किए गए हैं। हालांकि, डेटासेट और मीट्रिक की विविधता के कारण, एक ही बेंचमार्क पर और समान परिस्थितियों में उनके प्रदर्शन की व्यवस्थित रूप से तुलना करने के लिए कई प्रयास नहीं किए गए हैं। इस पेपर में, हम कला की स्थिति से 9 विषय मॉडलिंग तकनीकों का एक चयन प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो कार्य के दृष्टिकोण की विविधता को दर्शाता है, उनके प्रदर्शन की तुलना करने के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले विभिन्न मैट्रिक्स का अवलोकन, और इस तरह की तुलना करने की चुनौतियों का अवलोकन। हम अनुभवजन्य रूप से डेटासेट आकार, विषयों की संख्या और विषयों के वितरण के संदर्भ में विभिन्न प्रकार की वास्तविक जीवन की स्थितियों को दर्शाते हुए विभिन्न सेटिंग्स पर इन मॉडलों के प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, समान प्रीप्रोसेसिंग और मूल्यांकन प्रक्रियाओं का पालन करते हैं। दोनों मैट्रिक्स का उपयोग करना जो डेटासेट (अलग-अलग सुसंगतता मैट्रिक्स) की आंतरिक विशेषताओं पर भरोसा करते हैं, साथ ही साथ बाहरी ज्ञान (शब्द एम्बेडिंग और ग्राउंड-ट्रुथ टॉपिक लेबल), हमारे प्रयोगों से विषय मॉडल मूल्यांकन में सामान्य प्रथाओं के बारे में कई कमियों का पता चलता है।', 'ru': 'От статистических до нейронных моделей в литературе было предложено большое разнообразие алгоритмов тематического моделирования. Однако из-за разнообразия наборов данных и показателей не было предпринято много усилий для систематического сопоставления их эффективности на основе одних и тех же критериев и в одних и тех же условиях. В этой статье мы представляем выборку из 9 тематических методов моделирования из современного уровня техники, отражающих разнообразие подходов к задаче, обзор различных метрик, используемых для сравнения их эффективности, и проблемы проведения такого сравнения. Мы эмпирически оцениваем эффективность этих моделей в различных условиях, отражающих различные реальные условия с точки зрения размера набора данных, количества тем и распределения тем, следуя идентичным процессам предварительной обработки и оценки. Используя обе метрики, которые опираются на внутренние характеристики набора данных (различные метрики согласованности), а также внешние знания (вложения слов и ярлыки тем «земля-правда»), наши эксперименты выявляют несколько недостатков в отношении общих практик оценки тематических моделей.', 'ga': 'Ó mhúnlaí staitistiúla go samhlacha néaracha, tá raon leathan algartaim um shamhaltú topaicí molta sa litríocht. Mar gheall ar éagsúlacht na dtacar sonraí agus na méadrachta, áfach, ní dhearnadh mórán iarrachtaí chun a bhfeidhmíocht a chur i gcomparáid go córasach ar na tagarmharcanna céanna agus faoi na coinníollacha céanna. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair rogha de 9 dteicníocht samhaltaithe topaicí ón úrscothacht a léiríonn éagsúlacht cur chuige i leith an taisc, forbhreathnú ar na méadrachtaí éagsúla a úsáidtear chun a bhfeidhmíocht a chur i gcomparáid, agus na dúshláin a bhaineann le comparáid den sórt sin a dhéanamh. Déanaimid meastóireacht eimpíreach ar fheidhmíocht na múnlaí seo ar shuímh éagsúla a léiríonn éagsúlacht coinníollacha fíorsaoil i dtéarmaí méid tacar sonraí, líon na dtopaicí, agus dáileadh topaicí, tar éis próisis réamhphróiseála agus meastóireachta comhionanna. Ag baint úsáide as an dá mhéadracht atá ag brath ar shaintréithe intreacha an tacair sonraí (méadracht comhleanúnachais dhifriúla), chomh maith le heolas seachtrach (leabú focal agus lipéid topaicí fhírinne talún), léiríonn ár dturgnaimh roinnt easnaimh maidir leis na cleachtais choiteanna i measúnú samhlacha topaice.', 'ka': 'სტატისტიკური ნეიროლური მოდელებიდან, დიდი განსხვავებული ტემების მოდელურების ალგორიტემის შესაძლებელია ლიტერტურაში. მაგრამ, მონაცემების და მეტრიკის განსხვავებულობისთვის, არაფერი უნდა იყოს სისტემატიკურად მათი მუშაობის შესაბამისთვის და იგივე შესაბამისთვის. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ აჩვენებთ 9 ტემენტის მოდელირების ტექნოგიების არჩევა, რომლებიც ხელოვნების სტატუსიდან განსხვავებული მიღებების განსხვავება, განსხვავებული მეტრიკების განსხვავება, რომლებიც გამოყენებულია მათი მუშ ჩვენ ემპერიკურად ამ მოდელის მუშაობას განსხვავებულ პარამეტრებში გამოყენებთ განსხვავებული რეალური ცხოვრებას განსხვავებული განსხვავებების განსხვავებას მონაცემების ზომის, ტემების რაოდენობა და გაყოფილებ ორივე მეტრიკის გამოყენება, რომელიც მონაცემების კონტექტიკის ინტერეინსური პროგრამეტრების (განსხვავებული კონტექტიკის მეტრიკის) და გარეშე ცნობილების (სიტყვების ინტერექტიკები და ტექტიკის ტექტიკები) გამოყენება, ჩვენ', 'hu': 'A statisztikai modellektől a neurális modellekig a szakirodalomban számos téma modellezési algoritmust javasoltak. Az adatkészletek és mutatók sokfélesége miatt azonban nem történt sok erőfeszítés a teljesítményük szisztematikus összehasonlítására ugyanazon referenciaértékek mellett és azonos feltételek mellett. Ebben a tanulmányban 9 téma modellezési technikából álló válogatást mutatunk be a feladat megközelítésének sokféleségét tükröző technikából, áttekintést nyújtunk a teljesítményük összehasonlításához használt különböző mutatókról, valamint az ilyen összehasonlítás kihívásairól. Ezeknek a modelleknek a teljesítményét empirikusan értékeljük különböző beállításokon, amelyek különböző valós körülményeket tükröznek az adatkészlet méretében, a témák számában és a témák eloszlásában, azonos előfeldolgozási és értékelési folyamatokat követve. Mind az adatkészlet belső tulajdonságaira (különböző koherencia mutatók), mind a külső ismeretekre (szóbeágyazások és alapvető igazság témaköri címkék) támaszkodva kísérleteink számos hiányosságot fednek fel a témakészletek értékelésében alkalmazott általános gyakorlatokkal kapcsolatban.', 'el': 'Από στατιστικά έως νευρωνικά μοντέλα, έχει προταθεί μεγάλη ποικιλία αλγορίθμων μοντελοποίησης θεμάτων στη βιβλιογραφία. Ωστόσο, λόγω της ποικιλομορφίας των συνόλων δεδομένων και των μετρήσεων, δεν έχουν γίνει πολλές προσπάθειες συστηματικής σύγκρισης των επιδόσεών τους στα ίδια κριτήρια αναφοράς και υπό τις ίδιες συνθήκες. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια επιλογή από εννέα τεχνικές μοντελοποίησης θεμάτων από την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας που αντικατοπτρίζουν μια ποικιλία προσεγγίσεων στο έργο, μια επισκόπηση των διαφορετικών μετρήσεων που χρησιμοποιούνται για τη σύγκριση της απόδοσής τους, και τις προκλήσεις της διεξαγωγής μιας τέτοιας σύγκρισης. Αξιολογούμε εμπειρικά την απόδοση αυτών των μοντέλων σε διαφορετικές ρυθμίσεις που αντικατοπτρίζουν μια ποικιλία πραγματικών συνθηκών όσον αφορά το μέγεθος του συνόλου δεδομένων, τον αριθμό των θεμάτων και την κατανομή των θεμάτων, ακολουθώντας πανομοιότυπες διαδικασίες προεπεξεργασίας και αξιολόγησης. Χρησιμοποιώντας τόσο τις μετρήσεις που βασίζονται στα εγγενή χαρακτηριστικά του συνόλου δεδομένων (διαφορετικές μετρήσεις συνοχής), όσο και την εξωτερική γνώση (ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και ετικέτες βασικής αλήθειας), τα πειράματά μας αποκαλύπτουν αρκετές ελλείψεις όσον αφορά τις κοινές πρακτικές στην αξιολόγηση των μοντέλων θεμάτων.', 'it': "Dalla statistica ai modelli neurali, una vasta gamma di algoritmi di modellazione tematica sono stati proposti in letteratura. Tuttavia, a causa della diversità dei set di dati e delle metriche, non ci sono stati molti sforzi per confrontare sistematicamente le loro prestazioni sugli stessi parametri di riferimento e nelle stesse condizioni. In questo articolo, presentiamo una selezione di 9 tecniche di modellazione tematiche dallo stato dell'arte che riflettono una diversità di approcci al compito, una panoramica delle diverse metriche utilizzate per confrontare le loro prestazioni e le sfide di condurre un tale confronto. Valutiamo empiricamente le prestazioni di questi modelli su diverse impostazioni riflettendo una varietà di condizioni di vita reale in termini di dimensione del set di dati, numero di argomenti e distribuzione degli argomenti, seguendo identici processi di pre-elaborazione e valutazione. Utilizzando sia metriche che si basano sulle caratteristiche intrinseche del set di dati (metriche di coerenza diverse), sia conoscenze esterne (embedding di parole e etichette di argomenti di verità di base), i nostri esperimenti rivelano diverse carenze riguardo alle pratiche comuni nella valutazione dei modelli di argomento.", 'kk': 'Статистикалық невраллық моделдерден көптеген нақыштарды моделу алгоритмдері литературада ұсынылды. Бірақ деректер қорларының мен метрикалық қасиеттерінің бірнеше қасиеттеріне жүйелік түрде және бір шарттарына салыстыру үшін көп әрекет жоқ. Бұл қағазда, біз оның істемін салыстыру үшін қолданылатын 9 нақыштың модель техникаларын таңдап көрдік. Бұл тапсырманың әртүрлі түрлі жағдайын көрсетеді. Бұл әртүрлі метрикалардың көзі және бұл салыстыру үшін қо Біз бұл үлгілердің әртүрлі параметрлерінде, деректер жиынының өлшемі, нақыштардың саны және тақырыптарды тарату үшін, бірнеше преprocessing және оқиға процестерден кейін, бірнеше өмір шарттарын көрсетеді. Деректер жиынының (әртүрлі сәйкестік метрикалық), сыртқы білім (сөздерді ендіру және жергілікті мәселелер жарлықтарына тәуелді) ішкі қасиеттеріне сенетін екі метрикалық қолданылады, біздің тәжірибеміз нақыштар үлгілерінд', 'lt': 'Nuo statistinių iki nervinių modelių literatūroje pasiūlyta įvairių teminių modeliavimo algoritmų. Tačiau dėl duomenų rinkinių ir metrinių duomenų įvairovės nebuvo daug pastangų sistemingai palyginti jų rezultatus pagal tuos pačius lyginamuosius rodiklius ir tomis pačiomis sąlygomis. In this paper, we present a selection of 9 topic modelling techniques from the state of the art reflecting a diversity of approaches to the task, an overview of the different metrics used to compare their performance, and the challenges of conducting such a comparison.  Empiriškai vertiname šių modelių veiksmingumą įvairiose aplinkybėse, atspindinčiose įvairias realiojo gyvenimo sąlygas duomenų rinkinio dydžio, temų skaičiaus ir temų paskirstymo požiūriu, atlikdami identiškus parengimo ir vertinimo procesus. Naudodami tiek metrinius rodiklius, kurie grindžiami vidinėmis duomenų rinkinio charakteristikomis (skirtingais nuoseklumo rodikliais), tiek išorinėmis žiniomis (žodžių įterpimas ir esminės tiesos temų etiketėmis), mūsų eksperimentai atskleidžia keletą trūkumų, susijusių su bendra praktika vertinant teminius modelius.', 'ms': 'Dari statistik ke model saraf, pelbagai algoritma pemodelan topik telah diusulkan dalam literatur. However, because of the diversity of datasets and metrics, there have not been many efforts to systematically compare their performance on the same benchmarks and under the same conditions.  In this paper, we present a selection of 9 topic modelling techniques from the state of the art reflecting a diversity of approaches to the task, an overview of the different metrics used to compare their performance, and the challenges of conducting such a comparison.  Kami secara empirik menilai prestasi model ini pada tetapan yang berbeza yang mencerminkan pelbagai keadaan kehidupan sebenar dalam terma saiz set data, bilangan topik, dan distribusi topik, mengikut proses persiapan dan penilaian yang sama. Dengan menggunakan kedua-dua metrik yang bergantung pada ciri-ciri intrinsik set data (metrik koerensi berbeza), serta pengetahuan luaran (penyampaian perkataan dan label topik kebenaran-tanah), eksperimen kami mengungkapkan beberapa kekurangan mengenai praktik umum dalam penilaian model topik.', 'mk': 'Од статистички до нервни модели, во литературата се предложени широки различни алгоритми за моделирање на теми. Сепак, поради различноста на податоците и метриките, не постигнаа многу напори за систематично споредување на нивните резултати на истите споредби и под истите услови. In this paper, we present a selection of 9 topic modelling techniques from the state of the art reflecting a diversity of approaches to the task, an overview of the different metrics used to compare their performance, and the challenges of conducting such a comparison.  Емпирички ја проценуваме резултатот на овие модели на различни поставувања кои рефлектираат различни услови во реалниот живот во поглед на големината на датотеките, бројот на теми и дистрибуцијата на теми, по идентичните процеси на преработка и проценка. Користејќи ги двете метрики кои се зависат од внатрешните карактеристики на податоците (различни коеферентни метрики), како и надворешното знаење (вложување на зборови и етикети на темата на земјата-вистина), нашите експерименти откриваат неколку недостатоци во врска со заедничките практики во евалуацијата на тем', 'mt': 'Mill-mudelli statistiċi sal-mudelli newrali, varjetà wiesgħa ta’ algoritmi ta’ mudelli tematiċi ġew proposti fil-letteratura. Madankollu, minħabba d-diversità ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta u metriċi, ma kienx hemm ħafna sforzi biex jitqabbel sistematikament il-prestazzjoni tagħhom fuq l-istess punti ta’ riferiment u taħt l-istess kundizzjonijiet. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw għa żla ta’ 9 tekniki ta’ mudellar ta’ suġġetti mill-aktar avvanzati li jirriflettu diversità ta’ approċċi għall-kompitu, ħarsa ġenerali lejn il-metriċi differenti użati biex jitqabblu l-prestazzjoni tagħhom, u l-isfidi tat-twettiq ta’ dan it-tqabbil. Nivvalutaw empirikament il-prestazzjoni ta’ dawn il-mudelli fuq ambjenti differenti li jirriflettu varjetà ta’ kundizzjonijiet tal-ħajja reali f’termini tad-daqs tas-sett tad-dejta, in-numru ta’ suġġetti, u d-distribuzzjoni ta’ suġġetti, wara proċessi identiċi ta’ preproċessar u evalwazzjoni. Bl-użu taż-żewġ metriċi li jiddependu fuq il-karatteristiċi intrinsiċi tas-sett tad-dejta (metriċi ta’ koerenza differenti), kif ukoll l-għarfien estern (inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem u tikketti tas-suġġett tal-verità tal-art), l-esperimenti tagħna jiżvelaw diversi nuqqasijiet fir-rigward tal-prattiki komuni fl-evalwazzjoni tal-mudelli tematiċi.', 'ml': 'സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിച്ചിര എന്നാലും ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെയും മെട്രിക്കുകളുടെയും വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാരണം ഒരുപാട് ശ്രമിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത ഒരേ ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, കലാകാരത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും 9 പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്നിക്കുകളുടെ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന ഒരു തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ജോലിക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യസ് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ജീവിതത്തിന്റെ അവസ്ഥ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് വ്യത്യസ്തമായി ഈ മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രഭാവം നമ്മള്\u200d വിവിധീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് വലിപ്പം, പ്രമേയങ്ങളുടെ എണ്ണം,  ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ ഉള്ളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന രണ്ട് മെട്രിക്കുകളും പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവും ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ പൊതുമാതൃകങ്ങളെ', 'mn': 'Статистикээс сэтгэл зүйн загвараас уран зохиолд олон төрлийн сэдвийн загварын алгоритмыг санал болгож байна. Гэвч, өгөгдлийн санг болон метрик олон төрлийн учраас тэдний үйл ажиллагааг систематик адилхан багц дээр харьцуулах боломжгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид урлагийн байр суурь дээрх 9 сэдэв загварын модель техникуудын сонголтыг тайлбарлаж, ажлын тухай олон ойлголтыг харуулж, өөр өөр метриктикүүдийг харьцуулахын тулд хэрэглэгддэг, тэдний харьцуулахын тулд хэрэглэгддэг асуудал. Бид эдгээр загварын үйл ажиллагааг өөр өөр нөхцөлд үнэхээр олон бодит амьдралын нөхцөл байдлыг өгөгдлийн сангийн хэмжээ, сэдвийн тоо, сэдвийн хуваарилалтын тухай үнэлгээд үзүүлдэг. Бидний туршилтууд сэдвийн загварын оюутнуудын нийтлэг дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал хөдлөлд байдаг.', 'no': 'Fra statistiske til nøyralmodeller har det første ein stor variasjon av temamodelleringsalgoritme i litteraturen. Men på grunn av mange datasetjer og metrikar har det ikkje vært mange forsøk på å systematisk samanlikna utføringa sine på samme benchmarker og under samme vilkår. I denne papiret presenterer vi eit utval av 9 temamodelleringsteknikk frå kunsten som reflekserer ein mangfold av tilnærmingar til oppgåva, eit oversikt over dei ulike metrikane som brukar for å sammenligne utviklinga sine, og utfordringane for å gjera slike sammenligning. Vi evaluerer utviklinga av desse modelane på ulike innstillingar som reflekserer ein del av verkeleg livsstyrker i forhold til datasettstorleik, talet på emner og distribusjon av emner, etter identiske forhandlingar og evalueringsprosessar. Bruk både metrikar som rely på dei interne karakteristikaren av datasettet (ulike koherensmetrikar) og eksterne kunnskap (ord innebygging og grunnsannhetstemaetikettar), eksperimentene våre viser fleire feilsøknader om felles praksis i evaluering av temamodeller.', 'pl': 'Od modeli statystycznych do modeli neuronowych w literaturze zaproponowano szeroką gamę algorytmów modelowania tematycznego. Jednakże ze względu na różnorodność zbiorów danych i wskaźników nie podjęto wielu starań w celu systematycznego porównywania ich wyników na tych samych wskaźnikach odniesienia i na tych samych warunkach. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy wybór dziewięciotematycznych technik modelowania z najnowszej wiedzy odzwierciedlających różnorodność podejść do zadania, przegląd różnych wskaźników stosowanych do porównania ich wydajności oraz wyzwania związane z przeprowadzeniem takiego porównania. Oceniamy empirycznie wydajność tych modeli w różnych ustawieniach odzwierciedlających różne warunki rzeczywiste pod względem wielkości zbioru danych, liczby tematów i rozkładu tematów, według identycznych procesów przetwarzania i oceny. Wykorzystując zarówno wskaźniki, które opierają się na wewnętrznych cechach zbioru danych (różne wskaźniki spójności), jak i wiedzę zewnętrzną (osadzenia słów i etykiety tematów gruntowej prawdy), nasze eksperymenty ujawniają kilka niedociągnięć dotyczących powszechnych praktyk w ocenie modeli tematycznych.', 'ro': 'De la modele statistice la modele neurale, o mare varietate de algoritmi de modelare a subiectelor au fost propuse în literatură. Cu toate acestea, din cauza diversității seturilor de date și a măsurătorilor, nu s-au depus multe eforturi pentru a compara sistematic performanțele acestora pe aceleași criterii de referință și în aceleași condiții. În această lucrare, prezentăm o selecție de 9 tehnici de modelare a subiectelor de ultimă generație reflectând o diversitate de abordări ale sarcinii, o imagine de ansamblu a diferitelor metrice utilizate pentru a compara performanțele lor și provocările efectuării unei astfel de comparații. Evaluăm empiric performanța acestor modele pe diferite setări reflectând o varietate de condiții de viață reală în ceea ce privește dimensiunea setului de date, numărul de subiecte și distribuția subiectelor, după procese identice de pre-procesare și evaluare. Folosind atât metrici care se bazează pe caracteristicile intrinsece ale setului de date (metrici de coerență diferite), cât și cunoștințe externe (încorporări de cuvinte și etichete de subiecte cu adevăr de bază), experimentele noastre dezvăluie mai multe deficiențe în ceea ce privește practicile comune în evaluarea modelelor de subiecte.', 'sr': 'Od statističkih do neuralnih modela, u literaturi je predloženo široko raznolikost algoritma modeliranja tema. Međutim, zbog raznolikosti seta podataka i metrika, nije bilo mnogo napora da sistematski usporedi njihovu provedbu na istim kriterijama i pod istim uvjetima. U ovom papiru predstavljamo izbor od 9 tehnika modeliranja teme iz stanja umjetnosti koja odražava raznolikost pristupa zadatku, pregled različitih metrika korištenih za usporedbu njihovih performansa, i izazova provođenja takvog usporedbe. Mi empirički procjenjujemo provedbu ovih modela na različitim nastavama koji odražavaju razne uvjete stvarnog života u smislu veličine seta podataka, broja tema i distribucije tema, nakon identičnih procesa preobrade i procjene. Koristeći obje metrike koje se oslanjaju na unutrašnjih karakteristika seta podataka (različite koherencije metrike), kao i vanjske znanje (etikete riječi ugrađenja i teme teme zemaljske istine), naši eksperimenti pokazuju nekoliko nedostataka u vezi zajedničke prakse u procjeni modela teme.', 'so': 'Tusaalada takhasuska ilaa neurada waxaa warqadda lagu soo jeeday algorithm kala duduwan oo la sameynayo. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, sababtoo ah kala duduwan kooxaha iyo metriciyada, ma jirin in aad si rasmi ah uga dhigto sameynta falimahooda si isku qiimeeya iyo sharciyada isla xirfadooda. Qoraalkan waxaan ka keenaynaa doorashooyin saameyn ah oo ka mid ah xaalada farshaxanka, kaas oo ku sawiraya qaabab kala duduwan oo shaqada, aragtida qaabab kala duduwan oo u isticmaalaya isbarbarbardhigga falimahooda, iyo dhibaatooyinka sameynta qaabilaadda. Si fudud ayaannu ugu qiimeynaynaa sameynta modelladan oo ku saabsan qaablada kala duduwan oo ku sawiraya xaaladaha nololeed oo kala duduwan sida loo qoro tirada macluumaadka, tirada maadooyinka iyo kala qaybsan maadooyinka, marka lagu jiro baaritaanka isku mid ah iyo baaritaanka qiimeynta. Isku isticmaalayo labada metrici oo ku tiirsan tababarka hoose ee taariikhda (wadajirka kala duduwan), iyo aqoonta dibadda ah (hadalka ku qoran iyo baaritaanka sawirada dhulka), baaritaankeennu waxay muuqataa qaar gaaban oo ku saabsan tababarada caadiga ah ee ku saabsan tusaalooyinka mada.', 'sv': 'Fr책n statistiska till neurala modeller har en m채ngd olika 채mnesmodelleringsalgoritmer f철reslagits i litteraturen. P책 grund av m책ngfalden av datam채ngder och m채tv채rden har det dock inte gjorts m책nga anstr채ngningar f철r att systematiskt j채mf철ra deras resultat p책 samma riktm채rken och under samma villkor. I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett urval av 9 채mnesmodelleringstekniker fr책n den senaste tekniken som 책terspeglar en m책ngfald av tillv채gag책ngss채tt f철r uppgiften, en 철versikt 철ver de olika m채tv채rden som anv채nds f철r att j채mf철ra deras prestanda och utmaningarna med att genomf철ra en s책dan j채mf철relse. Vi utv채rderar empiriskt prestandan hos dessa modeller p책 olika inst채llningar som 책terspeglar en m채ngd olika verkliga f철rh책llanden vad g채ller dataupps채ttningsstorlek, antal 채mnen och 채mnesf철rdelning, efter identiska f철rbehandling- och utv채rderingsprocesser. Med hj채lp av b책de m채tv채rden som bygger p책 dataupps채ttningens inneboende egenskaper (olika koherensm채tv채rden) och extern kunskap (ordinb채ddningar och marksanningstematetiketter) avsl철jar v책ra experiment flera brister n채r det g채ller de gemensamma metoderna f철r utv채rdering av 채mnesmodeller.', 'si': 'සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මකයෙන් නියරල් මොඩල් වලට, විශාල විදියට විශාල විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අල්ගෝරිතම් වලට ප්\u200dර නමුත්, දත්ත සෙට් සහ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වල විවිධානය නිසා, ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය එකම බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් සහ එකම තත්වයක් සඳහා පද්ධත මේ පැත්තේ, අපි විදිහට විදිහට විදිහට විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා 9 අපි වෙනස් සැකසුම් සඳහා මේ මොඩේල්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණය අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා වගේ සැකසුම් සඳහා දත්ත සැකසුම් ප්\u200dරමාණය, ප්\u200dරමාණය, ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ව භාවිත කරන්නේ දෙන්නම මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් දෙන්නම් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ දත්ත සැට (වෙනස් කොහෙරෙන්ස් මෙට්\u200dරික්ස්), වගේම ප්\u200dරදේශය (වචනය සහ ප්\u200dරදේශ විශ්වාසය ලේබල්), අප', 'ur': 'ایسٹیسٹیکل سے نئورل موڈل تک، بہت سی موضوع موڈلینگ الگوریتم میں پیشنهاد کی گئی ہے. However, due to the diversity of datasets and metrics, there are many efforts to systematically compare their performance on the same benchmarks and under the same conditions. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے نو موضوع موڈلینگ ٹیکنیک کا انتخاب کرتا ہے جو کاغذ کی حالت سے بہت سی طریقوں کی تصویر کرتی ہے، مختلف متریک کی نظر سے ان کی عملکرد مقایسہ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا ہے، اور ایسی مقایسہ کی چالیں کرتی ہیں۔ ہم ان موڈلوں کے عمدہ کو مختلف تنظیمات کے ذریعہ مطابق مطابق مطابق تحقیق کرتے ہیں جن میں ڈاٹسٹ کی سایز، ٹوپوں کی تعداد، اور ٹوپوں کی تقسیم کے ذریعہ ایک دوسری پرپرسس اور ارزیابی پرسس کے پیچھے دکھاتے ہیں. ان دونوں متریکیوں کا استعمال کرنا جو ڈاٹ سٹ (مختلف مشترکیت متریک) کے داخل خصوصوں پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں، اور باہر علم (کلمات ابڈینگ اور زمین-حقیقت ٹوپ لیبل) کے ساتھ، ہماری آزمائش ٹوپ موڈل کے مطابق مشترکیں کے بارے میں بہت سی ناکامی ظاہر کرتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'புள்ளிவிவரமிலிருந்து புதிய மாதிரிகளில் இருந்து நெறி முறைமையில் இருந்து, பல்வேறு தலைப்பு மாதிரிப்பு முறைம ஆயினும், தரவுத்தளங்கள் மற்றும் மெட்ரிக்களின் பல்வேறு முயற்சிகள் காரணத்தால், அமைப்பிலாகவே அவர்கள் செயல்பாட்டை ஒப்பிட முயற்சி செய இந்த காகிதத்தில், கலைஞர் நிலையிலிருந்து 9 தலைப்பு மாதிரிப்பு தேர்வுகளை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், பணிக்கு பல்வேறு வழிமுறைகளை பிரதிபலிக்கும், அவர்கள் செயல்பாட்டை ஒப்ப இந்த மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாட்டை வெவ்வேறு அமைப்புகளில் நாம் வெவ்வேறு வாழ்க்கை நிபந்தனையை பார்க்க வேண்டும். தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் அளவு, தலைப்புகளின் எண்ணிக்கைய தரவுத்தளத்தின் உள்ளடக்கத்தில் நம்பிக்கை கொண்ட இரு மெட்ரிக்களையும் பயன்படுத்தி, வெளி அறிவுகளையும் (வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கம் மற்றும் நிலத்தில் உண்மையான தலைப்புகள் சிட்டைகளைய', 'vi': 'Từ các mô hình thống kê tới thần kinh, trong văn học đã đề xuất các thuật to án biểu tượng về chủ đề rất nhiều vấn đề. Tuy nhiên, vì sự khác nhau của các tập tin và đo hồ sơ, không có nhiều nỗ lực để so sánh chặt chẽ thành quả với nhau và với cùng một điều kiện. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một loạt các kỹ thuật mô hình đề tài 9 kiện thời trang hiện đại phản ánh sự đa dạng cách tiếp cận công việc, một tổng quát về các thước đo khác nhau dùng để so sánh khả năng của chúng, và các thử thách của việc so sánh này. Chúng tôi có kinh nghiệm đánh giá khả năng của các mô- đun này dựa trên các thiết lập khác nhau phản ánh các điều kiện sống thực tế khác nhau về kích thước của tập tin, số các chủ đề, và phân phát các chủ đề, sau các thủ tục xử lý trước và đánh giá giống nhau. Sử dụng cả hai thước đo dựa trên các đặc tính của bộ dữ liệu (các đo độ sánh khác nhau) cũng như kiến thức bên ngoài (sự nhúng từ và nhãn đề tài liệu mặt đất), các thí nghiệm của chúng tôi tiết lộ nhiều khiếm khuyết về các hoạt động chung trong đánh giá các mẫu đàn.', 'uz': "Statistik va neyural modellaridan ko'p mavzu modelli algoritlari littatiyatida talab qilindi. Lekin, ma'lumotlar va metriklarning turli turli darajada, bir xil bogʻlamalar va bir xil holatda ularning amalni tizim bilan birlashtirishga ko'p harakat qilmadi. In this paper, we present a selection of 9 topic modelling techniques from the state of the art reflecting a diversity of approaches to the task, an overview of the different metrics used to compare their performance, and the challenges of conducting such a comparison.  Biz bu modellarning natijasini o'qiymatimiz oddiy hayot holatiga, mavzular soni, va mavzularni ajratuvchi darajada, bir xil bir xil hayot holatlarini qiymatimiz va o'xshash bir xil jarayonlarni o'zgartirish mumkin. Maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi ichki xil xususiyatlarni (boshqa bir xil metriklarga) va externa илм (so'zlar tuzuvchisi va ground haqida mavzu tegnlari yordamida) bizning imtiyozlarimiz mavzu modelidagi umumiy harakatlarni qiymatda ko'p qiymatlashtiradi.", 'bg': 'От статистически до невронни модели в литературата са предложени голямо разнообразие от алгоритми за тематично моделиране. Поради разнообразието от набори от данни и показатели обаче не са положени много усилия систематично да се сравняват резултатите им при едни и същи показатели и при едни и същи условия. В настоящата статия представяме селекция от 9 тематични техники за моделиране от най-съвременните технологии, отразяващи разнообразието от подходи към задачата, преглед на различните показатели, използвани за сравняване на тяхната ефективност, и предизвикателствата при провеждането на такова сравнение. Ние емпирично оценяваме ефективността на тези модели при различни настройки, отразяващи различни условия от реалния живот по отношение на размера на набора от данни, броя на темите и разпределението на темите, следвайки идентични процеси на предварителна обработка и оценка. Използвайки както показатели, които разчитат на присъщите характеристики на набора от данни (различни показатели за съгласуваност), така и външни знания (вграждания на думи и етикети на темата за истината), нашите експерименти разкриват няколко недостатъка по отношение на общите практики в оценката на моделите на темата.', 'nl': 'Van statistische tot neurale modellen, een breed scala aan topic modelling algoritmes zijn voorgesteld in de literatuur. Vanwege de diversiteit aan datasets en statistieken zijn er echter niet veel inspanningen gedaan om hun prestaties systematisch te vergelijken op dezelfde benchmarks en onder dezelfde voorwaarden. In dit artikel presenteren we een selectie van negen topic modelling technieken uit de stand van de techniek die een verscheidenheid aan benaderingen van de taak weerspiegelen, een overzicht van de verschillende metrics gebruikt om hun prestaties te vergelijken, en de uitdagingen van het uitvoeren van een dergelijke vergelijking. We evalueren empirisch de prestaties van deze modellen op verschillende instellingen die een verscheidenheid aan reële omstandigheden weerspiegelen in termen van datasetgrootte, aantal onderwerpen en verdeling van onderwerpen, volgens identieke pre-processing- en evaluatieprocessen. Met behulp van zowel metrics die afhankelijk zijn van de intrinsieke kenmerken van de dataset (verschillende coherentie metrics), als externe kennis (woord embeddings en ground-truth topic labels), onthullen onze experimenten verschillende tekortkomingen met betrekking tot de gangbare praktijken in de evaluatie van topic modellen.', 'da': 'Fra statistiske til neurale modeller er en bred vifte af emneodelleringsalgoritmer blevet foreslået i litteraturen. På grund af mangfoldigheden af datasæt og metrics har der imidlertid ikke været mange bestræbelser på systematisk at sammenligne deres resultater på de samme benchmarks og under de samme betingelser. I denne artikel præsenterer vi et udvalg af 9 temamodelleringsteknikker fra den nyeste teknologi, der afspejler en mangfoldighed af tilgange til opgaven, et overblik over de forskellige metrics, der anvendes til at sammenligne deres ydeevne, og udfordringerne ved at foretage en sådan sammenligning. Vi evaluerer empirisk ydeevnen af disse modeller på forskellige indstillinger, der afspejler en række virkelige forhold i form af datasæt størrelse, antal emner og fordeling af emner, efter identiske forbehandling og evaluering processer. Ved hjælp af både metrics, der er afhængige af datasættets iboende egenskaber (forskellige kohærens metrics), såvel som ekstern viden (word embeddings og ground-sandhed emneatiketter), afslører vores eksperimenter flere mangler vedrørende den almindelige praksis i emnemodellevaluering.', 'hr': 'Od statističkih do neuralnih modela u literaturi je predloženo široko raznolikost algoritma modeliranja teme. Međutim, zbog raznolikosti seta podataka i metrika, nije bilo mnogo napora u usporedbi njihovog učinka na istim kriterijama i pod istim uvjetima. U ovom papiru predstavljamo izbor od 9 tehnika modeliranja teme iz stanja umjetnosti koja odražava raznolikost pristupa zadatku, pregled različitih metrika korištenih za usporedbu njihovih učinka i izazova provođenja takvog usporedbe. Mi empirički procjenjujemo učinkovitost tih modela na različitim nastavacima koji odražavaju razne uvjete stvarnog života u smislu veličine podataka, broja tema i distribucije tema, nakon identičnih procesa preobrade i procjene. Koristeći obje metrike koje se oslanjaju na unutrašnjih karakteristika seta podataka (različite mjere saslušnosti), kao i vanjske znanje (etikete riječi ugrađenja i teme teme teme zemlje istine), naši eksperimenti pokazuju nekoliko nedostataka u vezi zajedničke prakse u procjeni modela teme.', 'de': 'Von statistischen bis hin zu neuronalen Modellen wurde eine Vielzahl von Themenmodellierungsalgorithmen in der Literatur vorgeschlagen. Aufgrund der Vielfalt der Datensätze und Metriken gab es jedoch nicht viele Anstrengungen, ihre Leistung systematisch auf den gleichen Benchmarks und unter den gleichen Bedingungen zu vergleichen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine Auswahl von 9-Themenmodellierungstechniken aus dem Stand der Technik vor, die eine Vielzahl von Ansätzen zur Aufgabenstellung widerspiegeln, einen Überblick über die verschiedenen Metriken, die verwendet werden, um ihre Leistung zu vergleichen, und die Herausforderungen eines solchen Vergleichs. Wir bewerten empirisch die Performance dieser Modelle in verschiedenen Settings, die eine Vielzahl von realen Bedingungen in Bezug auf Datensatzgröße, Themenanzahl und Themenverteilung widerspiegeln, nach identischen Vorverarbeitungs- und Evaluierungsprozessen. Sowohl Metriken, die auf den intrinsischen Merkmalen des Datensatzes beruhen (verschiedene Kohärenzmetriken), als auch externes Wissen (Worteinbettungen und Ground-Truth Topic Labels), zeigen unsere Experimente einige Mängel hinsichtlich der gängigen Praktiken in der Bewertung von Topic Models auf.', 'ko': '통계 모델부터 신경 모델까지 문헌에서 다양한 주제 모델링 알고리즘을 제시했다.그러나 데이터 집합과 지표의 다양성 때문에 같은 기준과 같은 조건에서 그들의 성능을 체계적으로 비교하는 노력은 많지 않다.본고에서 우리는 최신 기술 중에서 9가지 주제 모델링 기술을 선택하여 임무의 각종 방법을 반영하고 그 성능을 비교하는 데 사용되는 서로 다른 지표와 이런 비교를 하는 도전을 개괄했다.우리는 경험에 따라 이러한 모델이 서로 다른 환경에서의 성능을 평가했다. 이런 환경은 데이터 집합의 크기, 주제의 수량과 주제의 분포 방면의 각종 현실 생활 조건을 반영하고 같은 예처리와 평가 과정을 따른다.데이터 집합의 내재적 특징에 의존하는 두 가지 도량(서로 다른 일치성 도량)과 외부 지식(단어 삽입과 기본 사실 주제 라벨)을 사용하여 우리의 실험은 주제 모델 평가에서 흔히 볼 수 있는 방법의 몇 가지 단점을 제시했다.', 'id': 'Dari statistik ke model saraf, banyak algoritma model topik telah diusulkan dalam literatur. Namun, karena perbedaan dataset dan metrik, tidak banyak usaha untuk membandingkan prestasi mereka secara sistematis pada benchmarks yang sama dan dalam kondisi yang sama. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan seleksi dari 9 teknik model topik dari state of the art yang merefleksikan kebanyakan pendekatan untuk tugas, panjang dari metrik berbeda yang digunakan untuk membandingkan prestasi mereka, dan tantangan untuk melakukan perbandingan seperti itu. Kami secara empiris mengevaluasi prestasi model ini pada pengaturan yang berbeda yang merefleksikan berbagai kondisi kehidupan nyata dalam terma ukuran dataset, jumlah topik, dan distribusi topik, mengikuti proses persiapan dan evaluasi yang sama. Menggunakan kedua metrik yang bergantung pada karakteristik intrinsik dari set data (metrik koerensi yang berbeda), serta pengetahuan eksternal (embedding kata dan label topik kebenaran-tanah), eksperimen kami mengungkapkan beberapa kekurangan mengenai praktek umum dalam evaluasi model topik.', 'fa': 'از آمار به مدل عصبی، الگوریتم\u200cهای مختلف مدل\u200cسازی موضوع در ادبیات پیشنهاد شده است. با این حال، به خاطر مختلف مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها و متریک، تلاش زیادی برای تقسیم کردن عملکرد آنها در یک مقدار و زیر یک شرایط وجود نداشته است. در این کاغذ، ما یک انتخاب از نو تکنیک مدل\u200cسازی موضوع را از وضعیت هنر نشان می\u200cدهیم که گونه\u200cگونه\u200cای از نزدیک\u200cها به کار نشان می\u200cدهد، یک نظر از متریک\u200cهای متفاوتی که برای مقایسه کردن عملکرد آنها استفاده می\u200cشود، و چالش\u200cها برای انجام این مقایسه است. ما عملکرد این مدلها را در تنظیمات متفاوتی ارزیابی می کنیم که در نظر اندازه\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cها، تعداد موضوع و توزیع موضوع، بعد از فرایندهای پیش\u200cپردازش و ارزیابی یکسان نشان می\u200cدهند. استفاده از هر دو متریک که بر ویژگی های داخلی از مجموعه داده (متریک متفاوتی متفاوتی) و دانش خارجی (نقاشی کلمه\u200cهای داخلی و موضوع حقیقت زمینی) استفاده می\u200cکنند، آزمایش\u200cهای ما چندین ناکامی در مورد تمرین مشترک در ارزیابی مدل\u200cهای موضوع نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'sw': 'Kutoka takwimu hadi mifano ya neurali, algorithi mbalimbali za mifano ya mada zimependekezwa katika fasihi. Hata hivyo, kwa sababu ya tofauti za seti za taarifa na mbinu, hakuna juhudi nyingi za kulinganisha utendaji wao katika misingi hiyo na chini ya hali ile ile. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka chaguo la mbinu za mifano 9 za mada kutoka katika hali ya sanaa zinazoonyesha tofauti za mitazamo kwenye kazi hiyo, mtazamo wa mitindo tofauti uliotumika kulinganisha utendaji wao, na changamoto za kufanya ulinganisho huo. Tunapatiza kwa makini ufanisi wa mifano hii katika mazingira tofauti yanayoonyesha hali mbalimbali ya maisha ya kweli kwa mujibu wa ukubwa wa taarifa, idadi ya mada, na usambazaji wa mada, kufuatia michakato yanayofanana na utafiti. Kwa kutumia mbinu zote zinazotegemea takwimu za ndani ya taarifa (mbinu tofauti za ushirikiano), pamoja na maarifa ya nje (neno linalojumuisha na maabara ya mada halisi ya ardhi), majaribio yetu yanaonyesha ukosefu wa vifupi kadhaa kuhusu vitendo vya kawaida katika mifano ya mada.', 'tr': 'Statistika näyral modellerden bäri, edebiýatynda birnäçe görnüş tema modelleýän algoritmalar teklip edildi. Ýöne, veri setirleriniň we metrikleriniň näçe görnüşleri sebäbi sistematik görnüşleri birnäçe çözümlerinde we bir şertlerde gurlaşdyrmak üçin köp çabalar ýok. Bu kagyzda, sungatyň durumyndan 9 tema modelleşdirmek tekniklerini çykaryp görevi näçe golaýlaryny görkez, farklı metrikleriň ukyplaryny çykarmak üçin ullanýan we şeýle bir uruşdaşmagyň kynçylyklaryny görkez. Biz bu nusgalaryň etkinleşigini farklı düzümlerde deňlendirip veri sistemasy ululykyna, meýdanlaryň sany we meýdanlaryň daýrylygyna görä, birnäçe öň-işleme we deňlenme prosellerinden ybaratýarys. Veri setiniň (farklı hereket metriklerine) daşarydaky bilim we daşarydaky bilim (sözler girişinde we yerleşik temalaryň etiketlerine ynanýan) hem metriklerimiz, deneylerimiz meňzeş praktikalar barada birnäçe ýeterlik ýüzerinde görkezilýän çäsirlerimizi belli edip bilýär.', 'af': "Van statistieke na neurale modelles is 'n wyse verskillende onderwerp modellering algoritme voorgestel in die literature. Maar vanweë die verskeidigheid van datastelle en metriek het daar nie baie versoekte gewees om hulle prestasie te vergelyk op dieselfde benchmarke en onder dieselfde voorwaardes nie. In hierdie papier stel ons 'n keuse van 9 onderwerp modelleringteknike van die staat van die kuns wat 'n verskeidigheid van toegang tot die taak reflekteer, 'n oorskou van die verskillende metrike wat gebruik word om hul prestasie te vergelyk en die uitdagings van sodanige 'n vergelyking te doen. Ons evalueer empiriese die prestasie van hierdie modele op verskillende instellings wat 'n verskillende reël-lewens-voorwaardes reflekteer in terms van datastel grootte, aantal onderwerpe en verspreiding van onderwerpe, volgens identiese voorspoeding en evaluering prosesse. Die gebruik van beide metries wat op die intrinsiese karakteristieke van die datastel vertrou (verskillende koherens metries), en ook eksterne kennis (woord inbettings en grond-waarheid onderwerp etikette), vertoon ons eksperimente verskeie kortpaaklikhede aangaande die gemeenskaplike praksies in onderwerp model evaluering.", 'sq': 'From statistical to neural models, a wide variety of topic modelling algorithms have been proposed in the literature.  Megjithatë, për shkak të shumëllojshmërisë së grupeve të të dhënave dhe metrikave, nuk ka patur shumë përpjekje për të krahasuar sistematikisht performancën e tyre në të njëjtat pikë referimi dhe në të njëjtat kushte. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një zgjedhje të 9 teknikave modelimi tematike nga gjendja e artit që pasqyrojnë një diversitet të qasjeve ndaj detyrës, një përmbledhje të metrikave të ndryshme të përdorura për të krahasuar performancën e tyre dhe sfidat e kryerjes së një krahasimi të tillë. Ne empirikisht vlerësojmë performancën e këtyre modeleve në rregullime të ndryshme që pasqyrojnë një varietet kushteve të jetës reale në lidhje me madhësinë e grupit të të dhënave, numrin e temave dhe shpërndarjen e temave, pas proceseve të përgatitjes dhe vlerësimit identike. Duke përdorur të dy metrikat që mbështeten në karakteristikat intrinsike të grupit të të dhënave (metrikat e ndryshme koherence) si dhe njohuritë e jashtme (përfshirjet e fjalëve dhe etiketat e temës së së vërtetës-tokës), eksperimentet tona zbulojnë disa mungesa lidhur me praktikat e përbashkëta në vlerësimin e modeleve tematike.', 'am': 'ከstatistic ጀምሮ ጀምሮ ጀምሮ በሐሳብ ላይ የተዘጋጀ የጦማሪያዎች አሌጎርቲም ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ ነገር ግን ከዳታ ሰርቨሮች እና ምትርኮች የተለየ ብልሃት የተነሣ፣ በአንድ ደብዳቤ እና በአንድ ክፍል ላይ ስርዓታቸውን በሥርዓት ለማስተካከል ብዙ ድጋፍ አልነበረም፡፡ In this paper, we present a selection of 9 topic modelling techniques from the state of the art reflecting a diversity of approaches to the task, an overview of the different metrics used to compare their performance, and the challenges of conducting such a comparison.  በተለያዩ የሕይወት ሥርዓት መጠን፣ የውይይቶች ቁጥር፣ ጉዳዮች ቁጥር እና ጉዳዮችን እናካፍናለን፡፡ በሁለቱ ሜትሪኮች ላይ የሚታመኑ የዳታ ደረጃዎች (ልዩ ሙትርት ሜሪካ) እና ውጭ እውቀት (ቃላት የውይይት እና የመሬት ውይይት ማዕከላዎች) በመጠቀም ፈተናዎቻችን በጉዳዩ ዓይነቶች ላይ የተለየ ሁኔታ ጉዳይ ግንኙነት ይገልጣል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ստոտիկական մոդելներից մինչև նեյրոնային մոդելներ գրականության մեջ առաջարկվել են թեմային մոդելման ալգորիթմներ: Այնուամենայնիվ, տվյալների համակարգերի և չափումների բազմազանության պատճառով շատ ջանքեր չկային, որոնք կարողացան համակարգչաբար համեմատել իրենց արտադրությունը նույն համեմատական նպատակներով և նույն պայմաններով: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք 9 թեմայի մոդելավորման տեխնիկա ընտրությունը, որը արտացոլում է առաջադրանքի տարբեր մոտեցումների բազմազանությունը, տարբեր մետրաչափումները, որոնք օգտագործվում են նրանց արտադրողությունների համեմատության համար, և նման համեմատության իրականացման մարտահր Մենք էմպրիկապես գնահատում ենք այս մոդելների արտադրողությունը տարբեր միջավայրերի վրա, որոնք արտացոլում են իրական կյանքի տարբեր պայմաններ տվյալների համակարգի չափի, թեմաների թվի և թեմաների տարածման առումով, նույն նախագործման և գնահատման գործընթացների հետևանքո Օգտագործելով երկու մետրիկները, որոնք հիմնված են տվյալների համակարգի ներքին հատկությունների վրա (տարբեր համապատասխանատվության մետրիկներ), ինչպես նաև արտաքին գիտելիքների վրա (բառերի ներդրումներ և հողի ճշմարտության թեմայի պիտակներ), մեր փորձերը բացահայտում են մի քանի թերություններ թեմայի', 'az': 'Statistik modellərdən nöral modellərə qədər çoxlu məsələlər modelləşdirmək algoritmi literaturada təbliğ edilmişdir. Lakin, verilən setlərin və metriklərin müxtəlifliyinə görə sistematik olaraq onların performanslarını eyni benchmarklarda və eyni şartlarda salmaq üçün çox çabalar yoxdur. Bu kağızda, sanatın məlumatının məlumatından 9 məlumatın modellik tekniklərinin seçimini göstərdik, işlərinin müxtəlif tərzlərini göstərdik, müxtəlif metriklərin nəzəriyyəti onların performanslarını qarşılaşdırmaq üçün istifadə edilən, və bu məlumatın çətinliklərini göstərdik. Biz bu modellərin performansını müxtəlif tərzlərində müxtəlif həyat şərtlərini verilən qurğu böyüklüyü, məsələlərin sayısı və məsələlərin dağıtılışını müxtəlif tərzlərində təşkil edirik. Verilər quruluğuna təvəkkül edən iki metrik, həmçin in dış bilgi (sözlər in şa edilməsi və yerli-gerçəklik məsələlərinin etiketlərinə təvəkkül edən, təminatlarımız məsələlərin müxtəlif təminatları barəsində çoxlu fərqli təminatları göstərir.', 'bn': 'পরিসংখ্যান থেকে নিউরেল মডেল থেকে সাহিত্যে প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে। তবে, ডাটাসেট এবং মেট্রিকের বৈচিত্র্যের কারণে একই বেনমার্ক এবং একই অবস্থায় তাদের প্রভাবের তুলনায় অনেক প্রচেষ্টা নেই। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা শিল্পের রাষ্ট্র থেকে ৯টি বিষয়ের মডেলিং প্রযুক্তির একটি নির্বাচন উপস্থাপন করি কাজের বৈচিত্র্যের প্রতিক্রিয়া, তাদের প্রদর্শনের তুলনায় বিভিন্ন ধর ডাটাসেটের আকার, সংখ্যা বিষয়বস্তু এবং বিষয়বস্তুর বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যের প্রতিক্রিয়ার বিভিন্ন ধরনের জীবন পরিস্থিতির প্রতি ডাটাসেটের অভ্যন্তরীণ বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর নির্ভর করে দুটি মেট্রিক ব্যবহার করে এবং বাইরের জ্ঞান (শব্দ বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন বিষয়ের লেবেল) ব্যবহার করে, আমাদের পরীক্ষা বিষয়ট', 'bs': 'Od statističkih do neuralnih modela u literaturi je predloženo široko raznolikost algoritma modeliranja teme. Međutim, zbog raznolikosti seta podataka i metrika, nije bilo mnogo napora da sistematski usporedi njihovu učinku na istim kriterijama i pod istim uvjetima. U ovom papiru predstavljamo izbor od 9 tehnika modeliranja teme iz stanja umjetnosti koja odražava raznolikost pristupa zadatku, pregled različitih metrika korištenih za usporedbu njihovih učinka, i izazova provođenja takvog usporedbe. Mi empirički procjenjujemo učinkovitost ovih modela na različitim nastavacima koji odražavaju razne uvjete stvarnog života u smislu veličine seta podataka, broja tema i distribucije tema, nakon identičnih procesa preobrade i procjene. Koristeći obje metrike koje se oslanjaju na unutrašnjih karakteristika seta podataka (različite koherencije metrike), kao i vanjskih znanja (etikete riječi ugrađenja i teme teme teme zemlje istine), naši eksperimenti pokazuju nekoliko nedostataka u vezi zajedničke prakse u procjeni modela teme.', 'ca': "Des dels models estadístics fins als neurones, a la literatura s'han proposat una gran varietat d'algoritmes de modelació de temes. No obstant això, a causa de la diversitat de conjunts de dades i mètriques, no hi ha hagut molts esforços per comparar sistemàticament el seu rendiment en els mateixos punts de referència i en les mateixes condicions. In this paper, we present a selection of 9 topic modelling techniques from the state of the art reflecting a diversity of approaches to the task, an overview of the different metrics used to compare their performance, and the challenges of conducting such a comparison.  Evaluam empíricament el rendiment d'aquests models en diferents entorns que reflecteixen una varietat de condicions de vida real en termes de tamany del conjunt de dades, nombre de temes i distribució de temes, segons processos de preprocessió i evaluació idèntics. Utilitzant les mateixes mètriques que confien en les característiques intrínsecs del conjunt de dades (diferents mètriques de coherencia), com i en el coneixement extern (incorporacions de paraules i etiquetes de temes de veritat fonamental), els nostres experiments revelen diverses deficiències en relació amb les pràctiques comunes en l'evaluació de models de temes.", 'cs': 'Od statistických až po neuronové modely byla v literatuře navržena široká škála tématických modelovacích algoritmů. Vzhledem k rozmanitosti datových sad a metrik však nebylo mnoho úsilí systematicky porovnávat jejich výkonnost na stejných měřítkách a za stejných podmínek. V tomto článku představujeme výběr devíti tématických modelovacích technik ze stavu techniky odrážejících rozmanitost přístupů k danému úkolu, přehled různých metrik použitých k porovnání jejich výkonu a výzvy spojené s prováděním takového srovnání. Empiricky hodnotíme výkonnost těchto modelů na různých nastaveních odrážejících různé reálné podmínky z hlediska velikosti datové sady, počtu témat a rozdělení témat, a to podle stejných procesů předzpracování a hodnocení. Použitím metrik, které vycházejí z vnitřních charakteristik datové sady (různé koherenční metriky), jakož i externích znalostí (vložení slov a označení témat základní pravdy), naše experimenty odhalují několik nedostatků týkajících se běžných postupů v hodnocení tématických modelů.', 'et': 'Kirjanduses on välja pakutud mitmesuguseid teemamodelleerimise algoritme alates statistilistest kuni närvimudeliteni. Andmekogumite ja mõõdikute mitmekesisuse tõttu ei ole siiski tehtud palju jõupingutusi nende tulemuslikkuse süstemaatiliseks võrdlemiseks samadel võrdlusnäitajatel ja samadel tingimustel. Käesolevas töös esitame valiku 9 teemamodelleerimise tehnikast, mis kajastavad erinevaid lähenemisviise ülesandele, ülevaate erinevatest mõõdikutest, mida kasutatakse nende tulemuslikkuse võrdlemiseks, ning sellise võrdluse läbiviimisega seotud väljakutsetest. Me hindame empiiriliselt nende mudelite jõudlust erinevates seadetes, mis kajastavad erinevaid reaalseid tingimusi andmekogumi suuruse, teemade arvu ja teemade jaotuse osas, järgides identseid eeltöötlus- ja hindamisprotsesse. Kasutades nii andmekogumi olemuslikele omadustele tuginevaid mõõdikuid (erinevad sidususmõõdikud) kui ka väliseid teadmisi (sõnade manustamine ja alustõde teemasildid), ilmneb meie katsetes mitmeid puudusi teemamudelite hindamise tavades.', 'fi': 'Kirjallisuudessa on ehdotettu monenlaisia aihemallinnusalgoritmeja tilastollisista malleista neuromalleihin. Dataaineistojen ja mittareiden moninaisuuden vuoksi niiden suorituskykyä ei kuitenkaan ole juurikaan pyritty vertailemaan systemaattisesti samoilla vertailuarvoilla ja samoilla ehdoilla. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään 9 aihemallinnustekniikkaa, jotka heijastavat erilaisia lähestymistapoja tehtävään, yleiskatsauksen niiden suorituskyvyn vertailuun käytetyistä eri mittareista sekä tällaisen vertailun tekemisen haasteita. Arvioimme empiirisesti näiden mallien suorituskykyä eri asetuksissa, jotka heijastavat erilaisia tosielämän olosuhteita aineiston koon, aiheiden määrän ja aiheiden jakautumisen suhteen, käyttäen identtisiä esikäsittely- ja arviointiprosesseja. Käyttämällä sekä aineiston luontaisiin ominaisuuksiin perustuvia mittareita (erilaiset koherenssimittarit) että ulkoista tietoa (word embeddings ja ground-truth topic labels), kokeemme paljastavat useita puutteita aihemallien arviointiin liittyvissä yhteisissä käytännöissä.', 'jv': 'Sumulai ke model sing dadi, akeh akeh akeh model sing tema iki, dadi jenis-jenis neng dadi basa. Nanging, kaya sistematik, dadi sing sampeyan dataset lan parameter, sing ora ono sedhaya pisan karo sistematik nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasakno karo bendhurikan sing berarti iki sakjane sampeyan sing berarti. Nang mapir iki, kita diwubah tanggal 9 teknik model sing bisa pernik ingkang diolah karo hal dadi kaja sing ngedol karo nggawe geraraning nggawe barang sampeyan karo nggawe sistem sing ngedol karo nggawe geraraning dhéwé, lan sakjane pernik nggawe geraraning sampeyan karo pak Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntukno akeh model iki ning halaman sing gawe ngubah perusahaan langgar sampek pisan Manual sing gawe dataset kuwat, nganggo perusahaan Tema lan nggawe werak-werak, iso nggawe perusahaan sampek iso nggawe nguasai perusahaan karo pakem sing berarti dadi. Ngawe gambar sistem sing dibenakake nggunakake cara-teka sing nggawe dataset', 'sk': 'Od statističnih do nevronskih modelov so v literaturi predlagali široko paleto algoritmov tematskega modeliranja. Vendar pa zaradi raznolikosti naborov podatkov in meritev ni bilo veliko prizadevanj za sistematično primerjavo njihove uspešnosti na enakih merilih in pod enakimi pogoji. V prispevku predstavljamo izbor devetih tematskih modeliralnih tehnik iz najsodobnejše tehnike, ki odražajo raznolikost pristopov k nalogi, pregled različnih meritev, uporabljenih za primerjavo njihove uspešnosti, in izzive izvedbe take primerjave. Empirično ocenjujemo učinkovitost teh modelov v različnih nastavitvah, ki odražajo različne realne pogoje v smislu velikosti nabora podatkov, števila tem in porazdelitve tem, po enakih procesih predobdelave in ocenjevanja. Z uporabo meritev, ki temeljijo na notranjih značilnostih nabora podatkov (različne meritve koherence), kot tudi zunanjega znanja (vgradnje besed in oznake temeljne resnice teme), naši eksperimenti razkrivajo številne pomanjkljivosti glede skupnih praks pri vrednotenju tematskih modelov.', 'he': 'מהסטטיסטיקה למודלים עצביים, מגוון רחב של אלגוריתמים מודלים נושאים הציעו בספרות. However, because of the diversity of datasets and metrics, there have not been many efforts to systematically compare their performance on the same benchmarks and under the same conditions.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים בחירה של 9 טכניקות דוגמנית נושאים מהמצב האמנותי שמשתקפות מגוון של גישות למשימה, מבט על המטריקות השונים שנמשכות להשוות את ביצועיהם, ואת האתגרים של ביצוע השוואה כזו. אנו מעריכים אמפירית את ההופעה של הדוגמנים האלה על מסדרים שונים שמשתקפים מגוון של תנאי חיים אמיתיים במונחים בגודל קבוצת נתונים באמצעות שני מטריות שמסומכות על האופיינים הפנימיים של קבוצת הנתונים (מטריות תואם שונות), כמו גם ידע חיצוני (קבוצות מילים ותוויות נושאים של אמת קרקע), הניסויים שלנו חושפים מספר חסרות בנוגע לפרקטיקות המשותפות בערכת מודלים נושאים.', 'ha': "From statistical to neural, an buƙata wasu algoritomi masu motsi na madaidaici cikin littafi. A lokacin da, sabõda mãsu sãɓãni na tsari da metrici, ba za'a sami aikin ƙwarai da cikakken su a kan duk bangon da kuma a ƙarƙashin da ke shi. Ga wannan takarda, Munã nuna wani na'urar masu shiryi na madaidaici 9 daga halin sanar, yana mai ƙayyade wasu hanyõyi masu zuwa aikin, an samfani wasu mitori da aka yi amfani da su sammeni da aikin su, da masu kansalar da za'a sami wannan. Tuna ƙaddara game da cikakken waɗannan misãlai a kan wasu shiryoyin hanyõyi dabam-daban, sunã yi wa'azi masu cikin halin rãyuwa a cikin muhimman da aka daidaita girma, ƙidãyar maɓallin, da raba maɓallin, idan an sami aikin bayani da za'a yi amfani da shi. Yi amfani da duk metrici waɗanda ke dõgara kan ƙananan cikin tsarin dataset (masu motsi da kwamfyuta), da kuma ma'anar bayani (maganar embeddinga da mazaɓan bakin gaske), jarrabayanmu suka bayyana masu ƙaranci masu bin aikin da ke cikin misãlai masu cikin muhimmada.", 'bo': 'ཚད་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་སྒུལ་གྱི་མིག་དཔེ་ལ་དག་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་འཕེལ་རིམ་པ་སྣེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བྱས་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། གནད་དོན་ཡིག་སྡུད་ཚན་དང་ཚད་རིམ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་མ་ཤེས་པའི་སྐྱེས་ཚད་གཅིག་ལས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་བ In this paper, we present a selection of 9 topic modelling techniques from the state of the art reflecting a diversity of approaches to the task, an overview of the different metrics used to compare their performance, and the challenges of conducting such a comparison. Examples of these are: ང་ཚོས་སྒྲིག Using both metrics that rely on the intrinsic characteristics of the dataset (different coherence metrics), as well as external knowledge (word embeddings and ground-truth topic labels), our experiments reveal several shortcomings regarding the common practices in topic models evaluation.'}
{'en': 'Semi-Supervised and Unsupervised Sense Annotation via Translations', 'ar': 'الشرح شبه الخاضع للإشراف وغير الخاضع للإشراف عبر الترجمات', 'es': 'Anotación sensorial semisupervisada y no supervisada a través de traducciones', 'fr': 'Annotation de sens semi-supervisée et non supervisée via des traductions', 'pt': 'Anotação de sentido semi-supervisionada e não supervisionada via traduções', 'ja': '翻訳による半監修および監修なしの感覚注釈', 'ru': 'Полунадзорная и неконтролируемая сенсорная аннотация через переводы', 'hi': 'अनुवाद के माध्यम से अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित और असुरक्षित सेंस एनोटेशन', 'zh': '译者半监、无监者注', 'ga': 'Anótáil Smaointe Leath-mhaoirsithe agus Gan Mhaoirseacht trí Aistriúcháin', 'ka': 'პროგრამეტური დანახვა და არაფერიზებული სიგრძნე ანოტაციაComment', 'el': 'Ημι-εποπτευόμενη και μη εποπτευόμενη αίσθηση σχολιασμός μέσω μεταφράσεων', 'it': 'Annotazione di senso semi-supervisionata e non supervisionata tramite traduzioni', 'kk': 'Аудармалар арқылы жарты бақылау және қолданылмаған сезім мәліметі', 'lt': 'Pusprižiūrima ir nekontroliuojama jutimo anotacija per vertimus', 'mk': 'Половина надгледувана и ненадгледувана анатација на чувства преку преводи', 'ms': 'Annotasi Sensa Semi-Dijaga dan Tidak Dijaga Melalui Terjemahan', 'hu': 'Félig felügyelt és felügyeletlen érzékelési jegyzék fordításokon keresztül', 'mt': 'Annotazzjoni tas-Sens Semissorveljata u Mhux Sorveljata permezz tat-Traduzzjonijiet', 'mn': 'Хугацаанд Хэрэглэгдсэн, Хэрэглэгдэхгүй мэдрэмжтэй Ангилал', 'pl': 'Częściowo nadzorowana i nienadzorowana komentarz sensu za pomocą tłumaczeń', 'no': 'Halvoversikt og uverkt følelsesnotasjon gjennom omsetjingar', 'ro': 'Adnotare de simț semi-supravegheată și nesupravegheată prin traduceri', 'si': 'වාර්ථාව මධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරධානය සහ අවධානය කරලා නැති සංවේදනය', 'sr': 'Полово наблюдени и неподржавани признак чувства путем превода', 'ml': 'പരിഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d മുഖേന സെന്\u200dസ് അറിയിപ്പു് നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാതിരിക്കുന്നു', 'so': 'Wargelinta Sensorka ee la ilaaliyey', 'sv': 'Halvövervakad och oövervakad förnuftsanatering via översättningar', 'ur': 'ترجمہ کے ذریعے نصف نظر والی اور غیرقابل غیرقابل احساس انٹلائی', 'ta': 'மொழிபெயர்ப்புகள் மூலம் பார்க்கப்பட்ட மற்றும் கண்காணிக்கப்படாத அனுப்பு அறிவிப்பு', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Ghi chú cảm xúc, giám sát, không giám sát thông qua dịch', 'bg': 'Полунадзорена и ненадблюдавана сензорна анотация чрез преводи', 'hr': 'Polovično nadgledano i neodržavano oznake osjećaja putem prevoda', 'da': 'Halvtilsynet og ukontrolleret sanseannontering via oversættelser', 'nl': 'Semi-supervised en niet-supervised sense annotatie via vertalingen', 'de': 'Semi-Supervised und Unsupervised Sense Annotation über Übersetzungen', 'ko': '번역을 통한 반감독과 비감독의 의미 주석', 'id': 'Annotasi Sensa Semi-DiSupervisi dan Tidak DiSupervisi Melalui Terjemahan', 'sw': 'Tangazo la Sensi la Kufuatiliwa na Tafsiri', 'tr': 'Çoklu gözetlenmiş ve Saqlanmamış Sense Notasyonu Çevirmeler Aracıyla', 'af': 'Semi- ondersoekte en Onondersoekte Sense Notasie deur Vertalings', 'fa': 'نویسندۀ احساسات نیمه مراقبت و غیرقابل حفاظت از طریق ترجمه\u200cها', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Njoftim i ndjeshëm gjysmë mbikqyrur dhe pa mbikqyrur nëpërmjet përkthimeve', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Yarı Gözlənmiş və Gözlənməmiş Senz Açıqları Tərcümələri vasitəsilə', 'bn': 'অনুবাদের মাধ্যমে সেমি- সুপার্ভিট এবং অনভার করা সেন্সের বিজ্ঞাপন', 'ca': 'Anotació de sentits semisupervisada i sense supervisió a través de traduccions', 'cs': 'Polovičně dohlížená a nekontrolovaná poznámka smyslu prostřednictvím překladů', 'bs': 'Polovično nadgledano i neodređeno oznake osjećaja putem prevoda', 'fi': 'Puolivalvottu ja valvomaton aistihuomautus käännösten kautta', 'et': 'Pooljärelevalvega ja järelevalveta sense annotatsioon tõlkete kaudu', 'ha': 'Annoction', 'he': 'Semi-Supervised and Unsupervised Sense Annotation via Translations', 'sk': 'Polnadzorovana in nenadzorovana opomba smisla prek prevodov', 'jv': 'Ngucap Jabun', 'bo': 'ལོ་རྒྱུས་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་དང་སྙིང་མེད་པའི་ཚོར་ཡིག་གི་སྒྲ་སྐད་འདོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མིན་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Acquisition of multilingual training data continues to be a challenge in word sense disambiguation (WSD). To address this problem, unsupervised approaches have been proposed to automatically generate sense annotations for training supervised WSD systems. We present three new methods for creating sense-annotated corpora which leverage translations, parallel bitexts, lexical resources, as well as contextual and synset embeddings. Our semi-supervised method applies machine translation to transfer existing sense annotations to other languages. Our two unsupervised methods refine sense annotations produced by a knowledge-based WSD system via lexical translations in a parallel corpus. We obtain state-of-the-art results on standard WSD benchmarks.', 'fr': "L'acquisition de données de formation multilingues continue d'être un défi dans la désambiguïsation du sens des mots (WSD). Pour résoudre ce problème, des approches non supervisées ont été proposées pour générer automatiquement des annotations de détection pour la formation de systèmes WSD supervisés. Nous présentons trois nouvelles méthodes pour créer des corpus annotés par des sens qui exploitent les traductions, les bitextes parallèles, les ressources lexicales, ainsi que les intégrations contextuelles et synsets. Notre méthode semi-supervisée applique la traduction automatique pour transférer les annotations de sens existantes vers d'autres langues. Nos deux méthodes non supervisées affinent les annotations sensorielles produites par un système WSD basé sur la connaissance via des traductions lexicales dans un corpus parallèle. Nous obtenons des résultats de pointe sur les benchmarks WSD standard.", 'ar': 'لا يزال الحصول على بيانات التدريب متعدد اللغات يمثل تحديًا في إزالة الغموض عن معنى الكلمة (WSD). لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، تم اقتراح مناهج غير خاضعة للإشراف لإنشاء تعليقات توضيحية منطقية لتدريب أنظمة WSD الخاضعة للإشراف. نقدم ثلاث طرق جديدة لإنشاء مجموعات ذات تعليقات توضيحية ذات معنى والتي تستفيد من الترجمات ونصوص البتات المتوازية والموارد المعجمية بالإضافة إلى الزخارف السياقية والمتزامنة. تطبق طريقتنا شبه الخاضعة للإشراف الترجمة الآلية لنقل التعليقات التوضيحية الحالية إلى لغات أخرى. تعمل طريقتنا غير الخاضعة للإشراف على تحسين التعليقات التوضيحية ذات المعنى التي ينتجها نظام WSD القائم على المعرفة عبر الترجمات المعجمية في مجموعة موازية. نحصل على أحدث النتائج وفقًا لمعايير WSD القياسية.', 'es': 'La adquisición de datos de entrenamiento multilingües sigue siendo un desafío en la desambiguación del sentido de las palabras (WSD). Para abordar este problema, se han propuesto enfoques no supervisados para generar automáticamente anotaciones sensoriales para el entrenamiento de sistemas WSD supervisados. Presentamos tres nuevos métodos para crear corpus con anotaciones sensoriales que aprovechan las traducciones, los bitextos paralelos, los recursos léxicos, así como las incrustaciones contextuales y synset. Nuestro método semisupervisado aplica la traducción automática para transferir las anotaciones sensoriales existentes a otros idiomas. Nuestros dos métodos no supervisados refinan las anotaciones sensoriales producidas por un sistema WSD basado en el conocimiento a través de traducciones léxicas en un corpus paralelo. Obtenemos resultados de vanguardia en los puntos de referencia de WSD estándar.', 'pt': 'A aquisição de dados de treinamento multilíngue continua a ser um desafio na desambiguação de sentido de palavras (WSD). Para resolver esse problema, abordagens não supervisionadas foram propostas para gerar automaticamente anotações de sentido para treinamento de sistemas WSD supervisionados. Apresentamos três novos métodos para a criação de corpora com anotação de sentido que alavancam traduções, bitextos paralelos, recursos lexicais, bem como embeddings contextuais e synset. Nosso método semissupervisionado aplica tradução automática para transferir anotações de sentido existentes para outros idiomas. Nossos dois métodos não supervisionados refinam anotações de sentido produzidas por um sistema WSD baseado em conhecimento por meio de traduções lexicais em um corpus paralelo. Obtemos resultados de última geração em benchmarks WSD padrão.', 'ja': '多言語トレーニングデータの取得は、単語センスの曖昧さ解消（ WSD ）における課題であり続けている。この問題に対処するために、トレーニング監視されたWSDシステムのセンス注釈を自動的に生成するための監視されていないアプローチが提案されている。私たちは、翻訳、並列ビットテキスト、語彙リソース、コンテキストおよびシンセット埋め込みを活用する、センス注釈付きコーパを作成するための3つの新しい方法を提示します。私たちのセミスーパーバイザリーメソッドは、機械翻訳を使用して、既存のセンス注釈を他の言語に転送します。私たちの2つの監督されていない方法は、並列コーパス内の語彙翻訳を介して、知識ベースのWSDシステムによって生成されたセンス注釈を洗練します。標準的なWSDベンチマークで最先端の結果を得ることができます。', 'zh': '多取语言训练数据仍是词义消歧义(WSD)一挑战。 既已发无监督之法,以练受监之WSD自生感注。 建三以创义注语料库新法,因译并行双文本,词汇资源及上下文合成集嵌之。 我们的半监法应用机器翻译将现在的感官注移到他语言。 二无监督并行语料库中词汇译,优化基于知识 WSD 统生成之义注。 吾于格 WSD 准试最先进。', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी प्रशिक्षण डेटा का अधिग्रहण शब्द अर्थ ों में एक चुनौती बनी हुई है बहुविकल्पी (डब्ल्यूएसडी)। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, असुरक्षित दृष्टिकोण स्वचालित रूप से प्रशिक्षण पर्यवेक्षित WSD प्रणालियों के लिए भावना एनोटेशन उत्पन्न करने के लिए प्रस्तावित किया गया है। हम सेंस-एनोटेट किए गए कॉर्पोरेट बनाने के लिए तीन नए तरीके पेश करते हैं जो अनुवाद, समानांतर बाइटेक्स्ट, लेक्सिकल संसाधनों के साथ-साथ प्रासंगिक और सिंसेट एम्बेडिंग का लाभ उठाते हैं। हमारी अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित विधि अन्य भाषाओं में मौजूदा भावना एनोटेशन को स्थानांतरित करने के लिए मशीन अनुवाद लागू करती है। हमारे दो असुरक्षित तरीके एक समानांतर कॉर्पस में लेक्सिकल अनुवाद के माध्यम से एक ज्ञान-आधारित डब्ल्यूएसडी सिस्टम द्वारा उत्पादित सेंस एनोटेशन को परिष्कृत करते हैं। हम मानक WSD बेंचमार्क पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Is dúshlán i gcónaí é sonraí oiliúna ilteangacha a fháil ó thaobh scaradh ciall focal (WSD). Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an bhfadhb seo, tá cur chuige neamh-mhaoirsithe molta chun nótaí ciallmhara a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch do chórais oiliúna WSD maoirsithe. Cuirimid i láthair trí mhodh nua chun corpora ciallmhar-anótáilte a chruthú a ghiaráil aistriúcháin, bittéacsanna comhthreomhara, acmhainní foclóireachta, chomh maith le neadú comhthéacsúla agus sinset. Cuireann ár modh leath-mhaoirsithe aistriúchán meaisín i bhfeidhm chun nótaí cialla atá ann cheana a aistriú go teangacha eile. Déanann ár dhá mhodh gan mhaoirseacht nótaí braite a tháirgeann córas WSD eolas-bhunaithe a fheabhsú trí aistriúchán foclóireachta i gcorpas comhthreomhar. Faighimid torthaí den scoth ar thagarmharcanna caighdeánacha WSD.', 'ru': 'Приобретение многоязычных учебных данных по-прежнему является проблемой в деле устранения двусмысленности в понимании слов (РСС). Для решения этой проблемы были предложены неконтролируемые подходы, позволяющие автоматически создавать смысловые аннотации для систем ВСД, находящихся под наблюдением инструкторов. Мы представляем три новых метода для создания смысловых аннотированных корпусов, которые используют переводы, параллельные битовые тексты, лексические ресурсы, а также контекстные и синхронные вложения. Наш полунадзорный метод использует машинный перевод для переноса существующих смысловых аннотаций на другие языки. Наши два неконтролируемых метода уточняют смысловые аннотации, созданные системой WSD, основанной на знаниях, посредством лексических переводов в параллельном корпусе. Мы получаем самые современные результаты по стандартным эталонам WSD.', 'el': 'Η απόκτηση πολύγλωσσων δεδομένων κατάρτισης εξακολουθεί να αποτελεί πρόκληση στην αποσαφήνιση λέξεων. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το πρόβλημα, έχουν προταθεί προσεγγίσεις χωρίς επίβλεψη για την αυτόματη δημιουργία νοητικών σχολίων για τα εποπτευόμενα συστήματα εκπαίδευσης. Παρουσιάζουμε τρεις νέες μεθόδους για τη δημιουργία ενσαρκωμένων Corporas που αξιοποιούν μεταφράσεις, παράλληλα bitext, λεξικούς πόρους, καθώς και ενσωμάτωση περιεχομένων και συνοπτικών συνόλων. Η ημι-εποπτευόμενη μέθοδος μας εφαρμόζει τη μηχανική μετάφραση για να μεταφέρει τις υπάρχουσες σημειώσεις αισθήσεων σε άλλες γλώσσες. Οι δύο ανεξέλεγκτες μέθοδοι μας βελτιώνουν τις σημειώσεις αισθήσεων που παράγονται από ένα σύστημα βασισμένο στη γνώση μέσω λεξικών μεταφράσεων σε παράλληλο σώμα. Λαμβάνουμε αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε τυποποιημένα κριτήρια αναφοράς.', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű képzési adatok beszerzése továbbra is kihívást jelent a szó értelmének egyértelműsítésében (WSD). E probléma kezelése érdekében felügyelet nélküli megközelítéseket javasoltak, amelyek automatikusan létrehozzák a felügyelt WSD-rendszerek képzéséhez szükséges érzékelési megjegyzéseket. Három új módszert mutatunk be a fordítások, párhuzamos bitextek, lexikai erőforrások, valamint kontextus és szinkset beágyazások létrehozására. Félig felügyelt módszerünk gépi fordítást alkalmaz a meglévő érzékelési jegyzetek más nyelvekre történő átvitelére. Két felügyelet nélküli módszerünk egy tudásalapú WSD rendszer által készített érzékelési jegyzékeket finomítja párhuzamos korpuszban lévő lexikális fordítások segítségével. A legkorszerűbb eredményeket érjük el a normál WSD referenciaértékeken.', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური განსწავლების მონაცემების მიღება იქნება სიტყვის განსწავლება (WSD). ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, არაფერიზებული გადაწყვეტილებები იყო, რომ ავტომატურად შექმნა სიგრძნობის ანოტაციების შექმნა, რომლებიც დააკეთებული WSD სი ჩვენ სამი ახალი მეთოდის შექმნის შექმნის სინოტექსტური კორპორას, რომელიც გამოიყენებს გადაწყენება, პარალელი ბიტექსტი, ლექსიკალური რესურსი, და კონტექსტური ჩვენი ნახევარწმუნებული მეთოდი მაქსინის გადატანაციას სხვა ენების გადატანაციას. ჩვენი ორი განსხვავებული მეტები განსხვავება სიგრძნობის ანოტაციები, რომლებიც ცნობიერებული WSD სისტემის გამოყენება პოლალელელი კორპუსში ლექსიკალური განსხვავებ ჩვენ მივიღეთ სტანდარტური სტანდარტური სტანდარტურების შესახებ.', 'it': "L'acquisizione di dati di formazione multilingue continua ad essere una sfida nella disambiguazione dei termini (WSD). Per affrontare questo problema, sono stati proposti approcci non supervisionati per generare automaticamente annotazioni sensoriali per la formazione di sistemi WSD supervisionati. Presentiamo tre nuovi metodi per creare corpora con annotazioni sensoriali che sfruttano traduzioni, bit paralleli, risorse lessicali, nonché incorporazioni contestuali e di sintesi. Il nostro metodo semi-supervisionato applica la traduzione automatica per trasferire annotazioni sensoriali esistenti in altre lingue. I nostri due metodi non supervisionati affinano le annotazioni sensoriali prodotte da un sistema WSD basato sulla conoscenza tramite traduzioni lessicali in un corpus parallelo. Otteniamo risultati all'avanguardia sui benchmark WSD standard.", 'lt': 'Daugiakalbių mokymo duomenų įsigijimas ir toliau yra iššūkis žodžio prasme, kai kalbama apie nedviprasmiškumą. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, buvo pasiūlyti nepastebimi metodai, kuriais automatiškai būtų sukurtos suprantamos VSD sistemų mokymo anotacijos. Mes pristatome tris naujus metodus, kaip sukurti supratimu anotuotą korprą, kuris sutelkia vertimus, lygiagrečius bitekstus, leksinius išteklius, taip pat kontekstinius ir sintetinius įterpimus. Our semi-supervised method applies machine translation to transfer existing sense annotations to other languages.  Mūsų du nepastebimi metodai tobulina supratimo anotacijas, kurias sukuria žiniomis pagrįsta VSD sistema, naudojant leksinius vertimus lygiagrečiu korpusu. Gavome naujausius rezultatus dėl standartinių VSD lyginamųjų rodiklių.', 'ms': 'Pendapatan data latihan berbilang bahasa terus menjadi cabaran dalam perkataan tidak ambiguasi (WSD). Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, pendekatan tidak diawasi telah diusulkan untuk menghasilkan anotasi sensor secara automatik untuk latihan sistem WSD mengawasi. Kami memperkenalkan tiga kaedah baru untuk mencipta korpra yang mengantuk terjemahan, teks gigit paralel, sumber leksikal, serta penyembedding kontekstual dan sinkset. Kaedah setengah-mengawasi kami melaksanakan terjemahan mesin untuk memindahkan annotasi sensor yang wujud ke bahasa lain. Dua kaedah kami tidak diawasi memperbaiki anotasi sensasi yang dihasilkan oleh sistem WSD berdasarkan pengetahuan melalui terjemahan leksikal dalam korpus selari. We obtain state-of-the-art results on standard WSD benchmarks.', 'mk': 'Добивањето на мултијазични податоци за обука и понатаму претставува предизвик во зборна смисла за разјаснување (ВСД). За решавање на овој проблем, беа предложени ненадгледувани пристапи за автоматски генерирање смислени анотации за обуката надгледувани системи на ВСД. We present three new methods for creating sense-annotated corpora which leverage translations, parallel bitexts, lexical resources, as well as contextual and synset embeddings.  Нашиот полунадгледуван метод аплицира машински превод за пренесување на постоечките сетилни анотации на други јазици. Нашите два ненадгледувани методи ги рафинираат сетилните анотации произведени од систем на ВСД базиран на знаење преку лексички преводи во паралелен корпус. Добиваме најнови резултати на стандардните резултати на ВСД.', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നത് വാക്കിന്റെ വിഷയത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്നതിനുള ഈ പ്രശ്നം വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, സൂക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയമായി വ്യുഎസ്ഡി സിസ്റ്റം പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിന മൂന്നു പുതിയ മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അതില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, പാരാളില്\u200d കടിക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200d, ലെക്സിക് നിലവിലുള്ള ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടുകള്\u200d മറ്റു ഭാഷകളിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങളുടെ സെമി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട നമ്മുടെ രണ്ട് സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വിജ്ഞാനം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ വ്യാസ്ഡി സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു പാരാ നമുക്ക് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് ആര്\u200dട്ട് ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കിട്ടുന്നുണ്ട്. സാധാരണ ഡബ്ലിഎസ്ഡി ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കുകളില്\u200d.', 'mt': 'L-akkwist ta’ dejta dwar it-taħriġ multilingwi għadu sfida f’sens ta’ diżambigwazzjoni tal-kliem (WSD). Biex tiġi indirizzata din il-problema, ġew proposti approċċi mhux sorveljati biex jiġġeneraw awtomatikament annotazzjonijiet tas-sens għal sistemi ta’ WSD sorveljati ta’ taħriġ. Aħna nippreżentaw tliet metodi ġodda għall-ħolqien ta’ korpura annotata bis-sens li tgħin lit-traduzzjonijiet, bit-testijiet paralleli, riżorsi lexiċi, kif ukoll inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwali u sintetiċi. Il-metodu nofs superviż tagħna japplika t-traduzzjoni bil-magna biex jittrasferixxi annotazzjonijiet tas-sens eżistenti għal lingwi oħra. Iż-żewġ metodi tagħna mhux sorveljati jirrifinaw l-annotazzjonijiet tas-sens prodotti minn sistema ta’ WSD ibbażata fuq l-għarfien permezz ta’ traduzzjonijiet lexiċi f’korpus parallel. Aħna nkisbu riżultati l-aktar avvanzati dwar il-punti ta’ riferiment standard tad-WSD.', 'mn': 'Олон хэл суралцах өгөгдлийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөл хэлбэрээр хүлээн зөвшөөрөл байдаг. Энэ асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд, хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн арга барилгуудыг автоматаар хүлээн зөвшөөрөх боломжтой болгодог. Бид мэдрэмжтэй корпора бүтээх гурван шинэ арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь орчуулалт, параллел бикст, лексик нөөц, мөн орчин үеийн болон синхронт байгуулалт. Бидний хагас удирдлагатай арга нь машины хөрөнгө оруулалтыг бусад хэл руу шилжүүлэхэд хэрэглэдэг. Бидний хоёр төлөвлөгдсөн арга нь мэдлэгтэй WSD системээр бүтээгдэхүүний мэдрэмжүүдийг параллел корпусын лексик хэлбэрээр сайжруулдаг. Бид стандарт WSD багц дээр урлагийн үр дүн гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Akseptering av fleirspråk opplæringsdata fortsetter å vera eit utfordring i ordfølelsen for disambiguasjon (WSD). For å oppretta dette problemet, er det første ikkje oppretta tilnærmingar for å automatisk laga følelsesnotasjonar for opplæring av oversikte WSD-systemar. Vi presenterer tre nye metodar for å laga følelsesmerket korpora som leverer omsetjingar, parallelle bitextar, leksiske ressursar, og kontekst og synkronisering. Det halvoversikte metoden vårt brukar maskineoversettelse for å overføra eksisterande følelsesnotasjonar til andre språk. Våre to ugjennomsiktige metodar refiner følelsesannotasjonar som er produsert av eit vitenskapsbasert WSD-system via leksisk omsetjingar i ein parallell korpus. Vi får resultat av kunsten på standard WSD-benchmarker.', 'pl': 'Pozyskiwanie wielojęzycznych danych szkoleniowych nadal stanowi wyzwanie w rozumieniu słowa (WSD). Aby rozwiązać ten problem, zaproponowano podejścia bez nadzoru, które automatycznie generują adnotacje sensowe dla systemów nadzorowanych nad szkoleniem. Przedstawiamy trzy nowe metody tworzenia korpusów z adnotacjami sensu, które wykorzystują tłumaczenia, równoległe biteksty, zasoby leksykalne, a także osadzenia kontekstowe i synsetowe. Nasza pół-nadzorowana metoda stosuje tłumaczenie maszynowe do przenoszenia istniejących adnotacji zmysłowych do innych języków. Nasze dwie metody bez nadzoru udoskonalają adnotacje zmysłowe wytwarzane przez oparty na wiedzy system WSD poprzez tłumaczenia leksykalne w równoległym korpusie. Uzyskujemy najnowocześniejsze wyniki na standardowych wskaźnikach referencyjnych WSD.', 'kk': 'Бірнеше тілдік оқыту деректерін алу әлі сөздердің сөздерінің өзгерістері (WSD) болып тұрады. Бұл мәселеге шешу үшін, басқару жүйелерді бақылайтын WSD жүйелерді автоматты түрде жазбаларды құру үшін қолданылады. Біз түсіндірілген корпораны құру үш жаңа әдістерді таңдаймыз. Бұл аудармаларды, параллелі битексті, лексикалық ресурстарды, сондай-ақ контексті және қадамдастыру құрылғыларын көмектес Біздің жарты бақылау әдіміміз басқа тілдерге бар сезім мәліметтерін аудару үшін машинаны аудару әдісін қолданады. Біздің екі қолданбаған әдістеріміз білім негіздеген WSD жүйесінен жасалған түсініктерді параллел корпус арқылы лексикалық аудармаларды түзету арқылы. Біз стандартты WSD бағдарламаларының күй- жайы нәтижелерін аламыз.', 'ro': 'Achiziționarea de date de formare multilingvă continuă să reprezinte o provocare în dezambiguizarea sensului cuvintelor (WSD). Pentru a soluționa această problemă, s-au propus abordări nesupravegheate pentru a genera automat adnotări de sens pentru formarea sistemelor WSD supravegheate. Vă prezentăm trei metode noi pentru crearea corpurilor adnotate cu simțuri care utilizează traduceri, bitexturi paralele, resurse lexicale, precum și încorporări contextuale și sintet. Metoda noastră semi-supravegheată aplică traducerea automată pentru a transfera adnotările de simț existente în alte limbi. Cele două metode nesupravegheate rafinează adnotările de simțuri produse de un sistem WSD bazat pe cunoaștere prin traduceri lexicale într-un corpus paralel. Obţinem rezultate de ultimă oră la standardele WSD.', 'sr': 'Prihvaćanje podataka o multijezičkoj obuci nastavlja biti izazov u rečima za disambiguaciju (WSD). Za rješavanje ovog problema, predloženi su neodređeni pristupi da bi automatski stvorili oznake smisla za obuku nadziranih sustava WSD-a. Predstavljamo tri nove metode za stvaranje osjećajne annotirane korpore koje utiču na prevode, paralelne bitexte, leksičke resurse, kao i kontekstualne i sinkronizacije. Naša polu-nadzorna metoda primjenjuje prevod mašine na prenošenje postojećih oznake smisla na drugi jezici. Naše dve nepotrebne metode refiniraju annotacije osjećaja proizvedene od sustava WSD-a na znanju putem leksičkih prevoda u paralelnom korpusu. Dobiæemo rezultate umetnosti na standardnim kriterijima WSD-a.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාවික ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා දත්ත ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අභ්\u200dයානයක් වෙනවා වචන අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට (WSD). මේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය කරන්න, විශ්වාස කරන්න බැරි විධානයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විධානය කරන්න ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විධානය කරන් අපි අළුත් විධානය තුනක් පෙන්වන්නේ අදහස් විධානයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න. ඒ වගේම අවශ්\u200dය විධානය, සමාන්\u200dය බිට්ස්ට්, ලෙක්සි අපේ අධ්\u200dයපරීක්ෂණ විධානය පරීක්ෂණය යුද්ධ පරීක්ෂණය වෙනුවෙන් අනිත් භාෂාවට තියෙන්න තේරු අපේ දෙන්නෙක් විධානය නැති විධානය නිර්මාණය කරනවා අදහස් අධික WSD පද්ධතියෙන් නිර්මාණය කරනවා සමාන්\u200dය කෝපුස අපිට ප්\u200dරමාණය WSD බෙන්ච්මාර්ක්ස් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිදේශයක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'so': 'Aqsashada macluumaadka waxbarashada luuqadaha kala duduwan wuxuu sii socdaa mid dhibaato ah oo ka baaraandegista hadalka (WSD). Si loo qabsado dhibaatadan waxaa loo talo galay qaabooyin aan la ilaalinayn in ay automatic u soo saaraan ogeysiiska maanka ee waxbarashada nidaamka WSD la ilaaliyey. Waxaynu keennaa saddex qaab cusub oo ah sameynta shirkad aan waxyaabaha lagu xumeeyey, taasoo ah tarjumaadyo, qeybta lambarka ah, xuquuqda leksikada, sidoo kale qalabka ku qoran. Shaqooyinkayada halka ka soo ilaalinaysan wuxuu ku codsadaa tarjumaadda mashiinka si uu u wareejiyo warqadaha maanka ah oo kale. Labadayada caadooyinka aan la ilaalinayn waxay hagaajiyaan dhibaatooyinka maanka ee ay ka soo saaraan nidaamka aqoonta ee WSD ee ku qoran tarjumaadda lexical oo isku mid ah. Waxaannu heli karnaa arimaha dowladda ee farshaxanka ah oo ku saabsan bangiyada WSD-da caadiga ah.', 'sv': 'Insamling av flerspråkiga utbildningsdata fortsätter att vara en utmaning när det gäller ordbetydelsens otvetydighet. För att ta itu med detta problem har man föreslagit icke-övervakade tillvägagångssätt för att automatiskt generera förnuftsmärkningar för utbildning av övervakade WSD-system. Vi presenterar tre nya metoder för att skapa förnuftiga korpora som utnyttjar översättningar, parallella bitexter, lexikala resurser samt kontextuella och synsetinbäddningar. Vår halvövervakade metod tillämpar maskinöversättning för att överföra befintliga sinnesanateringar till andra språk. Våra två oövervakade metoder förfinar sinnesanateringar producerade av ett kunskapsbaserat WSD-system via lexikala översättningar i en parallell korpus. Vi får toppmoderna resultat på standardstandarder för WSD.', 'ta': 'பல மொழி பயிற்சி தகவல் பெறுதல் தொடர்ந்து கொண்டிருக்கும் வார்த்தைக் குறிப்பிடுதலில் ஒரு சவால் இந்த பிரச்சினையை முகவரிக்க, பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத முறைமைகளை தானாகவே புரியும் அறிவிப்புகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு பரிந்து நாம் மூன்று புதிய முறைமைகளை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் உணர்வு குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட நிறுவனத்தை உருவாக்குவதற்கு, அது ஒப்பிட்ட மொழிமாற்றுகள், இணைய ப எங்கள் பாதி கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் இயந்திர மொழிமாற்றி பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது இருக்கும் உணர்வு அறிவிப் எங்கள் இரண்டு பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத முறைமைகள் ஒரு அறிவு அடிப்படையான WSD முறைமையில் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ள உணர்வு குறிப்பை மாற் நாங்கள் நிலையான WSD குறிப்புகளின் நிலையில் கலை முடிவுகள் கிடைக்கும்.', 'ur': 'بہت سی زبان کی تعلیم دیٹائی حاصل کرنا (WSD) کلمات کے مطابق ایک چال ہے۔ اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے، غیر قابل تحقیق کے مطابق پیشنهاد کی گئی ہے کہ اپنے ساتھ سمجھانے کے مطابق تحقیق کی WSD سیسٹموں کے لئے سمجھانے کا اظہار پیدا کریں۔ ہم نے تین نوی طریقے پیش کیے ہیں جن کے لئے احساس نازل کیا گیا ہے کہ ان کی ترجمہ، parallel bitexts, lexical resources، اور contextual and synset embeddings کی تخلیق کرتی ہیں. ہماری نصف نظارت کی طریقہ ماشین کی ترجمہ کو دوسری زبانوں میں ترجمہ کرنے کے لئے لازم کرتا ہے. ہمارے دو غیر محفوظ طریقے ایک سمجھ کا اظہار کرتا ہے جو علم پر بنیاد ہوا WSD سیسٹم کے ذریعہ ایک parallel corpus میں لکسیکل ترجمہ کرتی ہے۔ ہم نے استاندارد WSD بنچمٹ پر موجود آور نتیجے حاصل کئے ہیں.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik tilda taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni olish davom etadi va so'zlarning qiymatini o'zgartirish (WSD) davomida qismi bo'ladi. @ info: whatsthis Biz uchta yangi qo'shilga aniqlangan kompaniya yaratish orqali hozir qilamiz. Bu ta'lim tarjimalar, parallel bittiklar, leksikal Resource va oddiy narsalar va bir xil va bir xil tarjima qilish. Bizning semiz nazorat qilingan usuli boshqa tillarni o'zgartirish uchun mashina tarjima qiladi. Bizning ikkinchi saqlanmagan usullarning o'zgarishlarimiz o'zgarishni o'zgartirish mumkin, lekksikal tarjima qilish orqali o'zgartiradi. Biz Andoza WSD parametrlarida holatning holati natijalarini qabul qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Việc lấy dữ liệu đào tạo đa dạng tiếp tục là một thách thức trong vấn đề biến dạng từ ngữ (WSD). Để giải quyết vấn đề này, các phương pháp không giám sát đã được đề xuất để tự động tạo chú thích cảm xúc cho hệ thống WSD được giám sát. Chúng tôi giới thiệu ba phương pháp mới để tạo ra nhóm có ghi chú có giác quan, đó là thuật biến dịch, các thuật ngữ song, tài nguyên từ, và sự nhúng tay ngữ và nối tiếp. Phương pháp bán giám sát của chúng tôi dùng dịch thuật máy để chuyển chú thích cảm giác hiện thời sang các ngôn ngữ khác. Hai phương pháp không giám sát của chúng ta cải thiện biên bản cảm giác sản xuất bởi một hệ thống WSD dựa trên kiến thức thông qua dịch từ dược trong một tập thể song. Chúng tôi đạt được kết quả tối tân trên những tiêu chuẩn.', 'nl': "Het verwerven van meertalige trainingsgegevens blijft een uitdaging in woordzin disambiguation (WSD). Om dit probleem aan te pakken, zijn onbeheerde benaderingen voorgesteld om automatisch zintuiglijke annotaties te genereren voor training begeleide WSD-systemen. We presenteren drie nieuwe methoden voor het creëren van sense-annotated corpora's die gebruik maken van vertalingen, parallelle bitexts, lexicale bronnen, evenals contextuele en synsetinbeddingen. Onze semi-supervised methode past machinevertaling toe om bestaande zintuigaantekeningen over te dragen naar andere talen. Onze twee onbeheerde methoden verfijnen zintuigannotaties geproduceerd door een kennisgebaseerd WSD-systeem via lexicale vertalingen in een parallel corpus. We verkrijgen state-of-the-art resultaten op standaard WSD benchmarks.", 'de': 'Die Erfassung mehrsprachiger Trainingsdaten stellt nach wie vor eine Herausforderung in der Wortsinn-Disambiguation (WSD) dar. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, wurden unbeaufsichtigte Ansätze vorgeschlagen, um automatisch Sinnesannotationen für trainingsüberwachte WSD-Systeme zu generieren. Wir stellen drei neue Methoden vor, um sense-annotierte Korpora zu erstellen, die Übersetzungen, parallele Bitexte, lexikalische Ressourcen sowie kontextbezogene und synset Einbettungen nutzen. Unsere semi-überwachte Methode wendet maschinelle Übersetzung an, um vorhandene Sinnesannotationen in andere Sprachen zu übertragen. Unsere beiden unbeaufsichtigten Methoden verfeinern Sinnesannotationen eines wissensbasierten WSD-Systems mittels lexikalischer Übersetzungen in einem parallelen Korpus. Wir erhalten aktuelle Ergebnisse auf Basis von Standard-WSD-Benchmarks.', 'bg': 'Придобиването на многоезични данни за обучение продължава да бъде предизвикателство в обяснението на смисъла на думата. За решаване на този проблем са предложени ненадзорни подходи за автоматично генериране на сетивни анотации за обучение на надзорни системи за WSD. Представяме три нови метода за създаване на сензорно анотирани корпуси, които използват преводи, паралелни биттекстове, лексикални ресурси, както и контекстуални и синсетови вграждания. Нашият полунадзорен метод прилага машинен превод за прехвърляне на съществуващи сензорни анотации на други езици. Нашите два ненадзорни метода усъвършенстват сетивните анотации, произведени от базирана на знанието система чрез лексикални преводи в паралелен корпус. Получаваме най-съвременни резултати по стандартните референтни показатели.', 'da': 'Indsamling af flersprogede uddannelsesdata er fortsat en udfordring i ordforståelse (WSD). For at løse dette problem er der blevet foreslået uovervendte tilgange til automatisk at generere sanseanmærkninger til træning af overvågede WSD-systemer. Vi præsenterer tre nye metoder til at skabe sanseanmærkede korpora, der udnytter oversættelser, parallelle bitekster, leksikalske ressourcer samt kontekstuelle og synset indlejringer. Vores halvovervågede metode anvender maskinoversættelse til at overføre eksisterende sanseanmærkninger til andre sprog. Vores to uautoriserede metoder forfiner sanseanmærkninger produceret af et videnbaseret WSD-system via leksikalske oversættelser i et parallelt korpus. Vi opnår topmoderne resultater på standard WSD benchmarks.', 'ko': '의미 변조(WSD)에서 다국어 트레이닝 데이터 획득은 여전히 도전이다.이를 해결하기 위해 감시 있는 WSD 시스템을 훈련하는 데 사용되는 감지 주석을 자동으로 생성하는 무감독 방법이 제시됐다.우리는 번역, 병행위 텍스트, 어휘 자원과 상하문과 문법집을 이용하여 의미를 표시하는 자료 라이브러리를 만드는 세 가지 새로운 방법을 제시했다.우리의 반감독 방법은 기계번역을 응용하여 기존의 의미 주석을 다른 언어로 옮긴다.우리의 두 가지 무감독 방법은 평행 어료 라이브러리의 어휘 번역을 통해 지식 기반의 WSD 시스템에서 생성된 의미 주석을 최적화시켰다.우리는 표준수무서 기준에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Kupata taarifa za mafunzo ya lugha mbalimbali bado zinaendelea kuwa changamoto katika hali ya kutokuwepo kwa maneno (WSD). To address this problem, unsupervised approaches have been proposed to automatically generate sense annotations for training supervised WSD systems.  Tunaweza kuweka mbinu tatu mpya za kutengeneza kampuni yenye maana yenye kuchanganyikiwa ambazo zinatafsiri, vifaa vinavyofanana, vyanzo vya lexico, pamoja na vifaa vya kimataifa na vilivyotengenezwa. Utawala wetu uliothibitiwa kwa sekondari unatumia tafsiri ya mashine ili kuhamisha matangazo yanayopo kwenye lugha nyingine. mbinu zetu mbili zisizo na uhakika zinaonyesha udhalilisho wa maana uliotengenezwa na mfumo wa WSD wenye maarifa kwa kupitia tafsiri za lexico katika vifaa vinavyofanana. Tunapata matokeo ya hali ya sanaa kwenye bendera za viwanja vya WSD.', 'id': 'Acquisition of multilingual training data continues to be a challenge in word sense disambiguation (WSD).  Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, pendekatan yang tidak diawasi telah diusulkan untuk secara otomatis menghasilkan anotasi masuk akal untuk latihan sistem WSD yang diawasi. Kami mempersembahkan tiga metode baru untuk menciptakan corpora yang mengantuk terjemahan, bit teks paralel, sumber daya leksik, serta bentuk kontekstual dan sinset. Metode semi-supervised kami menerapkan terjemahan mesin untuk memindahkan annotasi sensor yang ada ke bahasa lain. Dua metode kami tidak diawasi memperbaiki anotasi sensor yang diproduksi oleh sistem WSD berdasarkan pengetahuan melalui terjemahan leksik dalam korpus paralel. Kami mendapatkan hasil terbaik pada benchmarks standar WSD.', 'fa': 'دریافت داده های آموزش های زیادی زبان همچنان یک چالش در ذهن زبان است. برای حل این مشکل، پیشنهاد داده شده است که دسترسی غیرقابل تحقیق برای تولید توضیح حس برای تمرین سیستم\u200cهای WSD تحقیق شده باشد. ما سه روش جدید برای ایجاد شرکت با احساس آگاهی را پیشنهاد می کنیم که ترجمه\u200cها، بیکست\u200cهای parallel، منابع\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی، همچنین وسیله\u200cهای موقعیتی و تغییر تنظیم می\u200cکنند. روش نیمه تحت نظر ما ترجمه ماشین را برای انتقال نوشته\u200cهای حسی موجود به زبانهای دیگر تغییر می\u200cدهد. دو روش غیرقابل تحویل ما توسط یک سیستم WSD بر اساس علم توسط ترجمه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی در یک کورپوس متفاوت تولید می\u200cکنند. ما نتیجه\u200cهای موقعیت هنری را در مقابل استاندارد WSD دریافت می\u200cکنیم.', 'af': "Ontvaring van multitaalske onderwerking data gaan voortgaan om 'n uitdrukking in woord sin onderwerp te wees (WSD). Om hierdie probleem te adres, is ononderwerpende toegange voorgestel om outomaties sin notasies te genereer vir onderwerp onderwerp onderwerp van WSD stelsels. Ons stel drie nuwe metodes voor die skep van sens-annotateerde korpora wat vertalings, parallele bitexte, leksiele hulpbronne, en kontekstuele en sinkroniseerde inbêdings verwyder. Ons semi-superviseerde metode applies masjien vertaling om bestaande sin notasies na ander tale te oordra. Ons twee ongeondersteunde metodes herstel sin notasies wat deur 'n kennis-gebaseerde WSD stelsel uitgevoer word deur leksiese vertalings in 'n parallele korpus. Ons kry status-of-the-art resultate op standaard WSD benchmarke.", 'hr': 'Prihvaćanje multijezičkih podataka o obuci nastavlja biti izazov u razumnom smislu disambiguacije (WSD). Za rješavanje ovog problema, predloženi su neodređeni pristupi kako bi automatski stvorili oznake smisla za obuku nadziranih sustava WSD-a. Predstavljamo tri nove metode za stvaranje osjetljivih annotiranih tijela koje utječu na prevode, paralelne bitexte, leksičke resurse, kao i kontekstalne i sinkronizacije. Naša polu nadzorna metoda primjenjuje prevod strojeva na prenošenje postojećih oznake osjećaja na drugi jezici. Naše dvije nepotrebne metode refiniraju annotacije osjećaja proizvođene sustavom WSD-a na znanju putem leksičkih prevoda u paralelnom korpusu. Dobili smo rezultate umjetnosti na standardnim kriterijama WSD-a.', 'tr': 'Çoklu dilli eğitim verilerini elde etmek (WSD) kelimelerini bozmakla kynçylyk edip duruyor. Bu meseläni çözmek üçin, taýýarlanmadyk approglar WSD sistemalary üçin awtomatik duýgym duýdury döretmäge teklip edildi. Duýgy närazy hasaplanýan corpora bejermek üçin üç täze yöntemi görkezýäris. Biziň ýarym gözlemäzli yöntemimiz maşynyň terjimesini meňzeş duýgym täzeliklerini başga dillere geçirmek üçin ulanýar. Bizim iki sistemimiz paralel korpusda bilim sistemi tarafından oluşan hasaplamalary düzenlemedi. Biz standart WSD etiketlerinde resim netijesi aldyk.', 'am': 'በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ማጠቃለያ (WSD) ዳታዎችን ለማግኘት የንግግር ማሰናከል መግለጫ ነው፡፡ የዚህን ጉዳይ ለመቀበል፣ የማይጠበቀው ደረጃዎች የWSD ሲስተማርን ለመፍጠር ራሳቸውን ማስታወቂያ ማስታወቂያ ለመፍጠር ተዘጋጅተዋል፡፡ እና ሦስት አዲስ ደረጃዎችን አቀረብን፡፡ የተጠበቀው ሥርዓታችን የመኪን ትርጉም ለሌሎች ቋንቋዎች ለመለወጥ ይጠቅማል፡፡ Our two unsupervised methods refine sense annotations produced by a knowledge-based WSD system via lexical translations in a parallel corpus.  የ-የ-አርእስት ውጤቶች የ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ', 'sq': 'Merrja e të dhënave të treinimit shumëgjuhës vazhdon të jetë një sfidë në kuptimin e fjalës çambiguacion (WSD). Për të trajtuar këtë problem, janë propozuar qasje të pazgjidhura për të gjeneruar automatikisht anotacione kuptimi për trajnimin e sistemeve të mbikqyrur të WSD. Ne paraqesim tre metoda të reja për krijimin e korprave të anotuara me kuptim që nxisin përkthime, bitext paralele, burime lexike si dhe përfshirje kontekstuale dhe sinset. Metoda jonë gjysmë e mbikqyrur aplikon përkthimin e makinës për të transferuar anotacionet ekzistuese të sensit në gjuhë të tjera. Dy metodat tona të pazgjidhura rafinojnë anotacionet e kuptimit të prodhuara nga një sistem WSD bazuar në njohuri nëpërmjet përkthimeve lexike në një korpus paralel. Ne arrijmë rezultate më të larta në pikat standarde të WSD.', 'az': 'Çoxlu dil təhsil verilənlərin alınması sözlərin təhsil edilməsi (WSD) deyil. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün, gözləyirlən WSD sistemlərinin təhsil edilməsi üçün özünüzə məlumatlar yaratmaq üçün təklif edilmişdir. Biz özünü məlumatlar yaratmaq üçün üç yeni yol göstəririk ki, təkrarlar, paralel bitextlər, leksik kaynaqlar, həmçinin contextual və synset inşalları yaradır. Yarı-gözləmə metodumuz maşın çevirimi başqa dillərə daşımaq üçün istifadə edir. Bizim iki müəyyən edilməmiş metodlarımız bilgi sistemində olan WSD sistemindən olub, paralel korpusda leksik tercümələr vasitəsilə dəyişdirir. Biz standart WSD benchmarklərində sanat sonuçlarını alırıq.', 'hy': 'Բազլեզու ուսուցման տվյալների ձեռք բերումը շարունակում է մարտահրավեր լինել բառի իմաստով բացատրելու համար: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար անվերահսկված մոտեցումներ են առաջարկվել, որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծեն զգացմունքային նոտացիաներ աշխարհի զարգացման վերահսկվող համակարգերի ուսումնասիրության համար: We present three new methods for creating sense-annotated corpora which leverage translations, parallel bitexts, lexical resources, as well as contextual and synset embeddings.  Մեր կիսակառավարվող մեթոդը կիրառվում է մեքենային թարգմանման համար, որպեսզի տեղափոխվի գոյություն ունեցող զգայական նոտացիաները այլ լեզուների: Մեր երկու անվերահսկված մեթոդները բարելավում են զգայական նոտացիաները, որոնք արտադրվում են գիտելիքով հիմնված համակարգի միջոցով լեքսիկական թարգմանությունների միջոցով զուգահեռ կորպուսում: Մենք ստանում ենք ամենակարևոր արդյունքներ ԱԱՎ-ի ստանդարտ հարաբերականների վրա:', 'bs': 'Prihvaćanje podataka o multijezičkoj obuci nastavlja biti izazov u smislu razuma disambiguacije (WSD). Za rješavanje ovog problema, predloženi su neodređeni pristupi kako bi automatski stvorili oznake smisla za obuku nadziranih sustava WSD-a. Predstavljamo tri nove metode za stvaranje osjetljivih annotiranih korpora koji utiču na prevode, paralelne bitexte, leksičke resurse, kao i kontekstualne i sinkronizacije. Naša polu-nadzorna metoda primjenjuje prevod mašine na prenošenje postojećih oznake smisla na drugi jezici. Naše dvije nepotrebne metode refiniraju annotacije osjećaja proizvođene sustavom WSD-a na znanju putem leksičkih prevoda u paralelnom korpusu. Dobili smo rezultate umjetnosti na standardnim kriterijima WSD-a.', 'bn': 'বহুভাষায় প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য পাওয়া যাচ্ছে শব্দের মানসিক বিভ্রান্তিতে চ্যালেঞ্জ। এই সমস্যাটি ঠিকানা করার জন্য, স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে উইএসডি সিস্টেমের প্রশিক্ষণ পর্যবেক্ষণ করার জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মানসিক ব আমরা তিনটি নতুন পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করেছি যেখানে অনুবাদ, প্যারালেল বিটেক্স, লেক্সিক্সিয়াল সম্পদ তৈরি করা হয়েছে এবং সাথে যুক্তি এবং সিনিসেটিং  আমাদের সেমি পর্যবেক্ষণের পদ্ধতি অন্যান্য ভাষায় বিদ্যমান মেশিন অনুবাদ প্রয়োগ করে। আমাদের দুই অরক্ষিত পদ্ধতি প্রতিষ্ঠানের মাধ্যমে লেক্সিক্যাল অনুবাদের মাধ্যমে জ্ঞান ভিত্তিক উইএসডি সিস্টেমের মাধ্যমে  স্ট্যান্ডার্ড ড ডিউএসডি বেনমার্কের উপর রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের ফলাফল পেয়েছি।', 'fi': 'Monikielisten koulutustietojen hankkiminen on edelleen haaste sanamerkityksen erottelussa (WSD). Ongelman ratkaisemiseksi on ehdotettu valvomattomia lähestymistapoja, joilla luodaan automaattisesti aistimerkintöjä koulutettavien ohjattujen WSD-järjestelmien käyttöön. Esittelemme kolme uutta tapaa luoda merkityitä korpusia, jotka hyödyntävät käännöksiä, rinnakkaisbittekstejä, sanastoresursseja sekä konteksti- ja synset-upotuksia. Puoli valvotussa menetelmässämme käytetään konekäännöstä olemassa olevien aistimerkintöjen siirtämiseen muille kielille. Kaksi valvomatonta menetelmää tarkentavat tietoon perustuvan WSD-järjestelmän tuottamia aistimerkintöjä sanastokäännösten avulla rinnakkaiskorpusessa. Saamme huippuluokan tuloksia standardistandardeista WSD-vertailuarvoista.', 'ca': "L'adquisició de dades multilingües de formació segueix sent un repte en termes de desambiguació. Per abordar aquest problema, s'han proposat enfocaments no supervisats per generar automàticament anotacions de sentit per a formar sistemes supervisats de DEM. We present three new methods for creating sense-annotated corpora which leverage translations, parallel bitexts, lexical resources, as well as contextual and synset embeddings.  El nostre mètode semisupervisat aplica la traducció màquina per transferir anotacions de sentit existents a altres llengües. Els nostres dos mètodes no supervisats refinen les anotacions sensorials produïdes per un sistema de DEM basat en el coneixement a través de traduccions lècsiques en un cos parallel. Obtenim resultats més avançats en els punts de referència estándar de l'SDM.", 'cs': 'Získávání vícejazyčných údajů o tréninku je i nadále výzvou ve slovním smyslu disambiguation (WSD). Pro řešení tohoto problému byly navrženy bez dohledu přístupy k automatickému generování smyslových anotací pro výcvikové systémy pod dohledem. Představujeme tři nové metody pro vytváření smyslově anotovaných korpusů, které využívají překlady, paralelní bitexty, lexikální zdroje a kontextové a syntetické vložení. Naše semi-supervisovaná metoda aplikuje strojový překlad k přenosu existujících smyslových anotací do jiných jazyků. Naše dvě metody bez dozoru zdokonalují smyslové anotace vytvořené znalostním WSD systémem pomocí lexikálních překladů v paralelním korpusu. Získáváme nejmodernější výsledky na standardních WSD benchmarkech.', 'et': 'Mitmekeelsete koolitusandmete omandamine on jätkuvalt väljakutseks sõnatähenduses. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks on tehtud ettepanek järelevalveta lähenemisviiside automaatseks loomiseks koolituse järelevalvega WSD süsteemidele. Esitleme kolme uut meetodit tähenduslike annoteeritud korpuste loomiseks, mis võimendavad tõlkeid, paralleelseid bitekste, leksikaalseid ressursse, samuti konteksti- ja sünkrooniliseid manustamisi. Meie pooljuhitav meetod rakendab masintõlke olemasolevate tähenduste edastamiseks teistesse keeltesse. Meie kaks järelevalveta meetodit täpsustavad teadmistepõhise WSD süsteemi poolt tekkinud tähenduslikke annotatsioone leksikaalsete tõlkete kaudu paralleelses korpuses. Saame tipptasemel tulemusi standardsete WSD võrdlusnäitajate kohta.', 'ha': "Akitaccen data na amfani da multilki na ƙara yana daidai ta zama wata mai zartar da maganar rabo (WSD). To, don ka nẽmi shiryarwa ga wannan muammãni, an buƙata hanyoyin wanda ba a tsare shi ba, dõmin ya ƙãga zane-zane masu inganci farat ɗaya wa wa tsarin na'urar WSD da aka tsare. Tuna halatar da hanyõyi uku wa za'a halitta firma mai sanyi da taƙaita, wanda za'a fassarar fassarori, fassarori masu parallel, masu kifi, da kuma masu haɗe da takardar da za'a sami. @ info: tooltip @ info: tooltip We obtain state-of-the-art results on standard WSD benchmarks.", 'sk': 'Pridobivanje večjezičnih podatkov o usposabljanju je še naprej izziv pri razjasnitvi besednega pomena (WSD). Za reševanje tega problema so bili predlagani nenadzorovani pristopi za samodejno ustvarjanje čutnih opomb za sisteme WSD nadzorovanega usposabljanja. Predstavljamo tri nove metode ustvarjanja korpusov s smiselnimi oznakami, ki izkoriščajo prevode, vzporedne bitne besedila, leksikalne vire ter kontekstualne in sinzbirne vdelave. Naša polnadzorovana metoda uporablja strojno prevajanje za prenos obstoječih opomb v druge jezike. Naši nenadzorovani metodi izboljšujeta čutne opombe, ki jih izdeluje sistem WSD na znanju, prek leksikalnih prevodov v vzporednem korpusu. Pridobimo najsodobnejše rezultate na standardnih merilih WSD.', 'jv': 'Ngawe jenis data sing nggunakake luwih-luwih dumadhi sakjane ngupakan seneng nggawe ngupakan pawaran (WSD). Mbok etongke perkoro sing bote iki, akeh apik sing wis dipoleh nggawe ngubah perusahaan seneng tau oleh nggawe sistem WSD seneng nggawe ngubah Anyone method Awakdhéwé kabèh sistem sing ora nggawe perusahaan seneng nggawe Jejaring winih sing bisa nguasai winih-aké WSD seng petani soko akeh perusahaan karo perusahaan bangsane section', 'he': 'ההרכשה של נתוני אימונים רבות שפותיים ממשיכים להיות אתגר במובן המילים כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הזאת, הצעו גישות ללא השגחה כדי ליצור אוטומטית ציונים הגיוניים לאימונים מערכות WSD ששולטות בהם. We present three new methods for creating sense-annotated corpora which leverage translations, parallel bitexts, lexical resources, as well as contextual and synset embeddings.  השיטה החצי-מפקחת שלנו משתמשת בתרגום מכונת כדי להעביר הערות תחושה קיימת לשפות אחרות. Our two unsupervised methods refine sense annotations produced by a knowledge-based WSD system via lexical translations in a parallel corpus.  אנחנו מקבלים תוצאות מוקדמות על נקודות רמז סטנדרטיות WSD.', 'bo': 'རྒྱལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དབྱིབས་གཏོང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དུ་འཕྲོ་མཐུད་ནི་ཡང་གནད་དོན་ཅིག་ཡོད། དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་བསླབ་ན་ཕན་མེད་པའི་གཙོ་ཚིག་གི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ལྟ་རྟོག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་འཛུགས་ཐབས་ལམ་གསུམ་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ལྟ་བུ་ཡིན་ཚུལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལྟ་རྒྱུས་ལམ་ལུགས ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་གནད་སྡུད་དབུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་མེད་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྐོར་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་བསྡ ང་ཚོས་WSD ཚད་རྟགས་བཀོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བཀོད་སྣང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Application of Deep Learning Methods to SNOMED CT Encoding of Clinical Texts : From Data Collection to Extreme Multi-Label Text-Based Classification', 'ar': 'تطبيق طرق التعلم العميق على ترميز SNOMED CT للنصوص السريرية: من جمع البيانات إلى تصنيف نصي متعدد التسميات شديد', 'pt': 'Aplicação de Métodos de Aprendizagem Profunda à Codificação SNOMED CT de Textos Clínicos: Da Coleta de Dados à Classificação Baseada em Texto Multi-Rótulo Extremo', 'es': 'Aplicación de métodos de aprendizaje profundo a la codificación SNOMED CT de textos clínicos: de la recopilación de datos a la clasificación extrema basada en texto de múltiples etiquetas', 'fr': "Application de méthodes d'apprentissage approfondi au codage SNOMED CT de textes cliniques\xa0: de la collecte de données à la classification textuelle multi-étiquettes extrême", 'ja': '臨床テキストのSNOMED CTエンコードへの深層学習方法の適用：データ収集から極端なマルチラベルテキストベースの分類へ', 'hi': 'नैदानिक ग्रंथों के SNOMED सीटी एन्कोडिंग के लिए डीप लर्निंग विधियों का अनुप्रयोग: डेटा संग्रह से चरम बहु-लेबल पाठ-आधारित वर्गीकरण तक', 'zh': '深度学术在临床文本SNOMED CT编码中应用:从数收极多标签本分类', 'ru': 'Применение методов глубокого обучения к кодированию клинических текстов с помощью SNOMED CT: от сбора данных до экстремальной многоуровневой текстовой классификации', 'ga': 'Modhanna Deepfhoghlama a Chur i bhFeidhm maidir le hIonchódú Téacsanna Cliniciúla SNOMED CT: Ó Bhailiú Sonraí go hAicmiú Téacs-bhunaithe Fíor-Illipéid', 'ka': 'კლინიკური ტექსტის ძალიან სწავლების მეტისების პროგრამა: მონაცემების კოლექციაზე მრავალ etiket ტექსტის დაბაზული კლასიფიკაცია', 'hu': 'Mélytanulási módszerek alkalmazása SNOMED CT Klinikai szövegek kódolása: az adatgyűjtéstől az extrém többcímkés szövegalapú osztályozásig', 'it': 'Applicazione dei metodi di Deep Learning alla codifica TC SNOMED dei testi clinici: dalla raccolta dei dati alla classificazione testuale multi-etichetta estrema', 'kk': 'SNOMED CT клиникалық мәтіндердің түйінгі оқыту әдістерінің қолданбасы: Деректер жинағынан көп жарлық мәтіндердің негізіндегі классификациясы', 'lt': 'Išsamaus mokymosi metodų taikymas SNOMED CT klinikinių tekstų kodavimui: nuo duomenų rinkimo iki ekstremalios daugiametės etiketės tekstu grindžiamos klasifikacijos', 'mk': 'Апликација на методите на длабоко учење на SNOMED CT кодирање на клинички тексти: Од собирање на податоци до екстремна класификација базирана на текст со многу ознаки', 'ms': 'Aplikasi Kaedah Belajar Dalam ke Pengekodan CT SNOMED Teks Klinik: Dari Kumpulan Data ke Klasifikasi Berdasarkan Teks Label-Berekstrim', 'mn': 'СNOMED CT клиникийн текстүүдийн гүнзгий суралцах арга загварын хэрэглээ: Өгөгдлийн цуглуулалтын холбоотоос олон найзуудын текст суурилсан классификация', 'ml': 'ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളുടെ കോഡിങ്ങിലേക്ക് ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന രീതികളുടെ പ്രയോഗത്തിനു്: ഡേറ്റാ സംഘത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d പല-', 'el': 'Εφαρμογή μεθόδων βαθιάς μάθησης στην κωδικοποίηση κλινικών κειμένων: Από τη συλλογή δεδομένων έως την ακραία ταξινόμηση πολλαπλών ετικετών', 'mt': 'Applikazzjoni ta’ Metodi ta’ Tagħlim fil-fond għall-Kodifikazzjoni tat-Teksti Kliniċi tat-CT SNOMED: Mill-Ġbir tad-Dejta sal-Klassifikazzjoni Bażata fuq it-Test b’Tikketti Multi Estimi', 'no': 'Programet for dyppa læringsmetodar til SNOMED CT-koding av kliniske tekstar: Fra datasamlinga til ekstremt multietikettbasert klassifikasjon', 'pl': 'Zastosowanie metod głębokiego uczenia do kodowania tekstów klinicznych SNOMED CT: od gromadzenia danych do ekstremalnej klasyfikacji opartej na tekstach wieloznakowych', 'ro': 'Aplicarea metodelor de învățare profundă la codificarea CT SNOMED a textelor clinice: de la colectarea datelor la clasificarea extremă bazată pe text multi-etichete', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Aplikacija metoda dubokog učenja na SNOMED CT kodiranje kliničkih tekstova: Od kolekcije podataka do ekstremne klasifikacije teksta na osnovu multietiketa', 'so': 'Ka codsashada qalabka waxbarashada deegaan ee SNOMED CT Encoding of Clinical Texts: From Data Collection to Extreme Label-Based Text-Based Classification', 'sv': 'Tillämpning av djupinlärningsmetoder på SNOMED CT Kodning av kliniska texter: Från datainsamling till extrem fleretikett textbaserad klassificering', 'ta': 'ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் முறைமைகளை SNOMED CT குறிமுறையாக்கும் பயன்பாடு: தகவல் தொகுப்பிலிருந்து அதிகமாக பல- விளக்கச்சீட்டு உரை வகைப்பாடு', 'ur': 'SNOMED CT Encoding of Clinical Texts for Deep Learning Methods of Application of Deep Learning: From Data Collection to Extreme Multi-Label Text Based Classification', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sử dụng các phương pháp học sâu để chặn chặn chặn chặn CT của các văn bản lâm sàng: từ bộ sưu tập dữ liệu cho đến đơn vị độc biểu', 'bg': 'Приложение на методите за дълбоко обучение при кодиране на клинични текстове: от събиране на данни до екстремна многоетикетна текстова класификация', 'nl': 'Toepassing van Deep Learning methodes op SNOMED CT codering van klinische teksten: van gegevensverzameling tot extreme multi-label tekst-based classificatie', 'hr': 'Primjena metoda dubokog učenja na SNOMED CT kodiranje kliničkih tekstova: Od skupljanja podataka do ekstremne klasifikacije teksta temeljene na višeoznačenom tekstu', 'da': 'Anvendelse af Deep Learning Metoder til SNOMED CT Kodning af kliniske tekster: Fra dataindsamling til ekstrem multi-label tekstbaseret klassificering', 'de': 'Anwendung von Deep Learning Methoden zur SNOMED CT Kodierung klinischer Texte: Von der Datenerhebung bis zur extremen Multi-Label Text-Based Klassifizierung', 'fa': 'کاربرد روش یادگیری عمیق برای رمزبندی CT از متن کلینیکی SNOMED: از جمع داده\u200cها تا کلاس\u200cسازی متن بسیار زیادی بر پایه\u200cهای متن\u200cبرچسب\u200cهای زیادی', 'id': 'Aplikasi Metode Belajar Dalam ke Kodifikasi CT SNOMED Teks Klinik: Dari Koleksi Data Ke Klasifikasi Berdasarkan Teks Multi-Label Ekstrem', 'ko': '심도 있는 학습 방법이 임상 텍스트 SNOMED CT 인코딩에서의 응용: 데이터 수집에서 극단적인 다중 태그 텍스트 기반의 분류까지', 'tr': 'SNOMED CT Klinik Metinler Ködleme: Data Collection to Extreme Multi-Label Text-Based Classification', 'sw': 'Utumiaji wa njia za kujifunza kina kwenda SNOMED CT Encoding of Clinical Text: From Data Collection to Extreme Label-Based Classification', 'af': 'Aansoek van Deep Leer Metode na SNOMED CT Enkodering van Kliniske Tekste: Van Data Versameling na Ekstra Multi- Label Teks Baseerde Klassifikasie', 'sq': 'Aplikacioni i Metodave të Mësimit të thellë në kodimin SNOMED CT të Teksteve Klinike: Nga mbledhja e të dhënave në klasifikimin ekstrem të bazuar në tekst me shumë etiketa', 'am': 'text-Based Classification', 'az': 'SNOMED CT Kodlaması Kliniki Metinlərin Deep Learning Methods Application of deep Learning Methods: From Data Collection to Extreme Multi-Label Text Based Classification', 'hy': 'Սնոմեդ տեքստի կլինիկական տեքստների CT-ի կոդավորման համար: Դետակի հավաքածուց մինչև շատ պիտակներ հիմնված տեքստի դասակարգում', 'bn': 'ক্লিনিক্যাল টেক্সটের এনকোডিং এর গভীর শিক্ষা মাধ্যমের অ্যাপলিকেশন: ডাটা সংগ্রহ থেকে বেশী বহুল লেবেলের টেক্সট- ভিত্তিক ক্লাসিকেশন', 'bs': 'Aplikacija metoda dubokog učenja na SNOMED CT kodiranje kliničkih tekstova: Od kolekcije podataka do ekstremne klasifikacije na tekstu baziranoj na višeetičkim etiketama', 'ca': "Aplicació dels mètodes d'aprenentatge profund a la codificació CT SNOMED dels textos clínics: des de la col·lecció de dades fins a la classificació extrema basada en textos multietiquetats", 'cs': 'Aplikace metod hlubokého učení na SNOMED CT kódování klinických textů: od sběru dat po extrémní multi-label textovou klasifikaci', 'et': 'Sügavõppemeetodite rakendamine kliiniliste tekstide SNOMED CT kodeerimisel: andmete kogumisest ekstreemse mitmemärgiselise tekstipõhise klassifikatsioonini', 'fi': 'Syväoppimisen menetelmien soveltaminen kliinisten tekstien SNOMED CT-koodaukseen: tiedonkeruusta äärimmäiseen monikäyttöiseen tekstipohjaiseen luokitukseen', 'he': 'שימוש של שיטות למידה עמוקה לקוד CT SNOMED של טקסטים קליניים: מאספת נתונים לאספת נתונים', 'sk': 'Uporaba metod globokega učenja za SNOMED CT kodiranje kliničnih besedil: od zbiranja podatkov do ekstremne večoznakne besedilne klasifikacije', 'ha': '@ label', 'bo': 'Application of Deep Learning Methods to SNOMED CT Encoding of Clinical Texts: From Data Collection to Extreme Multi-Label Text-Based Classification', 'jv': 'Application of deep Learning Methods to sNOMED C'}
{'en': 'Concept normalization of clinical texts to standard medical classifications and ontologies is a task with high importance for healthcare and medical research. We attempt to solve this problem through automatic SNOMED CT encoding, where SNOMED CT is one of the most widely used and comprehensive clinical term ontologies. Applying basic Deep Learning models, however, leads to undesirable results due to the unbalanced nature of the data and the extreme number of classes. We propose a classification procedure that features a multiple-step workflow consisting of label clustering, multi-cluster classification, and clusters-to-labels mapping. For multi-cluster classification, BioBERT is fine-tuned over our custom dataset. The clusters-to-labels mapping is carried out by a one-vs-all classifier (SVC) applied to every single cluster. We also present the steps for automatic dataset generation of textual descriptions annotated with SNOMED CT codes based on public data and linked open data. In order to cope with the problem that our dataset is highly unbalanced, some data augmentation methods are applied. The results from the conducted experiments show high accuracy and reliability of our approach for prediction of SNOMED CT codes relevant to a clinical text.', 'ar': 'يعتبر تطبيع مفهوم النصوص السريرية مع التصنيفات والأنطولوجيا الطبية القياسية مهمة ذات أهمية عالية للرعاية الصحية والبحث الطبي. نحاول حل هذه المشكلة من خلال التشفير التلقائي SNOMED CT ، حيث يعد SNOMED CT أحد أكثر المصطلحات السريرية استخدامًا وشمولية. ومع ذلك ، فإن تطبيق نماذج التعلم العميق الأساسية يؤدي إلى نتائج غير مرغوب فيها بسبب الطبيعة غير المتوازنة للبيانات والعدد الكبير من الفئات. نقترح إجراء تصنيف يتميز بسير عمل متعدد الخطوات يتكون من تجميع الملصقات ، والتصنيف متعدد المجموعات ، وتخطيط المجموعات إلى التسميات. بالنسبة للتصنيف متعدد المجموعات ، تم ضبط BioBERT على مجموعة البيانات المخصصة لدينا. يتم تنفيذ تعيين المجموعات إلى التسميات بواسطة مصنف واحد مقابل الكل (SVC) يتم تطبيقه على كل مجموعة على حدة. نقدم أيضًا خطوات إنشاء مجموعات البيانات تلقائيًا للأوصاف النصية المشروحة برموز SNOMED CT استنادًا إلى البيانات العامة والبيانات المفتوحة المرتبطة. من أجل التعامل مع المشكلة المتمثلة في أن مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنا غير متوازنة إلى حد كبير ، يتم تطبيق بعض طرق زيادة البيانات. تظهر نتائج التجارب التي تم إجراؤها دقة وموثوقية عالية لنهجنا للتنبؤ برموز SNOMED CT ذات الصلة بالنص السريري.', 'es': 'La normalización conceptual de los textos clínicos a las clasificaciones y ontologías médicas estándar es una tarea de gran importancia para la investigación médica y sanitaria. Intentamos resolver este problema mediante la codificación automática de SNOMED CT, donde SNOMED CT es una de las ontologías de términos clínicos más ampliamente utilizadas y completas. Sin embargo, la aplicación de modelos básicos de aprendizaje profundo conduce a resultados no deseados debido a la naturaleza desequilibrada de los datos y al número extremo de clases. Proponemos un procedimiento de clasificación que incluye un flujo de trabajo de varios pasos que consiste en agrupamiento de etiquetas, clasificación de múltiples clústeres y mapeo de clústeres a etiquetas. Para la clasificación de múltiples clústeres, BioBert se ajusta a nuestro conjunto de datos personalizado. La asignación de clústeres a etiquetas se lleva a cabo mediante un clasificador de uno contra todos (SVC) que se aplica a cada clúster. También presentamos los pasos para la generación automática de conjuntos de datos de descripciones textuales anotadas con códigos CT de SNOMED basados en datos públicos y datos abiertos vinculados. Para hacer frente al problema de que nuestro conjunto de datos está muy desequilibrado, se aplican algunos métodos de aumento de datos. Los resultados de los experimentos realizados muestran una alta precisión y confiabilidad de nuestro enfoque para la predicción de códigos de TC de SNOMED relevantes para un texto clínico.', 'fr': "La normalisation conceptuelle des textes cliniques aux classifications et ontologies médicales standard est une tâche d'une grande importance pour les soins de santé et la recherche médicale. Nous tentons de résoudre ce problème grâce au codage automatique SNOMED CT, où SNOMED CT est l'une des ontologies cliniques les plus utilisées et les plus complètes. L'application de modèles de Deep Learning de base conduit toutefois à des résultats indésirables en raison de la nature déséquilibrée des données et du nombre extrême de classes. Nous proposons une procédure de classification qui comprend un flux de travail en plusieurs étapes comprenant le regroupement d'étiquettes, la classification multi-clusters et le mappage des clusters vers les étiquettes. Pour la classification multi-clusters, BioBert est affiné par rapport à notre ensemble de données personnalisé. Le mappage des clusters vers les étiquettes est effectué par un classificateur un contre tous (SVC) appliqué à chaque cluster. Nous présentons également les étapes de la génération automatique de jeux de données de descriptions textuelles annotées avec des codes SNOMED CT sur la base de données publiques et de données ouvertes liées. Afin de faire face au problème du déséquilibre important de notre ensemble de données, certaines méthodes d'augmentation des données sont appliquées. Les résultats des expériences menées montrent la grande précision et la fiabilité de notre approche pour la prédiction des codes SNOMED CT pertinents pour un texte clinique.", 'pt': 'A normalização de conceitos de textos clínicos para classificações e ontologias médicas padrão é uma tarefa de grande importância para a saúde e a pesquisa médica. Tentamos resolver este problema através da codificação automática do SNOMED CT, onde o SNOMED CT é uma das ontologias de termos clínicos mais amplamente utilizadas e abrangentes. A aplicação de modelos básicos de Deep Learning, no entanto, leva a resultados indesejáveis devido à natureza desequilibrada dos dados e ao número extremo de classes. Propomos um procedimento de classificação que apresenta um fluxo de trabalho de várias etapas que consiste em agrupamento de rótulos, classificação de vários clusters e mapeamento de clusters para rótulos. Para classificação de vários clusters, o BioBERT é ajustado em nosso conjunto de dados personalizado. O mapeamento de clusters para rótulos é realizado por um classificador de um contra todos (SVC) aplicado a cada cluster. Também apresentamos as etapas para geração automática de conjuntos de dados de descrições textuais anotadas com códigos SNOMED CT com base em dados públicos e dados abertos vinculados. Para lidar com o problema de que nosso conjunto de dados é altamente desequilibrado, alguns métodos de aumento de dados são aplicados. Os resultados dos experimentos realizados mostram alta precisão e confiabilidade de nossa abordagem para previsão de códigos SNOMED CT relevantes para um texto clínico.', 'ja': '標準的な医療分類とオントロジーへの臨床テキストの概念の正規化は、ヘルスケアと医学研究にとって非常に重要な課題です。 我々は、SNOMED CTが最も広く使用され、包括的な臨床用語のオントロジーの1つである自動SNOMED CTエンコーディングを通じて、この問題を解決しようとしています。 しかし、基本的なディープラーニングモデルを適用すると、データのバランスが悪く、クラス数が極端に多いため、望ましくない結果につながります。 ラベルクラスタリング、マルチクラスタ分類、クラスタからラベルへのマッピングからなる複数ステップのワークフローを特徴とする分類手順を提案します。 マルチクラスター分類のために、BioBERTはカスタムデータセット上で微調整されます。 クラスタからラベルへのマッピングは、すべての単一のクラスタに適用される1対すべての分類子（ SVC ）によって実行される。 また、公開データとリンクされたオープンデータに基づいて、SNOMED CTコードでアノテーションされたテキスト記述の自動データセット生成のためのステップを提示します。 データセットが非常にアンバランスであるという問題に対処するために、いくつかのデータ拡張方法が適用されます。 実施された実験の結果は、臨床テキストに関連するSNOMED CTコードの予測のための当社のアプローチの高い精度と信頼性を示す。', 'zh': '以临床文本之概标准化为率,与本体为一医疗保健、医之高要。 吾试图自SNOMED CT编码以决之,其SNOMED CT至博至备临床术语体之一也。 然而用其本末,则数之不平,类之多也。 凡立分事,程有多步骤程,标签聚类,多聚类类聚类映射。 多集群之类,BioBERT微调于吾自定义数据集上。 群集及标签映射,各用一双全分类器 (SVC) 行。 又言公共数链接开数自生文本数集步。 应数集高不平,宜用增数。 所行之实验结果表明,所以占临床文本相关者SNOMED CT代码有高准确性可靠性。', 'hi': 'मानक चिकित्सा वर्गीकरण और ontologies के लिए नैदानिक ग्रंथों की अवधारणा सामान्यीकरण स्वास्थ्य देखभाल और चिकित्सा अनुसंधान के लिए उच्च महत्व के साथ एक कार्य है। हम स्वचालित SNOMED सीटी एन्कोडिंग के माध्यम से इस समस्या को हल करने का प्रयास करते हैं, जहां SNOMED CT सबसे व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले और व्यापक नैदानिक शब्द ontologies में से एक है। बुनियादी डीप लर्निंग मॉडल को लागू करना, हालांकि, डेटा की असंतुलित प्रकृति और कक्षाओं की चरम संख्या के कारण अवांछनीय परिणामों की ओर जाता है। हम एक वर्गीकरण प्रक्रिया का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसमें लेबल क्लस्टरिंग, मल्टी-क्लस्टर वर्गीकरण और क्लस्टर-टू-लेबल मैपिंग शामिल एक बहु-चरणीय वर्कफ़्लो शामिल है. मल्टी-क्लस्टर वर्गीकरण के लिए, BioBERT हमारे कस्टम डेटासेट पर ठीक ट्यून किया गया है। क्लस्टर-टू-लेबल मैपिंग प्रत्येक एकल क्लस्टर पर लागू एक-बनाम-सभी क्लासिफायर (SVC) द्वारा किया जाता है। हम सार्वजनिक डेटा और लिंक किए गए खुले डेटा के आधार पर SNOMED CT कोड के साथ एनोटेट किए गए पाठ्य विवरणों के स्वचालित डेटासेट पीढ़ी के लिए चरण भी प्रस्तुत करते हैं। इस समस्या से निपटने के लिए कि हमारा डेटासेट अत्यधिक असंतुलित है, कुछ डेटा संवर्धन विधियों को लागू किया जाता है। आयोजित प्रयोगों के परिणाम एक नैदानिक पाठ के लिए प्रासंगिक SNOMED सीटी कोड की भविष्यवाणी के लिए हमारे दृष्टिकोण की उच्च सटीकता और विश्वसनीयता दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Нормализация клинических текстов к стандартным медицинским классификациям и онтологиям является задачей, имеющей большое значение для здравоохранения и медицинских исследований. Мы пытаемся решить эту проблему с помощью автоматического кодирования SNOMED CT, где SNOMED CT является одним из наиболее широко используемых и всеобъемлющих клинических терминов онтологии. Применение базовых моделей глубокого обучения, однако, приводит к нежелательным результатам из-за несбалансированности данных и экстремального количества классов. Мы предлагаем процедуру классификации, которая включает многоэтапный рабочий процесс, состоящий из кластеризации меток, классификации нескольких кластеров и отображения кластеров на метки. Для классификации по нескольким кластерам BioBERT настроен по сравнению с нашим пользовательским набором данных. Сопоставление кластеров и меток осуществляется с помощью одного-всех классификаторов (SVC), применяемых к каждому кластеру. Также мы представляем этапы автоматической генерации наборов данных текстовых описаний, аннотированных кодами SNOMED CT на основе общедоступных данных и связанных открытых данных. Для решения проблемы, связанной с высокой несбалансированностью нашего набора данных, применяются некоторые методы дополнения данных. Результаты проведенных экспериментов показывают высокую точность и надежность нашего подхода к прогнозированию кодов SNOMED CT, относящихся к клиническому тексту.', 'ga': 'Tasc a bhfuil an-tábhacht ag baint leis don chúram sláinte agus don taighde leighis is ea normalú coincheapa téacsanna cliniciúla go haicmí caighdeánacha leighis agus ontologies. Déanaimid iarracht an fhadhb seo a réiteach trí ionchódú uathoibríoch SNOMED CT, áit a bhfuil SNOMED CT ar cheann de na hinteolaíochtaí téarma cliniciúla is mó a úsáidtear agus is cuimsithí. Mar sin féin, bíonn torthaí neamh-inmhianaithe mar thoradh ar mhúnlaí bunúsacha Deep Learning a chur i bhfeidhm mar gheall ar nádúr neamhchothrom na sonraí agus an líon mór ranganna. Molaimid nós imeachta aicmithe ina bhfuil sreabhadh oibre ilchéime comhdhéanta de bhraisliú lipéad, aicmiú ilchnuasach, agus mapáil braislí go lipéid. Maidir le haicmiú ilchnuasach, déantar BioBERT a mhionchoigeartú ar ár dtacar sonraí saincheaptha. Déanann aicmitheoir duine-le-h-uile (SVC) an léarscáiliú braisle-go-lipéid a chuirtear i bhfeidhm ar gach braisle amháin. Cuirimid i láthair freisin na céimeanna chun tacair sonraí a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch de thuairiscí téacsúla atá anótáilte le cóid SNOMED CT bunaithe ar shonraí poiblí agus sonraí oscailte nasctha. Chun dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb go bhfuil ár dtacar sonraí an-neamhchothromaithe, cuirtear roinnt modhanna méadaithe sonraí i bhfeidhm. Léiríonn torthaí na dturgnaimh a rinneadh ardchruinneas agus iontaofacht ár gcur chuige chun cóid SNOMED CT a bhaineann le téacs cliniciúil a thuar.', 'el': 'Η εξομάλυνση της έννοιας των κλινικών κειμένων σε τυποποιημένες ιατρικές ταξινομήσεις και οντολογίες αποτελεί έργο μεγάλης σημασίας για την υγειονομική περίθαλψη και την ιατρική έρευνα. Προσπαθούμε να επιλύσουμε αυτό το πρόβλημα μέσω της αυτόματης κωδικοποίησης όπου η αξονική είναι μία από τις πιο διαδεδομένες και περιεκτικές κλινικές ορολογικές. Ωστόσο, η εφαρμογή βασικών μοντέλων βαθιάς μάθησης οδηγεί σε ανεπιθύμητα αποτελέσματα λόγω της ανισορροπίας των δεδομένων και του ακραίου αριθμού των μαθημάτων. Προτείνουμε μια διαδικασία ταξινόμησης που διαθέτει μια ροή εργασίας πολλαπλών βημάτων που αποτελείται από ομαδοποίηση ετικετών, ταξινόμηση πολλαπλών συστάδων και αντιστοίχιση συστάδων σε ετικέτες. Για την ταξινόμηση πολλαπλών συστοιχιών, το είναι συντονισμένο μέσω του προσαρμοσμένου συνόλου δεδομένων μας. Η αντιστοίχιση συστάδων σε ετικέτες πραγματοποιείται από έναν ταξινομητή ενός έναντι όλων (που εφαρμόζεται σε κάθε συστάδα. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης τα βήματα για την αυτόματη δημιουργία συνόλων δεδομένων περιγραφών κειμένου σχολιασμένων με κωδικούς βασισμένους σε δημόσια δεδομένα και συνδεδεμένα ανοικτά δεδομένα. Προκειμένου να αντιμετωπιστεί το πρόβλημα ότι το σύνολο δεδομένων μας είναι εξαιρετικά ανισορροπημένο, εφαρμόζονται ορισμένες μέθοδοι αύξησης δεδομένων. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραματισμάτων που διεξήχθησαν δείχνουν υψηλή ακρίβεια και αξιοπιστία της προσέγγισής μας για την πρόβλεψη κωδικών ΣΝΟΜΗΜΕΝΗΣ αξονικής τομογραφίας που σχετίζονται με ένα κλινικό κείμενο.', 'hu': 'A klinikai szövegek koncepciós normalizálása az egészségügyi és orvosi kutatások számára kiemelt fontosságú feladat. Ezt a problémát automatikus SNOMED CT kódolással próbáljuk megoldani, ahol a SNOMED CT az egyik legelterjedtebb és legátfogóbb klinikai kifejezés ontológia. Az alapvető mélytanulási modellek alkalmazása azonban nemkívánatos eredményekhez vezet az adatok kiegyensúlyozatlansága és az osztályok szélsőséges száma miatt. Olyan osztályozási eljárást javasolunk, amely többlépéses munkafolyamatot tartalmaz, amely címke fürtözésből, többfürtös osztályozásból és klaszterek címkék leképezéséből áll. A többklaszteres osztályozáshoz a BioBERT egyéni adatkészletünkön alapul. A klaszterek-címkék leképezését az egyes klaszterekre alkalmazott SVC (one-vers-all) osztályozó végzi. Bemutatjuk továbbá a SNOMED CT kódokkal megjegyzett szöveges leírások automatikus adatkészlet-generálásának lépéseit nyilvános adatokon és kapcsolt nyílt adatokon alapuló lépéseit. Annak érdekében, hogy megbirkózzunk azzal a problémával, hogy adatkészletünk rendkívül kiegyensúlyozatlan, néhány adatbővítési módszert alkalmazunk. Az elvégzett kísérletek eredményei a klinikai szöveg szempontjából releváns SNOMED CT kódok előrejelzésére vonatkozó megközelítésünk nagy pontosságát és megbízhatóságát mutatják.', 'ka': 'კლინიკური ტექსტის ნორმალიზაცია სტანდარტური მედიცინური კლასიფიკაციაში და ონტოლოგიაში უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი სამუშაო მოქმედება. ჩვენ ვცდილობთ ამ პრობლემას ავტომატიკური SNOMED CT კოდირებას გამოყენებით, სადაც SNOMED CT არის ერთ-ერთი უფრო widely გამოყენებული და ყველაფერი კლინიკური ტემინის ანტოლოგია. მაგრამ მანძილური ძალიან სწავლების მოდელების გამოყენება, მაგრამ მონაცემების და კლასების კონტრემი მნიშვნელოვანი შედეგების შესახებ უნდა დაუწყება. ჩვენ კლასიფიკაციის პროცექტის გამოყენება, რომელიც აქვს მრავალ ნაგულისხმები სამუშაო მუშაო სამუშაო მუშაო კლასტერის, მრავალ კლასტერის კლასიფიკაციის და მრავალკლასტერის კლასიფიკაციისთვის, BioBERT არის ჩვენი განსაზღვრული მონაცემების სეტი. ყველა კლასტერისთვის კლასტერისთვის შესახებ ყველა კლასტერისთვის გამოყენება. ჩვენ ასევე აჩვენებთ ტექსტულ გამოსახულების მონაცემების ავტომატური მონაცემების კოდეების მონაცემებისთვის, რომლებიც SNOMED CT კოდეებით დაახლოებით საზოგადო მონაც ჩვენი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია ძალიან უბალესოდ არიან, რამდენიმე მონაცემების აგგენტაციის მეტოვები გამოყენება. გავაკეთებული ექსპერიმენტების შედეგები ჩვენი პროგრამის ძალიან წესიერება და დარწმუნებელობა, რომელიც კლინიკური ტექსტისთვის შესახებ SNOMED CT კოდის წინასწარმო', 'kk': 'Клиникалық мәтіндерді стандартты медицина классификацияларына және онтологияға нормализациялау - саулық медицина зерттеулеріне көп маңызды тапсырма. Бұл мәселеді автоматты түрде SNOMED CT кодтамасы арқылы шешуге тырыстық. SNOMED CT - ең жалпы және толық клиникалық термин онтологиясының бірі. Дегенмен негізгі терең оқыту үлгілерін қолдану деректердің және классының ең жоғары саны себебі қаламайтын нәтижелеріне сәйкес береді. Біз бірнеше қадам жұмыс жұмыс істеу процедурын ұсынамыз. Бұл жарлық кластерлер, көп кластерлер классификациясы және кластерлер мен жарлықтар картасынан бар. Көптеген кластер классификациясы үшін BioBERT өзіміздің деректер жиынымызды жақсы баптауға арналған. Әрбір кластерге қолданылатын кластерлер мен жарлықтар картасын бір- бір кластерге қарсы классификатор (SVC) істейді. Сонымен қатар, SNOMED CT кодтарына негізделген мәтіндік сипаттамаларды автоматты деректер жиынының қадамдарын көрсетедік. Деректер жиынымыздың балансы жоқ деген мәселелерін шешу үшін кейбір деректерді көбейту әдістері қолданылады. Орындалған тәжірибелердің нәтижелері клиникалық мәтініне сәйкес келетін SNOMED CT кодтарын бақылау үшін біздің тәжірибеміздің дұрыс және сенімділігін көрсетеді.', 'it': "La normalizzazione concettuale dei testi clinici alle classificazioni e ontologie mediche standard è un compito di grande importanza per la sanità e la ricerca medica. Cerchiamo di risolvere questo problema attraverso la codifica automatica SNOMED CT, dove SNOMED CT è una delle ontologie cliniche più utilizzate e complete del termine. L'applicazione di modelli di Deep Learning di base, tuttavia, porta a risultati indesiderati a causa della natura sbilanciata dei dati e del numero estremo di classi. Proponiamo una procedura di classificazione che prevede un flusso di lavoro in più fasi composto da cluster di etichette, classificazione multi-cluster e mappatura cluster-to-label. Per la classificazione multi-cluster, BioBERT viene perfezionato attraverso il nostro set di dati personalizzato. La mappatura cluster-to-label è effettuata da un classificatore one-vs-all (SVC) applicato a ogni singolo cluster. Presentiamo anche i passaggi per la generazione automatica di dataset di descrizioni testuali annotate con codici CT SNOMED basati su dati pubblici e open data collegati. Per far fronte al problema che il nostro set di dati è altamente sbilanciato, vengono applicati alcuni metodi di aumento dei dati. I risultati degli esperimenti condotti mostrano un'elevata accuratezza e affidabilità del nostro approccio per la previsione dei codici TC SNOMED rilevanti per un testo clinico.", 'lt': 'Klinikinių tekstų normalizavimas standartinėms medicininėms klasifikacijoms ir ontologijoms yra labai svarbus uždavinys sveikatos priežiūros ir medicininiams tyrimams. Mes bandome išspręsti šią problem ą automatiškai SNOMED CT koduojant, kur SNOMED CT yra viena iš plačiausiai naudojamų ir išsamiausių klinikinių terminų ontologijų. Tačiau taikant pagrindinius išsamaus mokymosi modelius, dėl nesubalansuoto duomenų pobūdžio ir itin daug klasių atsiranda nepageidaujamų rezultatų. Siūlome klasifikavimo procedūrą, kurioje numatytas daugiapakopis darbo srautas, susidedantis iš etikečių klasifikavimo, daugiapakopio klasifikavimo ir klasterių žemėlapių. Daugiaklasifikavimui BioBERT tiksliai pritaikytas pagal mūsų duomenų rinkinį. Žymėjimas klasteriais į etiketes atliekamas vieno ir viso klasifikatoriaus (SVC), kuris taikomas kiekvienam klasteriui. Mes taip pat pristatome žingsnius automatiniam duomenų rinkinio kūrimui tekstinių aprašymų, pažymėtų SNOMED CT kodais, grindžiamais viešaisiais duomenimis ir susijusiais atvirais duomenimis. Siekiant išspręsti problem ą, kad mūsų duomenų rinkinys yra labai nesubalansuotas, taikomi kai kurie duomenų didinimo metodai. Atliktų eksperimentų rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris į SNOMED CT kodų, susijusių su klinikiniu tekstu, prognozavimą yra labai tikslus ir patikimas.', 'mk': 'Концептот на нормализација на клиничките тексти на стандардните медицински класификации и онтологии е задача со голема важност за здравствената грижа и медицинското истражување. Се обидуваме да го решиме овој проблем преку автоматско кодирање на СНОМЕД ЦТ, каде СНОМЕД ЦТ е една од најшироко употребените и комплетни клинички термини онтологии. Но, примената на основните модели на длабоко учење води до нежелни резултати поради небалансираната природа на податоците и екстремниот број класи. Предложуваме процедура за класификација која има повеќекратен работен тек кој се состои од класификација на етикетите, класификација на повеќекратни класификации и мапирање на класификации. For multi-cluster classification, BioBERT is fine-tuned over our custom dataset.  Мапирањето на кластерите на етикетите е спроведено од класификатор еден против сите (SVC) кој се применува на секој кластер. Исто така ги претставуваме чекорите за генерација автоматски податоци на текстуални описи анотирани со SNOMED CT кодови базирани на јавни податоци и поврзани отворени податоци. За да се справиме со проблемот дека нашиот податок е многу небалансиран, се применуваат некои методи за зголемување на податоците. Резултатите од спроведените експерименти покажуваат висока прецизност и доверливост на нашиот пристап за предвидување на SNOMED CT кодови релевантни за клиничкиот текст.', 'ms': 'Konsep normalisasi teks klinik kepada klasifikasi perubatan piawai dan ontologi adalah tugas yang sangat penting untuk rawatan kesehatan dan kajian perubatan. Kami cuba untuk menyelesaikan masalah ini melalui pengekodan automatik SNOMED CT, di mana SNOMED CT adalah salah satu terma klinik yang paling digunakan dan meliputi. Melakukan model belajar mendalam asas, bagaimanapun, membawa kepada keputusan yang tidak diinginkan disebabkan sifat tidak seimbang data dan bilangan ekstrim kelas. Kami cadangkan prosedur klasifikasi yang mengandungi aliran kerja berbilang-langkah yang terdiri dari kelompok label, kelompok berbilang-kelompok, dan petakan kelompok-ke-label. Untuk klasifikasi kelompok-berbilang, BioBERT disesuaikan dengan baik atas set data suai kami. Pempetaan kelompok-ke-label dilakukan oleh satu-vs-all klasifikasi (SVC) yang dilaksanakan pada setiap kelompok. Kami juga memperkenalkan langkah untuk generasi set data automatik deskripsi teks yang dicatat dengan kod CT SNOMED berdasarkan data awam dan data terbuka terhubung. Untuk menghadapi masalah yang set data kita sangat tidak seimbang, beberapa kaedah peningkatan data dilaksanakan. Hasil eksperimen yang dilakukan menunjukkan ketepatan dan kepercayaan tinggi pendekatan kita untuk ramalan kod CT SNOMED yang berkaitan dengan teks klinik.', 'mt': 'Il-kunċett ta’ normalizzazzjoni tat-testi kliniċi għall-klassifikazzjonijiet mediċi u l-ontoloġiji standard huwa kompitu b’importanza kbira għall-kura tas-saħħa u r-riċerka medika. Aħna nippruvaw issolvu din il-problema permezz ta’ kodifikazzjoni awtomatika SNOMED CT, fejn SNOMED CT hija waħda mill-ontoloġiji tat-terminu kliniku l-aktar użati u komprensivi. Applying basic Deep Learning models, however, leads to undesirable results due to the unbalanced nature of the data and the extreme number of classes.  Aħna nipproponu proċedura ta’ klassifikazzjoni li għandha fluss tax-xogħol f’diversi stadji li jikkonsisti f’raggruppament ta’ tikketti, klassifikazzjoni ta’ diversi raggruppamenti, u mmappjar ta’ raggruppamenti għal tikketti. Għall-klassifikazzjoni b’diversi raggruppamenti, BioBERT huwa aġġustat bir-reqqa fuq is-sett tad-dejta personali tagħna. L-immappjar tar-raggruppamenti mat-tikketti jsir minn klassifikatur wieħed kontra kulħadd (SVC) applikat għal kull raggruppament wieħed. Aħna nippreżentaw ukoll il-passi għall-ġenerazzjoni awtomatika ta’ sett ta’ dejta ta’ deskrizzjonijiet testwali annotati bil-kodiċijiet SNOMED CT ibbażati fuq dejta pubblika u dejta miftuħa marbuta. Sabiex tiġi indirizzata l-problema li s-sett tad-dejta tagħna huwa żbilanċjat ħafna, jiġu applikati xi metodi ta’ żieda tad-dejta. Ir-riżultati mill-esperimenti mwettqa juru preċiżjoni u affidabbiltà għolja tal-approċċ tagħna għat-tbassir tal-kodiċijiet SNOMED CT rilevanti għal test kliniku.', 'ml': 'Concept normalization of clinical texts to standard medical classifications and ontologies is a task with high importance for healthcare and medical research.  സ്വയം സ്നോമെഡ് സിറ്റി കോഡിങിലൂടെ ഈ പ്രശ്നം പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ SNOMED CT ഏറ്റവും വിശാലമായ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിലും പ ഡേറ്റായുടെ അസാധാരണ പ്രകൃതിയും ക്ലാസുകളുടെ ഏറ്റവും എണ്ണവും കാരണം അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുക ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ക്ലാസ്സിഫേഷന്\u200d പ്രക്രിയയോട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. ലേബ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d ക് പല-ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d വ്യവസ്ഥയ്ക്ക്, ബിയോബെര്\u200dട്ടി നമ്മുടെ സ്വന്തം ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിന്റെ മേല ഓരോ ക്ലാസ്റ്ററിനും പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്ന എല്ലാ ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200dമാരുടെയും ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d മാപ്പിങ്ങ് നടത്തുന്നു. പൊതുവിന്റെ ഡേറ്റാകങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സ്നോമെഡി സിറ്റി കോഡുകള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്വയം ഡാറ്റാസ നമ്മുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് വളരെ തൂക്കം പാലിക്കാത്ത പ്രശ്നത്തിനായി നോക്കുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ചില ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടുവാനു നടപ്പില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഒരു സംസാ', 'mn': 'Эрүүл мэндийн эрүүл мэндийн болон эмнэлгийн судалгаанд маш чухал ажиллагаатай болсон. Бид энэ асуудлыг автоматжуулан СНОМЕД CT кодлогын аргаар шийдэх гэж оролдож байна. СНОМЕД CT нь хамгийн өргөн хэрэглэгдсэн, хамгийн дүүрэн шинжлэх ухааны онологи юм. Гэхдээ үндсэн гүн гүнзгий суралцах загваруудыг хэрэглэх нь өгөгдлийн баланслагүй байдал болон хичээлийн маш их хэмжээний шалтгаан нөлөөлдөг. Бид олон алхам ажлын хөдөлгөөн, олон кластерын хэлбэрээр, кластерт-т-маркетингийн газрын зураг бүрддэг хэлбэрээр хуваалцах процедурыг санал болгож байна. Олон-кластерын хуваалтын тулд BioBERT бидний хувилбар өгөгдлийн сангийн тусламжтай байдаг. Нэг эсрэг бүх классификатор (SVC) бүрт хэрэглэгдсэн бүх классистер зураг хийдэг. Мөн бид өөрсдийгөө автоматжуулалтын өгөгдлийн сангийн шинжлэх ухаан болон нээлттэй өгөгдлийн үндсэн SNOMED CT кодыг автоматжуулалтын шинжлэх ухаан гаргадаг. Бидний өгөгдлийн сангийн маш баланслагүй асуудлыг олохын тулд зарим өгөгдлийн нэмэлт арга хэрэглэгддэг. Дасгал хийсэн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга барилгын тодорхойлолт, хяналтын текстэй холбоотой СNOMED CT кодын тодорхойлолтыг тодорхойлох боломжтой байдаг.', 'no': 'Koncepter normalisering av kliniske tekstar til standardklassifikasjonar og ontologiar er eit oppgåve med høg viktighet for helseforskning og medisinske forskning. Vi prøver å løysa dette problemet gjennom automatisk SNOMED CT-koding, der SNOMED CT er ein av dei mest brukte og komplette kliniske uttrykk ontologiar. Å bruka grunnleggjande dyppalæringsmodeller fører imidlertid til ugjennomsiktige resultat på grunn av ikkje balansert natur av data og ekstremt tal klasser. Vi foreslår ein klassifikasjonsprosedyr som inneheld ein fleire steg arbeidsfløy som inneheld merkelappar, fleire klassifikasjon og kartlegging av klasseringar til merkelappar. For fleire klassifikasjonar er BioBERT fint opp over vårt eigendefinert datasett. Klastermappinga til merkelappene vert utført av ei klassifiserer (SVC) som er brukt til kvar enkelt klassering. Vi presenterer også stegane for automatisk datasett av tekstskildringar med SNOMED CT-kodar basert på offentlige data og tilkopla opne data. For å kopla med problemet at datasettet vårt er svært ubebalansert, vert nokre dataaugmentasjonsmetodar brukt. Resultatene frå dei gjeldande eksperimentane viser høg nøyaktighet og tiltrudd til tilnærminga vårt for foregåve av SNOMED CT-kodar som er relevante til ein klinisk tekst.', 'pl': 'Normalizacja koncepcji tekstów klinicznych do standardowych klasyfikacji medycznych i ontologii jest zadaniem o dużym znaczeniu dla opieki zdrowotnej i badań medycznych. Próbujemy rozwiązać ten problem poprzez automatyczne kodowanie SNOMED CT, gdzie SNOMED CT jest jedną z najbardziej używanych i kompleksowych ontologii klinicznych terminów. Zastosowanie podstawowych modeli Deep Learning prowadzi jednak do niepożądanych rezultatów ze względu na niezrównoważony charakter danych i skrajną liczbę zajęć. Proponujemy procedurę klasyfikacji, która obejmuje wieloetapowy przepływ pracy składający się z klastrowania etykiet, klasyfikacji wieloetapowej i mapowania klastrów do etykiet. W przypadku klasyfikacji wielu klastrów, BioBERT jest dostosowany do naszego niestandardowego zbioru danych. Mapowanie klastrów do etykiet jest przeprowadzane przez klasyfikator jeden vs-wszystko (SVC) stosowany do każdego klastra. Przedstawiamy również kroki automatycznego generowania zbiorów danych opisów tekstowych adnotacji kodami SNOMED CT opartymi na danych publicznych i powiązanych danych otwartych. Aby poradzić sobie z problemem, że nasz zbiór danych jest bardzo niezrównoważony, stosuje się niektóre metody powiększania danych. Wyniki przeprowadzonych eksperymentów pokazują wysoką dokładność i wiarygodność naszego podejścia do przewidywania kodów SNOMED CT istotnych dla tekstu klinicznego.', 'ro': 'Normalizarea conceptului textelor clinice la clasificări medicale standard și ontologii este o sarcină cu o importanță deosebită pentru sănătate și cercetare medicală. Încercăm să rezolvăm această problemă prin codificarea automată SNOMED CT, unde SNOMED CT este una dintre cele mai utilizate și cuprinzătoare ontologii clinice. Cu toate acestea, aplicarea modelelor de bază de Deep Learning duce la rezultate nedorite din cauza naturii dezechilibrate a datelor și a numărului extrem de clase. Propunem o procedură de clasificare care prezintă un flux de lucru în mai multe etape, constând în clusterizarea etichetelor, clasificarea mai multor clustere și maparea clusterelor la etichete. Pentru clasificarea multi-cluster, BioBERT este reglat fin pe setul nostru de date personalizat. Maparea cluster-to-labels este realizată de un clasificator unu-vs-all (SVC) aplicat fiecărui cluster. De asemenea, prezentăm pașii pentru generarea automată de seturi de date a descrierilor textuale adnotate cu coduri CT SNOMED bazate pe date publice și date deschise conectate. Pentru a face față problemei că setul nostru de date este foarte dezechilibrat, se aplică unele metode de mărire a datelor. Rezultatele experimentelor efectuate arată acuratețea și fiabilitatea abordării noastre pentru predicția codurilor CT SNOMED relevante pentru un text clinic.', 'sr': 'Konceptivna normalizacija kliničkih tekstova standardnim medicinskim klasifikacijama i ontologijama je zadatak sa visokom važnošću za zdravstveno-medicinsko istraživanje. Pokušavamo rešiti ovaj problem automatskim kodiranjem SNOMED CT-a, gde je SNOMED CT jedan od najširokih korišćenih i sveobuhvatnijih kliničkih terminova ontologija. Međutim, primjena osnovnih modela dubokog učenja vodi do neverovatnih rezultata zbog nepravednosti prirode podataka i ekstremnog broja klasa. Predlažemo klasifikacijsku proceduru koja uključuje višestruki korak radnog toka koji se sastoji od grupiranja etiketa, klasifikacije višestrukih klasera i mapiranja klasera na etikete. Za multiklaster klasifikaciju, BioBERT je dobro sređen nad našim posebnim podacima. Mapiranje klastara na etikete provede jedan protiv svih klasifikatora (SVC) koji se primjenjuje na svaki skup. Takoðe predstavljamo korake za automatsku generaciju tekstualnih opisa koji su navedeni kodovima SNOMED CT na temelju javnih podataka i povezanih otvorenih podataka. Da bi se riješio problem koji je naš set podataka veoma nepravedno, primjenjuju se neke metode povećanja podataka. Rezultati provedenih eksperimenata pokazuju visoku tačnost i pouzdanost našeg pristupa za predviđanje kodova SNOMED CT relevantnih kliničkom tekstu.', 'so': 'Qoraalka caadiga ah oo qoraalka dhakhaatiirta ah u diidi karo fasalka caafimaadka iyo xirfadaha caafimaadka ee caafimaadka ah waa shuqul aad u muhiim u leh baaritaanka caafimaadka iyo baaritaanka caafimaadka. Waxaynu isku dayaynaa in aan dhibaatadan u xambaarino si automatic ah SNOMED CT-ka, meesha ay SNOMED CT ka mid tahay mid ka mid ah waxa ugu wada isticmaalan oo ugu hooseeya waqtiga dhaqaale ee dhaqaale. Si kastaba ha ahaatee codsashada tusaalaha waxbarashada hoose ee hoose-dhexe waxay sababtoo ah resultooyin aan la qiimo karin dabiicadda macluumaadka iyo fasalaha aad u dheer. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa baaritaanka fasaxda oo qabanqaabiya wadooyin badan oo ka mid ah xarunta calaamadda, fasaxa kala duduwan, iyo sawirka looga baaraandegayo. Tusaale-kala duduwan, BioBERT ayaa si fiican looga dhigaa macluumaadkayaga caadi ah. The clusters-to-labels mapping is carried out by a one-vs-all classifier (SVC) applied to every single cluster.  Sidoo kale waxaynu soo bandhignaa tallaabooyin aan automatic-dhig macluumaad ka soo qorno qoraal qoraal ah oo lagu qoray SNOMED CT codes ku saleysan macluumaadka dadweynaha iyo macluumaad furan. Si aad u xambaarto dhibaatada looga baahan yahay sawiradayada, waxaa lagu codsadaa qaabab lagu kordhinayo macluumaadka. Midhaha imtixaanka la sameeyay waxay muuqataa saxda aad u saxda iyo ku aaminsanaanshaha qaabkeenna si loo sii sheego qoraalka xarunta dhakhtarka ee SNOMED.', 'sv': 'Konceptnormalisering av kliniska texter till standardiserade medicinska klassificeringar och ontologier är en uppgift med stor betydelse för hälso- och sjukvård och medicinsk forskning. Vi försöker lösa detta problem genom automatisk SNOMED CT kodning, där SNOMED CT är en av de mest använda och omfattande kliniska termontologierna. Att tillämpa grundläggande djupinlärningsmodeller leder dock till oönskade resultat på grund av den obalanserade karaktären av data och det extrema antalet klasser. Vi föreslår en klassificeringsförfarande som innehåller ett arbetsflöde i flera steg bestående av etikettklustring, klassificering av flera kluster och kartläggning av kluster till etiketter. För klassificering av flera kluster finjusteras BioBERT över vårt anpassade dataset. Kartläggningen kluster-till-etiketter utförs av en one-vs-all klassificerare (SVC) som tillämpas på varje kluster. Vi presenterar också stegen för automatisk datauppsättning generering av textbeskrivningar kommenterade med SNOMED CT-koder baserade på offentliga data och länkade öppna data. För att hantera problemet med att vår datamängd är mycket obalanserad tillämpas vissa dataförstärkningsmetoder. Resultaten från de utförda experimenten visar hög noggrannhet och tillförlitlighet i vårt tillvägagångssätt för prediktion av SNOMED CT koder relevanta för en klinisk text.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාත්මක පණිවිඩයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාත්මක පණිවිඩය සහ විද්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සහ විද්\u200dයාත්මක ප අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය SNOMED CT සංකේතනයෙන් විස්තර කරන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා, කොහෙද SNOMED CT තමයි ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ සම් ඒත් මූලික දුරස්ථානය ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය අවස්ථානය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම, තොරතුරු සහ ප්\u200dරමාණ සංඛ්යාවක් අවස්ථානය න අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විශේෂණ පද්ධතියෙන් විශේෂ විධානයක් තියෙන්නේ ලේබුල් ක්\u200dලාස්ටර් එක්ක, විශේෂ ක්\u200dලාස්ටර් වර ගොඩක් ක්ලාස්ටර් විශේෂණය සඳහා, BioBERT අපේ සැකසුම් දත්ත සැට වලට හොඳ සැකසුම් කරනවා. Name අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය දත්ත සූදානම් විස්තර කරනවා SNOMED CT කෝඩ් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය දත්ත සහ සම්බන්ධ දත්ත සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වෙලා ත අපේ දත්ත සෙට් ගොඩක් සාමාන්\u200dයය නැති ප්\u200dරශ්නය සමග ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න, තොරතුරු විශාල විධානය සමහර විධා පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ විශ්වාසිතාවක් ස්නෝ', 'ur': 'سلامتی اور پزشکی تحقیقات کے لئے بہت اہم کام ہے۔ ہم اس مسئلہ کو اپنا SNOMED CT اکنوڈینگ کے ذریعے حل کرنے کی کوشش کررہے ہیں جہاں SNOMED CT سب سے زیادہ استعمال کیا گیا ہے اور سب سے زیادہ کلینیکی کلینیکی ٹمنڈلوژ میں سے ایک ہے. لیکن بنیادی عمیق سیکھنے کی نمونڈلوں کو لازم کرنا، ڈاٹا اور کلاس کے بہت زیادہ تعداد کے باعث ناپسند نتیجے کی وجہ سے ناپسند کرتا ہے. ہم ایک کلاسپیٹ پردازی کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جس میں لابل کلسٹر، multi-cluster کلاسپیٹ، اور کلسٹر-to-لابل نقشه کے مطابق ایک چند سپے کارفول شامل ہے. Multicluster classification کے لئے، BioBERT ہمارے خصوصی ڈاٹ سٹ پر ٹھیک تنظیم ہے. کلسٹر پر لابل مٹینگ ایک مخالف کلسٹر (SVC) نے ہر کلسٹر پر لازم کیا ہے۔ ہم نے اپنا استعمال ڈیٹسٹ پیدا کرنے کے لئے استعمال بھی پیش کیے ہیں جنہیں SNOMED CT کوڈوں کے ذریعہ مشخص کردیا گیا ہے جو عمومی ڈیٹا اور کھولی ڈیٹا پر بنیاد ہے۔ اس مسئلہ کے ساتھ جواب دینے کے لئے کہ ہمارے ڈیٹ سٹ بہت برالیس نہیں ہے، کچھ ڈیٹ اضافہ طریقے کاروبار کئے جاتے ہیں. جتنے آزمائش کے نتیجے ہیں ان کے نتیجے ایک کلینیکی ٹکسٹ کے معاملہ میں ہمارے طریقے کا بالا دقیق اور امانت داری دکھاتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'நிலையான மருத்துவ வகுப்புகள் மற்றும் தொழில்நுட்பங்களுக்கு சாதாரண மாற்றத்தை நிறுத்துக நாம் இந்த பிரச்சனையை தீர்க்க முயற்சி செய்கிறோம் தானாகவே SNOMED CT குறியீட்டின் குறியீடு, அங்கு SNOMED CT என்பது மிகவும் விரிவாக பயன் அடிப்படை ஆழம் கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்துதலாம், ஆனால் தரவின் ஒற்றைப்படாத இயல்பினாலும் வகுப்புகளின் மிக எண்ணிக்கை நாம் ஒரு வகுப்பு செயல்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது விளக்கச்சீட்டு வரைப்படத்தில் இருக்கும் பல க்ளூஸ்டர் வகுப்பு, மற்றும் குள்ளிகள் வரைப் பல- க்ளூஸ்டர் வகுப்புகளுக்கு, பியோபிரெட் எங்கள் தனிப்பயன் தரவுத்தளத்திற்கு நன்றாக முடிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. ஒவ்வொரு குழுவுக்கும் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ள ஒரு மற்றும் எல்லா வகுப்பாளர் (SVC) வரைப்படம் செயல்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. SNOMED CT குறியீடுகளை பொது தரவுகளை அடிப்படையில் மற்றும் இணைக்கப்பட்ட திறந்த தரவுகளை அடிப்படையில் குறிப்பிட்ட நாம் தானாகவே தரவு அம எங்கள் தகவல் அமைப்பு மிகவும் சமமில்லாத பிரச்சனையை நீக்க, சில தரவு கூட்டுதல் முறைகள் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட சோதனைகளின் முடிவுகள் அதிக சரியான மற்றும் நம்பிக்கையை காண்பிக்கிறது ஒரு சில குறிப்பிட்ட உரையுடன் தொடர்புட', 'uz': "Name Biz bu muammolarni avtomatik SNOMED CT kodlash orqali avtomatik aniqlashga harakat qilamiz, amba SNOMED CT (SNOMED CT) eng eng katta ishlatilgan va eng katta klinikal soʻzning ontologiyasi. Bir xil o'rganish modellarini qoʻllash mumkin, ammo maʼlumotning tub tomonidan oʻxshash natijalariga va sinfning juda qisqa soni sababchi natijalariga oʻtishadi. Biz bir necha darajada ishlash jarayonini tahrirlash imkoniyatini tahrirlash imkoniyatini tahrirlashimiz mumkin. Bir necha darajada ko'p ish oynasini tahrirlash mumkin. Bir nechta-cluster darajasi uchun BioBERT moslama maʼlumotlar sahifasi bilan yaxshi bogʻ'liq. Name @ info: whatsthis @ info Javob berilgan tajribalarning natijalari klinikal matn bilan bog'liq boʻlgan SNOMED CT kodlarini bajarish uchun juda foydalanish va ishonaligimizni koʻrsatiladi.", 'vi': 'Sự bình thường hóa các văn bản lâm sàng theo quy mô y học tiêu chuẩn và khoa ứng là một nhiệm vụ rất quan trọng cho sức khỏe và nghiên cứu y học. Chúng tôi cố gắng giải quyết vấn đề này bằng việc cài đặt cấu trúc an to àn toàn toàn của SNCC, nơi mà chụp CT đã được sử dụng rộng rãi và bao quát các thuật ngữ lâm sàng. Việc áp dụng các mô hình cơ bản về học sâu dẫn đến kết quả không mong đợi do tính chất không cân bằng của dữ liệu và số lượng tối đa của lớp học. Chúng tôi đề xuất một quy trình phân loại có một dòng chảy đa bước, gồm gồm nhóm nhãn, phân hạng đa cụm, và phân loại các tập thể đạt nhãn. Để phân loại đa nhóm, BioBERT đã được chỉnh chính xác trên bộ dữ liệu riêng của chúng ta. Bản đồ hóa nhãn tập thể được thực hiện bởi một đấu trường phân loại một (SVC) được áp dụng cho mỗi tập đoàn. Chúng tôi cũng giới thiệu các bước cho việc sản xuất các mô tả văn bản tự động được ghi chú bằng mã CT SNOMed dựa trên dữ liệu công cộng và kết nối các dữ liệu mở. Để giải quyết vấn đề về sự thiếu cân bằng của chúng ta, một số phương pháp gia tăng dữ liệu được áp dụng. Kết quả các thí nghiệm đã tiến hành cho thấy độ chính xác và đáng tin cậy cao của phương pháp dự đoán của chúng ta về mã CT SNOMED liên quan đến chữ viết lâm sàng.', 'bg': 'Нормализирането на концепцията на клиничните текстове към стандартните медицински класификации и онтологии е задача с голямо значение за здравеопазването и медицинските изследвания. Опитваме се да решим този проблем чрез автоматично кодиране, където е една от най-широко използваните и изчерпателни клинични термини онтологии. Прилагането на основни модели на задълбочено обучение обаче води до нежелани резултати поради небалансирания характер на данните и крайния брой класове. Предлагаме процедура за класификация, която включва работен поток от няколко стъпки, състоящ се от клъстериране на етикети, класификация на няколко клъстера и картографиране на клъстери към етикети. За многоклъстерна класификация е фина настройка на нашия персонализиран набор от данни. Картирането на клъстери към етикети се извършва от класификатор един срещу всички (СВС), приложен към всеки един клъстер. Представяме и стъпките за автоматично генериране на текстови описания, анотирани с кодове базирани на публични данни и свързани отворени данни. За да се справим с проблема, че нашият набор от данни е силно небалансиран, се прилагат някои методи за увеличаване на данните. Резултатите от проведените експерименти показват висока точност и надеждност на нашия подход за прогнозиране на СНОМЕД КТ кодове, свързани с клиничен текст.', 'da': 'Begrebet normalisering af kliniske tekster til standard medicinske klassifikationer og ontologier er en opgave med stor betydning for sundhedsvæsenet og medicinsk forskning. Vi forsøger at løse dette problem gennem automatisk SNOMED CT kodning, hvor SNOMED CT er en af de mest udbredte og omfattende kliniske betegnelser ontologier. Anvendelse af grundlæggende Deep Learning modeller fører dog til uønskede resultater på grund af dataenes ubalancerede karakter og det ekstreme antal klasser. Vi foreslår en klassificeringsprocedure, der indeholder en arbejdsproces i flere trin bestående af etiketklyngning, klassificering af flere klynger og tilknytning af klynger til etiketter. Til klassificering af flere klynger finjusteres BioBERT via vores brugerdefinerede datasæt. Kortlægningen af klynger til etiketter udføres af en SVC (one-vs-all klassificering), der anvendes på hver enkelt klynge. Vi præsenterer også trinnene for automatisk datasæt generering af tekstbeskrivelser kommenteret med SNOMED CT-koder baseret på offentlige data og tilknyttede åbne data. For at kunne klare problemet med, at vores datasæt er stærkt ubalanceret, anvendes nogle data augmentation metoder. Resultaterne fra de gennemførte forsøg viser høj nøjagtighed og pålidelighed af vores tilgang til forudsigelse af SNOMED CT koder relevante for en klinisk tekst.', 'de': 'Die konzeptionelle Normalisierung klinischer Texte auf medizinische Standardklassifikationen und Ontologien ist eine Aufgabe von hoher Bedeutung für das Gesundheitswesen und die medizinische Forschung. Wir versuchen, dieses Problem durch automatische SNOMED CT Kodierung zu lösen, wobei SNOMED CT eine der am weitesten verbreiteten und umfassendsten klinischen Termontologien ist. Die Anwendung grundlegender Deep Learning Modelle führt jedoch aufgrund der unausgewogenen Natur der Daten und der extremen Anzahl von Klassen zu unerwünschten Ergebnissen. Wir schlagen ein Klassifizierungsverfahren vor, das einen mehrstufigen Workflow umfasst, der aus Label-Clustering, Multi-Cluster-Klassifizierung und Cluster-to-Labels-Zuordnung besteht. Für die Klassifizierung mehrerer Cluster wird BioBERT über unseren benutzerdefinierten Datensatz fein abgestimmt. Die Cluster-to-Labels-Zuordnung wird von einem Eins-vs-All-Klassifikator (SVC) durchgeführt, der auf jeden einzelnen Cluster angewendet wird. Wir stellen auch die Schritte zur automatischen Datensatzgenerierung von Textbeschreibungen vor, die mit SNOMED CT-Codes kommentiert sind, basierend auf öffentlichen Daten und verlinkten offenen Daten. Um das Problem zu bewältigen, dass unser Datensatz stark unausgewogen ist, werden einige Methoden der Datenauswertung angewendet. Die Ergebnisse der durchgeführten Experimente zeigen eine hohe Genauigkeit und Zuverlässigkeit unseres Ansatzes zur Vorhersage von SNOMED CT Codes relevant für einen klinischen Text.', 'hr': 'Konceptivna normalizacija kliničkih tekstova standardnim medicinskim klasifikacijama i ontologijama je zadatak s visokom važnošću za zdravstveno i medicinsko istraživanje. Pokušavamo riješiti ovaj problem putem automatskog kodiranja SNOMED CT-a, gdje je SNOMED CT jedan od najširom korištenijih i sveobuhvatnijih kliničkih terminova ontologija. Međutim, primjenjivanje osnovnih modela dubokog učenja dovodi do nevidljivih rezultata zbog nepravednosti prirode podataka i ekstremnog broja klasa. Predlažemo klasifikacijsku proceduru koja uključuje višestruki korak radnog toka koji se sastoji od skupljanja etiketa, višestruke klasifikacije i mapiranja klasera na etikete. Za multiklasičnu klasifikaciju, BioBERT je dobro sređen nad našim običnim podacima. Mapiranje klasera na etikete provede je jedna protiv svih klasifikatora (SVC) primjena na svaku skupinu. Također predstavljamo korake za automatsku generaciju kompeta podataka tekstualnih opisa navedenih kodovima SNOMED CT na temelju javnih podataka i povezanih otvorenih podataka. Da bi se riješio problema s kojim je naša kompleta podataka vrlo nezalansirana, primjenjuju se neke metode povećanja podataka. Rezultati provođenih eksperimenata pokazuju visoku preciznost i pouzdanost našeg pristupa za predviđanje kodova SNOMED CT relevantnih kliničkom tekstu.', 'nl': 'Conceptnormalisatie van klinische teksten naar standaard medische classificaties en ontologieën is een taak van groot belang voor gezondheidszorg en medisch onderzoek. We proberen dit probleem op te lossen door middel van automatische SNOMED CT-codering, waarbij SNOMED CT een van de meest gebruikte en uitgebreide klinische termontologieën is. Het toepassen van basis Deep Learning modellen leidt echter tot ongewenste resultaten vanwege de onevenwichtige aard van de gegevens en het extreme aantal lessen. We stellen een classificatieprocedure voor die bestaat uit een workflow in meerdere stappen, bestaande uit labelclustering, multiclustering en clusters-naar-labels toewijzing. Voor multi-cluster classificatie wordt BioBERT verfijnd via onze aangepaste dataset. De toewijzing van clusters naar labels wordt uitgevoerd door een één-tegen-alles classificator (SVC) die op elk cluster wordt toegepast. We presenteren ook de stappen voor automatische dataset generatie van tekstbeschrijvingen geannoteerd met SNOMED CT codes op basis van openbare gegevens en gekoppelde open data. Om het probleem aan te pakken dat onze dataset zeer onevenwichtig is, worden enkele data augmentation methodes toegepast. De resultaten van de uitgevoerde experimenten tonen een hoge nauwkeurigheid en betrouwbaarheid van onze benadering voor voorspelling van SNOMED CT codes relevant voor een klinische tekst.', 'ko': '임상 텍스트의 개념을 표준적인 의학 분류와 본체로 규범화하는 것은 의료 보건과 의학 연구에 있어 매우 중요한 임무이다.우리는 자동 SNOMED CT 코드를 통해 이 문제를 해결하려고 시도했다. 그 중에서 SNOMED CT는 가장 광범위하고 전면적인 임상 용어 본체 중의 하나이다.그러나 데이터의 불균형성과 학급의 극단적인 수량 때문에 기본적인 심도 있는 학습 모델을 응용하면 이상적이지 않은 결과를 초래할 수 있다.우리는 분류 과정을 제시했는데 그 특징은 여러 단계의 작업 절차로 라벨 집합, 다중 집단 분류와 집단이 라벨에 비치는 것을 포함한다.BioBERT는 다중 클러스터 분류의 경우 사용자 정의 데이터 세트에서 미세하게 조정했습니다.클래스에서 탭으로 매핑하는 것은 클래스마다 적용되는 모든 분류기 (SVC) 에서 실행됩니다.또한 공공 데이터와 링크 개방 데이터를 기반으로 SNOMED CT 코드 주석이 있는 텍스트 설명 데이터 세트를 자동으로 생성하는 절차도 소개했다.데이터 집합의 고도 불균형 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 일부 데이터 확충 방법을 채택하였다.실험 결과 임상 텍스트와 관련된 SNOMED CT 코드를 예측하는 방법은 정확성과 신뢰성이 높은 것으로 나타났다.', 'fa': 'تعریف عادی از متن کلینیک به کلینیک\u200cهای پزشکی استاندارد و آنتولوژی یک کار است که برای تحقیقات سلامتی و پزشکی مهم دارد. ما سعی می\u200cکنیم این مشکل را از طریق رمزبندی CT اتوماتیک SNOMED حل کنیم، جایی که SNOMED CT یکی از بزرگترین ترمیم استفاده شده و کلینیک ترمیم کنتولوژی است. ولی کاربرد مدل یادگیری عمیق، به دلیل طبیعت نابرابری داده ها و تعداد فوق العاده کلاس به نتایج ناخوشایند می رسد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش مختصات که یک جریان کار چندین مرحله را مشخص می\u200cکند که از طریق نقشه\u200cبندی نقشه\u200cبندی نقشه\u200cبندی نقشه\u200cبندی، کلاس\u200cبندی\u200cهای چندین مرحله و نقشه\u200cبندی\u200cها را مشخص می\u200cکند. برای کلاس\u200cشناسی چند کلاس، BioBERT بر روی مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای ویژه\u200cی ما خوب تنظیم شده است. نقشه\u200cسازی کلاس\u200cها به نقشه\u200cهای برچسب\u200cها توسط یک مقایسه\u200cکننده (SVC) بر هر گروه\u200cای کاربرد می\u200cشود. ما همچنین قدم\u200cهایی برای تولید مجموعه داده\u200cهای خودکار از توضیح\u200cهای متن را با کدهای SNOMED CT بر اساس داده\u200cهای عمومی و داده\u200cهای باز ارتباط می\u200cدهیم. برای حل با مشکلی که مجموعه داده\u200cهای ما بسیار نابرابر است، برخی از روش افزایش داده\u200cها کاربرد می\u200cشوند. نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایشات انجام شده دقیق و قابلیت بالا از دستور ما برای پیش\u200cبینی از کدهای CT SNOMED ارتباط به یک متن کلینیک نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'id': 'Konsep normalisasi teks klinis ke klasifikasi medis standar dan ontologi adalah tugas yang sangat penting untuk perawatan kesehatan dan penelitian medis. Kami mencoba untuk memecahkan masalah ini melalui pengekodan otomatis SNOMED CT, di mana SNOMED CT adalah salah satu terma klinis yang paling digunakan dan komprensif. Menggunakan model dasar Belajar Dalam, bagaimanapun, menyebabkan hasil yang tidak diinginkan karena sifat tidak seimbang data dan jumlah ekstrim kelas. Kami mengusulkan prosedur klasifikasi yang mengandung aliran kerja berbagai langkah yang terdiri dari berkumpul label, berkumpul berkumpul-berkumpul, dan peta berkumpul-ke-label. Untuk klasifikasi multikelompok, BioBERT telah disesuaikan dengan baik atas set data kita sendiri. The clusters-to-labels mapping is carried out by a one-vs-all classifier (SVC) applied to every single cluster.  Kami juga mempersembahkan langkah untuk generasi dataset otomatis deskripsi teks yang dicatat dengan kode CT SNOMED berdasarkan data publik dan data terbuka terhubung. Untuk mengatasi masalah bahwa dataset kita sangat tidak seimbang, beberapa metode peningkatan data diterapkan. Hasil dari eksperimen yang dilakukan menunjukkan akurasi dan kepercayaan tinggi pendekatan kita untuk prediksi kode SNOMED CT yang relevan untuk teks klinis.', 'sq': 'Koncepti normalizimi i teksteve klinike ndaj klasifikimeve dhe ontologjive mjekësore standarde është një detyrë me rëndësi të lartë për kujdesin shëndetësor dhe kërkimin mjekësor. Ne përpiqemi të zgjidhim këtë problem nëpërmjet kodimit automatik të SNOMED CT, ku SNOMED CT është një nga ontologjitë më të përdorura dhe më të përgjithshme të termit klinik. Aplikimi i modeleve bazë të Mësimit të thellë, megjithatë, çon në rezultate të padëshirueshme për shkak të natyrës së paekuilibruar të të dhënave dhe numrit ekstrem të klasave. Ne propozojmë një procedurë klasifikimi që përmban një rrjedhje pune me hapa të shumta që përbëhet nga klasifikimi i etiketave, klasifikimi i grupeve të shumta dhe hartimi i grupeve në etiketa. Për klasifikimin e grupeve të shumta, BioBERT është i rregulluar në bazë të të dhënave tona të personalizuara. hartimi i grupeve në etiketa kryehet nga një klasifikues i një-kundër të gjithë (SVC) i aplikuar në çdo grup. Ne prezantojmë gjithashtu hapat për gjenerimin automatik të të dhënave të përshkrimeve tekstuale të anotuara me kodet SNOMED CT bazuar në të dhënat publike dhe të dhënat e lidhura të hapura. Me qëllim që të përballemi me problemin që grupi ynë i të dhënave është shumë i paekuilibruar, zbatohen disa metoda rritjeje të të dhënave. Rezultatet nga eksperimentet e kryera tregojnë saktësi të lartë dhe besueshmëri të qasjes sonë për parashikimin e kodeve SNOMED CT të rëndësishme për një tekst klinik.', 'am': 'የፕኒኪሎን ጽሑፎች ማቀናቀል ለድምህርት መግለጫ እና ኦኖሎጂ ለመፈወስ ጤና እና ለመፈወስ ጥናት እጅግ አስቸጋሪ ስራ ነው፡፡ የSNOMED CT (SNOMED CT) በተጠቃሚ እና በጠቅላላ ግንኙነት የግልጾች ግንኙነት አንዱ ሲሆን የዚህን ጉዳይ አካባቢ የSNOMED CT ኮድ ማፍለስ እንሞክራለን፡፡ የጥልቅ ትምህርት ዓይነቶችን በመጠቀም፣ ዳራዎችን እና ተጨማሪ ክፍተቶችን በማይችል ፍሬዎች ይሄዳል፡፡ የጽሑፍ ቅድመት፣ የብዙው ቅድመት ክፍተት እና የጽሑፎች ማህበረሰብ እና የቅድመ-ወደ-ምልክት ማህበረሰብ የሚያስፈልገውን የክፍለ ሥርዓት ማቀናቀል እናሳስባታለን፡፡ ለብዙው ጉዳይ መግለጫ ቢዮBERT በተለየ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም የተሻለ ነው፡፡ የጭብጥ ደረጃዎች መክፈቻዎች በአንድ-ሁሉንም መተላለፊያ (SVC) በሁሉም ጉዳይ ላይ ይደረጋሉ፡፡ በህዝብ ዳታ እና የተከፈቱት ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም የSNOMED CT ኮዶች የተገኘውን የጽሑፍ ትክክለቶችን የዳታ አካሄዶችን አቀረብናለን፡፡ ዳታቤችን እጅግ ያልተካሄደውን መከራ ለመቀላቀል፣ አንዳንዶቹ የዳታ ማጠቃለያ ዘዴዎች ይጠቅማል፡፡ በተፈተናው ፈተናዎች ውጤቶች የደረጃ እርግጠኛ እና የሥርዓታችንን መጠቀሚያ እና የስNOMED CT ጽሑፎችን ለመፍጠር የተጠቃሚ ጽሑፍ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'Kliniki metinlerin standart lukmançylyk klasifikasyna we ontologiýa düzenlemesi saglyk we lukmançy araştyrmalary üçin gaty möhüm zady. Biz bu meseleni otomatik SNOMED CT ködlemeleri bilen çözmek synanyşýarys. SNOMED CT iň uly ullanýan we daňlap kliniki termynyň biri. Ancak temel derin öwrenmek nusgalaryny uygulamak, hatlaryň we klaslaryň iň baýramçylygy sebäbi göz ýeterli netijelere gidýär. Biz klasifikasyon procedesini teklif edip, etiket clusterini, multiple-cluster klasifikasyonu we cluster-to-etiketlerden oluşan bir şekilde görkezmek üçin teklif edip bileris. Birnäçe-kluster klasifikasiýasy üçin BioBERT biziň häzirki datajämiz üstünde düzeldi. Häzirki üçin ýeke görkezilýän cluster-to-etitler kartasy bilen ýene bir görkezilýän derejesi bar. Biz hem mekdepler SNOMED CT ködleri bilen daýanýan we açyk maglumaty daýanýan otomatik veri setirmeleri üçin basýarys. Veri setimizin derecede çözmesi üçin, bazı veri yükselme yöntemleri uygulandyrylýar. Döredilen deneyleriň netijesi SNOMED CT kodlarynyň kliniki metinyne degişli ýagdaýymyzyň has dogrylygyny we ynamlylygyny görkezýär.', 'sw': 'Kuzuia utaratibu wa maandishi ya kliniki kwa ajili ya kutangaza vifaa vya kitabibu na utafiti wa afya ni kazi yenye umuhimu mkubwa wa afya na utafiti wa afya. Tunajaribu kutatua tatizo hili kwa njia ya utambulisho wa CT binafsi wa SNOMED, ambapo CT ni moja wapo ya matumizi makubwa zaidi na muhula wa kina. Kutumia mifano ya msingi ya kujifunza, hata hivyo, yanapelekea matokeo yasiyo na hatia kutokana na asili ya taarifa na idadi kubwa ya darasa. Tunazipendekeza mchakato wa kutangazwa unaoonesha mvua ya hatua nyingi za kazi ikiwa ni pamoja na michoro ya viungo, usambazaji wa vifaa vingi, na ramani ya mabango ya mabango. Kwa kutangaza vifaa vingi vingi, BioBERT imewekwa vizuri kwenye seti ya taarifa zetu za kawaida. The clusters-to-labels mapping is carried out by a one-vs-all classifier (SVC) applied to every single cluster.  Pia tunaweka hatua za kutengeneza taarifa za kujitegemea za maelezo ya maandishi yanayochapishwa na sheria za SNOMED za CT kwa kutumia taarifa za umma na taarifa za wazi. Ili kukabiliana na tatizo ambalo seti yetu ya taarifa hazina usawa sana, baadhi ya njia za kuongeza data zinatumiwa. Matokeo ya majaribio yaliyoendeshwa yanaonyesha ukweli wa juu na uaminifu wa namna yetu ya kutabiri sheria za SNOMED za CT zinazohusiana na ujumbe wa kliniki.', 'hy': 'Կլինիկական տեքստերի նորմալիզացիան ստանդարտ բժշկական դասակարգումների և օնտոլոգիաների համար շատ կարևոր խնդիր է առողջապահության և բժշկական հետազոտությունների համար: We attempt to solve this problem through automatic SNOMED CT encoding, where SNOMED CT is one of the most widely used and comprehensive clinical term ontologies.  Այնուամենայնիվ, հիմնական խորը ուսումնասիրության մոդելների կիրառումը հանգեցնում է անցանկանալի արդյունքների, որոնք հանգեցվում են տվյալների անհավասարակշռության բնույթի և դասերի ծայրահեղ քանակի պատճառով: Մենք առաջարկում ենք դասակարգման գործընթաց, որը ունի բազմաքային աշխատանքի հոսք, որը կազմված է պիտակների խմբավորումներից, բազմախմբավորումներից և խմբավորումներից մինչև պիտակներ քարտեզագրելուց: Բազմախմբերի դասակարգման համար, Բիոբերթը լավ է կազմված մեր հատուկ տվյալների համակարգում: Կլաստերներ-պիտակների քարտեզագրումը կատարվում է մեկ-առ-բոլոր դասակարգչի (VC) միջոցով, որը կիրառվում է յուրաքանչյուր կլաստերի վրա: Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք այնպիսի քայլեր, որոնց միջոցով ստեղծվում են ավտոմատիկ տվյալների համակարգ տեքստալ նկարագրություններ, որոնք գրված են ՍՆՕՄԵԴ CT-կոդներով, հիմնված հանրային տվյալների և կապված բաց Այն խնդիրը լուծելու համար, որ մեր տվյալների համակարգը չափազանց անհավասարակշռություն ունի, որոշ տվյալների բարձրացման մեթոդներ են կիրառում: Աշխատեցված փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս մեր մոտեցումների ճշգրիտությունը և վստահությունը սնոմեդ թ.Թ.Թ. կոդի կանխատեսման համար, որոնք կարևոր են կլինիկական տեքստին:', 'bn': 'স্বাস্থ্য সেবা এবং চিকিৎসা গবেষণার জন্য বেশী গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ। আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে SNOMED CT এনকোডিং এর মাধ্যমে এই সমস্যাটি সমাধান করার চেষ্টা করছি, যেখানে SNOMED CT হচ্ছে সবচেয়ে ব্যবহৃত এবং সম্পূর্ণ ক্লিনিকি কিন্তু মৌলিক গভীর শিক্ষা মডেল প্রয়োগ করা হচ্ছে তথ্যের অসম্পূর্ণ প্রকৃতি এবং অনেক ক্লাসের সংখ্যার কারণে। আমরা একটি ক্লাস্টাফিকেশন প্রক্রিয়া প্রস্তাব করি যা লেবেল ক্লাস্টারিং, বহুক্লাস্টার ক্লাসাফিকেশন এবং ক্লাস্টার-থেকে লেবেল ম্যাপিং এর মধ মাল্টিক ক্লাস্টারের ক্লাসাফিকেশনের জন্য বিওবের্ট আমাদের স্বনির্বাচিত তথ্যের ব্যাপারে ভালো সুন ক্লাস্টার-থেকে লেবেল ম্যাপ প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে প্রত্যেক ক্লাস্টারের প্রতিটি ক্লাস্টারে। এছাড়াও আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ডাটাসেট প্রজন্মের পদক্ষেপ উপস্থাপন করি যা পাবলিক তথ্য এবং সংযুক্ত তথ্যের ভিত্তিতে স্নোমেড সি আমাদের ডাটাসেট অত্যন্ত অসম্পূর্ণ সমস্যার সাথে মুক্ত করার জন্য, কিছু তথ্য যুক্ত করার পদ্ধতি প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে। অনুষ্ঠিত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদক্ষেপের উচ্চ সঠিক এবং বিশ্বস্তির বিষয়টি দেখাচ্ছে একটি ক্লিনিকিল ল লেখার সাথে', 'af': "Koncepsie normalisering van kliniske teks na standaard mediese klasifikasies en ontologies is 'n taak met hoë belangrikheid vir gesondige sorg en mediese forsoek. Ons probeer om hierdie probleem te los deur outomatiese SNOMED CT-kodering, waar SNOMED CT is een van die mees vaste gebruik en kompleksies kliniske term ontologies. Die toepassing van basiese diep leer modele lei tog na ongewendige resultate vanweë die onbalanseerde natuur van die data en die ekstreme aantal klasse. Ons voorstel 'n klasifikasie prosedure wat 'n veelvuldige stap werksvloei bevat wat bestaan van etiket clustering, multi- cluster klasifikasie en clusters- to- labels kaart. Vir multi-cluster klasifikasie, BioBERT is fyn-tuned oor ons pasmaak datastel. Die klasters- na- etikette kaart word uitgevoer deur 'n een- teen- al klassifiseerder (SVC) toegepas na elke enkele klaster. Ons het ook die stappe voorgestel vir outomatiese datastel generasie van tekstuele beskrywings wat met SNOMED CT kodes gebaseer is op publieke data en gekoppel oop data. Om te kopeer met die probleem dat ons datastel baie onbalanse is, is sommige data augmentasie metodes aangepas. Die resultate van die gedoende eksperimente vertoon hoë presisie en betroubaarheid van ons toegang vir voorskou van SNOMED CT kodes wat betrokke aan 'n kliniese teks.", 'cs': 'Koncepční normalizace klinických textů do standardních lékařských klasifikací a ontologií je úkolem s vysokým významem pro zdravotnictví a lékařský výzkum. Tento problém se snažíme vyřešit pomocí automatického kódování SNOMED CT, kde SNOMED CT je jednou z nejpoužívanějších a nejkomplexnějších klinických termínových ontologií. Aplikace základních modelů Deep Learning však vede k nežádoucím výsledkům kvůli nevyvážené povaze dat a extrémnímu počtu tříd. Navrhujeme klasifikační postup, který obsahuje vícekrokový pracovní postup sestávající z clusterování štítků, klasifikace více clusterů a mapování clusterů na štítky. Pro klasifikaci více clusterů je BioBERT jemně vyladěn na naší vlastní sadě dat. Mapování clusterů na štítky je prováděno klasifikátorem jednorázového klasifikátoru (SVC) aplikovaným na každý cluster. Dále uvádíme kroky pro automatické generování datových sad textových popisů anotovaných kódy SNOMED CT na základě veřejných dat a propojených otevřených dat. Abychom se vypořádali s problémem, že naše datová sada je vysoce nevyvážená, používají se některé metody rozšíření dat. Výsledky provedených experimentů ukazují vysokou přesnost a spolehlivost našeho přístupu k predikci SNOMED CT kódů relevantních pro klinický text.', 'et': 'Kliiniliste tekstide normaliseerimine standardsetele meditsiinilistele klassifikatsioonidele ja ontoloogiatele on tervishoiu ja meditsiiniliste uuringute jaoks väga oluline ülesanne. Püüame seda probleemi lahendada automaatse SNOMED CT kodeerimise kaudu, kus SNOMED CT on üks laialdaselt kasutatavamaid ja terviklikumaid kliinilisi termineid ontoloogiad. Põhiliste sügavõppe mudelite rakendamine toob aga kaasa ebasoovitavaid tulemusi andmete tasakaalustamatu olemuse ja klasside äärmise arvu tõttu. Pakume välja klassifitseerimisprotseduuri, mis hõlmab mitmeastmelist töövoogu, mis koosneb sildiklastritest, mitmest klastrist ja klastrist sildiks kaardistamisest. Mitme klastri klastri klassifitseerimiseks on BioBERT täpselt häälestatud meie kohandatud andmekogumi kaudu. Klastrite ja siltide kaardistamine viiakse läbi iga klastri suhtes rakendatava ühe vs kõigi klastri klastri (SVC) abil. Samuti tutvustame SNOMED CT koodidega annoteeritud tekstikirjelduste automaatset genereerimist avalikel andmetel ja seotud avatud andmetel. Selleks et toime tulla probleemiga, et meie andmekogum on väga tasakaalustatud, rakendatakse mõningaid andmete suurendamise meetodeid. Teostatud katsete tulemused näitavad meie lähenemisviisi kõrget täpsust ja usaldusväärsust SNOMED CT koodide prognoosimisel kliinilises tekstis.', 'fi': 'Kliinisten tekstien käsitteellinen normalisointi lääketieteellisiin luokituksiin ja ontologioihin on terveydenhuollon ja lääketieteellisen tutkimuksen kannalta erittäin tärkeä tehtävä. Yritämme ratkaista ongelman automaattisella SNOMED CT -koodauksella, jossa SNOMED CT on yksi yleisimmistä ja kattavimmista kliinisistä ontologioista. Syväoppimisen perusmallien soveltaminen johtaa kuitenkin ei-toivottuihin tuloksiin datan epätasapainon ja luokkamäärän äärimmäisyyden vuoksi. Ehdotamme luokitusmenettelyä, jossa on monivaiheinen työnkulku, joka koostuu tarraklusteroinnista, usean klusterin luokittelusta ja klustereista tunnisteisiin -kartoituksesta. Moniklusterin luokittelua varten BioBERT on hienosäädetty mukautetun datajoukon päälle. Clusters-to-label -kartoitus suoritetaan jokaiselle klusterille sovelletulla yksi vs-all -luokittimella (SVC). Esittelemme myös vaiheet automaattiseen aineiston tuottamiseen SNOMED CT-koodeilla merkityillä tekstikuvauksilla julkiseen dataan ja linkitettyyn avoimeen dataan perustuvilla tekstikuvauksilla. Jotta voitaisiin selviytyä ongelmasta, jonka mukaan aineistomme on erittäin epätasapainoinen, käytetään joitakin datan lisäämismenetelmiä. Kokeiden tulokset osoittavat kliinisen tekstin kannalta merkityksellisten SNOMED CT-koodien ennustamisen korkean tarkkuuden ja luotettavuuden.', 'az': 'Standardlı tıbbi klasifikasiya və ontologiya üçün kliniki mətnlərin nəzəriyyəti normal etməsi sağlam təhsil və tıbbi təhsil üçün yüksək məlumatdır. Biz bu problemi avtomatik SNOMED CT kodlaması vasitəsilə çəkməyə çalışırıq. SNOMED CT ən geniş istifadə edilən və bütün kliniki termin ontologiyalarından biridir. Ancaq temel derin öyrənmə modellərini istifadə etmək məlumatların və dəstələrin aşırı sayısına görə gözləməz nəticələrə yol göstərir. Biz bir klasifikasiya prosedüsini təbliğ edirik ki, etiketli clustering, çoxlu klasifikasyon və cluster-to-etiketlər haritasından oluşan çoxlu adım çalışma akışını təsdiqləyir. Multi-cluster klasifikasiyası üçün BioBERT bizim hökmümüz verilən qurğumuz üstündə təmizlənir. Hər dəstəyə uyğulanmış bir klasifikatçı (SVC) ilə birlikdə müəyyən edilmişdir. Biz də SNOMED CT kodları ilə bildirilmiş məlumatların və açıq məlumatların bağlı məlumatlarına dayanan avtomatik verilər qurulması üçün adımları göstəririk. Məlumatlarımızın çox balansız olduğu problem ə çəkmək üçün, bazı məlumatları artırma metodları istifadə edilir. SNOMED CT kodlarını kliniki metinlə əlaqəli olan tədbirlərin sonuçları yüksək doğruluğu və təvəkküllüyünü göstərər.', 'bs': 'Konceptivna normalizacija kliničkih tekstova standardnim medicinskim klasifikacijama i ontologijama je zadatak sa visokom važnošću za zdravstveno-medicinsko istraživanje. Pokušavamo riješiti ovaj problem putem automatskog kodiranja SNOMED CT-a, gdje je SNOMED CT jedan od najširom korištenijih i sveobuhvatnijih kliničkih terminova ontologija. Međutim, primjenjivanje osnovnih modela dubokog učenja vodi do neverovatnih rezultata zbog nepravednosti prirode podataka i ekstremnog broja klasa. Predlažemo klasifikacijsku proceduru koja uključuje višestruki korak radnog toka koji se sastoji od skupljanja etiketa, klasifikacije višestrukih klasera i mapiranja klasera do etiketa. Za multiklasičnu klasifikaciju, BioBERT je dobro sređen nad našim običnim podacima. Mapiranje klastara na etikete provede je jedna protiv svih klasifikatora (SVC) primjena na svaki skup. Također predstavljamo korake za automatsku generaciju kompleta podataka tekstualnih opisa annotiranih kodovima SNOMED CT-a na temelju javnih podataka i povezanih otvorenih podataka. Da bi se riješio problema s kojim je naša kompleta podataka vrlo nepravedno, primjenjena su neke metode povećanja podataka. Rezultati provođenih eksperimenata pokazuju visoku preciznost i pouzdanost našeg pristupa za predviđanje kodova SNOMED CT relevantnih kliničkom tekstu.', 'ca': "La normalització del concepte de textos clínics a classificacions mèdiques i ontologies està una tasca de gran importància per a la sanitat i la recerca mèdica. Intentem resoldre aquest problema a través de la codificació automàtica SNOMED CT, on SNOMED CT és una de les ontologies clíniques més utilitzades i completas. Però aplicar models bàsics d'aprenentatge profund, porta a resultats indesiderats degut a la naturalesa desequilibrada de les dades i al nombre extrem de classes. Proposem un procediment de classificació que té un flux de treball de múltiples etapes consistint en agrupament d'etiquetes, classificació de múltiples agrupaments i mapeament agrupaments a etiquetes. Per a la classificació de grups múltiples, BioBERT està perfeccionat sobre el nostre conjunt de dades personalitzat. El mapatge de grups a etiquetes es fa per un classificador únic contra tot (SVC) aplicat a cada grup. També presentem les etapes de generació automàtica de conjunts de dades de descripcions textuals anotats amb codis CT SNOMED basats en dades públices i dades obertes vinculades. In order to cope with the problem that our dataset is highly unbalanced, some data augmentation methods are applied.  Els resultats dels experiments efectuats mostran alta precisió i fiabilitat del nostre enfocament per a predir codis CT SNOMED rellevants a un text clínic.", 'he': 'הרעיון נורמליזציה של טקסטים קליניים לקlassifications רפואיות סטנדרטיות ואונטולוגיות הוא משימה עם חשיבות גבוהה לטיפול בריאות ומחקר רפואי. אנחנו מנסים לפתור את הבעיה הזאת באמצעות הקוד אוטומטי של סי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי.טי Applying basic Deep Learning models, however, leads to undesirable results due to the unbalanced nature of the data and the extreme number of classes.  אנו מציעים תהליך מסווג שמכיל זרם עבודה במספר צעדים שמכיל מסווג תוויות, מסווג של מסווגים רבים, ומפיות מסווגים לתוויות. For multi-cluster classification, BioBERT is fine-tuned over our custom dataset.  המפית של הקלאסטרים לתוויות מבצעת על ידי קלאסטר אחד נגד כולם (SVC) שמשתמש לכל הקלאסטר. אנחנו גם מציגים את השלבים לדורת קבוצת נתונים אוטומטית של תיאורים טקסטאליים שנעטפו עם קודים SNOMED CT מבוססים על נתונים ציבוריים וקשורים נתונים פתוחים. In order to cope with the problem that our dataset is highly unbalanced, some data augmentation methods are applied.  The results from the conducted experiments show high accuracy and reliability of our approach for prediction of SNOMED CT codes relevant to a clinical text.', 'ha': "Ka kawai tsararin littãfin da aka ƙayyade zuwa fassarar takarda na madaidaici da ontoloji, yana da wani aikin muhimmi mai amfani ga ruwan zartar da waraka da kuma ma'abũcin afya. Munã jarraba solar wannan mataimaki a bayan kodi na SNAMED AT farat ɗaya, inda SNAMED AT ta zama daga ɗayan masu shimfiɗaɗewa da jumla na muhalli na ƙayyade. Aka amfani da misalin Hakima Kidep, amma, yana ƙara wa matsala wanda ba za'a yi ba da inganci wa tsarin data da yawan darafõfi mai girma. Tuna goyya da wani aikin fasalar da ke ƙayyade tafiyar aiki guda-dabam mai yawa wanda ke sami cikin shirin ayuka, mai fassarar-multi-clust, da kartoni-zuwa-labels. @ info: whatsthis The clusters-to-labels mapping is carried out by a one-vs-all classifier (SVC) applied to every single cluster.  Tuna halatar da hanyõyin wajen tsarin da aka daidaita danne-danne farat ɗaya da tsarin littafan misãlai da aka sanar da su da SNAMED AT-koden da aka samu da kuma da haɗi da data masu buɗe. Dõmin ya samu matsayin da tsarin danne-danne za'a sãɓa, an amfani da wasu shiryoyin augutarwa ga data. Faramarra daga jarrabai da aka aiko yana nũna wa tsari mai girma da aminci ga hanyarmu wa gabanin kodin SNAMED da matsayin ta yi amfani da matsayin kifi.", 'sk': 'Normalizacija koncepta kliničnih besedil v standardne medicinske klasifikacije in ontologije je naloga, ki je zelo pomembna za zdravstvene in medicinske raziskave. Ta problem poskušamo rešiti z avtomatskim SNOMED CT kodiranjem, kjer je SNOMED CT ena najbolj uporabljenih in celovitih kliničnih terminov ontologij. Uporaba osnovnih modelov globokega učenja pa vodi do neželenih rezultatov zaradi neuravnotežene narave podatkov in ekstremnega števila razredov. Predlagamo postopek razvrščanja, ki vključuje potek dela v več korakih, ki vključuje gručenje oznak, klasifikacijo več grozdov in kartiranje grozdov na oznake. Za razvrščanje več grozdov je BioBERT natančno nastavljen nad našim naborom podatkov po meri. Kartiranje grozdov na oznake izvaja klasifikator ena proti vsem (SVC), ki se uporablja za vsak grozd. Predstavljamo tudi korake za avtomatsko generiranje nabora podatkov besedilnih opisov z oznakami SNOMED CT, ki temeljijo na javnih podatkih in povezanih odprtih podatkih. Za soočanje s problemom, da je naš nabor podatkov zelo neuravnotežen, se uporabljajo nekatere metode povečanja podatkov. Rezultati izvedenih poskusov kažejo visoko natančnost in zanesljivost našega pristopa za napovedovanje SNOMED CT kod, pomembnih za klinično besedilo.', 'bo': 'རྨན་གཞུང་གི་ཐིག་རིམ་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་SNOMED CT་ཡིག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཀོད་པ་ལས་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལྟ་བྱེད་པར་དཔའ་བཅས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཉེར་སྤྱོད་བྱས་ན་རྨན་གཞི་རྩལ་བའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱང་ཉེས་བ་ཡིན་པས། གནད་དོན་ཡིག་འཕྲིན་དང་གྲངས་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆེ་ We propose a classification procedure that features a multiple-step workflow consisting of label clustering, multi-cluster classification, and clusters-to-labels mapping. དབྱེ་རིམ་མང་གསོག་ཅིག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་ཆེ་བས། BioBERT དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་རང་བཟོས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག The clusters-to-labels mapping is carried out by a one-vs-all classifier (SVC) applied to each cluster. We also present the steps for automatic dataset generation of textual descriptions annotated with SNOMED CT codes based on public data and linked open data. འུ་ཅག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་དེ་འདྲ་བཤུས་བྱེད་པར་ང་ཚོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་སྒྲིག་ཆས་འདི་རྒྱ་ཆེ་མཐོང་མེད་པར། ངལ་ཚོགས་བྱས་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་མཐོ་རྣམས་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་བདེ་འཇགས་དང་རྟོན་རུང་བ་སྟོན་ཐུབ།', 'jv': 'Ngawe Awak dhéwé gewis beraksi perusahaan kanggo ngilangno nggawe boten iki ning automatik kanggo koding KNOMED " politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Define politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness clusters-to-label Anyone Digawe kanggo nggunakake perkoro sing ngomong nik dataset iki dadi ora bisa balanci, supoyo sistem dadi yang ngerasakno Rejaleng nggawe perintah sing gagale mungkar nggawe kesalakno lan nglanggar sampeyan kanggo ngerasai CNOMED Cdromok sing adilah kanggo teks klènik.'}
{'en': 'Transfer Learning for Czech Historical Named Entity Recognition', 'pt': 'Transferência de Aprendizagem para Reconhecimento de Entidade Nomeada Histórica Tcheca', 'ar': 'نقل التعلم من أجل التعرف على الكيان التاريخي المشهور في التشيك', 'fr': "Apprentissage par transfert pour la reconnaissance d'entité nommée historique tchèque", 'es': 'Transferir el aprendizaje para el reconocimiento histórico de entidades nombradas', 'ja': 'チェコの歴史的な名前付きエンティティ認識のための転送学習', 'zh': '捷克史名实体者迁学', 'ru': 'Передача обучения для признания Чешской исторической именованной сущности', 'hi': 'चेक ऐतिहासिक नामित इकाई मान्यता के लिए स्थानांतरण अधिगम', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Aistrithe le haghaidh Aitheantas Aonáin Ainmnithe Stairiúil na Seice', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μάθηση μεταφοράς για την αναγνώριση ιστορικού Ονόματος της Τσεχικής Δημοκρατίας', 'hu': 'Transzfer tanulás a cseh történelmi nevezett entitás elismeréséhez', 'it': 'Trasferimento di apprendimento per il riconoscimento di entità con nome storico ceco', 'lt': 'Mokymasis perkelti į Čekijos istorinio pavadinimo subjekto pripažinimą', 'mk': 'Преносно учење за признавање на чешки историски именуван ентитет', 'kk': 'Чех тарихлық аталған нысандардың оқытуы', 'ms': 'Pemindahan Belajar untuk Pengenalan Entiti bernama Sejarah Czech', 'no': 'Overføringslæring for Tsjekkisk historisk gjenkjenning', 'pl': 'Transfer Learning dla czeskiego historycznego uznawania podmiotów o nazwie historycznej', 'ml': 'ചെക്ക് ചരിത്രത്തിലെ ചരിത്രത്തിലെ പേരിന്റെ എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് മാ', 'ro': 'Transfer de învățare pentru recunoașterea entității cu denumire istorică cehă', 'mn': 'Түүхний Түүхэн нэрлэгдсэн Нэгтийн Тодорхойлолтын Трансфер суралцах', 'mt': 'Tagħlim ta’ Trasferiment għar-Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija Storikament Ċeka', 'sv': 'Transfer Learning för tjeckiska historiska namngivna enheter erkännande', 'sr': 'Prebacivanje učenja češkog istorijskog priznanja imenovanog entiteta', 'so': 'Ku wareejinta waxbarashada Czech Historical Named Entity Recognition', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'செக் வரலாற்று வரலாறு பெயரிடப்பட்ட உருப்படியை கண்டறிதலுக்கு மாற்று', 'ur': 'چک کی تاریخی کا نام رکھا ہوا انٹیٹی پتپذیرش کے لئے ترنسفر سیکھنا', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Truyền giáo truyền học cho người Tài chính Séc được biết đến.', 'bg': 'Прехвърляне на обучение за признаване на чешко историческо наименувано лице', 'nl': 'Transfer Learning voor Tsjechische historische naamsbekendheid', 'hr': 'Prebacivanje učenja češkog povijesnog priznanja imenovanog područja', 'da': 'Overførsel af læring til tjekkisk historisk navngivet enhed anerkendelse', 'de': 'Transfer Learning für die Anerkennung historischer benannter Entitäten in Tschechien', 'ko': '체코 역사명명 실체 식별의 이동 학습', 'id': 'Transfer Learning for Czech Historical Named Entity Recognition', 'fa': 'انتقال یادگیری برای شناسایی اجزای تاریخی چک نامیده شده', 'sw': 'Kubadilisha Ufundisho kwa ajili ya Kizech Historical Named Entity Recognition', 'tr': 'Çehiýa Taýry Adlanylan Entity Tanamak üçin öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Mësimi i transferimit për njohjen e njësisë me emër historik çeke', 'af': 'Oordrag Leer vir Tsjechse Historiese Genaamde Entiteit Herkenning', 'am': 'Historical Named Entity Recognition', 'hy': 'Չեքսի պատմական անվանումների ճանաչելու ուսումնասիրությունը', 'az': '칂톛k Tarihi Adl캼 Entity Recognition 칲칞칲n 칐yr톛nm톛', 'bn': 'Transfer Learning for Czech Historical Named Entity Recognition', 'bs': 'Prebacivanje učenja za priznanje češkog istorijskog imenovanog entiteta', 'et': 'Tšehhi ajaloolise nimega üksuse tunnustamise ülekandmine', 'ca': 'Transfer Learning for Czech Historical Named Entity Recognition', 'cs': 'Transfer Learning pro uznání českých historických jmenovaných entit', 'fi': 'Siirto-oppiminen Tšekin historiallisen nimetyn yksikön tunnustamista varten', 'jv': 'Layout', 'sk': 'Prenos učenja za priznavanje češkega zgodovinskega imenovanega subjekta', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': "לימוד העברה עבור זיהוי איכות בשם היסטורי צ'קי", 'bo': 'གནས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ནི་ཅེག་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་མིང་དང་ཆ་རྟོགས་པ'}
{'en': 'Nowadays, named entity recognition (NER) achieved excellent results on the standard corpora. However, big issues are emerging with a need for an application in a specific domain, because it requires a suitable annotated corpus with adapted NE tag-set. This is particularly evident in the historical document processing field. The main goal of this paper consists of proposing and evaluation of several transfer learning methods to increase the score of the Czech historical NER. We study several information sources, and we use two neural nets for NE modeling and recognition. We employ two corpora for evaluation of our transfer learning methods, namely Czech named entity corpus and Czech historical named entity corpus. We show that BERT representation with fine-tuning and only the simple classifier trained on the union of corpora achieves excellent results.', 'pt': 'Atualmente, o reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas (NER) alcança excelentes resultados nos corpora padrão. No entanto, grandes problemas estão surgindo com a necessidade de uma aplicação em um domínio específico, pois requer um corpus anotado adequado com um conjunto de tags NE adaptado. Isso é particularmente evidente no campo de processamento de documentos históricos. O principal objetivo deste artigo consiste em propor e avaliar vários métodos de aprendizagem por transferência para aumentar a pontuação do NER histórico tcheco. Estudamos várias fontes de informação e usamos duas redes neurais para modelagem e reconhecimento de EN. Empregamos dois corpora para avaliação de nossos métodos de aprendizagem por transferência, a saber, corpus de entidade nomeado tcheco e corpus de entidade nomeado histórico tcheco. Mostramos que a representação BERT com ajuste fino e apenas o classificador simples treinado na união de corpora alcança excelentes resultados.', 'fr': "De nos jours, la reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) a obtenu d'excellents résultats sur les corpus standard. Cependant, de grands problèmes apparaissent avec le besoin d'une application dans un domaine spécifique, car elle nécessite un corpus annoté approprié avec un ensemble de balises NE adapté. Cela est particulièrement évident dans le domaine du traitement des documents historiques. L'objectif principal de cet article est de proposer et d'évaluer plusieurs méthodes d'apprentissage par transfert afin d'augmenter le score du NER historique tchèque. Nous étudions plusieurs sources d'information et nous utilisons deux réseaux neuronaux pour la modélisation et la reconnaissance de l'NE. Nous utilisons deux corpus pour l'évaluation de nos méthodes d'apprentissage par transfert, à savoir le corpus d'entités nommées en tchèque et le corpus d'entités nommées historiques tchèques. Nous montrons que la représentation BERT avec réglage fin et seul le classificateur simple formé à l'union de corpus permet d'obtenir d'excellents résultats.", 'es': 'Hoy en día, el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) logró excelentes resultados en los corpus estándar. Sin embargo, están surgiendo grandes problemas con la necesidad de una aplicación en un dominio específico, porque requiere un corpus anotado adecuado con un conjunto de etiquetas NE adaptado. Esto es particularmente evidente en el campo del procesamiento de documentos históricos. El objetivo principal de este artículo consiste en proponer y evaluar varios métodos de aprendizaje por transferencia para aumentar la puntuación de la NER histórica checa. Estudiamos varias fuentes de información y utilizamos dos redes neuronales para el modelado y el reconocimiento de NE. Empleamos dos corpus para la evaluación de nuestros métodos de aprendizaje de transferencia, a saber, el corpus de entidades con nombre checo y el corpus de entidades con nombre histórico checo. Demostramos que la representación de BERT con ajuste fino y solo el simple clasificador entrenado en la unión de cuerpos logra excelentes resultados.', 'ar': 'في الوقت الحاضر ، حقق التعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER) نتائج ممتازة في الهيئة المعيارية. ومع ذلك ، تظهر مشكلات كبيرة مع الحاجة إلى تطبيق في مجال معين ، لأنها تتطلب مجموعة مشروحة مناسبة مع مجموعة علامات NE المعدلة. هذا واضح بشكل خاص في مجال معالجة المستندات التاريخية. يتمثل الهدف الرئيسي من هذه الورقة في اقتراح وتقييم عدة طرق لتعليم النقل لزيادة درجة معدل صافي الدخل القومي التشيكي. ندرس العديد من مصادر المعلومات ، ونستخدم شبكتين عصبيتين لنمذجة NE والتعرف عليها. نحن نوظف مجموعتين لتقييم أساليب التعلم الخاصة بنا ، وهما مجموعة الكيانات التشيكية المسمى والكيان التاريخي المسمى التشيكي. نظهر أن تمثيل BERT مع الضبط الدقيق وأن المصنف البسيط فقط المدرب على اتحاد الشركات يحقق نتائج ممتازة.', 'ja': '今日では、名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）は標準体で優れた結果を達成しました。しかし、適応されたNEタグセットを備えた適切な注釈付きコーパスを必要とするため、特定のドメインでのアプリケーションの必要性に関する大きな問題が発生しています。これは、歴史的文書処理分野で特に顕著である。本論文の主な目的は、チェコの歴史的NERのスコアを上げるためのいくつかの転送学習方法を提案し、評価することである。私たちはいくつかの情報源を研究し、NEモデリングと認識に2つのニューラルネットを使用しています。当社は、転送学習方法の評価のために2つのコーパ、すなわちチェコ名のエンティティコーパスとチェコ名の歴史的エンティティコーパスを採用しています。BERT表現を微調整し、コーパの結合について訓練された単純な分類子のみが優れた結果を達成することを示しています。', 'hi': 'आजकल, नामित इकाई मान्यता (एनईआर) ने मानक कॉर्पोरेट पर उत्कृष्ट परिणाम प्राप्त किए। हालांकि, एक विशिष्ट डोमेन में एक एप्लिकेशन की आवश्यकता के साथ बड़े मुद्दे उभर रहे हैं, क्योंकि इसके लिए अनुकूलित एनई टैग-सेट के साथ एक उपयुक्त एनोटेट कॉर्पस की आवश्यकता होती है। यह ऐतिहासिक दस्तावेज़ प्रसंस्करण क्षेत्र में विशेष रूप से स्पष्ट है। इस पेपर के मुख्य लक्ष्य में चेक ऐतिहासिक एनईआर के स्कोर को बढ़ाने के लिए कई हस्तांतरण सीखने के तरीकों का प्रस्ताव और मूल्यांकन शामिल है। हम कई सूचना स्रोतों का अध्ययन करते हैं, और हम एनई मॉडलिंग और मान्यता के लिए दो तंत्रिका जाल का उपयोग करते हैं। हम अपने हस्तांतरण सीखने के तरीकों के मूल्यांकन के लिए दो कॉर्पोरेट को नियोजित करते हैं, अर्थात् चेक नामित इकाई कॉर्पस और चेक ऐतिहासिक नामित इकाई कॉर्पस। हम दिखाते हैं कि ठीक ट्यूनिंग के साथ BERT प्रतिनिधित्व और केवल कॉर्पोरेट के संघ पर प्रशिक्षित सरल क्लासिफायर उत्कृष्ट परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'zh': '今名实体(NER)于格语料库有异绩。 然须于特定域中用应用程序,故有大故,以其有适宜 NE 标集之宜语料。 其在史文档处领尤明。 本文大要,立评数术,以崇捷克史NER之分。 考之数信息源,并用二神经网络NE建模识。 吾以二语料库来质吾迁学之法,即捷克名实体语料库与捷克史名实体语料库。 明于微BERT,语料库并集练分类器而后出色也。', 'ru': 'В настоящее время признание именованных сущностей (NER) достигло отличных результатов на стандартных корпорациях. Однако возникают большие проблемы, связанные с необходимостью применения в конкретной области, поскольку для этого требуется подходящий аннотированный корпус с адаптированным набором тегов NE. Это особенно заметно в области обработки исторических документов. Основная цель настоящего документа состоит в том, чтобы предложить и оценить несколько методов трансферного обучения для повышения баллов чешского исторического NER. Мы изучаем несколько источников информации и используем две нейронные сети для моделирования и распознавания NE. Мы используем два корпуса для оценки наших методов обучения трансферу, а именно чешский с именем entity corpus и чешский с историческим именем entity corpus. Показано, что представительство BERT с тонкой настройкой и только простой классификатор, обученный на союзе тел, достигает отличных результатов.', 'ga': 'Sa lá atá inniu ann, bhain aitheantas aonáin ainmnithe (NER) torthaí sármhaithe amach ar an gcorpas caighdeánach. Mar sin féin, tá ceisteanna móra ag teacht chun cinn agus an gá atá le feidhmchlár i bhfearann ar leith, toisc go dteastaíonn corpas anótáilte oiriúnach le tacar clibeanna NE oiriúnaithe. Tá sé seo soiléir go háirithe i réimse próiseála doiciméad stairiúil. Is éard atá i bpríomhsprioc an pháipéir seo ná roinnt modhanna foghlama aistrithe a mholadh agus a mheas chun scór NER stairiúil na Seice a mhéadú. Déanaimid staidéar ar roinnt foinsí faisnéise, agus úsáidimid dhá néarlíon le haghaidh samhaltú agus aithint NE. Tá dhá chorpas fostaithe againn chun ár modhanna foghlama aistrithe a mheas, is iad sin corpas aonáin ainmnithe na Seice agus corpas aonáin ainmnithe stairiúil na Seice. Léirímid go mbaineann ionadaíocht BERT le mionchoigeartú agus gan ach an t-aicmitheoir simplí atá oilte ar aontas an chorpora torthaí den scoth.', 'hu': 'Napjainkban a nevezett entitás felismerés (NER) kiváló eredményeket ért el a standard corporákon. Nagy problémák merülnek fel azonban, ha egy adott domain alkalmazásra van szükség, mert ehhez megfelelő kommentált korpusz szükséges, adaptált NE címkészlettel. Ez különösen nyilvánvaló a történelmi dokumentumfeldolgozás területén. A tanulmány fő célja több transzfer tanulási módszer javaslata és értékelése a cseh történelmi NER pontszámának növelése érdekében. Több információs forrást tanulmányozunk, és két neurális hálót használunk az NE modellezéséhez és felismeréséhez. Transzfer tanulási módszereink értékeléséhez két korpuszt alkalmazunk, nevezetesen a cseh entitás corpus és a cseh történelmi entitás corpus. Megmutatjuk, hogy a BERT képviselete finomhangolással és csak a corpora egyesülésére képzett egyszerű osztályozó ér el kiváló eredményeket.', 'el': 'Σήμερα, η αναγνώριση ονομάτων οντοτήτων (ΝΕΡ) πέτυχε άριστα αποτελέσματα στα τυποποιημένα σώματα. Ωστόσο, εμφανίζονται μεγάλα ζητήματα με την ανάγκη για μια εφαρμογή σε έναν συγκεκριμένο τομέα, επειδή απαιτεί ένα κατάλληλο σχολιασμένο σώμα με προσαρμοσμένο σύνολο ετικετών NE. Αυτό είναι ιδιαίτερα εμφανές στον τομέα της επεξεργασίας ιστορικών εγγράφων. Ο κύριος στόχος της παρούσας εργασίας συνίσταται στην πρόταση και αξιολόγηση διαφόρων μεθόδων μάθησης μεταφοράς για την αύξηση της βαθμολογίας της τσεχικής ιστορικής ΕΡ. Μελετάμε διάφορες πηγές πληροφοριών, και χρησιμοποιούμε δύο νευρωνικά δίκτυα για μοντελοποίηση και αναγνώριση ΝΔ. Χρησιμοποιούμε δύο σώματα για την αξιολόγηση των μεθόδων εκμάθησης μεταφοράς μας, συγκεκριμένα τσεχικό σώμα οντοτήτων και τσεχικό ιστορικό σώμα οντοτήτων. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι η εκπροσώπηση με την τελειοποίηση και μόνο ο απλός ταξινομητής εκπαιδευμένος στην ένωση των σωμάτων επιτυγχάνει άριστα αποτελέσματα.', 'it': "Al giorno d'oggi, il named entity recognition (NER) ha ottenuto ottimi risultati sui corpora standard. Tuttavia, stanno emergendo grandi problemi con la necessità di un'applicazione in un dominio specifico, perché richiede un corpus annotato adatto con tag-set NE adattato. Ciò è particolarmente evidente nel campo dell'elaborazione storica dei documenti. L'obiettivo principale di questo lavoro consiste nel proporre e valutare diversi metodi di apprendimento di trasferimento per aumentare il punteggio del NER storico ceco. Studiamo diverse fonti di informazione e utilizziamo due reti neurali per la modellazione e il riconoscimento NE. Utilizziamo due corpora per la valutazione dei nostri metodi di apprendimento del trasferimento, vale a dire il corpus di entità denominato ceco e il corpus di entità denominato storico ceco. Dimostriamo che la rappresentazione BERT con la messa a punto e solo il semplice classificatore addestrato sull'unione dei corpora ottiene ottimi risultati.", 'ka': 'დღეს ინტერტის განაცნობა (NER) უკეთესი წარმოდგენა სტანდარტული კოპორაზე. მაგრამ დიდი პრობლემები იქნება განსაკუთრებული დიომინში პრობლემენტის შესაძლებლობა, რადგან ის მოჭირდება საჭირო ანოტატირებული კორპუსი, რომელიც აეპტირებული NE- ეს განსაკუთრებით ჩვენებულია ისტორიური დოკუმენტის პროცესი პანელში. ამ დოკუმენტის მნიშვნელოვანი მიზეზი consists of proposing and evaluation of several transfer learning methods to increase the score of the Czech historical NER. ჩვენ ვისწავლობთ რამდენიმე ინფორმაციის გამოსახულება, და ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ორი ნეიროლური ქსელი NE მოდელირება და მოცნობისთვის. ჩვენ ორი კოპორაციას გამოყენებთ ჩვენი ტრანსტრინტის სწავლების მეტისების განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომელიც ფექი სახელ ინტერნეტი კოპუსი და ფექი ისტორიული ინ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ BERT-ის გამოსახულება საკუთარი კლასიფიკაცია და მხოლოდ ერთადერთი კლასიფიკაცია, რომელსაც კოპორაციის შესაძლებელი შედეგება.', 'kk': 'Қазіргі уақытта, стандартты корпораға аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) керек нәтижелерді жеткізді. Бірақ, үлкен мәселелер бір доменде қолданбаны қажет етеді, себебі оның адаптацияланған NE тегтер жиыны қолдану керек корпус керек. Бұл тарихый құжаттарды өзгерту өрісінде өзгертілген. Бұл қағаздың негізгі мақсаты - Чех тарихлық NER нөмірін көтеру үшін бірнеше аудару әдістерін ұсыну және бағалау. Біз бірнеше мәлімет көзін зерттейміз, және біз NE моделі мен анықтау үшін екі неврал желі қолданамыз. Біз екі корпораға жұмыс істеу әдістерімізді оқыту үшін қолданамыз, мәселен, Чехияның корпус атауы мен Чехияның тарихы "entity corpus" атауы. Біз BERT дегенді жақсы баптаулармен және тек корпораның білімінде оқылған қарапайым классификациялық нәтижелерді жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'Денес, именуваното препознавање на ентитетот (NER) постигна одлични резултати на стандардната корпора. Сепак, се појавуваат големи прашања со потреба од апликација во специфичен домен, бидејќи бара соодветен анотиран корпус со адаптиран NE tag set. Ова е особено очигледно во историското поле за обработување на документи. Главната цел на овој документ е да се предложи и процени неколку методи за учење на трансфер за зголемување на резултатот на чешката историска НЕР. Истражуваме неколку извори на информација, и користиме две нервни мрежи за моделирање и препознавање на НЕ. Ние вработуваме два капора за проценка на нашите методи на трансферентно учење, имено Чешки именуван ентитет корпус и Чешки историски именуван ентитет корпус. Ние покажуваме дека претставувањето на БЕРТ со финетизирање и само едноставниот класификатор обучен во синдикатот на капората постигнува одлични резултати.', 'ml': 'ഇന്ന് സാധാരണ കോര്\u200dപ്പോറിയില്\u200d ഉത്തമമായ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും ഒരു പ്രയോഗത്തിന്റെ ആവശ്യമുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പുറപ്പെടുന്നുണ്ട്. കാരണം അതിന് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ഒരു പ്രയോഗത്തിന്റെ ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. നെ ചരിത്ര രേഖയുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തില്\u200d ഇത് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് വ്യക്തമാണ്. ഈ പത്രത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാന ലക്ഷ്യം ചെക്കിന്റെ ചരിത്ര ചരിത്രത്തിലെ സ്കോര്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി പല മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പഠ നമ്മള്\u200d പല വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു, നെയിന്\u200d മോഡലിങ്ങ് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനായി രണ്ട് നെ നമ്മുടെ മാറ്റുന്ന ശിക്ഷയുടെ രീതികള്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി രണ്ടു കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വേല്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ചെക്ക് പേരുള് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്\u200dറെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d നല്ല തുടങ്ങുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് മാത്രമാണ്. കോര്\u200dപ്പോര യൂണിയനില്\u200d പഠി', 'ms': 'Hari ini, pengenalan entiti bernama (NER) mencapai keputusan yang baik pada korpra piawai. However, big issues are emerging with a need for an application in a specific domain, because it requires a suitable annotated corpus with adapted NE tag-set.  Ini sangat jelas dalam medan pemprosesan dokumen sejarah. Tujuan utama kertas ini adalah melamar dan penilaian beberapa kaedah pembelajaran pemindahan untuk meningkatkan skor NER sejarah Czech. Kami mempelajari beberapa sumber maklumat, dan kami menggunakan dua jaringan saraf untuk model dan pengenalan NE. Kami menggunakan dua korpra untuk penilaian kaedah pembelajaran pemindahan kami, iaitu entiti Czech bernama corpus dan entiti sejarah Czech bernama corpus. Kami menunjukkan bahawa perwakilan BERT dengan penyesuaian dan hanya klasifikasi sederhana dilatih pada persatuan corpora mendapat keputusan yang baik.', 'mt': 'Illum, ir-rikonoxximent tal-entità msejħa (NER) kiseb riżultati eċċellenti fuq il-korpora standard. Madankollu, qed jitfaċċaw kwistjonijiet kbar b’ħtieġa għal applikazzjoni f’qasam speċifiku, minħabba li jeħtieġ korpus annotat adattat b’sett adattat ta’ tikketti NE. Dan huwa partikolarment evidenti fil-qasam storiku tal-ipproċessar tad-dokumenti. L-għan ewlieni ta’ dan id-dokument jikkonsisti fil-proposta u l-evalwazzjoni ta’ diversi metodi ta’ tagħlim ta’ trasferiment biex jiżdied il-punteġġ tan-NER storika Ċeka. Aħna nistudjaw diversi sorsi ta’ informazzjoni, u nużaw żewġ xbieki newrali għall-immudellar u r-rikonoxximent tan-NE. Aħna nimpjegaw żewġ korpi għall-evalwazzjoni tal-metodi tagħna tat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment, jiġifieri l-entità Ċeka msejħa korpus u l-entità Ċeka msejħa korpus storiku. Aħna nuru li r-rappreżentanza tal-BERT bl-irfinar u biss il-klassifikatur sempliċi mħarreġ fl-unjoni tal-korpora jikseb riżultati eċċellenti.', 'pl': 'Obecnie nazwane rozpoznawanie entity (NER) osiągnęło doskonałe wyniki na standardowych korporach. Jednak pojawiają się duże problemy związane z potrzebą aplikacji w określonej dziedzinie, ponieważ wymaga ona odpowiedniego adnotacji korpusu z dostosowanym zestawem tagów NE. Jest to szczególnie widoczne w dziedzinie przetwarzania dokumentów historycznych. Głównym celem artykułu jest zaproponowanie i ocena kilku metod uczenia się transferowego w celu zwiększenia wyniku czeskiego historycznego NER. Badamy kilka źródeł informacji i używamy dwóch sieci neuronowych do modelowania i rozpoznawania NE. Do oceny naszych metod uczenia się transferowego stosujemy dwie korpusy, a mianowicie czeski korpus nazwany entity oraz czeski historyczny korpus nazwany entity. Pokazujemy, że reprezentacja BERT z dopracowaniem i tylko prostym klasyfikatorem przeszkolonym na złączeniu korpusów osiąga doskonałe rezultaty.', 'no': 'Denne daga oppnådd sjølvvalde resultat på standard korpora med namnet entitetskjenning (NER). Dette gjer imidlertid store problemer med eit nødvendig for eit program i eit spesifikke domene, fordi det krev eit passande annotated corpus med tilpassa NE tag- set. Dette er spesielt synleg i den historiske dokumenthandlingsfeltet. Dette hovudmålet av papiret inneheld å foreslå og evaluera fleire læringsmetodar for å økja poeng på den tsjekkiske historiske NER-en. Vi studerer fleire informasjonskjelder, og vi bruker to neuralnett for NE-modellering og gjenkjenning. Vi arbeider to korporar for evaluering av våre overføringsmetoder, som tysk namnet entitet corpus og Tsjekkisk historisk namnet entitet corpus. Vi viser at BERT-representasjonen med fine-tuning og berre den enkle klassifiseringen som trengte på union av korpora oppnår utrolig resultat.', 'ro': 'În prezent, recunoașterea entităților denumite (NER) a obținut rezultate excelente pe corporele standard. Cu toate acestea, apar probleme mari cu necesitatea unei aplicații într-un anumit domeniu, deoarece necesită un corpus adnotat adecvat cu set de etichete NE adaptat. Acest lucru este evident în special în domeniul prelucrării documentelor istorice. Scopul principal al acestei lucrări constă în propunerea și evaluarea mai multor metode de transfer de învățare pentru creșterea scorului NER istoric ceh. Studiem mai multe surse de informație și folosim două rețele neurale pentru modelarea și recunoașterea NE. Utilizăm două corpore pentru evaluarea metodelor noastre de învățare prin transfer, și anume corpus de entitate denumit ceh și corpus de entitate denumit istoric ceh. Noi arătăm că reprezentarea BERT cu ajustare fină și numai simplul clasificator instruit pe unirea corporelor obține rezultate excelente.', 'lt': 'Šiandien pavadintas subjekto pripažinimas (NER) pasiekė puikius standartinės korporacijos rezultatus. Vis dėlto kyla didelių problemų, dėl kurių reikia taikyti konkrečią sritį, nes jai reikalingas tinkamas anotuotas korpusas su pritaikytu NE ženklų rinkiniu. Tai ypač akivaizdu istorinėje dokumentų apdorojimo srityje. Pagrindinis šio dokumento tikslas – pasiūlyti ir įvertinti keletą perkėlimo mokymosi metodų siekiant padidinti Čekijos istorinės NER rezultatus. Mes tiriame kelis informacijos šaltinius ir naudojame du nervinius tinklus NE modeliavimui ir pripažinimui. Naudojame dvi korporas, kad įvertintume savo perdavimo mokymosi metodus, būtent Čekijos vardu pavadintą subjektą korpusą ir Čekijos istoriniu vardu pavadintą subjektą korpusą. Mes parodome, kad BERT atstovavimas su patobulinimu ir tik paprastas klasifikatorius, apmokytas korporos sąjungoje, gauna puikių rezultatų.', 'sr': 'Danas priznanje entiteta (NER) postiglo je odliène rezultate standardnog korporacije. Međutim, veliki problemi se pojavljuju sa potrebom za aplikacijom u određenom domenu, jer zahteva odgovarajući annotirani korpus sa prilagođenim setom NA etiketa. Ovo je posebno jasno u istorijskom polju obrade dokumenta. Glavni cilj ovog papira se sastoji od predloženja i procjene nekoliko metoda učenja prijenosa kako bi povećala rezultat češkog istorijskog NER-a. Proučavamo nekoliko izvora informacija i koristimo dve neurone mreže za modeliranje i prepoznavanje NE. Mi zapošljavamo dve korporacije za procjenu naših metoda učenja transfera, a to je češki entitet corpus i češki istorijski entitet corpus. Pokazujemo da predstavljanje BERT sa finom prilagodbom i samo jednostavan klasifikator obučen za sindikat korpore postiže odličan rezultat.', 'si': 'අදින්, නම් අයිති අයිති අඳුරණය (NER) ප්\u200dරමාණය කොර්පෝරා වලින් හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර නමුත්, ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dර මේක විශේෂයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරදේශයක් තියෙන්නේ ඉතිහාසික වැඩසටහන් කරණාකරණ ක්\u200dෂේත්\u200dරයේ. මේ පත්තරේ ප්\u200dරධාන අරමුණ තමයි චෙක් ඉතිහාසික NER ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ විශ්වාස කරන්න. අපි තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරධානයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අපි න්\u200dයූරාල් ජාලය දෙකක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා NE ම අපි කොර්පෝරා දෙන්නෙක් විශ්වාස කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය ඉගෙන ගන්න විදියට, චෙක් කොර්පුස් සහ චෙක් ඉතිහාසික අයි අපි පෙන්වන්නේ BERT ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා හොඳ සංවිධානය සඳහා සරල විශේෂකයෙක් විතරයි කොර්පෝරාගේ සංවිධා', 'so': 'Maanta, aqoonsashada aqoonsiga entity (NER) wuxuu helay resulto wanaagsan oo ku saabsan shirkadda standardka ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee arimaha waaweyn waxaa ku soo baxaya baahida codsiga guriga gaar ah, sababtoo ah waxay u baahan tahay qof ku habboon oo ku habboon tagta NE. Tani si gaar ah ayaa ugu muuqda beerta ka baaraandegista taariikhda dukumentiga. Ujeedada ugu horeeya ee warqaddan waxaa ka mid ah hagitaanka iyo qiimeynta qaababka waxbarashada bedelka ah si loo kordhiyo kooxda taariikhda ee Czech. Waxaynu barannaa manfacyo badan oo macluumaad ah, waxaynu isticmaalnaa laba shabakado neurada ah si aan u sameyno sameynta iyo aqoonsashada NE. Waxaynu shaqaynaynaa laba shirkad oo qiimeynaya qaababka waxbarashada ee loo soo wareejiyo, tusaale ahaan Czech magaceeda qoyska shaqaalaha iyo xuquuqda taariikhda ee lagu magacaabay korpus. Waxaynu muujinnaa in kooxaha BERT oo ku qoran tababar wanaagsan oo keliya oo la barto ururka shirkadda, wuxuu helaa resulto wanaagsan.', 'sv': 'Numera uppnådde namngiven entitetsigenkänning (NER) utmärkta resultat på standardcorpora. Stora problem uppstår dock med ett behov av en applikation inom en specifik domän, eftersom det kräver en lämplig kommenterad korpus med anpassad NE tagg-uppsättning. Detta är särskilt tydligt inom området för historisk dokumentbehandling. Huvudmålet med denna uppsats är att föreslå och utvärdera flera överföringsinlärningsmetoder för att öka poängen för den tjeckiska historiska NER. Vi studerar flera informationskällor och använder två neurala nät för NE modellering och igenkänning. Vi använder två corpora för utvärdering av våra överföringsinlärningsmetoder, nämligen tjeckiska entitetscorpus och tjeckiska historiska entitetscorpus. Vi visar att BERT-representation med finjustering och endast den enkla klassificeraren utbildade på föreningen av corpora uppnår utmärkta resultat.', 'ta': 'இன்று, பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடையாளம் (NER) நிலையான நிறுவனத்தில் சிறந்த முடிவுகள் அடைந்தது. ஆனால், பெரிய பிரச்சனைகள் ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட தளத்தில் ஒரு பயன்பாட்டின் தேவையுடன் வருகின்றன, ஏனென்றால் இது ஒதுக்கப்பட்ட NE ஒட்டு அமைப் இது வரலாற்று ஆவணத்தை செயல்படுத்தும் புலத்தில் முக்கியமாக தெளிவாக உள்ளது. இந்த காகிதத்தின் முக்கிய இலக்கு செக்கு வரலாற்று வரலாற்று NER மதிப்பை அதிகரிக்க பல மாற்று கற்றல் முறைகளின் பரிந்துரையும் மற நாங்கள் பல தகவல் மூலங்களை படிக்கிறோம், மற்றும் நாம் NE மாதிரி மற்றும் அடையாளத்திற்கு இரண்டு புதிய வலைப்பின நாங்கள் இரண்டு நிறுவனத்தை வேலை செய்ய வேண்டும் எங்கள் மாற்றும் கற்றல் முறைகளை மதிப்பிடுவதற்கு, செக் பெயர் பொருள் கார்ப் மற்றும் செ BERT பிரதிநிதியை நன்றாக குறிப்பிடும் என்று காட்டுகிறோம் மற்றும் நிறுவனத்தின் யூனியன் ஒரு சுலபமான வகுப்பாளர் மட்டு', 'mn': 'Өнөөдөр бизнесийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөл (NER) стандарт корпора дээр гайхалтай үр дүн гарч ирсэн. Гэвч том асуудлууд тодорхой хэлбэрээр хэрэглэх хэрэгтэй болж байна. Учир нь энэ нь зөвшөөрөгдсөн НЭ тегт хэлбэртэй адилхан зохицуулагдсан корпус хэрэгтэй. Энэ нь түүхэн баримт үйлдвэрлэх талбайд ялангуяа тодорхой. Энэ цаасны гол зорилго нь Чехийн түүхийн НЕР-ын тоог нэмэгдүүлэх хэд хэдэн сургалтын сургалтын аргыг санал, үнэлгээ. Бид олон мэдээллийн эх үүсвэрийг судалж, НЭ-н модель болон танихын тулд 2 мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглаж байна. Бид хоёр корпора ашиглаж, өөрсдийгөө шилжүүлэх сургалтын арга замыг үнэлэх зорилго дээр хэрэглэдэг. Бид БЕРТ-ын төлөвлөгөө сайхан зохион байгуулах болон Корпора хоорондоо сургалтын энгийн хувилбар нь гайхалтай үр дүнг гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ur': 'آج، انٹیٹی شناسایی (NER) نے استاندارڈ کورپورا پر بہترین نتائج حاصل کی۔ لیکن بڑے مسئلہ ایک خاص ڈومین میں ایک کاربرد کے لئے ضرورت کے ساتھ پیدا ہوتے ہیں، کیونکہ اس کے لئے ایک اچھی کاربرس کی ضرورت ہے جس کے ساتھ مطابق نیا ٹاگ-سٹ کے ساتھ مطابق ہے. یہ مخصوصاً تاریخی دکھانے کی پروسس فیلڈ میں واضح ہے۔ اس کاغذ کی اصلی موضوع یہ ہے کہ چک تاریخی NER کے اسکور کو بڑھانے کے لئے بہت سی ترنسیس سیکھنے کے طریقے کی پیشنهاد اور ارزیابی کرنا ہے. ہم بہت سی اطلاعات کے سراسر پڑھتے ہیں، اور ہم نے نورول نیٹ استعمال کیا ہے نور مدل اور پہچان کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم دو کورپورا کو ہمارے ترنسیٹ سیکھنے کے طریقے کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں، یعنی چیک کے نام ایک ٹینٹی کورپوس اور چک تاریخی کا نام ایک ٹینٹی کورپوس ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ BERT نمایش بہترین تنظیم کے ساتھ اور صرف سادھا کلیسٹر جو corpora کے اتحاد پر آموزش کی گئی ہے بہترین نتیجے حاصل کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bugun hozirda, quyidagi tashkilotni tasdiqlash (NER) andoza kompaniyada yaxshi natijalarini bajardi. Ammo, katta muammolar koʻrsatilgan domen davlatda dastur kerak bo'ladi, chunki u oʻrnatilgan NE tag-set bilan mos keladigan kompyuter kerak. Bu tarixi hujjatning boshqaruvi maydonda mos keladi. Bu qogʻozning asosiy maqsad, cheksiz tarixi NER qiymatini oshirish uchun bir necha ta'minlovchi o'rganish usullarini qiymatlash va qiymatlash mumkin. Biz bir necha maʼlumot manbasini o'rganamiz, va biz NE modelini va tasdiqlash uchun ikkita neyrol tarmoqni foydalanamiz. We employ two corpora for evaluation of our transfer learning methods, namely Czech named entity corpus and Czech historical named entity corpus.  Biz BERT tashkilotlarini yaxshi ko'rsatganimiz va faqat kompaniya birlashida o'rganilgan oddiy darajalar yaxshi natijaga keladi.", 'vi': 'Ngày nay, tên công ty nhận dạng (NER) đã đạt được kết quả tốt về tiêu chuẩn Hạ sĩ. Tuy nhiên, những vấn đề lớn đang xuất hiện với nhu cầu ứng dụng trong một lĩnh vực cụ thể, vì nó yêu cầu một tập thể được ghi chú thích hợp với một bộ phận gắn thẻ RNE. Đặc biệt là trong lĩnh vực xử lý tài liệu lịch sử. Mục tiêu chính của bài báo này là đề xuất và đánh giá một số phương pháp học về chuyển nhượng nhằm tăng số lượng lớn của cá nhân trong lịch sử Séc. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu nhiều nguồn thông tin, và sử dụng hai mạng lưới thần kinh để tạo mẫu và nhận dạng ne. Chúng tôi tuyển dụng hai tập đoàn để đánh giá phương pháp học chuyển nhượng của chúng tôi, đó là tập đoàn tên Séc và tập đoàn tên tuổi Séc. Chúng tôi cho thấy Diễn viên BERT với độ nghiên cứu kỹ lưỡng và chỉ người phân loại đơn giản được đào tạo về Hiệp hội Hạ sĩ đạt được kết quả tốt.', 'da': 'I dag opnåede navngivne enhedsanerkendelse (NER) fremragende resultater på standard corpora. Der opstår imidlertid store problemer med et behov for en applikation i et bestemt domæne, fordi det kræver et passende kommenteret korpus med tilpasset NE tagsæt. Dette fremgår især af det historiske dokumentbehandlingsområde. Hovedformålet med denne artikel er at foreslå og evaluere flere transferlæringsmetoder for at øge scoren af den tjekkiske historiske NER. Vi studerer flere informationskilder, og vi bruger to neurale net til NE modellering og genkendelse. Vi anvender to corpora til evaluering af vores transferlæringsmetoder, nemlig tjekkisk navngivet entity corpus og tjekkisk historisk navngivet entity corpus. Vi viser, at BERT-repræsentation med finjustering og kun den enkle klassificering, der er uddannet på foreningen af corpora, opnår fremragende resultater.', 'bg': 'В днешно време, назоваваното разпознаване на обекти (НЕР) постигна отлични резултати при стандартните корпуси. Въпреки това възникват големи проблеми с необходимостта от приложение в конкретен домейн, тъй като то изисква подходящ анотиран корпус с адаптиран набор от маркери. Това е особено очевидно в областта на историческата обработка на документи. Основната цел на настоящата статия се състои в предлагане и оценка на няколко метода за трансферно обучение за повишаване на оценката на чешкия исторически НЕР. Изследваме няколко източника на информация и използваме две невронни мрежи за моделиране и разпознаване на НЕ. Ние използваме две корпорации за оценка на методите ни за трансферно обучение, а именно чешки корпус с наименовани единици и чешки исторически корпус с наименовани единици. Показваме, че представителството на БЕРТ с фина настройка и само простият класификатор, обучен в обединението на корпусите, постига отлични резултати.', 'nl': "Tegenwoordig behaalde named entity recognition (NER) uitstekende resultaten op de standaard corpora. Er ontstaan echter grote problemen met de behoefte aan een toepassing in een specifiek domein, omdat het een geschikt geannoteerd corpus met aangepaste NE tag-set vereist. Dit is vooral duidelijk op het gebied van historische documentverwerking. Het belangrijkste doel van deze paper bestaat uit het voorstellen en evalueren van verschillende transferleermethoden om de score van de Tsjechische historische NER te verhogen. We bestuderen verschillende informatiebronnen, en we gebruiken twee neurale netten voor NE modellering en herkenning. We gebruiken twee corpora's voor de evaluatie van onze transferleermethoden, namelijk Tsjechisch named entity corpus en Tsjechisch historical named entity corpus. We laten zien dat BERT vertegenwoordiging met finetuning en alleen de eenvoudige classificator opgeleid op de vereniging van corpora uitstekende resultaten bereikt.", 'hr': 'Danas priznanje entiteta (NER) postiglo je odlični rezultati standardnog korporacije. Međutim, veliki problemi se pojavljuju s potrebom za zahtjev u određenom domenu, jer zahtijeva odgovarajući annotirani korpus s prilagođenim NA-setom. To je posebno očigledno u povijesnom području obrade dokumenta. Glavni cilj ovog papira sastoji se od predloženja i procjene nekoliko metoda učenja prijenosa za povećanje rezultata češkog povijesnog NER-a. Proučavamo nekoliko izvora informacija i koristimo dvije neurone mreže za modeliranje i priznanje NE. Mi zapošljavamo dvije korporacije za procjenu naših metoda učenja prijenosa, a to je češki entitet corpus i češki povijesni entitet corpus. Pokazujemo da predstavljanje BERT-a sa finom prilagodbom i samo jednostavan klasifikator obučen za sindikat tijela postigne odlične rezultate.', 'de': 'Heute erzielte Named Entity Recognition (NER) hervorragende Ergebnisse auf den Standard-Korpora. Allerdings treten große Probleme mit der Notwendigkeit einer Anwendung in einer bestimmten Domäne auf, da sie ein geeignetes annotiertes Korpus mit angepasstem NE-Tag-Set erfordert. Dies zeigt sich insbesondere im Bereich der historischen Dokumentenverarbeitung. Das Hauptziel dieser Arbeit besteht darin, verschiedene Transferlernmethoden vorzuschlagen und zu evaluieren, um die Punktzahl des tschechischen historischen NER zu erhöhen. Wir untersuchen mehrere Informationsquellen und verwenden zwei neuronale Netze für die NE-Modellierung und -Erkennung. Wir verwenden zwei Korpora zur Evaluation unserer Transferlernmethoden, nämlich den tschechischen benannten Entitätskorpus und den tschechischen historischen benannten Entitätskorpus. Wir zeigen, dass BERT-Darstellung mit Feinabstimmung und nur der einfache Klassifizierer, der auf die Vereinigung von Korpora trainiert ist, hervorragende Ergebnisse erzielt.', 'id': 'Hari ini, pengenalan entitas bernama (NER) mencapai hasil yang baik pada korpora standar. Namun, masalah besar muncul dengan kebutuhan untuk aplikasi di domain spesifik, karena membutuhkan corpus annotasi yang sesuai dengan set tag NE yang sesuai. Ini sangat jelas dalam bidang proses dokumen sejarah. Tujuan utama kertas ini terdiri dari mengusulkan dan evaluasi beberapa metode belajar transfer untuk meningkatkan skor NER sejarah Czech. Kami mempelajari beberapa sumber informasi, dan kami menggunakan dua jaringan saraf untuk model dan pengenalan NE. Kami mempekerjakan dua korpra untuk evaluasi metode belajar transfer kami, yaitu entity corpus bernama Ceko dan entity corpus bernama sejarah Ceko. Kami menunjukkan bahwa representasi BERT dengan penyesuaian dan hanya klasifikasi sederhana yang dilatih dalam persatuan korpora mendapatkan hasil yang baik.', 'ko': '현재 명명 실체 식별(NER)은 표준 자료 라이브러리에서 좋은 효과를 거두었다.그러나 특정 분야의 응용 프로그램이 필요하기 때문에 큰 문제가 발생했다. 주석이 있는 자료 라이브러리와 조정된 NE 태그 집합이 필요하기 때문이다.이것은 역사 문서 처리 분야에서 특히 뚜렷하다.본고의 주요 목표는 체코 역사 학습자의 점수를 높이기 위해 몇 가지 이동 학습 방법을 제시하고 평가하는 것이다.우리는 몇 가지 정보원을 연구했고 두 개의 신경 네트워크를 이용하여 NE 모델링과 식별을 진행했다.우리는 두 개의 자료 라이브러리를 사용하여 우리의 이동 학습 방법, 즉 체코 명명 실체 자료 라이브러리와 체코 역사 명명 실체 자료 라이브러리를 평가한다.우리는 어료 라이브러리에 훈련된 단순 분류기를 모아야만 좋은 결과를 얻을 수 있다는 미조를 가진 버트의 주장을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'امروزه، شناسایی یک entity (NER) نتایج فوق العاده در شرکت استاندارد رسید. با این حال، مسائل بزرگ با نیازی برای یک کاربرد در یک دامنه خاص وجود دارد، زیرا نیازی به یک شرکت مناسبی با مجموعه\u200cی نقاشی نیاز دارد. این مخصوصا در میدان پردازش سند تاریخی مشخص است. هدف اصلی این کاغذ consists of proposing and evaluation of several transfer methods to increase the score of the Czech historical NER. ما چند منابع اطلاعات را مطالعه می کنیم، و از دو شبکه عصبی برای مدل و شناسایی نو استفاده می کنیم. ما دو شرکت را برای ارزیابی روش یادگیری انتقال ما استفاده می کنیم، یعنی چک به عنوان شرکت کورپوس و تاریخ چک به عنوان شرکت کورپوس. ما نشان می دهیم که نمایش BERT با تغییرات خوب و تنها راهنمایی ساده که در اتحاد شرکت آموزش داده شده به نتیجه های عالی رسیده است.', 'tr': 'Häzirki gün, ady barlag tanamagy (NER) standart korpora üstüne örän gowy netijede ýetdi. Ýöne uly mesele belli domaýda bir program gerek bolup görünýär, sebäbi bu ýerde uygun täg-düzümlendirilen corpus gerek. Bu taryhy senedi işleýän sahypada adaty. Bu kagyzyň esasy maksady - Çehiň taryh NER\'iň अंsalyny artmak üçin birnäçe terjime öwrenme metodlaryny teklip etmek we deňlemek. Biz birnäçe informasiýa çeşmelerini öwrenýärdik we ýene-de NE modellendirmek we tanyşmak üçin iki nuýral şebekelerini ulanýarys. Biz öz transfers öwrenmegimiziň çärelerini deňlemek üçin iki korpora işleýäris. Şeýle diýip Çehiýanyň ady "entity corpus" we "entity corpus" diýip atlandyrylýar. BERT\'nin iyi şekilde gösterildiğini ve sadece korpora birliğinde eğitilen basit klasifikatçının mükemmel sonuçlarını gösteriyoruz.', 'sw': 'Leo, jina la kutambua entity (NER) lilipata matokeo mazuri kwenye kampuni ya kawaida. However, big issues are emerging with a need for an application in a specific domain, because it requires a suitable annotated corpus with adapted NE tag-set.  Hii ni wazi hasa katika eneo la utaratibu wa nyaraka za kihistoria. Lengo kuu la gazeti hili lina pendekezo na kutathmini mbinu kadhaa za kujifunza za uhamishaji ili kuongeza kiwango cha Uholanzi wa kihistoria wa Czech. Tunafundisha vyanzo kadhaa vya habari, na tunatumia mitandao miwili ya kiserikali kwa ajili ya kutengeneza na kutambua NE. Tunajiri makampuni mawili ili ili kutathmini njia zetu za kujifunza kwa ajili ya uhamiaji, yaani Czech inayoitwa chombo cha habari na kihistoria kinachoitwa Kizech. Tunaonyesha kuwa uwakilishi wa BERT kwa mafunzo mazuri na ni mwandishi rahisi tu aliyefundishwa kwenye muungano wa kampuni hupata matokeo mazuri.', 'af': "Vandag, genaamde entiteiterkenning (NER) het uitsonderlike resultate op die standaard korpora bereik. Maar, groot probleme word opgekom met 'n benodig vir' n aansoek in 'n spesifieke domein, omdat dit benodig 'n geskikte annotateerde korpus met aanpasbare ne etiket- set. Hierdie is veral duidelik in die historiese dokumentverwerking veld. Die hoof doel van hierdie papier bestaan van voorstel en evaluering van verskeie oordragmetodes om die aantal van die Tsjeë historiese NER te vermeerder. Ons studeer verskeie inligting bronne, en ons gebruik twee neurale netwerke vir NE modellering en herken. Ons gebruik twee korpora vir evaluering van ons oordrag leer metodes, naamlik Tsjechse genaamde entiteit corpus en Tsjechse histories genaamde entiteit corpus. Ons wys dat BERT voorstelling met fyn-tuning en slegs die eenvoudige klassifiseerder wat op die union van korpora opgelei het, uitgelukkige resultate bereik.", 'sq': 'Sot, njohja e emëruar e njësisë (NER) arriti rezultate të shkëlqyera në korprën standard. Megjithatë, çështje të mëdha po shfaqen me një nevojë për një aplikim në një domeni të caktuar, sepse kërkon një korpus të përshtatshëm të anotuar me një set të përshtatshëm me etiketa NE. Kjo është veçanërisht e qartë në fushën historike të procesimit të dokumenteve. Qëllimi kryesor i kësaj letre përbëhet nga propozimi dhe vlerësimi i disa metodash të mësimit të transferimit për të rritur rezultatin e NER historike çeke. Ne studiojmë disa burime informacioni, dhe përdorim dy rrjete neuronale për modelimin dhe njohjen e NE. Ne punësojmë dy korpra për vlerësimin e metodave tona të mësimit të transferit, veçanërisht korpus i njësisë së quajtur Çeke dhe korpus i njësisë historike të quajtur Çeke. Ne tregojmë se përfaqësimi i BERT me rregullim të mirë dhe vetëm klasifikuesi i thjeshtë i trajnuar në bashkimin e korprës arrin rezultate të shkëlqyera.', 'am': 'ዛሬ የአካባቢ ስህተት ማውቀት (NER) የተባለው የአካላቢው ኮርፖርተር ላይ የተሻለ ፍሬዎችን አግኝቷል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ታላላቅ ጉዳዮች በተለየ ውይይት ውስጥ ፕሮግራም ያስፈልጋል፣ ምክንያቱም በNE tag-set የተጠቃሚ ካርፓስ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ This is particularly evident in the historical document processing field.  የዚህ ገጾች ዋነኛ ጉዳይ የቻክክ ታሪካዊ መረጃን ለመጨመር እና ለማስተዋል የክፍል ትምህርት ማድረጊያውን ለማሳመር እና ለማስተዋል ነው፡፡ ብዙ የመረጃ ምንጮች እናስተምራለን እና ሁለትን የናውሬት መረብ ለምሳሌ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ሁለትን ኮርፖርት፣ አካባቢ ኮርፓስ እና የቻክክ ታሪካዊ ኮርፓስ የሚባልን የፍጥረት ትምህርት ማድረጊያውን ለማስተዋል እናደርጋለን፡፡ BERT መልዕክት በመልካም ማድረግ እናሳየዋለን፤ በኮርፖራ ዩንቨርስቲ የተማረ ቀላል ትክክል ፍሬዎችን ማግኘት ብቻ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այսօր, անվանված էության ճանաչելը (ՆԵՌ) լավ արդյունքներ ստացավ ստանդարտ կառուցվածքի վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, մեծ խնդիրներ են առաջանում որոշակի ոլորտում ծրագրի կարիքի հետ, որովհետև այն պահանջում է համապատասխան annoted կորպուս, որն ունի հարմարեցված ՆԵ նշաններ: Սա հատկապես ակնհայտ է պատմական փաստաթղթերի վերլուծության ոլորտում: Այս թղթի հիմնական նպատակն այն է, որ առաջարկենք և գնահատենք մի քանի փոխանցման ուսումնական մեթոդներ, որպեսզի բարձրացնենք Չեքսի պատմական ՆԵՌ-ի գնահատականը: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք բազմաթիվ տեղեկատվական աղբյուրներ և օգտագործում ենք երկու նյարդային ցանց ՆԵ մոդելների և ճանաչության համար: Մենք օգտագործում ենք երկու կոպորա մեր փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության մեթոդների գնահատման համար, հատկապես Չեխի կողմից կորպորուս կողմից և Չեխի պատմական կողմից կորպորուս կողմից: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ BER-ի ներկայացումը բարձրացված և միայն պարզ դասակարգիչը, ով մարմնի միավորման մեջ է վարժեցված, ստանում է հրաշալի արդյունքներ:', 'az': 'Bu günlərdə, ünvanların tanıması (NER) standart korporasında ən gözəl sonuçlar gəldi. Ancaq böyük məsələlər müəyyən bir domain içində bir proqramın ehtiyacı var, çünki bu, uyğunlaşdırılmış NET etiket seti ilə uyğunlaşdırılmış bir korpus lazım olduğu üçün. Bu xüsusiyyətli səhifələr işləmə sahəsində görünür. Bu kağızın ən böyük məqsədi Çehir tarihi NER nəticəsini artırmaq üçün çoxlu transfer öyrənmə metodlarını təbliğ etmək və değerlendirməkdir. Biz bir neçə məlumat kaynaqlarını öyrənirik, Nə modelləri və tanınması üçün iki nöral ağı kullanırıq. Biz hərəkət öyrənmə metodlarını değerləşdirmək üçün iki korpora istifadə edirik. Çək adında entity corpus və Çək tarihi entity corpus adlı. Biz BERT göstəririk ki, düzgün düzgün düzgün düzgün və yalnız korpora birlikdə təhsil edilən basit klasifikatçının münasibətli sonuçlarını başarar.', 'bs': 'Danas priznanje entiteta (NER) postiglo je odličan rezultat standardnog korporacije. Međutim, veliki problemi se pojavljuju sa potrebom za zahtjevanjem u određenom domenu, jer zahtijeva odgovarajući annotirani korpus s prilagođenim setom NA etiketa. Ovo je posebno očigledno u istorijskom polju obrade dokumenta. Glavni cilj ovog papira se sastoji od predloženja i procjene nekoliko metoda učenja prijenosa za povećanje rezultata češkog istorijskog NER-a. Proučavamo nekoliko izvora informacija i koristimo dve neurone mreže za modeliranje i prepoznavanje NE. Mi zapošljavamo dvije korporacije za procjenu naših metoda učenja transfera, a to je češki entitet corpus i češki istorijski entitet corpus. Mi pokazujemo da predstavljanje BERT sa finom prilagodbom i samo jednostavan klasifikator obučen za sindikat korpore postigne odlične rezultate.', 'ca': "Avui en dia, el reconeixement de l'entitat (NER) va aconseguir resultats excels en el corpora normal. No obstant això, apareixen grans problemes amb la necessitat d'una aplicació en un domini específic, perquè requereix un corpus anotat adequat amb un conjunt de etiquetes NE adaptat. Això és particularment evident en el camp històric del processament dels documents. El principal objectiu d'aquest paper consisteix en proposar i evaluar diversos mètodes d'aprenentatge de transfer ències per augmentar la puntuació del NER històric cec. Estudem diverses fonts d'informació i fem servir dues xarxes neurals per modelar i reconèixer la NE. Empreguem dos corpores per avaluar els nostres mètodes d'aprenentatge de transfer ència, a saber, el corpus de l'entitat ceca i el corpus històric cec. Mostrem que la representació BERT amb ajustes fins i només el classificador senzill entrenat en l'unió de corpora aconsegueix resultats excelentes.", 'cs': 'V současné době pojmenované entity rozpoznávání (NER) dosáhlo vynikajících výsledků na standardních korpusech. Nicméně se objevují velké problémy s potřebou aplikace v konkrétní doméně, protože vyžaduje vhodný anotovaný korpus s adaptovanou sadou značek NE. To je patrné zejména v oblasti zpracování historických dokumentů. Hlavním cílem tohoto článku je navrhnout a zhodnotit několik metod transferového učení pro zvýšení skóre českého historického NER. Studujeme několik informačních zdrojů a používáme dvě neuronové sítě pro modelování a rozpoznávání NE. K hodnocení metod transferového učení využíváme dva korpusy, a to český korpus s názvem entity a český historický korpus s názvem entity. Ukazujeme, že reprezentace BERT s jemným laděním a pouze jednoduchým klasifikátorem trénovaným na sjednocení korpusů dosahuje vynikajících výsledků.', 'bn': 'আজকের দিনে স্বীকৃতির নাম নির্বাচন (NER) স্বীকৃতি পেয়েছে স্ট্যান্ডার্ড কর্পোরায়। তবে একটি নির্দিষ্ট ডোমেইনে একটি অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের প্রয়োজনের জন্য বিশাল বিষয়গুলো উদ্ভব হচ্ছে, কারণ এটি প্রয়োজনীয় নেট ট ট্যাগ-সেটের সাথে মি This is particularly evident in the historical document processing field.  এই পত্রিকার প্রধান লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে চেকের ঐতিহাসিক নেটরের স্কোর বৃদ্ধি করার জন্য প্রস্তাব এবং বেশ কিছু পরিবর্তন শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি তথ্যের উৎস গবেষণা করি, এবং আমরা নেট মডেলিং এবং স্বীকৃতির জন্য দুটি নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করি। আমরা দুই কর্পোরা কাজ করি আমাদের পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা পদ্ধতির মূল্যের জন্য, যার নাম হচ্ছে সাধারণ কোর্পাস এবং চেক ঐতিহাসিক প্রতিষ্ঠান নামে প আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে বেরেটের প্রতিনিধিত্ব ভালো টুইটিং দিয়ে এবং শুধুমাত্র কোর্পোরার ইউনিয়নে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা সহজ ক্লাস', 'et': 'Tänapäeval saavutas nimega entity recognition (NER) standardkorpuste puhul suurepäraseid tulemusi. Siiski tekivad suured probleemid seoses vajadusega rakenduse järele konkreetses valdkonnas, sest see nõuab sobivat märgitud korpust koos kohandatud NE siltide komplektiga. See on eriti ilmne ajalooliste dokumentide töötlemise valdkonnas. Käesoleva dokumendi peamine eesmärk on pakkuda välja ja hinnata mitmeid siirdeõppe meetodeid, et suurendada Tšehhi ajaloolise NER skoori. Uurime mitmeid infoallikaid ning kasutame NE modelleerimiseks ja tuvastamiseks kahte närvivõrku. Me kasutame oma siirdeõppe meetodite hindamiseks kahte korpust, nimelt Tšehhi nimega üksuse korpus ja Tšehhi ajalooline nimega üksuse korpus. Näitame, et BERT esindus peenhäälestusega ja ainult lihtne klassifitseerija, kes on koolitatud korpuste liitmiseks, saavutab suurepäraseid tulemusi.', 'fi': 'Nykyisin nimetty entity recognition (NER) saavutti erinomaisia tuloksia standardikorpussa. Suuria ongelmia syntyy kuitenkin, kun sovellukselle on tarvetta tietyllä toimialueella, koska se edellyttää sopivaa selityksiä sisältävää korpusta, jossa on mukautettu NE-tagi. Tämä on erityisen selvää historiallisten asiakirjojen käsittelyn alalla. Tämän artikkelin päätavoitteena on ehdottaa ja arvioida useita siirtooppimismenetelmiä Tšekin historiallisen NER:n pistemäärän nostamiseksi. Tutkimme useita tietolähteitä ja käytämme kahta neuroverkkoa NE-mallinnukseen ja tunnistamiseen. Käytämme kahta corporaa siirtooppimismenetelmien arviointiin, nimittäin tšekkiläistä nimettyä kokonaisuuskorpusta ja tšekkiläistä historiallista nimettyä kokonaisuuskorpusta. Osoitamme, että BERT-edustus hienosäätimellä ja vain korpusten yhdistämiseen koulutettu yksinkertainen luokittelija saavuttaa erinomaisia tuloksia.', 'he': "כיום, זיהוי ישות בשם NER השיג תוצאות מצוינות על הקופורה הסטנדרטית. עם זאת, נוצרים בעיות גדולות עם צורך ליישום בתחום מסוים, כי זה דורש קורפוס מוטען מתאים עם תגים NE מתאים. זה ברור במיוחד בשדה עיבוד המסמכים ההיסטוריים. המטרה העיקרית של העבודה הזו היא להציע והעריכה של כמה שיטות לימוד העברה כדי להעלות את תוצאה של NER ההיסטורית הצ'צ'י. אנו לומדים מספר מקורות מידע, ואנחנו משתמשים בשני רשתות עצביות לדוגמא ויכרון NE. אנו משתמשים בשני גופרות להערכה של שיטות הלימוד העברה שלנו, כלומר גופרוס של ישות בשם צ'קי וקורפוס של ישות בשם צ'קי. אנחנו מראים שהמייצג של BERT עם התרגיל ורק הקליסס הפשוט מאומן באיגוד הקופורה משיג תוצאות מצוינות.", 'ha': "A yanzu, an ambaci sunan ganin shaidar abun (NER) ya sami matsala masu kyau a kan makampuni na daidaita. Amma, masu girma za'a tsãge da amfani da shirin ayuka cikin wani wuri mai ƙayyadadde, dõmin ana buƙata wata nau'i mai daidai da shirin tagon na NE-da aka daidaita. Wannan mai bayyanãwa ne cikin filin aiki na kwanan wata takardar aiki. Gagon babban takardan wannan na ƙunsa da ɗabi'a na buƙata masu motsi da shiryoyin ayuka masu shige dõmin ya ƙara kowon na historical na Czech. Tuna karatun manyan information masu yawa, kuma tuna amfani da mitandao biyu na neura zuwa misalin na NE. Tuna aikin makampuni biyu dõmin ka ƙaddara shiryoyin ayukanmu da za'a iya shige, kamar ceki wanda aka suna karbon nau'in gaskiyar da kuma kiyayen Kizeki. Tuna nũna cewa mabarancin BERT da mai kyãwo, kuma masu sakan da aka sanar da shi a kan unin korpo, yana da mafiya kyakkyawan matsalar.", 'sk': 'Danes je imenovano priznavanje entitet (NER) doseglo odlične rezultate na standardnih korpusih. Vendar pa se pojavljajo velike težave s potrebo po aplikaciji na določeni področju, saj zahteva ustrezno označeno korpus s prilagojenim naborom oznak NE. To je še posebej očitno na področju zgodovinske obdelave dokumentov. Glavni cilj tega prispevka je predlagati in oceniti več metod transfernega učenja za povečanje rezultata češkega zgodovinskega NER. Preučujemo več informacijskih virov in uporabljamo dve nevronski mreži za modeliranje in prepoznavanje NE. Za vrednotenje naših metod transfernega učenja uporabljamo dva korpusa, in sicer češki imenovani korpus entitete in češki zgodovinski imenovani korpus entitete. Pokazujemo, da BERT zastopanost s finim nastavitvijo in samo preprostim klasifikatorjem usposobljen za združevanje korpusov dosega odlične rezultate.', 'bo': 'ད་ལྟ་མིང་ཞིབ་དང་དབང་རྩིས་ལ(NER)རྣམས་མཐུན་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ། However, big issues are emerging with a need for an application in a specific domain, because it requires a suitable annotated corpus with adapted NE tag-set. འདི་ལ་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཁྱད་པར་སྟོན་པ་རེད། The main goal of this paper is to propose and evaluate of several transfer learning methods to increase the score of the Czech historical NER. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་སློབ་ཆོག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་མཐུན་དྲ་རྒྱ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་སྤྱད་ནས་དབུ ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ལ་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་འཛིན་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་BERT་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་མིང་དང་། སྡུད་མིག་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ལས་འཕར་རིས་ཐོག་ལས་ཕལ་མོ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀ', 'jv': 'jenis-jenis, nambah ono pancene sampeyan pangan (NIR) kang diolah podho akeh barang langkung wigatining ketahanan pangan. Last.fm Punika dipun ngomong khaban langkung naripun ning cawarta nggawe Dokumen sing apik. Tarjamahan punika ingkang paling iki dadi isuk-isuk lan tatabanjur layang manit yang pisan kanggo nggawe barang tarjamahan sing ngendalikke dadi cetek dadi VOR Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo sistem informasi, lan gambar dhéwé iso nggambar netong karo model karo iso nggambar obah-obahan. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing duwé perusahaan kanggo nyenggap urip nggambar kelas kuwi nggawe winih dhéwé, nambah Cek dhèwèké nganggo perusahaan khiripus lan cetek sing nganggo perusahaan uwong. Awak dhéwé éntukno BERT Rayakno ngono alam-alam kuwi duluran lan ijol-ijolan winih dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo nguasai perusahaan sugih'}
{'en': 'Domain-Specific Japanese ELECTRA Model Using a Small Corpus', 'ar': 'نموذج ELECTRA الياباني الخاص بالمجال باستخدام مجموعة صغيرة', 'es': 'Modelo ELECTRA japonés específico de dominio que utiliza un corpus pequeño', 'pt': 'Modelo ELECTRA japonês específico de domínio usando um pequeno corpus', 'fr': 'Modèle ELECTRA japonais spécifique au domaine utilisant un petit corpus', 'ja': '小さなコーパスを使用したドメイン固有の日本のエレクトラモデル', 'zh': '用小语料库特定于域日语 ELECTRA 模', 'hi': 'डोमेन-विशिष्ट जापानी इलेक्ट्रा मॉडल एक छोटे कॉर्पस का उपयोग कर', 'ru': 'Домен-специфическая японская модель ELECTRA с использованием малого тела', 'ga': 'Samhail ELECTRA Seapánach a Bhaineann go Sonrach le Fearann Úsáid as Corpas Beag', 'hu': 'Tartomány-specifikus japán ELECTRA modell kis korpusz használatával', 'el': 'Ειδικό ιαπωνικό μοντέλο ELECTRA χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μικρό σώμα', 'ka': 'Domain- Specific Japanese ELECTRA Model Using a Small Corpus', 'kk': 'Domain- Specific Japanese ELECTRA Model Use a Small Corpus', 'mk': 'Name', 'it': 'Modello ELECTRA giapponese specifico per il dominio utilizzando un piccolo corpus', 'ms': 'Domain-Specific Japanese ELECTRA Model Using a Small Corpus', 'lt': 'Domenui būdingas Japonijos ELECTRA modelis, naudojantis mažą korpusą', 'ml': 'ഒരു ചെറിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d - പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ജാപ്പനീസ് എലിക്ട്രാ മോഡല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Mudell tal-ELECTRA Ġappuniż Speċifiku għad-Dominju bl-Użu ta’ Korpus Żgħar', 'mn': 'Домен-тодорхой Япон ELECTRA загвар жижиг хэлбэрийг ашиглах', 'no': 'Domenespesifisert japansk ELECTRA- modell som brukar ein liten korpus', 'ro': 'Model ELECTRA japonez specific domeniului utilizând un corpus mic', 'pl': 'Specyficzny dla domeny japoński model ELECTRA z wykorzystaniem małego korpusu', 'sr': 'Domena-specifični japanski model ELECTRA Koristi mali korpus', 'so': 'Domain-Specific Japanese ELECTRA Model Using a Small Corpus', 'sv': 'Domänspecifik japansk ELECTRA-modell med hjälp av en liten corpus', 'ur': 'Domain-Specific Japanese ELECTRA Model Using a Small Corpus', 'si': 'ඩොමේන්- විශේෂ ජාපානිය ELECTRA මොඩේල්', 'ta': 'டொமைன்- குறிப்பிட்ட ஜப்பானிய ELECTRA மாதிரி சிறிய கார்புஸ் பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bộ vi phân miền đặc biệt Nhật Bản Name', 'bg': 'Специфичен за домейна японски модел с помощта на малък корпус', 'hr': 'Domena-specifični japanski model ELECTRA Koristeći mali korpus', 'nl': 'Domeinspecifiek Japans ELECTRA-model met behulp van een klein korpus', 'da': 'Domænespecifik japansk ELECTRA-model ved hjælp af et lille korpus', 'de': 'Domänenspezifisches japanisches ELECTRA-Modell mit einem kleinen Korpus', 'id': 'Model ELECTRA Jepang Spesifik Domain Menggunakan Korpus Kecil', 'ko': '소형 자료 라이브러리의 특정 영역을 사용하는 일본어 ELECTRA 모델', 'fa': 'مدل ژاپنی ELECTRA ویژه\u200cای با استفاده از یک کورپوس کوچک', 'sw': 'Utumiaji Korpus ndogo', 'af': "Domein- Spesifieke Japaanse ELECTRA Model wat gebruik 'n klein korpus", 'tr': 'Aýratyn Aýratyn Japonça ELECTRA Modeli Kiçi Köpüsüni ulanan', 'sq': 'Domain-Specific Japanese ELECTRA Model Using a Small Corpus', 'az': 'Domain-Specific Japanese ELECTRA Modeli Kiçik Corpus', 'am': 'ዶሜን-የተለየ ጃፓን ELECTRA ሞዴል', 'hy': 'Դոմենին հատուկ ճապոնացի ELELELElectra մոդելը՝ օգտագործելով փոքրիկ կորպուս', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Domenički specijalni japanski model ELECTRA Koristeći mali korpus', 'ca': 'Model japonès ELECTRA específic per domini utilitzant un petit cos', 'cs': 'Doménově specifický japonský model ELECTRA s využitím malého korpusu', 'et': 'Domeenispetsiifiline Jaapani ELECTRA mudel, mis kasutab väikest korpust', 'fi': 'Verkkoaluekohtainen japanilainen ELECTRA-malli käyttäen pientä korpusta', 'sk': 'Japonski model ELECTRA, specifičen za domeno, z uporabo majhnega korpusa', 'jv': 'Name', 'ha': '@ item Specific dictionary', 'bo': 'Domain-Specific Japanese ELECTRA Model Using a Small Corpus', 'he': 'דוגמנית ELECTRA יפנית ספציפית לדמיין בשימוש גוף קטן'}
{'en': 'Recently, domain shift, which affects accuracy due to differences in data between source and target domains, has become a serious issue when using machine learning methods to solve natural language processing tasks. With additional pretraining and fine-tuning using a target domain corpus, pretraining models such as BERT (Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers) can address this issue. However, the additional pretraining of the BERT model is difficult because it requires significant computing resources. The efficiently learning an encoder that classifies token replacements accurately (ELECTRA) pretraining model replaces the BERT pretraining method’s masked language modeling with a method called replaced token detection, which improves the computational efficiency and allows the additional pretraining of the model to a practical extent. Herein, we propose a method for addressing the computational efficiency of pretraining models in domain shift by constructing an ELECTRA pretraining model on a Japanese dataset and additional pretraining this model in a downstream task using a corpus from the target domain. We constructed a pretraining model for ELECTRA in Japanese and conducted experiments on a document classification task using data from Japanese news articles. Results show that even a model smaller than the pretrained model performs equally well.', 'ar': 'في الآونة الأخيرة ، أصبح تحول المجال ، الذي يؤثر على الدقة بسبب الاختلافات في البيانات بين المجالات المصدر والهدف ، مشكلة خطيرة عند استخدام أساليب التعلم الآلي لحل مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. من خلال التدريب المسبق الإضافي والضبط الدقيق باستخدام مجموعة المجال المستهدف ، يمكن لنماذج التدريب المسبق مثل BERT (تمثيلات التشفير ثنائي الاتجاه من المحولات) معالجة هذه المشكلة. ومع ذلك ، فإن التدريب المسبق الإضافي لنموذج BERT صعب لأنه يتطلب موارد حاسوبية كبيرة. يستبدل التعلم الفعال لبرنامج التشفير الذي يصنف بدائل الرمز المميز بدقة (ELECTRA) نموذج التدريب المسبق طريقة BERT السابقة للتدريب بنمذجة اللغة المقنعة بطريقة تسمى اكتشاف الرمز المستبدل ، مما يحسن الكفاءة الحسابية ويسمح بالتدريب المسبق الإضافي للنموذج إلى حد عملي. هنا ، نقترح طريقة لمعالجة الكفاءة الحسابية لنماذج التدريب المسبق في تحول المجال من خلال إنشاء نموذج التدريب المسبق ELECTRA على مجموعة بيانات يابانية والتدريب المسبق الإضافي لهذا النموذج في مهمة المصب باستخدام مجموعة من المجال الهدف. أنشأنا نموذجًا للتدريب المسبق لـ ELECTRA باللغة اليابانية وأجرينا تجارب على مهمة تصنيف المستندات باستخدام بيانات من المقالات الإخبارية اليابانية. تظهر النتائج أنه حتى النموذج الأصغر من النموذج الذي تم اختباره مسبقًا يعمل بشكل جيد.', 'pt': 'Recentemente, a mudança de domínio, que afeta a precisão devido a diferenças nos dados entre os domínios de origem e destino, tornou-se um problema sério ao usar métodos de aprendizado de máquina para resolver tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural. Com pré-treinamento adicional e ajuste fino usando um corpus de domínio de destino, modelos de pré-treinamento como BERT (Representações de codificador bidirecional de transformadores) podem resolver esse problema. No entanto, o pré-treinamento adicional do modelo BERT é difícil porque requer recursos computacionais significativos. O modelo de pré-treinamento de aprendizagem eficiente de um codificador que classifica substituições de token com precisão (ELECTRA) substitui a modelagem de linguagem mascarada do método de pré-treinamento BERT por um método chamado detecção de token substituído, que melhora a eficiência computacional e permite o pré-treinamento adicional do modelo em uma extensão prática. Aqui, propomos um método para abordar a eficiência computacional de modelos de pré-treinamento em mudança de domínio, construindo um modelo de pré-treinamento ELECTRA em um conjunto de dados japonês e pré-treinamento adicional deste modelo em uma tarefa downstream usando um corpus do domínio de destino. Construímos um modelo de pré-treinamento para ELECTRA em japonês e realizamos experimentos em uma tarefa de classificação de documentos usando dados de artigos de notícias japoneses. Os resultados mostram que mesmo um modelo menor que o modelo pré-treinado tem um desempenho igualmente bom.', 'fr': "Récemment, le changement de domaine, qui affecte la précision en raison des différences de données entre les domaines source et cible, est devenu un problème sérieux lors de l'utilisation de méthodes d'apprentissage automatique pour résoudre des tâches de traitement du langage naturel. Grâce à un préentraînement et à un réglage précis supplémentaires à l'aide d'un corpus de domaine cible, des modèles de pré-apprentissage tels que BERT (Représentations d'encodeurs bidirectionnels à partir de transformateurs) peuvent résoudre ce problème. Cependant, le pré-entraînement supplémentaire du modèle BERT est difficile car il nécessite des ressources informatiques importantes. L'apprentissage efficace d'un codeur qui classe avec précision les remplacements de jetons (ELECTRA) remplace la modélisation du langage masqué de la méthode de pré-apprentissage BERT par une méthode appelée détection de jetons remplacés, ce qui améliore l'efficacité de calcul et permet le pré-entraînement supplémentaire du modèle dans la pratique. Dans la présente invention, nous proposons une méthode pour traiter l'efficacité informatique de modèles de pré-apprentissage dans un changement de domaine en construisant un modèle de pré-apprentissage ELECTRA sur un ensemble de données japonais et en préentraînant ce modèle dans une tâche en aval à l'aide d'un corpus provenant du domaine cible. Nous avons construit un modèle de pré-entraînement pour ELECTRA en japonais et avons mené des expériences sur une tâche de classification de documents en utilisant des données provenant d'articles de presse japonais. Les résultats montrent que même un modèle plus petit que le modèle préentraîné fonctionne également bien.", 'es': 'Recientemente, el cambio de dominio, que afecta a la precisión debido a las diferencias en los datos entre los dominios de origen y de destino, se ha convertido en un problema grave cuando se utilizan métodos de aprendizaje automático para resolver tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Con una capacitación previa adicional y un ajuste fino utilizando un corpus de dominio de destino, los modelos de preentrenamiento como BERT (Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers) pueden abordar este problema. Sin embargo, la capacitación previa adicional del modelo BERT es difícil porque requiere importantes recursos informáticos. El modelo de preentrenamiento de aprendizaje eficiente de un codificador que clasifica los reemplazos de tokens con precisión (ELECTRA) reemplaza el modelado de lenguaje enmascarado del método de preentrenamiento BERT por un método llamado detección de token reemplazado, que mejora la eficiencia computacional y permite el preentrenamiento adicional del modelo en la práctica. En este documento, proponemos un método para abordar la eficiencia computacional de los modelos de preentrenamiento en el cambio de dominio mediante la construcción de un modelo de preentrenamiento ELECTRA en un conjunto de datos japonés y el preentrenamiento adicional de este modelo en una tarea posterior utilizando un corpus del dominio objetivo. Construimos un modelo de preentrenamiento para ELECTRA en japonés y realizamos experimentos en una tarea de clasificación de documentos utilizando datos de artículos de noticias japoneses. Los resultados muestran que incluso un modelo más pequeño que el modelo previamente entrenado funciona igual de bien.', 'zh': '近者,源域、域之间数异而准确性移为用机器学自然语言治之大者也。 以域语料库额外预练微调,预练模形(如BERT(Transformers双向编码器示))可以决之。 然BERT 额预训练难,以其多计算资源也。 高效学对令牌代正类者编码器(ELECTRA)预练模将BERT预训练方法屏蔽语言建模代为换令牌检测之法,以重计效率,许预训练于实对模型。 本文设域移位中预练模算效率之法,其法于日本数集上构ELECTRA预练模形,并用域中语料库于下流附预练之。 以日语为ELECTRA构一预练模形,并用日本新闻文数文档分类实验之。 结果表明,虽小于预,其性亦同。', 'ja': '最近では、ソースドメインとターゲットドメインの間のデータの違いによる精度に影響を与えるドメインシフトは、自然言語処理タスクを解決するために機械学習方法を使用する際に深刻な問題となっています。 ターゲットドメインコーパスを使用した追加の事前トレーニングと微調整により、BERT （ Transformersからの双方向エンコーダ表現）などの事前トレーニングモデルがこの問題に対処できます。 しかしながら、BERTモデルの追加の事前訓練は、多大なコンピューティングリソースを必要とするため、困難である。 トークン置換を正確に分類するエンコーダを効率的に学習すること（エレクトラ）の事前訓練モデルは、BERTの事前訓練方法のマスクされた言語モデリングを置換トークン検出と呼ばれる方法に置き換え、計算効率を向上させ、実用的な範囲でのモデルの追加の事前訓練を可能にします。 ここで、我々は、日本のデータセット上にエレクトラの事前トレーニングモデルを構築し、ターゲットドメインからのコーパスを使用してダウンストリームタスクでこのモデルを追加的に事前トレーニングすることによって、ドメインシフトにおける事前トレーニングモデルの計算効率に対処する方法を提案する。 日本語でエレクトラの事前研修モデルを構築し、日本のニュース記事のデータを用いた文書分類タスクの実験を行った。 結果は、事前に訓練されたモデルよりも小さいモデルでも同様に良好なパフォーマンスを発揮することを示しています。', 'hi': 'हाल ही में, डोमेन शिफ्ट, जो स्रोत और लक्ष्य डोमेन के बीच डेटा में अंतर के कारण सटीकता को प्रभावित करता है, प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों को हल करने के लिए मशीन लर्निंग विधियों का उपयोग करते समय एक गंभीर मुद्दा बन गया है। एक लक्ष्य डोमेन कॉर्पस का उपयोग करके अतिरिक्त प्रीट्रेनिंग और फाइन-ट्यूनिंग के साथ, BERT (ट्रांसफॉर्मर से द्विदिश एन्कोडर प्रतिनिधित्व) जैसे प्रीट्रेनिंग मॉडल इस समस्या को संबोधित कर सकते हैं। हालांकि, BERT मॉडल की अतिरिक्त pretraining मुश्किल है क्योंकि इसके लिए महत्वपूर्ण कंप्यूटिंग संसाधनों की आवश्यकता होती है। कुशलतापूर्वक एक एन्कोडर सीखना जो टोकन प्रतिस्थापन को सटीक रूप से वर्गीकृत करता है (इलेक्ट्रा) प्रीट्रेनिंग मॉडल BERT प्रीट्रेनिंग विधि के नकाबपोश भाषा मॉडलिंग को प्रतिस्थापित टोकन डिटेक्शन नामक एक विधि के साथ प्रतिस्थापित करता है, जो कम्प्यूटेशनल दक्षता में सुधार करता है और मॉडल के अतिरिक्त प्रीट्रेनिंग को व्यावहारिक सीमा तक अनुमति देता है। इसमें, हम एक जापानी डेटासेट पर एक ELECTRA pretraining मॉडल का निर्माण करके डोमेन शिफ्ट में pretraining मॉडल की कम्प्यूटेशनल दक्षता को संबोधित करने के लिए एक विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और लक्ष्य डोमेन से एक कॉर्पस का उपयोग करके एक डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य में इस मॉडल को अतिरिक्त प्रीट्रेनिंग करते हैं। हमने जापानी में ELECTRA के लिए एक pretraining मॉडल का निर्माण किया और जापानी समाचार लेखों से डेटा का उपयोग करके एक दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण कार्य पर प्रयोग किए। परिणाम बताते हैं कि यहां तक कि पूर्वप्रशिक्षित मॉडल से छोटा मॉडल भी समान रूप से अच्छा प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'В последнее время сдвиг домена, который влияет на точность из-за различий в данных между исходным и целевым доменами, стал серьезной проблемой при использовании методов машинного обучения для решения задач обработки естественного языка. С дополнительным предварительным обучением и точной настройкой с использованием корпуса целевой области, модели предварительного обучения, такие как BERT (двунаправленные представления кодировщика от трансформаторов), могут решить эту проблему. Однако дополнительное предварительное обучение модели BERT затруднено, поскольку оно требует значительных вычислительных ресурсов. Эффективное обучение кодировщика, который точно классифицирует замены токенов (ELECTRA) модель предварительного обучения заменяет метод моделирования замаскированного языка BERT методом, называемым замещенным обнаружением токенов, который улучшает вычислительную эффективность и позволяет дополнительное предварительное обучение модели в практической степени. В данном документе мы предлагаем способ решения вычислительной эффективности моделей предварительного обучения при сдвиге домена путем построения модели предварительного обучения ELECTRA на японском наборе данных и дополнительного предварительного обучения этой модели в задаче ниже по потоку с использованием корпуса из целевого домена. Мы построили модель предварительного обучения для ELECTRA на японском языке и провели эксперименты по задаче классификации документов, используя данные из японских новостных статей. Результаты показывают, что даже модель, меньшая, чем предварительно обученная модель, работает одинаково хорошо.', 'ga': 'Le déanaí, tá aistriú fearainn, a dhéanann difear do chruinneas mar gheall ar dhifríochtaí sonraí idir an fhoinse agus an spriocfhearainn, ina cheist thromchúiseach nuair a úsáidtear modhanna meaisínfhoghlama chun tascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha a réiteach. Le réamhoiliúint agus mionchoigeartú breise ag baint úsáide as corpas an fhearainn sprice, is féidir le samhlacha réamhoiliúint ar nós BERT (Léirithe Ionchódóra Déthreo ó Chlaochladáin) aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo. Mar sin féin, tá sé deacair réamhoiliúint bhreise a dhéanamh ar mhúnla BERT mar go dteastaíonn acmhainní suntasacha ríomhaireachta uaidh. Má fhoghlaimítear go héifeachtúil ionchódóir a aicmiú go cruinn ar athchur comharthaí (ELECTRA) cuirtear modh ar a dtugtar braite comharthaí athsholáthair, a fheabhsaíonn an éifeachtúlacht ríomhaireachtúil agus a cheadaíonn réamhoiliúint bhreise an mhúnla go pointe praiticiúil, in ionad samhaltú teanga chumhdaigh mhodh pretraining BERT. Anseo, molaimid modh chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar éifeachtúlacht ríomhaireachtúil na múnlaí réamhoiliúint san aistriú fearainn trí mhúnla réamhoiliúint ELECTRA a thógáil ar thacar sonraí Seapánach agus an tsamhail seo a réamhoiliúint breise i dtasc iartheachtacha ag baint úsáide as corpas ón spriocfhearann. Thógamar samhail réamhoiliúint do ELECTRA sa tSeapáinis agus rinneamar turgnaimh ar thasc aicmithe doiciméad ag baint úsáide as sonraí ó ailt nuachta Seapánacha. Léiríonn torthaí go n-oibríonn fiú múnla níos lú ná an tsamhail réamhoilte chomh maith.', 'hu': 'A közelmúltban a tartományváltás, amely a forrás- és céltartományok közötti adatok különbségei miatt befolyásolja a pontosságot, komoly problémává vált, amikor gépi tanulási módszereket használnak a természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatok megoldására. További előkészítéssel és finomhangolással a céltartomány-korpusz segítségével az olyan előkészítő modellek, mint a BERT (Transzformátorok kétirányú kódoló reprezentációi) megoldhatják ezt a problémát. A BERT modell további előkészítése azonban nehéz, mivel jelentős számítási erőforrásokat igényel. Egy olyan kódoló hatékony tanulása, amely pontosan osztályozza a tokencseréket (ELECTRA) előkészítési modellt, helyettesíti a BERT előkészítési módszer maszkos nyelvmodellezését egy olyan módszerrel, amelynek neve cserélt tokenfelismerés, amely javítja a számítási hatékonyságot és lehetővé teszi a modell további előkészítését gyakorlati mértékben. Az alábbiakban egy módszert javasolunk a domain shift előkészítési modellek számítási hatékonyságának kezelésére, egy ELECTRA előkészítési modell japán adatkészletre építésével, valamint a modell további előkészítésével a céltartományból származó korpusz felhasználásával. Készítettünk egy előképzési modellt az ELECTRA számára japán nyelven, és kísérleteket végeztünk egy dokumentum osztályozási feladatra japán cikkekből származó adatok felhasználásával. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy még az előkészített modellnél kisebb modell is ugyanolyan jól teljesít.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე, დემომინის შეცვლა, რომელიც მიხედვით წარმოდგენების განსხვავებებისთვის მონაცემების და მიხედვილი დემომინის შორის განსხვავებებისთვის, იყო серიგი პრობლემა, როდესაც მაქსინურ ამ პრობლემას შესაძლებელია დამატებული კოპპუსის გამოყენება და დამატებული კონფიგურაცია, როგორც BERT (ორდირექციონალური კონფიგურაციების გამოყენება ტრანფიგურაციის კონფიგურაცი მაგრამ, BERT მოდელის დამატებითი უფრო რთულია, რადგან ის უნდა გავაკეთოთ მნიშვნელოვანი კომპიუტერის რესურსები. ეფექტიურად შესწავლის კოდერი, რომელიც კლასიფიკურად ტექნონის შეცვლების მოდელი (ELECTRA) წინასწავლის მოდელის შეცვლა BERT წინასწავლის მასკური ენის მოდელის მოდელის მასკური ენის მოდელის მასკური მოდელისთვის, რომელიც შეცვლა ტექნონის განახლება,  აქ ჩვენ მინდომებით მოდელების კომპუტაციალური ეფექტიური მუშაობას, რომელიც დომინის ცვლილებაში მოდელების კომპუტაციალური ეფექტიური ეფექტიური ეფექტიური მუშაობისთვის, რომელიც ELECTRA მოდელს წა ჩვენ ჯაპონეთში ELECTRA-ის მოდელს შევქმნა და ექსპერიმენტების კლასიფიკაციის რაოდენობაში დავაკეთეთ წონეთის ახალგაზრულების მონაცემების გამოყენებით. შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ მოდელიც უფრო პატარა, ვიდრე მოდელის მოდელისთვის უფრო კარგი გამოყენება.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατα, η μετατόπιση τομέα, η οποία επηρεάζει την ακρίβεια λόγω των διαφορών στα δεδομένα μεταξύ των τομέων προέλευσης και στόχου, έχει γίνει σοβαρό πρόβλημα κατά τη χρήση μεθόδων μηχανικής μάθησης για την επίλυση εργασιών επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Με πρόσθετη προεπιλογή και βελτιστοποίηση χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σώμα τομέα προορισμού, μοντέλα προεπιλογής όπως οι αμφίδρομες αναπαραστάσεις κωδικοποιητή από μετασχηματιστές) μπορούν να αντιμετωπίσουν αυτό το ζήτημα. Ωστόσο, η πρόσθετη προεπιλογή του μοντέλου BERT είναι δύσκολη επειδή απαιτεί σημαντικούς υπολογιστικούς πόρους. Η αποτελεσματική εκμάθηση ενός κωδικοποιητή που ταξινομεί με ακρίβεια τις αντικαταστάσεις σήματος (ΗΛΕΚΤΡΑ) αντικαθιστά τη μοντελοποίηση της μασκαρισμένης γλώσσας της μεθόδου με μια μέθοδο που ονομάζεται ανίχνευση αντικατάστασης σήματος, η οποία βελτιώνει την υπολογιστική αποδοτικότητα και επιτρέπει την πρόσθετη προεπεξεργασία του μοντέλου σε πρακτικό βαθμό. Στο πλαίσιο αυτό, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο για την αντιμετώπιση της υπολογιστικής αποδοτικότητας των μοντέλων προεπιλογής στη μετατόπιση τομέα με την κατασκευή ενός μοντέλου προεπιλογής σε ένα ιαπωνικό σύνολο δεδομένων και την πρόσθετη προεπιλογή αυτού του μοντέλου σε μια μεταγενέστερη εργασία χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σώμα από τον τομέα προορισμού. Κατασκευάσαμε ένα μοντέλο προετοιμασίας για το ELECTRA στα ιαπωνικά και πραγματοποιήσαμε πειράματα σε μια εργασία ταξινόμησης εγγράφων χρησιμοποιώντας δεδομένα από ιαπωνικά άρθρα ειδήσεων. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι ακόμη και ένα μοντέλο μικρότερο από το προκαθορισμένο μοντέλο αποδίδει εξίσου καλά.', 'it': "Recentemente, il cambio di dominio, che influisce sulla precisione a causa delle differenze nei dati tra domini di origine e di destinazione, è diventato un problema serio quando si utilizzano metodi di apprendimento automatico per risolvere le attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Con ulteriori pretraining e messa a punto utilizzando un corpus di dominio di destinazione, modelli di pretraining come BERT (bidirezional Encoder Representations from Transformers) possono risolvere questo problema. Tuttavia, il pre-training aggiuntivo del modello BERT è difficile perché richiede risorse informatiche significative. L'apprendimento efficiente di un encoder che classifica accuratamente le sostituzioni di token (ELECTRA) sostituisce la modellazione del linguaggio mascherato del metodo di pretraining BERT con un metodo chiamato detection token sostituito, che migliora l'efficienza computazionale e consente l'ulteriore pretraining del modello in misura pratica. Di seguito, proponiamo un metodo per affrontare l'efficienza computazionale dei modelli di pre-formazione nello spostamento di dominio costruendo un modello di pre-formazione ELECTRA su un set di dati giapponese e pre-formazione aggiuntiva di questo modello in un'attività downstream utilizzando un corpus dal dominio di destinazione. Abbiamo costruito un modello di pre-formazione per ELECTRA in giapponese e condotto esperimenti su un compito di classificazione dei documenti utilizzando dati provenienti da articoli di notizie giapponesi. I risultati mostrano che anche un modello più piccolo del modello pretrained funziona altrettanto bene.", 'kk': 'Соңғы уақытта, көзі мен мақсатты домендер арасындағы деректердің айырмашылығының дұрыстығына сезінген доменнің өзгерістерін өзгерту үшін машина үйрену әдістерін қолдану үшін, табиғи тілді өң Бұл мәселеді шешуге болады деген қосымша доменнің корпус қолданатын қосымша теңдеу және дұрыс баптау үшін BERT (Трансформациялардан екі бағытты кодерлердің кескіндері). Бірақ BERT үлгісінің қосымша өзгерту қиын, себебі ол маңызды есептеу ресурстарын талап етеді. Токен алмастыруды дұрыс (ELECTRA) деген кодтамасын оқыту үлгісі BERT- тың алмастыру тәсілінің қалқан тіл моделін алмастыру тәсілімен алмастырылған токен анықтау әдісімен алмастырылады. Бұл компьютердің эффективнігін жақсартып, үлгісінің қосымша қалқа Мұнда, біз доменге ауыстыру үлгілерінің компьютерлік тәртіпсіздігін өзгерту әдісін жапон деректер жиынында ELECTRA моделін құру үшін және қосымша мәліметті басқару әдісіне қосымша тапсырманың төменгі тапсырмасында ко Біз жапон тілінде ELECTRA үшін келесі үлгі құрып, жапон жаңалық мақалаларының деректерін қолдану үшін құжаттың классификациясының тапсырмаларын жасадық. Нәтижелері өзгертілген үлгіден кішірейтін үлгілер дұрыс жақсы орындалады.', 'lt': 'Neseniai domenų keitimas, kuris dėl duomenų skirtumų tarp šaltinio ir tikslinių domenų daro įtaką tikslumui, tapo rimtu klausimu naudojant mašin ų mokymosi metodus natūralaus kalbų apdorojimo užduotims išspręsti. Papildant išankstinį mokymą ir tikslinį koregavimą naudojant tikslinį domeno korpus, išankstinio mokymo modeliai, pavyzdžiui, BERT (dvikrypčių kodų atstovavimas iš transformatorių), gali spręsti šį klausimą. However, the additional pretraining of the BERT model is difficult because it requires significant computing resources.  Efektyviai išmokant koduotoją, kuris tiksliai klasifikuoja žymenų pakaitalus (ELECTRA) išankstinio mokymo model į, pakeičiamas BERT išankstinio mokymo metodo maskuotas kalbų modeliavimas metodu, vadinamu pakeistu žymenų aptikimu, kuris pagerina skaičiavimo efektyvumą ir leidžia praktiškai papildomai išankstinio mokymo modelį. Šiame kontekste siūlome metodą, skirtą išankstinio mokymo modelių skaičiavimo efektyvumui sprendžiant srities keitimo metu sukurti ELECTRA išankstinio mokymo model į Japonijos duomenų rinkinyje ir papildomai išankstinio mokymo metodą atliekant tolesnę užduotį naudojant korpusą iš tikslinės srities. Japoniškai sukūrėme ELECTRA parengimo model į ir atlikome dokumentų klasifikavimo užduoties eksperimentus naudojant Japonijos naujienų straipsnių duomenis. Rezultatai rodo, kad net mažesnis nei anksčiau parengtas modelis veikia taip pat gerai.', 'mk': 'Неодамна, промената на домените, која влијае на прецизноста поради разликите во податоците помеѓу домените извор и мета, стана сериозно прашање кога се користат методите на машинско учење за решавање на природните задачи за обработување јазик. Со дополнително претренирање и фино прилагодување со користење на корпус на домен на целта, претренирање модели како што е BERT (Бидирекционални кодерски претставувања од трансформерите) може да го реши ова прашање. Сепак, дополнителното претренирање на моделот БЕРТ е тешко бидејќи бара значителни компјутерски ресурси. Ефикасното учење на кодерот кој го класификува моделот на претренирање на знаците точно (ЕЛЕКТРА) го замени маскираното јазичко моделирање на методот на претренирање на BERT со метод наречен замена детекција на знаците, што ја подобрува компјутациската ефикасност и овозможува дополнително претренирање на моделот во практичен степен. Herein, we propose a method for addressing the computational efficiency of pretraining models in domain shift by constructing an ELECTRA pretraining model on a Japanese dataset and additional pretraining this model in a downstream task using a corpus from the target domain.  Конструиравме предтренинг модел за ЕЛЕКТРА на јапонски и спроведовме експерименти на задача за класификација на документи користејќи податоци од јапонските вести. Резултатите покажуваат дека дури и моделот помал од предобучениот модел оди исто добро.', 'ms': 'Baru-baru ini, pergerakan domain, yang mempengaruhi ketepatan disebabkan perbezaan dalam data antara domain sumber dan sasaran, telah menjadi isu serius bila menggunakan kaedah pembelajaran mesin untuk menyelesaikan tugas pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi. Dengan latihan dan penyesuaian tambahan menggunakan korpus domain sasaran, model penyesuaian seperti BERT (Perwakilan Pengekod Dua Arah dari Penukar) boleh mengatasi isu ini. Namun, pralatihan tambahan model BERT adalah sukar kerana ia memerlukan sumber komputer yang signifikan. Pembelajaran efisien pengekod yang mengklasifikasikan penggantian token dengan tepat (ELECTRA) model pralatihan menggantikan model bahasa bertopeng kaedah pralatihan BERT dengan kaedah yang dipanggil pengesan token yang digantikan, yang meningkatkan efisiensi pengiraan dan membenarkan pralatihan tambahan model secara praktik. Di sini, kami mengusulkan kaedah untuk mengatasi efisiensi pengiraan model pretraining dalam shift domain dengan membina model pretraining ELECTRA pada set data Jepun dan pretraining tambahan model ini dalam tugas turun menggunakan corpus dari domain sasaran. Kami membina model pretraining untuk ELECTRA dalam bahasa Jepun dan melakukan eksperimen pada tugas klasifikasi dokumen menggunakan data dari artikel berita Jepun. Hasil menunjukkan bahawa walaupun model yang lebih kecil daripada model yang dilatih sebelum dilatih berjalan dengan baik sama.', 'mt': 'Dan l-a ħħar, il-bidla fid-dominju, li taffettwa l-preċiżjoni minħabba d-differenzi fid-dejta bejn is-sors u d-dominji fil-mira, saret kwistjoni serja meta jintużaw metodi ta’ tagħlim bil-magni biex jissolvew kompiti naturali ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi. With additional pretraining and fine-tuning using a target domain corpus, pretraining models such as BERT (Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers) can address this issue.  However, the additional pretraining of the BERT model is difficult because it requires significant computing resources.  It-tagħlim effiċjenti ta’ kodifikatur li jikklassifika b’mod preċiż il-mudell ta’ taħriġ minn qabel ta’ sostituzzjonijiet ta’ token s (ELECTRA) jissostitwixxi l-mudell tal-lingwa maskrata tal-metodu ta’ taħriġ minn qabel ta’ BERT b’metodu msejjaħ detezzjoni sostitwita ta’ tokens, li jtejjeb l-effiċjenza tal-komputazzjoni u jippermetti t-taħriġ minn qabel addizzjonali tal-mudell s a punt prattiku. F’dan il-kuntest, qed nipproponu metodu għall-indirizzar tal-effiċjenza komputattiva tal-mudelli ta’ taħriġ minn qabel fil-bidla tad-dominju billi nibnu mudell ta’ taħriġ minn qabel tal-ELECTRA fuq sett ta’ dejta Ġappuniż u tagħlim minn qabel addizzjonali ta’ dan il-mudell f’kompitu downstream bl-użu ta’ korpus mid-dominju fil-mira. Ibni mudell ta’ taħriġ minn qabel għall-ELECTRA fil-Ġappuniż u wettaqna esperimenti fuq kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni tad-dokumenti bl-użu ta’ dejta minn artikoli tal-a ħbarijiet Ġappuniżi. Ir-riżultati juru li anke mudell iżgħar mill-mudell imħarreġ minn qabel għandu prestazzjoni ugwalment tajba.', 'mn': 'Саяхан хүрээлэний өөрчлөлт, эх үүсвэр болон зорилго доторх мэдээллийн өөрчлөлтийн шалтгаан нь машин суралцах аргыг ашиглаж байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх үйлдлийг шийдэхэд машин суралцах аргыг ашиглах нь маш чухал асуудал Нэг зорилготой холбооны корпус ашиглан нэмэлт эргүүлэлт болон сайхан цэвэрлэлт, BERT (Төрвөлжүүлэгчдийн хоёр шугам кодчуудын төлөөлөлт) шиг загварууд энэ асуудлыг зохицуулж чадна. Гэвч BERT загварын нэмэлт хэмжээний хувьд маш хэцүү, учир нь тооцоолох боломжууд хэрэгтэй. Үнэндээ тоон орлуулалтыг зөв (ELECTRA) хуваалцах загварыг хичээдэг кодчууд нь BERT-ын хэлбэрийн зурагтай хэлний моделийг өөрчилж, тооны үр дүнг сайжруулдаг. Энэ нь тооны үр дүнг сайжруулж, загварын нэмэлт эргүүлэлтийг практикийн хэмжээнд боломжтой болгодог. Энд бид холбооны шилжүүлэлтийн тооцоололтын үр дүнтэй байдлыг тооцоолох арга зааж өгдөг. Японы өгөгдлийн сангийн дээр ELECTRA шилжүүлэлтийн загварыг бүтээж, энэ загварыг доорх ажил дээр дамжуулах арга зааж өгдөг. Бид Япон хэлний ELECTRA-ын хувьд хувьцааны загвар бүтээсэн. Япон мэдээллийн баримтуудын мэдээллийг ашиглан баримтуудын хувьцааны ажил дээр туршилт хийсэн. Үүний үр дүнд зөвхөн өмнөх загвараас бага загвар ч адилхан ажилладаг.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുതന്നെ സ്രോതസ്സിലും ലക്ഷ്യ ഡോമെന്\u200dസിനും തമ്മിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാരണം ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d മാറ്റുന്ന ഡോമെന്\u200d മാറ്റം സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ ഒരു ലക്ഷ്യം ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് കൂടുതല്\u200d മഴ പെയ്യുന്നതും നല്ല മഴയും കൂടുതല്\u200d മാതൃകയുമായി ബെര്\u200dട്ടി (ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാരില്\u200d നി എന്നാലും, ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ കൂടുതല്\u200d മഴപെയ്യുന്നത് കഠിനമാണ് കാരണം അതിന്\u200dറെ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കണക്ക് ചെയ്യേണ്ടത ചിഹ്നങ്ങളുടെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ശരിയായി വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്ന ഒരു കോഡോര്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സാധാരണ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ മുഖം മൂടിയ ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിന് പകരം ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മാറ്റ ഇതിനിടയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രോഗ്രാം ചെയ്യുന്നു, ഒരു ജാപ്പാനീസ് ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റേറ്റ് മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും ഈ മോഡലിനെ കൂടുതല്\u200d പെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള കണക്കിട ജാപ്പാനീസില്\u200d ഈലെക്ട്രായ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d നാം നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചു. ജാപ്പാനിലെ വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു രേഖയു Results show that even a model smaller than the pretrained model performs equally well.', 'sr': 'Nedavno je promena domena, koja utiče na tačnost zbog razlike podataka između izvora i ciljnih domena, postala ozbiljna pitanja kada se koristi metode učenja mašine kako bi rešili prirodni zadatak obrade jezika. Sa dodatnim pretkišenjem i ispravljanjem korpusom ciljnog domena, modeli pretkišenja poput BERT (predstavljanja dvosmjernih kodera iz transformera) mogu riješiti ovaj problem. Međutim, dodatno pretvaranje modela BERT je teško jer zahteva značajne računalne resurse. Efikasno učenje kodera koji precizno klasifikuje zamjene znakova (ELECTRA) pretresnog model a zamjenjuje maskirani jezik metode pretresanja BERT sa metodom koja se zove zamjenjena detekcija znakova, koja poboljšava računalnu efikasnost i omogućava dodatno pretresanje modela praktično. Ovde predlažemo metodu za rješavanje računalne efikasnosti model a pretvaranja u domenu smjene, izgradivši model pretvaranja ELECTRA na japanskom setu podataka i dodatno pretvaranje ovog modela u donjem zadatku koristeći korpus iz ciljne domene. Napravili smo model pretreniranja za ELECTRA na japanskom jeziku i provodili eksperimente na zadatku klasifikacije dokumenta koristeći podatke iz japanskih novinskih članaka. Rezultati pokazuju da čak i model manji od pretkivanog model a dobro izvodi.', 'no': 'Nyleg har domeneforskyving, som påvirkar nøyaktighet på grunn av ulike data mellom kjelde og måldområde, blitt eit seriøsk problem når du brukar maskinelæringsmetodar for å løysa naturspråkshandsamingsoppgåver. Med tilleggsinnstilling og finnstilling ved bruk av ein mål domenekorpus kan du handtera dette problemet med modeller som BERT (Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers). Det er imidlertid vanskeleg at den fleire grense av BERT-modellen er fordi det krev signifikante dataressursar. Den effektivt læringa av eit koder som klassifiserer utvekslingar for token nøyaktig (ELECTRA) bytter ut maskerte språk i BERT- metoden for å lære med eit metode kalla utvekslingsoppdaging av token, som forbetrar computational effektivitet og tillet den ekstra område av modellen til praktisk storleik. I denne måten foreslår vi ein metode for å handsama dataeffektiviteten av pretraining-modeller i domeneforskyving ved å konstruere eit ELECTRA pretraining-modell på ein japansk datasett og tillegg pretraining av denne modellen i ein nedtrekkoppgåve med ein korpus frå måldområdet. Vi konstruerte eit pretraining model for ELECTRA i japansk og oppførte eksperimenter på eit dokumentklassifikasjonskoppgåve ved bruk av data frå japanske nyttikkel. Resultat viser at sjølv eit modell mindre enn den første modellen utfører like godt.', 'si': "මුළින්ම, ඩොමේන් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, මුළින්ම සහ ඉලක්ෂිත ඩොමේන්ස් අතර වෙනස් විදියට පරික්ෂා කරනවා, ස්වභාවික භාෂ ඉලක්ක ඩොමේන් කොර්පුස් භාවිතා වෙනුවෙන් තවත් ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ස් සහ හා හොඳ සංවිධානය සඳහා, ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ස් මොඩේල් වගේ BERT (බි නමුත්, BERT මොඩල් එකේ තවත් ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ස් එක අමාරුයි මොකද ඒකට වැදගත් පරිගණනය සම්බන්ධතාවක් ඕන The Effectivity learning an coder that classifies Token replace acement correctly (ELECTRA) antiraining Model replaced the BERT antiraining approach's mased language Modeling with a way call replaced Token Detection, that impropers the computer Effectivity and allows the extra antiraining of the Model to a Practical magnitude. මෙතන, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ජාපානි දත්ත සටහන් එකේ ELECTRA ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න සඳහා පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස අපි ජාපානියේ ELECTRA වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරිට්\u200dරේන්ස් මොඩේලයක් හැදුවා, ජාපාන් වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් දත්ත භාවිතා  ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර", 'sv': 'På senare tid har domänskiftet, som påverkar noggrannheten på grund av skillnader i data mellan käll- och måldomäner, blivit ett allvarligt problem när man använder maskininlärningsmetoder för att lösa naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter. Med ytterligare förbebildning och finjustering med hjälp av en måldomänkorpus kan förbebildningsmodeller som BERT (Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers) åtgärda problemet. Den ytterligare förberedelsen av BERT-modellen är dock svår eftersom den kräver betydande datorresurser. Effektivt lärande av en kodare som klassificerar token ersättningar korrekt (ELECTRA) pre-training modell ersätter BERT pre-training metodens maskerade språkmodellering med en metod som kallas Replied token detection, vilket förbättrar beräkningseffektiviteten och möjliggör ytterligare pre-training av modellen i praktisk utsträckning. Här föreslår vi en metod för att ta itu med beräkningseffektiviteten hos förkräningsmodeller i domänskifte genom att konstruera en ELECTRA-förkräningsmodell på en japansk datauppsättning och ytterligare förkränning av denna modell i en nedströmsuppgift med hjälp av en korpus från måldomänen. Vi konstruerade en förberedande modell för ELECTRA på japanska och genomförde experiment på en dokumentklassificeringsuppgift med hjälp av data från japanska nyhetsartiklar. Resultaten visar att även en modell som är mindre än den förkränade modellen presterar lika bra.', 'pl': 'Ostatnio zmiana domeny, która wpływa na dokładność ze względu na różnice w danych pomiędzy domenami źródłowymi i docelowymi, stała się poważnym problemem podczas stosowania metod uczenia maszynowego do rozwiązywania zadań przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Dzięki dodatkowemu szkoleniu wstępnemu i dostrajaniu za pomocą korpusu domeny docelowej, modele wstępnego szkolenia, takie jak BERT (Dwukierunkowe reprezentacje koderów z transformatorów), mogą rozwiązać ten problem. Jednakże dodatkowe przygotowanie wstępne modelu BERT jest trudne, ponieważ wymaga znacznych zasobów obliczeniowych. Efektywnie uczący się kodera, który dokładnie klasyfikuje model wstępnego treningu zastępstw tokenów (ELECTRA), zastępuje maskowane modelowanie języka BERT metodą zwaną detekcją tokenów zastępczych, co poprawia wydajność obliczeniową i umożliwia dodatkowe treningi wstępne modelu w praktycznym zakresie. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy metodę zajęcia się efektywnością obliczeniową modeli wstępnego treningu w przesunięciu domeny poprzez konstruowanie modelu wstępnego ELECTRA na japońskim zbiorze danych oraz dodatkowe wstępne treningowanie tego modelu w dalszym zadaniu przy użyciu korpusu z domeny docelowej. Zbudowaliśmy model wstępnego treningu dla ELECTRA w języku japońskim i przeprowadziliśmy eksperymenty nad zadaniem klasyfikacji dokumentów z wykorzystaniem danych z japońskich artykułów wiadomościowych. Wyniki pokazują, że nawet model mniejszy niż model wstępnie trenowany sprawdza się równie dobrze.', 'ro': 'Recent, schimbarea domeniului, care afectează acuratețea datorită diferențelor dintre datele dintre domeniile sursă și domeniile țintă, a devenit o problemă serioasă atunci când se utilizează metode de învățare automată pentru a rezolva sarcinile de procesare a limbajului natural. Cu pregătirea suplimentară și reglarea fină utilizând un corpus de domeniu țintă, modelele de pregătire precum BERT (Reprezentații codificatoare bidirecționale de la transformatori) pot rezolva această problemă. Cu toate acestea, pregătirea suplimentară a modelului BERT este dificilă deoarece necesită resurse de calcul semnificative. Învățarea eficientă a unui encoder care clasifică cu precizie înlocuirile token-urilor (ELECTRA) modelul de pregătire înlocuiește modelarea limbajului mascat al metodei BERT de pregătire cu o metodă numită detectarea token-urilor înlocuite, care îmbunătățește eficiența computațională și permite pregătirea suplimentară a modelului într-o măsură practică. În prezent, propunem o metodă de abordare a eficienței computaționale a modelelor de pre-formare în schimbarea domeniului prin construirea unui model de pre-formare ELECTRA pe un set de date japonez și pre-formare suplimentară a acestui model într-o sarcină din aval folosind un corpus din domeniul țintă. Am construit un model de pregătire pentru ELECTRA în japoneză și am efectuat experimente pe o sarcină de clasificare a documentelor folosind date din articolele de știri japoneze. Rezultatele arată că chiar și un model mai mic decât modelul pre-instruit performează la fel de bine.', 'ur': 'اگلے، ڈومین شیفٹ، جو سورس اور موقع ڈومین کے درمیان متفاوتوں کے باعث دقیق تغییر کے باعث اثر دیتا ہے، جب ماشین سیکھنے کی طریقوں کا استعمال کرتا ہے تابع زبان پردازشی کے کاموں کو حل کرنے کے لئے مطابق کے م اس مسئلہ کے مطابق اضافہ ڈومین کورپوس کے مطابق اضافہ پرٹرینڈ اور اضافہ ٹونگ کے ساتھ، پرٹرینڈ موڈل جیسے BERT (ترنسفورٹ سے دوسری طریقہ کا انڈاکوڈر معجزات) اس مسئلہ کو حل سکتے ہیں However, the additional pretraining of the BERT model is difficult because it requires significant computing resources. ایک کوڈر کو مفید طور پر سیکھ رہا ہے جو ٹوکنوں کی بدلنے کو دقیق (ELECTRA) سمجھ رہا ہے۔ یہاں، ہم ایک طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ڈومین شیفٹ میں پرٹرینڈ موڈل کی کمپیوٹرینڈ کے مطابق کامپیوتر کے مطابق دفاع کریں، ایک جاپانی ڈاٹ سٹ پر ELECTRA پرٹرینڈ موڈل بنا کر اور اس موڈل کو ڈاٹ سٹ کے مطابق ڈاٹ سٹ کے مطابق ہم نے جاپانی میں ELECTRA کے لئے ایک پرٹرینڈ موڈل بنایا اور ایک دفتر کلاسپیٹ کے کام پر ایک آزمائش کی تھی جو جاپانی نیویس لکھائیوں کے ذریعہ سے ڈاٹے استعمال کر رہی تھی. نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ اگرچہ ایک موڈل بھی زیادہ چھوٹی موڈل برابر عمل کرتا ہے۔', 'so': 'Hadii ugu dhowayd bedelka gudaha, taasoo saameyn ku yeelanaya si saxda ah oo ku saabsan kala duwan macluumaadka u dhexeeya asalka iyo meelaha la isku hago, waxay noqotay arrin aad u adag marka lagu isticmaalo qaababka waxbarashada machine in lagu xalliyo shaqooyinka lagu baaraandegayo afka dabiicadda ah. Sida uu ku isticmaalo qalabka deegaanka oo kale ku soo daabaqo iyo qoraal-bannaan, tusaale ahaan qaababka ka soo daabaqo tusaale ahaan BERT (Representations of Bidirectional Encoder from Transformers) waxay arrintan ka macaamiloon karaan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee dib u soo celinta modelka BERT waa adag tahay sababtoo ah waxay u baahan tahay hanti aad u badan xisaabinta. Qoraalka aad u barashada ayaa si saxda ah isbedelka calaamada si saxda ah (ELECTRA) u bedela qaababka hore-ka-dhigidda luqada BERT oo u beddelaya qaab lagu beddelo calaamada bedelka, kaas oo kordhiya awoodda xisaabta, wuxuuna u raadsan karaa dib-u-dhigidda modelka si caadiga ah. Herein, we propose a method for addressing the computational efficiency of pretraining models in domain shift by constructing an ELECTRA pretraining model on a Japanese dataset and additional pretraining this model in a downstream task using a corpus from the target domain.  Dhab ahaan baannu uga dhisnay ELECTRA oo ku qoran Jabanees, waxaana sameynay imtixaamo ku saabsan shaqada qoraalka fasaxda oo ku isticmaalaya macluumaadka warqadaha Japanese. Midhaha resultadu waxay muuqataa in xittaa tusaale ka yar muuqashada hore uu si siman u sameeyo.', 'ta': 'அண்மையில், மூலத்திற்கும் சேர்க்கும் மூலங்களுக்கும் இடையே தரவுகளின் வேறுபாடுகள் காரணத்தால் களம் மாற்றம், இயந்திர மொழி செயல்படுத்தும கூடுதலாக மழையும் நன்றாக்குதலும் மூலம் இலக்கு களம் குறியீட்டை பயன்படுத்தி, BERT போன்ற மாதிரிகளை மாதிரியும் மாதிரிகள் இந்த பிரச்சனை முடி எனினும், BERT மாதிரியின் கூடுதல் மழையும் கடினமாக இருக்கும் ஏனெனில் அது முக்கியமான கணிப்பொறி வளங்கள் தேவை குறியீட்டை சரியாக வகுக்கும் குறியீட்டு மாதிரி( ELECTRA) மாதிரி மாதிரி பெரிய முறைமையை மாற்றும் முறைமையை மாற்றும் முறைமையை மாற்றுகிறது, மாற்றிய குறியீடு கண்டுபிடிப்பு என்ற முறையில இங்கு, நாம் ஒரு முறையை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கிறோம் இலக்கு களத்தில் இருந்து ஒரு ELECTRA மாதிரியை உருவாக்குவதற்கான கணிப்பாட்டின் விளைவு மாதிரியை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க முடியும் முறையில நாங்கள் ஜப்பானியில் ELECTRA க்கு முன்னோட்டமைப்பு மாதிரி உருவாக்கினோம் மற்றும் ஜப்பானிய செய்தி கட்டுரைகளை பயன்படுத்தி தக முடிவுகள் ஒரு மாதிரி கூட மாதிரியை விட சிறியதாக காட்டும்', 'uz': "Yaqinda, domen oʻzgarishlari, manba va maqola domenening орасидаги ўзгартишлар сабабидан аниқ таъсир beradi. Mashine o'rganish usullarini ishlatish uchun asl tilni boshqarish vazifalarini ishlatish uchun juda muhim muammolar edi. Name Lekin BERT modelining qoʻshimcha o'ylashni qiyin, chunki u juda muhim kompyuterni taklif qilish kerak. Name Herein, we propose a method for addressing the computational efficiency of pretraining models in domain shift by constructing an ELECTRA pretraining model on a Japanese dataset and additional pretraining this model in a downstream task using a corpus from the target domain.  Biz Yaponiya tilida ELECTRA modelini yaratdik va Japoniya news maqolalari bilan maʼlumot yordamida hujjat classification vazifasini bajardik. Natijalar ko'rsatadi, taqdim modeldan kichik model ham yaxshi bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Dạo gần đây, việc chuyển nhượng miền, tác động đến độ chính xác nhờ sự khác nhau trong dữ liệu giữa miền gốc và miền đích, đã trở thành vấn đề nghiêm trọng khi dùng phương pháp học máy để giải quyết các công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Thêm mưa và độ chín nhờ một tập thể miền đích, các mô hình trước khi mưa như BERT (Đài Truyền Mã hoá) có thể giải quyết vấn đề này. Tuy nhiên, loại bỏ thêm của mô hình BERT lại rất khó khăn vì nó đòi hỏi một nguồn tính toán quan trọng. Việc tìm hiểu một bộ mã hóa có hiệu quả phân loại các thay thế tượng hình tượng trước giá trị bằng biểu tượng thay thế bằng cách dùng một phương pháp có thể thay thế bằng chứng nhận dạng biểu tượng thay thế, nâng cao hiệu suất tính to án thay thế và cho phép thay đổi hình thức của mô hình. Ở đây, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp để xử lý hiệu quả tính của các mô hình trước khi rơi vào miền dưới bằng cách xây dựng một mô hình hạt Dãi cho một bộ dữ liệu Nhật Bản và thêm chất lượng này trong một nhiệm vụ xuôi dòng sử dụng một tập thể từ miền đích. Chúng tôi đã tạo ra một mô hình pretending cho thiện xạ trong Nhật Bản và thực hiện thử nghiệm về một nhiệm vụ phân loại tài liệu bằng dữ liệu từ các báo chí Nhật Bản. Kết quả cho thấy ngay cả mô hình nhỏ hơn mẫu trước cũng tiến triển tốt như vậy.', 'bg': 'Напоследък смяната на домейна, която засяга точността поради разликите в данните между източника и целевите домейни, се превърна в сериозен проблем при използването на методи за машинно обучение за решаване на задачи по обработка на естествен език. С допълнително предтрениране и фино настройване с използване на целеви домейни корпус, предтренировъчни модели като двупосочни представяне на кодери от трансформатори могат да се справят с този проблем. Допълнителното предварително обучение на модела BERT обаче е трудно, тъй като изисква значителни изчислителни ресурси. Ефективното изучаване на кодер, който класифицира точно заместващите символи (ЕЛЕКТРА), замества маскираното езиково моделиране на метода за предтрениране с метод, наречен откриване на заместени символи, което подобрява изчислителната ефективност и позволява допълнителното предтрениране на модела до практическа степен. Предлагаме метод за справяне с изчислителната ефективност на моделите за предтрениране при промяна на домейна чрез конструиране на модел за предтрениране върху японски набор от данни и допълнително предтрениране на този модел в задача надолу по веригата, използвайки корпус от целевата област. Изработихме модел за подготовка на ЕЛЕКТРА на японски език и проведохме експерименти по задача за класификация на документи, използвайки данни от японски новинарски статии. Резултатите показват, че дори модел по-малък от предварително тренирания модел се представя еднакво добре.', 'nl': 'Recent is domeinverschuiving, die invloed heeft op de nauwkeurigheid als gevolg van verschillen in gegevens tussen bron- en doeldomeinen, een ernstig probleem geworden bij het gebruik van machine learning methoden om natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken op te lossen. Met extra pretraining en finetuning met behulp van een doeldomein corpus kunnen pretraining modellen zoals BERT (Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers) dit probleem oplossen. De aanvullende pretraining van het BERT-model is echter moeilijk omdat het aanzienlijke rekenmiddelen vereist. Het efficiënt leren van een encoder die tokenvervangingen nauwkeurig classificeert (ELECTRA) pretraining model vervangt de gemaskeerde taalmodellering van de BERT pretraining methode met een methode genaamd replaced token detection, die de rekenefficiëntie verbetert en de extra pretraining van het model in praktische mate mogelijk maakt. Hierin stellen we een methode voor voor het aanpakken van de rekenefficiëntie van pretraining modellen in domeinverschuiving door een ELECTRA pretraining model te bouwen op een Japanse dataset en dit model extra pretraining in een downstream taak met behulp van een corpus uit het doeldomein. We bouwden een pretraining model voor ELECTRA in het Japans en voerden experimenten uit op een documentclassificatietaak met behulp van gegevens uit Japanse nieuwsberichten. Resultaten tonen aan dat zelfs een model kleiner dan het voorgetrainde model even goed presteert.', 'hr': 'Nedavno je promjena domena koja utječe na preciznost zbog razlika podataka između izvora i ciljnih domena postala ozbiljna pitanja kada se koristi metode učenja strojeva za rješavanje zadataka prirodnog obrade jezika. Uz dodatne pretkišenje i fino prilagođenje korpusom ciljnog domena, modeli pretkišenja poput BERT (predstavljanja dvosmjernih kodera iz transformera) mogu riješiti ovaj problem. Međutim, dodatno pretvaranje modela BERT-a je teško jer zahtijeva značajne računalne resurse. Efikasno učenje kodera koji precizno klasifikira zamjene znakova (ELECTRA) pretresnog model a zamjenjuje maskirani jezik metode pretresanja BERT-a s metodom nazivom zamjenom otkrivanjem znakova, koja poboljšava računalnu učinkovitost i omogućava praktično dodatno pretresanje modela. Ovdje predlažemo metodu za rješavanje računalne učinkovitosti model a pretreniranja u smjeni domena izgradnjem modela pretreniranja ELECTRA na japanskom setu podataka i dodatno pretreniranje ovog modela u donjem zadatku koristeći korpus iz ciljne domene. Napravili smo model pretkivanja za ELECTRA na japanskom jeziku i provodili eksperimente na zadatku klasifikacije dokumenta koristeći podatke iz japanskih novinskih članaka. Rezultati pokazuju da čak i model manji od pretkišnog model a dobro izvodi.', 'da': 'For nylig er domæneskiftet, som påvirker nøjagtigheden på grund af forskelle i data mellem kilde- og måldomæner, blevet et alvorligt problem, når du bruger maskinlæringsmetoder til at løse naturlige sprogbehandlingsopgaver. Med yderligere foruddannelse og finjustering ved hjælp af et måldomænekorpus kan foruddannelsesmodeller som BERT (Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers) løse dette problem. Den yderligere foruddannelse af BERT-modellen er imidlertid vanskelig, fordi den kræver betydelige computerressourcer. Den effektive læring af en encoder, der klassificerer token-erstatninger nøjagtigt (ELECTRA) forudtræningsmodellen, erstatter BERT-forudtræningsmetodens maskerede sprogmodellering med en metode kaldet erstattet token-detektion, hvilket forbedrer beregningseffektiviteten og muliggør yderligere forudtræning af modellen i praktisk udstrækning. Heri foreslår vi en metode til at håndtere beregningseffektiviteten af pre-training modeller i domæneskift ved at konstruere en ELECTRA pre-training model på et japansk datasæt og yderligere pre-training denne model i en downstream opgave ved hjælp af et corpus fra måldomænet. Vi konstruerede en foruddannelsesmodel for ELECTRA på japansk og udførte eksperimenter på en dokumentklassifikationsopgave ved hjælp af data fra japanske nyhedsartikler. Resultaterne viser, at selv en model, der er mindre end den forudtrænede model, klarer sig lige så godt.', 'de': 'In letzter Zeit ist der Domain-Shift, der die Genauigkeit aufgrund von Unterschieden in den Daten zwischen Quell- und Zieldomänen beeinträchtigt, zu einem ernsthaften Problem geworden, wenn maschinelle Lernmethoden zur Lösung natürlicher Sprachverarbeitungsaufgaben eingesetzt werden. Mit zusätzlichem Vortraining und Feinabstimmung unter Verwendung eines Zieldomänenkorpus können Vortrainingsmodelle wie BERT (Bidirektional Encoder Representations from Transformers) dieses Problem beheben. Das zusätzliche Vortraining des BERT-Modells ist jedoch schwierig, da es erhebliche Rechenressourcen erfordert. Der effizient lernende Encoder, der Token Replacements akkurat klassifiziert (ELECTRA), ersetzt die maskierte Sprachmodellierung der BERT Pretraining Methode durch eine Methode namens Replaced Token Detection, die die Recheneffizienz verbessert und das zusätzliche Pretraining des Modells in praktischem Umfang ermöglicht. Hierin schlagen wir eine Methode vor, um die Recheneffizienz von Vortrainingsmodellen in Domänenverschiebungen zu adressieren, indem wir ein ELECTRA Vortrainingsmodell auf einem japanischen Datensatz konstruieren und dieses Modell in einer nachgelagerten Aufgabe mit einem Korpus aus der Zieldomäne zusätzlich vortrainieren. Wir konstruierten ein Vortrainingsmodell für ELECTRA auf Japanisch und führten Experimente zu einer Dokumentenklassifikationsaufgabe mit Daten aus japanischen Nachrichtenartikeln durch. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass auch ein Modell kleiner als das vortrainierte Modell gleichermaßen gut abschneidet.', 'id': 'Baru-baru ini, perubahan domain, yang mempengaruhi akurasi karena perbedaan dalam data antara domain sumber dan target, telah menjadi masalah serius ketika menggunakan metode belajar mesin untuk memecahkan tugas proses bahasa alam. Dengan pretraining tambahan dan fine-tuning menggunakan target domain corpus, pretraining model seperti BERT (Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers) dapat mengatasi masalah ini. Namun, perkelahian tambahan model BERT sulit karena membutuhkan sumber komputer yang signifikan. Belajar efisien pengekode yang mengklasifikasi penggantian token dengan akurat (ELECTRA) model pretraining menggantikan metode pretraining BERT model bahasa bertopeng dengan metode yang disebut deteksi token yang digantikan, yang meningkatkan efisiensi komputasi dan memungkinkan pretraining tambahan model secara praktis. Di sini, kami mengusulkan metode untuk mengatasi efisiensi komputasional model pretraining dalam shift domain dengan membangun model pretraining ELECTRA pada set data Jepang dan tambahan pretraining model ini dalam tugas turun menggunakan corpus dari domain target. Kami membangun model pre-training untuk ELECTRA dalam bahasa Jepang dan melakukan eksperimen pada tugas klasifikasi dokumen menggunakan data dari artikel berita Jepang. Results show that even a model smaller than the pretrained model performs equally well.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 기계 학습 방법을 사용하여 자연 언어 처리 임무를 해결할 때 원역과 목표역 간의 데이터 차이로 인해 정확성에 영향을 주는 역 이동은 이미 심각한 문제가 되었다.목표역 어료 라이브러리를 사용하여 BERT (트랜스포머에서 온 양방향 인코더 표시) 와 같은 추가 예훈련 모델을 사용하면 이 문제를 해결할 수 있다.그러나 버트 모델의 추가 훈련은 대량의 계산 자원이 필요하기 때문에 어렵다.효율적인 학습으로 영패 교체를 정확하게 분류하는 인코더(ELECTRA) 예비훈련 모델은 베르토 예비훈련 방법의 복면 언어 모델을 교체영패 검측이라고 하는 방법으로 교체함으로써 계산 효율을 높이고 실제 범위 내에서 모델에 대한 액외 예비훈련을 허용한다.이에 따라 우리는 역이동 중 예훈련 모델의 계산 효율을 해결하는 방법을 제시했다. 방법은 일본 데이터 집합에서 ELECTRA 예훈련 모델을 구축하고 하류 임무에서 목표역에서 온 어료 라이브러리를 사용하여 이 모델에 대해 추가 예훈련을 하는 것이다.우리는 ELECTRA를 위해 일본어에서 예비 훈련 모델을 구축하고 일본 뉴스 기사의 데이터를 이용하여 문서 분류 임무를 실험했다.그 결과 예훈련 모델보다 작은 모델도 마찬가지로 잘 나왔다.', 'fa': 'تازگی، تغییر دومین، که به خاطر تغییرات داده\u200cهای بین منبع و دامنهای هدف تاثیر می\u200cدهد، موقع استفاده از روش یادگیری ماشین برای حل کار\u200cهای پردازش زبان طبیعی یک مشکل جدی می\u200cشود. با استفاده از یک کورپوس دامنی هدف، مدل\u200cهای تغییر کردن مانند BERT (نمایش\u200cهای کوردور دورانی از تغییر\u200cدهندگان) می\u200cتواند این مسئله را حل کند. با این حال، تحریک اضافی از مدل BERT سخت است، زیرا نیاز به منابع محاسبات مهم است. موثرت یاد کردن یک کودهر که دقیقاً جایگزینش\u200cهای نشان\u200cها (ELECTRA) را ترجیح می\u200cدهد، مدل پیشنهاد\u200cکننده\u200cی نشان\u200cهای نشان\u200cها را با یک روش به نام کشف\u200cهای نشان\u200cهای جایگزینی تغییر می\u200cدهد، که موثرت محاسبات را بهبود می\u200cکند و اجازه می\u200cدهد پیشنهاد مدل را به اندازه\u200cی عملی به جایگز در این مورد، ما یک روش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با ساختن یک مدل پیش\u200cگیری ELECTRA روی یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای ژاپنی و پیش\u200cگیری این مدل را در یک کار پایین پایین از یک کورپوس از دامنه هدف در مورد استفاده از یک کورپوس استفاده کنیم. ما یک مدل تحریک برای ELECTRA در ژاپنی ساختیم و آزمایشات را روی یک کار تحریک سند با استفاده از داده\u200cها از مقاله\u200cهای خبری ژاپنی انجام دادیم. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که حتی یک مدل کوچکتر از مدل پیش ریخته\u200cشده به طور درست انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Hivi karibuni, mabadiliko ya ndani, ambayo yanaathiri uhalisia kutokana na tofauti za taarifa kati ya vyanzo na maeneo yanayolenga, yamekuwa suala kubwa pale kutumia njia za kujifunza mashine ili kutatua kazi za upasuaji wa lugha za asili. Kwa kutumia vifaa vingine vya kutengeneza mvua na kuboresha vizuri kwa kutumia makampuni ya ndani yenye lengo, kutengeneza mifano kama vile BERT (Representations from Transformers) wanaweza kuhoji suala hili. Hata hivyo, mvua ya kuongezeka kwa muundo wa BERT ni vigumu kwa sababu inahitaji rasilimali muhimu za kompyuta. Kujifunza kwa ufanisi kwamba hubadilisha mabadiliko ya alama (ELECTRA) kwa namna ya kutengeneza mifano inabadilisha mtindo wa lugha yenye uchunguzi wa BERT kwa njia inayoitwa kubadilishwa kwa alama, ambayo inaongezea ufanisi wa hisabati na inaruhusu kutengeneza mvua kwa kiwango kiuhalisia. Hii, tunapendekeza njia ya kuhusiana na ufanisi wa kompyuta wa kutengeneza mifano ya kutengeneza mabadiliko ya ndani kwa kutengeneza modeli ya ELECTRA ya kutengeneza matumizi ya matumizi ya data nchini Japani na kuongeza matumizi ya kutengeneza modeli hii katika kazi ya mito ya chini kwa kutumia vifaa kutoka kwenye eneo la lengo. Tumetengeneza mfano wa ELECTRA nchini Japani na tukafanya majaribio juu ya kazi ya usambazaji wa nyaraka kwa kutumia taarifa kutoka makala za habari za Japani. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa hata mtindo mdogo kuliko modeli uliofanana unafanya vizuri.', 'af': "Onlangs, domein verskuif, wat afvloek presies vanweë verskilte in data tussen bron en doel domeine, het 'n ernstige probleem geword wanneer masjien leer metodes gebruik word om natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte te los. Met addisionele pretreëning en fin-tuning gebruik van 'n doel domein korpus, pretreënmodele soos BERT (Bidireksionale enkoder voorstellings van Transformers) kan hierdie probleem adres. Maar die addisionele presreëning van die BERT model is moeilik, want dit benodig betekende rekenaar hulpbronne. Die effektief leer van 'n enkoder wat klassifiseer token vervangings akkuraat (ELECTRA) pretraining model vervang die BERT pretraining metode se maskerde taal modellering met 'n metode genoem vervangde token opdekking, wat die rekenaar effektief verbeter en toelaat die addisionele pretraining van die model na 'n praktiese uitbreiding toe. Hierin, ons voorstel 'n metode om die rekenaarske effektiviteit van die pretraining modele in domein skakel te adres deur 'n ELECTRA pretraining model te konstrukteer op 'n Japanse datastel en addisionele pretraining van hierdie model in 'n onderstreem taak te gebruik met 'n korpus van die doel domein. Ons het 'n pretraining model vir ELECTRA in Japanse gebou en eksperimente gedoen op 'n dokumentklassifikasie taak met gebruik van data van Japanse nuus artikels. Resultate wys dat selfs 'n model kleiner as die voorstrek model gelyk goed uitvoer.", 'sq': 'Recently, domain shift, which affects accuracy due to differences in data between source and target domains, has become a serious issue when using machine learning methods to solve natural language processing tasks. Me parastërvitje shtesë dhe rregullim të hollësishëm duke përdorur një korpus domeni objektiv, modele parastërvitje të tillë si BERT (Përfaqësuese të koduesve dy-drejtorë nga Transformuesit) mund të trajtojnë këtë çështje. Megjithatë, paratrajtimi shtesë i model it BERT është i vështirë sepse kërkon burime të rëndësishme kompjuterike. Mësimi efektiv i një koduesi që klasifikon me saktësi modelin e parastërvitjes s ë token (ELECTRA) zëvendëson modelimin e gjuhës së maskuar të metodës së parastërvitjes BERT me një metodë të quajtur zbulim i zëvendësuar token, i cili përmirëson efektshmërinë llogaritare dhe lejon parastërvitjen shtesë të modelit në një shkallë praktike. Këtu, ne propozojmë një metodë për trajtimin e efikasitetit kompjuterik të modeleve të parastërvitjes në ndryshimin e domenit duke ndërtuar një model ELECTRA të parastërvitjes në një set të dhënash japoneze dhe parastërvitjen shtesë të këtij modeli në një detyrë poshtë duke përdorur një korpus nga domeni objektiv. Ne ndërtuam një model parakursimi për ELECTRA në japonez dhe kryem eksperimente në një detyrë klasifikimi dokumentesh duke përdorur të dhënat nga artikujt e lajmeve japoneze. Rezultatet tregojnë se edhe një model më i vogël se modeli i stërvitur përpara funksionon njëlloj mirë.', 'tr': 'Soňky wagtlar, çeşme we maksady alanlaryň arasyndaky maglumatyň arasyndaky tapawutlaryna uğraşan domena üýtgetmek üçin maşyny öwrenmek taryşlaryny ulananda çykyp çözmek üçin esasy mesele boldy. BERT (Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers) bu meseleyi çözebilir. Bu şekilde BERT modelinin eklemesi kyn, çünki wajyp hasaplamak çeşmeleri gerek. Etkinlik öwrenmek üçin token almagyny dogry klasifik eden bir ködler (ELECTRA) önlemek nusgasyny BERT önlemek metodumyň maskeli dilini örnekleýär. Bu sistemiň kalkularyň etkinliýetini geliňleýär we nusgasyny pratik bir şekilde s üýtgedir. Şimdi, biz domun değişikliklerinde önlenme modellerinin hesaplama etkinliğini çözmek için bir yöntem teklif ediyoruz. Bir ELECTRA veri setinde bir Japon veri setinde önlenme modeli oluşturarak ve bu modeli a şağıdaki görevde bir korpus kullanarak aşağı bir şekilde önlenme şeklini teklif ediyoruz. Biz ELECTRA üçin japonça dilinde läsirli nusga düzəldik we Japonça täzeliklerden maglumatlar ulanan bir sened klasifikasynda турdik. Netijenler, önlenmiş modelden hatta örnek kiçi bir şekilde eşit bir şekilde işlediğini gösteriyor.', 'am': 'Recently, domain shift, which affects accuracy due to differences in data between source and target domains, has become a serious issue when using machine learning methods to solve natural language processing tasks.  በተጨማሪም ዝናብ እና ጥሩ ማቀናቀል በተጨማሪው የዶሜን ኮምፕስ በመጠቀም፣ እንደBERT (የBidirectional Encoder Representatives from Transformers) ምሳሌዎችን እንደምትዘረጋ ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን የBERT ሞዴል መፍጠር በብዛት ምክንያት ትልቅ የተጠቃሚ ሀብት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ምልክት ማቀናጃ በተፈጸመ (ELECTRA) የሚለውጥ የሆኑት የኮድ ክፍል ማስተማርን በተለየ የፊደል ሞዴል BERT የፊደል ቋንቋ ምሳሌ ይለውጣል፤ በተለወጠው ምልክት ማቀናቀል በተለወጠ ዓይነት፣ ቁጥጥር ውስጥነት ያበጅላል፣ የሞዴላውን መዘርጋት በተጨማሪም ክፍል ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ፣ በጃፓን ዳታተሮች ላይ የELECTRA ሞዴል በመሠረት እና ይህንን ሞዴል በበታች ፈሳሾች ስራ ላይ በኮርፓስ ከክሮፕስ የሚጠይቁትን አካባቢ ማድረግ እና አካባቢ ማድረጊያውን በመጠቀም የውኃ አካባቢ አድራጊውን ለመቆጣጠር እናስባታለን፡፡ በጃፓንኛ ውስጥ ELECTRA የፊደል ሞዴል ሠርተናል እና ከጃፓን ዜና ጽሑፎች ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም የሰነድ ክፍተት ላይ ፈተናዎችን አደረግን፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ በተለየ ሞዴል የበለጠ ምሳሌ ይታነሳል፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջերս բնագավառների և նպատակային բնագավառների միջև տեղեկատվության ճշգրտության արդյունքում ազդում է բնագավառների և նպատակային բնագավառների միջև տեղեկատվության փոփոխությունը դառնում է լուրջ խնդիր, երբ մեքենային ուսումնասիրության մեթո Ավելին նախապատրաստման և բարելավման միջոցով օգտագործելով նպատակային տիեզերքի կորպուս, նախապատրաստման մոդելներ, ինչպիսիք են BER (Երկու ուղղությամբ կոդավորող ներկայացուցիչներ վերածողներից) կարող են լուծել այս խնդիրը: Այնուամենայնիվ, BER մոդելի ավելացյալ նախադասությունը դժվար է, որովհետև այն պահանջում է նշանակալի հաշվողական ռեսուրսներ: Էֆեկցիոնալ սովորելը նշանների փոխարինումները ճշգրիտ դասակարգում է (ELElectra) նախապատրաստման մոդելը փոխարինում է BER նախապատրաստման մեթոդի ծածկված լեզվի մոդելը նշաններով փոխարինված նշանների հայտնաբերման մեթոդով, որը բարելավում է հաշվարկման արդյունավետությունը և թույլ է տալիս մոդելի ավելաց Այստեղ մենք առաջարկում ենք մի մեթոդ, որպեսզի հաշվարկների արդյունավետության վերաբերյալ հաշվարկների արդյունավետությունը դիմել տիեզերական փոփոխության ընթացքում կառուցվելով ELELCEthr-ի նախապատրաստման մոդել ճապոնական տվյալների համակարգի վրա և ավելին նախապատրաստվելով այս մոդելը հետագա Մենք կառուցեցինք Էլեկտրա նախապատրաստման մոդել ճապոներեն լեզվով և կատարեցինք փորձեր փաստաթղթի դասակարգման խնդրի վրա՝ օգտագործելով ճապոներեն նորությունների տվյալներ: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ նույնիսկ փոքր մոդելը, քան նախօրինակված մոդելը, նույնքան լավ է աշխատում:', 'az': "Son zamanlarda, mənbələr və məqsəd domenilər arasındakı məlumatların dəyişikliklərinə görə, maşın öyrənmə metodlarını istifadə etmək üçün təbiətli dil işləmə işlərini çəkmək üçün dəyişiklik bir problemə oldu. Beləcə, BERT (Transformers'dən ikiyönəlmiş Encoder Görüntüləri) kimi məqsəd domeinin korpusu vasitəsilə əlavə təmizlənən və düzgün təmizlənən modellərlə bu meseleyi çəkə bilər. Ancaq BERT modelinin əlavə edilməsi çətin, çünki bu çox möhkəm hesablama resursu lazımdır. Etkili öyrənən kodlayıcı, token əvəzini düzgün (ELECTRA) ilə dəyişdirən pretraining modelini BERT pretraining metodunun maskəli dil modelini, əvəz olunan token deteksiyonu ilə dəyişdirən metodu ilə əvəz edir. Bu, hesablama faydalanılığını daha yaxşılaşdırır və modelinin əlavə edilməsini praktik qədər dəyişdirər. Beləliklə, biz bir Japon veri qutusu üzerində ELECTRA pretraining modeli in şa edərək, bu modeli a şağı bir işdə korpus vasitəsilə birlikdə kompjuterlik modellərin təşkil etkinliğini çəkmək üçün bir metodu təklif edirik. Biz Japon dilində ELECTRA üçün gözləmə modeli in şa etdik və Japon haqq məsələlərindən verilər vasitəsilə döküm klasifikasiyonu işlədik. Sonuçlar göstərir ki, daha kiçik modellərin əvvəlki modellərin eyni qədər yaxşı işlədiyini göstərir.", 'bs': 'Nedavno je promjena domena koja utječe na preciznost zbog razlika podataka između izvora i ciljnih domena postala ozbiljna pitanja kada se koristi metode učenja mašine za rješavanje zadataka prirodnog obrade jezika. Sa dodatnim pretkišenjem i ispravljanjem korpusom ciljnog domena, modeli pretkišenja poput BERT (predstavljanja dvosmjernih kodera iz transformera) mogu riješiti ovaj problem. Međutim, dodatno pretvaranje modela BERT je teško jer zahtijeva značajne računalne resurse. Efikasno učenje kodera koji precizno klasifikuje zamjene znakova (ELECTRA) pretresnog model a zamjenjuje maskirani jezik metode pretresanja BERT sa metodom koja se zove zamjenjena detekcija znakova, koja poboljšava računalnu efikasnost i omogućava dodatno pretresanje modela u praktičnu mjeru. Ovdje predlažemo metodu za rješavanje računalne učinkovitosti model a pretvaranja u smjenu domena izgradnjem modela pretvaranja ELECTRA na japanskom setu podataka i dodatno pretvaranje ovog modela u donjem zadatku koristeći korpus iz ciljne domene. Napravili smo model pretkivanja za ELECTRA na japanskom jeziku i provodili eksperimente na zadatku klasifikacije dokumenta koristeći podatke iz japanskih novinskih članaka. Rezultati pokazuju da čak i model manji od pretkišenog model a dobro izvodi.', 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজ সমাধানের জন্য ডোমেইন পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে তথ্য এবং লক্ষ্য ডোমেনের মধ্যে পার্থক্যের কারণে ডোমেইন পরিবর্ টার্গেট ডোমেইন কোর্পাস ব্যবহার করে অতিরিক্ত ভাবে বৃষ্টি এবং সুন্দর প্রতিষ্ঠানের মাধ্যমে, বিবের্ট (ট্রান্সফর্মার থেকে বাইডেক্যাল এনকো তবে বিবেরেটি মডেলের আরো বৃষ্টিপাত কঠিন কারণ এটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সম্পদ গণনা প্রয়োজন। কার্যকরভাবে একটি এনকোডার শিখতে পারে যে চিহ্নের প্রতিস্থাপন সঠিকভাবে (ELECTRA) প্রতিস্থাপনের মডেলের প্রতিস্থাপন করে বিবেরেটের মুখোশিত ভাষার মডেলের পরিবর্তে প্রতিষ্ঠিত হয়েছে যার মাধ্যমে এক পদ্ধতির পর এখানে আমরা একটি উপায়ের প্রস্তাব করছি যে আমরা ডোমেইন পরিবর্তনের গণনায় মডেল নির্মাণ করতে পারি একটি ইলেক্ট্রা নির্মাণ করে একটি জাপানী ডাটাসেটের মডেল নির্মাণ করে এবং এই মডেলটিকে নীচে বৃষ্টি করার আমরা জাপানীয় ইলেক্ট্রার জন্য একটি প্রাকদর্শন মডেল নির্মাণ করেছি এবং জাপানী সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের তথ্য ব্যবহার করে একটি নথিপত্র বিভাগ কা ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে এমনকি প্রেমিক মডেলের চেয়ে ছোট একটা মডেল একই ভালো কাজ করে।', 'cs': 'Posun domény, který ovlivňuje přesnost v důsledku rozdílů v datech mezi zdrojovou a cílovou doménou, se v poslední době stal vážným problémem při používání metod strojového učení k řešení úloh zpracování přirozeného jazyka. S dalším předškolením a jemným laděním pomocí korpusu cílové domény lze tento problém řešit modely předškolení, jako je BERT (Bidirektional Encoder Representations from Transformers). Dodatečné předškolení modelu BERT je však obtížné, protože vyžaduje značné výpočetní zdroje. Efektivní učení kodéru, který přesně klasifikuje model předtréninku tokenů (ELECTRA), nahrazuje maskované jazykové modelování metody BERT metodou detekce tokenů, která zlepšuje výpočetní efektivitu a v praktické míře umožňuje další předtrénink modelu. V této práci navrhujeme metodu řešení výpočetní efektivity modelů předtréninku při posunu domén konstrukcí modelu předtréninku ELECTRA na japonském datovém souboru a dalším předtréninkem tohoto modelu v následné úloze pomocí korpusu z cílové domény. Vytvořili jsme model předtréninku pro ELECTRA v japonštině a provedli experimenty na úloze klasifikace dokumentů s využitím dat z japonských zpravodajských článků. Výsledky ukazují, že i model menší než předtrénovaný model funguje stejně dobře.', 'ca': "Recentment, el canvi de dominis, que afecta la precisió degut a les diferències en les dades entre dominis de font i d'alvo, s'ha convertit en un problema seriós quan utilitzen mètodes d'aprenentatge màquinari per resoldre tasques naturals de processament de llenguatges. Amb la pré-capacitació adicional i l'ajustament fent servir un corpus de domini d'objectiu, models de pré-capacitació com BERT (Representacions Bidirectional Encoder from Transformers) poden abordar aquest problema. No obstant això, la pré-formació adicional del model BERT és difícil perquè necessita recursos informàtics significatius. The efficiently learning an encoder that classifies token replacements accurately (ELECTRA) pretraining model replaces the BERT pretraining method's masked language modeling with a method called replaced token detection, which improves the computational efficiency and allows the additional pretraining of the model to a practical extent.  A aquest lloc, proposem un mètode per abordar l'eficiència computacional dels models de pré-formació en el canvi de domini construint un model d'ELECTRA de pré-formació en un conjunt de dades japonès i una pré-formació adicional en una tasca avall utilitzant un corpus del domini d'objectiu. Vam construir un model de pré-capacitació d'ELECTRA en japonès i vam fer experiments en una tasca de classificació de documents fent servir dades d'articles de notícies japoneses. Els resultats mostren que fins i tot un model més petit que el model pré-entrenat funciona igualment bé.", 'et': 'Hiljuti on masinõppe meetodite kasutamisel looduskeele töötlemise ülesannete lahendamiseks muutunud tõsiseks probleemiks domeenivahetus, mis mõjutab täpsust lähte- ja sihtdomeenide erinevuste tõttu. Täiendava eeltreeningu ja täpsustamise abil sihtdomeenikorpuse abil saavad selle probleemi lahendada sellised eeltreeningmudelid nagu BERT (kahesuunalised kodeerijad Transformeritest). BERTi mudeli täiendav eelõpetamine on siiski keeruline, sest see nõuab märkimisväärseid arvutusressursse. Tokenide asendamist täpselt klassifitseeriva kodeerija (ELECTRA) efektiivne õppimine asendab BERT-eeltreeningmeetodi maskeeritud keele modelleerimise meetodiga, mida nimetatakse asendatud tokeni tuvastamiseks, mis parandab arvutusefektiivsust ja võimaldab mudeli täiendavat eeltreeningut praktilises ulatuses. Siinkohal pakume välja meetodi, kuidas käsitleda eeltreeningu mudelite arvutusefektiivsust domeeninihkes, ehitades Jaapani andmekogumile ELECTRA eeltreeningu mudeli ja lisaks eeltreeningu mudeli alljärgnevas ülesandes, kasutades sihtdomeenist pärit korpust. Ehitasime ELECTRA jaoks jaapani keeles eeltreeningu mudeli ja viisime läbi eksperimente dokumentide klassifitseerimise ülesandega, kasutades jaapani uudisteartiklitest saadud andmeid. Tulemused näitavad, et isegi eeltreenitud mudelist väiksem mudel toimib sama hästi.', 'fi': 'Viime aikoina verkkotunnuksen vaihtamisesta, joka vaikuttaa tarkkuuteen lähde- ja kohdeverkkotunnusten välisten tietojen eroiden vuoksi, on tullut vakava ongelma, kun koneoppimismenetelmiä käytetään luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävien ratkaisemiseen. Lisäesikoulutuksella ja hienosäädöllä kohdeverkkotunnuskorpusta käyttämällä esikoulutusmallit, kuten BERT (Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers), voivat ratkaista tämän ongelman. BERT-mallin esikoulutus on kuitenkin vaikeaa, koska se vaatii merkittäviä laskentaresursseja. Tokeneiden korvaamista tarkasti luokittelevan kooderin (ELECTRA) tehokas oppiminen korvaa BERT-esikoulutusmenetelmän masked language modelling menetelmällä nimeltä replaced token detection, joka parantaa laskennallista tehokkuutta ja mahdollistaa mallin lisäkoulutuksen käytännössä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme menetelmää esikoulutusmallien laskennalliseen tehokkuuteen domeeninvaihdoksessa rakentamalla ELECTRA-esikoulutusmallin japanilaiselle datajoukolle ja lisäkouluttamalla tätä mallia loppupään tehtävässä kohdedomeenin korpusella. Rakensimme ELECTRAlle japaninkielisen esikoulutusmallin ja teimme kokeita dokumenttieluokitustehtävässä käyttäen japanilaisten uutisartikkeleiden dataa. Tulokset osoittavat, että esikoulutettua mallia pienempi malli toimii yhtä hyvin.', 'sk': 'V zadnjem času je sprememba domene, ki vpliva na natančnost zaradi razlik v podatkih med izvornimi in ciljnimi domenami, postala resna težava pri uporabi metod strojnega učenja za reševanje nalog obdelave naravnega jezika. Z dodatnim predusposabljanjem in natančnim nastavitvijo s korpusom ciljne domene lahko to težavo rešijo modeli predusposabljanja, kot je BERT (predstavitve dvosmernih kodirnikov iz transformatorjev). Vendar pa je dodatno predusposabljanje modela BERT težko, ker zahteva znatne računalniške vire. Učinkovito učenje kodirnika, ki natančno razvršča zamenjave žetonov (ELECTRA), nadomešča modeliranje maskiranega jezikovnega modeliranja BERT metode predtreniranja z metodo imenovano zaznavanje zamenjanih žetonov, ki izboljšuje računalniško učinkovitost in omogoča dodatno predtreniranje modela v praktičnem obsegu. V nadaljevanju predlagamo metodo za obravnavanje računalniške učinkovitosti modelov predtreninga pri premiku domene s konstrukcijo modela predtreninga ELECTRA na japonskem naboru podatkov in dodatnim predtreningom tega modela v nadaljnjem delu z uporabo korpusa iz ciljne domene. Izdelali smo model predtreninga za ELECTRA v japonščini in izvedli eksperimente na nalogi klasifikacije dokumentov s podatki iz japonskih člankov. Rezultati kažejo, da tudi model, manjši od predtreniranega modela, deluje enako dobro.', 'jv': 'recent, domain shift, that affect exact Dubo with additional presining and Fin-tuning use a goal domain capitus, presining modes like BERT (Bidirectial decoder representtations from Transformer) can Address this question. Nanging, maneh dumateng manut BERT kuwi susah-susahe kuwi dianggap ngono kaya butuh dolanan sak komputer. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness herein, we proposal a method for Address-ing the dataset and additional presininging this model in a downtream task use a corus from the goal domain. Awak dhéwé nggawe model sing paling-urip nggawe ETESTRA ning japong lan ngawe barang nggawe pancening nggambar kelas kuwi nggambar data suku Artis Japong Pametuné wong ngomong nik model sing paling apik ning model sing bisa ngeduluran maneh.', 'ha': "A yanzu, shige ɗin Domen, wanda ke yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka da ke shagala a tsakanin maɓallin mutane da ke amfani da shi, ya zama mai girma idan an yi amfani da shiryoyin ayukan ayuka da ke zartar da aikin aiki na fassarar harshe na asili. Ga da ƙara tsari da baka mai kyau, yana amfani da nau'in komai wanda aka yi amfani da shi, misãlai na kiyaye misãlai kamar BERT (Repositories of Digitimal Encoder daga Transformers) can address wannan masu al'amarin. A lokacin da ake ƙara zaurin misalin BERT mai tsanani, dõmin yana da amfani mai girma ga lissafi. Mai amfani da wani kode wanda ke rarraba matsayin ayuka da aka daidaita (ELEctra) na musanya motel ɗin da misalin ayuka na BERT ya musanya shirin ayuka mai rufe BERT, yana da shirin da aka bada canza tsarin ayuka da aka bada shi, yana ƙara fassarar akansa da lissafi kuma yana yarda da addi wa raini wa motel zuwa wani fasa. Daga wannan, Muke buɗa ɗe ɗabi'a wa ƙidãya masu amfani da shiryoyin misãlai cikin shifta guda da za'a samun wata ELEctra ta zama misãlai mai nuna a kan danne-danne na japane kuma yana ƙara yi misalin wannan misalin a cikin wani aikin ruwa na ƙarami, ko na yi amfani da wani nau'in daga sauri wanda za'a yi amfani da shi. Mun gina wani misãlin da aka yi wa ELEctra a cikin Jabaniya kuma Muka samun jarrabãwa a kan wani aikin takardar sigarin takarda da za'a yi amfani da data daga takardar lãbãri na Jabaniya. Ana nuna cewa, kõ kuwa wata motel mafi ƙaranci daga misalin da aka yi daɗawa, yana aiki daidai.", 'he': 'לאחרונה, שינוי שטח, אשר משפיע על מדויקת בגלל הבדלים בין מידע למקור למטרה, הפך לבעיה רצינית כשמשתמשים בשיטות לימוד מכונות לפתור משימות עיבוד שפה טבעיות. עם שימוש מוקדם ותרגיל נוסף באמצעות קורפוס בתחום המטרה, דוגמנים של שימוש מוקדם כמו BERT (מייצגי קודם שתיים כיוונים מ Transformers) יכולים להתמודד עם הנושא הזה. בכל אופן, התאמה הנוספת של דוגמנית BERT קשה כי היא דורשת משאבי מחשב משמעותיים. הלימודים היעילים של קודד שמקלסם את מודל החליפות של סימנים בדיוק (ELECTRA) מחליפים את מודל החליפות של שיטת החליפות של השפה המסווה של שיטת החליפות BERT עם שיטה שנקראת גילוי סימנים החליפים, אשר משפר את היעילות החישובית ומאפשר את החליפות החליפות הנוספת של המודל למידה מעשית. Herein, we propose a method for addressing the computational efficiency of pretraining models in domain shift by constructing an ELECTRA pretraining model on a Japanese dataset and additional pretraining this model in a downstream task using a corpus from the target domain.  בנינו דוגמא מלפני אימון לאלקטרה ביפנית ובצענו ניסויים על משימה מסמכים מסווגים באמצעות נתונים ממאמרי חדשות יפנים. התוצאות מראות שאפילו דוגמא קטנה יותר מהדוגמא המתאימת מבצעת היטב באותה מידה.', 'bo': "འཕྲལ་ཁམས་དེ་ལྟར་domain shift With additional pretraining and fine-tuning using a target domain corpus, pretraining models such as BERT (Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers) can address this issue. ཡིན་ནའང་། BERT མ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག The efficiently learning an encoder that classifies token replacements accurately (ELECTRA) pretraining model replaces the BERT pretraining method's masked language modeling with a method called replaced token detection, which improves the computational efficiency and allows the additional pretraining of the model to a practical extent. Herein, we propose a method for addressing the computational efficiency of pretraining models in domain shift by constructing an ELECTRA pretraining model on a Japanese dataset and additional pretraining this model in a downstream task using a corpus from the target domain. ང་ཚོས་ཉེ་ཧོང་གི་ནང་དུ་ELECTRA ལ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱས་ནས་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྟངས་ཞིག གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་མང་ཙམ་བཟོ་བའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་བ་ཞིག་ལས་ཆུང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཉེན་ཁ་ཤས་བྱེད།"}
{'en': 'Behavior of Modern Pre-trained Language Models Using the Example of Probing Tasks', 'ar': 'سلوك النماذج اللغوية الحديثة المدربة مسبقًا باستخدام مثال استقصاء المهام', 'es': 'Comportamiento de modelos lingüísticos preentrenados modernos utilizando el ejemplo de tareas de sondeo', 'pt': 'Comportamento de modelos de linguagem pré-treinados modernos usando o exemplo de tarefas de sondagem', 'fr': "Comportement des modèles linguistiques modernes pré-entraînés à l'aide de l'exemple des tâches de sondage", 'ja': 'プロービングタスクの例を使用した現代の事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルの動作', 'ru': 'Поведение современных предварительно обученных языковых моделей на примере задач зондирования', 'hi': 'आधुनिक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल का व्यवहार जांच कार्यों के उदाहरण का उपयोग करके', 'zh': '用探测事示例今代预训习言语模样的行为', 'ga': 'Iompraíocht Mhúnlaí Teanga Nua-Réamhoilte Ag Úsáid Sampla de Thascanna Tóraithe', 'ka': 'მოდინარე წინასწარმატებული ენის მოდელების მონაცემები', 'el': 'Συμπεριφορά σύγχρονων προ-εκπαιδευμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων χρησιμοποιώντας το παράδειγμα εργασιών ανίχνευσης', 'hu': 'Modern előképzett nyelvi modellek viselkedése a vizsgálati feladatok példájával', 'it': "Comportamento dei moderni modelli linguistici pre-addestrati utilizzando l'esempio di attività di prova", 'kk': 'Қазіргі алдыңғы оқылған тіл үлгілерінің қасиеттері', 'lt': 'Modernių išankstinio mokymo kalbos modelių elgesys, naudojantis bandymų užduočių pavyzdžiu', 'mk': 'Однесувањето на модерните предобучени јазички модели користејќи пример на тестирање задачи', 'ms': 'Perilaku Model Bahasa Terlatih Modern Mengguna Contoh Tugas Pengujian', 'ml': 'പ്രോബിങ്ങ് ജോലികളുടെ ഉദാഹരണമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന മുന്\u200dപരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ സ്വഭാവം', 'mt': 'Imġiba ta’ Mudelli Moderni tal-Lingwa mħarrġa minn qabel bl-użu tal-Eżempju ta’ Kompiti ta’ Probar', 'mn': 'Орчин үеийн сургалтын өмнөх хэл загварын үйл ажиллагааны жишээ ашиглах', 'no': 'Åtferd av moderne føretrained språk- modeller ved bruk av eksempel på prøveoppgåver', 'pl': 'Zachowanie nowoczesnych wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych na przykładzie zadań sondowania', 'ro': 'Comportamentul modelelor lingvistice moderne pre-instruite folosind exemplul de sarcini de probă', 'sr': 'Ponašanje modernih predobučenih jezičkih modela Koristeći primjer ispitivanja zadataka', 'si': 'අධ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණිත භාෂාව මොඩිල්ස් වර්තනය', 'so': 'Behavior of modern-trained Models of language used by using an example of Probining tasks', 'sv': 'Beteende hos moderna förberedda språkmodeller med hjälp av exempel på provuppgifter', 'ur': 'آغاز تربیت کی زبان موڈل کی رفتار', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய மொழி மாதிரியின் நடத்தை', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hành vi của các mô- đun ngôn ngữ được đào tạo hiện đại Sử dụng ví dụ của các nhiệm vụ định sẵn', 'hr': 'Ponašanje modernih predobučenih jezičkih modela Koristeći primjer ispitivanja zadataka', 'nl': 'Gedrag van moderne voorgetrainde taalmodellen aan de hand van het voorbeeld van proeftaken', 'bg': 'Поведение на съвременните предварително обучени езикови модели, използващи примера за задачи за сондиране', 'da': 'Opførsel af moderne præuddannede sprogmodeller ved hjælp af eksemplet på testopgaver', 'id': 'Perilaku Model Bahasa Terlatih Modern Menggunakan Contoh Tugas Pengujian', 'ko': '탐구적 임무를 예로 삼아 현대가 미리 훈련한 언어 모델의 행위를 연구하다', 'de': 'Verhalten moderner vortrainierter Sprachmodelle am Beispiel von Tastaturen', 'fa': 'رفتار مدل زبان پیش آموزش مدرن با استفاده از نمونه کارهای تحقیق', 'tr': 'Häzirki öňden eğlenmiş diller nusgalarynyň davranmasy', 'af': 'Gedrag van Moderne Vorige Taal Modelle wat gebruik die Voorbeeld van Probeer Opdragte', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ደረጃ ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Behavior of Modern Pre-trained Language Models Using the Example of Probing Tasks', 'sw': 'tabia za Modeli za Lugha zilizo na mafunzo ya sasa kwa kutumia mfano wa Kazi za Kudhibiti', 'az': 'Ňěimdiki …ôvv…ôl t…ôhsil edilmiŇü Dil Modell…ôrinin davranńĪŇülarńĪ', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i modeleve moderne të gjuhës së stërvitur para duke përdorur shembullin e detyrave të provave', 'bs': 'Ponašanje modernih predobučenih jezičkih modela Koristeći primjer ispitivanja zadataka', 'bn': 'প্রোবিং কাজের উদাহরণ ব্যবহার করে আধুনিক প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষা মডেলের আচরণ', 'cs': 'Chování moderních předškolených jazykových modelů na příkladu sondovacích úloh', 'fi': 'Nykyaikaisten esikoulutettujen kielimallien käyttäytyminen käyttäen esimerkkiä luotaustehtävistä', 'et': 'Kaasaegsete eelõpetatud keelemudelite käitumine, kasutades prooviülesannete näidet', 'ca': "Comportament de models moderns de llenguatge pré-entrenats utilitzant l'exemple de tasques de prova", 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'ha': 'Farawa na Ƙarawa na farko da aka yi wa shirin ayukan harshen zaman aka tsare', 'sk': 'Obnašanje sodobnih vnaprej usposobljenih jezikovnih modelov z uporabo primera opravil sondenja', 'he': 'התנהגות של דוגמני שפה מודרניים מאומנים מראש', 'bo': 'འགྲོ་སྟངས་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་དབྱེ་བ་ཀྱི་དཔེར་ན།'}
{'en': 'Modern transformer-based language models are revolutionizing NLP. However, existing studies into language modelling with BERT have been mostly limited to English-language material and do not pay enough attention to the implicit knowledge of language, such as semantic roles, presupposition and negations, that can be acquired by the model during training. Thus, the aim of this study is to examine behavior of the model BERT in the task of masked language modelling and to provide linguistic interpretation to the unexpected effects and errors produced by the model. For this purpose, we used a new Russian-language dataset based on educational texts for learners of Russian and annotated with the help of the National Corpus of the Russian language. In terms of quality metrics (the proportion of words, semantically related to the target word), the multilingual BERT is recognized as the best model. Generally, each model has distinct strengths in relation to a certain linguistic phenomenon. These observations have meaningful implications for research into applied linguistics and pedagogy, contribute to dialogue system development, automatic exercise making, text generation and potentially could improve the quality of existing linguistic technologies', 'fr': "Les modèles de langage modernes basés sur des transformateurs révolutionnent la PNL. Cependant, les études existantes sur la modélisation du langage avec BERT se sont limitées pour la plupart au matériel en anglais et ne prêtent pas suffisamment attention à la connaissance implicite de la langue, comme les rôles sémantiques, les présuppositions et les négations, que le modèle peut acquérir pendant la formation. Le but de cette étude est donc d'examiner le comportement du modèle BERT dans la tâche de modélisation du langage masqué et de fournir une interprétation linguistique des effets inattendus et des erreurs produits par le modèle. À cette fin, nous avons utilisé un nouveau jeu de données en russe basé sur des textes éducatifs pour les apprenants de russe et annoté à l'aide du Corpus national de la langue russe. En termes de métriques de qualité (proportion de mots sémantiquement liée au mot cible), le BERT multilingue est reconnu comme le meilleur modèle. En général, chaque modèle possède des points forts distincts par rapport à un certain phénomène linguistique. Ces observations ont des implications significatives pour la recherche en linguistique appliquée et en pédagogie, contribuent au développement de systèmes de dialogue, à la réalisation automatique d'exercices, à la génération de textes et pourraient potentiellement améliorer la qualité des technologies linguistiques existantes.", 'ja': '現代の変圧器ベースの言語モデルは、NLPに革命を起こしています。 しかし、BERTを用いた言語モデリングに関する既存の研究は、ほとんどが英語の教材に限定されており、トレーニング中にモデルが獲得できる意味的役割、前提条件、否定などの言語の暗黙の知識には十分注意を払っていない。 したがって、この研究の目的は、マスク言語モデリングのタスクにおけるモデルBERTの挙動を調べ、モデルによって生じる予期せぬ効果および誤りに対して言語学的解釈を提供することである。 この目的のために、私たちはロシア語の学習者のための教育テキストに基づいた新しいロシア語データセットを使用し、ロシア語の国立コーパスの助けを借りて注釈を付けました。 品質指標（対象単語に意味的に関連する単語の割合）では、多言語のBERTが最良のモデルとして認識されています。 一般に、各モデルは、特定の言語現象に関連して明確な強みを持っている。 これらの観察は、応用言語学と教育学の研究に有意義な意味を持ち、対話システムの開発、自動運動の作成、テキストの生成に貢献し、既存の言語技術の質を向上させる可能性がある。', 'es': 'Los modelos lingüísticos modernos basados en transformadores están revolucionando la PNL. Sin embargo, los estudios existentes sobre modelado del lenguaje con BERT se han limitado en su mayoría a material en inglés y no prestan suficiente atención al conocimiento implícito del lenguaje, como roles semánticos, presuposiciones y negaciones, que el modelo puede adquirir durante el entrenamiento. Por lo tanto, el objetivo de este estudio es examinar el comportamiento del modelo BERT en la tarea de modelar el lenguaje enmascarado y proporcionar interpretación lingüística a los efectos inesperados y errores producidos por el modelo. Para ello, utilizamos un nuevo conjunto de datos en idioma ruso basado en textos educativos para estudiantes de ruso y anotados con la ayuda del Corpus Nacional de la lengua rusa. En términos de métricas de calidad (la proporción de palabras, semánticamente relacionadas con la palabra objetivo), el BERT multilingüe es reconocido como el mejor modelo. Por lo general, cada modelo tiene puntos fuertes distintos en relación con un determinado fenómeno lingüístico. Estas observaciones tienen implicaciones significativas para la investigación de la lingüística aplicada y la pedagogía, contribuyen al desarrollo del sistema de diálogo, la realización automática de ejercicios, la generación de textos y podrían mejorar la calidad de las tecnologías lingüísticas existentes.', 'ar': 'نماذج اللغة الحديثة القائمة على المحولات تحدث ثورة في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. ومع ذلك ، فإن الدراسات الحالية في نمذجة اللغة باستخدام BERT قد اقتصرت في الغالب على مواد اللغة الإنجليزية ولا تولي اهتمامًا كافيًا للمعرفة الضمنية للغة ، مثل الأدوار الدلالية والافتراضات والنفي ، التي يمكن أن يكتسبها النموذج أثناء التدريب. وبالتالي ، فإن الهدف من هذه الدراسة هو فحص سلوك نموذج BERT في مهمة نمذجة اللغة المقنعة وتقديم تفسير لغوي للتأثيرات والأخطاء غير المتوقعة التي ينتجها النموذج. لهذا الغرض ، استخدمنا مجموعة بيانات جديدة باللغة الروسية تستند إلى نصوص تعليمية لمتعلمي اللغة الروسية وتم شرحها بمساعدة المجموعة الوطنية للغة الروسية. فيما يتعلق بمقاييس الجودة (نسبة الكلمات ، المرتبطة دلاليًا بالكلمة المستهدفة) ، يتم التعرف على BERT متعدد اللغات على أنه أفضل نموذج. بشكل عام ، لكل نموذج نقاط قوة مميزة فيما يتعلق بظاهرة لغوية معينة. هذه الملاحظات لها آثار ذات مغزى على البحث في علم اللغة التطبيقي وعلم التربية ، وتساهم في تطوير نظام الحوار ، وصنع التمارين التلقائية ، وتوليد النصوص ، ويمكن أن تحسن جودة التقنيات اللغوية الحالية', 'pt': 'Modelos modernos de linguagem baseados em transformadores estão revolucionando a PNL. No entanto, os estudos existentes sobre modelagem de linguagem com BERT têm se limitado principalmente ao material em inglês e não dão atenção suficiente ao conhecimento implícito da linguagem, como papéis semânticos, pressupostos e negações, que podem ser adquiridos pelo modelo durante o treinamento. Assim, o objetivo deste estudo é examinar o comportamento do modelo BERT na tarefa de modelagem de linguagem mascarada e fornecer interpretação linguística para os efeitos inesperados e erros produzidos pelo modelo. Para isso, usamos um novo conjunto de dados de língua russa baseado em textos educativos para aprendizes de russo e anotados com a ajuda do Corpus Nacional da língua russa. Em termos de métricas de qualidade (a proporção de palavras, semanticamente relacionadas à palavra alvo), o BERT multilíngue é reconhecido como o melhor modelo. Geralmente, cada modelo tem pontos fortes distintos em relação a um determinado fenômeno linguístico. Essas observações têm implicações significativas para a pesquisa em linguística aplicada e pedagogia, contribuem para o desenvolvimento do sistema de diálogo, criação automática de exercícios, geração de texto e potencialmente podem melhorar a qualidade das tecnologias linguísticas existentes', 'zh': '盖转换器世语言模样正在彻底改变NLP。 然今之BERT言建模论大体于英语材,而未尽其言之隐,如语义角色,设而否之,可得而法也。 是故本论者,检模形BERT蔽言建模行,为不测之效,为非言之说。 于是用一新俄语数集,当数集于俄语学者之教本,而于俄语国语料库之助注焉。 质量指标(之于单词语义者单词比例)言,多言BERT以为最。 凡模形于某语,各有异势。 观用语言学教育学之义,有助于言,自习为之,文本生焉,可得而言也。', 'hi': 'आधुनिक ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित भाषा मॉडल एनएलपी में क्रांति ला रहे हैं। हालांकि, BERT के साथ भाषा मॉडलिंग में मौजूदा अध्ययन ज्यादातर अंग्रेजी भाषा की सामग्री तक सीमित रहे हैं और भाषा के अंतर्निहित ज्ञान पर पर्याप्त ध्यान नहीं देते हैं, जैसे कि शब्दार्थ भूमिकाएं, पूर्वधारणा और नकार, जिन्हें प्रशिक्षण के दौरान मॉडल द्वारा प्राप्त किया जा सकता है। इस प्रकार, इस अध्ययन का उद्देश्य नकाबपोश भाषा मॉडलिंग के कार्य में मॉडल BERT के व्यवहार की जांच करना और मॉडल द्वारा उत्पादित अप्रत्याशित प्रभावों और त्रुटियों के लिए भाषाई व्याख्या प्रदान करना है। इस उद्देश्य के लिए, हमने रूसी भाषा के शिक्षार्थियों के लिए शैक्षिक ग्रंथों के आधार पर एक नए रूसी भाषा डेटासेट का उपयोग किया और रूसी भाषा के राष्ट्रीय कॉर्पस की मदद से एनोटेट किया। गुणवत्ता मैट्रिक्स (शब्दों का अनुपात, शब्दार्थ रूप से लक्ष्य शब्द से संबंधित) के संदर्भ में, बहुभाषी BERT को सबसे अच्छे मॉडल के रूप में पहचाना जाता है। आम तौर पर, प्रत्येक मॉडल में एक निश्चित भाषाई घटना के संबंध में अलग-अलग ताकत होती है। इन टिप्पणियों में लागू भाषाविज्ञान और शिक्षाशास्त्र में अनुसंधान के लिए सार्थक निहितार्थ हैं, संवाद प्रणाली के विकास, स्वचालित व्यायाम बनाने, पाठ पीढ़ी में योगदान करते हैं और संभावित रूप से मौजूदा भाषाई प्रौद्योगिकियों की गुणवत्ता में सुधार कर सकते हैं', 'ru': 'Современные языковые модели, основанные на трансформаторах, революционизируют NLP. Тем не менее, существующие исследования по языковому моделированию с BERT были в основном ограничены англоязычным материалом и не уделяют достаточного внимания неявному знанию языка, такому как семантические роли, предположения и отрицания, которые могут быть приобретены моделью во время обучения. Таким образом, целью данного исследования является изучение поведения модели BERT в задаче моделирования замаскированного языка и обеспечение лингвистической интерпретации неожиданных эффектов и ошибок, вызванных моделью. Для этого мы использовали новый русскоязычный набор данных, основанный на обучающих текстах для изучающих русский язык и аннотированный с помощью Национального корпуса русского языка. По показателям качества (доля слов, семантически связанных с целевым словом) многоязычный БЕРТ признан лучшей моделью. Как правило, каждая модель имеет свои сильные стороны по отношению к определенному языковому феномену. Эти наблюдения имеют значимые последствия для исследований в области прикладной лингвистики и педагогики, способствуют развитию системы диалога, автоматическому созданию упражнений, генерации текста и потенциально могут улучшить качество существующих лингвистических технологий', 'ga': 'Tá múnlaí teanga nua-aimseartha atá bunaithe ar chlaochladán ag réabhlóidiú NLP. Mar sin féin, tá staidéir reatha ar shamhaltú teanga le BERT teoranta don chuid is mó d’ábhar Béarla agus ní thugann siad aird leordhóthanach ar an eolas intuigthe ar theanga, mar róil shéimeantacha, toimhde agus diúltacht, is féidir leis an tsamhail a shealbhú le linn oiliúna. Mar sin, is í aidhm an staidéir seo ná scrúdú a dhéanamh ar iompar na samhla BERT sa tasc a bhaineann le múnlú teanga faoi cheilt agus léirmhíniú teangeolaíoch a sholáthar ar na héifeachtaí agus na hearráidí nach raibh coinne leo a chruthaíonn an tsamhail. Chun na críche sin, d’úsáideamar tacar sonraí nua Rúisise bunaithe ar théacsanna oideachais d’fhoghlaimeoirí na Rúise agus é anótáilte le cabhair ó Chorpas Náisiúnta na Rúise. I dtéarmaí méadrachta cáilíochta (comhréir na bhfocal, a bhaineann go séimeantach leis an spriocfhocal), aithnítear an CERT ilteangach mar an tsamhail is fearr. Go ginearálta, tá láidreachtaí ar leith ag gach múnla maidir le feiniméan teanga áirithe. Tá impleachtaí bríocha ag na breathnuithe seo ar thaighde ar theangeolaíocht fheidhmeach agus ar oideolaíocht, cuireann siad le forbairt córas idirphlé, déanamh cleachtaidh uathoibríoch, giniúint téacs agus d’fhéadfadh feabhas a chur ar cháilíocht na dteicneolaíochtaí teanga atá ann cheana.', 'el': 'Τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα γλωσσών που βασίζονται σε μετασχηματιστές προκαλούν επανάσταση στο NLP. Ωστόσο, οι υπάρχουσες μελέτες για τη μοντελοποίηση γλωσσών με το BERT περιορίζονται ως επί το πλείστον σε αγγλόγλωσσο υλικό και δεν δίνουν αρκετή προσοχή στην έμμεση γνώση της γλώσσας, όπως σημασιολογικοί ρόλοι, προϋποθέσεις και αρνήσεις, που μπορεί να αποκτηθεί από το μοντέλο κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης. Έτσι, στόχος της παρούσας μελέτης είναι να εξετάσει τη συμπεριφορά του μοντέλου στο έργο της μοντελοποίησης μασκαρισμένης γλώσσας και να παράσχει γλωσσική ερμηνεία στα απρόσμενα αποτελέσματα και λάθη που παράγει το μοντέλο. Για το σκοπό αυτό, χρησιμοποιήσαμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων στη ρωσική γλώσσα βασισμένο σε εκπαιδευτικά κείμενα για μαθητές της ρωσικής γλώσσας και σχολιασμένο με τη βοήθεια του Εθνικού Σώματος της ρωσικής γλώσσας. Όσον αφορά τις ποιοτικές μετρήσεις (το ποσοστό λέξεων, σημασιολογικά σχετιζόμενο με τη λέξη-στόχο), το πολυγλωσσικό σύστημα αναγνωρίζεται ως το καλύτερο μοντέλο. Γενικά, κάθε μοντέλο έχει διακριτές δυνάμεις σε σχέση με ένα συγκεκριμένο γλωσσικό φαινόμενο. Οι παρατηρήσεις αυτές έχουν σημαντικές επιπτώσεις στην έρευνα στην εφαρμοσμένη γλωσσολογία και παιδαγωγική, συμβάλλουν στην ανάπτυξη συστημάτων διαλόγου, στην αυτόματη άσκηση, στη δημιουργία κειμένου και δυνητικά θα μπορούσαν να βελτιώσουν την ποιότητα των υφιστάμενων γλωσσικών τεχνολογιών', 'ka': 'მოდინარე ტრანფორმენტერის ენის მოდელები NLP-ის რეგჲლუციაციას გავაკეთებენ. მაგრამ მსგავსი მსგავსი მსგავსი მსგავსი ბერტიკის მოდელეციაში ბერტიკის მატერიალზე უფრო დაფართებულია და არ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია მსგავსი ენის მეცნიერებას, როგორც სმენტიკური პროლები, პრეს ამიტომ, ამ სწავლის მიზეზი არის BERT მოდელის მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ მასკურად ენის მოდელილის მოქმედებაში და ინგლისტიკური ინტერპუქციის მონაცემების და მოდელის შეცდომის შეცდომის შე ამ მიზეზისთვის, ჩვენ გამოყენეთ ახალი პროსური ენის მონაცემების კოპოსს, რომელიც პროსური ენის მონაცემებისთვის განსწავლებელი ტექსტის ბაზედან დავუყენეთ. კაalitეტის მეტრიკის შესახებ (სიტყვების პროპორცია, სემონტიკურად მინიშვნელოვანი სიტყვების შესახებ), მრავალენგური BERT იყო საუკეთესი მოდელი. საერთოდ, ყოველ მოდელეში განსხვავებული ძალიანები განსხვავებული ენგურისტიკური ფენომენის შესახებ. ეს მონაცემებები აქვს სანიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაციებისთვის და პედაგოგიისთვის შესაძლებლობებისთვის გამოყენება, დიალოგის სისტემის განვითარებაში, ავტომატური განვითარებაში, ტექსტის განვითარებაში და პო', 'it': "I moderni modelli linguistici basati su trasformatori stanno rivoluzionando NLP. Tuttavia, gli studi esistenti sulla modellazione linguistica con BERT sono stati per lo più limitati al materiale in lingua inglese e non prestano sufficiente attenzione alla conoscenza implicita della lingua, quali ruoli semantici, presupposizioni e negazioni, che il modello può acquisire durante la formazione. Pertanto, lo scopo di questo studio è quello di esaminare il comportamento del modello BERT nel compito di modellazione del linguaggio mascherato e di fornire un'interpretazione linguistica agli effetti inaspettati ed errori prodotti dal modello. A questo scopo, abbiamo utilizzato un nuovo set di dati in lingua russa basato su testi educativi per gli studenti di lingua russa e annotato con l'aiuto del Corpo Nazionale della lingua russa. In termini di metriche di qualità (proporzione di parole, semanticamente correlata alla parola target), il BERT multilingue è riconosciuto come il modello migliore. In generale, ogni modello ha punti di forza distinti rispetto a un determinato fenomeno linguistico. Queste osservazioni hanno implicazioni significative per la ricerca in linguistica applicata e pedagogia, contribuiscono allo sviluppo di sistemi di dialogo, all'elaborazione automatica di esercizi, alla generazione di testi e potenzialmente potrebbero migliorare la qualità delle tecnologie linguistiche esistenti.", 'lt': 'Moderni transformatoriais pagrįsti kalbų modeliai revoliucijuoja NLP. Tačiau esami kalbų modeliavimo tyrimai su BERT daugiausia buvo susiję su anglų kalba ir nepakankamai dėmesio skiria netiesioginėms kalbos žinioms, pvz., semantiniams vaidmenims, prielaidoms ir neigiamams dalykams, kuriuos modelis gali įgyti mokymo metu. Taigi šio tyrimo tikslas – išnagrinėti BERT modelio elgesį maskuotos kalbos modeliavimo užduotyje ir pateikti kalbinį aiškinimą nenumatytam modelio poveikiui ir klaidoms. Šiuo tikslu naudojome naują rusų kalbos duomenų rinkinį, pagrįstą rusų kalbos mokytojams skirtomis švietimo tekstais ir užrašytus padedant rusų kalbos nacionaliniam korpusui. Kalbant apie kokybės metriką (žodžių, semantiškai susijusių su tiksliniu žodžiu, dalis), daugiakalbis BERT pripažįstamas geriausiu modeliu. Generally, each model has distinct strengths in relation to a certain linguistic phenomenon.  Šios pastabos turi reikšmingą poveikį taikomosios kalbos ir pedagogijos moksliniams tyrimams, prisideda prie dialogo sistemos kūrimo, automatinio mokymosi, tekstų kūrimo ir gali pagerinti esamų kalbų technologijų kokybę.', 'kk': 'Қазіргі түрлендіруші тіл үлгілері NLP революциясын өзгертеді. Бірақ BERT тілді моделлеу зерттеулері көбінесе ағылшын тілді материалға шектелген және тілді белгілеу үшін, мысалы, семантикалық рольдер, алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- ала, үлгілеу кезінде қабылдауға Бұл зерттеулердің мақсаты - BERT үлгісін қалқалаған тіл моделінің тапсырмасында тексеру және үлгісінің күтпеген эффекттерді және қателерін лингвистикалық интерпретациясын беру. Бұл мақсат үшін біз Руссияның оқытушыларының оқытушыларына негізделген жаңа руссияның тіл деректер жиынын қолдандық және Руссияның ұлттық корпусының көмегімен белгіленген. Сапатты метрикалық (сөздердің бөлшегі, мәселендік сөзге сәйкес қатынасыз), бірнеше тілді BERT деген ең жақсы үлгі деп анықталады. Жалпы түрде, әрбір үлгі тілдік панеліне байланысты күштері бар. Бұл наблюдения қолданылған лингвистикалық және педагогиялық зерттеулердің маңызды нәрселері бар, диалог жүйесін жасау, автоматты жұмыс істеу, мәтін құру және қолданылған лингвистикалық технологиялық', 'mk': 'Модерните јазички модели базирани на трансформатори револуционираат НЛП. Сепак, постојните студии за моделирање на јазикот со БЕРТ беа претежно ограничени на материјалот на англиски јазик и не обрнуваат доволно внимание на имплицитното знаење на јазикот, како што се семантичките улоги, претпоставувањата и негативите, кои може да се набават од моделот Затоа, целта на оваа студија е да се испита однесувањето на моделот БЕРТ во задачата на маскирано јазичко моделирање и да се обезбеди јазичка интерпретација на неочекуваните ефекти и грешки произведени од моделот. За оваа цел, употребивме нови податоци на руски јазик базирани на образовни тексти за учениците на руски и анотирани со помош на Националниот корпус на рускиот јазик. Во поглед на квалитетната метрика (процентот на зборови, семантично поврзан со зборот на целта), мултијазичниот БЕРТ се признава како најдобар модел. Генерално, секој модел има различни сили во однос на одреден јазички феномен. Овие набљудувања имаат значајни импликации за истражувањето на аплицираната лингвистика и педагогија, придонесуваат за развојот на дијалогот, автоматското правење вежби, генерацијата на текст и потенцијално би можеле да го подобрат квалитетот на постојните', 'ml': 'ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d NLP വിപ്ലവത്തിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുന്നു. However, existing studies into language modelling with BERT have been mostly limited to English-language material and do not pay enough attention to the implicit knowledge of language, such as semantic roles, presupposition and negations, that can be acquired by the model during training.  അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഈ പഠനത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം ബെര്\u200dടിയുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രകൃതിയെ പരിശോധിക്കുക എന്നതാണ്. മുഖുഷിച്ച ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മോഡലിങ്ങിന്റെ ജോലിയ ഇതിനുവേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ റഷ്യന്\u200d ഭാഷ വിദ്യാഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കി ഉപയോഗിച്ചു റഷ്യന്\u200dറെ പഠിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വി ഗുണപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ മെട്രിക്കിന്\u200dറെ (വാക്കുകളുടെ അക്കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d, ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ വാക്കിന്\u200dറെ സാമാന്തികമായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിര സാധാരണ, ഓരോ മോഡലും കുറച്ച് ഭാഷക്കാരുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ശക്തികളുണ്ട്. ഈ അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷകങ്ങളിലും പദ്ധതികളിലും പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് അര്\u200dഥ്യമായ പ്രഭാവങ്ങളുണ്ട്, സംസാരം സംവിധാനത്തിന്റെ വിദ്യ', 'hu': 'A modern transzformátor alapú nyelvi modellek forradalmasítják az NLP-t. A BERT-vel végzett nyelvmodellezéssel kapcsolatos meglévő tanulmányok azonban többnyire angol nyelvű anyagokra korlátozódtak, és nem fordítanak elegendő figyelmet a modell által a képzés során elsajátítható implicit nyelvismeretekre, mint például a szemantikai szerepekre, feltételezésekre és tagadásokra. A tanulmány célja tehát a BERT modell viselkedésének vizsgálata a maszkos nyelvmodellezés során, valamint a modell által okozott váratlan hatások és hibák nyelvi értelmezése. Ebből a célból egy új orosz nyelvű adatkészletet használtunk az orosz nyelvű tanulók számára oktatási szövegeken alapuló és az orosz nyelvű Nemzeti Testület segítségével jegyzetelt. A minőségi mutatók szempontjából (a szavak aránya, szemantikusan kapcsolódik a célszóhoz) a többnyelvű BERT a legjobb modell. Általában minden modellnek különböző erősségei vannak egy bizonyos nyelvi jelenséghez képest. Ezek a megfigyelések jelentős hatással vannak az alkalmazott nyelvészeti és pedagógiai kutatásra, hozzájárulnak a párbeszédrendszer fejlesztéséhez, az automatikus gyakorlatkészítéshez, a szövegkészítéshez, és potenciálisan javíthatják a meglévő nyelvi technológiák minőségét.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli lingwistiċi moderni bbażati fuq it-trasformaturi qed jirrevoluzzjonaw il-NLP. Madankollu, l-istudji eżistenti dwar l-immudellar tal-lingwi bil-BERT kienu fil-biċċa l-kbira limitati għal materjal tal-lingwa Ingliża u ma jagħtux biżżejjed attenzjoni lill-għarfien impliċitu tal-lingwa, bħar-rwoli semantiċi, il-preżunzjoni u n-negazzjonijiet, li jistgħu jinkisbu mill-mudell matul it-taħriġ. Għalhekk, l-għan ta’ dan l-istudju huwa li jeżamina l-imġiba tal-mudell BERT fil-kompitu tal-mudellar tal-lingwa mħassa u li jipprovdi interpretazzjoni lingwistika għall-effetti u l-iżbalji mhux mistennija prodotti mill-mudell. Għal dan il-għan, użajna sett ġdid ta’ dejta bil-lingwa Russa bbażat fuq testi edukattivi għal studenti tar-Russu u annotati bl-għajnuna tal-Korp Nazzjonali tal-lingwa Russa. F’termini ta’ metriċi ta’ kwalità (il-proporzjon ta’ kliem, relatat semantikament mal-kelma fil-mira), il-BERT multilingwi huwa rikonoxxut bħala l-aħjar mudell. Ġeneralment, kull mudell għandu saħħa distinta fir-rigward ta’ ċertu fenomenu lingwistiku. Dawn l-osservazzjonijiet għandhom implikazzjonijiet sinifikanti għar-riċerka fil-lingwistika applikata u l-pedagoġija, jikkontribwixxu għall-iżvilupp tas-sistema tad-djalogu, it-tfassil awtomatiku tal-eżerċizzju, il-ġenerazzjoni tat-test u potenzjalment jistgħu jtejbu l-kwalità tat-teknoloġiji lingwistiċi eżistenti', 'pl': 'Nowoczesne modele językowe oparte na transformatorach rewolucjonizują NLP. Jednakże istniejące badania nad modelowaniem języka przy użyciu BERT ograniczały się w większości do materiałów anglojęzycznych i nie zwracają wystarczającej uwagi na domniemaną znajomość języka, taką jak role semantyczne, założenia i negacje, które można nabyć przez model podczas szkolenia. Celem niniejszego opracowania jest zatem zbadanie zachowań modelu BERT w zadaniu modelowania języka maskowanego oraz dostarczenie interpretacji językowej nieoczekiwanych efektów i błędów wytwarzanych przez model. W tym celu wykorzystaliśmy nowy zestaw danych w języku rosyjskim oparty na tekstach edukacyjnych dla uczących się języka rosyjskiego i adoptowany przy pomocy Narodowego Korpusu Języka Rosyjskiego. Pod względem wskaźników jakości (proporcja słów, semantycznie związana z docelowym słowem), wielojęzyczny BERT jest uznawany za najlepszy model. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, każdy model ma odrębne mocne strony w odniesieniu do pewnego zjawiska językowego. Obserwacje te mają znaczące implikacje dla badań nad językoznawstwem stosowanym i pedagogiką, przyczyniają się do rozwoju systemu dialogu, automatycznego wykonywania ćwiczeń, tworzenia tekstów i potencjalnie mogą poprawić jakość istniejących technologii językowych', 'no': 'Moderne transformeringsspråk- modeller revolusjonar NLP. Men eksisterande studier i språk modellering med BERT er mest begrenset til engelsk språk materiell, og ikkje har nok oppmerking til den implisitte kjenninga av språk, som semantiske roller, presupposering og negasjon, som kan hentast av modellen under opplæring. Målet til denne studien er å undersøke atferden av modellen BERT i oppgåva av maskerte språk- modellering og å gjera språk- tolking til dei uventa effektane og feilene som er produsert av modellen. For dette målet brukte vi ein ny russisk språk dataset basert på utdanningstekstar for lærarar av russisk og oppmerket med hjelp av den nasjonale korpusen av den russiske språket. I forhold til kvalitetsmeterikk (proporsjonen av ord, semantisk relatert til målsordet) er det fleirspråkskelige BERT gjenkjent som den beste modellen. Generelt har kvar modell ulike strengar i forhold til ein viss språkstisk fenomen. Desse observasjonane har betydelige implikasjonar for forskning i brukte språk og pedagogi, som bidrar til utvikling av dialogsystemet, automatisk utvikling, tekstgenerering og potensielt kan forbetra kvaliteten på eksisterande språk-teknologi', 'ro': 'Modelele moderne de limbaj bazate pe transformatoare revoluționează PNL. Cu toate acestea, studiile existente privind modelarea limbilor străine cu BERT s-au limitat în cea mai mare parte la materiale în limba engleză și nu acordă suficientă atenție cunoașterii implicite a limbii, cum ar fi rolurile semantice, presupunerile și negațiile, care pot fi dobândite de model în timpul formării. Astfel, scopul acestui studiu este de a examina comportamentul modelului BERT în sarcina modelării limbajului mascat și de a oferi interpretare lingvistică efectelor neașteptate și erorilor produse de model. În acest scop, am folosit un nou set de date în limba rusă bazat pe texte educaționale pentru cursanții de limbă rusă și adnotat cu ajutorul Corpului Național al limbii ruse. În ceea ce privește măsurătorile calității (proporția de cuvinte, legată semantic de cuvântul țintă), BERT multilingv este recunoscut drept cel mai bun model. În general, fiecare model are puncte forte distincte în raport cu un anumit fenomen lingvistic. Aceste observații au implicații semnificative pentru cercetarea lingvistică aplicată și pedagogie, contribuie la dezvoltarea sistemului de dialog, la realizarea automată a exercițiilor exerciționale, la generarea de text și ar putea îmbunătăți calitatea tehnologiilor lingvistice existente', 'mn': 'Орчин үеийн өөрчлөгчийн хэл загварууд нь NLP-г хувьсгалдаг. Гэхдээ БЕРТ-тэй хэлний моделийн судалгаагаар ихэнхдээ Англи хэл материалтай хязгаарлагддаг. Тэгээд хэл болон сургалтын үед сургалтын төлөвлөгөө, төлөвлөгөө, эсрэг талаар хангалттай анхаарлаа хангалттай анхаарлаа хангалттай байхгүй. Ингээд энэ судалгааны зорилго бол BERT загварын загварын загварыг дүрслэгдсэн хэл загварын даалгаварын талаар судалж, хэлний түүхийг загвараар гаргасан хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн нөлөөлөл, алдаа гаргах юм. Энэ зорилгоор бид Оросын сурагчид боловсролын текстүүд дээр шинэ Оросын хэл хэлний улс төрөлхтний тусламжтай шинэ өгөгдлийн санг ашигласан. Маш сайн хэмжээний метрикийн хувьд (үгийн хувьд, зорилготой үгнээс холбогдсон) олон хэлний BERT нь хамгийн сайн загвар гэж анзаарна. Ихэнхдээ загвар бүр хэлний явдалтай холбоотой өөр хүчтэй байдаг. Эдгээр ажиглалтууд нь хэрэглэгдсэн хэлний болон педагогийг судалж, диалог системийн хөгжлийн тулд, автоматик дасгал хөгжлийн тулд нэмэгдүүлдэг, текст үйлдвэрлэл, мөн суурь хэлний технологийн сайн чанарыг сайжруулж', 'sr': 'Moderni jezički modeli na transformaciji revolucionišu NLP. Međutim, postojeće studije o modelima jezika sa BERT uglavnom su ograničene na engleski jezik materijal i ne obraćaju dovoljno pažnje na implicitno znanje jezika, kao što su semantičke uloge, predstavljanje i negacije, koje se može dobiti model tokom treninga. Zato je cilj ovog studija pregledati ponašanje modela BERT u zadatku maskiranog jezika i pružati jezičku interpretaciju neočekivanim efekatima i greškama koje je proizvela model. Za ovu svrhu, koristili smo novi ruski podatak na osnovu obrazovnih tekstova za učenike ruskog jezika i annotirali pomoći Nacionalnog korpusa ruskog jezika. U smislu kvalitetne metrike (proporcija reèi, semantički povezano sa ciljnom reèi), multijezički BERT je priznat kao najbolji model. Obično, svaki model ima različite snage u vezi sa određenim jezičkim fenomenom. Ove primedbe imaju značajne implikacije za istraživanje primjenjene jezičke i pedagogije, doprinose razvoju dijaloga, automatsku vježbu, proizvodnju teksta i potencijalno poboljšavanje kvalitete postojećih jezičkih tehnologija', 'ms': 'Model bahasa yang berasaskan pengubah modern sedang mengubah NLP. However, existing studies into language modelling with BERT have been mostly limited to English-language material and do not pay enough attention to the implicit knowledge of language, such as semantic roles, presupposition and negations, that can be acquired by the model during training.  Oleh itu, tujuan kajian ini adalah untuk memeriksa perilaku model BERT dalam tugas model bahasa bertopeng dan untuk menyediakan interpretasi bahasa kepada kesan dan ralat yang tidak dijangka yang dihasilkan oleh model. Untuk tujuan ini, kami menggunakan set data bahasa Rusia yang baru berdasarkan teks pendidikan untuk pelajar bahasa Rusia dan dicatat dengan bantuan Korpus Nasional bahasa Rusia. Dalam terma metrik kualiti (nisbah perkataan, secara semantik berkaitan dengan perkataan sasaran), BERT berbilang bahasa dikenali sebagai model terbaik. Secara umum, setiap model mempunyai kekuatan yang berbeza dalam hubungan dengan fenomena bahasa tertentu. Perhatian ini mempunyai implikasi yang bermakna untuk kajian dalam bahasa dan pedagogi yang dilaksanakan, menyumbang kepada pembangunan sistem dialog, pembuatan latihan automatik, pembuatan teks dan mungkin boleh meningkatkan kualiti teknologi bahasa yang ada', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha luuqada ee asalka hore ee bedelka ah waxay is-beddelayaan NLP. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxbarashada joogta oo ku qoran qoraalka luuqada ee BERT waxaa inta badan lagu xadgudbay wax ku saabsan luuqada Ingiriiska, mana dhegaysan karo aqoonta ku saabsan luqada, tusaale ahaan qaybaha semantika, horumarinta iyo diimaha, tusaale ahaan waxaa laga heli karaa tusaale ahaan marka lagu baranayo. Taas darteed, waxyaabaha waxbarashadan waa in lagu baarayo dabeecada BERT oo lagu sameeyo sameynta luuqada maskax ah iyo in lagu siiyo fasirada luuqada oo aan la filanayn falimaha iyo qaladka modellka soo saaray. Taas darteed waxaynu isticmaalnay taariikhda cusub ee luuqada Ruushka oo ku saleysan qoraalka waxbarashada oo lagu barto barashada Ruushka waxaana lagu caawiyey korpus afka Ruushka. Tilmaamaha takhasuska ah (qeybta hadalka, si kala duwan oo la xiriira hadalka goalka), waxaa looga aqoonsadaa BERT luuqadaha kala duduwan sida modelka ugu fiican. Sida caadiga ah, qaab walba waxaa ku jira xoog kala duwan oo la xiriira xaalad luqad ah. Ardayadan waxay leeyihiin saameyn muhiim ah oo ku saabsan waxbarashada luuqadaha iyo cilmiga la xiriiray, waxay ku contributeysaa horumarinta nidaamka dialogka, tababar bilowga ah sameynta, abuuridda qoraalka iyo suurtogal ahaan waxay bedelan karaan qiimaha teknolojiyada luuqadda ah oo ku jira', 'sv': 'Moderna transformatorbaserade språkmodeller revolutionerar NLP. Befintliga studier av språkmodellering med BERT har dock huvudsakligen begränsats till engelskspråkigt material och ägnar inte tillräcklig uppmärksamhet åt de underförstådda språkkunskaper, såsom semantiska roller, antaganden och negationer, som modellen kan förvärva under utbildningen. Syftet med denna studie är därför att undersöka beteendet hos modellen BERT i arbetet med maskerad språkmodellering och att ge språklig tolkning av de oväntade effekter och fel som modellen ger upphov till. För detta ändamål använde vi en ny ryskspråkig datauppsättning baserad på pedagogiska texter för elever i ryska och kommenterade med hjälp av Ryska språkets nationella kår. När det gäller kvalitetsmått (andelen ord, semantiskt relaterade till målordet) erkänns den flerspråkiga BERT som den bästa modellen. Generellt sett har varje modell tydliga styrkor i förhållande till ett visst språkfenomen. Dessa observationer har betydelsefulla konsekvenser för forskningen inom tillämpad lingvistik och pedagogik, bidrar till utveckling av dialogsystem, automatisk övning, textgenerering och kan potentiellt förbättra kvaliteten på befintlig språkteknik.', 'ur': 'مدرنی تبدیل کرنے والے زبان کی مدل NLP کو انقلاب کر رہے ہیں۔ However, existing studies in language modelling with BERT are mostly limited to English-language material and do not pay enough attention to the implicit knowledge of language, such as semantic roles, presupposition and negations, which can be acquired by the model during training. اسی طرح، اس تحقیقات کا موقع یہ ہے کہ BERT کے ماسک زبان موڈلینگ کے کام میں موڈل کی رفتار کی تحقیق کرنا اور مدل کے ذریعہ پیدا کئے ہوئے غیر منتظر اثرات اور خطائیں زبان کی تعبیر کی تعبیر کرنا ہے. اس کے لئے ہم نے روسی زبان والوں کے لئے ایک نئی روسی زبان ڈیٹ سٹ کا استعمال کیا ہے اور روسی زبان کی ملی کورپوس کی مدد کے ذریعہ مشورہ کیا ہے۔ کیلوٹی متریک کے مطابق (کلمات کے مطابق، متریک کلمات کے مطابق، متریک کلمات کے مطابق) بہت سی زبان BERT کو بہترین نمڈل سے پہچان لیا جاتا ہے۔ عمومی طور پر، ہر مدل ایک زبان شناسی فائدہ کے معاملہ میں مختلف قوت رکھتا ہے. یہ اظہارات لکھنے کے لئے مطلوب اثرات ہیں لکھنے والی زبان شناسی اور پڈاگوژی کی تحقیقات کے لئے، ڈالیٹ سیستم کی توسعہ، اتماٹی آزمائش بنانے کے لئے، ٹیکسٹ پیدا کرنے کے لئے اور شاید موجود زبان شناسی تکنولوژی کی کیفیت کو', 'si': 'අධ්\u200dයාත්මක භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා NLP වලින්. නමුත්, බෙර්ට් එක්ක භාෂාව මඩේලින් එක්ක තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා භාෂාව සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය ස ඉතින්, මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ අලක්ෂණය තමයි BERT මොඩල් විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා භාෂාව මොඩල් කරනවා වගේ වැඩේ භාෂාවික විදිහට සහ භාෂාවික ව මේ අදහසට, අපි රුසියානුවේ ඉගෙන ගන්න අලුත් රුසියානු භාෂාව දත්ත සැට් එකක් භාවිත කරනවා රුසියානු භාෂාවේ ජාතික කොර්ප කුළුවත් මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වලින් (වචනය සම්පූර්ණය, ලක්ෂ වචනය සම්පූර්ණයෙන්), බාධ්\u200dය භාෂාවත් BERT විශේෂ වි සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම, හැම මොඩල් එක්කම විශේෂ ශක්තිමත් තියෙනවා කිසිම භාෂාවික ප්\u200dරදේශයක් සම්බන්ධ මේ පරීක්ෂණාවල් තියෙන්නේ විශ්වාස කරන්න භාෂාවාද්\u200dයාත්මක සහ පෙඩාගෝජිය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශ්වාස කරන්න, ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය වි', 'ta': 'Modern transformer-based language models are revolutionizing NLP.  ஆனால், BERT மொழி மாதிரியில் உள்ள படிப்பாடுகள் பெரும்பாலாகவே கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது மொழி பொருளுக்கு தேவையான கவனம் இல்லை, பாதிப்பு விளையாட்டுகள், முன்னே அதனால், இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியின் இலக்கு BERT மாதிரியின் நடைமுறையை பரிசோதிக்க வேண்டும் மூடப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரியாக்கத்தில் மற்றும் மாதிர இந்த காரணத்திற்கு, நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய ருஷ்யன் மொழிய தகவல் அமைப்பை பயன்படுத்தி ருஷ்யன் கற்றல்களுக்கு கல்வி உரைகளை அடிப்படையில் பயன்படுத்தி  தரம் முறைமைகளின் (வார்த்தைகளின் விகிதத்தின் விகிதத்தில், குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தையுடன் அர்த்தமாக, பல மொழி பெர்ட் சிறந்த மாத பொதுவாக, ஒவ்வொரு மாதிரியிலும் சில மொழிகளின் வித்தியாசமான சக்திகள் உள்ளன. இந்த கண்காணிப்புகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட மொழிமாற்றங்கள் மற்றும் கல்வியியலுக்கும் ஆராய்ச்சிகளுக்கு அர்த்தமான பாதிப்புகள் உள்ளன, உரையாடல் உருவாக்கு', 'uz': "Name Ammo, BERT bilan bir tilni modellashga mavjud o'rganishlar ko'p ingliz tili materiallariga qaraydi va o'z tilni aniqlashga yetarli narsalarning juda muhimi muhimi emas, masalan semantik qobiliyatlari, oldinga joylashtirish va negativlardan foydalanishi mumkin. Bu o'qituvchining maqsadi BERT modelining xususiyatlarini o'rganish va modeli yaratilgan kutilmagan effektlar va xatolarni o'rganish uchun lingvistik fasirlarini o'rganish. Bu sababda, biz Ruscha ta'limni o'rganish uchun ta'lim matnlari asosida yangi Ruscha tili maʼlumotlar tarkibini ishlatdik va Ruscha tilining Tashqi Korpusi yordamida tashkilotgan. Muhimlik metrikalar (soʻzlarning qismlari, qismi soʻzda bog'liq so'zlar bilan bog'liq), bir necha tilda BERT eng yaxshi model deb aniqlanadi. Umumiy, har bir model bir necha lingvistik munosabati bilan ajratilgan kuchlar bor. Bu qo'llanmalar qo'llangan tillar va taʼminlov sohasida o'rganish uchun muhim muammolar bor, dialog tizimning taʼminotlariga, avtomatik ishlash, matn generasi va mavjud tillar teknologiya sifatini oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình ngôn ngữ mới tạo biến thế đang cách mạng. Tuy nhiên, các nghiên cứu về mô hình ngôn ngữ với BERT đã được giới hạn với ngôn ngữ Anh và không chú ý đến kiến thức ngôn ngữ ngầm của ngôn ngữ, như các vai trò theo ngữ, giả thuyết và tiêu cực, có thể lấy được từ mẫu trong suốt cuộc huấn luyện. Mục đích của nghiên cứu này là kiểm tra hành vi của thử nghiệm BERT trong nhiệm vụ làm mô phỏng ngôn ngữ đeo mặt nạ và cung cấp giải thích ngôn ngữ cho tác động và lỗi bất ngờ được tạo ra bởi mô hình này. Mục đích này, chúng tôi đã sử dụng một bộ dữ liệu tiếng Nga mới, dựa trên văn bản giáo dục cho học sinh của người Nga và được ghi chú với sự giúp đỡ của Tập Đoàn Quốc Gia của ngôn ngữ Nga. Về mặt đo chất lượng (tỷ lệ ngôn ngữ ngữ, theo ngữ nghĩa thì liên quan đến từ đích) nó được công nhận là mô hình lớn nhất của BERT. Thông thường, mỗi mô hình đều có những điểm mạnh khác nhau đối với một số hiện tượng ngôn ngữ. Những quan sát này có những tác động có ý nghĩa với nghiên cứu ngôn ngữ học và giáo dục được áp dụng, đóng góp cho việc phát triển hệ thống đối thoại, tự động thực hành, sản xuất văn bản và có thể cải thiện chất lượng các công nghệ ngôn ngữ hiện thời.', 'bg': 'Съвременните трансформаторни езикови модели революционират НЛП. Съществуващите изследвания на езиковото моделиране с BERT обаче са предимно ограничени до английски език материали и не обръщат достатъчно внимание на имплицитните познания на езика, като семантични роли, предположения и отрицания, които моделът може да придобие по време на обучението. По този начин целта на настоящото изследване е да се изследва поведението на модела в задачата на маскирано езиково моделиране и да се осигури лингвистична интерпретация на неочакваните ефекти и грешки, породени от модела. За целта използвахме нов рускоезичен набор от данни, базиран на образователни текстове за учащи руски език и анотиран с помощта на Националния корпус на руския език. По отношение на качествените показатели (пропорцията на думите, семантично свързани с целевата дума), многоезичният е признат за най-добрия модел. Като цяло всеки модел има различни силни страни по отношение на определен лингвистичен феномен. Тези наблюдения имат значими последици за научните изследвания в приложната лингвистика и педагогика, допринасят за разработването на диалогова система, автоматичното създаване на упражнения, генерирането на текст и потенциално биха могли да подобрят качеството на съществуващите лингвистични технологии', 'hr': 'Moderni jezički modeli na transformaciji revolucioniraju NLP. Međutim, postojeće ispitivanje o modelima jezika s BERT-om uglavnom su ograničene na engleski jezički materijal i ne obraćaju dovoljno pažnje na implicitno znanje jezika, kao što su semantičke uloge, predpostavke i negacije, koje se može dobiti model tijekom obuke. Stoga je cilj ovog ispitivanja pregledati ponašanje modela BERT u zadatku maskiranog jezika i pružati jezičko tumačenje neočekivanim učinama i greškama proizvođenim modelom. Za ovu svrhu, koristili smo novi ruski podaci na temelju obrazovnih tekstova učenicima ruskog jezika i annotirali pomoći Nacionalnog korpusa ruskog jezika. U smislu kvalitetne metrike (proporcija riječi, semantički povezan s ciljnom riječju), multijezički BERT priznaje se kao najbolji model. Obično, svaki model ima različite snage u vezi s određenim jezičkim fenomenom. Te promatranja imaju značajne implikacije za istraživanje primjenjene jezičke i pedagogije, doprinose razvoju dijalogskih sustava, automatsku vježbu, proizvodnju teksta i potencijalno poboljšavanje kvalitete postojećih jezičkih tehnologija', 'da': 'Moderne transformer-baserede sprogmodeller revolutionerer NLP. De eksisterende undersøgelser af sprogmodellering med BERT har imidlertid for det meste været begrænset til engelsksproget materiale og lægger ikke tilstrækkelig vægt på den implicitte sprogkundskab, såsom semantiske roller, forudsætninger og negationer, som modellen kan erhverve under uddannelsen. Formålet med denne undersøgelse er således at undersøge adfærd af modellen BERT i opgaven med maskeret sprogmodellering og at give sproglig fortolkning af de uventede effekter og fejl, modellen producerer. Til dette formål brugte vi et nyt russisk-sproget datasæt baseret på pædagogiske tekster til elever i russisk og annoteret med hjælp fra det nationale korpus af det russiske sprog. Med hensyn til kvalitetsmålinger (andelen af ord, semantisk relateret til målordet) anerkendes den flersprogede BERT som den bedste model. Generelt har hver model forskellige styrker i forhold til et bestemt sprogligt fænomen. Disse observationer har betydningsfulde konsekvenser for forskningen i anvendt lingvistik og pædagogik, bidrager til udvikling af dialogsystemer, automatisk øvelsesfremstilling, tekstgenerering og potentielt kunne forbedre kvaliteten af eksisterende sprogteknologier', 'nl': 'Moderne transformatorgebaseerde taalmodellen revolutioneren NLP. Bestaande studies naar taalmodellering met BERT zijn echter grotendeels beperkt tot Engelstalig materiaal en besteden onvoldoende aandacht aan de impliciete kennis van taal, zoals semantische rollen, vooronderstellingen en ontkenningen, die het model tijdens de training kan verwerven. Het doel van deze studie is om het gedrag van het model BERT in de taak van gemaskerde taalmodellering te onderzoeken en taalkundige interpretatie te geven van de onverwachte effecten en fouten die door het model worden veroorzaakt. Hiervoor gebruikten we een nieuwe Russisch-taalige dataset gebaseerd op educatieve teksten voor studenten van het Russisch en geannoteerd met behulp van het Nationaal Korpus van de Russische taal. Qua kwaliteitsmetrics (het aantal woorden, semantisch gerelateerd aan het doelwoord) wordt de meertalige BERT erkend als het beste model. Over het algemeen heeft elk model verschillende sterke punten in relatie tot een bepaald taalfenomeen. Deze observaties hebben betekenisvolle implicaties voor onderzoek naar toegepaste linguïstiek en pedagogiek, dragen bij tot de ontwikkeling van dialoogsystemen, automatische oefeningen, tekstgeneratie en kunnen mogelijk de kwaliteit van bestaande taaltechnologieën verbeteren', 'de': 'Moderne transformatorbasierte Sprachmodelle revolutionieren NLP. Bisherige Studien zur Sprachmodellierung mit BERT beschränkten sich jedoch meist auf englischsprachiges Material und widmen den impliziten Sprachkenntnissen, wie semantischen Rollen, Voraussetzungen und Negationen, die das Modell während der Ausbildung erwerben kann, nicht genügend Aufmerksamkeit. Ziel dieser Arbeit ist es daher, das Verhalten des Modells BERT bei der maskierten Sprachmodellierung zu untersuchen und die unerwarteten Effekte und Fehler des Modells sprachlich zu interpretieren. Dazu haben wir einen neuen russischsprachigen Datensatz verwendet, der auf Lehrtexten für Russisch-Lernende basiert und mit Hilfe des Nationalkorpus der russischen Sprache kommentiert wurde. In Bezug auf Qualitätsmetriken (Wortanteil, semantisch bezogen auf das Zielwort) wird das mehrsprachige BERT als bestes Modell anerkannt. Generell hat jedes Modell unterschiedliche Stärken in Bezug auf ein bestimmtes sprachliches Phänomen. Diese Beobachtungen haben bedeutsame Auswirkungen auf die Forschung in der angewandten Linguistik und Pädagogik, tragen zur Entwicklung von Dialogsystemen, zur automatischen Übung, zur Texterstellung bei und könnten möglicherweise die Qualität bestehender linguistischer Technologien verbessern.', 'ko': 'transformer 기반의 현대 언어 모델이 NLP를 완전히 바꾸고 있다.그러나 기존의 BERT 언어 모델링에 대한 연구는 대부분이 영어 언어 자료에 국한되어 모델이 훈련 과정에서 얻을 수 있는 언어 은밀한 지식, 예를 들어 의미 역할, 예설과 부정에 대해 충분한 중시를 하지 못했다.따라서 본 연구의 목적은 모델이 복면 언어 모델링 임무에서의 행위를 검증하고 모델에 발생한 의외의 영향과 오류에 대해 언어 해석을 제공하는 것이다.이를 위해 우리는 새로운 러시아어 학습자 교육 텍스트를 바탕으로 한 러시아어 데이터 집합을 사용하고 국가 러시아어 어료 라이브러리의 도움을 받아 주석을 달았다.다국어 BERT는 품질 지표(단어의 비율, 대상 단어의 의미와 관련)에서 최적의 모델로 꼽힌다.일반적으로 모든 모델은 어떤 언어 현상 방면에서 서로 다른 장점을 가지고 있다.이러한 관찰 결과는 응용언어학과 교육학의 연구에 중요한 의의를 가지고 대화 시스템의 개발, 자동 연습, 텍스트 생성에 도움이 되며 기존 언어 기술의 질을 향상시킬 수 있다', 'id': 'Model bahasa modern berdasarkan transformer revolusi NLP. Namun, penelitian yang ada tentang model bahasa dengan BERT kebanyakan terbatas pada bahasa Inggris dan tidak memperhatikan cukup pengetahuan implicit bahasa, seperti peran semantis, predoposisi dan negati, yang dapat diperoleh oleh model selama latihan. Jadi, tujuan studi ini adalah untuk memeriksa perilaku model BERT dalam tugas model bahasa bertopeng dan untuk menyediakan interpretasi bahasa kepada efek dan kesalahan yang tidak terduga yang dibuat oleh model. Untuk tujuan ini, kami menggunakan set data bahasa Rusia baru berdasarkan teks pendidikan untuk pelajar bahasa Rusia dan dicatat dengan bantuan Korpus Nasional bahasa Rusia. In terms of quality metrics (the proportion of words, semantically related to the target word), the multilingual BERT is recognized as the best model.  Secara umum, setiap model memiliki kekuatan yang berbeda dalam hubungan dengan fenomena bahasa tertentu. Perhatian ini memiliki implikasi yang berarti untuk penelitian dalam bahasa dan pedagogi yang diterapkan, berkontribusi ke pembangunan sistem dialog, pembuatan latihan otomatis, pembuatan teks dan potensial bisa meningkatkan kualitas teknologi bahasa yang ada', 'fa': 'مدلهای زبان متغیر کننده مدرن به NLP انقلاب می کنند. با این حال، تحقیقات موجود در مورد مدل زبانی با BERT بیشتر به ماده انگلیسی محدود شده است و به اندازه کافی توجه به دانش معمولی زبان، مثل نقشه\u200cهای semantic، پیش\u200cفرض و منفی، که می\u200cتواند در زمان آموزش توسط مدل دریافت شود، به اندازه کافی توجه نکنند. بنابراین هدف این مطالعه این است که رفتار مدل BERT را در وظیفه مدل کردن زبان ماسک تحقیق کنیم و تعبیر زبانی را به اثرات غیرمنتظر و اشتباه های توسط مدل تولید کنیم. برای این هدف، ما از یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید زبان روسیه استفاده کردیم که بر اساس متن آموزشی برای دانش آموزان روسیه استفاده می\u200cکنیم و با کمک کشوری ملی زبان روسیه نوشته شده است. با توجه به متریک کیفیت (نسبت کلمات، نسبت به کلمات هدف، نسبت به نسبت نسبت به کلمات متریک) BERT چندین زبان به عنوان بهترین مدل شناخته می\u200cشود. معمولاً هر مدل قدرت متفاوتی در ارتباط با یک پدیده\u200cای زبان\u200cشناسی دارد. این مشاهده\u200cها اثرات معنی برای تحقیقات به زبان\u200cشناسی و پداگوژی کاربرد دارند، توسعه به توسعه سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو، توسعه تمرین\u200cهای خودکار، توسعه\u200cهای متن و احتمالاً کیفیت تکنولوژی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی موجود را بهتر', 'sw': 'Mradi wa lugha za mabadiliko ya sasa unabadilisha mapinduzi ya NLP. However, existing studies into language modelling with BERT have been mostly limited to English-language material and do not pay enough attention to the implicit knowledge of language, such as semantic roles, presupposition and negations, that can be acquired by the model during training.  Kwa hiyo, lengo la utafiti huu ni kuchunguza tabia za muundo wa BERT katika kazi ya mifano ya lugha yenye mavazi na kutoa tafsiri ya lugha kwa madhara yasiyotarajiwa na makosa yaliyozaliwa na mtindo huo. Kwa sababu hii, tulitumia taarifa mpya za lugha ya Kirusi kwa kutumia maandishi ya elimu kwa ajili ya wanafunzi wa Urusi na kuchanganyikiwa kwa msaada wa Bunge la Taifa la lugha ya Urusi. Kwa kiwango cha viwango (kiwango cha maneno, kimsingi kinahusiana na neno la lengo), lugha mbalimbali BERT inajulikana kama mtindo bora. Kwa ujumla, kila model ana nguvu tofauti katika kuhusiana na hali fulani ya lugha. Maoni haya yanahusiana na maana ya utafiti katika lugha na sayansi zinazotumika, yanachangia katika maendeleo ya mazungumzo, mazoezi ya kibinafsi, kizazi cha maandishi na uwezekano wa kuboresha ubora wa teknolojia ya lugha', 'sq': 'Modelet moderne gjuhësh bazuar në transformues po revolucionojnë NLP. Megjithatë, studimet ekzistuese në modelimin e gjuhës me BERT janë kufizuar kryesisht në materialin gjuhës angleze dhe nuk i kushtojnë vëmendje të mjaftueshme njohurisë implicitete të gjuhës, të tilla si rolet semantike, supozimet dhe negativët, që mund të fitohen nga modeli gjatë trajnimit. Kështu, qëllimi i këtij studimi është të shqyrtojë sjelljen e modelit BERT në detyrën e modelimit të gjuhës së maskuar dhe të ofrojë interpretim gjuhësor efekteve dhe gabimeve të papritura të prodhuara nga modeli. Për këtë qëllim, përdorëm një set të ri të dhënash në gjuhën ruse bazuar në tekste arsimore për mësuesit e rusëve dhe shënuar me ndihmën e Korpus Kombëtar të gjuhës ruse. Në termat e metrikës së cilësisë (proporcioni i fjalëve, lidhur semantikisht me fjalën objektiv), BERT shumëgjuhës është njohur si modeli më i mirë. Gjeneralisht, çdo model ka fuqi të ndryshme në lidhje me një fenomen të caktuar gjuhësor. Këto vëzhgime kanë pasoja të rëndësishme për kërkimin në gjuhën e aplikuar dhe pedagogjinë, kontribuojnë në zhvillimin e sistemit të dialogut, krijimin e stërvitjeve automatike, gjenerimin e tekstit dhe potencialisht mund të përmirësojnë cilësinë e teknologjive gjuhësore ekzistuese', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች የNLP ዓመፀኛ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን BERT በተደረገው ቋንቋ ምሳሌ ላይ ያሉት ትምህርት ብዙው ለቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ማህበረሰብ ተቃራኒ ሆነዋል፡፡ Thus, the aim of this study is to examine behavior of the model BERT in the task of masked language modelling and to provide linguistic interpretation to the unexpected effects and errors produced by the model.  ለዚህ ምክንያት የራሽያ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ትምህርት ጽሑፎችን በመሠረት አዲስ የሮሽኛ ቋንቋ ዳታተር ተጠቃሚ የራሲ ኮርፓስ በተረዳ ነው፡፡ በጥያቄ ማተሚያ (የቃላት ክፍል፣ ለጉዳዩ ቃላት እኩሌታ፣ የብዙ ቋንቋዎች BERT በመልካም ምሳሌ ይታወቃል፡፡ በጠቅላላ፣ ሁሉም ሞዴል በተለየ ቋንቋዊ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ እነዚህ አስተያየት ለቋንቋዎች እና ለትምህርት ማስታወቂያ የሚያስፈልጉት ጉዳይ አለባቸው፣ ለጥያቄ ስርዓት ማድረግ፣ የጥምቀት ማድረግ፣ ጽሑፍ ትውልድ እና የቋንቋዊ ቴክኖሎጂ ጥያቄን ማሻሻል ይችላል፡፡', 'tr': "Modern terjime edilen dil nusgalary NLP'a rewolýusiýarlar. BERT bilen görkezilýän diller üçin bar öwrenmeler köplenç iňlisçe dil materialyna diýip çarpylýar we dilleriň iňlisçe bilimi ýaly semantik täblikleri, öwürleme we täblikleri ýaly, okuw wagtynda bu nusga tarapyndan alınabilir. Şol sebäpli, bu araşdyrmanyň amasydyr BERT modeliniň sarhoş dil modelleşdirmegi we modelden üretilen hatalaryň gürrüňsiz täsirlerine dil yorumyny bermek. Bu maksadyň üçin biz Rus dilleriniň öwrenmegi üçin täze bir sany guruldyk we Rus diliniň milli korpusynyň kömegi bilen duýýardyk. Görnöşim metrikleri (sözlerin proporsiýasy, semantik sözleriň maksady sözlerine sereden), multidil BERT iň gowy nusga diýip tanalýar. Adatça, her nusga belli dil fenomeni bilen baglaşyk güçleri bar. Bu gözlemler uygulanan lingwistikler we pedagogy barlamasynda möhüm täsirler bar, dijalog sistemasy gelişmesine kömekleýär, metin döretmegine we olaryň bar lingwistiki tehnologiýalaryň keyfiýetini gowurap biler.", 'hy': 'Նորակայական լեզվի մոդելները վերափոխում են ՆԼՊ-ը: Այնուամենայնիվ, BER-ի միջոցով գոյություն ունեցող լեզվի մոդելավորման ուսումնասիրությունները հիմնականում սահմանափակվել են անգլերեն լեզվի նյութերի վրա և բավականին ուշադրություն չեն դարձնում լեզվի ենթադրական գիտելիքին, ինչպիսիք են սեմանտիկ դերերը, ենթադրությունը և բա Այսպիսով, այս ուսումնասիրության նպատակն է ուսումնասիրել BER-ի մոդելի վարքագիծը ծածկված լեզվի մոդելավորման խնդրում և լեզվաբանական մեկնաբանություն տալ մոդելի կողմից առաջացած անսպասելի ազդեցություններին և սխալներին: Այս նպատակով մենք օգտագործեցինք ռուսական լեզու նոր տվյալների համակարգ, որը հիմնված է ռուսական ուսանողների կրթական տեքստների վրա և գրված է ռուսական լեզու ազգային կորպոսի օգնությամբ: Ինչպիսի չափումների առումով (բառերի համեմատությունը, որը սեմանտիկապես կապված է նպատակային բառի հետ), բազլեզու BER-ը համարվում է լավագույն մոդելը: Ընդհանուր առմամբ, յուրաքանչյուր մոդել ունի որոշակի լեզվաբանական ֆենոմենի հետ կապված առանձնահատուկ ուժեր: Այս դիտարկումները իմաստալից ազդեցություններ ունեն կիրառված լեզվաբանության և pedagoգիայի ուսումնասիրության վրա, ներդրում են համակարգի խոսակցության զարգացման, ավտոմատիկ վարժությունների ստեղծման, տեքստի ստեղծման և պոտենցիալ կարող են բարելավել գ', 'az': "Modern transformer-based dil modell…ôri NLP'i d…ôyiŇüm…ôy…ô baŇüladńĪlar. Ancaq BERT il…ô dil modell…ôŇüdirilm…ôsi bar…ôsind…ôki √∂yr…ônm…ôl…ôr √ßox ńįngilizce dil materyalńĪna sńĪnńĪr edilmiŇüdir v…ô dill…ôrin imkansńĪz bilgi kimi semantik roll…ôrin, …ôvv…ôlc…ôd…ôn v…ô negasyonlarńĪn, modell…ôrin t…ôhsil sńĪrasńĪnda alńĪnabilir. Bel…ôlikl…ô, bu t…ôcr√ľb…ônin m…ôqs…ôdi BERT model in in davranńĪŇülarńĪnńĪ gizli dil modell…ôrinin v…ô modell…ôrin t…ôcr√ľb…ô edilm…ôy…ôn t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrin…ô dil yorumluluńüu verm…ôkdir. Bu m…ôqs…ôdil…ô biz Rus dilind…ôn √∂yr…ôn…ôn…ônl…ôr √ľ√ß√ľn t…ôhsil m…ôtnl…ôrin…ô dayanan yeni Rus dilind…ô veril…ôn m…ô ‚Äô lumat qurmasńĪnńĪ v…ô Rus dilind…ô Ulusal Korpusun k√∂m…ôyi il…ô bildirilmiŇüdik. X√ľsusiyy…ôtli metrikl…ôrin (s√∂zl…ôrin proporsiyasńĪ, semantik olaraq m…ôqs…ôd s√∂z√ľn…ô bańülńĪ), √ßoxlu dil BERT …ôn yaxŇüńĪ model olaraq tanńĪnńĪr. Genellikle, h…ôr modell…ôrin b…ôzi dil fenomeni il…ô m√ľxt…ôlif g√ľcl…ôri var. Bu m…ôlumatlar istifad…ô edil…ôn dil v…ô pedagogi bar…ôsind…ôki araŇütńĪrmalar √ľ√ß√ľn anlamlńĪ t…ôsirl…ôr var, dialog sistemini geliŇütirm…ôy…ô, avtomatik t…ôhsil yaratmańüa, metin t…ôhsil etm…ôy…ô v…ô m√ľmk√ľn olaraq h…ômin dil teknolojil…ôrin keyfiyy…ôtini yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪra bil…ôr.", 'bn': 'আধুনিক পরিবর্তন ভিত্তিক ভাষার মডেল এনএলপিকে বিপ্লব করছে। তবে বেরেটির সাথে ভাষার মডেলের বিদ্যমান গবেষণা বেশীরভাগ ইংরেজী ভাষার উপাদানের সীমাবদ্ধ হয়েছে এবং ভাষার প্রাপ্ত জ্ঞানের প্রতি যথেষ্ট মনোযোগ প্রদান করে না, যে তাই এই গবেষণার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে মুখোশিত ভাষা মডেলেলের আচরণ পরীক্ষা করা এবং মডেলের দ্বারা অপ্রত্যাশিত প্রভাব ও ত্রুটির জন্য ভাষাগত ব্যাখ্যা দেয় For this purpose, we used a new Russian-language dataset based on educational texts for learners of Russian and annotated with the help of the National Corpus of the Russian language.  মানের মেট্রিক ব্যাপারে (শব্দের অংশ, সামান্যিক ভাবে লক্ষ্যের শব্দের সাথে সম্পর্কিত), বহুভাষায় বেরেটিকে সর্বোচ্চ মডে সাধারণত, প্রত্যেক মডেল একটি নির্দিষ্ট ভাষার ব্যাপারে বিভিন্ন শক্তি রয়েছে। এই পর্যবেক্ষণের মধ্যে প্রয়োজনীয় ভাষার ভাষা এবং শিক্ষাজ্ঞের গবেষণার জন্য অর্থ প্রভাব রয়েছে, ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম উন্নয়ন, স্বয়ংক্রিয় অনুশীলন, লেখা প্রজন্ম এবং সম্ভবত', 'bs': 'Moderni jezički modeli na transformaciji revolucioniraju NLP. Međutim, postojeće studije o modelima jezika sa BERT uglavnom su ograničene na engleski jezički materijal i ne obraćaju dovoljno pažnje na implicitno znanje jezika, poput semantičkih uloga, pretpostavke i negacija, koje se može prikupiti modelom tijekom obuke. Stoga je cilj ovog ispitivanja pregledati ponašanje modela BERT u zadatku maskiranog jezika i pružati jezičko interpretacije neočekivanim efekatima i greškama proizvođenim modelom. Za ovu svrhu, koristili smo novi ruski podatak na temelju obrazovnih tekstova za učenike ruskog jezika i annotirali pomoći Nacionalnog korpusa ruskog jezika. U smislu kvalitetne metrike (proporcija riječi, semantički povezano sa ciljnom riječju), multijezički BERT se priznaje kao najbolji model. Obično, svaki model ima različite snage u odnosu na određeni jezički fenomen. Ove promatranja imaju značajne implikacije za istraživanje primjenjene jezičke i pedagogije, doprinose razvoju dijaloga, automatsku vježbu, proizvodnju teksta i potencijalno poboljšavanje kvalitete postojećih jezičkih tehnologija', 'af': "Moderne transformeerder-gebaseerde taal modele word revolusie van NLP. Maar bestaande studies in taal modellering met BERT is meeste beperk tot Engelstaal materiaal en doen nie genoeg aandag aan die inplisite kennis van taal, soos semantiese roles, voorspoediging en negasies, wat deur die model gedurende onderwerp kan word nie. So, die doel van hierdie studie is om gedrag van die model BERT te ondersoek in die taak van maskeerde taal modellering en om lingwisiese uitlegging te verskaf aan die onverwagte effekte en foute wat deur die model geproduseer is. Vir hierdie doel het ons 'n nuwe Russiese-taal-datastel gebruik wat op opvoedkundige teks gebaseer is vir die leerners van Russiese en wat met die hulp van die Nasionale Korpus van die Russiese taal aangetel is. In terms of quality metrics (the proportion of words, semantically related to the target word), the multilingual BERT is recognized as the best model. Algemeen, elke model het eienskaplike sterkte in relatie met 'n sekere lingvisse fenomen. Hierdie opmerking het betekenlike inplikasies vir ondersoek binne aangewende lingvistike en pedagogie, bydra aan dialoog stelsel ontwikkeling, automatiese oefening maak, teks genereering en potensieel die kwaliteit van bestaande lingvisiese teknologies kan verbeter", 'et': 'Kaasaegsed transformaatoril põhinevad keelemudelid muudavad NLP-d revolutsiooniliseks. Kuid olemasolevad uuringud keele modelleerimise kohta BERTiga on piirdunud enamasti ingliskeelse materjaliga ega pööra piisavalt tähelepanu kaudsetele keeleoskustele, nagu semantilised rollid, eeldused ja eitamised, mida mudel saab omandada koolituse käigus. Seega on käesoleva uuringu eesmärk uurida mudeli BERT käitumist maskeeritud keele modelleerimise ülesandes ning pakkuda keelelist tõlgendamist mudeli ootamatutele mõjudele ja vigadele. Selleks kasutasime uut venekeelset andmekogumit, mis põhineb vene keele õppijatele mõeldud haridustekstidel ja on märgitud vene keele Rahvuskorpuse abil. Kvaliteedimõõdikute osas (sõnade osakaal, semantiliselt seotud sihtsõnaga) peetakse mitmekeelset BERT-i parimaks mudeliks. Üldiselt on igal mudelil konkreetse keelelise nähtuse suhtes erinevad tugevused. Need tähelepanekud avaldavad olulist mõju rakenduskeeleteaduse ja pedagoogika uurimisele, aitavad kaasa dialoogisüsteemi arendamisele, automaatsele harjutusele, teksti loomisele ning võivad parandada olemasolevate keeletehnoloogiate kvaliteeti.', 'ca': "Modens models de llenguatge basats en transformadors revolucionen el NLP. No obstant això, els estudis existents sobre la modelació de llenguatges amb BERT s'han limitat principalment al material de llenguatge anglès i no prestan suficient atenció al coneixement implícit de llenguatge, com els rols semàntics, la presunció i les negations, que el model pot adquirir durant l'entrenament. Thus, the aim of this study is to examine behavior of the model BERT in the task of masked language modelling and to provide linguistic interpretation to the unexpected effects and errors produced by the model.  Per això vam utilitzar un nou conjunt de dades de llenguatge russo basat en textos educatius per aprenents russos i anotats amb l'ajuda del Corpus Nacional de llenguatge russo. En termes de mètriques de qualitat (la proporció de paraules, semànticament relacionades amb la paraula alvo), el BERT multillengua es reconeix com el millor model. Generally, each model has distinct strengths in relation to a certain linguistic phenomenon.  Aquestes observacions tenen conseqüències significatives per la recerca sobre la lingüística aplicada i la pedagogia, contribueixen al desenvolupament del sistema de diàleg, la creació automàtica d'exercicis, la generació de textos i potencialment podrien millorar la qualitat de les tecnologies lingüístices existents", 'cs': 'Moderní jazykové modely založené na transformátorech přinášejí revoluci NLP. Stávající studie jazykového modelování s BERT se však většinou omezují na anglický materiál a nevěnují dostatečnou pozornost implicitním znalostem jazyka, jako jsou sémantické role, předpoklady a negace, které lze model získat během školení. Cílem této studie je tedy zkoumat chování modelu BERT v úkolu modelování maskovaných jazyků a poskytnout jazykovou interpretaci neočekávaných efektů a chyb modelu. Za tímto účelem jsme využili nový ruský datový soubor založený na vzdělávacích textech pro studenty ruského jazyka a anotovaný s pomocí Národního korpusu ruského jazyka. Z hlediska metrik kvality (podíl slov, sémanticky vztahující se k cílovému slovu) je vícejazyčný BERT uznáván za nejlepší model. Obecně platí, že každý model má své silné stránky ve vztahu k určitému jazykovému jevu. Tato pozorování mají smysluplné důsledky pro výzkum aplikované lingvistiky a pedagogiky, přispívají k rozvoji dialogového systému, automatickému vytváření cvičení, tvorbě textu a potenciálně by mohly zlepšit kvalitu stávajících jazykových technologií', 'fi': 'Nykyaikaiset muuntajapohjaiset kielimallit mullistavat NLP:n. Nykyiset BERT:n kielimallinnustutkimukset ovat kuitenkin rajoittuneet enimmäkseen englanninkieliseen aineistoon, eikä niissä kiinnitetä riittävästi huomiota implisiittiseen kielitaitoon, kuten semanttisiin rooleihin, olettamuksiin ja kiistoihin, joita malli voi hankkia koulutuksen aikana. Tämän tutkimuksen tavoitteena on tutkia BERT-mallin käyttäytymistä maskitun kielimallinnuksen tehtävässä ja tarjota kielellinen tulkinta mallin tuottamille odottamattomille vaikutuksille ja virheille. Tätä tarkoitusta varten käytimme uutta venäjänkielistä aineistoa, joka perustui venäjän kielen oppijoille tarkoitettuihin opetusteksteihin ja johon tehtiin huomautuksia Venäjän kansallisen korpusen avulla. Laadunmittareiden (sanojen osuus, semanttisesti suhteessa kohdesanaan) osalta monikielinen BERT tunnustetaan parhaaksi malliksi. Jokaisella mallilla on yleensä omat vahvuutensa suhteessa tiettyyn kielelliseen ilmiöön. Havainnoilla on merkityksellisiä vaikutuksia soveltavan kielitieteen ja pedagogiikan tutkimukseen, ne edistävät vuoropuhelujärjestelmän kehittämistä, automaattista harjoitusta, tekstin tuottamista ja voivat mahdollisesti parantaa olemassa olevien kieliteknologioiden laatua.', 'ha': "Tsarin-zane-zane-zane na yanzu ana kure NLP. A lokacin da ake da amfani da karatun cikin misalin harshe da BERT, an ƙayyade mafiya yawa zuwa abun Ingiriya masu kuma ba su saurara wa masu da ma'anar maganar harshe, kamar rolin na semantic, mazaɓa da nega, wanda za'a sami shi da motel a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shi. Haƙĩƙa, aim in wannan karanta yana jarraba aikin motsi na BERT a cikin aikin misalin misalin harshen da aka buɗe shi kuma ya ga fassarar linguistic zuwa masu kallo da ba'a yi tsammãni ba da kuma ɓata wanda aka samu da shi. To, sabõda wannan, mun yi amfani da tsarin danasãri na Ruushi, a kan karatun littãfin da aka sani masu karatun Ruushi kuma aka yi mataimaki da taimakon Naifar Corbas na harshen Ruushi. Ga ƙayyade metric da aka tsare (rabon maganar da aka yi wa maganar da aka yi amfani da shi), an gane BERT cikin mulki-nau'in rubutu kamar shirin baƙata. A jumla'a, kõwane motel yana da ƙarfi mai rarraba cikin wani abu na'ura. Wannan kayan gaskata suna da muhimmi wa research cikin linguistic da linguistic da da da aka lissafa, yana ƙara wa mafarin zauren akwatin bayani na zauren akwatin bayani, na samar da aikin bayani na farat ɗaya, kizaɓen matsayi da mai yiwuwa yana iya ƙaranci sifar technical masu cikin lugha", 'sk': 'Sodobni transformatorski jezikovni modeli revolucionarno spreminjajo NLP. Vendar pa so obstoječe študije jezikovnega modeliranja z BERT večinoma omejene na angleško-jezikovno gradivo in ne posvečajo dovolj pozornosti implicitnemu znanju jezika, kot so semantične vloge, predpostavke in zanikanja, ki jih model lahko pridobi med usposabljanjem. Namen te študije je torej preučiti vedenje modela BERT pri nalogi maskiranega jezikovnega modeliranja in zagotoviti jezikovno interpretacijo nepričakovanih učinkov in napak, ki jih ustvarja model. V ta namen smo uporabili nov nabor podatkov v ruskem jeziku, ki temelji na izobraževalnih besedilih za učence ruskega jezika in je bil označen s pomočjo Narodnega korpusa ruskega jezika. Z vidika meritev kakovosti (delež besed, semantično povezan s ciljno besedo) je večjezični BERT priznan kot najboljši model. Na splošno ima vsak model različne prednosti v zvezi z določenim jezikovnim pojavom. Ta opažanja imajo pomembne posledice za raziskave uporabne jezikoslovje in pedagogike, prispevajo k razvoju dialognega sistema, avtomatičnemu izdelavi vadb, ustvarjanju besedila in potencialno lahko izboljšajo kakovost obstoječih jezikovnih tehnologij', 'jv': 'Layout model sing paling transformer Moderno kuwi nggawe NLP. Nanging, diwong liya sing ngendalikne ning limun model ning BERT dumadhi kudu nggawe ingkang karo ingkang. Saiki, akeh kanggo ngilangno ujian iki dadi kanggo ujian pancen ning model BERT dumadhi kapan ingkang model urip bantuan lan nggawe aturan jèn dhèwèk kanggo ngerasakno ujian kanggo ngerasakno pangan lan akeh akeh dhèwèk. Saiki iki, awak dhéwé ngejaraké dataset anyar tentang Rusi-ingkang basa kanggo kelas mapan ingkang basa kanggo nggawe barang rusi lan nganggep bantuan kanggo Kerap Nalikasi kanggo langgadhakan Rusi. Durangkang metika kalitas (sampeyan kelas, sematik rabi gambar ngono cilas), BERT multilengkang dadi model sing apik dhéwé. Jeneng-jeneng, saben model dadi nggawe stir-stir nang rabi akèh wong liyang. Awaraning padha mengko akeh mengko nggawe barang nggunakake tarjamahan kanggo ngilangno ingkang karo pedogé, supoyo nggawe sistem kanggo nggunakake sistem, gagal sistem sistem sing otomatik, jenengan teks lan iso nggawe nggawe kalité teknôlogi sing gawe nguasai', 'he': 'דוגמני שפת מודרניים מבוססים על משתנים ממהפכות NLP. למרות זאת, מחקרים קיימים בנוגע לדוגמה לשפה עם BERT היו מוגבלים בעיקר לחומר בשפה אנגלית ולא מקשיבים מספיק תשומת לב לידע המיוחד של שפה, כמו תפקידים סמנטיים, הניחוש ושלילות, שאפשר להשיג על ידי הדוגמה במהלך האימון. כך, המטרה של המחקר הזה היא לבדוק התנהגות של המודל BERT במשימה של מודל שפת מסוכנת ולספק פרשנות שפתית להשפעות ולא צפויות שנוצרות על ידי המודל. למטרה זו, השתמשנו בסיס מידע חדש בשפה רוסית מבוסס על טקסטים חינוכיים ללמודים של רוסיה ומכתבים בעזרת הקורפוס הלאומי של השפה הרוסית. במטריקה איכותית (המספר של מילים, שקשור באופן סמנטי למילה המטרה), BERT המורבולוגי מוכר כמודל הטוב ביותר. בדרך כלל, לכל מודל יש כוחות ברורים בנוגע לתופעה שפתית מסוימת. התבוננות האלה יש השלכות משמעותיות למחקר בשפתיים ופאדגוגיה, תורמים לפיתוח מערכת דיאלוג, יצירת התאמנות אוטומטית, יצירת טקסטים ופוטנציאלית יכולות לשפר את איכות טכנולוגיות לשפתיים קיימות', 'bo': 'Modern transformer-based language models are revolutionizing NLP. ཡིན་ནའང་། BERT དང་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་ཡིག དེར་བརྟེན། ལས་འཚོལ་བ་འདིའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་མིང་དཔྱད་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་གི་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་རྣམ་པ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས། སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་རྣམ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ In terms of quality metrics (the proportion of words, semantically related to the target word), the multilingual BERT is recognized as the best model. སྤྱིར་བཏང་། མ་དབྱིབས་རེ་རེར་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ཞིག་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ནུས་མཐུན་ཁྱད་པར་ཡོད། These observations have meaningful implications for research into applied linguistics and pedagogy, contribute to dialog system development, automatic exercise making, text generation and potentially can improve the quality of existing linguistic technologies.'}
{'en': 'Application of Mix-Up Method in Document Classification Task Using BERT', 'fr': "Application de la méthode de confusion dans la tâche de classification de documents à l'aide du BERT", 'es': 'Aplicación del método de confusión en la tarea de clasificación de documentos mediante BERT', 'pt': 'Aplicação do Método Mix-Up na Tarefa de Classificação de Documentos usando BERT', 'ar': 'تطبيق طريقة الخلط في مهمة تصنيف المستندات باستخدام BERT', 'zh': '混淆之法,BERT文档类之用也', 'ja': 'BERTを使用した文書分類タスクにおけるミックスアップ方法の適用', 'hi': 'BERT का उपयोग कर दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण कार्य में मिक्स-अप विधि का अनुप्रयोग', 'ru': 'Применение метода смешивания в задаче классификации документов с использованием BERT', 'ga': 'Modh Measctha a Chur i bhFeidhm sa Tasc Aicmithe Doiciméid ag Úsáid BERT', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაციის მომხმარების მომხმარება', 'it': "Applicazione del metodo di miscelazione nell'attività di classificazione dei documenti utilizzando BERT", 'hu': 'A keverési módszer alkalmazása a dokumentumok osztályozási feladataiban a BERT használatával', 'el': 'Εφαρμογή μεθόδου ανάμειξης στην εργασία ταξινόμησης εγγράφων με τη χρήση του BERT', 'kk': 'BERT қолданылатын құжат классификациялау тапсырмасындағы Mix- Up әдісінің қолданбасы', 'ms': 'Application of Mix-Up Method in Document Classification Task Using BERT', 'ml': 'Comment', 'lt': 'Susimaišymo metodo taikymas dokumentų klasifikavimo užduotyje, naudojant BERT', 'mt': 'Application of Mix-Up Method in Document Classification Task Using BERT', 'pl': 'Zastosowanie metody mieszania w zadaniu klasyfikacji dokumentów przy użyciu BERT', 'mn': 'Документын классификацийн үйл ажиллагаанд Mix-Up методын хэрэглээ BERT хэрэглэх', 'no': 'Programet for mix-up metode i dokumentklassifikasjonsverkt som brukar BERT', 'si': 'BERT භාවිත කරන්න විවෘත විධානයේ විවෘත විධානය', 'ro': 'Aplicarea metodei de amestecare în activitatea de clasificare a documentelor utilizând BERT', 'sr': 'Aplikacija metode mješanja u klasifikaciji dokumenta koristeći BERT', 'mk': 'Апликација на методот за мешање во задачата за класификација на документот користејќи BERT', 'so': 'Application of Mix-Up Method in Document Classification Task Using BERT', 'ta': 'Comment', 'sv': 'Tillämpning av blandad metod i dokumentklassificeringsuppgift med hjälp av BERT', 'ur': 'BERT کے استعمال میں مکس آپ طریقہ کا کاروبار', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Ứng dụng của giao thức trộn trong tác vụ phân tích tài liệu.', 'bg': 'Прилагане на метода за смесване в задачата за класификация на документи с помощта на BERT', 'da': 'Anvendelse af blandingsmetode i dokumentklassifikationsopgaver ved hjælp af BERT', 'hr': 'Aplikacija metode mješanja u klasifikaciji dokumenta koristeći BERT', 'nl': 'Toepassing van Mix-Up Methode bij Document Classification Task met behulp van BERT', 'de': 'Anwendung der Verwechslungsmethode bei der Dokumentenklassifikation unter Verwendung von BERT', 'ko': 'BERT 기반 문서 분류 작업에 혼합 방법 적용', 'id': 'Application of Mix-Up Method in Document Classification Task Using BERT', 'fa': 'کاربرد روش مخلوط در کاربرد کلاسیف سند استفاده از BERT', 'sw': 'Utumiaji wa Utawala wa Mix-Up katika Hifadhi ya Hukumu', 'tr': "BERT'i Ullanýan Senedler Çaşyrma Görnöşi", 'af': 'Aansoek van Mix- Up Metode in Dokument Klassifikasie Opdrag gebruik BERT', 'sq': 'Application of Mix-Up Method in Document Classification Task Using BERT', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'Application of Mix-Up Method in Document Classification Task Using BERT', 'az': 'BERT kullan캼lan D톛st톛 Klasifikasiyas캼 G칬r칲nt칲s칲nd톛ki Mix-Up Metodonun Uygulamas캼', 'bn': 'Comment', 'ca': 'Aplicació del mètode de mistura en la tasca de classificació de documents utilitzant BERT', 'bs': 'Aplikacija metode miješanja u klasifikaciji dokumenta koristeći BERT', 'cs': 'Aplikace metody směšování při klasifikaci dokumentů pomocí BERT', 'et': 'Segamismeetodi rakendamine dokumentide klassifitseerimise ülesandes BERT-i abil', 'fi': 'Sekoitusmenetelmän soveltaminen asiakirjojen luokittelutehtävään BERT:n avulla', 'jv': 'Application of Mix-up Method in document', 'sk': 'Uporaba metode mešanja pri opravilu klasifikacije dokumentov z uporabo BERT', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Application of Mix-Up Method in Document Classification Task Using BERT', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་དབྱེ་རིམ་བྱ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱིས་BERT སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་Mix-Up Method'}
{'en': 'The mix-up method (Zhang et al., 2017), one of the methods for data augmentation, is known to be easy to implement and highly effective. Although the mix-up method is intended for image identification, it can also be applied to natural language processing. In this paper, we attempt to apply the mix-up method to a document classification task using bidirectional encoder representations from transformers (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Since BERT allows for two-sentence input, we concatenated word sequences from two documents with different labels and used the multi-class output as the supervised data with a one-hot vector. In an experiment using the livedoor news corpus, which is Japanese, we compared the accuracy of document classification using two methods for selecting documents to be concatenated with that of ordinary document classification. As a result, we found that the proposed method is better than the normal classification when the documents with labels shortages are mixed preferentially. This indicates that how to choose documents for mix-up has a significant impact on the results.', 'es': 'Se sabe que el método de confusión (Zhang et al., 2017), uno de los métodos para el aumento de datos, es fácil de implementar y altamente efectivo. Aunque el método de confusión está destinado a la identificación de imágenes, también se puede aplicar al procesamiento del lenguaje natural. En este artículo, intentamos aplicar el método de confusión a una tarea de clasificación de documentos utilizando representaciones de codificadores bidireccionales de transformadores (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Como BERT permite la entrada de dos frases, concatenamos secuencias de palabras de dos documentos con etiquetas diferentes y utilizamos la salida de varias clases como datos supervisados con un vector de un solo paso. En un experimento en el que se utilizó el corpus de noticias livedoor, que es japonés, comparamos la precisión de la clasificación de documentos utilizando dos métodos para seleccionar los documentos que se van a concatenar con la clasificación de documentos ordinaria. Como resultado, encontramos que el método propuesto es mejor que la clasificación normal cuando los documentos con escasez de etiquetas se mezclan preferentemente. Esto indica que la forma de elegir documentos para la confusión tiene un impacto significativo en los resultados.', 'ar': 'من المعروف أن طريقة الخلط (Zhang et al. ، 2017) ، وهي إحدى طرق زيادة البيانات ، سهلة التنفيذ وفعالة للغاية. على الرغم من أن طريقة الخلط مخصصة لتعريف الصورة ، إلا أنه يمكن تطبيقها أيضًا على معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. في هذه الورقة ، نحاول تطبيق طريقة الخلط على مهمة تصنيف المستندات باستخدام تمثيلات التشفير ثنائية الاتجاه من المحولات (BERT) (Devlin et al. ، 2018). نظرًا لأن BERT يسمح بإدخال جملتين ، فقد قمنا بربط تسلسل الكلمات من وثيقتين بتسميات مختلفة واستخدمنا الإخراج متعدد الفئات كبيانات خاضعة للإشراف مع متجه واحد ساخن. في تجربة باستخدام مجموعة الأخبار الحية ، وهي يابانية ، قمنا بمقارنة دقة تصنيف المستندات باستخدام طريقتين لاختيار المستندات المراد ربطها مع تصنيف المستندات العادي. نتيجة لذلك ، وجدنا أن الطريقة المقترحة أفضل من التصنيف العادي عندما يتم خلط المستندات التي بها نقص في الملصقات بشكل تفضيلي. يشير هذا إلى أن كيفية اختيار المستندات للخلط لها تأثير كبير على النتائج.', 'pt': 'O método mix-up (Zhang et al., 2017), um dos métodos para aumento de dados, é conhecido por ser fácil de implementar e altamente eficaz. Embora o método de mistura seja destinado à identificação de imagens, ele também pode ser aplicado ao processamento de linguagem natural. Neste artigo, tentamos aplicar o método mix-up a uma tarefa de classificação de documentos usando representações de codificadores bidirecionais de transformadores (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Como o BERT permite a entrada de duas frases, concatenamos sequências de palavras de dois documentos com rótulos diferentes e usamos a saída multiclasse como dados supervisionados com um vetor one-hot. Em um experimento usando o corpus de notícias livedoor, que é japonês, comparamos a precisão da classificação de documentos usando dois métodos de seleção de documentos a serem concatenados com a classificação de documentos comum. Como resultado, verificamos que o método proposto é melhor do que a classificação normal quando os documentos com falta de etiquetas são misturados preferencialmente. Isso indica que a escolha de documentos para confusão tem um impacto significativo nos resultados.', 'fr': "La méthode de confusion (Zhang et al., 2017), l'une des méthodes d'augmentation des données, est connue pour être facile à mettre en œuvre et très efficace. Bien que la méthode de confusion soit destinée à l'identification d'images, elle peut également être appliquée au traitement du langage naturel. Dans cet article, nous tentons d'appliquer la méthode de confusion à une tâche de classification de documents en utilisant des représentations de codeur bidirectionnelles provenant de transformateurs (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Comme BERT permet la saisie de deux phrases, nous avons concaténé des séquences de mots de deux documents avec des étiquettes différentes et utilisé la sortie multi-classe comme données supervisées avec un vecteur unique. Dans une expérience utilisant le corpus d'actualités livedoor, qui est japonais, nous avons comparé la précision de la classification des documents à l'aide de deux méthodes de sélection des documents à concaténer avec celle de la classification des documents ordinaires. En conséquence, nous avons constaté que la méthode proposée est meilleure que la classification normale lorsque les documents présentant des carences d'étiquettes sont mélangés de manière préférentielle. Cela indique que la façon de choisir les documents à mélanger a un impact significatif sur les résultats.", 'ja': 'データ増強の方法の一つであるミックスアップ法（ Zhang et al., 2017 ）は、実装が容易で、非常に効果的であることが知られている。 ミックスアップ法は画像識別を目的としていますが、自然言語処理にも適用できます。 本稿では，トランスからの双方向エンコーダ表現を用いた文書分類タスクにミックスアップ法を適用しようと試みる（ BERT ） （ Devlin et al., 2018 ） ． BERTは2文入力を可能にするため、異なるラベルを持つ2つのドキュメントからワードシーケンスを連結し、ワンホットベクトルを持つ監視対象データとしてマルチクラス出力を使用しました。 日本語であるライブドアニュースコーパスを使用した実験では、通常の文書分類と連結する文書を選択するための2つの方法を用いて文書分類の精度を比較した。 その結果、ラベルが不足している文書を優先的に混合した場合、提案された方法が通常の分類よりも優れていることがわかった。 これは、ミックスアップのためにドキュメントを選択する方法が結果に大きな影響を与えることを示しています。', 'zh': '混法(Zhang等,2017)数增一,已知易成而高效。 虽混于图像识别,亦可施于自然语言。 本文,试用自变压器(BERT)双向编码器示以混淆之法用于文档类(Devlin等,2018)。 BERT许两句,故以两文档单词序相属,以多类输为一热向量督数。 凡用livemore新闻语料库(日语)之实验,较用二文档之法,与凡文档之类文档准确性。 当标签短缺者文档优先混合,其法优于常分。 明择文档而合之,有大害也。', 'hi': 'मिक्स-अप विधि (झांग एट अल. 2017), डेटा वृद्धि के तरीकों में से एक, को लागू करने में आसान और अत्यधिक प्रभावी होने के लिए जाना जाता है। यद्यपि मिक्स-अप विधि छवि पहचान के लिए अभिप्रेत है, इसे प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण पर भी लागू किया जा सकता है। इस पेपर में, हम ट्रांसफॉर्मर (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018) से द्विदिश एन्कोडर प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करके एक दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण कार्य के लिए मिक्स-अप विधि को लागू करने का प्रयास करते हैं। चूंकि BERT दो-वाक्य इनपुट के लिए अनुमति देता है, इसलिए हमने अलग-अलग लेबल वाले दो दस्तावेज़ों से शब्द अनुक्रमों को concatenated किया और एक-गर्म वेक्टर के साथ पर्यवेक्षित डेटा के रूप में बहु-वर्ग आउटपुट का उपयोग किया। लाइवडोर समाचार कॉर्पस का उपयोग करके एक प्रयोग में, जो जापानी है, हमने दस्तावेजों के चयन के लिए दो तरीकों का उपयोग करके दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण की सटीकता की तुलना की, जिसे सामान्य दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण के साथ संयोजित किया जाना था। नतीजतन, हमने पाया कि प्रस्तावित विधि सामान्य वर्गीकरण से बेहतर है जब लेबल की कमी वाले दस्तावेजों को प्राथमिकता से मिलाया जाता है। यह इंगित करता है कि मिक्स-अप के लिए दस्तावेज़ों का चयन कैसे करें, परिणामों पर महत्वपूर्ण प्रभाव पड़ता है।', 'ru': 'Известно, что метод смешивания (Zhang et al., 2017), один из методов увеличения данных, является простым в реализации и высокоэффективным. Хотя метод путаницы предназначен для идентификации изображений, он также может быть применен к обработке естественного языка. В этой статье мы пытаемся применить метод путаницы к задаче классификации документов, используя двунаправленные представления кодировщика от трансформаторов (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Поскольку BERT позволяет вводить два предложения, мы объединили последовательности слов из двух документов с разными метками и использовали многоклассовый выход в качестве контролируемых данных с однократным вектором. В эксперименте с использованием информационного корпуса liveoor, который является японским, мы сравнили точность классификации документов с использованием двух методов отбора документов, которые должны быть объединены с классификацией обычных документов. В результате мы обнаружили, что предлагаемый метод лучше, чем обычная классификация, когда документы с недостачей этикеток смешаны преимущественно. Это указывает на то, что выбор документов для путаницы оказывает значительное влияние на результаты.', 'ga': "Is eol go bhfuil an modh meascáin (Zhang et al., 2017), ceann de na modhanna chun sonraí a mhéadú, éasca le cur i bhfeidhm agus an-éifeachtach. Cé go bhfuil an modh meascáin beartaithe le haghaidh aitheantais íomhá, is féidir é a chur i bhfeidhm freisin ar phróiseáil teanga nádúrtha. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iarracht an modh meascáin a chur i bhfeidhm ar thasc aicmithe doiciméad ag baint úsáide as uiríll ionchódóra déthreocha ó chlaochladáin (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Ós rud é go gceadaíonn CRET ionchur dhá abairt, chomhcheangail muid seichimh focal ó dhá dhoiciméad le lipéid éagsúla agus d'úsáideamar an t-aschur ilranga mar na sonraí maoirsithe le veicteoir aon-te. I dturgnamh a bhain úsáid as an gcorpas nuachta beo, arb é an tSeapáin é, rinneamar comparáid idir cruinneas rangú doiciméad agus úsáid á baint as dhá mhodh chun doiciméid a roghnú a bheadh comhghatáilte leis an ngnáthaicmiú doiciméad. Mar thoradh air sin, fuair muid amach go bhfuil an modh molta níos fearr ná an gnáth-aicmiú nuair a bhíonn na doiciméid le ganntanas lipéid measctha go fabhrach. Tugann sé seo le fios go bhfuil tionchar suntasach ag an gcaoi le doiciméid a roghnú le haghaidh meascadh suas ar na torthaí.", 'el': 'Η μέθοδος ανάμειξης (κ.α., 2017), μια από τις μεθόδους αύξησης δεδομένων, είναι γνωστή ότι είναι εύκολη στην εφαρμογή και εξαιρετικά αποτελεσματική. Αν και η μέθοδος ανάμειξης προορίζεται για αναγνώριση εικόνας, μπορεί επίσης να εφαρμοστεί στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας. Σε αυτή την εργασία, επιχειρούμε να εφαρμόσουμε τη μέθοδο ανάμειξης σε μια εργασία ταξινόμησης εγγράφων χρησιμοποιώντας αμφίδρομες αναπαραστάσεις κωδικοποιητών από μετασχηματιστές (κ.α., 2018). Δεδομένου ότι ο BERT επιτρέπει την εισαγωγή δύο προτάσεων, συνδέσαμε αλληλουχίες λέξεων από δύο έγγραφα με διαφορετικές ετικέτες και χρησιμοποιήσαμε την παραγωγή πολλαπλών κλάσεων ως εποπτευόμενα δεδομένα με ένα διάνυσμα ενός καυτού. Σε ένα πείραμα που χρησιμοποιούσε το ιαπωνικό ενημερωτικό σώμα, συγκρίναμε την ακρίβεια της ταξινόμησης εγγράφων χρησιμοποιώντας δύο μεθόδους επιλογής εγγράφων προς συσχέτιση με εκείνη της συνήθους ταξινόμησης εγγράφων. Ως αποτέλεσμα, διαπιστώσαμε ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος είναι καλύτερη από την κανονική ταξινόμηση όταν τα έγγραφα με ελλείψεις ετικετών αναμειγνύονται κατά προτίμηση. Αυτό δείχνει ότι ο τρόπος επιλογής εγγράφων για μπέρδεμα έχει σημαντικό αντίκτυπο στα αποτελέσματα.', 'ka': 'ჩანგი და ალ. 2017, ერთი მონაცემების მეტი, რომელიც მონაცემების აღექტირება, იცის, რომ მარტივია და ძალიან ეფექტიური გამოყენება. მაგრამ ჩვენი სიმყვარების მეტი გამოსახულების განსახულებისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვის მო ამ დოკუმენტში, ჩვენ მოვცდილობთ გადაყენება შემდეგ კლასიფიკაციის რაოდენობას დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაციის დავალებისთვის, გამოყენებული ორიდერექციონალური კოდერების რესპენტებით BERT იმიტომ, რომ ორი წესების შესაძლებლობად, ჩვენ ორი დოკუმენტიდან განსხვავებული წესების შესაძლებლობა და მრავალი კლასის შესაძლებლობა, როგორც მონაცემებული მონაცემები ერთი დოქტური გვ ექსპერიმენტის გამოყენებაში ცხოვრებული ნუტური კორპუსს, რომელიც იაპონური, ჩვენ გადაწყენეთ დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაციის სიმართლეობას, რომელიც გამოყენებული ორი მეტი გამოყენებ შემდეგ ჩვენ მივიღეთ, რომ პროგრამეტს უკეთესია ნორმალური კლასიფიკაციაზე, როდესაც პროგრამეტურად კლასიფიკაციაში დოკუმენტები კონტაქტიურად გადამყ ეს მონიშნავს, რომ როგორ გამოიყენება დოკუმენტების შესაძლებლობისთვის შესაძლებელი შედეგების შედეგება.', 'hu': 'A keverési módszer (Zhang et al., 2017), az adatok nagyobbításának egyik módszere, ismert, hogy könnyen megvalósítható és rendkívül hatékony. Bár a keverési módszer a kép azonosítására szolgál, a természetes nyelv feldolgozására is alkalmazható. Jelen tanulmányban megpróbáljuk alkalmazni a keverési módszert egy dokumentum osztályozási feladatra, amely transzformátorokból származó kétirányú kódoló reprezentációkat (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Mivel a BERT két mondatból álló bevitelt tesz lehetővé, két különböző címkékkel ellátott dokumentum szavasorozatait összekapcsoltuk, és a többosztályú kimenetet egy forró vektorral felügyelt adatként használtuk. Egy japán, a livedoor hírcsoport használatával végzett kísérletben a dokumentumok osztályozásának pontosságát két módszerrel hasonlítottuk össze a hagyományos dokumentumok osztályozásával. Ennek eredményeként megállapítottuk, hogy a javasolt módszer jobb, mint a normál osztályozás, ha a címkehiányos dokumentumokat előnyben vegyük össze. Ez azt jelzi, hogy a keveréshez szükséges dokumentumok kiválasztása jelentős hatással van az eredményekre.', 'it': "Il metodo mix-up (Zhang et al., 2017), uno dei metodi per l'aumento dei dati, è noto per essere facile da implementare e altamente efficace. Sebbene il metodo mix-up sia destinato all'identificazione delle immagini, può essere applicato anche all'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. In questo articolo, si tenta di applicare il metodo mix-up a un'attività di classificazione dei documenti utilizzando rappresentazioni bidirezionali encoder da trasformatori (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Poiché BERT consente l'input di due frasi, abbiamo concatenato sequenze di parole da due documenti con etichette diverse e usato l'output multi-classe come dati supervisionati con un vettore one-hot. In un esperimento utilizzando il corpus di notizie livedoor, che è giapponese, abbiamo confrontato l'accuratezza della classificazione dei documenti utilizzando due metodi per selezionare i documenti da concatenare con quello della classificazione ordinaria dei documenti. Di conseguenza, abbiamo scoperto che il metodo proposto è migliore della classificazione normale quando i documenti con carenze di etichette sono mescolati preferenzialmente. Ciò indica che come scegliere i documenti da miscelare ha un impatto significativo sui risultati.", 'mk': 'The mix-up method (Zhang et al., 2017), one of the methods for data augmentation, is known to be easy to implement and highly effective.  Иако методот на мешање е наменет за идентификација на сликата, исто така може да се примени и на природното обработување на јазикот. Во овој весник, се обидуваме да го примениме методот на мешање на задачата за класификација на документите со користење на двоправни кодерски претставувања од трансформаторите (БЕРТ) (Devlin et al., 2018). Since BERT allows for two-sentence input, we concatenated word sequences from two documents with different labels and used the multi-class output as the supervised data with a one-hot vector.  In an experiment using the livedoor news corpus, which is Japanese, we compared the accuracy of document classification using two methods for selecting documents to be concatenated with that of ordinary document classification.  Како резултат на тоа, откривме дека предложениот метод е подобар од нормалната класификација кога документите со недостатоци на етикети се мешани преференцијално. Ова покажува дека начинот на избор на документи за мешање има значително влијание врз резултатите.', 'ml': 'ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d (Zhang et al., 2017) കണക്കാക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും വളരെ പ്രവ ചിത്രം തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന മിഷ്ക്കങ്ങളുടെ രീതിയാണെങ്കിലും സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത In this paper, we attempt to apply the mix-up method to a document classification task using bidirectional encoder representations from transformers (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018).  BERT രണ്ട് വാക്കുകളുടെ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടിന് അനുവദിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, രണ്ടു രേഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത ചിത്രങ്ങളുമായി വാക്കിന്റെ സെക്കന്\u200dസ്കെന്റ് ചെയ ജാപ്പാനീസ് ജീവിക്കുന്ന ലൈവ്ഡോര്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്ത കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് രേഖകള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിന് രണ്ട്  അതിന്റെ ഫലമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയാണ് സാധാരണ ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫിക്ഷനെക്കാള്\u200d നല് മിഷ്ക്ക്- അംഗീകരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള രേഖകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കേണ്ടതെന്ന് ഇതിന് കാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'ms': 'The mix-up method (Zhang et al., 2017), one of the methods for data augmentation, is known to be easy to implement and highly effective.  Although the mix-up method is intended for image identification, it can also be applied to natural language processing.  Dalam kertas ini, kami cuba untuk melaksanakan kaedah campuran kepada tugas klasifikasi dokumen menggunakan perwakilan pengekod bidireksi dari pengubah (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Since BERT allows for two-sentence input, we concatenated word sequences from two documents with different labels and used the multi-class output as the supervised data with a one-hot vector.  In an experiment using the livedoor news corpus, which is Japanese, we compared the accuracy of document classification using two methods for selecting documents to be concatenated with that of ordinary document classification.  As a result, we found that the proposed method is better than the normal classification when the documents with labels shortages are mixed preferentially.  This indicates that how to choose documents for mix-up has a significant impact on the results.', 'mn': 'Мөн мэдээллийн нэмэгдүүлэх аргын нэг нь маш амархан болон үр дүнтэй байдаг. Хэдийгээр холбоотой арга зураг танихын тулд зориулагдсан ч байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлд ч мөн хэрэглэгдэж болно. Энэ цаасан дээр бид баримт хуваалтын ажил дээр холбоотой арга хэрэглэхийг хичээдэг. БЕРТ хоёр өгүүлбэр орлуулах боломжтой болсон учраас бид хоёр бичгийн дарааллын дарааллыг өөр жагсаалтай хоёр бичсэн бөгөөд олон хичээлийн үр дүнг нэг халуун вектортай удирдлагатай өгөгдлийн хувьд хэр Япон гэдэг амьтны мэдээллийн корпус ашигладаг туршилтын дотор бид баримт хуваалтын зөв тодорхойлолтыг хоёр арга зам ашиглаж бичиг баримт хуваалтын тухай харьцуулсан. Үүний үр дүнд бид санал өгсөн арга нь тэмдэглэгдэх баримтуудтай хамааралтай дүрслэлээс илүү сайн гэдгийг олж мэдсэн. Энэ нь холбоотой баримт хэрхэн сонгох нь үр дүн дээр чухал нөлөөтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'kk': 'Мақсаттау әдісі (Zhang et al., 2017), деректерді өзгерту әдістерінің бірі, және өте эффективні істеу оңай болып табылады. Кескінді идентификациялау үшін араластыру әдісі болса да, оны табиғи тілді өңдеу үшін қолдануға болады. Бұл қағазда, біз құжаттарды қадамдастыру әдісін құжаттың классификациялау тапсырмасына (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). BERT екі сөзді келтіруге мүмкіндік беретін себебі, екі құжаттан бірнеше жарлықтар мен бірнеше жарлықтарымен бірнеше класс шығысын бақылайтын деректер ретінде қолдандық. Құжаттарды таңдау үшін екі әдімгімен құжаттарды таңдау үшін жаңа жаңалық корпус қолданатын тәжірибеде, япониялық, құжаттарды таңдау үшін құжаттардың дұрыстығын салыстырдық. Нәтижесінде, келтірілген әдістер жарлық құжаттардың қысқартылығының кәдімгі классификациясынан артық болып таптық. Бұл араластыру үшін құжаттарды таңдау үшін нәтижелердің маңызды нәтижесін көрсетеді.', 'mt': 'The mix-up method (Zhang et al., 2017), one of the methods for data augmentation, is known to be easy to implement and highly effective.  Although the mix-up method is intended for image identification, it can also be applied to natural language processing.  In this paper, we attempt to apply the mix-up method to a document classification task using bidirectional encoder representations from transformers (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018).  Since BERT allows for two-sentence input, we concatenated word sequences from two documents with different labels and used the multi-class output as the supervised data with a one-hot vector.  F’esperiment bl-użu tal-livedoor news corpus, li huwa Ġappuniż, qabblu l-preċiżjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni tad-dokumenti bl-użu ta’ żewġ metodi għall-għażla tad-dokumenti li għandhom ikunu konċidentati ma’ dik tal-klassifikazzjoni ordinarja tad-dokumenti. As a result, we found that the proposed method is better than the normal classification when the documents with labels shortages are mixed preferentially.  This indicates that how to choose documents for mix-up has a significant impact on the results.', 'no': 'Mjukingsmetoden (Zhang et al., 2017), ein av metodane for data augmentasjon, er kjent til å vera lett å implementera og veldig effektiv. Dette kan også brukast til naturspråkshandtering, selv om mix-up-metoden er for bilete-identifisering. I denne papiret prøver vi å bruka mix-up-metoden til eit dokumentklassifikasjon-oppgåve ved hjelp av bidireksjonal koderingsrepresentasjonar frå transformatorar (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Sidan BERT tillater inndata frå to setningar, har vi samanserte ordsekvensar frå to dokument med ulike etikettar og brukt utdata frå fleire klasser som overvakte data med ein ein varme vektor. I eit eksperiment med livedoor news corpus, som er japansk, samanlikna vi nøyaktighet for dokumentklassifikasjon med to metodar for å velja dokument som skal samsvarast med det vanlege dokumentklassifikasjonen. I resultatet fann vi at den foreslåde metoden er bedre enn den vanlege klassifikasjonen når dokumenta med merkelappen korta er blandet førehandsvising. Dette viser at korleis å velja dokument for mixing har ein signifikant effekt på resultatene.', 'pl': 'Metoda mieszania (Zhang i al., 2017), jedna z metod powiększania danych, jest znana jako łatwa w wdrożeniu i wysoce skuteczna. Chociaż metoda mieszania jest przeznaczona do identyfikacji obrazu, może być również stosowana do przetwarzania języka naturalnego. W niniejszym artykule próbujemy zastosować metodę mieszania do zadania klasyfikacji dokumentów przy użyciu dwukierunkowych reprezentacji koderów z transformatorów (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Ponieważ BERT umożliwia wejście dwuzdań, połączyliśmy sekwencje słów z dwóch dokumentów o różnych etykietach i wykorzystaliśmy wieloklasowy wyjście jako nadzorowane dane z jednym gorącym wektorem. W eksperymencie z wykorzystaniem japońskiego korpusu wiadomości live door porównaliśmy dokładność klasyfikacji dokumentów przy użyciu dwóch metod wyboru dokumentów, które mają być połączone ze zwykłą klasyfikacją dokumentów. W rezultacie stwierdziliśmy, że proponowana metoda jest lepsza niż zwykła klasyfikacja, gdy dokumenty z niedoborami etykiet są mieszane preferowanie. Oznacza to, że sposób wyboru dokumentów do pomieszania ma istotny wpływ na wyniki.', 'lt': 'The mix-up method (Zhang et al., 2017), one of the methods for data augmentation, is known to be easy to implement and highly effective.  Nors mišinio metodas skirtas vaizdo identifikavimui, jis taip pat gali būti taikomas natūraliam kalbų apdorojimui. Šiame dokumente bandome taikyti sumaišymo metodą dokumentų klasifikavimo užduotims, naudojant dvikrypčius transformatorių kodatorių (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018 m.). Kadangi BERT leidžia įvesti du sakinius, mes sutrumpinome žodžių sekas iš dviejų dokumentų su skirtingomis etiketėmis ir naudojome daugiakalassinį išėjimą kaip prižiūrimus duomenis su vienu karštu vektoriumi. In an experiment using the livedoor news corpus, which is Japanese, we compared the accuracy of document classification using two methods for selecting documents to be concatenated with that of ordinary document classification.  Todėl nustatėme, kad siūlomas metodas yra geresnis už įprastą klasifikaciją, kai dokumentus su etiketėmis trūksta lengviau sumaišyti. Tai rodo, kad tai, kaip pasirinkti dokumentus mišiniui, daro didelį poveikį rezultatams.', 'ro': 'Metoda amestecării (Zhang et al., 2017), una dintre metodele de mărire a datelor, este cunoscută a fi ușor de implementat și foarte eficientă. Deși metoda de amestecare este destinată identificării imaginilor, ea poate fi aplicată și procesării limbajului natural. În această lucrare, încercăm să aplicăm metoda amestecării la o sarcină de clasificare a documentelor utilizând reprezentări bidirecționale de la transformatoare (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Deoarece BERT permite introducerea în două propoziții, am concatenat secvențe de cuvinte din două documente cu etichete diferite și am folosit ieșirea multi-clasă ca date supravegheate cu un vector cu un singur fierbinte. Într-un experiment folosind corpusul de știri live door, care este japonez, am comparat acuratețea clasificării documentelor folosind două metode de selectare a documentelor care urmează să fie concatenate cu cea a clasificării documentelor obișnuite. Ca urmare, am constatat că metoda propusă este mai bună decât clasificarea normală atunci când documentele cu deficiențe de etichete sunt amestecate preferențial. Acest lucru indică faptul că modul de alegere a documentelor pentru amestecare are un impact semnificativ asupra rezultatelor.', 'so': 'Mid ka mid ah qaababka kordhiska macluumaadka (Zhang et al., 2017), waxaa loo yaqaan inuu si fudud u sameeyo oo aad u shaqeeyo. In kastoo ay leedahay aqoonsiga sawirka isku xiran, waxaa sidoo kale lagu codsan karaa baaraandegista luqada asalka ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu isku daynaa in aynu ku codsanaynaa qaababka isku qasbidda shaqada ee warqadda fasaxa, sida loo isticmaalo kooxooyinka ku qorayo iskudarka (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Since BERT allows for two-sentence input, we concatenated word sequences from two documents with different labels and used the multi-class output as the supervised data with a one-hot vector.  Imtixaan ah oo ku isticmaalaya korpuska warqada nolosha ee Jabanees ah, waxaynu isbarbardhignay saxda fasaxa dukumentiga, si aan u doorto dukumentiyada in lagu kaleexeeyo fasaxa wargeyska caadiga ah. Sababtaas darteed waxaan ogaanay in qaababka la soo jeeday ay ay ka wanaagsan tahay fasalka caadiga ah marka dukumentiyada lagu qasbo gaaban alaabta. Markaas waxaa loola jeedaa in sida loo doorto dukumentiyada isku qasbidda uu saameyn ku yeelanayo matooyinka.', 'ta': 'இந்த கலந்த முறைமை (Zhang et al., 2017), தரவு கூட்டுதல் முறைகளில் ஒன்று, மிகவும் செயல்படுத்துவதற்கு எளிதானதாகவும் தெரியும். பிம்பத்தை அடையாளத்திற்கான கலந்த முறைமையாக தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்டாலும், அது இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தலுக்க இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு ஆவண வகைப்பாட்டு பணிக்கு கலந்த முறைமையை பயன்படுத்த முயற்சிக்கிறோம் மாற்றும் மாற்றங்களிலிருந்து பிரெட்லி BERT இரண்டு வாக்கியத்தின் உள்ளீட்டை அனுமதிக்கும் போது, நாம் இரண்டு ஆவணங்களில் இருந்து வார்த்தை பிரிவுகளை சேர் ஜாப்பானியாக இருக்கும் செய்தி குறிப்பை பயன்படுத்தும் ஒரு சோதனையில், நாம் இரண்டு முறைகளை பயன்படுத்தி ஆவணத்தை தேர்ந்தெடுத்து சாதாரண ஆவண வகைப்பாட முடிவில், முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையானது சிட்டைகளுடன் குறிப்புகளுடன் கலந்த போது இயல்பான வகுப்பாட்டை விட சிறந் கலப்புக்கான ஆவணங்களை எவ்வாறு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் என்பதை இது குறிப்பிடுகிறது முடிவுகளின் மீது முக்கி', 'sv': 'Mix-up metoden (Zhang et al., 2017), en av metoderna för dataökning, är känd för att vara enkel att implementera och mycket effektiv. Även om mixed-up metoden är avsedd för bildidentifiering, kan den också tillämpas på naturlig språkbehandling. I denna uppsats försöker vi tillämpa mixed-up metoden på en dokumentklassificeringsuppgift med hjälp av tvåriktade encoderrepresentationer från transformatorer (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Eftersom BERT tillåter inmatning av två meningar sammanfogade vi ordsekvenser från två dokument med olika etiketter och använde flerklassutmatningen som övervakad data med en hetvektor. I ett experiment med livedoor news corpus, som är japansk, jämförde vi noggrannheten i dokumentklassificeringen med två metoder för att välja dokument som ska sammanlänkas med den vanliga dokumentklassificeringen. Som ett resultat fann vi att den föreslagna metoden är bättre än den normala klassificeringen när dokument med etikettbrist blandas företrädesvis. Detta indikerar att hur man väljer dokument för blandning har en betydande inverkan på resultaten.', 'sr': 'Mešavanje metode (Zhang et al., 2017), jedan od metoda povećanja podataka, poznato je da je lako provesti i vrlo efikasno. Iako je metod miješanja predviđen za identifikaciju slika, može se primjenjivati i na prirodno obradivanje jezika. U ovom papiru pokušavamo da primjenjujemo metodu miješanja na zadatak klasifikacije dokumenta koristeći predstave bidirektivnog kodera od transformatora (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Budući da je BERT omogućila da dodje dve rečenice, zaključili smo rečne sekvence iz dva dokumenta sa različitim etiketama i koristili višeklasični izlaz kao nadzorne podatke sa jednim vrućim vektorom. U eksperimentu koristeći vesti korpus jetre, koji je Japanac, usporedili smo tačnost klasifikacije dokumenta koristeći dve metode da izaberemo dokumente koji će biti povezani sa običnom klasifikacijom dokumenta. Kao rezultat toga, otkrili smo da je predložena metoda bolja od normalne klasifikacije kada su dokumenti sa nedostatkom etiketa umešani preferencijalno. To ukazuje na to kako odabrati dokumente za mješanje ima značajan uticaj na rezultate.', 'si': 'මික්ස් අප් විධානය (ජාන්ග් ට් ල්., 2017), දත්ත වැඩි කරන විධානයෙන් එකක්, දත්ත වැඩි විධානය සහ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පින්තූර පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා මික්ස් විධානයක් තියෙන්නේ නමුත්, ඒක ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා මික්ස්ප් විධානය සඳහා විශේෂ විධානයක් ලබාගන්න බිදිරික්\u200dෂිත කාර්යාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න BERT වාක්ය දෙකක් ඇතුලට අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන් නිසා, අපි වෙනස් ලේබෙල් වල ලෙබෙක් දෙකක් වලින් වාක්ය වලින් වචන වචන වචන වචන පත්ති පරීක්ෂණයක් ජාපානියානු වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, අපි පරීක්ෂණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජන ඉතින්, අපි හොයාගත්තා විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදියට සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට වඩා හොඳයි කියලා ලේබෙල් අඩුවෙන් ලේබෙල් වල මේක පෙනුවන් වෙනවා කියලා මික්ස් එක් වෙනුවෙන් ලිපිම් තෝරගන්නේ කොහොමද ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචා', 'ur': 'میکس-آپ طریقہ (Zhang et al., 2017), ڈیٹا اضافہ کرنے کے لئے ایک طریقہ ہے، اسے آسان اور بہت اضافہ کرنے کے لئے پہچان لیا جاتا ہے. اگرچہ میکس-آپ طریقہ تصویر کی شناسایی کے لئے مقرر کیا گیا ہے، اسے بھی طبیعی زبان پردازی پر لازم کر سکتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک دفتر کلاسیفوں کے کام پر میکس-آپ طریقہ کا استعمال کرنا کی کوشش کی ہے جو دوسری طریقہ کا انڈیر کوڈر ٹورنسفور (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). BERT کے لئے دو کلاس اینپیٹ کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے، ہم نے دو دفتروں سے مختلف لابل کے ساتھ کلاس اینپیٹ کو ایک گرم ویکتور کے ساتھ دوسرے کلاس کے آئٹ کے ساتھ سمجھا دیا ہے۔ ایک آزمائش میں جہاپنی خبر کورپوس کے استعمال سے، ہم نے دو طریقوں کے مطابق دکھانے کی دکھانے کی دکھانے کی دکھانے کی دکھانے کی دکھانے کی دکھانے کی دکھانے کی دکھانے کی دکھانے کی دکھانے کے مطابق مقایسہ کی۔ اس کے نتیجے میں ہم نے پایا کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ عام کلاسیفوں سے بہتر ہے جب لابلوں کے ساتھ لکھنے کی کمزوری پیدا ہوتی ہیں۔ یہ نشان دیتا ہے کہ میکس-آپ کے لئے سند کیسے انتخاب کرنا نتائج پر اہم اثر ہے.', 'uz': "Name Agar rasmni aniqlash uchun qoʻyish usuli boʻlishi kerak boʻlsa, uni asl tilni boshqarish uchun qoʻllash mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz transformatorlar (BERT) (Devlin et al, 2018) bilan bir necha kodlash namoyishlari bilan hujjat classification vazifasini qoʻllashga harakat qilamiz. BERT ikkita so'zlar kiritishga ruxsat beradi, biz ikkita hujjatdagi so'zlar chegarasini bir xil yordamida bir necha hujjat bilan birlashtiramiz va bir issiq vektor bilan saqlangan maʼlumotdan foydalanamiz. Yaponiyasi, Livdoor news Corpus (Livdoor News Corpus) yordamida biz hujjatning darajasini ikkita usuli bilan birlashtirish uchun qoʻllanmagan hujjatning oddiy darajasi bilan birlashtirish mumkin. Va natijada biz o'ylab ko'rsatganimiz, ilova qilingan usuli oddiy darajadagi darajadan яхшироқдир. Hujjatlar lab tugmalar birikmasi bilan birlashtirilganda. Name", 'vi': 'The mix-up methods (Zhang et al., 2007) Một trong những phương pháp gia tăng dữ liệu được biết là dễ dàng thực hiện và rất hiệu quả. Tuy nhiên phương pháp pha trộn được dùng để nhận diện ảnh, nhưng cũng có thể được áp dụng cho việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi cố áp dụng phương pháp trộn lẫn nhau vào một nhiệm vụ phân tích tài liệu bằng các biểu tượng mã hóa hai trực tiếp từ các bộ chuyển hóa (BERT) (Devlin et al., thậm chí 208). Vì BERT cho phép nhập hai phần chữ, chúng tôi kết hợp các chuỗi từ từ hai tài liệu với các nhãn khác nhau và sử dụng sản xuất nhiều lớp như dữ liệu được giám sát với một véc- tơ nóng. Trong một thử nghiệm dùng hệ thống ảnh trực tiếp, tức là Nhật Bản, chúng tôi đã so sánh độ chính xác của việc phân loại tài liệu bằng hai phương pháp lựa chọn tài liệu cần được xác định với quy trình phân loại tài liệu bình thường. Kết quả là, chúng tôi thấy phương pháp được đề nghị tốt hơn bình thường khi các tài liệu thiếu nhãn được trộn thích hợp. Điều này cho thấy cách chọn các tài liệu để trộn lẫn có tác động đáng kể tới kết quả.', 'bg': 'Методът за смесване (Джан и др., 2017), един от методите за увеличаване на данните, е известен като лесен за прилагане и високо ефективен. Въпреки че методът за смесване е предназначен за идентификация на изображения, той може да се прилага и за обработка на естествен език. В тази статия се опитваме да приложим метода на смесване към задача за класификация на документи, използвайки двупосочни кодиращи изображения от трансформатори (Девлин и др., 2018). Тъй като позволява въвеждане с две изречения, ние конкатенирахме последователности от думи от два документа с различни етикети и използвахме многокласовия изход като надзорни данни с един горещ вектор. В експеримент с помощта на японския новинарски корпус сравнихме точността на класификацията на документите, използвайки два метода за избор на документи, които да бъдат конкатенирани с този на обикновената класификация на документите. В резултат на това установихме, че предложеният метод е по-добър от нормалната класификация, когато недостигът на документи с етикети се смесва предпочитано. Това показва, че как да изберете документи за объркване има значително въздействие върху резултатите.', 'nl': 'De mix-up methode (Zhang et al., 2017), een van de methoden voor data augmentatie, staat erom bekend eenvoudig te implementeren en zeer effectief te zijn. Hoewel de mix-up methode bedoeld is voor beeldidentificatie, kan het ook worden toegepast op natuurlijke taalverwerking. In dit artikel proberen we de mix-up methode toe te passen op een documentclassificatietaak met behulp van bidirectionele encoder representaties van transformatoren (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Omdat BERT invoer in twee zinnen mogelijk maakt, hebben we woordreeksen van twee documenten met verschillende labels aan elkaar gekoppeld en gebruikten we de multi-class output als de begeleide gegevens met een one-hot vector. In een experiment met het Japans live door news corpus hebben we de nauwkeurigheid van documentclassificatie vergeleken met die van gewone documentclassificatie. Als gevolg hiervan hebben we geconstateerd dat de voorgestelde methode beter is dan de normale indeling wanneer de documenten met een tekort aan etiketten bij voorkeur gemengd worden. Dit geeft aan dat het kiezen van documenten voor verwarring een aanzienlijke impact heeft op de resultaten.', 'hr': 'Mešavanje metode (Zhang et al., 2017), jedna od metoda povećanja podataka, zna se da je lako provesti i vrlo učinkoviti. Iako je metod miješanja namijenjen za identifikaciju slika, može se primjenjivati i na prirodnu obradu jezika. U ovom papiru pokušavamo primjenjivati mješavinu metodu na zadatak klasifikacije dokumenta koristeći predstave bidirektivnog kodera od transformatora (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Budući da je BERT omogućila da se utvrdi dvije rečenice, zaključili smo sekvence riječi iz dva dokumenta s različitim etiketama i koristili izlaz višeklase kao nadzorne podatke s jednim vrućim vektorom. U eksperimentu koristeći vijestinski korpus jetre, što je Japanski, usporedili smo preciznost klasifikacije dokumenta koristeći dvije metode za izabranje dokumenta koji će biti povezani s običnom klasifikacijom dokumenta. Kao rezultat toga, otkrili smo da je predložena metoda bolja od normalne klasifikacije kada su dokumenti s nedostatkom etiketa umešani preferencijalno. To ukazuje na to kako odabrati dokumente za mješanje ima značajan utjecaj na rezultate.', 'da': 'Mix-up metoden (Zhang et al., 2017), en af metoderne til dataaugmentation, er kendt for at være nem at implementere og meget effektiv. Selvom blandingsmetoden er beregnet til billedidentifikation, kan den også anvendes til behandling af naturligt sprog. I denne artikel forsøger vi at anvende mixed-up metoden til en dokumentklassifikationsopgave ved hjælp af bidirectional encoder repræsentationer fra transformere (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Da BERT giver mulighed for to sætninger input, sammenkoblede vi ordsekvenser fra to dokumenter med forskellige etiketter og brugte multi-class output som overvågede data med en one-hot vektor. I et eksperiment med livedoor news corpus, som er japansk, sammenlignede vi nøjagtigheden af dokumentklassificering ved hjælp af to metoder til udvælgelse af dokumenter, der skal sammenkobles med den almindelige dokumentklassificering. Som følge heraf fandt vi, at den foreslåede metode er bedre end den normale klassificering, når dokumenter med etiketter mangler blandes fortrinsvis. Dette indikerer, at hvordan man vælger dokumenter til blanding har en betydelig indvirkning på resultaterne.', 'de': 'Die Verwechslungsmethode (Zhang et al., 2017), eine der Methoden zur Datenauswertung, ist dafür bekannt, einfach zu implementieren und hochwirksam zu sein. Obwohl die Verwechslungsmethode zur Bildidentifizierung bestimmt ist, kann sie auch auf die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache angewendet werden. In diesem Beitrag versuchen wir, die Verwechslungsmethode auf eine Dokumentenklassifikationsaufgabe mit bidirektionalen Encoderdarstellungen von Transformatoren (BERT) anzuwenden (Devlin et al., 2018). Da BERT die Eingabe von zwei Sätzen zulässt, verketteten wir Wortsequenzen aus zwei Dokumenten mit unterschiedlichen Beschriftungen und nutzten die Mehrklassenausgabe als überwachte Daten mit einem One-Hot-Vektor. In einem Experiment mit dem japanischen Livedoor-Nachrichtenkorpus haben wir die Genauigkeit der Dokumentenklassifizierung anhand zweier Methoden zur Auswahl von Dokumenten mit derjenigen der gewöhnlichen Dokumentenklassifizierung verglichen. Als Ergebnis haben wir festgestellt, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode besser ist als die normale Klassifizierung, wenn die Dokumente mit Labelmangeln bevorzugt gemischt werden. Dies zeigt an, dass die Auswahl von Dokumenten für Verwechslungen erhebliche Auswirkungen auf die Ergebnisse hat.', 'id': 'Metode mix-up (Zhang et al., 2017), salah satu metode untuk peningkatan data, dikenal sebagai mudah untuk dieksploitasi dan sangat efektif. Although the mix-up method is intended for image identification, it can also be applied to natural language processing.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mencoba untuk menggunakan metode mix-up untuk tugas klasifikasi dokumen menggunakan represensi koder bidireksi dari transformer (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Karena BERT memungkinkan masukan dua kalimat, kami menyatukan urutan kata dari dua dokumen dengan label yang berbeda dan menggunakan output multi-kelas sebagai data yang diawasi dengan vektor yang satu panas. Dalam sebuah eksperimen menggunakan livedoor news corpus, yang adalah Jepang, kami membandingkan akurasi klasifikasi dokumen menggunakan dua metode untuk memilih dokumen yang harus disesuaikan dengan klasifikasi dokumen biasa. Sebagai hasilnya, kami menemukan bahwa metode yang diusulkan adalah lebih baik dari klasifikasi normal ketika dokumen dengan kekurangan label dicampur preferensi. This indicates that how to choose documents for mix-up has a significant impact on the results.', 'ko': '혼합 방법(Zhang et al., 2017)은 데이터 확장 방법 중의 하나로 모두가 알고 있는 바와 같이 이 방법은 실시하기 쉽고 매우 효과적이다.비록 혼합 방법은 이미지 식별에 사용되지만, 자연 언어 처리에도 응용될 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 혼합 방법을transformers(BERT) 양방향 인코더로 표시된 문서 분류 작업(Devlin et al., 2018)에 적용하려고 한다.BERT는 두 문장의 입력을 허용하기 때문에, 우리는 서로 다른 라벨을 가진 두 문서의 단어 서열을 연결하고, 여러 종류의 출력을 열 벡터를 가진 감독 데이터로 사용한다.livedoor 뉴스 자료 라이브러리(일본어)를 사용한 실험에서 우리는 두 가지 방법으로 연결할 문서와 일반 문서를 분류하는 문서 분류의 정확성을 비교했다.그 결과 탭이 없는 문서를 우선적으로 혼합할 때 일반적인 분류 방법보다 이 방법이 낫다는 것을 알 수 있다.이것은 혼합할 문서를 어떻게 선택하는가가 결과에 중대한 영향을 미친다는 것을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'روش مخلوط (Zhang et al., 2017) یکی از روش\u200cهای افزایش داده\u200cها آسان و بسیار موثر است. هر چند روش مخلوط برای شناسایی تصویر مقرر شده است، می\u200cتواند به پرداخت زبان طبیعی هم کاربرد شود. در این کاغذ، ما سعی می\u200cکنیم روش مخلوط را به یک کار شناسایی سند استفاده کنیم با استفاده از نمایش\u200cهای رمز\u200cکنندگان (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Since BERT allows for two sentence input, we concatenated word sequences from two documents with different labels and used the multi-class output as the supervised data with a hot vector. در یک آزمایش با استفاده از کورپوس خبرهای چهارخانه، که ژاپنی است، دقیقات کلیسازی سند را با استفاده از دو روش برای انتخاب کردن سند برای هماهنگی با کلیسازی سند معمولی مقایسه کردیم. به نتیجه، ما فهمیدیم که این روش پیشنهاد بهتر از فرقه\u200cبندی عادی است وقتی سند\u200cهای کوتاهی با نقاشی\u200cهای نقاشی به ترکیب ترکیب می\u200cشوند. این نشان می دهد که چگونه برگزیدن مدارک برای مخلوط تاثیر بزرگی بر نتیجه\u200cها دارد.', 'tr': 'Karışma yöntemi (Zhang et al., 2017), maglumat ýetişdirmegi üçin bir nusga üçin ýeňil implementasy we örän täsirli bolup bilinýär. Resim kimligi üçin bir karışlaşdyrma täze hili, be ýleki diller işlemek üçin uygulanabilir. Bu kagyzda, biziň karışyk yöntemi bir sened klasifikasy täblisasyny terjime edip görkezmäge synanyşýarys (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). BERT iki sözle girişine izin verir çünkü, iki seneden farklı etiketlerle birleşmiş kelime sıralar ve çoklu sınıf çizgisini bir ısı vektöre gözetlenmiş veri olarak kullandık Bir deneyde, Japonça hasaplanjaň korpusyny ulanyp geçirilýän çykyş bilen, dürli sened klasifikasyyla ylalaşyk üçin 2 yöntemi ulanyp synanyşdyrdyk. Netijäniň üçin teklip eden yöntemiň adatça klasifikasiýadan has gowydygyny tapdyk. Bu karışmak üçin senedi nädip saýlamagyny netijelere nähili täsir etjek bolandygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Die gemink metode (Zhang et al., 2017), een van die metodes vir data augmentasie, is bekend om maklik te implementeer en baie effektief te wees. Alhoewel die gemink metode is bedoel vir beeldidentifikasie, kan dit ook aanwend word na natuurlike taal verwerking. In hierdie papier, ons probeer om die gemink-opmetode na 'n dokumentklassifikasie taak te toewend deur gebruik van bidireksjonale enkoder voorstellings van transformeerders (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Omdat BERT toelaat vir twee- setnings invoer, het ons samefoedige woord volgorde van twee dokumente met verskillende etikette en gebruik die multiklas uitvoer as die ondersoekte data met 'n een- warm vektor. In 'n eksperiment gebruik die lewendeur nuuskorpus, wat Japaanse is, vergelyk ons die presisiteit van dokumentklassifikasie met twee metodes om dokumente te kies wat saamgelyk word met die normale dokumentklassifikasie. As 'n resultaat, ons het gevind dat die voorgestelde metode beter is as die normale klasifikasie wanneer die dokumente met etikette kortpad voorkeur gemeng word. Hierdie wys dat hoe om dokumente te kies vir gemink het 'n betekende invloek op die resultate.", 'sw': 'Njia ya mchanganyiko (Zhang et al., 2017), moja ya njia za kuongeza data, inajulikana ni rahisi kutekeleza na yenye ufanisi mkubwa. Ingawa mbinu za mchanganyiko unalengwa kwa ajili ya kutambua picha, pia inaweza kutumika kwa upasuaji wa lugha asili. Katika karatasi hii, tunajaribu kutumia mbinu ya mchanganyiko katika kazi ya kutangaza nyaraka kwa kutumia uwakilishi wa kodi kwa bidii kutoka mabadiliko (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Since BERT allows for two-sentence input, we concatenated word sequences from two documents with different labels and used the multi-class output as the supervised data with a one-hot vector.  Katika jaribio la kutumia makampuni ya habari ya maisha, ambayo ni Kijapani, tulilinganisha ukweli wa usambazaji wa nyaraka kwa kutumia mbinu mbili za kuchagua nyaraka zinazohusiana na utangazaji wa nyaraka za kawaida. Matokeo yake, tuligundua kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa ni bora kuliko kutangazwa kwa kawaida ambapo nyaraka zenye upungufu wa alama zinachanganyika zaidi. Hii inaonyesha jinsi ya kuchagua nyaraka kwa ajili ya mchanganyiko una athari kubwa kwa matokeo.', 'sq': 'The mix-up method (Zhang et al., 2017), one of the methods for data augmentation, is known to be easy to implement and highly effective.  Megjithëse metoda e përzierjes është e synuar për identifikimin e imazhit, ajo mund të aplikohet gjithashtu në procesimin natyror të gjuhës. Në këtë letër, ne përpiqemi të aplikojmë metodën e përzierjes në një detyrë klasifikimi të dokumentit duke përdorur përfaqësime dy-drejtuese koduese nga transformuesit (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Nga që BERT lejon hyrjen me dy fjalë, ne shkurtuam sekuencat e fjalëve nga dy dokumente me etiketa të ndryshme dhe përdorëm daljen me shumë klasa si të dhënat e mbikqyrura me një vektor të nxehtë. In an experiment using the livedoor news corpus, which is Japanese, we compared the accuracy of document classification using two methods for selecting documents to be concatenated with that of ordinary document classification.  Si rezultat, gjetëm se metoda e propozuar është më e mirë se klasifikimi normal kur dokumentet me shkurtime etiketash janë përzier preferimisht. Kjo tregon se si të zgjedhësh dokumentet për përzierje ka një ndikim të rëndësishëm në rezultatet.', 'am': 'The mix-up method (Zhang et al., 2017), one of the methods for data augmentation, is known to be easy to implement and highly effective.  Although the mix-up method is intended for image identification, it can also be applied to natural language processing.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ አካባቢ ማድረግ ከtransformers (BERT) (Devlin et al, 2018) በመጠቀም የሰነድ ክፍል ማድረጊያውን ለመጠቀም እንሞክራለን፡፡ BERT ለሁለት-ክፍል ውስጥ ጥያቄን ሲፈቅድ ከሁለት ሰነድ ቃላት የተለየ ምልክቶች እና በብዙ-ደረጃ ውጤት የተጠበቀውን ዳታ በአንድ-hot vector እና ተጠቀምን፡፡ የጃፓንዊው የሕያፍ ዜና ኮርፓስ በሚጠቀም ፈተና፣ የሰነድ ክፍል በተለየ ሁለቱን ሰነድ ክፍሎች ለመምረጥ በተቃወም ሰነድ ክፍል ለመለጠፍ አካል፡፡ ከዚህም ምክንያት የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት በተጨማሪው የምልክት አቋራጭ በተቀራረበ ጊዜ ከአዳዲስ ክፍል በላጭ እንዲሻል አግኝተናል፡፡ ይህ ሰነዱን እንዴት ለመምረጥ ምረጡ ፍሬዎቹን በጥቅልቅ ጉዳይ ይኖራል፡፡', 'az': 'Məlumatı artırmaq metodlarından birini (Zhang et al., 2017), qarışıqlıq metodlarının istifadəsi və çox etkilidir. Karışma metodu görüntü tanımlaması üçün hazırlanmış olsa da, bu təbiətli dil işləməsi üçün də uygulanabilir. Bu kağızda, müxtəlif metodları transformatçıların (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). BERT iki cümləlik girişini mümkün etdikdən sonra, iki belədən müxtəlif etiketlərlə birləşdirdik və çoxlu sınıf çıxışını bir isti vektörlə birləşdirdik. Yaponca xəbər korpusu istifadə edən bir təcrübədə, sıradan döküm klasifikasyonu seçmək üçün iki metodları ilə dəyişdirdik. Sonuç olaraq, təklif edilmiş metodu normal klasifikasiyasından daha yaxşıdır. Etiketlərlə yazılmış məsələlər istifadə edilərək daha yaxşıdır. Bu belə göstərir ki, karışmaq üçün belələrin necə seçməsinin sonuçlarına möhkəm bir etkisi var.', 'bn': 'মিশ্র-আপ পদ্ধতি (Zhang et al., 2017), ডাটা যোগাযোগের একটি পদ্ধতি, এটি ব্যবহার এবং অত্যন্ত কার্যকর করার জন্য সহজ। Although the mix-up method is intended for image identification, it can also be applied to natural language processing.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মিশ্র-আপ পদ্ধতি প্রয়োগ করার চেষ্টা করছি বিদ্যুত কোডারের প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করে বিবেরেট (ডেভেলিনেট আল, ২০১৮)। যেহেতু বিবেরেট দুই বাক্যের ইনপুটের অনুমতি দেয়, আমরা দুই নথিপত্র থেকে শব্দের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত ব জাপানি নামের লাইডরের সংবাদ কোর্পাস ব্যবহার করে একটি পরীক্ষায় আমরা নথি ব্যবহার করে দুটি পদ্ধতি নির্বাচনের মাধ্যমে তুলনা করেছি যা সাধারণ নথি বিভাগের স এর ফলে আমরা প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতিটি স্বাভাবিক শ্রেণীর চেয়ে ভালো যখন লেবেলের সংক্রান্ত তথ্যগুলো মিশ্রিত হয়। এটি নির্দেশ করে যে মিশ্র-আপের নথি কিভাবে বেছে নেওয়া হবে তার ফলাফলের উপর গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রভাব রয়েছে।', 'bs': 'Mešavanje metode (Zhang et al., 2017), jedan od metoda povećanja podataka, poznato je da je lako provesti i vrlo efikasno. Iako je metod miješanja namijenjen za identifikaciju slika, može se primjenjivati i na prirodnu obradu jezika. U ovom papiru pokušavamo primjenjivati metodu miješanja na zadatak klasifikacije dokumenta koristeći predstave bidirektivnog kodera od transformatora (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Budući da je BERT omogućila da se udruži dvije rečenice, zaključili smo sekvence riječi iz dva dokumenta sa različitim etiketama i koristili višeklasični izlaz kao nadzirani podaci s jednim vrućim vektorom. U eksperimentu koristeći vijestinski korpus, koji je Japanac, usporedili smo preciznost klasifikacije dokumenta koristeći dvije metode za izabranje dokumenta koji će biti povezani s običnom klasifikacijom dokumenta. Kao rezultat toga, otkrili smo da je predložena metoda bolja od normalne klasifikacije kada su dokumenti s nedostatkom etiketa umešani preferencijalno. To ukazuje na to kako odabrati dokumente za mješanje ima značajan uticaj na rezultate.', 'cs': 'Metoda mix-up (Zhang et al., 2017), jedna z metod pro rozšíření dat, je známá jako snadná implementace a vysoce efektivní. I když je metoda směšování určena k identifikaci obrazu, může být aplikována i na zpracování přirozeného jazyka. V tomto článku se pokusíme aplikovat metodu směšování na úlohu klasifikace dokumentů pomocí obousměrných snímačů z transformátorů (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Vzhledem k tomu, že BERT umožňuje vstup ve dvou větách, jsme řetězili slovní sekvence ze dvou dokumentů s různými popisky a použili vícetřídní výstup jako kontrolovaná data s jedním horkým vektorem. V experimentu s využitím japonského zpravodajského korpusu livedodoor jsme porovnali přesnost klasifikace dokumentů pomocí dvou metod pro výběr dokumentů, které mají být řetězeny s klasifikací běžných dokumentů. V důsledku toho jsme zjistili, že navrhovaná metoda je lepší než běžná klasifikace, pokud jsou dokumenty s nedostatkem štítků přednostně smíšeny. To naznačuje, že způsob výběru dokumentů pro změnu má významný vliv na výsledky.', 'fi': 'Sekoitusmenetelmä (Zhang et al., 2017), yksi datan lisäämisen menetelmistä, tiedetään olevan helppo toteuttaa ja erittäin tehokas. Vaikka sekoitusmenetelmä on tarkoitettu kuvantunnistukseen, sitä voidaan soveltaa myös luonnollisen kielen käsittelyyn. Tässä työssä pyrimme soveltamaan sekoitusmenetelmää dokumenttien luokittelutehtävään käyttäen muuntajien kaksisuuntaisia koodausesityksiä (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Koska BERT mahdollistaa kahden lauseen syötön, yhdistimme sanasekvenssit kahdesta eri tunnisteella varustetusta asiakirjasta ja käytimme monitoimiluokkaista tulostetta valvottuna datana yhden kuuman vektorin avulla. Japaninkielistä livedoor-uutiskorpusta hyödyntävässä kokeessa vertailtiin asiakirjojen luokittelun tarkkuutta kahdella menetelmällä, joilla valitaan asiakirjoja tavalliseen asiakirjaluokitukseen. Tuloksena havaitsimme, että ehdotettu menetelmä on normaalia parempi, kun etikettien puutteelliset asiakirjat sekoitetaan mieluiten. Tämä osoittaa, että asiakirjojen valinnalla sekaannusta varten on merkittävä vaikutus tuloksiin.', 'ca': "El mètode de combinació (Zhang et al., 2017), un dels mètodes per augmentar les dades, és conegut com fàcil d'implementar i altament efectiu. Encara que el mètode de mistura està destinat a identificar imatges, també pot ser aplicat al processament natural de llenguatges. En aquest paper intentem aplicar el mètode de mistura a una tasca de classificació de documents fent servir representacions bidireccionals del codificador dels transformadors (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Com que BERT permet entrada de dues frases, vam concatenar seqüències de paraules de dos documents amb etiquetes diferents i vam utilitzar la sortida de múltiples classes com a dades supervisades amb un vector d'un sol calor. En un experiment utilitzant el corpus de notícies de la porta viva, japonès, vam comparar la precisió de la classificació dels documents utilitzant dos mètodes per seleccionar els documents que estarien concatenats amb la de la classificació normal dels documents. Com a resultat, vam descobrir que el mètode proposat és millor que la classificació normal quan els documents amb escassetat d'etiquetes es mestren preferentment. Això indica que la manera d'escollir documents per a combinar té un impacte significatiu en els resultats.", 'hy': 'The mix-up method (Zhang et al., 2017), one of the methods for data augmentation, is known to be easy to implement and highly effective.  Չնայած, որ խառնման մեթոդը նախատեսված է պատկերի հայտնաբերման համար, այն կարող է նաև կիրառվել բնական լեզվի վերաբերյալ: In this paper, we attempt to apply the mix-up method to a document classification task using bidirectional encoder representations from transformers (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018).  Since BERT allows for two-sentence input, we concatenated word sequences from two documents with different labels and used the multi-class output as the supervised data with a one-hot vector.  Փորձարկում, որը օգտագործում է կենդանի նորությունների կորպոսը, որը ճապոներեն է, մենք համեմատեցինք փաստաթղթերի դասակարգումների ճշգրտությունը օգտագործելով երկու մեթոդ փաստաթղթերի ընտրելու համար, որոնք համապատասխանում են հասարակ փաստաթղթե Արդյունքում, մենք հայտնաբերեցինք, որ առաջարկված մեթոդը ավելի լավ է, քան սովորական դասակարգումը, երբ պիտակներով պակաս ունեցող փաստաթղթերը նախընտրաբար խառնվում են: This indicates that how to choose documents for mix-up has a significant impact on the results.', 'et': 'Segamismeetod (Zhang et al., 2017), üks andmete suurendamise meetodeid, on teadaolevalt lihtne rakendada ja väga tõhus. Kuigi segamismeetod on mõeldud pildi identifitseerimiseks, võib seda kasutada ka looduskeele töötlemisel. Käesolevas töös püüame rakendada segamismeetodit dokumentide klassifitseerimise ülesandele, kasutades trafode kahesuunalisi kodeerijaid (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Kuna BERT võimaldab sisestada kahe lausega, sidusime sõnasjadad kahest erineva siltiga dokumendist ja kasutasime mitmeklassilist väljundit järelevalveandmetena ühe kuuma vektoriga. Jaapani keelest live door uudistekorpust kasutavas eksperimendis võrreldi dokumentide klassifitseerimise täpsust kahe meetodi abil, mille abil valida dokumente, mida seostatakse tavaliste dokumentide klassifitseerimisega. Selle tulemusena leidsime, et kavandatud meetod on tavalisest klassifikatsioonist parem, kui märgistusega dokumente eelistatakse segada. See näitab, et kuidas valida dokumente segamini, avaldab tulemustele märkimisväärset mõju.', 'jv': '"Mix-up" method (Jang et al), ong mungkin karo sistem kanggo awakdata agelak dadi, dadi dianggawe barang kelas karo ngono barang apik dhéwé. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepulan iki, kita saiki nggawe Mix-up method nggo basa tanggal panjenengan kelas nggawe Biireksyonal koder representations from transformer (BERT)(Devline et al, 2008). Since Anyone Refs Ngomongke punika dipileh gambar neng sampeyan nggawe Dokumen kanggo mbanjuraké', 'ha': "Tsarin da aka haɗa (Zhang et al., 2017), aka sani, ɗayan hanyoyi na ƙara data, za'a zama mai sauƙin amfani da kuma mai amfani mai girma. Kuma kõ da aka yi amfani da shirin-ɗabi'a wa gane-zane, za'a iya amfani da shi zuwa manajan harshe na asali. In this paper, we attempt to apply the mix-up method to a document classification task using bidirectional encoder representations from transformers (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018).  Dõmin da BERT ya yarda da shigar da takardar aiki biyu, sai mu haɗa sau masu sauya daga wasu takardar biyu da wasu alama daban-daban kuma muka yi amfani da durowa multi-daraja kamar da aka tsare data da ke sami wata mai hoto. Kuma a cikin wani jarrabi da ke yi amfani da nau'in dabãrar aiki, wanda ya zama japane, sai muka sami tsarin lissafi na takardar, kuma mun yi amfani da shiryoyin biyu dõmin ya zãɓi takardar dukka dõmin a haɗe su da shi na fasalin takardar. Kayya, muka gane cewa metoden da aka buƙata shi ne mafi alhẽri daga fasalin mai normal idan an haɗa takardun takardun da ƙararra cikin labo da kuma an fi zama kyauta. Wannan yana nuna cewa za'a zãɓi takardar kwamfyutan da za'a haɗi shi yana da matsala mai girma.", 'sk': 'Metoda mešanja (Zhang et al., 2017), ena od metod za povečanje podatkov, je znana kot enostavna za izvajanje in zelo učinkovita. Čeprav je metoda mešanja namenjena identifikaciji slik, se lahko uporablja tudi za obdelavo naravnega jezika. V tem prispevku poskušamo uporabiti metodo mešanja za opravilo klasifikacije dokumentov z uporabo dvosmernih predstavitev kodirnikov iz transformatorjev (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). Ker BERT omogoča vnos dveh stavkov, smo združili zaporedja besed iz dveh dokumentov z različnimi oznakami in uporabili večrazredni izhod kot nadzorovani podatki z enim vročim vektorjem. V eksperimentu z uporabo japonskega korpusa novic livedoor smo primerjali točnost klasifikacije dokumentov z dvema metodama izbire dokumentov, ki jih je treba povezati z metodami običajne klasifikacije dokumentov. Zato smo ugotovili, da je predlagana metoda boljša od običajne klasifikacije, kadar se primanjkljaj dokumentov z etiketami prednostno meša. To kaže, da ima način izbire dokumentov za mešanje pomemben vpliv na rezultate.', 'he': 'שיטת הערבוב (Zhang et al., 2017), אחת השיטות לגבירת נתונים, ידועה להיות קלה להפעיל ויעילה מאוד. למרות ששיטת הערבוב נועדת לזהות תמונה, היא גם יכולה להיות שימושית לעבוד שפה טבעית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מנסים להשתמש בשיטת הערבוב למשימת שיעור שיעור מסמכים באמצעות מייצגים של קודם שתיים כיוונים ממעברים (BERT) (Devlin et al., 2018). מאחר וברט מאפשר להכניסה של שתי משפטים, הצפנו רצפי מילים משני מסמכים עם תוויות שונות ושתמשנו בתוצאות רבות-מעמד כנתונים מושגים עם ווקטור חם אחד. בניסוי בשימוש בקורפוס החדשות של הדלת החיה, שהיא יפנית, השוונו את מדויקת מסמכים בשימוש בשתי שיטות לבחור מסמכים שיתווה עם מדויקת מסמכים רגילה. כתוצאה מכך, מצאנו שהשיטה המוצעת טובה יותר מהכיוון הנורמלי כשהמסמכים עם חסרי תוויות מעורבים בעדיפות. זה מצביע על כך שאיך לבחור מסמכים לערבוב יש השפעה משמעותית על התוצאות.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་(Zhang et al.2017)ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག གཟུགས་རིས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་ཡིན་ནའང་རང་རུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Since BERT allows for two-sentence input, we concatenated word sequences from two documents with different labels and used the multi-class output as the supervised data with a one-hot vector. སྔོན་ལྟ་བུའི་བརྡ་ཞིག་གི་མཛུབ་གླིང་འདི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་གོ་སྐབས་ནི་ཉེ་ཧོང་གི་ཡིག་ཆའི་ངོ་བོར་ཡིག་གེ། As a result, we found that the proposed method is better than the normal classification when the documents with labels shortages are mixed preferentially. འདིས་mix་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གདམ་པ་ལ་གྱིས་གནོད་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གནོད་འགྱུར་བ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Neural Machine Translation for Sinhala-English Code-Mixed Text', 'fr': 'Traduction automatique neuronale pour texte mixte cinghalais-anglais', 'es': 'Traducción automática neuronal para texto mixto cingalés e inglés', 'ar': 'الترجمة الآلية العصبية للنص السنهالية الإنجليزية كود مختلط', 'pt': 'Tradução automática neural para texto misto de código cingalês-inglês', 'hi': 'सिंहली-अंग्रेजी कोड-मिश्रित पाठ के लिए तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद', 'ja': 'シンハラ語-英語コード-混合テキスト用ニューラル機械翻訳', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод для сингальского-английского кодово-смешанного текста', 'zh': '僧伽罗语-英语代码-混文神经机器翻译', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach do Théacs Cód-Mheasctha Siolóinis-Béarla', 'hu': 'Neurális gépi fordítás a singala-angol kód-vegyes szöveghez', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Νευρική μηχανική μετάφραση για μικτό κείμενο κινχαλο-αγγλικό κώδικα', 'lt': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'it': 'Traduzione automatica neurale per testo misto in codice singala-inglese', 'kk': 'Синхал- ағылшын код- аралас мәтін үшін нейрондық машинаның аудармасыName', 'ml': 'Neural Machine Translation for Sinhala-English Code-Mixed Text', 'ms': 'Name', 'mn': 'Синхал-Англи код-холбогдсон текст дээр мэдрэлийн машины хөгжүүлэлт', 'no': 'Neuralmaskinsomsetjing for sinhalsk- engelsk- kodeflekst tekst', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni ta’ Makkinarju Newrali għal test imħallat bil-Kodiċi Sinhala-Ingliż', 'ro': 'Traducere automată neurală pentru text mixt de cod singhala-engleză', 'si': 'Name', 'pl': 'Neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe dla tekstu mieszanego w języku chińsko-angielskim', 'so': 'Turjumista baabuurta Neural machine for Sinhala-Ingiriis Code-Mixed Text', 'sv': 'Neural maskinöversättning för singala-engelska kodblandad text', 'sr': 'Neuralna mašina prevoda za sinhalski engleski kodirani tekst', 'ur': 'Sinhala-English Code-Mixed Text کے لئے نیورال ماشین ترجمہ', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dịch về máy thần kinh cho đơn vị', 'bg': 'Невроден машинен превод за синхала-английски кодов смесен текст', 'nl': 'Neurale machinevertaling voor Sinhalas-Engelse code-gemengde tekst', 'da': 'Neural maskinoversættelse for singala-engelsk kode-blandet tekst', 'hr': 'Neuralno prevodenje stroja za sinhalski engleski kodirani tekst', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung für Singhala-Englisch Code-Mixed Text', 'ko': '스님 가로어 - 영어 코드 혼합 텍스트의 신경 번역', 'id': 'Translation Machine Neural for Sinhala-English Code-Mixed Text', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی برای متن پیوند پیوند\u200cپیوند سینهال- انگلیسی', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kijerumani kwa ajili ya Maandishi ya Miungano ya Kiingereza', 'tr': 'Sinhala-Iňlisçe Kod-Karışma Metin üçin Nural Maşynyň terjime edilmesi', 'af': 'Nural Masjien Vertaling vir Sinhala- Engels Kode- gemengde Teks', 'sq': 'Teksti i përzier me kod sinhala-anglez', 'am': 'የነዌብ መኪን ትርጉም', 'hy': 'Սինհալա-անգլերեն կոդի խառնված տեքստի նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն', 'bn': 'সিঙ্গাল- ইংরেজী কোড- মিক্সেড টেক্সটের জন্য নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ', 'bs': 'Neuralna mašina prevoda za sinhala-engleski kodirani tekst', 'az': 'Sinhal-İngilizə Kodu-Karışmış Metin üçün nöral Makine Çeviri', 'ca': 'Traducció de màquines neuronals per text mixt de codi sinhala-anglès', 'et': 'Neuraalne masintõlge sinhala-inglise koodsega teksti jaoks', 'cs': 'Neurální strojový překlad pro čínština-anglický kód smíšený text', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen konekäännös sinhala-englanti koodisekoitettu teksti', 'sk': 'Nevralni strojni prevod za sinhalo-angleško kodno mešano besedilo', 'he': 'Neural Machine Translation for Sinhala-English Code-Mixed Text', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'jv': 'Nyural Masukan Terjamahan kanggo kode-Nyunalan kang Teks Mi-Mixed', 'bo': 'སིན་ཧྲིལ་ཡིག་གི་སྤྱོད་པའི་མ་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རྟགས་བཀལ་བ'}
{'en': 'Code-mixing has become a moving method of communication among multilingual speakers. Most of the social media content of the multilingual societies are written in code-mixed text. However, most of the current translation systems neglect to convert code-mixed texts to a standard language. Most of the user written code-mixed content in social media remains unprocessed due to the unavailability of linguistic resource such as parallel corpus. This paper proposes a Neural Machine Translation(NMT) model to translate the Sinhala-English code-mixed text to the Sinhala language. Due to the limited resources available for Sinhala-English code-mixed(SECM) text, a parallel corpus is created with SECM sentences and Sinhala sentences. Srilankan social media sites contain SECM texts more frequently than the standard languages. The model proposed for code-mixed text translation in this study is a combination of Encoder-Decoder framework with LSTM units and Teachers Forcing Algorithm. The translated sentences from the model are evaluated using BLEU(Bilingual Evaluation Understudy) metric. Our model achieved a remarkable BLEU score for the translation.', 'ar': 'أصبح خلط الشفرات وسيلة مؤثرة للتواصل بين المتحدثين متعددي اللغات. تتم كتابة معظم محتوى الوسائط الاجتماعية للمجتمعات متعددة اللغات بنص مختلط بأكواد. ومع ذلك ، فإن معظم أنظمة الترجمة الحالية تتجاهل تحويل النصوص المختلطة بالشفرات إلى لغة قياسية. لا يزال معظم المحتوى المكتوب المختلط بالشفرات في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي غير معالج بسبب عدم توفر الموارد اللغوية مثل المجموعة المتوازية. تقترح هذه الورقة نموذجًا للترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) لترجمة النص المختلط بالشفرة السنهالية الإنجليزية إلى اللغة السنهالية. نظرًا لمحدودية الموارد المتاحة لنص مختلط الأكواد (SECM) باللغة السنهالية الإنجليزية ، يتم إنشاء مجموعة موازية مع جمل SECM وجمل السنهالية. تحتوي مواقع الوسائط الاجتماعية السريلانكية على نصوص SECM بشكل متكرر أكثر من اللغات القياسية. النموذج المقترح لترجمة النص المختلط في هذه الدراسة هو مزيج من إطار عمل التشفير-فك التشفير مع وحدات LSTM وخوارزمية فرض المعلمين. يتم تقييم الجمل المترجمة من النموذج باستخدام مقياس BLEU (BLEU). حقق نموذجنا درجة BLEU ملحوظة في الترجمة.', 'fr': "Le mixage de codes est devenu une méthode de communication émouvante pour les locuteurs multilingues. La plupart des contenus des réseaux sociaux des sociétés multilingues sont rédigés dans un texte mixte de code. Cependant, la plupart des systèmes de traduction actuels négligent de convertir les textes mixtes de code en une langue standard. La plupart du contenu mixte de code écrit par l'utilisateur sur les réseaux sociaux n'est pas traité en raison de l'indisponibilité de ressources linguistiques telles que des corpus parallèles. Cet article propose un modèle de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) pour traduire le texte mixte cinghalais-anglais en langue cinghalaise. En raison des ressources limitées disponibles pour le texte mixte cinghalais-anglais (SECM), un corpus parallèle est créé avec des phrases SECM et des phrases en cinghalais. Les sites de réseaux sociaux srilankais contiennent des textes SECM plus fréquemment que les langues standard. Le modèle proposé pour la traduction de textes mixtes en code dans cette étude est une combinaison d'un framework Encoder-Decoder avec des unités LSTM et un algorithme de forçage des enseignants. Les phrases traduites du modèle sont évaluées à l'aide de la métrique BLEU (Bilingual Evaluation Understudy). Notre modèle a obtenu un score BLEU remarquable pour la traduction.", 'es': 'La mezcla de códigos se ha convertido en un método de comunicación en movimiento entre los hablantes multilingües. La mayor parte del contenido de las redes sociales de las sociedades multilingües está escrito en texto con código mixto. Sin embargo, la mayoría de los sistemas de traducción actuales no convierten textos con código mixto a un idioma estándar. La mayor parte del contenido de código mezclado escrito por el usuario en las redes sociales permanece sin procesar debido a la falta de disponibilidad de recursos lingüísticos, como el corpus paralelo. Este artículo propone un modelo de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) para traducir el texto con código mixto cingalés e inglés al idioma cingalés. Debido a los limitados recursos disponibles para el texto mixto cingalés e inglés (SECM), se crea un corpus paralelo con sentencias SECM y oraciones en cingalés. Los sitios de medios sociales de Sri Lanka contienen textos SECM con más frecuencia que los idiomas estándar. El modelo propuesto para la traducción de texto con código mixto en este estudio es una combinación del marco Encoder-Decoder con unidades LSTM y el Algoritmo Forcing de Maestros. Las frases traducidas del modelo se evalúan mediante la métrica BLEU (estudio sustituto de evaluación bilingüe). Nuestro modelo obtuvo una notable puntuación BLEU para la traducción.', 'pt': 'A mistura de códigos tornou-se um método de comunicação em movimento entre falantes multilíngues. A maior parte do conteúdo de mídia social das sociedades multilíngues é escrita em texto misto de código. No entanto, a maioria dos sistemas de tradução atuais negligencia a conversão de textos de código misto para um idioma padrão. A maior parte do conteúdo de código misto escrito pelo usuário nas mídias sociais permanece não processado devido à indisponibilidade de recursos linguísticos, como corpus paralelo. Este artigo propõe um modelo de Neural Machine Translation (NMT) para traduzir o texto misto de código cingalês-inglês para o idioma cingalês. Devido aos recursos limitados disponíveis para texto cingalês-inglês code-mixed (SECM), um corpus paralelo é criado com sentenças SECM e sentenças Sinhala. Os sites de mídia social do Sri Lanka contêm textos SECM com mais frequência do que os idiomas padrão. O modelo proposto para tradução de texto misto de código neste estudo é uma combinação do framework Encoder-Decoder com unidades LSTM e Algoritmo de Força de Professores. As sentenças traduzidas do modelo são avaliadas usando a métrica BLEU (Bilingual Evaluation Understudy). Nosso modelo alcançou uma notável pontuação BLEU para a tradução.', 'ja': 'コードミキシングは、多言語話者間のコミュニケーションの移動方法となっている。 多言語社会のソーシャルメディアコンテンツのほとんどは、コードが混在したテキストで書かれています。 しかし、現在の翻訳システムのほとんどは、コードが混在したテキストを標準言語に変換することを無視しています。 並行コーパスなどの言語リソースが利用できないため、ソーシャルメディアで書かれたユーザーのコードミックスコンテンツのほとんどは未処理のままです。 本論文では、シンハラ語-英語のコードミックステキストをシンハラ語に翻訳するためのニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）モデルを提案している。 Sinhala - English code - mix (SECM)テキストに利用できるリソースが限られているため、SECM文とSinhala文で並列コーパスが作成されます。 Srilankanソーシャルメディアサイトには、標準言語よりも頻繁にSECMテキストが含まれています。 この研究でコード混合テキスト翻訳のために提案されたモデルは、LSTMユニットとTeachers Forcing Algorithmとのエンコーダデコーダフレームワークの組み合わせである。 モデルからの翻訳された文章は、BLEU （ Bilingual Evaluation Understudy ）メトリックを使用して評価されます。 私たちのモデルは、翻訳で驚くべきBLEUスコアを達成しました。', 'ru': 'Перемешивание кодов стало подвижным методом общения между многоязычными носителями. Большая часть контента в социальных сетях многоязычных обществ написана смешанным текстом. Однако большинство нынешних систем перевода не преобразуют смешанные тексты в стандартный язык. Большая часть пользовательского контента со смешанным кодом в социальных сетях остается необработанным из-за отсутствия лингвистического ресурса, такого как параллельный корпус. В этой статье предлагается модель нейронного машинного перевода(НМП) для перевода сингальско-английского текста со смешанным кодом на сингальский язык. Из-за ограниченных ресурсов, доступных для сингальско-английского текста со смешанным кодом (SECM), создается параллельный корпус с предложениями SECM и сингальскими предложениями. На сайтах социальных сетей Шриланки тексты SECM встречаются чаще, чем на стандартных языках. Модель, предложенная для смешанного перевода текста в этом исследовании, представляет собой комбинацию фреймворка кодировщика-декодера с блоками LSTM и алгоритмом форсировки учителей. Переведенные предложения из модели оцениваются с помощью метрики BLEU(Bilingual Evaluation Understudy). Наша модель достигла замечательного балла BLEU за перевод.', 'hi': 'कोड-मिश्रण बहुभाषी वक्ताओं के बीच संचार का एक चलती विधि बन गया है। बहुभाषी समाजों की अधिकांश सोशल मीडिया सामग्री कोड-मिश्रित पाठ में लिखी गई है। हालांकि, अधिकांश वर्तमान अनुवाद प्रणालियां कोड-मिश्रित ग्रंथों को एक मानक भाषा में परिवर्तित करने की उपेक्षा करती हैं। सोशल मीडिया में अधिकांश उपयोगकर्ता लिखित कोड-मिश्रित सामग्री भाषाई संसाधन जैसे समानांतर कॉर्पस की अनुपलब्धता के कारण असंसाधित रहती है। यह पेपर सिंहली भाषा में सिंहली-अंग्रेजी कोड-मिश्रित पाठ का अनुवाद करने के लिए एक तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करता है। सिंहली-अंग्रेजी कोड-मिश्रित (एसईसीएम) पाठ के लिए उपलब्ध सीमित संसाधनों के कारण, एसईसीएम वाक्यों और सिंहल वाक्यों के साथ एक समानांतर कॉर्पस बनाया गया है। श्रीलंकाई सोशल मीडिया साइटों में मानक भाषाओं की तुलना में अधिक बार एसईसीएम ग्रंथ होते हैं। इस अध्ययन में कोड-मिश्रित पाठ अनुवाद के लिए प्रस्तावित मॉडल एलएसटीएम इकाइयों और शिक्षकों को मजबूर करने वाले एल्गोरिथ्म के साथ एनकोडर-डिकोडर फ्रेमवर्क का एक संयोजन है। मॉडल से अनुवादित वाक्यों का मूल्यांकन BLEU (द्विभाषी मूल्यांकन Understudy) मीट्रिक का उपयोग करके किया जाता है। हमारे मॉडल ने अनुवाद के लिए एक उल्लेखनीय BLEU स्कोर हासिल किया।', 'zh': '代码混为多语种言语之间一移之流也。 多言协会者社交媒体皆以代码杂文本为之。 然当时多译统忽将代码混合文本转换为准的言语。 语言资源(如并行语料库)者不可用,社交媒体中多用户所撰代码混合未决。 本文立神经机器翻译(NMT)模,合僧伽罗语-英语代码本翻译成僧伽罗语。 以僧伽罗语-英语代码混 (SECM) 文本有限,故用 SECM 句与僧伽罗语句创一并行语料库。 斯里兰卡社交媒体网站频含SECM本。 本研代码混合文本转换模型编码器-解码器框架与LSTM单元师强算法之组。 用BLEU(双语评)指标对模型译句评之。 形于译者著BLEU分。', 'ga': 'Is modh cumarsáide soghluaiste anois é códmheascadh i measc cainteoirí ilteangacha. Tá an chuid is mó d’ábhar meán sóisialta na gcumann ilteangach scríofa i dtéacs cód-mheasctha. Mar sin féin, déanann an chuid is mó de na córais aistriúcháin atá ann faoi láthair faillí téacsanna cód-mheasctha a thiontú go teanga chaighdeánach. Tá an chuid is mó den ábhar códmheasctha scríofa ag úsáideoirí ar na meáin shóisialta fós gan phróiseáil mar gheall ar easpa acmhainne teanga ar nós corpas comhthreomhar. Molann an páipéar seo múnla Neural Machine Translation (NMT) chun an téacs códmheasctha Siolóinis-Béarla a aistriú go dtí an Siolóinis. De bharr na n-acmhainní teoranta atá ar fáil do théacs cód-mheasctha Siolóinis-Béarla (SECM), cruthaítear corpas comhthreomhar le habairtí SECM agus abairtí Siolóine. Bíonn téacsanna SECM níos minice i suíomhanna meán sóisialta Srilankan ná sna teangacha caighdeánacha. Is é atá sa mhúnla atá molta d’aistriúchán téacs cód-mheasctha sa staidéar seo ná meascán de chreat Ionchódóra-Díchódóra le haonaid LSTM agus Algartam um Fhoréigean Múinteoirí. Déantar na habairtí aistrithe ón tsamhail a mheas trí úsáid a bhaint as méadrach BLEU(Bilingual Evaluation Understudy). Bhain ár múnla scór iontach BLEU amach don aistriúchán.', 'hu': 'A kódkeverés a többnyelvű beszélők közötti kommunikáció mozgó módszerévé vált. A többnyelvű társaságok közösségi média tartalmának nagy része kódkevert szövegben van írva. A jelenlegi fordítási rendszerek többsége azonban elhanyagolja a kódkeverékes szövegek standard nyelvre történő átalakítását. A közösségi médiában a felhasználók által írt kódkevert tartalom többsége feldolgozatlan marad, mivel nem érhető el nyelvi erőforrás, például a párhuzamos korpusz. A tanulmány egy Neural Machine Translation (NMT) modellt javasol a szinhala-angol kódkevert szöveg lefordítására a szinhala nyelvre. Mivel korlátozott erőforrások állnak rendelkezésre a szinhala-angol code-mixed(SECM) szöveghez, egy párhuzamos korpusz jön létre SECM mondatokkal és szinhala mondatokkal. A srilankani közösségi oldalak gyakrabban tartalmaznak SECM szövegeket, mint a normál nyelvek. A jelen tanulmányban a kódkevert szövegfordításra javasolt modell az Encoder-Decoder keretrendszer LSTM egységekkel és a Teachers Forcing Algorithm kombinációja. A modell lefordított mondatait BLEU (kétnyelvű értékelés alátámasztása) metrika segítségével értékeljük. Modellünk figyelemre méltó BLEU pontszámot ért el a fordításhoz.', 'el': 'Η ανάμειξη κώδικα έχει γίνει μια κινούμενη μέθοδος επικοινωνίας μεταξύ πολύγλωσσων ομιλητών. Το μεγαλύτερο μέρος του περιεχομένου των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης των πολύγλωσσων κοινωνιών είναι γραμμένο σε μικτό κείμενο κώδικα. Ωστόσο, τα περισσότερα από τα σημερινά μεταφραστικά συστήματα παραμελούν να μετατρέψουν κείμενα μικτού κώδικα σε μια τυποποιημένη γλώσσα. Το μεγαλύτερο μέρος του γραπτού περιεχομένου των χρηστών στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης παραμένει ανεπεξέργαστο λόγω της μη διαθεσιμότητας γλωσσικού πόρου όπως το παράλληλο σώμα. Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει ένα μοντέλο Νευρικής Μηχανικής Μετάφρασης (NMT) για τη μετάφραση του Σινχάλα-Αγγλικού κώδικα-μικτού κειμένου στη Σινχάλα γλώσσα. Λόγω των περιορισμένων διαθέσιμων πόρων για κείμενο Σινχάλα-Αγγλικού κώδικα-μικτού (SECM), δημιουργείται ένα παράλληλο σώμα με προτάσεις και προτάσεις Σινχάλα. Οι ιστοσελίδες κοινωνικής δικτύωσης του Σριμάνκαν περιέχουν κείμενα του SECM πιο συχνά από τις τυπικές γλώσσες. Το μοντέλο που προτείνεται για τη μετάφραση κώδικα-μικτού κειμένου σε αυτή τη μελέτη είναι ένας συνδυασμός πλαισίου κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή με μονάδες και αλγόριθμο επιβολής δασκάλων. Οι μεταφρασμένες προτάσεις από το μοντέλο αξιολογούνται χρησιμοποιώντας τη μετρική. Το μοντέλο μας πέτυχε αξιοσημείωτη βαθμολογία για τη μετάφραση.', 'it': "Il code-mixing è diventato un metodo di comunicazione commovente tra i parlanti multilingue. La maggior parte dei contenuti dei social media delle società multilingue sono scritti in testo codificato. Tuttavia, la maggior parte degli attuali sistemi di traduzione trascura di convertire testi misti in codice in una lingua standard. La maggior parte dei contenuti codificati scritti dall'utente nei social media rimane non elaborati a causa dell'indisponibilità di risorse linguistiche come il corpus parallelo. Questo articolo propone un modello Neural Machine Translation (NMT) per tradurre il testo in codice singhala-inglese nella lingua singhala. A causa delle limitate risorse disponibili per il testo singhala-inglese code-mixed (SECM), viene creato un corpus parallelo con frasi SECM e frasi singhala. I siti di social media Srilankan contengono testi SECM più frequentemente rispetto alle lingue standard. Il modello proposto per la traduzione di testo misto in questo studio è una combinazione di Encoder-Decoder framework con unità LSTM e Teachers Forcing Algorithm. Le frasi tradotte dal modello sono valutate utilizzando la metrica BLEU (Bilingual Evaluation Understudy). Il nostro modello ha ottenuto un notevole punteggio BLEU per la traduzione.", 'kk': 'Кодты араластыру көптілік сөйлейтіншілер арасында байланыстыру әдісі болды. Көп тілдік қоғамдарының социаллық медиа мазмұнының көбі код аралас мәтінде жазылады. Бірақ, назардағы аудару жүйелерінің көпшілігі код араластырылған мәтіндерді стандартты тіліне аударуға болмайды. Пайдаланушылардың көпшілігі жазылған код араластырылған мазмұның көпшілігі әлемдік медиақтағы лингвистикалық ресурстардың параллель корпус сияқты мүмкіндігі болмайтын Бұл қағаз синхалы- ағылшын код араластырылған мәтінді синхалық тіліне аудару үшін нейралы машинаны аудару (NMT) үлгісін ұсынады. Синхал- ағылшын код араластырылған (SECM) мәтіннің шектелген ресурстарының себебі, параллелі корпус SECM сөздермен мен синхалық сөздермен құрылады. Шрилан социаллық медиа сайтында стандартты тілдерден көп SECM мәтіндері бар. Бұл зерттеулерде код араластырылған мәтін аудармасының үлгісі - LSTM бірліктері мен Мұғалімдері Алгоритмді бағыттауға арналған Encoder- декодер фреймінің біріктірімі. Үлгіден аударылған сөздерді BLEU (Екінші оқу астындағы оқу) метрикалық түрде тең алады. Біздің моделіміз аудармалардың белгілі BLEU нәтижесін жетті.', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური საუკეთესებელი კომუნიკაციის გადატანა. მრავალენგური საზოგადოებების სოციალური მედიაში მნიშვნელოვანი საზოგადოებების უფრო მეტი კოდის შესაბამისი ტექსტში დაწერა. მაგრამ მიმდინარე შეცვლის სისტემის უფრო მეტი არ უნდა კოდის შეცვლის ტექსტის სტანდარტული ენაში გადაცვლა. სოციალური მედიაში ყველაფერი მომხმარებელი კოდის შემთხვევაში მუშაობაში არ დაუწყებულია, რადგან ლენგურისტიკური რესურსების შესაძლებლობად, როგორც პარალელი კო ეს დოკუმენტი უნეიროლური მაქსინის შეცვლა (NMT) მოდელს სინჰალური ანგლისური კოდის შეცვლა სინჰალური ენაში. სინჰალური ანგლისური ტექსტისთვის შესაძლებელი რესურსების გამოსახულება (SECM) ტექსტისთვის, პარალელი კორპუსი SECM სიტყვებით და სინჰალური სიტყვებით შექმნა. შრილანკანის სოციალური მედია საზოგადოებში SECM ტექსტი უფრო ფარჯიშია, ვიდრე სტანდარული ენების. ამ სწავლაში კოდის შემდეგ ტექსტის გასაგულისხმებისთვის მოდელი არის LSTM ერთეულებით და სწავლებელი ალგორიტიმს შემდეგ Encoder-Decoder ფრამბემის კომბიზაცია. მეტრიკის გამოყენებული მოდელიდან გამოყენებული სიტყვები გამოყენებულია BLEU(მეტრიკური განსაზღვრება) მეტრიკის გამოყენებით. ჩვენი მოდელის შესაძლებელი BLEU წერტილის შესაძლებლობისთვის მიღება.', 'ms': 'Pengcampuran kod telah menjadi kaedah komunikasi bergerak di antara pembicara berbilang bahasa. Kebanyakan kandungan media sosial masyarakat berbilang bahasa ditulis dalam teks campuran kod. Namun, kebanyakan sistem terjemahan semasa mengabaikan untuk menukar teks campuran-kod ke bahasa piawai. Kebanyakan kandungan kod-campuran ditulis pengguna dalam media sosial masih belum diproses kerana tidak tersedia sumber bahasa seperti corpus selari. Kertas ini melaporkan model Terjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT) untuk menerjemahkan teks kod-campuran Sinhala-Inggeris ke bahasa Sinhala. Kerana sumber terbatas yang tersedia untuk teks kod-campuran (SECM) Bahasa Inggeris-Sinhala, korpus selari dicipta dengan kalimat SECM dan kalimat Sinhala. laman media sosial Srilankan mengandungi teks SECM lebih sering daripada bahasa piawai. Model yang diusulkan untuk terjemahan teks campuran-kod dalam kajian ini adalah kombinasi kerangka Pengekod-Pengekod dengan unit LSTM dan Algoritma Memaksa Guru. kalimat terjemahan dari model diteliti menggunakan metrik BLEU( Understudy Evaluation Bilingual). Model kami mencapai skor BLEU yang luar biasa untuk terjemahan.', 'ml': 'കോഡ് മിക്കിങ്ങ് പല ഭാഷയിലെ സംസാരിക്കുന്നവരുടെ ഇടയില്\u200d നീങ്ങുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയായിരിക്കുന്നു. പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയയുടെ ഉള്ളടക്കം കോഡ് മിഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട വാചകത്തില്\u200d എഴുതിയി എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള പരിഭാഷപ്രവർത്തനങ്ങളിലേറെപ്പേരും ഒരു സാധാരണ ഭാഷയിലേക്ക് കലര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിനെ അവഗണിക് സാമൂഹ്യ മാധ്യമങ്ങളില്\u200d എഴുതിയ കോഡ് കലര്\u200dത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ അധികപേരും പാരാണല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് പോലുള്ള ഭാഷ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സിങ്ഹാല- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് കോഡ്- mixed text സിനാലാ ഭാഷയിലേക്ക് ഒരു നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. സിങ്ഹാല- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് കോഡ് മിഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d സെസിഎം ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നതില്\u200d സ്രിലാങ്കാന്\u200d സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയയുടെ സൈറ്റുകള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നു.  ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d കോഡ്- mixed text translation-ന്റെ പ്രാദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d എംഎസ്റ്റിം യൂണിറ്റുകളും ടീച്ചര്\u200dസ്റ്റര്\u200d ബദ്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മോഡലില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d BLEU( ബിലിങ്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അന്റ്റോള്\u200dട്രിക്ക്) മെട്രിക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വിലയ നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി ഒരു മഹത്തായ ബില്ലു യു സ്കോര്\u200d നേടി', 'mk': 'Мешањето на кодовите стана движечки метод на комуникација меѓу мултијазичните говорници. Повеќето социјални медиуми во мултијазичните општества се напишани во мешан текст. However, most of the current translation systems neglect to convert code-mixed texts to a standard language.  Повеќето од корисниците пишуваат мешана содржина во социјалните медиуми и понатаму не се процесирани поради недостигноста на јазички ресурси како што е паралелниот корпус. Овој документ предлага модел на неурална машина за преведување на синхалско- англискиот код- мешан текст на синхалскиот јазик. Поради ограничените ресурси достапни за текстот синхалско-англиски код- мешан (SECM), паралелен корпус се создава со реченици SECM и синхалски реченици. Сејтовите на сриланските социјални медиуми содржат тексти на SECM почесто од стандардните јазици. Моделот предложен за превод на текст со мешан код во оваа студија е комбинација на рамка на кодер-декодер со LSTM единици и Алгоритм на принудување на учителите. Преведените реченици од моделот се проценуваат користејќи метрика BLEU( Дивјазична подстудија за евалуација). Нашиот модел постигна извонреден БЛЕУ резултат за преводот.', 'lt': 'Kodų derinimas tapo judančiu daugiakalbių kalbėtojų ryšio metodu. Dauguma daugiakalbių visuomenės socialinių žiniasklaidų turinio įrašoma mišriame tekste. Vis dėlto dauguma dabartinių vertimo sistemų neatsižvelgia į kodų mišrių tekstų konvertavimą į standartinę kalbą. Dauguma naudotojų rašomo kodų mišraus turinio social in ėje žiniasklaidoje lieka neapdorotas dėl kalbinių išteklių, pavyzdžiui, paralelinio korpuso, nepakankamumo. Šiame dokumente siūlomas neurologinio mašinų vertimo (NMT) modelis, skirtas sinhališkai ir anglų kalbos kodų mišriam tekstui išversti į sinhališką kalbą. Atsižvelgiant į ribotus išteklius, skirtus tekstui „Sinhala-English code-mixed“ (SECM), kuriamas lygiagretus korpus su „SECM“ ir „Sinhala“ sakiniais. Srilanko socialinės žiniasklaidos svetainėse SECM tekstai dažniau nei standartinės kalbos. Šiame tyrime siūlomas kodų mišraus teksto vertimo model is yra kodų dekoderių sistemos derinys su LSTM vienetais ir mokytojų priverstiniu algoritmu. Iš modelio išversti sakiniai vertinami naudojant BLEU (dvikalbio vertinimo tyrimo) metriką. Our model achieved a remarkable BLEU score for the translation.', 'mn': 'Код холбоотой нь олон хэлний ярьдаг хүмүүсийн холбоотой хөдөлгөөн арга болсон. Олон хэл нийгмийн нийгмийн нийгмийн ихэнх мэдээлэл нь кодын төвөгтэй текст бичигддэг. Гэвч одоогийн орчин үеийн орчуулах системүүдийн ихэнх нь код холбогдсон текстүүдийг стандарт хэл рүү шилжүүлэхийг хүсэхгүй. Хэрэглэгчдийн ихэнх нь нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчид хэлний боловсрол зэрэгцээ корпус зэрэгцээ хэлний боловсрол байхгүй учраас хамгаалахгүй байна. Энэ цаас Синхал-Англи хэлний код холбогдсон текстийг синхал хэл руу орлуулахын тулд мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэх загварыг санал болгодог. Синхал-Англи хэлний код-холбогдсон (SECM) текстүүдэд хязгаарлагдсан нөөц болохоор параллел корпус SECM өгүүлбэртэй болон синхал өгүүлбэртэй үүсгэдэг. Шриланчуудын нийгмийн хэвлэлийн сайтууд стандарт хэлээс илүү ихэвчлэн SECM текст агуулдаг. Энэ судалгаанд код холбогдсон текст орчуулалтын загвар нь LSTM нэгжүүд болон багш нар Алгоритмыг хүргэж байгаа Encoder-Decoder хэлбэртэй холбогдолтой юм. Загвараас орчуулсан өгүүлбэрүүдийг BLEU(Хоёрдугаар оюутнуудын үнэлгээ) метрик ашиглан дүгнэж байна. Бидний загвар нь хөрөнгө оруулахад гайхалтай БЛЕУ оноо олсон.', 'pl': 'Miksowanie kodu stało się poruszającą metodą komunikacji wśród wielojęzycznych mówców. Większość treści mediów społecznościowych wielojęzycznych społeczeństw jest napisana tekstem mieszanym z kodem. Jednak większość obecnych systemów tłumaczeń zaniedbuje konwersję tekstów mieszanych kodem na standardowy język. Większość treści pisanych przez użytkownika w mediach społecznościowych pozostaje nieprzetworzona ze względu na brak dostępności zasobów językowych, takich jak równoległy korpus. Niniejszy artykuł proponuje model neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) do tłumaczenia tekstu mieszanego kodem chińsko-angielskim na język chiński. Ze względu na ograniczone zasoby dostępne dla tekstu chińsko-angielskiego kodu-mieszanego (SECM), tworzony jest równoległy korpus ze zdaniami SECM i zdaniami chińskimi. Serwisy społecznościowe w Srilankanie zawierają teksty SECM częściej niż standardowe języki. Model zaproponowany do tłumaczenia tekstu mieszanego kodem w niniejszym opracowaniu jest połączeniem frameworku Encoder-Decoder z jednostkami LSTM oraz algorytmem wymuszania nauczycieli. Przetłumaczone zdania z modelu są oceniane za pomocą metryki BLEU (Bilingual Evaluation Understudy). Nasz model osiągnął niezwykły wynik BLEU dla tłumaczenia.', 'no': 'Name Dei fleste sosiale media-innhaldet i fleirspråkssamanhengane er skriven i tekst med kodefeks. Dei fleste av dei gjeldande omsetjingssystemene vil likevel konvertera tekst med kode til eit standardspråk. Dei fleste av brukarane som er skriven med kode-blandet innhald i sosiale medier er ikkje prosessert på grunn av ikkje tilgjengeleg språksressurs som parallelle korpus. Denne papiret foreslår eit neuralmaskinsomsetjingsmodul (NMT) for å oversette teksten med kode mellom sinhalsk- engelsk til sinhalsk språk. På grunn av dei grenserte ressursane som er tilgjengelege for teksten med sinhalsk- engelsk kode- blandet (SECM), blir eit parallell korpus oppretta med SECM- setningar og sinhala- setningar. Srilankan-sosiale medianettstader inneheld SECM-tekstar oftast enn standardsspråka. Modellen foreslått for omsetjing av tekst mellom koden i denne studien er ein kombinasjon av koder- dekoderrammeverket med LSTM- einingar og lærarar som tvingar algoritme. Omsette setningane frå modellen blir evaluert med BLEU- metrisk. Modellen vårt oppnådd eit merkelig BLEU-poeng for omsetjinga.', 'sr': 'Mešanje kodova postala je pokretna metoda komunikacije među višejezičkim govornicima. Većina društvenih medija multijezičkih društva napisana je u tekstu mešanom kodu. Međutim, većina trenutnih sustava prevođenja zaboravlja preobraćati tekste pomešane kod na standardni jezik. Većina korisnika napisanog kodiranog sadržaja u društvenim medijima ostaje neprocesovana zbog nepostupnosti jezičkih resursa poput paralelnog korpusa. Ovaj papir predlaže model neurološkog prevoda (NMT) za prevod teksta pomešanog koda sa sinhalama na sinhalački jezik. Zbog ograničenih resursa koje su dostupne za tekst sinhalanskog-engleskog koda pomešana (SECM), paralelni korpus se stvori sa rečenicama SECM-a i kaznama sinhalaca. Sriljanski društveni mediji sadrže tekstove SECM češće od standardnih jezika. Model predložen za prevod teksta u ovom ispitivanju je kombinacija okvira kodera-dekodera sa LSTM jedinicama i nastavnicima koji prisiljavaju algoritam. Prevedene rečenice iz modela procjenjuju se koristeći metričku BLEU (podstudiranje za dvostruku ocjenu). Naš model je postigao izvanredan rezultat BLEU za prevod.', 'ro': 'Mixarea codurilor a devenit o metodă mișcătoare de comunicare între vorbitorii multilingvi. Majoritatea conținutului social media al societăților multilingve sunt scrise în text mixt de coduri. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea sistemelor actuale de traducere neglijează convertirea textelor mixte de cod într-o limbă standard. Majoritatea conținutului amestecat de coduri scris de utilizator în rețelele sociale rămâne neprelucrat din cauza indisponibilității resurselor lingvistice, cum ar fi corpul paralel. Această lucrare propune un model Neural Machine Translation (NMT) pentru a traduce textul singhala-engleză în limba singhală. Datorită resurselor limitate disponibile pentru text singhala-engleză code-mixed (SECM), se creează un corpus paralel cu propoziții SECM și propoziții singhala. Site-urile social media Srilankan conțin texte SECM mai frecvent decât limbile standard. Modelul propus pentru traducerea textului mixt de coduri în acest studiu este o combinație de cadru Encoder-Decoder cu unități LSTM și algoritmul de forțare a profesorilor. Frazele traduse din model sunt evaluate folosind metrica BLEU (Bilingual Evaluation Understudy). Modelul nostru a obținut un scor BLEU remarcabil pentru traducere.', 'si': 'Name ගොඩක් භාෂාත්මක සමාජාත්මක සාමාජික මිඩියාව සමාව ලියලා තියෙන්නේ. නමුත්, ප්\u200dරස්තූත වාර්ථාව පද්ධතියක් ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dය භාෂාවක් වෙනුවෙන් කෝඩ් මික්ස් පාළුව සාමාජික මිඩියාවට ලියපු ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් ලියපු කෝඩ් මිස්සු සාමාජික සාමාජික සාමාජික සා මේ පැත්තේ සින්හාල්- ඉංග්\u200dරීසි කෝඩ- මික්ස් පාළුවක් සින්හාලි භාෂාවට පරිවර්තන කරන්න සින්හාල් භාෂා සින්හාල්-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි කෝඩ් මිශ්\u200dරීය (SECM) පාළුවට පුළුවන් සීමාන්\u200dය සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූ ශ්\u200dරිලාන්කාන් සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමය සිටින් SECM පණිවිඩය සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවට වඩා වඩා  මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ කෝඩ් මික්ස් පාළු භාවිතය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් LSTM යුනිත්වය සහ ගුරුවර් අල්ගෝරිතම් සමග ස මොඩේල් වලින් භාවිත කතාවල් බිලින්ගුල් විශ්ලේෂණය බිලින්ගුල් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය කර අපේ නිර්මාණය පරිවර්තනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබුනා.', 'sv': 'Kodblandning har blivit en rörlig kommunikationsmetod bland flerspråkiga talare. Det mesta av det sociala medieinnehållet i de flerspråkiga samhällena är skrivet i kodblandad text. De flesta av de nuvarande översättningssystemen försummar dock att konvertera kodblandade texter till ett standardspråk. Det mesta av användarskrivet kodblandat innehåll i sociala medier förblir obearbetat på grund av otillgängligheten av språkliga resurser såsom parallell corpus. Denna uppsats föreslår en Neural Machine Translation (NMT) modell för att översätta den singhala-engelska kodblandade texten till singhala språket. På grund av de begränsade resurser som finns tillgängliga för singala-engelska kodblandad(SECM)-text skapas en parallell korpus med SECM-meningar och singala meningar. Srilankans sociala medier innehåller SECM-texter oftare än standardspråken. Den modell som föreslås för kodblandad textöversättning i denna studie är en kombination av Encoder-Decoder ramverk med LSTM-enheter och Teachers Forcing Algorithm. De översatta meningarna från modellen utvärderas med hjälp av BLEU (tvåspråkig utvärdering substudie). Vår modell uppnådde en anmärkningsvärd BLEU-poäng för översättningen.', 'so': 'Codeynta isku xiriirka waxay noqotay qaab dhaqdhaqaaq ah oo ku dhexeeya hadalka luuqadaha kala duduwan. Inta badan waxaa ku qoran macluumaadka bulshada ee bulshada kala duduwan qoraal ku qoran. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, nidaamka turjumista ee joogtada badankood waxay ka jeedaan in ay qoraal koonfureed u beddelaan luuqad standard ah. Inta badan ee isticmaalayaasha ku qoran kooxda isku xiran ee macluumaadka bulshada ayaa la baaraandegay sababtoo ah sababtoo ah aysan helin manfacada luqada sida korpus oo kale. Kanu warqaddan wuxuu soo jeedaa tarjumaadda Neural Machine (NMT) model to translate the Sinhala-Ingiriis code-mixed text to the Sinhala language. Sababta ay tahay maal xad ah oo ay ku jiraan qoraalka kooxda ee Sinhala-Ingiriis (SECM), waxaa la abuuraa qodob isku mid ah oo lagu qoray xukunka SECM iyo xafiiska Sinhala. Bogagga shabakada bulshada ee Srilankan waxaa ku yaala qoraal-qoraal SECM oo ka badan luuqadaha caadiga ah. Tusaalada lagu soo jeedo qoraalka koowaad-mixed-text turjumista waxbarashadan waa isku xir kookookoor-Decoder framework oo ay leeyihiin LSTM iyo Macallimiin qasab Algorithm. Tusaalada waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa qoraalka ku qoran BLEU(Waxbarashada ku qoran afka bilowga). Tusaalkayagii wuxuu gaadhay qiimo aad u fiican BLEU oo turjumista.', 'ur': 'کڈ میکسنگ بہت سی زبان صحبت کرنے والوں کے درمیان تعامل کی حرکت کا طریقہ ہو گیا ہے۔ اکثر سیاسی میڈیا موجودات کی مختلف زبان اجتماعوں میں لکھی جاتی ہیں۔ However, most of the current translation systems ignore code-mixed texts to a standard language. اکثر کارساز کو سوسیلی میڈیا میں لکھا ہوا کڈ میکس منصوبات کی نسبت زبان منصوبات کے غیر قابل دسترسی کے باعث بغیر محسوس ہو رہے ہیں۔ This paper proposes a Neural Machine Translation (NMT) model to translate the Sinhala-English code-mixed text to the Sinhala language. Sinhala-English code-mixed (SECM) text کے لئے موجود ہونے کے لئے محدودہ سرمایہ کے سبب، ایک parallel corpus is created with SECM sentences and Sinhala sentences. سیرلنک سوسیلی میڈیا سائٹوں میں SECM پیغام استاندارڈ زبانوں سے زیادہ اضافہ ہے۔ اس تحقیقات میں کوڈ میکس ٹیکسٹ ترجمہ کے لئے پیشنهاد کی موڈل LSTM یونیٹوں اور استاد الگوریتم کے ساتھ Encoder-Decoder فرموٹ کی ترجمہ ہے. موڈل سے ترجمہ کلمات بلیوس (دوئلینگ ارزش اندر استرس) کے مطابق مطابق ارزش کی جاتی ہیں. ہماری مدل نے ترجمہ کے لئے ایک اثر بلیوس اسکور پہنچا۔', 'ta': 'பல மொழி பேச்சாளர்களுக்கு இடையே தொடர்பு முறையாகும். பல மொழிகளின் சமூகங்களின் பெரும்பாலான சமூக ஊடகங்களின் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் குறியீடு கலந்த உரையில் எழுதப்பட்டுள் ஆனால், தற்போதைய மொழிபெயர்ப்பு அமைப்பு சமூக ஊடகங்களில் பெரும்பாலான எழுதப்பட்ட குறியீடு கலக்கப்பட்ட உள்ளடக்கங்கள் செயல்படுத்தப்படாது இணைய கோர்புஸ் போன்ற மொழியின் கி @ info சிங்ஹாலா- ஆங்கிலத்தின் குறியீடு- கலக்கப்பட்ட (SECM) உரைக்கு கிடைக்கும் வரம்பு மூலங்கள் காரணத்தால், SECM வாக்குகள் மற்றும் சிங் ஸ்ரிலாங்கான் சமூக ஊடக தளங்களில் SECM உரைகள் நிலையான மொழிகளை விட அதிகமாக இருக்கிறது. இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில் குறியீட்டு கலக்கப்பட்ட உரை மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி LSTM அலகுகள் மற்றும் ஆசிரியர்கள் அல்gor மாதிரியில் இருந்து மொழிபெயர்ப்பின் வாக்குகள் BLEU (Bilingual evaluation Understudy) மெட்ரிக் பயன்படுத்தப்படும். நம்முடைய மாதிரி மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கான பிலியு மதிப்பெண் அடைந்தது.', 'mt': 'It-taħlit tal-kodiċi sar metodu ta’ komunikazzjoni li jiċċaqlaq fost il-kelliema multilingwi. Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-kontenut tal-midja soċjali tas-soċjetajiet multilingwi jinsab f’test imħallat bil-kodiċi. However, most of the current translation systems neglect to convert code-mixed texts to a standard language.  Most of the user written code-mixed content in social media remains unprocessed due to the unavailability of linguistic resource such as parallel corpus.  Dan id-dokument jipproponi mudell ta’ Traduzzjoni ta’ Magni Newrali (NMT) biex it-test imħallat bil-kodiċi Sinhala-Ingliż jiġi tradott fil-lingwa Sinhala. Minħabba r-riżorsi limitati disponibbli għat-test imħallat bil-kodiċi Sinhala-Ingliż (SECM), jinħoloq korpus parallel mas-sentenzi SECM u s-sentenzi Sinhala. Is-siti tal-midja soċjali Srilankan fihom testi tas-SECM aktar spiss mil-lingwi standard. Il-mudell propost għat-traduzzjoni tat-test imħallat bil-kodiċi f’dan l-istudju huwa kombinazzjoni ta’ qafas ta’ Encoder-Decoder ma’ unitajiet LSTM u Algorithm ta’ Forcing tal-għalliema. Is-sentenzi tradotti mill-mudell huma evalwati bl-użu tal-metrika BLEU(Substudju ta’ Evalwazzjoni Bilinguali). Il-mudell tagħna kiseb punteġġ notevoli BLEU għat-traduzzjoni.', 'uz': "Kodlash qoidasi bir necha tilda gapiruvchilar orasidagi aloqa usuli bo'lgan. Ko'pchilik jamiyatlar jamiyatlarining ko'pchiligi jamiyatli tarkibi kodlash matnini yozishadi. Lekin, joriy tarjima tizimning ko'pchiligi kod- mixed matnlarni andoza tilga aylantirishga eʼtibor bermaydi. Name Name Name Name The model proposed for code-mixed text translation in this study is a combination of Encoder-Decoder framework with LSTM units and Teachers Forcing Algorithm.  Name Bizning modelimiz tarjima qilish uchun ajoyib BLEU scori topdi.", 'vi': 'Mã pha trộn đã trở thành một phương pháp liên lạc chuyển động giữa các diễn viên đa dạng. Phần lớn nội dung truyền thông xã hội của các xã hội đa dạng đều được viết bằng mã trộn. Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các hệ thống dịch chuyển hiện nay thiếu khả năng chuyển đổi các văn bản hỗn hợp mã thành ngôn ngữ tiêu chuẩn. Phần lớn nội dung mã trộn lẫn trong các phương tiện xã hội vẫn chưa được xử lý vì không có tài nguyên ngôn ngữ như tập thể song. Tờ giấy này đề xuất một mô hình Dịch về máy thần kinh (NMB) để dịch đoạn mã trộn của Sinhala-English sang ngôn ngữ SinHale. Do các nguồn lực hạn chế cho văn bản theo mã trộn (SecM) của SinHale-Anh, một tập thể song song được tạo ra với các câu thứ hai và SinHale. Các trang mạng xã hội bố Lan chứa các văn bản theo thứ hai thường xuyên hơn ngôn ngữ tiêu chuẩn. The model proposed for mã-mixed text translation in this study is a combination of Encoder-Decder structure with LSTM units and teachers Khởi tạo Algorithm. Các câu dịch ra từ mô hình được đánh giá bằng hệ thống LELIU(Bài Đánh giá giải) Mô hình của chúng tôi đã đạt được một số lượng đáng chú ý.', 'nl': 'Code-mixing is uitgegroeid tot een bewegende manier van communicatie tussen meertalige sprekers. De meeste social media content van de meertalige samenlevingen zijn geschreven in code-gemengde tekst. De meeste huidige vertaalsystemen verwaarlozen echter om code-gemengde teksten om te zetten naar een standaardtaal. Het grootste deel van de door de gebruiker geschreven code-mixed content in sociale media blijft onbewerkt vanwege de onbeschikbaarheid van taalkundige bronnen zoals parallelle corpus. Deze paper stelt een Neural Machine Translation (NMT) model voor om de Singhala-Engelse code-mixed tekst te vertalen naar de Singhala taal. Vanwege de beperkte middelen die beschikbaar zijn voor Sinhalas-Engelse code-mixed(SECM) tekst, wordt een parallel corpus gecreëerd met SECM zinnen en Sinhalas zinnen. Srilankan social media sites bevatten SECM teksten vaker dan de standaard talen. Het model dat in deze studie wordt voorgesteld voor code-gemengde tekst vertaling is een combinatie van Encoder-Decoder framework met LSTM eenheden en Teachers Forcing Algorithm. De vertaalde zinnen uit het model worden geëvalueerd met behulp van BLEU (Bilingual Evaluation Understudy) metric. Ons model behaalde een opmerkelijke BLEU score voor de vertaling.', 'hr': 'Mješanje kodova postalo je pokretni način komunikacije među višejezičkim govornicima. Većina sadržaja društvenih medija multijezičkih društva napisana je u tekstu mešanom kod. Međutim, većina trenutnih sustava prevođenja zaboravlja preobraćati tekste pomiješane kod na standardni jezik. Većina korisnika napisanog sadržaja mešanog koda u društvenim medijima ostaje neprocijeđena zbog nepostupnosti jezičkih resursa poput paralelnog korpusa. Ovaj papir predlaže model neurološkog prevoda (NMT) za prevod teksta pomiješanog sinhalačkog engleskog koda na sinhalački jezik. Zbog ograničenih resursa koje su dostupne za tekst sinhalski-engleski mješani kodovi (SECM), paralelni korpus je stvoren sa rečenicama SECM-a i kaznicama sinhala. Sriljanski društveni mediji sadrže tekstove SECM češće od standardnih jezika. Model koji je predložen za prevod teksta u ovom ispitivanju pomiješan kod je kombinacija okvira kodera-dekodera sa LSTM jedinicama i učiteljima koji prisiljavaju algoritam. Prevedene rečenice iz modela procjenjuju se koristeći metričku BLEU (podispitivanje za dvostruku procjenu). Naš model je postigao izvanredan rezultat BLEU za prevod.', 'bg': 'Смесването на кодове се превърна в движещ се метод за комуникация между многоезичните говорители. Повечето от съдържанието на социалните медии на многоезичните общества са написани в кодово смесен текст. Въпреки това, повечето от сегашните системи за превод пренебрегват конвертирането на смесени с кодове текстове на стандартен език. Повечето от потребителското писмено кодово смесено съдържание в социалните медии остава непробивано поради липсата на езиков ресурс като паралелен корпус. Настоящата статия предлага модел на неврален машинен превод (НМТ) за превод на синхалско-английски кодово смесен текст на синхалския език. Поради ограничените ресурси, налични за синхалско-английски кодов смесен текст, се създава паралелен корпус с изречения и синхалски изречения. Сайтовете на Сриланка в социалните медии съдържат текстове по-често от стандартните езици. Моделът, предложен за кодово-смесен текстов превод в настоящото изследване, е комбинация от рамка за кодиране-декодер с единици и алгоритъм на учителите. Преведените изречения от модела се оценяват с помощта на метрика. Нашият модел постигна забележителен резултат за превода.', 'da': 'Kodeblanding er blevet en bevægende kommunikationsmetode blandt flersprogede talere. Størstedelen af indholdet på sociale medier i de flersprogede samfund er skrevet i kode-blandet tekst. De fleste af de nuværende oversættelsessystemer undlader imidlertid at konvertere kodblandede tekster til et standardsprog. Det meste af det brugerskrevne kodeblandede indhold i sociale medier forbliver ubehandlet på grund af manglende tilgængelighed af sproglige ressourcer såsom parallel corpus. Denne artikel foreslår en Neural Machine Translation (NMT) model til at oversætte den singhala-engelske kodeblandede tekst til singhala sproget. På grund af de begrænsede ressourcer til rådighed for singhala-engelsk kode-blandet (SECM) tekst, oprettes et parallelt korpus med SECM sætninger og singhala sætninger. Srilankans sociale mediesider indeholder SECM-tekster oftere end standardsprogene. Den model, der foreslås for kode-blandet tekst oversættelse i dette studie, er en kombination af Encoder-Decoder ramme med LSTM enheder og Teachers Forcing Algorithm. De oversatte sætninger fra modellen evalueres ved hjælp af BLEU (Tosproget Evaluation Understudy) metric. Vores model opnåede en bemærkelsesværdig BLEU score for oversættelsen.', 'id': 'Pengcampuran kode telah menjadi metode komunikasi bergerak di antara pembicara berbagai bahasa. Kebanyakan isi media sosial masyarakat berbilang bahasa ditulis dalam teks kode-campuran. Namun, kebanyakan sistem terjemahan saat ini mengabaikan untuk mengubah teks kode-campuran ke bahasa standar. Kebanyakan pengguna menulis isi kode-campuran dalam media sosial masih belum diproses karena tidak tersedia sumber daya bahasa seperti corpus paralel. Kertas ini mengusulkan model Translation Mesin Neural (NMT) untuk menerjemahkan teks kode-campuran Sinhala-Inggris ke bahasa Sinhala. Karena sumber daya terbatas yang tersedia untuk teks kode-mixed (SECM) bahasa Inggris-Sinhala, sebuah corpus paralel diciptakan dengan kalimat SECM dan kalimat Sinhala. Srilankan social media sites contain SECM texts more frequently than the standard languages.  Model yang diusulkan untuk terjemahan teks campuran kode dalam studi ini adalah kombinasi dari kerangka Encoder-Decoder dengan LSTM unit dan Algoritma Memaksa Guru. Kalimat terjemahan dari model diteliti menggunakan metrik BLEU(Bilingual Evaluation Understudy). Model kami mencapai nilai BLEU yang luar biasa untuk terjemahan.', 'ko': '코드 혼합은 이미 여러 언어 사용자 간의 교류의 일종의 이동 방식이 되었다.다언어 사회의 대다수 소셜 미디어 내용은 코드와 텍스트를 혼합하여 작성된 것이다.그러나 현재 대부분의 번역 시스템은 코드 혼합 텍스트를 표준 언어로 바꾸는 것을 소홀히 하고 있다.평행 자료 라이브러리 등 언어 자원을 사용할 수 없기 때문에 소셜 미디어에서 대다수 사용자가 작성한 코드 혼합 내용은 여전히 처리되지 않았다.본고는 승가로어-영어 코드 혼합 텍스트를 승가로어로 번역하는 신경기계번역(NMT) 모델을 제시했다.승가라어-영어 코드 혼합(SECM) 텍스트의 사용 가능한 자원이 제한되어 있기 때문에 SECM 문장과 승가라어 문장을 이용하여 평행 어료 라이브러리를 만들었다.스리랑카 소셜미디어 사이트에는 SECM 텍스트의 빈도가 표준어보다 높다.본고에서 제시한 코드 혼합 텍스트 번역 모델은 인코딩-디코딩 프레임워크, LSTM 단원과 강제 알고리즘을 결합시켰다.BLEU 메트릭을 사용하여 모델의 번역 문장을 평가합니다.우리의 모델은 번역 방면에서 현저한 BLEU 점수를 얻었다.', 'de': 'Code-Mixing ist zu einer bewegenden Methode der Kommunikation unter mehrsprachigen Sprechern geworden. Die meisten Social-Media-Inhalte der mehrsprachigen Gesellschaften sind in Code-Mixed-Text geschrieben. Allerdings vernachlässigen die meisten gängigen Übersetzungssysteme die Umwandlung von Code-Mixed-Texten in eine Standardsprache. Der Großteil der vom Benutzer geschriebenen Code-Mixed-Inhalte in sozialen Medien bleibt aufgrund der Nichtverfügbarkeit sprachlicher Ressourcen wie paralleler Korpus unverarbeitet. Diese Arbeit schlägt ein Neural Machine Translation (NMT) Modell vor, um den Singhala-Englischen Code-Mixed Text in die Singhala Sprache zu übersetzen. Aufgrund der begrenzten Ressourcen für Singhala-English code-mixed(SECM)-Text wird ein paralleler Korpus mit SECM-Sätzen und Singhala-Sätzen erstellt. Srilankan Social Media Seiten enthalten SECM Texte häufiger als die Standardsprachen. Das in dieser Studie vorgeschlagene Modell für die Übersetzung von Code-Mixed Text ist eine Kombination aus Encoder-Decoder Framework mit LSTM Einheiten und Teachers Forcing Algorithm. Die übersetzten Sätze aus dem Modell werden mit BLEU (Bilingual Evaluation Understudy) Metrik ausgewertet. Unser Modell erzielte eine bemerkenswerte BLEU-Punktzahl für die Übersetzung.', 'fa': 'ترکیب قانونی یک روش حرکت در ارتباط بین زبان\u200cها تبدیل شده است. بیشتر محتوای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی از جامعه\u200cهای زیادی زبان در متن پیوند پیوند متصل شده نوشته می\u200cشوند. ولی بیشتر سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه فعلی به زبان استاندارد تبدیل کردن متن\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cشده کد را نادیده می\u200cگیرند. بیشتر کاربر محتوای پیوسته\u200cای از کد نوشته شده در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی به دلیل غیرقابل دسترسی منابع زبان\u200cشناسی مانند کورپوس متفاوتی در حال حاضر است. این کاغذ یک مدل تغییرات ماشین عصبی (NMT) را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد تا متن متصل شده\u200cی کد انگلیسی سینهالی را به زبان سینهالی ترجمه کند. به دلیل منابع محدودیت برای متن رمز پیوند (SECM) سینهال-انگلیسی وجود دارد، یک کورپوس پارالی با جمله\u200cهای SECM و جمله\u200cهای سینهال ایجاد می\u200cشود. سایت\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی سرلانکا متن\u200cهای SECM بیشتر از زبان\u200cهای استاندارد را دارند. Model proposed for code-mixed text translation in this study is a combination of Encoder-Decoder framework with LSTM units and teachers Forcing Algorithm. جمله\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cشده از مدل با استفاده از متریک BLEU(تحقیق زیر ارزیابی دوگانه) ارزیابی می\u200cشوند. مدل ما یک امتیاز بلوئوپ فوق العاده برای ترجمه رسید.', 'sw': 'Miungano ya sheria imekuwa njia ya kuhamisha mawasiliano kati ya wazungumzaji wa lugha mbalimbali. Mitandao mengi ya mitandao ya kijamii ya jumuiya nyingi za lugha zimeandikwa kwa maandishi yanayochanganyika. Hata hivyo, mifumo mingi ya tafsiri ya sasa hupuuza kubadilisha maandishi yanayochanganyika kwa kodi kuwa lugha ya kawaida. Most of the user written code-mixed content in social media remains unprocessed due to the unavailability of linguistic resource such as parallel corpus.  Makala hii inapendekeza mfumo wa Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Neural (NMT) kutafsiri ujumbe wa kodi-Kiingereza kwa lugha ya Sinhala. Kutokana na rasilimali chache zinazopatikana kwa ujumbe wa kodi ya Sinhala-Kiingereza (SECM), makampuni yanatengenezwa kwa hukumu za SECM na hukumu za Sinhala. Tovuti za mitandao ya kijamii za Srilanki zina ujumbe wa SECM mara kwa mara kuliko lugha za kawaida. Mradi unapendekezwa kwa kutafsiri tafsiri ya maandishi yenye mchanganyiko wa kodi katika utafiti huu ni muunganiko wa mfumo wa mfumo wa Encoder na vifaa vya LSTM na Walimu wanaohamasisha Algorithi. sentensi zilizotafsiriwa kutoka kwa mtindo huo zinavutiwa kwa kutumia mbinu ya BLEU(Utafiti wa Uchunguzi wa Kilugha). Mfano wetu ulifanikiwa score ya BLEU ya kutangaza tafsiri.', 'af': "Name Die meeste van die sosiale media inhoud van die multitaalse samelewing is geskryf in kode gemengde teks. Maar meeste van die huidige vertalingsstelsels verwerp om kode gemengde teks na 'n standaard taal te omskakel. Die meeste van die gebruiker het geskrywe kode gemengde inhoud in sosiale media oorgebly onverwerp vanweë die onbeskikbaarheid van lingvisse hulpbron soos parallele korpus. Hierdie papier voorstel 'n Neural Masjien Vertaling( NMT) model om die Sinhala- Engels kode- gemengde teks te vertaal na die Sinhala taal. Dus die beperkte hulpbron beskikbaar vir Sinhala- Engels kode- gemengde (SECM) teks, word 'n parallele korpus geskep met SECM setnings en Sinhala setnings. Srilankan sosiale media tuistes bevat SECM teks meer dikwels as die standaard tale. Die model voorgestel vir kode gemengde teks vertaling in hierdie studie is 'n kombinasie van Encoder-Decoder raamwerk met LSTM eenhede en onderwysers wat versterk Algoritme. Die vertaalde setinge van die model word uitgewerk met gebruik van BLEU (Bilinguele Evaluering Understudy) metrie. Ons model het 'n remarkante BLEU-poeker vir die vertaling bereik.", 'sq': 'Përzierja e kodeve është bërë një metodë lëvizëse komunikimi midis folësve shumëgjuhës. Shumica e përmbajtjes së medias sociale të shoqërive shumëgjuhësore janë shkruar në tekst të përzier me kode. Megjithatë, shumica e sistemeve aktuale të përkthimit harrojnë të konvertojnë tekste të përziera me kod në një gjuhë standard. Most of the user written code-mixed content in social media remains unprocessed due to the unavailability of linguistic resource such as parallel corpus.  Ky dokument propozon një model të përkthimit të makinës nervore (NMT) për të përkthyer tekstin e përzier me kod sinhala-anglez në gjuhën sinhala. Për shkak të burimeve të kufizuara të disponueshme për tekstin e përzier me kod sinhala-anglez (SECM), krijohet një korpus paralel me frazat SECM dhe frazat sinhala. Faqet e medias sociale të Srilankës përmbajnë tekste SECM më shpesh se gjuhët standarde. Modeli i propozuar për përkthimin e tekstit të përzier me kode në këtë studim është një kombinim i kuadrit të koduesit-dekoderit me njësitë LSTM dhe Algoritmin e Forcimit të Mësuesve. Frazat e përkthyera nga modeli vlerësohen duke përdorur metrikën BLEU(Substudimi i vlerësimit dygjuhësor). Modeli ynë arriti një rezultat të jashtëzakonshëm BLEU për përkthimin.', 'tr': 'Ködleme karışmasy birnäçe dilli gürleşýänler arasynda habarlaşmak üçin bir hereket edildi. Birnäçe dilli jemgyýetlerin sosyal medýäniň köp bölegi koda karışan metinde ýazylýar. Ýöne häzirki terjime sistemleriniň köp bölegi, karmaşdyran metinleri standart dile üýtgetmekden çykarýar. Ullançylaryň köp bölegi sosyal medýäniň içinde ýazylýan ködlemeler, parallel korpus ýaly dil çeşmeleriň tapylmadygyna sebäbi işlenmediler. Bu kagyz Sinhalaly-Iňlisçe karışylyk metini Sinhalaly diline terjime etmek üçin bir nural maşynyň terjime(NMT) nusgasyny teklip edýär. Sinhalaly-iňlisçe karışyk(SECM) metin üçin meňzeşli çeşmeleriň sebäbi parallel korpus SECM sözleri we Sinhalaly sözleri bilen döredildi. Şrilanka sosialy medýdançalar standart dillerden köplenç SECM metinlerini bar. Bu aramda karışmış metin terjime üçin nusgala edildi. Bu aramda LSTM bir ködler we Mugallymlar Algoritmus bilen birleştirilýär. Modeliň terjime edilen sözleriň BLEU(Bilingual Taýýarlama Astynyň Çykyşy) metrikleri ulanylar. Biziň nusgymyz bu terjime üçin örän möhüm bir BLEU netijesi tapdy.', 'hy': 'Կոդի խառնուրդը դարձավ շարժվող հաղորդակցման մեթոդ բազմալեզվով խոսնակների միջև: Շատ լեզվով հասարակությունների սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների պարունակությունը գրված է կոդի խառնված տեքստում: Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայիս թարգմանման համակարգերի մեծամասնությունը անտեսում է կոդի խառնված տեքստերը ստանդարտ լեզվի: Most of the user written code-mixed content in social media remains unprocessed due to the unavailability of linguistic resource such as parallel corpus.  Այս թղթին առաջարկում է նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) մոդել, որը կթարգմանի սինալա-անգլերեն կոդի խառնված տեքստը սինալայի լեզվին: Սինհալա-անգլերեն կոդ-խառնված (SEKM) տեքստի համար հասանելի սահմանափակ ռեսուրսների շնորհիվ զուգահեռ կորպուս է ստեղծվում SEKM նախադասություններով և սինալա նախադասություններով: Սրիլանյան սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների կայքերը ավելի հաճախ են ներառում SEK տեքստերը, քան ստանդարտ լեզուները: Այս ուսումնասիրության մեջ կոդի խառնված տեքստի թարգմանման համար առաջարկված մոդելը կոդեր-կոդեր համակարգի է LSMT միավորների և ուսուցիչների պարտադրող ալգորիթմի հետ: Մոդելի թարգմանված նախադասությունները գնահատվում են օգտագործելով ԲԼԵՎ (Երկլեզու գնահատման ենթաուսումնասիրություն) մետրիկ: Մեր մոդելը հաջողվեց թարգմանության համար գլխավոր գնահատականներ:', 'az': 'Kod karışması çoxlu dilli danışanlar arasında hərəkət etmə yolu oldu. Çoxlu dil toplumların sosyal media məlumatının çoxu kodlu karışıqlı metinlərdə yazılır. Halbuki, a ğımdaki tercümə sistemlərinin çoxu kodla karışmış metinləri standart dilinə çevirməsini unutdur. İstifadəçilərin çoxu sosyal media içində yazılmış kodla karışılmış məlumatı paralel korpus kimi dil çoxluğunun mümkün olmadığı üçün istifadə edilməz. Bu kağıt Sinhal-İngilizce kodu karışıqlı metinləri Sinhal dilinə çevirmək üçün NMT modelini təklif edir. Sinhal-İngilizə kodu karıştırılmış (SECM) mətnlərinin müəyyən edilən müəyyən kaynaqlarına görə paralel korpus SECM sözləri və Sinhal sözləri ilə yaradılır. Şrilankı sosyal media sitələri standart dillərindən daha çox SECM metinləri içərir. Bu araşdırma içində Kod-karışıqlı metin çevirisi üçün təklif edilən model LSTM birlikləri ilə Kod-Dekoder çerçivesi və Muhəmmədlər Algoritimi zorlayırlar. Modeldən çevirilən cümlələr BLEU(İkinci Evaluation Understudy) metric vasitəsilə değerlənir. Bizim modelimiz tərcümə üçün gözəl bir BLEU nöqtəsi qəbul etdi.', 'am': 'የኮድ ማቀናቀል በቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች መካከል የመንቀሳቀስ መልዕክት ሆኖአል፡፡ ብዙዎቹ የቋንቋዎች ማኅበረሰቦች ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያዎች በጽሑፍ በተለየ ጽሑፍ ተጽፎአል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የአሁኑ ትርጉም ስርዓቶች ብዙዎቹ የኮድ-mixed ጽሑፎችን ወደ standard ቋንቋ ለመለወጥ ተዉታል፡፡ በማኅበራዊ ማኅበራዊ አውታር የተጻፈው የጽሑፍ ኮድ የተቀላቀለ ጥያቄ ብዙዎቹም እንደተያያይደለ የቋንቋዊ ክፍተት እንዳይገኝ ነው፡፡ This paper proposes a Neural Machine Translation(NMT) model to translate the Sinhala-English code-mixed text to the Sinhala language.  በሲንሐላ-እንግሊዘኛ ኮድ-መቀላቀል (SECM) ጽሑፍ የተደረገ ሀብት ምክንያት በSECM ፍርድ እና በሲንሃላ ፍርድ የተደረገ የኮርፓስ ክፍል ነው፡፡ የሳሪንጋን ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ገጾች የSECM ጽሑፎች በዓላማዊ ቋንቋዎች ላይ አብዛኛዎች ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ ለcode-mixed text ትርጓሜ የተገኘው model - Encoder-Decoder framework - with LSTM units and Teachers Forcing Algorithm - a combination. ከሞዴል የተዘጋጁ ቃላት BLEU (Bilingual Evaluation Understudy) ሚትሪክ የተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን ለትርጉም የBLEU score አግኝቷል፡፡', 'bn': 'কোড মিশ্রণ বিভিন্ন ভাষাভাষীদের মধ্যে যোগাযোগের মাধ্যমে পরিণত হয়েছে। Most of the social media content of the multilingual societies are written in code-mixed text.  তবে বর্তমান অনুবাদ সিস্টেম স্বাভাবিক ভাষায় কোড- মিশ্রিত টেক্সট পরিবর্তন করার উপেক্ষা করেছে। সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে বেশীরভাগ ব্যবহারকারীর লেখা কোড-মিশ্রিত বিষয়বস্তু প্রক্রিয়া নেই, যেমন পার্যালেল কোর্পাসের মত ভাষ এই পত্রিকাটি সিনাহাল-ইংরেজী কোড-মিশ্রিত লেখাটিকে সিনাহালার ভাষায় অনুবাদ করার জন্য নেউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ প্রস্তাব করে। সিঙ্গাল-ইংরেজি কোড মিশ্রিত (সেসিএম) লেখার জন্য সীমিত সম্পদের কারণে সিসিএমের বাক্য এবং সিঙ্গালার শাস্তি দিয়ে একটি পার্লিল কর্প শ্রিলাঙ্কান সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের সাইটের মধ্যে সেসিএম টেক্সট প্রায়শ স্ট্যান্ডার ভাষার চেয়ে ব এই গবেষণায় কোড মিশ্রিত টেক্সট অনুবাদের জন্য প্রস্তাবিত মডেল হচ্ছে এনকোডার-ডেকোডার ফ্রেম্যাকার্ক LSTM ইউনিট এবং শিক্ষকদের বাধ্য মডেল থেকে অনুবাদ করা বিলিউ (বিলিঙ্গুয়াল ইনভায়ালুয়েশন আন্ডার্টলেশন) মেট্রিক ব্যবহার করে মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে। আমাদের মডেল অনুবাদের জন্য একটি চমৎকার বিলিউ স্কোর অর্জন করেছে।', 'bs': 'Mješanje kodova postalo je pokretni metod komunikacije među višejezičkim govornicima. Većina sadržaja društvenih medija multijezičkih društva napisana je u tekstu pomiješanom kodom. Međutim, većina trenutnih sustava prevođenja zaboravlja preobraćati tekste pomiješane kod na standardni jezik. Većina korisnika napisanog sadržaja mešanog koda u društvenim medijima ostaje neprocijeđena zbog nepostupnosti jezičkih resursa poput paralelnog korpusa. Ovaj papir predlaže model neurološkog prevoda (NMT) za prevod teksta pomiješanog sinhala-engleskog koda na sinhala jezik. Zbog ograničenih resursa koje su dostupne za tekst sinhalanskog-engleskog koda pomiješanog (SECM), paralelni korpus je stvoren sa kaznama SECM-a i kaznama sinhalaca. Sriljanski društveni mediji sadrže tekstove SECM češće od standardnih jezika. Model predložen za prevod teksta u ovom ispitivanju između kodova je kombinacija okvira kodera-dekodera sa LSTM jedinicama i učiteljima koji prisiljavaju algoritam. Prevedene rečenice iz modela procjenjuju se koristeći metričku BLEU (podstudiranje za dvostruku procjenu). Naš model je postigao izvanredan rezultat BLEU za prevod.', 'cs': 'Mixování kódu se stalo pohyblivou metodou komunikace mezi vícejazyčnými mluvčími. Většina obsahu sociálních médií mnohojazyčných společností je napsána v textu smíšeném kódem. Nicméně většina současných překladatelských systémů zanedbává konverzi textů smíšených kódem do standardního jazyka. Většina uživatelů psaného kódově smíšeného obsahu v sociálních médiích zůstává nezpracována kvůli nedostupnosti jazykových zdrojů, jako je paralelní korpus. Tento příspěvek navrhuje model neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) pro překlad čínštiny-anglického kódu smíšeného textu do sinhálského jazyka. Vzhledem k omezeným zdrojům, které jsou k dispozici pro čínština-anglický text, je vytvořen paralelní korpus s větami SECM a sinhálskými větami. Srilankanské sociální média obsahují texty SECM častěji než standardní jazyky. Model navržený pro překlad kódového smíšeného textu v této práci je kombinací frameworku Encoder-Decoder s LSTM jednotkami a algoritmem vynucování učitelů. Přeložené věty z modelu jsou hodnoceny pomocí metriky BLEU (Bilingual Evaluation Understudy). Náš model dosáhl pozoruhodného skóre BLEU pro překlad.', 'ca': "La combinació de codis s'ha convertit en un mètode mouent de comunicació entre parlants multilingües. La majoria del contingut dels mitjans socials de les societats multilingües està escrit en text combinat amb codis. Tot i així, la majoria dels sistemes de traducció actuals no converteixen els textos combinats amb codi en un llenguatge normal. La majoria del contingut escrit per codi mixt als mitjans socials encara no ha estat processat degut a la falta de recursos lingüístics com el corpus parallel. Aquest article propon un model de traducció neuronal de màquina (NMT) per traduir el text mixte entre codi sinàl i anglès al llenguatge sinàl. Gràcies a les limitades quantitats de recursos disponibles per al text mixte de codi sinhala-anglès (SECM), es crea un corpus paral·lel amb frases SECM i frases sinhala. Els llocs de mitjans socials Srilankan contenen textos SECM més sovint que les llengües habituals. El model proposat per la traducció de text combinat amb codis en aquest estudi és una combinació de marc de codificador-codificador amb unitats LSTM i algoritmes de for ça dels professors. Les frases traduïdes del model s'evaluen usant la mètrica BLEU. El nostre model va aconseguir una puntuació notable BLEU per a la traducció.", 'et': 'Koodide segamine on muutunud liikuvaks suhtlemisviisiks mitmekeelsete kõnelejate vahel. Enamik mitmekeelsete ühiskondade sotsiaalmeedia sisust on kirjutatud koodisegatekstina. Enamik praegustest tõlkesüsteemidest jätab siiski tähelepanuta koodisegatud tekstide teisendamise standardkeelde. Enamik kasutaja kirjutatud koodisega sisust sotsiaalmeedias on töötlemata keelelise ressursi, näiteks paralleelkorpuse puudumise tõttu. Käesolev töö pakub välja neuraalse masintõlke (NMT) mudeli tõlkimiseks sinhala-inglise koodisegatud teksti tõlkimiseks sinhala keelde. Kuna sinhala-inglise koodisegatud teksti (SECM) jaoks on kättesaadavad piiratud ressursid, luuakse paralleelne korpus SECM lausete ja sinhala lausetega. Srilankani sotsiaalmeedia saidid sisaldavad SECM tekste sagedamini kui tavakeeled. Käesolevas uuringus pakutakse välja koodisegatud tekstitõlke mudel kombinatsiooniks kodeeri-dekooderi raamistikust LSTM üksuste ja õpetajate sundlalgoritmiga. Mudeli tõlgitud lauseid hinnatakse BLEU (Bilingual Evaluation Understudy) meetri abil. Meie mudel saavutas märkimisväärse BLEU skoori tõlke.', 'fi': 'Koodien sekoittamisesta on tullut monikielisten puhujien liikuttava viestintätapa. Suurin osa monikielisten yhteiskuntien sosiaalisen median sisällöstä on kirjoitettu koodisekoitettuna tekstinä. Suurin osa nykyisistä käännösjärjestelmistä laiminlyö kuitenkin koodisekoitettujen tekstien muuntamisen tavalliseksi kieleksi. Suurin osa käyttäjän kirjoittamasta koodisekoitetusta sisällöstä sosiaalisessa mediassa on edelleen käsittelemättä, koska kieliaineistoa, kuten rinnakkaiskorpusta, ei ole saatavilla. Tässä työssä ehdotetaan neurokonekäännösmallia (NMT) sinhala-englantilaisen koodisekoitetun tekstin kääntämiseksi sinhalan kielelle. Koska sinhala-englanti code mixed(SECM) -tekstiin on saatavilla rajallisia resursseja, rinnakkaiskorpus luodaan SECM-lauseilla ja sinhala-lauseilla. Srilankanin sosiaalisen median sivustot sisältävät SECM-tekstejä useammin kuin tavalliset kielet. Tässä tutkimuksessa koodisekoitetun tekstin kääntämiseen ehdotettu malli on yhdistelmä kooderi-dekooderikehystä LSTM-yksiköihin ja Opettajien pakkoalgoritmiin. Mallin käännetyt lauseet arvioidaan BLEU (Bilingual Evaluation Understudy) -metrillä. Mallimme saavutti huomattavan BLEU-pisteen käännöksessä.', 'he': 'Code-mixing has become a moving method of communication among multilingual speakers.  Most of the social media content of the multilingual societies are written in code-mixed text.  עם זאת, רוב מערכות התרגום הנוכחיות שוכחות להפוך טקסטים מעורבים בקוד לשפה סטנדרטית. רוב המשתמשים כתבו תוכן מעורבב קוד בתקשורת חברתית נשאר ללא התהליך בגלל הלא זמין של משאבים שפתיים כמו קורפוס מקביל. העבודה הזו מציעה מודל לתרגום מכונת נוירולית (NMT) כדי לתרגם את הטקסט המערובב של קוד סינהלי-אנגלי לשפה סינהלית. Due to the limited resources available for Sinhala-English code-mixed(SECM) text, a parallel corpus is created with SECM sentences and Sinhala sentences.  Srilankan social media sites contain SECM texts more frequently than the standard languages.  המודל המוצע לתרגום טקסט מעורב בקוד במחקר הזה הוא שילוב של מסגרת קוד-קוד עם יחידות LSTM ואלגוריתם מאלץ. המשפטים המתורגמים מהדוגמא מתערכים באמצעות מטריקה BLEU (Understudy of Bilingual Evaluation). Our model achieved a remarkable BLEU score for the translation.', 'sk': 'Mešanje kod je postalo gibljiva metoda komunikacije med večjezičnimi govorniki. Večina vsebin družbenih medijev večjezičnih družb je napisana v kodno mešanih besedilih. Vendar večina sedanjih prevajalskih sistemov zanemarja pretvorbo besedil z mešanimi kodami v standardni jezik. Večina uporabnikov napisanih kodno mešanih vsebin v družbenih omrežjih ostaja nepredelana zaradi nedostopnosti jezikovnih virov, kot je vzporedni korpus. Ta prispevek predlaga model nevralnega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) za prevajanje besedila sinhalsko-angleškega kodno mešanega besedila v sinhalski jezik. Zaradi omejenih virov, ki so na voljo za besedilo SECM (sinhala-angleško kodno mešano), je ustvarjen vzporedni korpus s stavki SECM in sinhalskimi stavki. Srilankana socialna omrežja vsebujejo besedila SECM pogosteje kot standardni jeziki. Model, predlagan za prevajanje besedila z mešanimi kodami, je kombinacija okvira Encoder-Dekoder z enotami LSTM in algoritmom prisilnih učiteljev. Prevedeni stavki iz modela so ovrednoteni z uporabo metrike BLEU (dvojezična evalvacija Understudy). Naš model je dosegel izjemno oceno BLEU za prevod.', 'ha': "Code-Mixe ya kasance wata shirin mai tafiyar da wa'azi a tsakanin masu saurãre bakan mulki-harshe. Babu mafi yawan mitandai na jamii da ke cikin jamii masu yawa na rubũtu cikin littãfin da aka haɗa. Babu kasa, mafi yawansu na fassarar da ake kai yanzu sunã ƙyãma wa ya mayar da matsayin kodi-da-haɗe zuwa wata harshe na daidaita. Babu mafi yawan mãsu amfani da ya rubutu kodi-da-haɗi cikin mitandai da jamii ba za'a yi cẽto ba don a zartar da shi kamar ba'a iya sãmun resource na linguistic kamar nauyi. @ item license (short name) Dukan da aka ƙayyade marufau wanda ke iya amfani da wa kodi na Sinhala-Ingiriya-Mixed (SCM), an halitta nau'in rubutu mai daidaita da cewa na SCM da cewa Sinhala. QFontDatabase @ action: button An ƙaddara salon da aka fassara daga misalin ayuka, a ƙaddara metric mai amfani da BLEU(Bayan Taimar Bayaniya Babil da Fassarar). Tuduniyarmu ya sami wani na'urar BLEU mai girma wa fassarar.", 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་སྐད་ཀྱི་མིང་འདྲ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྤོར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཆགས་ཡོད། སྐད་རིགས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད་པའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དུ་རྟགས་བཀལ་ཡོད ཡིན་ནའང་ད་ལྟོའི་ཡིག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་ནི་ཡིག སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ནང་གི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཡིག ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མིའུ་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་སྔོན་སྲོལ་འདུག་ སིན་ཧྲིལ་ཡིག སིན་ཧྲིལ་ཡིག Srilankan social media sites contain SECM texts more frequently than the standard languages. The model proposed for code-mixed text translation in this study is a combination of Encoder-Decoder framework with LSTM units and Teachers Forcing Algorithm. The translated sentences from the model are evaluated using BLEU(Bilingual Evaluation Understudy) metric. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་ཡུལ་ཆེན་ཤིག་རྙེད་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'Where Banyak akèh sing paling media sothik kanggo sampeyan akeh langkung sampeyan sampeyan karo akeh basa. Nanging, akeh langkung sistem anyar terjamah-sistem sing bisa ngulinakake Piye soko perusahaan liyane dadi karo kode-karo hal-hal nang media sotiné kuwi ora bisa nguasai perusahaan karo hal-hal nganggep Perintah iki supoyo sistem sing model de Terjamahan (NMT), nggo terjamahan kelompok Singhal-Inggris barang kelompok karo Singhal. Tanggal nggo oleh sing perusahaan nggo kelas kanggo kelas nggo teks Singhal-Inggris kode-Mixed(SESM), sampeyan karo perusahaan kelas kotak dipunanggo kelas SECm karo peranggo kelas SECm karo peranggo kelas Singhal. Sampeyan hukum sing mengko hukum sing larang SESM, luwih akeh luwih apik sing luwih apik sing luwih sedhaya. model supoyo nggo kode-karbote teks terjamahan kanggo nggambar urip iki dadi karo konbine karo koder-Dekoder karo perusahaan LTT karo Pak guru nggawe Algorithm Validity Modelèn dhéwé wis ngerasakno sing paling dhéwé nang tarjamahan.'}
{'en': 'Multilingual Multi-Domain NMT for Indian Languages', 'ar': 'متعدد اللغات متعدد المجالات NMT للغات الهندية', 'es': 'NMT multidominio multilingüe para idiomas indios', 'fr': 'NMT multidomaine multilingue pour les langues indiennes', 'pt': 'NMT multilíngue de vários domínios para idiomas indianos', 'ja': 'インドの言語のための多言語マルチドメインNMT', 'zh': '宜用印度语言多领域 NMT', 'hi': 'भारतीय भाषाओं के लिए बहुभाषी बहु-डोमेन NMT', 'ru': 'Многоязычный многодоменный NMT для индийских языков', 'ga': 'NMT Il-fhearainn Ilteangach do Theangacha Indiacha', 'ka': 'Multilingual Multi- Domain NMT ინდიანეთების ენებისთვის', 'el': 'Πολυγλωσσικός πολυτομέας NMT για ινδικές γλώσσες', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű több domain NMT indiai nyelvekhez', 'kk': 'Үндік тілдер үшін көп тіл- домен NMT', 'it': 'Multilingual Multi-Domain NMT per le lingue indiane', 'lt': 'Multilingual Multi-Domain NMT for Indian Languages', 'mk': 'Мултијазичен Мултидомен НМТ за индиски јазици', 'ml': 'ഇന്ത്യന്\u200d ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പല ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പല- ഡമെന്\u200d NMT', 'mt': 'Multilingwi Multi-Domain NMT għall-Lingwi Indjani', 'mn': 'Энэтхэгийн хэл дээр олон хэлний хэл NMT', 'ms': 'NMT Berberbilang-Domain untuk Bahasa India', 'no': 'Multispråk multidomene NMT for indiske språk', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczny Multi-Domain NMT dla języków indyjskich', 'ro': 'Multilingv Multi-Domain NMT pentru limbi indiene', 'sr': 'Mnogo jezika multidomena NMT za Indijske jezike', 'si': 'ඉන්දියානු භාෂාව සඳහා ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් විශාල- ඩොමේන් NMT', 'so': 'Luqadaha Hindiyadaha', 'sv': 'Multilingual Multi-Domain NMT för indiska språk', 'ta': 'இந்திய மொழிகளுக்கான பல- டொமைன் NMT', 'ur': 'انڈیان زبانوں کے لئے بہت سی زبان دامین NMT', 'uz': 'Hindiston tillari uchun Multi- Domen NMT', 'vi': 'phát ngôn đa miền miền miền Giao cho Ngôn ngữ Ấn Độ', 'bg': 'Многоезична многодомейнна НМТ за индийски езици', 'hr': 'Mnogjezički multidomene NMT za Indijske jezike', 'da': 'Flersproget multi-domæne NMT for indiske sprog', 'nl': 'Meertalige multi-domein NMT voor Indiase talen', 'de': 'Mehrsprachiges Multi-Domain NMT für indische Sprachen', 'ko': '다국어 다국어 NMT', 'id': 'Multilingual Multi-Domain NMT for Indian Languages', 'tr': 'Hindi diller üçin köp diller', 'fa': 'Multilingual Multi Domain NMT برای زبانهای هندی', 'af': 'Multilingual Multidomein NMT vir Indiese Taal', 'sw': 'Lugha nyingi NMT kwa lugha za Kihindi', 'sq': 'NMT shumëgjuhës për gjuhët indiane', 'hy': 'Հնդկական լեզուների բազմալեզու NMT', 'bn': 'ভারতীয় ভাষার জন্য মাল্টিভাষা ডোমেইন NMT', 'am': 'የህንድ ቋንቋዎች', 'ca': 'Multillenguatge multidomínic MT per a llengües indies', 'az': 'Hindistan dillÉ™ri ĂĽĂ§ĂĽn Ă§ox dilli NMT', 'et': 'Mitmekeelne mitmedomeeniline NMT India keeltele', 'cs': 'Vícejazyčný multi-doménový NMT pro indické jazyky', 'fi': 'Monikielinen Multi-Domain NMT Intian kielille', 'bs': 'Mnogjezički multidomeni NMT za Indijske jezike', 'jv': 'Multi-domain NMT kanggo langgambar barang barang', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Večjezični večdomenski NMT za indijske jezike', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་གའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྣ་མང་ཆེ་བ་མཚོན་གྱི་NMT'}
{'en': 'India is known as the land of many tongues and dialects. Neural machine translation (NMT) is the current state-of-the-art approach for machine translation (MT) but performs better only with large datasets which Indian languages usually lack, making this approach infeasible. So, in this paper, we address the problem of data scarcity by efficiently training multilingual and multilingual multi domain NMT systems involving languages of the  . We are proposing the technique for using the joint domain and language tags in a multilingual setup. We draw three major conclusions from our experiments : (i) Training a multilingual system via exploiting lexical similarity based on language family helps in achieving an overall average improvement of. over bilingual baselines, (ii) Technique of incorporating domain information into the language tokens helps multilingual multi-domain system in getting a significant average improvement of     over the baselines, (iii) Multistage fine-tuning further helps in getting an improvement of -. for the language pair of interest.', 'fr': "L'Inde est connue comme la terre de nombreuses langues et dialectes. La traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) est l'approche de pointe actuelle de la traduction automatique (MT), mais elle ne fonctionne mieux qu'avec de grands ensembles de données dont les langues indiennes font généralement défaut, ce qui rend cette approche irréalisable. Ainsi, dans cet article, nous abordons le problème de la rareté des données en formant efficacement des systèmes NMT multidomaines multilingues et multilingues impliquant des langues du. Nous proposons la technique d'utilisation des balises communes de domaine et de langue dans une configuration multilingue. Nous tirons trois conclusions principales de nos expériences\xa0: (i) La formation d'un système multilingue en exploitant la similitude lexicale basée sur la famille de langues aide à atteindre une amélioration moyenne globale de .par rapport aux lignes de base bilingues, (ii) Technique d'intégration des informations de domaine dans les jetons de langue aident le système multidomaine multilingue à obtenir une amélioration moyenne significative de par rapport aux lignes de base, (iii) Le réglage fin en plusieurs étapes aide à obtenir une amélioration de -.pour la paire de langues d'intérêt.", 'ar': 'تُعرف الهند بأنها أرض العديد من الألسنة واللهجات. الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) هي أحدث الأساليب الحالية للترجمة الآلية (MT) ولكنها تعمل بشكل أفضل فقط مع مجموعات البيانات الكبيرة التي تفتقر إليها اللغات الهندية عادة ، مما يجعل هذا النهج غير عملي. لذلك ، في هذه الورقة ، نعالج مشكلة ندرة البيانات من خلال التدريب الفعال لأنظمة NMT متعددة اللغات ومتعددة المجالات التي تتضمن لغات 𝐈𝐧𝐝𝐢𝐚𝐧 𝐬𝐮𝐛𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐭𝐢𝐧𝐞𝐧𝐭. نحن نقترح تقنية استخدام المجال المشترك وعلامات اللغة في إعداد متعدد اللغات. نستخلص ثلاثة استنتاجات رئيسية من تجاربنا: (1) تدريب نظام متعدد اللغات من خلال استغلال التشابه المعجمي القائم على عائلة اللغة يساعد في تحقيق متوسط التحسين العام لـ 𝟑.𝟐𝟓 𝐁𝐋𝐄𝐔 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 على خطوط الأساس ثنائية اللغة ، (2) تقنية دمج معلومات المجال في تساعد الرموز المميزة للغة نظام متعدد اللغات في الحصول على متوسط تحسين كبير لـ 𝟔 𝐁𝐋𝐄𝐔 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 عبر الخطوط الأساسية ، (3) يساعد الضبط الدقيق متعدد المراحل بشكل أكبر في الحصول على تحسين 𝟏-𝟏.𝟓 𝐁𝐋𝐄𝐔 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 للزوج اللغوي ذي الاهتمام .', 'es': 'La India es conocida como la tierra de muchas lenguas y dialectos. La traducción automática neuronal (NMT) es el enfoque actual de vanguardia para la traducción automática (MT), pero solo funciona mejor con grandes conjuntos de datos de los que normalmente carecen los idiomas indios, lo que hace que este enfoque sea inviable. Por lo tanto, en este artículo, abordamos el problema de la escasez de datos mediante la capacitación eficiente de sistemas NMT multidominio multilingües y multilingües que involucran idiomas del. Proponemos la técnica para usar las etiquetas de dominio y idioma conjuntas en una configuración multilingüe. Sacamos tres conclusiones principales de nuestros experimentos: (i) Entrenar un sistema multilingüe mediante la explotación de la similitud léxica basada en la familia lingüística ayuda a lograr una mejora promedio general de .sobre las líneas de base bilingües, (ii) Técnica de incorporación de información de dominio en los tokens de idioma ayudan al sistema multidominio multilingüe a obtener una mejora promedio significativa de sobre las líneas de base, (iii) el ajuste fino multietapa ayuda aún más a obtener una mejora de -.para el par de idiomas de interés.', 'pt': 'A Índia é conhecida como a terra de muitas línguas e dialetos. A tradução automática neural (NMT) é a abordagem atual de última geração para tradução automática (MT), mas funciona melhor apenas com grandes conjuntos de dados que os idiomas indianos geralmente não possuem, tornando essa abordagem inviável. Assim, neste artigo, abordamos o problema da escassez de dados treinando eficientemente sistemas NMT multilíngues e multilíngues envolvendo idiomas do 𝐈𝐧𝐝𝐢𝐚𝐧 𝐬𝐮𝐛𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐭𝐢𝐧𝐞𝐧𝐭. Estamos propondo a técnica para usar o domínio conjunto e as tags de idioma em uma configuração multilíngue. Tiramos três conclusões principais de nossos experimentos: (i) Treinar um sistema multilíngue por meio da exploração da similaridade lexical com base na família linguística ajuda a alcançar uma melhoria média geral de 𝟑.𝟐𝟓 𝐁𝐋𝐄𝐔 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 sobre linhas de base bilíngues, (ii) Técnica de incorporação de informações de domínio em os tokens de idioma ajudam o sistema multi-domínio multilíngue a obter uma melhoria média significativa de 𝟔 𝐁𝐋𝐄𝐔 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 sobre as linhas de base, (iii) O ajuste fino de vários estágios ajuda a obter uma melhoria de 𝟏-𝟏.𝟓 𝐁𝐋𝐄𝐔 𝐬𝟓 𝐢𝐋𝐄𝐔 𝐬𝟓 𝐢𝐋𝐄𝐔 𝐬𝟓 𝐢𝐋𝐄𝐔 𝐬𝟓 𝐢𝐋𝐄𝐔 .', 'zh': '印度称为方言及方言之地。 神经机器翻译(NMT)最先进机器翻译(MT)法,唯印度语言常乏大数集乃善,不可。 故其在本文,训练及印度次大陆语言多言多域NMT系统以决数稀缺。 我们立在多言语设置中用联合和语言标签的技艺。 吾于实验得三要:(i)因言家之词汇相似性以练多言,有助于双语基线均升3.25 BLEU分,(ii)将域息并于言表之术,有助于多言多域系统比基线均6 BLEU分。  (iii) 多微调,益以兴言1-1.5 BLEU。', 'ja': 'インドは多くの舌と方言の国として知られています。 ニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）は、機械翻訳（ MT ）のための現在の最先端のアプローチですが、インドの言語が通常欠いている大きなデータセットでのみより良いパフォーマンスを発揮し、このアプローチを実行不可能にします。 そこで，本稿では，多言語・多言語多領域NMTシステムを効率的に訓練することで，データ不足の問題に対処する。 共同ドメインと言語タグを多言語セットアップで使用するためのテクニックを提案しています。 私たちは、実験から3つの主要な結論を導き出します。（ i ）言語ファミリーに基づいて語彙の類似性を利用して多言語システムをトレーニングすることは、バイリンガルのベースラインを超えて、全体的な平均改善を達成するのに役立ちます。（ ii ）言語トークンにドメイン情報を組み込む技術は、ベースラインを超えて、多言語のマルチドメインシステムが平均改善を大幅に達成するのに役立ちます。（ iii ）多段階の微調整は、関心のある言語ペアのために、さらに改善を達成するのに役立ちます。', 'hi': 'भारत को कई भाषाओं और बोलियों की भूमि के रूप में जाना जाता है। न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) मशीन अनुवाद (एमटी) के लिए वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोण है, लेकिन केवल बड़े डेटासेट के साथ बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है जो भारतीय भाषाओं में आमतौर पर कमी होती है, जिससे यह दृष्टिकोण अव्यवहार्य हो जाता है। इसलिए, इस पत्र में, हम भारतीय उपमहाद्वीप की भाषाओं को शामिल करने वाली बहुभाषी और बहुभाषी बहु-डोमेन एनएमटी प्रणालियों को कुशलतापूर्वक प्रशिक्षित करके डेटा की कमी की समस्या का समाधान करते हैं। हम एक बहुभाषी सेटअप में संयुक्त डोमेन और भाषा टैग का उपयोग करने के लिए तकनीक का प्रस्ताव कर रहे हैं। हम अपने प्रयोगों से तीन प्रमुख निष्कर्ष निकालते हैं: (i) भाषा परिवार के आधार पर लेक्सिकल समानता का शोषण करने के माध्यम से एक बहुभाषी प्रणाली को प्रशिक्षित करने से द्विभाषी बेसलाइन पर 3.25 BLEU बिंदुओं के समग्र औसत सुधार को प्राप्त करने में मदद मिलती है, (ii) भाषा टोकन में डोमेन जानकारी को शामिल करने की तकनीक बेसलाइन पर 6 BLEU अंकों का एक महत्वपूर्ण औसत सुधार प्राप्त करने में बहुभाषी बहु-डोमेन प्रणाली में मदद करती है,  (iii) मल्टीस्टेज फाइन-ट्यूनिंग आगे ब्याज की भाषा जोड़ी के लिए 1-1.5 BLEU अंकों का सुधार प्राप्त करने में मदद करता है।', 'ru': 'Индия известна как страна многих языков и диалектов. Нейронный машинный перевод (NMT) является современным подходом к машинному переводу (MT), но работает лучше только с большими наборами данных, которых обычно не хватает индийским языкам, что делает этот подход невыполнимым. Таким образом, в этой статье мы решаем проблему нехватки данных, эффективно обучая многоязычные и многоязычные многодоменныесистемыНМТ,включающиеязыкиязыка,накоторомговорятлюди. Мы предлагаем технику использования тегов совместного домена и языка в многоязычной настройке. Мы делаем три основных вывода из наших экспериментов: (i) Обучение многоязычной системы посредством использования лексического сходства, основанного на языковой семье, помогает достичь общего среднего улучшения по сравнению с двуязычными базовыми линиями, (ii) Техника включения доменной информации в языковые токены помогает многоязычной многодоменной системе получить значительное среднее улучшение по сравнению с базовыми линиями, (iii) Многоступенчатая тонкая настройка дополнительно помогает получить улучшение по сравнению с языковой парой, представляющей интерес.', 'ga': 'Tugtar tír a lán teangacha agus canúintí ar an India. Is é an t-aistriúchán meaisín néareolaíoch (NMT) an cur chuige úrscothach maidir le haistriúchán meaisín (MT) faoi láthair ach ní fheidhmíonn sé níos fearr ach amháin le tacair shonraí móra nach mbíonn teangacha Indiacha de ghnáth in easnamh orthu, rud a fhágann nach bhfuil an cur chuige seo indéanta. Mar sin, sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le ganntanas sonraí trí chórais NMT ilteangacha agus ilteangacha a oiliúint go héifeachtach a bhaineann le teangacha an 𝐈𝐧𝐝𝐢𝐚𝐧 𝐬𝐮𝐛𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐭𝐢𝐧𝐞𝐧𝐭. Táimid ag moladh an teicníc chun an comhfhearann agus na clibeanna teanga a úsáid i socrú ilteangach. Bainimid trí mhórchonclúid ónár dturgnaimh: (i) Cabhraíonn oiliúint a chur ar chóras ilteangach trí leas a bhaint as cosúlachtaí foclóireachta bunaithe ar theaghlach teanga le meánfheabhsú foriomlán a bhaint amach de 𝟑. Cuidíonn na comharthaí teanga le córas il-fearainn ilteangach chun meánfheabhsú suntasach 𝟔 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐬 .', 'hu': 'Indiát sok nyelv és dialektus földjeként ismerik. A neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) a gépi fordítás (MT) jelenlegi korszerű megközelítése, de csak olyan nagy adatkészletekkel teljesít jobban, amelyek általában hiányoznak az indiai nyelvek, így ez a megközelítés lehetetlen. Ebben a tanulmányban tehát az adathűség problémájával foglalkozunk azzal, hogy hatékonyan képzünk többnyelvű és többnyelvű, több domain NMT rendszereket, amelyek magukban foglalják az indiai szubkontinens nyelveit. Javasoljuk a közös domain és nyelvi címkék többnyelvű beállításban történő használatának technikáját. Kísérleteinkből három fő következtetést vonunk le: (i) Egy többnyelvű rendszer képzése a nyelvcsaládon alapuló lexikális hasonlóság kiaknázásával segít elérni a kétnyelvű alapközpontokhoz képest 3,25 BLEU-pont átlagos javulását, (ii) A domain információk nyelvi tokenekbe történő beépítésének technikája segít a többnyelvű, több domain rendszer számára abban, hogy jelentős átlagosan 6 BLEU ponttal javuljon az alapvető vonalakhoz képest, (iii) A többfokozatú finomhangolás további segítségével 1–1,5 BLEU ponttal javuljon az érdeklődő nyelvpár esetében.', 'el': 'Η Ινδία είναι γνωστή ως η χώρα πολλών γλωσσών και διαλέκτων. Η νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT) είναι η τρέχουσα προσέγγιση τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για τη μηχανική μετάφραση (ΜΤ), αλλά αποδίδει καλύτερα μόνο με μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων τα οποία συνήθως λείπουν στις ινδικές γλώσσες, καθιστώντας αυτή την προσέγγιση αδύνατη. Έτσι, σε αυτή την εργασία, αντιμετωπίζουμε το πρόβλημα της έλλειψης δεδομένων εκπαιδεύοντας αποτελεσματικά πολυγλωσσικά και πολυγλωσσικά συστήματα που περιλαμβάνουν γλώσσες της Ινδικής υποηπείρου. Προτείνουμε την τεχνική για τη χρήση των κοινών ετικετών τομέα και γλώσσας σε μια πολυγλωσσική ρύθμιση. Από τα πειράματά μας εξάγουμε τρία σημαντικά συμπεράσματα: (i) Η εκπαίδευση ενός πολυγλωσσικού συστήματος μέσω της αξιοποίησης της λεξικής ομοιότητας με βάση την γλωσσική οικογένεια βοηθά στην επίτευξη μιας συνολικής μέσης βελτίωσης των 3.25 σημείων σε σχέση με τις δίγλωσσες γραμμές βάσης, (ii) Η τεχνική ενσωμάτωσης πληροφοριών τομέων στα γλωσσικά σήματα βοηθά το πολυγλωσσικό σύστημα πολλαπλών τομέων στην επίτευξη μιας σημαντικής μέσης βελτίωσης των 6 σημείων BLEU πέρα από τις γραμμές βάσης, (iii) Ο πολυστασιακός συντονισμός βοηθά περαιτέρω στη βελτίωση των σημείων 1-1.5 BLEU για το γλωσσικό ζεύγος ενδιαφέροντος.', 'ka': 'ინდოეთის მსოფლიო ენები და დიალექტიების მსოფლიო. ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელება (NMT) არის მიმდინარე მანქანის გაგრძელება (MT) მხოლოდ მხოლოდ დიდი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომლებიც ინდიანეთიური ენების ნამდვილად არსებობ ამიტომ, ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მონაცემების პრობლემების შესახებ ეფექტიურად მრავალენგური და მრავალენგური მრავალენგური სამკონტენტის სისტემი NMT სისტემის შესახებ ინ ჩვენ გვეძლევა ტექნექტიკის გამოყენება ერთადერთი დიომინის და ენის ჭდეების მრავალენგური დასრულებაში. ჩვენ ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტების სამი მნიშვნელოვანი გადაწყვეტილება: i) მრავალენგური სისტემას ექსპლექცია ლექსიკალური განსხვავების გამოყენებით, რომელიც ენის ოჯახის დაბაზედ დახმარებს სამყარო განსხვ ii) დიომინური ინფორმაციის ტექნექცია ენაში მრავალური მრავალური დიომინური სისტემაში დახმარებს 6 BLEU წერტილების განმავლობაში, iii) მრავალური კონფიგურაციის განმავლობაში დახმარებს 1-1.5 BLEU წერტილების გაუკეთებას ენაზე ინტერესტის მრავალურ', 'it': "L'India è conosciuta come la terra di molte lingue e dialetti. La traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) è l'attuale approccio allo stato dell'arte per la traduzione automatica (MT), ma funziona meglio solo con grandi set di dati che le lingue indiane di solito mancano, rendendo questo approccio impossibile. Quindi, in questo articolo, affrontiamo il problema della scarsità di dati attraverso la formazione efficiente di sistemi NMT multilingue e multilingue multidominio che coinvolgono le lingue del subcontinente indiano. Proponiamo la tecnica per utilizzare i tag di dominio e lingua comuni in una configurazione multilingue. I nostri esperimenti traggono tre conclusioni principali: (i) La formazione di un sistema multilingue sfruttando la somiglianza lessicale basata sulla famiglia linguistica aiuta a raggiungere un miglioramento medio complessivo di 3,25 punti BLEU rispetto alle linee di base bilingue, (ii) La tecnica di incorporare le informazioni di dominio nei token linguistici aiuta il sistema multidominio multilingue a ottenere un significativo miglioramento medio di 6 punti BLEU rispetto alle linee di base, (iii) La messa a punto multistadio aiuta ulteriormente a ottenere un miglioramento di 1-1,5 punti BLEU per la coppia linguistica di interesse.", 'kk': 'Үндістан көп тіл мен диалекттердің жері ретінде белгіленген. Нейрондық машинаның аударуы (NMT) компьютердің аударуы (MT) үшін қазіргі күй- жайы, бірақ индиялық тілдерінің кәдімгі үлкен деректер жинақтарымен ғана жақсы жұмыс істейді. Бұл жағдайды Бұл қағазда, мәселелерді көптілік және көптілік тілдерді NMT жүйелерінде индиялық субконтиненттің тілдерін қолдану үшін көптілік және көптілік тілдерді оқыту үшін Біз бірнеше тілді баптауларында біріктірілген домен мен тілді тегтерді қолдану техникасын ұсынамыз. Біз өзіміздің тәжірибемізден үш негізгі шешімізді: i) тіл үйлеріне негізделген лексикалық ұқсастығын қолдану үшін көптілік жүйесін оқыту үшін тіл үйлеріне көмектеседі. Екі тіл негізгі жолдарда 3,25 BLEU ii) Доменнің мәліметін тіл белгілеріне қосу техникасы көп тілді көп доменнің жүйесіне 6 BLEU нүктелерін негізгі сызықтардың орташа жақсартуға көмектеседі, (iii) Көп қадамдастыру үшін 1- 1, 5 BLEU нүктелерін бірнеше қадамдастыру көмектеседі.', 'mk': 'Индија е позната како земја на многу јазици и дијалекти. Neural machine translation (NMT) is the current state-of-the-art approach for machine translation (MT) but performs better only with large datasets which Indian languages usually lack, making this approach infeasible.  Во овој весник, го решаваме проблемот со недостатокот на податоци со ефикасна обука на мултијазични и мултијазични мултијазични НМТ системи кои вклучуваат јазици на индискиот потконтинент. Ја предлагаме техниката за користење на заедничките домени и јазични ознаки во мултијазична поставка. Повлекуваме три главни заклучоци од нашите експерименти: (i) обуката на мултијазичен систем преку искористување на лексикалната сличност базирана на јазичното семејство помага во постигнувањето на целокупно просечно подобрување од 3,25 БЛЕ поени над двојјазичните (ii) Техниката на вклучување на информациите за домените во јазичките точки помага на мултијазичкиот мултидоменички систем во добивањето значително просечно подобрување од 6 БЛЕ поени над базите линии, (iii) Мултифазивното финетизирање понатаму помага во добивањето подобрување од 1 до 1,5 БЛЕ поени за јазичкиот пар', 'lt': 'Indija yra žinoma kaip daugelio kalbų ir dialektų žemė. Neuralinis mašinų vertimas (NMT) yra dabartinis naujausias mašinų vertimo metodas (MT), tačiau geriau veikia tik su dideliais duomenų rinkiniais, kurių paprastai trūksta Indijos kalbų, todėl šis metodas yra užkrečiamas. Taigi šiame dokumente sprendžiame duomenų trūkumo problem ą veiksmingai rengiant daugiakalbes ir daugiakalbes daugiakalbes NMT sistemas, kuriose dalyvauja Indijos pakrantės kalbos. Siūlome metodą, kaip naudoti jungtinį domeną ir kalbos ženklus daugiakalbėje sistemoje. Iš savo eksperimentų mes darome tris pagrindines i švadas: i) daugiakalbės sistemos mokymas naudojant kalbų šeimoje pagrįstą leksikinį panašumą padeda pasiekti bendrą vidutinį 3,25 BLEU taško pagerėjimą, palyginti su dvikalbėmis bazinėmis linijomis, ii) Domeninės informacijos įtraukimo į kalbų simbolius technika padeda daugiakalbei daugiakalbei daugiakalbei sistemai pasiekti reikšmingą vidutinį 6 BLEU taškų pagerėjimą virš bazinių linijų, iii) daugiakaipės patobulinimas toliau padeda pagerinti 1–1,5 BLEU taškų kalbų poros interesams.', 'ms': 'India dikenali sebagai tanah banyak lidah dan dialekt. Neural machine translation (NMT) is the current state-of-the-art approach for machine translation (MT) but performs better only with large datasets which Indian languages usually lack, making this approach infeasible.  Jadi, dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi masalah kekurangan data dengan melatih secara efektif sistem NMT berbilang bahasa dan berbilang domain yang melibatkan bahasa subkontinen India. Kami mencadangkan teknik untuk menggunakan tag domain dan bahasa bersama dalam seting berbilang bahasa. Kami menarik tiga kesimpulan utama dari eksperimen kami: (i) melatih sistem berbilang bahasa melalui mengeksploitasi persamaan leksikal berdasarkan keluarga bahasa membantu mencapai peningkatan rata-rata umum 3.25 titik BLEU atas garis dasar dua bahasa, (ii) Teknik untuk memasukkan maklumat domain ke dalam token bahasa membantu sistem berbilang-domain berbilang bahasa dalam mendapatkan peningkatan rata-rata yang signifikan 6 titik BLEU di atas garis dasar, (iii) Penyesuaian lanjut tahap berbilang membantu mendapatkan peningkatan 1-1.5 titik BLEU untuk pasangan bahasa yang berminat.', 'mt': 'L-Indja hija magħrufa bħala l-art ta’ ħafna ilsna u dijaletti. It-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT) hija l-approċċ attwali l-aktar avvanzat għat-traduzzjoni tal-magni (MT) iżda tagħmel aħjar biss b’settijiet ta’ dejta kbar li normalment jonqsu mill-lingwi Indjani, u dan l-approċċ isir infeżibbli. Għalhekk, f’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw il-problema tal-iskarsezza tad-dejta billi nħarrġu b’mod effiċjenti s-sistemi NMT multilingwi u multilingwi li jinvolvu l-lingwi tas-sottokontinent Indjan. Qed nipproponu t-teknika għall-użu tat-tikketti konġunti tad-dominju u tal-lingwa f’sett multilingwi. Aħna nġibdu tliet konklużjonijiet ewlenin mill-esperimenti tagħna: (i) It-taħriġ ta’ sistema multilingwi permezz tal-isfruttar ta’ similarità lexikali bbażata fuq il-familja tal-lingwi jgħin biex jinkiseb titjib medju globali ta’ 3,25 punt BLEU fuq linji bażi billingwi, (ii) It-teknika tal-inkorporazzjoni tal-informazzjoni tad-dominju fit-tokens tal-lingwi tgħin lis-sistema multilingwi multidomestika biex tikseb titjib medju sinifikanti ta’ 6 punti BLEU fuq il-linji bażi, (iii) L-a ġġustament fin f’diversi stadji jkompli jgħin biex jinkiseb titjib ta’ 1-1.5 punti BLEU għall-par lingwistiku ta’ interess.', 'mn': 'Энэтхэг олон хэл, диалектын орон гэдэг. Цөмийн машин хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) нь машины хөгжүүлэлтийн орчин үеийн урлагийн арга зам юм. Гэхдээ Энэтхэг хэл ихэвчлэн алдагдахгүй том өгөгдлийн сангуудтай илүү сайн ажилладаг. Энэ арга зам нь хамаагүй болгодог. Тэгэхээр энэ цаасан дээр бид олон хэл болон олон хэлний олон хэлний NMT системийг Энэтхэгийн суурь тив холбоотой мэдээллийн хамааралтай асуудлыг эффективно суралцаж өгдөг. Бид олон хэлний сургалтын холбоотой холбоотой, хэлний тегтүүдийг ашиглах техникийг санал болгож байна. Бид өөрсдийн туршилтаас гурван чухал шийдвэр гаргаж ирсэн: i) хэл гэр бүлийн үндсэн хэлний ижил хэлний системийг ашиглан олон хэлний системийг суралцах нь 2 хэлний суурь шугам дээр 3.25 BLEU цэгийн дундаж сайжруулах тулд тусалдаг. ii) Холбооны мэдээллийг хэлний тэмдэгт оруулах техник хэлний олон хэлний олон хэлний тогтолцооны системд суурь шугам дээр 6 BLEU цэгийн дундаж сайжруулахад тусалдаг, (iii) Олон талаар сайжруулах нь хэлний хоёр сонирхолтой 1-1,5 BLEU цэгийг сайжруулахад тусалдаг.', 'no': 'India er kjent som land av mange språk og dialektar. Neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT) er den gjeldande tilnærminga av kunsten for maskinsomsetjing (MT), men utfører berre bedre med store datasett som indiske språk vanlegvis manglar, og gjer denne tilnærminga ikkje tilgjengeleg. I denne papiret vert vi oppretta problemet med data feil ved å utlære fleirspråk og fleirspråk multidomene NMT-systemet som involverer språk i Indiske underkontinentet. Vi foreslår teknikken for å bruka felles domene og språk- taggar i eit fleirspråk oppsett. Vi tegnar tre store konklusjonar frå eksperimentene våre: i) å lære eit fleirspråksystem ved å bruka leksisk similaritet basert på språksfamilien hjelper til å gjennomsnittlig forbetringa av 3,25 BLEU-punkt over bilinguelt baseline, ii) Tehnika for å inkludere domeneinformasjon i språketeken hjelper fleirspråk multidomenesystemet i å få ein signifikant gjennomsnittlig forbedring av 6 BLEU-punkt over baselinjene, (iii) fleirstadig finnstilling hjelper meir til å få forbedring av 1-1,5 BLEU-punkt for språktparen av interesse.', 'pl': 'Indie są znane jako kraina wielu języków i dialektów. Neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe (NMT) jest obecnym najnowocześniejszym podejściem do tłumaczenia maszynowego (MT), ale działa lepiej tylko w przypadku dużych zbiorów danych, których języki indyjskie zwykle brakuje, co czyni to podejście niemożliwe do wykonania. W niniejszym artykule zajmujemy się zatem problemem niedoboru danych poprzez efektywne szkolenie wielojęzycznych i wielojęzycznych systemów NMT z udziałem języków subkontynentu indyjskiego. Proponujemy technikę stosowania wspólnych tagów domeny i języka w konfiguracji wielojęzycznej. Z naszych eksperymentów wyciągamy trzy główne wnioski: (i) Szkolenie systemu wielojęzycznego poprzez wykorzystanie podobieństwa leksykalnego opartego na rodzinie języków pomaga osiągnąć ogólną średnią poprawę punktów 3.25 BLEU w stosunku do dwujęzycznych linii bazowych, (ii) Technika włączania informacji o domenie do tokenów językowych pomaga wielojęzycznemu systemowi wielojęzycznemu w uzyskaniu znaczącej średniej poprawy 6-punktów BLEU nad liniami bazowymi, (iii) Wielostopniowe dostrajanie dodatkowo pomaga w uzyskaniu poprawy punktów 1-1.5 BLEU dla pary językowej zainteresowania.', 'ro': 'India este cunoscută ca țara multor limbi și dialecte. Traducerea automată neurală (NMT) este abordarea actuală de ultimă generație pentru traducerea automată (MT), dar performează mai bine numai cu seturi mari de date pe care limbile indiene le lipsesc de obicei, făcând această abordare imposibilă. Deci, în această lucrare, abordăm problema deficitului de date prin instruirea eficientă a sistemelor multilingve și multilingve multidomenii NMT care implică limbi din subcontinentul indian. Propunem tehnica de utilizare a etichetelor de domeniu și limbă comune într-o configurație multilingvă. Tragem trei concluzii majore din experimentele noastre: (i) Formarea unui sistem multilingv prin exploatarea similitudinii lexicale bazate pe familia lingvistică ajută la obținerea unei îmbunătățiri medii globale de 3,25 puncte BLEU față de liniile de bază bilingve, (ii) Tehnica de încorporare a informațiilor de domeniu în jetoanele lingvistice ajută sistemul multilingv multidomeniu să obțină o îmbunătățire medie semnificativă de 6 puncte BLEU față de liniile de referință, (iii) ajustarea fină în mai multe etape ajută în obținerea unei îmbunătățiri de 1-1,5 puncte BLEU pentru perechea lingvistică de interes.', 'sr': 'Indija je poznata kao zemlja mnogih jezika i dijalekata. Neuralni prevod mašine (NMT) je trenutni pristup umetnosti za prevod mašine (MT), ali radi bolje samo sa velikim podacima koje indijski jezici obično nedostaju, čineći taj pristup neprijateljivim. Dakle, u ovom papiru, riješimo problem nedostatka podataka efikasno obučavanjem multijezičkih i multijezičkih multijezičkih sustava NMT-a uključujući jezike Indijskog podkontinenta. Predlažemo tehniku za upotrebu zajedničkih domena i jezičkih znakova u multijezičkom setu. Napravili smo tri velika zaključka iz naših eksperimenata: i) obučavanje multijezičkog sistema koristeći leksičku sličnost na osnovu jezičke porodice pomaže u ostvarivanju ukupnog prosječnog poboljšanja 3,25 BLEU bodova na dvojezičkim osnovnim linijama, ii) Tehnika uključenja informacija o domenu u znakove jezika pomaže multijezičkom multidomenalnom sistemu u dobivanju značajnog prosječnog poboljšanja 6 BLEU bodova na osnovnim linijama, (iii) Višestadijskog finaliziranja dalje pomaže u poboljšanju 1-1,5 BLEU bodova za jezički par interesa.', 'si': 'ඉන්දියාව බොහොම භාෂාවක් සහ ඩායාලක්ට් වලින් දන්නවා. න්\u200dයුරාල් මැෂින් භාෂාව (NMT) තමයි මැෂින් භාෂාව (MT) සඳහා ප්\u200dරස්තූත ස්ථානය- of- the- art approach (state- of- art) නමුත් විශාල දත්ත සැට්  ඉතින්, මේ පත්තරේ අපි දත්ත අවශ්\u200dයයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ඉන්දියානු භාෂාව සම්පුර්ණ භාෂාවක් සහ බොහොම භාෂාවක් වගේ භා අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා විශාල භාෂාවක් සැකසුම් වලට සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ භාෂාවක් ටැග් භාවිතා කරන අපි අපේ පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතියක් තුනක් ගන්නවා: (i) භාෂාව පවුලේ අධාරිත ලෙක්සිකල් සාමාන්\u200dයතාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා භාෂාව පවුලේ අධා (i) භාෂාව ටොකන්ස් වලට ඩොමේන් තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණයේ තාක්ෂණය බොහොම භාෂාවක් බොහොම භාෂාවක් පද්ධතියට උදව් කරන්න බොහොම භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 6 BLUE', 'ml': 'ഇന്ത്യയെ പല ഭാഷകളുടെയും ചരിത്രത്തിന്റെയും ഭൂമിയാണ് അറിയപ്പെടുന്നത്. ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (NMT) ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സ്ഥാനം- of- the- art approach (MT) എന്നാല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റേറ്റുകള്\u200d മാത്രമ അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഡേറ്റാവിന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. പല ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും പല ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും മ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയില്\u200d സഹജമായ ഡൊമെയിനും ഭാഷയുടെ ടാഗുകളും ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രാദേശിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്ന് മൂന്ന് പ്രധാനപരിഹാസങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്ന് വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നു: (i) ഭാഷ കുടുംബത്തെ ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d  (ii) ഭാഷയിലേക്ക് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ടെക്നിക്കിക്കൂ', 'so': 'India waxaa loo yaqaan dhulka luuqado badan iyo luuqado kala duwan. Turjumista neural machine (NMT) is the current state-of-the-art approach for machine translation (MT) but does better with better data sets which normally lack of Indian language, making this approach infeable. Marka warqaddan, waxaynu ka sheekaynaynaa dhibaatada khatar ah ee macluumaadka, si faa’iido ah ayaannu u tababarinnaa nidaamka afka kala duduwan iyo habaarka kala duduwan ee NMT ee ku saabsan luqadaha barashada hindi. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa teknikada lagu isticmaalayo guriga wadajirka ah iyo alaabta luqada ee ku qoran xarunta luuqadaha kala duduwan. Saddex dhamaadyo oo muhiim ah ayaan ka soo qaadannaa imtixaankayada: (i) Waxbarashada nidaamka luuqadaha kala duduwan iyo isticmaalka isku mid ahaanshaha lexicka ee qoyska luuqada ku saleysan ayaa caawiya in uu gaadho kororsiinta ugu dhexeeya 3.25 BLEU barta labada luqadood, (ii) Techniqka macluumaadka domain ee calaamadaha luuqada ah waxaa caawinaya in uu helo hagaajinta hababka badan oo kala duduwan 6 BLEU oo ku qoran saldhigyada hoose, (iii) sawirada farsamada badan ayaa ka caawinaya horumarinta barwaaqada 1-1.5 BLEU labada xiisaha ah ee luqada.', 'sv': 'Indien är känt som landet för många språk och dialekter. Neural maskinöversättning (NMT) är den nuvarande toppmoderna metoden för maskinöversättning (MT) men presterar bättre endast med stora datamängder som indiska språk vanligtvis saknar, vilket gör detta tillvägagångssätt omöjligt. Så, i denna uppsats, tar vi upp problemet med databrist genom att effektivt utbilda flerspråkiga och flerspråkiga multidomän NMT-system som involverar språk i den indiska subkontinenten. Vi föreslår tekniken för att använda gemensamma domän- och språktaggar i en flerspråkig konfiguration. Vi drar tre viktiga slutsatser av våra experiment: (i) Att utbilda ett flerspråkigt system genom att utnyttja lexikal likhet baserad på språkfamilj hjälper till att uppnå en övergripande genomsnittlig förbättring på 3,25 BLEU-poäng jämfört med tvåspråkiga baslinjer, (ii) Tekniken för att införliva domäninformation i språktokens hjälper flerspråkiga flerdomänsystem att få en betydande genomsnittlig förbättring på 6 BLEU-poäng jämfört med baslinjerna, (iii) Flerstegs finjustering bidrar ytterligare till att få en förbättring på 1–1,5 BLEU-poäng för det språkpar som intresserar sig.', 'ta': 'இந்தியாவுக்கு பல மொழிகள் மற்றும் இலக்கங்களின் நாடு என்று தெரியப்படுகிறது. கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான தற்போதைய நிலை- of- the- art approach (MT) ஆனால் இந்திய மொழிகள் வழக்கமாக க குறைந்த பெரிய தகவல் அமைப்புகளுடன் மட்டும் செயல்படும், இந் எனவே, இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தரவு பயிற்சியின் பிரச்சனையை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கிறோம் பல மொழிகள் மற்றும் பல மொழிகள் NMT முறைமைகள் இந்திய துணை கண் நாங்கள் ஒரு பல மொழி அமைப்பில் இணைய தளம் மற்றும் மொழி ஒட்டுகளை பயன்படுத்த தொழில்நுட்பம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். நாம் எங்கள் சோதனைகளிலிருந்து மூன்று முக்கிய முடிவுகளை வரைகிறோம்: (i) மொழி குடும்பத்தை உபயோகித்து ஒரு பல மொழி முறைமையை பயிற்சி மூலம் பயிற்சி செய்து மொ (ii) களம் தகவலை மொழி குறியீடுகளில் சேர்க்கும் தொழில்நுட்பம் பல மொழிக்கு- களம் முறைமையில் 6 பிலியு புள்ளிகளை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு உதவுகிறது. அடிப்படைகளில் உள்ள 6 பிலியு புள்ளிகள் மேலும் சரியான மு', 'ur': 'انڈیا بہت سی زبانوں اور دیالکتوں کے ملک کا نام ہے۔ نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) ماشین ترجمہ (MT) کے لئے موجود state-of-the-art approach ہے لیکن صرف بڑے ڈاٹ سٹ کے ساتھ بہتر عمل کرتا ہے جسے انڈی زبانیں معمولاً کمی کرتے ہیں، اس طرح اس طرح غیر قابل ہو سکتے ہیں۔ تو ہم اس کاغذ میں ڈیٹا کمزوری کے مسئلہ کو اثبات کے ذریعے مطابق بہت سی زبان اور بہت سی زبان ڈیمین NMT سیستم کی آموزش کے ذریعے جوڑ رہے ہیں۔ ہم ایک بہت سی زبان تنظیم میں جوڑ ڈومین اور زبان ٹاگ کے استعمال کرنے کے لئے تکنیک پیشنهاد کر رہے ہیں. ہم نے اپنی تجربات سے تین اہل نتیجے ڈال دیں: (i) زبان خاندان پر بنیاد لکھنے کے ذریعہ ایک بہت سی زبان سیستم کی تعلیم کرنا مدد کرتا ہے کہ 3.25 بلیوس پوینٹوں کی عمومی عمومی improvement کو دو زبان بنیاد لینوں پر، (ii) ڈومین معلومات کو زبان کے ٹوکنوں میں شامل کرنے کی تکنیک مدد کرتی ہے کہ بوسیل لینوں پر 6 BLEU پوینٹوں کی عمدہ عمدہ ترقی حاصل کرتی ہے اور (iii) بہت سی سٹیج فین ترکینگ کا اضافہ کرتا ہے کہ 1-1.5 BLEU پوینٹوں کی ترقی حاصل کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Hindiston ko'p tillar va dialeklar soni deb nomlanadi. Name Hullas, bu qogʻozda, biz Hindiston subcontinent tillarining tillari bilan ko'plab tillar va bir necha tillar NMT tizimini ishlatishda juda foydalanamiz. Biz bir necha tillar tugmasini bir necha tilda bir bir nechta qo'shilgan domen va tillar taglarini ishlatish uchun teknologiya talab qilamiz. Biz tajribaларимиздан uchta muhim murakkablarini chiqaramiz: (i) tillar oilasi asosida o'rganish uchun bir necha tillar tizimni o'rganish va o'z tilning oilasini o'rganish orqali o'zgarishga yordam beradi 3.25 BLEU o'zgarishni ikki tillar asosida o'zgarishga yordam beradi, (ii) Domen maʼlumotini tillar belgilariga kiritish teknologiya bir nechta domen tizimi asosidagi 6 BLEU notlarini ajratish mumkin (iii) Bir necha darajada ajratish imkoniyatini qo'shish uchun 1- 1. 5 BLEU notlarini yaxshi ko'payadi.", 'vi': 'Ấn Độ là vùng đất của nhiều ngôn ngữ và thổ ngữ. Dịch về máy thần kinh (NMB) là phương pháp hiện đại nhất của kỹ thuật dịch vụ máy (MTV) nhưng chỉ làm tốt hơn với các bộ dữ liệu lớn mà ngôn ngữ Ấn Độ thường thiếu, khiến phương pháp này không thể thực hiện được. Vậy, trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta giải quyết vấn đề về sự khan hiếm dữ liệu bằng cách huấn luyện hiệu quả các hệ thống NMT đa dạng và đa miền nhiều loại, liên quan đến ngôn ngữ của Ấn Độ. Chúng tôi đề xuất kỹ thuật sử dụng các thẻ miền và ngôn ngữ chung trong một thiết lập đa dạng. Chúng tôi rút ra ba kết quả quan trọng từ thí nghiệm: i) Đào tạo một hệ thống đa dạng nhờ khai thác nét văn học dựa trên gia đình ngôn ngữ giúp đạt được một đi ểm tối đa trên nền tảng hai thứ, Một kỹ thuật để nhập thông tin miền vào các thẻ ngôn ngữ giúp cho hệ thống đa miền đại loại có khả năng đạt được một sự cải thiện trung bình đáng kể của sáu nguyên tắc trên đường cơ bản, và một kỹ thuật đa giai đoạn giúp cải thiện các điểm 1-1.1.5 của nguyên tắc hợp lệ cho các cặp ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Индия е известна като земята на много езици и диалекти. Невровият машинен превод (НМТ) е съвременният подход за машинен превод (МТ), но се представя по-добре само с големи набори от данни, които индийските езици обикновено нямат, което прави този подход невъзможен. Така че, в тази статия, ние разглеждаме проблема с недостига на данни чрез ефективно обучение на многоезични и многоезични многодомейни НМТ системи, включващи езици на индийския субконтинент. Предлагаме техниката за използване на съвместните домейни и езикови тагове в многоезична настройка. Извършваме три основни заключения от нашите експерименти: (и) Обучението на многоезична система чрез използване на лексикална прилика въз основа на езиково семейство помага за постигането на общо средно подобрение от 3,25 точки спрямо двуезичните базови линии, Техниката за включване на информация за домейна в езиковите токени помага на многоезичната многодомейнна система за постигане на значително средно подобрение от 6 точки спрямо базовите линии, многоетапното фино настройване допълнително помага за получаване на подобрение от 1-1,5 точки за езиковата двойка, която представлява интерес.', 'hr': 'Indija je poznata kao zemlja mnogih jezika i dijalekata. Neuralni prevod strojeva (NMT) je trenutni pristup umjetnosti za prevod strojeva (MT), ali čini bolje samo sa velikim podacima koje indijski jezici obično nedostaju, čineći taj pristup neprihvatljivim. Dakle, u ovom papiru rješavamo problem nedostatka podataka učinkovito obučavanjem multijezičkih i multijezičkih multijezičkih sustava NMT-a uključujući jezike Indijskog podkontinenta. Predlažemo tehniku za upotrebu zajedničkih domena i jezičkih znakova u multijezičkom setu. Nacrtajemo tri velika zaključka iz naših eksperimenata: i) obučavanje multijezičkog sustava koristeći leksičku sličnost na temelju jezičke obitelji pomaže u postizanju ukupnog prosječnog poboljšanja 3,25 BLEU bodova na dvojezičkim početnim linijama, ii) Tehnika uključenja informacija o domenu u znakove jezika pomaže multijezičkom multidomenalnom sustavu u dobivanju značajnog prosječnog poboljšanja 6 BLEU bodova na početnim linijama, (iii) Višestadijskog finaliziranja daljnje pomaže u poboljšanju 1-1,5 BLEU bodova za jezički par interesa.', 'da': 'Indien er kendt som landet for mange sprog og dialekter. Neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) er den aktuelle state-of-the-art tilgang til maskinoversættelse (MT), men fungerer kun bedre med store datasæt, som indiske sprog normalt mangler, hvilket gør denne tilgang umulig. Så i denne artikel behandler vi problemet med dataknaphed ved effektivt at træne flersprogede og flersprogede NMT-systemer, der involverer sprog i det indiske subkontinent. Vi foreslår teknikken til brug af fælles domæne- og sprogmærker i en flersproget opsætning. Vi drager tre vigtige konklusioner af vores eksperimenter: (i) Uddannelse af et flersproget system ved at udnytte leksikalsk lighed baseret på sprogfamilie hjælper med at opnå en samlet gennemsnitlig forbedring på 3,25 BLEU-point i forhold til tosprogede basislinjer, (ii) Teknikken til at indarbejde domæneoplysninger i sprogtokens hjælper flersprogede flerdomænesystem med at opnå en betydelig gennemsnitlig forbedring på 6 BLEU-point i forhold til basislinjerne, (iii) Multitrins finjustering hjælper yderligere med at opnå en forbedring på 1-1,5 BLEU-point for det sprogpar, der er interesseret i.', 'nl': 'India staat bekend als het land van vele talen en dialecten. Neural machine translation (NMT) is de huidige state-of-the-art benadering voor machinevertaling (MT), maar presteert alleen beter met grote datasets die Indiase talen meestal missen, waardoor deze aanpak onmogelijk is. In dit artikel pakken we het probleem van dataschaarste aan door efficiënt meertalige en meertalige multidomein NMT-systemen te trainen waarbij talen van het Indiase subcontinent betrokken zijn. We stellen de techniek voor om de gezamenlijke domein- en taaltags in een meertalige opstelling te gebruiken. We trekken drie belangrijke conclusies uit onze experimenten: (i) Het trainen van een meertalig systeem door gebruik te maken van lexicale gelijkenis op basis van taalfamilie helpt bij het bereiken van een algemene gemiddelde verbetering van 3.25 BLEU punten ten opzichte van tweetalige basislijnen, (ii) Techniek van het opnemen van domeininformatie in de taaltokens helpt meertalig multi-domein systeem bij het verkrijgen van een significante gemiddelde verbetering van 6 BLEU punten boven de basislijnen, (iii) Meerfasige fine-tuning helpt verder bij het verkrijgen van een verbetering van 1-1.5 BLEU punten voor het taalpaar van belang.', 'id': 'India dikenal sebagai tanah banyak bahasa dan dialekt. Terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) adalah pendekatan modern-state-of-the-art untuk terjemahan mesin (MT) tetapi berhasil lebih baik hanya dengan set data besar yang biasanya kekurangan bahasa India, membuat pendekatan ini tidak dapat disembunyikan. Jadi, di kertas ini, kita mengatasi masalah kekurangan data dengan secara efisien melatih sistem NMT multibahasa dan multibahasa yang melibatkan bahasa dari subkontinen India. Kami mengusulkan teknik untuk menggunakan domain dan tag bahasa bersama dalam setup multibahasa. Kami menarik tiga kesimpulan utama dari eksperimen kami: (i) melatih sistem berbilang bahasa melalui eksploitasi persamaan lexik berdasarkan keluarga bahasa membantu mencapai keseluruhan peningkatan rata-rata 3,25 poin BLEU atas garis dasar dua bahasa,  (ii) Technique of incorporating domain information into the language tokens helps multilingual multi-domain system in getting a significant average improvement of 6 BLEU points over the baselines, (iii) Multistage fine-tuning further helps in getting an improvement of 1-1.5 BLEU points for the language pair of interest.', 'ko': '인도는 다양한 언어와 사투리로 유명하다.신경기계번역(NMT)은 현재 가장 선진적인 기계번역(MT) 방법이지만 인도 언어가 통상적으로 부족한 대형 데이터 집합에서만 더 잘 표현되기 때문에 이런 방법은 불가능하다.따라서 본고에서 우리는 인도차대륙 언어와 관련된 다언어와 다언어 다역 NMT 시스템을 효과적으로 교육함으로써 데이터의 희소성을 해결한다.우리는 다중 언어 설정에서 연합역과 언어 표기를 사용하는 기술을 제시했다.우리는 실험에서 세 가지 주요 결론을 얻었다. (i) 어족의 어휘 유사성을 바탕으로 한 다언어 시스템을 훈련함으로써 이중 언어 기선보다 평균 3.25개의 BLEU점을 높이는 데 도움이 된다.(ii) 도메인 정보를 언어 표기에 통합하는 기술은 다중 언어 다중 도메인 시스템이 기선에서 6개의 BLEU 포인트의 현저한 평균 개선을 얻는 데 도움이 되고, (iii) 다중 마이크로스피커는 관심 있는 언어 쌍에서 1-1.5개의 BLEU 포인트를 개선하는 데 도움이 된다.', 'de': 'Indien ist bekannt als das Land vieler Sprachen und Dialekte. Neurale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) ist der aktuelle State-of-the-Art Ansatz für maschinelle Übersetzung (MT), schneidet aber nur mit großen Datensätzen besser ab, die in indischen Sprachen normalerweise fehlen. In diesem Beitrag behandeln wir das Problem der Datenknappheit, indem wir mehrsprachige und mehrsprachige Multidomain-NMT-Systeme effizient trainieren, die Sprachen des indischen Subkontinents einbeziehen. Wir schlagen die Technik vor, die gemeinsamen Domain- und Sprachtags in einem mehrsprachigen Setup zu verwenden. Wir ziehen drei wichtige Schlussfolgerungen aus unseren Experimenten: (i) Die Ausbildung eines mehrsprachigen Systems durch Nutzung der lexikalischen Ähnlichkeit basierend auf der Sprachfamilie hilft, eine allgemeine durchschnittliche Verbesserung von 3.25 BLEU Punkten gegenüber zweisprachigen Basislinien zu erreichen. (ii) Die Technik der Integration von Domäneninformationen in die Sprachtoken hilft mehrsprachigem Mehrdomänensystem, eine signifikante durchschnittliche Verbesserung von 6 BLEU-Punkten über die Basislinien zu erzielen, (iii) Mehrstufige Feinabstimmung hilft weiter, eine Verbesserung von 1-1.5 BLEU-Punkten für das Sprachpaar von Interesse zu erzielen.', 'fa': 'هند به عنوان زمین بسیاری از زبانها و دیالکت شناخته می شود. ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) روش فعلی هنری برای ترجمه ماشین (MT) است ولی تنها با مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای بزرگ انجام می\u200cدهد که زبان هندی معمولاً کم است و این روش را ناتوان می\u200cکند. بنابراین، در این کاغذ، ما مشکل کمبود داده\u200cها را با آموزش بسیاری از زبان\u200cهای متعدد زبان و متعدد زبان\u200cهای NMT با زبان\u200cهای زیر قاره هند حل می\u200cکنیم. ما فناوری را برای استفاده از نقاشی\u200cهای ملحق و زبان در یک تنظیم بسیاری زبان پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. ما سه نتیجه بزرگ از آزمایشات خودمان را می\u200cکشیم: i) آموزش یک سیستم متعدد زبان با استفاده از شباهت زبانی بر اساس خانواده زبان کمک می\u200cکند تا به رسیدن یک بهترین متوسط عمومی از 3.25 نقطه\u200cهای BLEU بر اساس پایین دو زبان، (ii) تکنیکی از شامل اطلاعات دامنی در نشانه\u200cهای زبان به سیستم چندین دامنی\u200cهای زبان کمک می\u200cکند تا بهترین متوسط 6 نقطه\u200cهای BLEU بر پایه\u200cخط\u200cهای بنیادی داشته باشد, (iii) تنظیم چندین مرحله\u200cای بیشتر به بهترین کردن نقطه\u200cهای ۱-۱.۵ BLEU برای جفت سود زبان کمک می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'India inajulikana kama nchi ya lugha nyingi na lugha. Tafsiri ya mashine ya asili (NMT) ni njia ya sasa ya sanaa kwa ajili ya kutafsiri mashine (MT) lakini inafanya vizuri zaidi kwa kutumia takwimu kubwa ambazo lugha za Kihindi mara nyingi hukosa, na kuzifanya mbinu hii isiyo na mashambulizi. Kwa hiyo, katika gazeti hili, tunazungumzia tatizo la ukosefu wa taarifa kwa mafunzo ya ufanisi katika mfumo wa aina mbalimbali na lugha mbalimbali unaohusisha lugha za bara la India. Tunapendekeza teknolojia kwa kutumia viungo vya pamoja na viungo vya lugha katika mfumo wa lugha mbalimbali. Tunajaribu matokeo makubwa matatu kutoka majaribio yetu: (i) Kufundisha mfumo wa lugha nyingi kwa kutumia usawa wa watu wa lugha kwa kutumia familia za lugha zinasaidia kupata maendeleo ya wastani wa kiwango cha jumla ya pointi 3.25 BLEU juu ya misingi ya lugha mbili, (ii) Teknolojia ya kuingiza taarifa za ndani katika alama za lugha zinasaidia mfumo wa lugha mbalimbali kupata maendeleo makubwa ya kiwango cha wastani wa pointi 6 BLEU kwenye misingi ya msingi, (iii) mafunzo ya viwanja vingine yanasaidia kupata maendeleo ya pointi 1-1.5 BLEU kwa ajili ya lugha mbili za maslahi.', 'tr': 'Hindistan köp diller we dialektler bolup tanalýar. NMT öwrülen enjamlar maşynyň terjimesi (NMT) maşynyň terjimesi üçin häzirki möhüm taýýarlanan ýagdaýdyr, ýöne Hindistan dilleriniň adatça ýok bolan uly terjimeleri bilen gowy edip bilýär. Bu ýagdaýy çykarmaz. Şonuň üçin bu kagyzda, biz esasy maglumatlaryň ýeterlikli hasaplamasynda, Hindistan alt kontinentinde bolan multidil we multidil multi domenaly NMT sistemalarynda çykyp barýarys. Biz multi dil düzümlerinde birleşik domena we dil täglerini ulanmak üçin tekniki tekniýe tekniýe tekniýe berýäris. Biz öz deneylerimizden üç esasy çözüm çykýarys: (i) bir köp dil sistemasyny dil maşgalasyna daýan ýan bir şekilde çykyp bilim sistemasyny 3.25 BLEU bilim üssüňleriniň orta çözümlerini ýetirmekde kömek edýäris, (ii) Diller içine domena maglumatlaryny birleşdirmek tekniki çoklu diller çoklu-domeny sistemasyna 6 BLEU puçlaryň orta düzeltmegine kömek edip otyr, (iii) Çoklu-stadijler düzeltmegine kömek edip 1-1.5 BLEU gyzyklanmagy üçin kömekleyär.', 'af': "Indië is bekend as die land van baie tale en dialekte. Neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) is die huidige staat- of- die- kunstenaar toegang vir masjien vertaling (MT) maar doen beter slegs met groot datastelle wat indiese tale gewoonlik ontbreek het, maak hierdie toegang onbeskikbaar. So, in hierdie papier, besluit ons die probleem van data skuilheid deur effektief multilingwe en multilingwe multi domein NMT stelsels te onderwerp met tale van die Indiese subkontinent. Ons voorstel die tekniks vir gebruik van die gemeenskappe domein en taal etikette in 'n veelvuldige opstelling. Ons trek drie hoofde konklusies van ons eksperimente: i) Onderoefening van 'n veelvuldige tale stelsel deur die uitbreiding van leksiese gelykenis gebaseer op taal familie hulp om 'n hele gemiddelde verbetering van 3.25 BLEU punte te te doen oor twee tale basisline, (ii) Tehnikasie van die inkorporering van domein inligting in die taal tokens helper veelvuldige multi-domein stelsel in die kry van 'n betekende gemiddelde verbetering van 6 BLES punte oor die basisline, (iii) veelvuldige fyn-tuning verdere hulp om 'n verbetering van 1-1.5 BLEU punte te te kry vir die taal paar belang.", 'am': 'ህንድ በብዙ ቋንቋዎችና ቋንቋዎች መሬት የታወቀ ነው፡፡ የኔural machine translation (NMT) is the current state-of-the-art approach for machine translation (MT) but does better than that with large data sets which Indian language usually lacks, makes this approach infected. ስለዚህ በዚህ ካላት፣ የዳታ ድካም ጉዳይ ላይ የህንድ አፍሪካን ቋንቋ እና በብዛት ቋንቋ እና በብዙ ቋንቋ የሚናገረውን የአንድራዊ አፍሪካን ቋንቋ እናስጠይቃለን፡፡ We are proposing the technique for using the joint domain and language tags in a multilingual setup.  በቋንቋ ቤተሰብ ላይ በመጠቀም የቋንቋ ቤተሰቦችን በመጠቀም በብዙ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሲስተማርን የ3.25 ቢልዩን ጥናት በሁለት ቋንቋዎች መሠረት በመጠቀም ይረዳል፡፡ የዶሜን መረጃዎች ወደ ቋንቋ ምልክቶች ውስጥ ለማግባት የስህተት ግንኙነት በብዙ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ-ዶሜን ሲስተካከል የ6 ቢልዩን ክፍሎች በመደገፊያው ማድረግ ይረዳል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հնդկաստանը հայտնի է որպես շատ լեզուների և դիալեկտների երկիր: Neural machine translation (NMT) is the current state-of-the-art approach for machine translation (MT) but performs better only with large datasets which Indian languages usually lack, making this approach infeasible.  Այսպիսով, այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք տվյալների բացակայության խնդիրը՝ արդյունավետ ուսուցանելով բազլեզու և բազլեզու բազլեզու բնագավառների NMT համակարգերը, որոնք ներառում են հնդկական ենթամայրցամաքի լեզուներ: Մենք առաջարկում ենք միջոցներ, որոնց միջոցով օգտագործվում են միավոր բնագավառը և լեզվի թեգերը բազլեզու կառուցվածքում: Մենք մեր փորձարկումներից երեք կարևոր եզրակացություն ենք հանում. i) բազլեզու համակարգի ուսուցանումը լեքսիկ ընտանիքի հիմնված լեքսիկական նմանությունների օգտագործման միջոցով օգնում է հասնել ընդհանուր ընդհանուր բարելավման 3.25 բԼԵՎ-ի կետերի միջին (i) Դոմենտային ինֆորմացիայի ներառման տեխնիկան լեզվային նշանների մեջ օգնում է բազլեզու բազլեզու տիեզերքի համակարգին ստանալ հիմնական գծերի ընթացքում 6 բԼԵՎ միավորի նշանակալի միջին բարելավումը, (i) Բազբեզերական բարելավումը ավելի շատ օգնում է ստանալ 1-1,5 բԼԵՎ միավորի բարել', 'az': 'Hindistan çox dillərin və dialektlərin ölkəsi kimi tanınır. NMT maşın çeviri maşın çeviri üçün hazırkı məlumat tərzidir, amma Hindistan dillərinin çox böyük veri qurğuları ilə daha yaxşı işlər edir ki, bu tərzidi çox çətinliklə dəyişməz. Beləliklə, bu kağızda, Hindistan alt-kontinentinin dilləri ilə birlikdə çoxlu dil və çoxlu dilli NMT sistemlərini təhsil etmək üçün məlumatların zəif problemlərini çəkirik. Biz çoxlu dil ayarlarında birləşdirilmiş domena və dil etiketlərini istifadə etmək üçün tekniki təklif edirik. Biz təcrübələrimizdən üç böyük bir sonuç çəkirik: i) dil ailəsi ilə təcrübə edib dil sistemini iki dil baselinin üstündə 3.25 BLEU nöqtələrinin ortalama düzəltməsinə kömək edir. ii) Domenin məlumatlarını dil işaretlərinə qovuşdurmaq tekniki çoxlu dil çoxlu domenin sisteminə kömək edir ki, baz çətinlərin üstündə 6 BLEU noktalarının ortalama düzəltməsinə kömək edir, (iii) Daha çoxlu fərqli düzəltmə daha da 1-1.5 BLEU nöqtələrini dil çift interesi üçün daha yaxşılaşdırmağa kömək edir.', 'bn': 'ভারত অনেক ভাষা এবং ভাষার ভাষা হিসেবে পরিচিত। নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) হচ্ছে মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য বর্তমান রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের প্রতিক্রিয়া (এমটি) কিন্তু শুধুমাত্র বড় ডাটাসেটে তাই এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ভারতীয় সাবমহাদেশের ভাষায় ভাষায় কার্যকর ভাষায় বহুভাষী এবং বহুভাষার মাল্টিভাষা এমটি সিস্টেমের মাধ্যমে তথ্ আমরা এই প্রযুক্তিটি প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে যুক্ত ডোমেইন এবং ভাষা ট্যাগ ব্যবহার করার জন্য। আমরা আমাদের পরীক্ষা থেকে তিনটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সমাপ্তি তুলে ধরি: (i) ভাষার পরিবারের ভিত্তিতে লেক্সিক্যাল সমতা ব্যবহারের মাধ্যমে একটি মাল্টিভাষার ব্যবস্থা প্রশি (২) ভাষায় ডোমেইন তথ্য যোগাযোগ করার প্রযুক্তির প্রযুক্তি মাল্টিভাষায় বহুভাষী ডোমেইন সিস্টেমের মাধ্যমে ৬ বিলিউ পয়েন্টের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি পেতে সাহায্য করে (৩) মাল্টিমেজের ভা', 'bs': 'Indija se poznaje kao zemlja mnogih jezika i dijalekata. Neuralni prevod mašine (NMT) je trenutni pristup umetnosti za prevod mašine (MT), ali čini bolje samo sa velikim podacima koje indijski jezici obično nedostaju, čineći taj pristup neprijateljivim. Dakle, u ovom papiru, riješimo problem nedostatka podataka efikasno obučavanjem multijezičkih i multijezičkih multijezičkih sustava NMT-a uključujući jezike Indijskog podkontinenta. Predlažemo tehniku za upotrebu zajedničkih domena i jezičkih znakova u multijezičkom setu. Nacrtajemo tri velika zaključka iz naših eksperimenata: i) obučavanje multijezičkog sistema preko iskorištavanja leksičke sličnosti na temelju jezičke porodice pomaže u ostvarivanju ukupnog prosječnog poboljšanja 3,25 BLEU bodova na dvojezičkim početnim linijama, ii) Tehnika uključenja informacija o domenu u znakove jezika pomaže multijezičkom multidomenalnom sistemu u dobivanju značajnog prosječnog poboljšanja 6 BLEU bodova na osnovnim linijama, (iii) Višestadijskog finaliziranja dodatno pomaže u poboljšanju 1-1,5 BLEU bodova za jezički par interesa.', 'ca': "L'Índia es coneix com la terra de moltes llengües i dialectes. La traducció de màquines neuronals (NMT) és l'enfocament actual d'última generació de traducció de màquines (MT), però és millor només amb grans conjunts de dades que normalment falten les llengües indies, fent que aquest enfocament és infesíbel. Així que, en aquest article, abordem el problema de l'escassetat de dades formant eficientment sistemes multilingües i multilingües multilingües de MTN que impliquen llengües del subcontinent indià. Estem proposant la tècnica d'utilitzar les etiquetes conjuntes de domini i llenguatge en una configuració multillengua. Des dels nostres experiments treiem tres conclusions importants: i) Formar un sistema multillenguatge explotant la similitud lèxica basada en la família lingüística ajuda a aconseguir una millora mitjana global de 3,25 punts BLEU sobre les línies de base bilingües, ii) La tècnica d'incorporar la informació de domini a les fitxes de llenguatge ajuda al sistema multillenguatge multidominis a obtenir una millora mitjana significativa de 6 punts BLEU sobre les línies de base, iii) L'ajustament multietapa ajuda a obtenir una millora de 1-1,5 punts BLEU per al parell de llenguatges d'interès.", 'cs': 'Indie je známá jako země mnoha jazyků a dialektů. Neurální strojový překlad (NMT) je současným nejmodernějším přístupem pro strojový překlad (MT), ale funguje lépe pouze s velkými datovými sadami, které indické jazyky obvykle chybí, což činí tento přístup nemožný. V tomto článku se tedy zabýváme problémem nedostatku dat efektivním školením vícejazyčných a vícejazyčných multidoménových NMT systémů zahrnujících jazyky indického subkontinentu. Navrhujeme techniku použití společných značek domény a jazyka ve vícejazyčném nastavení. Z našich experimentů vyvozujeme tři hlavní závěry: (i) Trénink vícejazyčného systému prostřednictvím využití lexikální podobnosti založené na jazykové rodině pomáhá dosáhnout celkového průměrného zlepšení 3.25 BLEU bodů oproti dvojjazyčným základním liniím, (ii) Technika začlenění informací o doméně do jazykových tokenů pomáhá vícejazyčnému vícedoménovému systému získat významné průměrné zlepšení 6 BLEU bodů nad základními liniemi, (iii) Vícestupňové jemné ladění dále pomáhá získat zlepšení 1-1.5 BLEU bodů pro jazykový pár zájmů.', 'fi': 'Intia tunnetaan monien kielten ja murteiden maana. Neuraalinen konekäännös (NMT) on nykyaikainen konekäännös (MT), mutta toimii paremmin vain suurilla tietoaineistoilla, joita intialaisilla kielillä yleensä ei ole, joten tämä lähestymistapa on mahdoton toteuttaa. Tässä asiakirjassa käsittelemme tiedon niukkuuden ongelmaa kouluttamalla tehokkaasti monikielisiä ja monikielisiä monikielisiä NMT-järjestelmiä, joissa on mukana Intian niemimaan kieliä. Ehdotamme tekniikkaa käyttää yhteisiä verkkotunnus- ja kielitunnisteita monikielisessä kokoonpanossa. Teemme kokeistamme kolme merkittävää johtopäätöstä: (i) Monikielisen järjestelmän kouluttaminen kieliperheeseen perustuvaa sanastollista samankaltaisuutta hyödyntäen auttaa saavuttamaan keskimäärin 3,25 BLEU-pistettä verrattuna kaksikielisiin perusviivoihin, (ii) Tekniikka, jolla verkkotunnustiedot sisällytetään kielitunnuksiin, auttaa monikielistä moniverkkotunnusjärjestelmää saavuttamaan merkittävän keskimääräisen 6 BLEU-pisteen parannuksen perusviivoista, (iii) Monivaiheinen hienosäätö auttaa edelleen saamaan 1–1,5 BLEU-pisteen parannuksen kiinnostuksen kohteena olevalle kieliparille.', 'et': 'India on tuntud kui paljude keelte ja dialektide maa. Neuraalne masintõlge (NMT) on praegune kaasaegne lähenemisviis masintõlkele (MT), kuid toimib paremini ainult suurte andmekogumitega, millest India keeltel tavaliselt puudub, muutes selle lähenemisviisi võimatuks. Seega käsitleme käesolevas dokumendis andmepuuduse probleemi, koolitades tõhusalt mitmekeelseid ja mitmekeelseid mitmevaldkondlikke NMT-süsteeme, mis hõlmavad India alamkontinendi keeli. Me pakume välja tehnika ühiste domeeni ja keele siltide kasutamiseks mitmekeelses seadistuses. Me teeme oma eksperimentidest kolm peamist järeldust: i) mitmekeelse süsteemi koolitamine keeleperekonnal põhineva leksikaalse sarnasuse kasutamise kaudu aitab saavutada keskmise üldise paranemise 3,25 BLEU punkti võrra võrreldes kakskeelsete lähtejoontega, (ii) Domeeniteabe lisamise meetod keeleteenidesse aitab mitmekeelsel mitmedomeenilisel süsteemil saavutada olulist keskmist paranemist 6 BLEU punkti võrra võrreldes lähtejoontega, (iii) Mitmeastmeline peenhäälestus aitab veelgi saavutada huvipakkuva keelepaari puhul 1–1,5 BLEU punkti võrra.', 'sq': 'India është e njohur si vendi i shumë gjuhëve dhe dialekteve. Neural machine translation (NMT) is the current state-of-the-art approach for machine translation (MT) but performs better only with large datasets which Indian languages usually lack, making this approach infeasible.  So, in this paper, we address the problem of data scarcity by efficiently training multilingual and multilingual multi domain NMT systems involving languages of the Indian subcontinent.  Ne po propozojmë teknikën për përdorimin e emrave të përbashkët të domenit dhe gjuhës në një konfigurim shumëgjuhës. Ne tërheqim tre përfundime të mëdha nga eksperimentet tona: (i) Treinimi i një sistemi shumëgjuhës nëpërmjet shfrytëzimit të ngjashmërisë lexike bazuar në familjen gjuhësore ndihmon në arritjen e një përmirësimi të përgjithshëm mesatar prej 3.25 pikësh BLEU mbi linjat bazë dy gjuhësore,  (ii) Technique of incorporating domain information into the language tokens helps multilingual multi-domain system in getting a significant average improvement of 6 BLEU points over the baselines, (iii) Multistage fine-tuning further helps in getting an improvement of 1-1.5 BLEU points for the language pair of interest.', 'jv': 'barang-barang wong liya sing dikondisikno karo akeh basa karo dialekan. Nyorol sistem terjamahan So, in this paper, we Address the question of data shortness We are proposal the teknik for use the joint domain and language tags in a multilanguage setup. Awak dhéwé éntukno telu akeh sampeyan sing luwih nggawe gerangguna (i) nggawe sistem multi-lenguangka sing wis nguasai podho akeh luwih apik sing dimulai tarjamahan kanggo nggawe gerangguna sing luwih apik nyebute nggawe gerangguna sistem sing gak dhéwé kanggo nggawe gerangguna 3.5 (iii) Teknik of inkporting domain information in the language token help multilanguage multi-domain System in Get a Signual medium advancement of 6 CLUEpoints on the basic liners, (iii) Multiphase Fin- tuning additional help in Get an advancement of 1-1.5 bleUE points for the language pating of interactive', 'ha': "Yana sanin Hinduta kamar ƙasar harshe da harshe mãsu yawa. translation Kayya, cikin wannan takarda, Munã tambayar masu zartar da ma'abũcin data da ke yi mafiya amfani da wa'anar mulki-harshe da multi-lingui na NMT masu hususann harsunan Indian. Tuna goyyar da tufãfin da za'a yi amfani da tagogi na komai da harshe cikin tsari masu baka mulki-lingui. Tuna jiyya matsayi uku daga jarrabai:(i) Ana ƙidida wani na'ura na mulki-lingui da za'a yi amfani da kwamfyutan littafin leksisi a kan kwamfyutan family na harshe yana taimako da ya kai ƙarami a gabansa gaba ɗaya na 3.25 BLEU points a kan rubutun biyu, Technical of shigar da information in ɗayan cikin ayukan ayuka na ƙara multi-Domen na ƙara mulki-lingui, yana taimako da in sami mai girma wa shiryarwa na 6 BLEU points kan kwanan kwanan basuɗe, (ii) mai amfani da kyautar fasa mai yawa yana ƙara wa improve points na 1-1.5 BLEU wa littafin lugha.", 'he': 'הודו ידוע כארץ של הרבה לשונות ודיאלקטים. התרגום המכונה העצבית (NMT) הוא הגישה המיוחדת הנוכחית לתרגום המכונה (MT), אך היא טובה יותר רק עם קבוצות נתונים גדולות ששפות הודיות בדרך כלל חסרות, מה שעושה את הגישה הזאת בלתי אפשרית. So, in this paper, we address the problem of data scarcity by efficiently training multilingual and multilingual multi domain NMT systems involving languages of the Indian subcontinent.  אנחנו מציעים את הטכניקה לשימוש בתחום המשותף ותגיות השפה במערכת רבות שפות. אנחנו משיכים שלושה מסקנות גדולות מהניסויים שלנו: (i) אימון מערכת רבות שפות דרך ניצל דמיון לקסיקלי מבוסס על משפחת שפות עוזר להשיג שיפור ממוצע כללי של 3.25 נקודות BLEU מעל קווי בסיס שתיים שפות, (ii) טכניקה להכניס מידע שטח לתוך סימני השפה עוזרת למערכת multilingual multi-domain להשיג שיפור ממוצע משמעותי של 6 נקודות BLEU מעל הקווים הבסיסיים, (iii) התאים ממוצעים נוספים עוזרים להשיג שיפור של 1-1.5 נקודות BLEU לזוג השפה של עניין.', 'sk': 'Indija je znana kot dežela številnih jezikov in narečij. Nevralno strojno prevajanje (NMT) je sedanji najsodobnejši pristop za strojno prevajanje (MT), vendar je boljši le z velikimi nabori podatkov, ki jih indijski jeziki običajno nimajo, zaradi česar je ta pristop neizvedljiv. V tem članku torej obravnavamo problem pomanjkanja podatkov z učinkovitim usposabljanjem večjezičnih in večjezičnih večdomenskih NMT sistemov, ki vključujejo jezike indijske podceline. Predlagamo tehniko uporabe skupnih domenskih in jezikovnih oznak v večjezični nastavitvi. Iz naših eksperimentov smo pripravili tri glavne zaključke: (i) Usposabljanje večjezičnega sistema z izkoriščanjem leksikalne podobnosti, ki temelji na jezikovni družini, pomaga doseči splošno povprečno izboljšanje za 3,25 točke BLEU v primerjavi z dvojezičnimi osnovnimi črtami, (ii) Tehnika vključevanja domenskih informacij v jezikovne žetone pomaga večjezičnemu večdomenskemu sistemu doseči znatno povprečno izboljšanje 6 točk BLEU v primerjavi z izhodiščnimi vrstami, (iii) Večstopenjsko natančno nastavitev dodatno pomaga doseči izboljšanje 1-1,5 točk BLEU za jezikovni par, ki ga zanima.', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་གར་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་dialects(dialects)ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཞིག་རེད། ནུས་མེད་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཆས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་མ་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས། དེར་བརྟེན། འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་སྣ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་མང་གསོག་སྤྱོད་པའི་དུས་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ནང་གི་དབུགས་ཁུལ་དང་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་ལས་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་གསུམ་ལས་: (i) སྐད་ཡིག (ii) Technique of incorporating domain information into the language tokens helps multilingual multi-domain system in getting a significant average improvement of 6 BLEU points over the baselines, (iii) Multistage fine-tuning further helps in getting an improvement of 1-1.5 BLEU points for the language pair of interest.'}
{'en': 'Fiction in Russian Translation : A Translationese Study', 'ar': 'الخيال في الترجمة الروسية: دراسة الترجمة', 'pt': 'Ficção em Tradução Russa: Um Estudo Traducional', 'fr': 'Fiction dans la traduction russe\xa0: une étude traductionnelle', 'ja': 'ロシア語訳のフィクション：翻訳研究', 'hi': 'रूसी अनुवाद में कल्पना: एक अनुवादी अध्ययन', 'es': 'Ficción en la traducción al ruso: un estudio translacionés', 'ga': 'Ficsean san Aistriúchán Rúisise: Staidéar Aistriúcháin', 'ru': 'Художественная литература в русском переводе: переводческое исследование', 'zh': '俄语译小说:译', 'el': 'Fiction στη ρωσική μετάφραση: Μια μεταφραστική μελέτη', 'hu': 'Fikció orosz fordításban: Egy fordítási tanulmány', 'it': 'Fiction in Russian Translation: A Translationese Study', 'lt': 'Fikcija rusų kalba: vertimo raštu tyrimas', 'kk': 'Орус аудармасында орындалу: аудармалы оқу', 'ka': 'Name', 'ms': 'Fiction in Russian Translation: A Translation Study', 'mt': 'Fiction in Russian Translation: A Translationese Study', 'mk': 'Фикција на руски превод: преводна студија', 'mn': 'Оросын орчуудын орчуулалт: Үүний орчуулалт судалгаа', 'ml': 'Fiction in Russian Translation: A Translationese Study', 'no': 'Fiksjon i russisk omsetjing: ein oversettelsesstudie', 'pl': 'Fikcja w tłumaczeniu rosyjskim: studium tłumaczeniowe', 'si': 'Name', 'ro': 'Ficțiune în traducere rusă: Un studiu traducător', 'sr': 'Fikcija u ruskom prevodu: Proučavanje prevoda', 'so': 'Fixiga turjumista Ruushka: A Translation Study', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Fiction i ryska översättning: En översättning studie', 'ur': 'روسی ترجمہ میں تقویت: ایک ترجمہ تحقیق', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tiếng dịch của Nga: Một Nghiên cứu Dịch ngữ', 'bg': 'Фикцията на руски език Превод: преводаческа литература', 'hr': 'Fikcija u ruskom prevodu: ispitivanje prevoda', 'da': 'Fiktion i russisk oversættelse: En oversættelsesstudie', 'nl': 'Fictie in Russische vertaling: Een vertaalse studie', 'de': 'Fiktion in russischer Übersetzung: Eine Translationesische Studie', 'id': 'Fiksi dalam Terjemahan Rusia: Sebuah Belajar Terjemahan', 'ko': '러시아어 번역 중의 소설: 번역학 연구', 'fa': 'تعیین در ترجمه روسیه: یک مطالعه ترجمه', 'tr': 'Orsça terjimelerinde çykmak: terjime edilen öwrenme', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Fiksioni në përkthimin rus: Një studim përkthimi', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Urusi: Utafiti wa Tafsiri', 'az': 'Rus 칞evirind톛 fiksi: T톛rc칲m톛 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'bn': 'রাশিয়ান অনুবাদ: একটি অনুবাদ স্টিডি', 'bs': 'Fikcija u ruskom prevodu: Proučavanje prevoda', 'ca': 'Ficció en traducció russa: Un estudi de traducció', 'cs': 'Fikce v ruském překladu: Překladatelská studie', 'fi': 'Kaunokirjallisuus venäjäksi Käännös: A Translationese Study', 'et': 'Kirjandus vene keeles Tõlge: A Translationese Study', 'hy': 'Ռուսաստանի թարգմանությունը. թարգմանական ուսումնասիրություն', 'jv': 'Pijane kanggo Terusan Rusi: Omukan pijane Rusi', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Fikcija v ruskem jeziku Prevajanje: A Translationese Study', 'he': 'תורגם וסונכרן ע"י Qsubs מצוות', 'bo': 'རྩིས་ཤུལ་ཡིན་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ནང་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་ཞིག་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a translationese study based on the parallel data from the Russian National Corpus (RNC). We explored differences between literary texts originally authored in Russian and fiction translated into Russian from 11 languages. The texts are represented with frequency-based features that capture structural and lexical properties of language. Binary classification results indicate that literary translations can be distinguished from non-translations with an accuracy ranging from 82 to 92 % depending on the source language and feature set. Multiclass classification confirms that translations from distant languages are more distinct from non-translations than translations from languages that are typologically close to Russian. It also demonstrates that translations from same-family source languages share translationese properties. Structural features return more consistent results than features relying on external resources and capturing lexical properties of texts in both translationese detection and source language identification tasks.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة دراسة مترجمة تستند إلى بيانات موازية من الهيئة الوطنية الروسية (RNC). اكتشفنا الاختلافات بين النصوص الأدبية التي تم تأليفها في الأصل باللغة الروسية والنصوص الخيالية المترجمة إلى الروسية من 11 لغة. يتم تمثيل النصوص بسمات قائمة على التردد تلتقط الخصائص الهيكلية والمعجمية للغة. تشير نتائج التصنيف الثنائي إلى أنه يمكن تمييز الترجمات الأدبية عن غير الترجمات بدقة تتراوح من 82 إلى 92٪ اعتمادًا على لغة المصدر ومجموعة الميزات. يؤكد التصنيف متعدد الفئات أن الترجمات من اللغات البعيدة أكثر تميزًا عن الترجمات غير الترجمات من الترجمات من اللغات القريبة من اللغة الروسية نسبيًا. كما يوضح أيضًا أن الترجمات من لغات مصدر من نفس العائلة تشترك في خصائص الترجمة. تُظهر الميزات الهيكلية نتائج أكثر اتساقًا من الميزات التي تعتمد على الموارد الخارجية وتلتقط الخصائص المعجمية للنصوص في مهام اكتشاف الترجمة وتحديد لغة المصدر.', 'fr': "Cet article présente une étude traductionese basée sur les données parallèles du Russian National Corpus (RNC). Nous avons exploré les différences entre des textes littéraires rédigés à l'origine en russe et des fictions traduites en russe à partir de 11 langues. Les textes sont représentés avec des caractéristiques basées sur la fréquence qui capturent les propriétés structurelles et lexicales du langage. Les résultats de la classification binaire indiquent que les traductions littéraires peuvent être distinguées des non-traductions avec une précision allant de 82 à 92\xa0% selon la langue source et l'ensemble de fonctionnalités. La classification multiclasse confirme que les traductions provenant de langues éloignées sont plus distinctes des non-traductions que les traductions provenant de langues proches du russe sur le plan typologique. Cela montre également que les traductions provenant de langues sources de la même famille partagent des propriétés traductionese. Les caractéristiques structurelles renvoient des résultats plus cohérents que les fonctionnalités s'appuyant sur des ressources externes et capturant les propriétés lexicales des textes à la fois dans les tâches de détection du traducteur et d'identification de la langue source.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um estudo de tradução baseado em dados paralelos do Russian National Corpus (RNC). Exploramos as diferenças entre textos literários originalmente escritos em russo e ficção traduzida para o russo de 11 idiomas. Os textos são representados com recursos baseados em frequência que capturam propriedades estruturais e lexicais da linguagem. Os resultados da classificação binária indicam que as traduções literárias podem ser diferenciadas das não traduções com uma precisão que varia de 82 a 92%, dependendo do idioma de origem e do conjunto de recursos. A classificação multiclasse confirma que as traduções de línguas distantes são mais distintas das não traduções do que as traduções de línguas que são tipologicamente próximas do russo. Também demonstra que as traduções de idiomas de origem da mesma família compartilham propriedades de tradução. Recursos estruturais retornam resultados mais consistentes do que recursos que dependem de recursos externos e capturam propriedades lexicais de textos em tarefas de detecção de tradução e identificação de idioma de origem.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un estudio de traducción basado en los datos paralelos del Corpus Nacional de Rusia (RNC). Exploramos las diferencias entre los textos literarios originalmente escritos en ruso y la ficción traducida al ruso desde 11 idiomas. Los textos se representan con características basadas en la frecuencia que capturan las propiedades estructurales y léxicas del lenguaje. Los resultados de la clasificación binaria indican que las traducciones literarias se pueden distinguir de las no traducciones con una precisión que oscila entre el 82 y el 92%, según el idioma de origen y el conjunto de funciones. La clasificación multiclase confirma que las traducciones de idiomas distantes son más distintas de las que no son traducciones que las traducciones de idiomas tipológicamente cercanos al ruso. También demuestra que las traducciones de los idiomas de origen de la misma familia comparten propiedades de traducción. Las características estructurales arrojan resultados más consistentes que las funciones que se basan en recursos externos y capturan las propiedades léxicas de los textos en las tareas de detección de traducción e identificación del idioma de origen.', 'ja': 'ロシア国立コーパス（ RNC ）からの並列データに基づく翻訳研究を紹介する。 もともとロシア語で書かれた文学テキストと、11の言語からロシア語に翻訳されたフィクションの違いを探った。 テキストは、言語の構造的および語彙的特性を取り込む頻度ベースの特徴で表されます。 バイナリ分類の結果は、文学的翻訳がソース言語と特徴セットに応じて82 ～ 92 ％の範囲の精度で非翻訳と区別できることを示しています。 マルチクラス分類は、ロシア語に類型的に近い言語からの翻訳よりも、遠い言語からの翻訳の方が非翻訳とは異なることを確認する。 また、同じファミリーのソース言語からの翻訳が翻訳特性を共有していることも実証している。 構造的特徴は、翻訳検出とソース言語識別タスクの両方で、外部リソースに依存し、テキストの辞書的特性をキャプチャする特徴よりも一貫性のある結果を返します。', 'zh': '本文据俄罗斯国语料库(RNC)平行数译。 寻其初俄语文本与11种语翻译成俄语小说之异。 文本以频率,言语词汇属性。 二元分类结果表明,文学与非译分别,准确率自82%至92%不等,决于源言功能集。 多类证验,比类学上近俄语言,自远译与非译者更明。 又明同源语译共其性也。 比之外资,译检和源语,得文本词法属性,结构特征还益一。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर रूसी राष्ट्रीय कॉर्पस (आरएनसी) से समानांतर डेटा के आधार पर एक अनुवाद अध्ययन प्रस्तुत करता है। हमने मूल रूप से रूसी में लिखे गए साहित्यिक ग्रंथों और 11 भाषाओं से रूसी में अनुवादित कथाओं के बीच मतभेदों का पता लगाया। ग्रंथों को आवृत्ति-आधारित विशेषताओं के साथ दर्शाया गया है जो भाषा के संरचनात्मक और लेक्सिकल गुणों को कैप्चर करते हैं। बाइनरी वर्गीकरण परिणामों से संकेत मिलता है कि साहित्यिक अनुवाद को स्रोत भाषा और सुविधा सेट के आधार पर 82 से 92% तक की सटीकता के साथ गैर-अनुवादों से अलग किया जा सकता है। मल्टीक्लास वर्गीकरण इस बात की पुष्टि करता है कि दूर की भाषाओं के अनुवाद उन भाषाओं के अनुवादों की तुलना में गैर-अनुवादों से अधिक अलग हैं जो टाइपोलॉजिकल रूप से रूसी के करीब हैं। यह यह भी दर्शाता है कि समान-परिवार स्रोत भाषाओं के अनुवाद अनुवाद गुण साझा करते हैं। संरचनात्मक विशेषताएं बाहरी संसाधनों पर निर्भर सुविधाओं की तुलना में अधिक सुसंगत परिणाम लौटाती हैं और अनुवाद का पता लगाने और स्रोत भाषा पहचान कार्यों दोनों में ग्रंथों के लेक्सिकल गुणों को कैप्चर करती हैं।', 'ru': 'В данной работе представлено переводческое исследование, основанное на параллельных данных Российского национального корпуса (РНК). Мы исследовали различия между литературными текстами, первоначально написанными на русском языке, и художественной литературой, переведенной на русский язык с 11 языков. Тексты представлены частотно-ориентированными признаками, которые фиксируют структурные и лексические свойства языка. Результаты бинарной классификации показывают, что литературные переводы можно отличить от нетрансляций с точностью от 82 до 92% в зависимости от исходного языка и набора признаков. Многоклассовая классификация подтверждает, что переводы с отдаленных языков более отличаются от непереводов, чем переводы с языков, типологически близких к русскому. Это также демонстрирует, что переводы с исходных языков одного и того же семейства имеют общие переводческие свойства. Структурные особенности дают более согласованные результаты, чем особенности, полагающиеся на внешние ресурсы и фиксирующие лексические свойства текстов как в задачах обнаружения переводчиков, так и в задачах идентификации исходного языка.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo staidéar aistritheach i láthair bunaithe ar shonraí comhthreomhara ó Chorpas Náisiúnta na Rúise (RNC). Rinneamar iniúchadh ar dhifríochtaí idir téacsanna liteartha a scríobhadh ar dtús i Rúisis agus ficsean a aistríodh go Rúisis ó 11 theanga. Léirítear na téacsanna le gnéithe bunaithe ar mhinicíocht a shealbhaíonn airíonna struchtúracha agus foclóireachta teanga. Tugann torthaí aicmithe dhénártha le fios gur féidir aistriúcháin liteartha a idirdhealú ó aistriúcháin nach aistriúcháin iad le cruinneas idir 82% agus 92% ag brath ar an teanga foinse agus ar an ngné atá leagtha síos. Deimhníonn rangú ilranga go bhfuil aistriúcháin ó theangacha i bhfad i gcéin níos difriúil ó neamh-aistrithe ná le haistriúcháin ó theangacha atá gar don Rúisis de réir tíopeolaíochta. Léiríonn sé freisin go bhfuil airíonna aistriúcháin ag aistriúcháin ó theangacha foinse-teaghlaigh chéanna. Tugann gnéithe struchtúracha torthaí níos comhsheasmhaí ná gnéithe a bhíonn ag brath ar acmhainní seachtracha agus a shealbhaíonn airíonna foclóireachta téacsanna i dtascanna braite aistrithe agus sainaithint teanga foinse araon.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια μεταφραστική μελέτη βασισμένη στα παράλληλα δεδομένα του Ρωσικού Εθνικού Σώματος (RNC). Ερευνήσαμε τις διαφορές μεταξύ λογοτεχνικών κειμένων που συντάχθηκαν αρχικά στα ρωσικά και μυθοπλασίας που μεταφράστηκαν στα ρωσικά από 11-γλώσσες. Τα κείμενα παρουσιάζονται με χαρακτηριστικά βασισμένα στη συχνότητα που αποτυπώνουν δομικές και λεξικές ιδιότητες της γλώσσας. Τα αποτελέσματα της δυαδικής ταξινόμησης δείχνουν ότι οι λογοτεχνικές μεταφράσεις μπορούν να διακριθούν από τις μη μεταφράσεις με ακρίβεια που κυμαίνεται από 82 έως 92% ανάλογα με τη γλώσσα προέλευσης και το σύνολο χαρακτηριστικών. Η ταξινόμηση πολλαπλών κλάσεων επιβεβαιώνει ότι οι μεταφράσεις από μακρινές γλώσσες είναι πιο διακριτές από τις μη μεταφράσεις από τις μεταφράσεις από γλώσσες που είναι τυπολογικά κοντά στα ρωσικά. Αποδεικνύει επίσης ότι οι μεταφράσεις από γλώσσες προέλευσης της ίδιας οικογένειας μοιράζονται μεταφραστικές ιδιότητες. Τα δομικά χαρακτηριστικά αποδίδουν πιο συνεπή αποτελέσματα από τα χαρακτηριστικά που βασίζονται σε εξωτερικούς πόρους και συλλαμβάνουν λεξικές ιδιότητες των κειμένων τόσο στις εργασίες ανίχνευσης μεταφράσεων όσο και στον προσδιορισμό της πηγής γλώσσας.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány az Orosz Nemzeti Testület (RNC) párhuzamos adataira épülő translációs tanulmányt mutat be. Feltártuk a különbségeket az eredetileg orosz nyelvű irodalmi szövegek és 11 nyelvről orosz nyelvű regény között. A szövegeket frekvenciaalapú jellemzőkkel képviselik, amelyek a nyelv strukturális és lexikai tulajdonságait rögzítik. A bináris osztályozási eredmények azt mutatják, hogy az irodalmi fordítások a nem fordításoktól 82–92%-os pontossággal megkülönböztethetők a forrásnyelvtől és a funkciókészlettől függően. A többosztályos besorolás megerősíti, hogy a távoli nyelvekről származó fordítások jobban különböznek a nem fordításoktól, mint az orosz nyelvekről származó fordítások. Azt is bizonyítja, hogy az azonos családi forrásnyelvekről származó fordítások fordítási tulajdonságokkal rendelkeznek. A strukturális jellemzők következetesebb eredményeket eredményeznek, mint a külső erőforrásokra támaszkodó funkciók, és a szövegek lexikai tulajdonságait rögzítik mind a fordítás felismerése, mind a forrásnyelv azonosítása során.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз Россияның улық корпус (RNC) параллелі деректерінің негізінде аударылған зерттеулерді көрсетеді. Біз әріпті мәтіндер арасындағы айырмашылықтарын түсіндік. Орус және оқиға 11 тілден аударылған. Мәтіндер тілдің структуралық және лексикалық қасиеттерін түсірген жиіліктерді негіздеген мүмкіндіктерінен көрсетіледі. Бинарлық шектеу нәтижелері әріпті аудармалардан 82- 92% дегеннен көзінің тілінен және мүмкіндіктеріне тәуелді түрлендіру мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Көптеген класс бөлімі қашықтағы тілдерден аудармалардың аудармалардың орысша тілдерінен типлогикалық түрде жақын тілдерден аудармалардан артық болатынын тексереді. Сонымен қатар бір отбасының көзі тілдерінен аудармаларды аудармалардың қасиеттерін ортақтастырады. Структуралық мүмкіндіктері сыртқы ресурстар мен аудармалы анықтау және көзінің тілдерді идентификациялау тапсырмаларындағы мәтіндердің лексикалық қасиеттерін алу мүмкіндіктерінен артық нәти', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta uno studio traduzionese basato sui dati paralleli del Corpo Nazionale Russo (RNC). Abbiamo esplorato le differenze tra i testi letterari originariamente scritti in russo e la narrativa tradotta in russo da 11 lingue. I testi sono rappresentati con caratteristiche basate sulla frequenza che catturano le proprietà strutturali e lessicali del linguaggio. I risultati della classificazione binaria indicano che le traduzioni letterarie possono essere distinte dalle non traduzioni con una precisione che varia dall'82 al 92% a seconda della lingua di origine e del set di funzionalità. La classificazione multiclasse conferma che le traduzioni da lingue lontane sono più distinte dalle non traduzioni rispetto alle traduzioni da lingue tipologicamente vicine al russo. Dimostra inoltre che le traduzioni provenienti da lingue di origine della stessa famiglia condividono proprietà traduzionesi. Le caratteristiche strutturali restituiscono risultati più coerenti rispetto alle caratteristiche basate su risorse esterne e catturano le proprietà lessicali dei testi sia nelle attività di rilevamento traslazionale che nell'identificazione della lingua di origine.", 'mk': 'Овој весник претставува преведувачка студија базирана на паралелните податоци од Рускиот национален корпус (РНК). Истражувавме разлики помеѓу литературните тексти првично авторирани на руски и фантастиката преведени на руски од 11 јазици. The texts are represented with frequency-based features that capture structural and lexical properties of language.  Binary classification results indicate that literary translations can be distinguished from non-translations with an accuracy ranging from 82 to 92% depending on the source language and feature set.  Мултикласификацијата потврдува дека преведувањата од далечните јазици се поразлични од непроведувањата од преведувањата од јазици кои се типологички блиски до Русија. Исто така, покажува дека преведувањата од истите семејни јазици од извор делат преведувачки сопствености. Структурните карактеристики ги враќаат поважните резултати отколку карактеристиките кои се зависат од надворешни ресурси и заземаат лексикални сопствености на текстите во задачите за детекција на преводот и идентификација на изворот', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas vertimo tyrimas, pagrįstas lygiagrečiais Rusijos nacionalinio korpuso (RNC) duomenimis. Ištyrėme skirtumus tarp literatūros tekstų, originaliai rašytų rusiškai, ir fikcijos tekstų, išverstų į rusišką iš 11 kalbų. The texts are represented with frequency-based features that capture structural and lexical properties of language.  Dvišalės klasifikacijos rezultatai rodo, kad literatūros vertimai gali būti skiriami nuo vertimų, kurių tikslumas svyruoja nuo 82 % iki 92 % priklausomai nuo kilmės kalbos ir savybių rinkinio. Multiclass classification confirms that translations from distant languages are more distinct from non-translations than translations from languages that are typologically close to Russian.  Jis taip pat rodo, kad vertimai iš tų pačių šeimos šaltinių kalbų turi vertimo savybes. Struktūrinės savybės teikia nuoseklesnius rezultatus nei savybės, grindžiamos išoriniais ištekliais ir tekstų tekstų tekstų tekstų savybėmis tiek vertimų nustatymo, tiek išorinės kalbos identifikavimo užduotyse.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს ტრანლაციონალური სწავლობა, რომელიც პერსონალური კორპოსს (RNC) დაბაზიან პარალელური მონაცემები. ჩვენ განსხვავებდით ლეტრატური ტექსტის განსხვავებების განსხვავებას, რომელიც პროსური და ფიქციის განსხვავებულია 11 ენაზე. ტექსტის გამოსახულება სიტყვების სტრუქტური და ლექსიკალური განსახულებებით. ბინერი კლასიფიკაციის შედეგები აჩვენებენ, რომ ლიტრატური შეტყობინებები შეიძლება განსხვავება არ შეტყობინებული განსხვავებულიან 82-92% განსხვავებული წარმოდგენების და ფუნქციების შესახებ მრავალკლასის კლასიფიკაცია დააწყება, რომ განსხვავებული ენების განსხვავებაზე უფრო განსხვავებულია, ვიდრე ენების განსხვავებაზე, რომელიც ტიპოლოგიურად პროსიაში გადა ეს ასევე აჩვენებს, რომ ერთადერთი ოჯახის მხოლოდ სახელის ენებიდან ტრანლაციონის მნიშვნელობების განსაზღვრება. სტრუქტურული ფუნქციები უფრო კონსტენტიური შედეგების შემდეგ ფუნქციები, რომლებიც გარეშე რესურსების შესახებ და ტექსტის ლექსიკალური განსახულება და გამოსახულებული ენ', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta studju traduzzjonali bbażat fuq id-dejta parallel a mill-Korp Nazzjonali Russu (RNC). Esplorajna d-differenzi bejn testi letterarji oriġinarjament awtorizzati fir-Russu u fikzjoni tradotti fir-Russu minn 11-il lingwa. It-testi huma rrappreżentati b’karatteristiċi bbażati fuq il-frekwenza li jaqbdu l-karatteristiċi strutturali u lexiċi tal-lingwa. Binary classification results indicate that literary translations can be distinguished from non-translations with an accuracy ranging from 82 to 92% depending on the source language and feature set.  Il-klassifikazzjoni multiklassi tikkonferma li t-traduzzjonijiet minn lingwi distanti huma aktar distinti minn non-traduzzjonijiet minn traduzzjonijiet minn lingwi tipikament qrib ir-Russu. Dan juri wkoll li t-traduzzjonijiet minn lingwi tas-sors tal-istess familja jaqsmu l-proprjetajiet tat-traduzzjonijiet. Structural features return more consistent results than features relying on external resources and capturing lexical properties of texts in both translationese detection and source language identification tasks.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d റഷ്യന്\u200d നാഷണല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പാരാളല്\u200d ഡേറ്റായി അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഒരു പരിഭാഷപ്രദര്\u200dശന പഠ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രുഷ്യസ്ഥാനത്തിലും ഫിക്ഷനിലും രുഷ്യന്\u200d ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും രൂഷിയിലേക്കും വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിച്ചു. ഭാഷയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഗുണഗണങ്ങളുമായി പദാവലികള്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിയിക്കുന്നു. ബൈനറി ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു സാഹിത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത് 82 വരെ 9 അകലെയുള്ള ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ന ഒരേ കുടുംബ സ്രോതസ്സ് ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഭാഷകള്\u200d ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിഭാഷകളുടെ ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കുച പുറത്തുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സ്ഥിരമായ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചുവരുന്നു. ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വ', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan kajian terjemahan berdasarkan data selari dari Korpus Nasional Rusia (RNC). Kami mengeksplorasi perbezaan antara teks literari yang dimuliakan dalam bahasa Rusia dan fiksi diterjemahkan ke bahasa Rusia dari 11 bahasa. Teks diwakili dengan ciri-ciri berasaskan frekuensi yang menangkap ciri-ciri struktur dan leksikal bahasa. Keputusan klasifikasi binari menunjukkan bahawa terjemahan literari boleh dibedakan dari non-terjemahan dengan ketepatan yang berlainan dari 82 hingga 92% bergantung pada bahasa sumber dan set ciri. Klasifikasi kelas berbilang mengesahkan bahawa terjemahan dari bahasa jauh lebih berbeza dari bukan-terjemahan daripada terjemahan dari bahasa yang secara tipologi dekat dengan Rusia. Ia juga menunjukkan bahawa terjemahan dari bahasa sumber keluarga yang sama berkongsi sifat terjemahan. Ciri-ciri struktur mengembalikan keputusan yang lebih konsisten daripada ciri-ciri bergantung pada sumber luar dan menangkap ciri-ciri leksikal teks dalam kedua-dua penemuan terjemahan dan tugas pengenalan bahasa sumber.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас РНК-ын параллел өгөгдлийн үндсэн шинжлэх ухааны судалгааг харуулдаг. Бид оюуны бичил үсэг болон зохиолын хоорондын ялгааг судалсан. Эхлээд Российн 11 хэл руу орчуулсан. Текст нь хэлний бүтэц болон лексикийн чадваруудыг барьж буй давхар багасгасан чадвартай илэрхийлэгддэг. Хоёр дахь хуваалтын үр дүн нь бичил хэл болон хувьцааны хэл дээр хамааралгүй бичил хэлбэрээс 82-92%-аас тодорхойлж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг. Олон-хичээлийн хуваалтын хэлээс хол хэлээс илүү хэлбэрээр оршин хэлээс ойрхон хэлээс илүү ялгаатай гэдгийг баталдаг. Энэ нь мөн адил гэр бүлийн эх үүсвэрийн хэл дээр орчуулагч чанарыг хуваалцдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг. Структур чадварууд нь гадаад нөөцийн боловсруулалт дээр байрлаж, хөрөнгө оруулалт болон эх хэлний идентификацийн даалгавруудын хэлбэрээс илүү тогтвортой үр дүн гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono badanie translacyjne oparte na danych równoległych z Rosyjskiego Korpusu Narodowego (RNC). Badaliśmy różnice między tekstami literackimi autorskimi pierwotnie w języku rosyjskim a fikcją przetłumaczoną na rosyjski z 11-języków. Teksty są reprezentowane za pomocą cech opartych na częstotliwości, które uwzględniają strukturalne i leksykalne właściwości języka. Wyniki klasyfikacji binarnej wskazują, że tłumaczenia literackie można odróżnić od nietłumaczeń z dokładnością od 82 do 92% w zależności od języka źródłowego i zestawu cech. Klasyfikacja wieloklasowa potwierdza, że tłumaczenia z odległych języków bardziej odróżniają się od nietłumaczeń niż tłumaczenia z języków typologicznie bliskich rosyjskiemu. Pokazuje również, że tłumaczenia z języków źródłowych tej samej rodziny mają właściwości tłumaczeniowe. Funkcje strukturalne przynoszą bardziej spójne wyniki niż funkcje opierające się na zasobach zewnętrznych i przechwytujące właściwości leksykalne tekstów zarówno w zadaniach wykrywania tłumaczeń, jak i identyfikacji języka źródłowego.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser eit translationisk studie basert på parallelle data frå den russiske nasjonale korpusen (RNC). Vi undersøkte forskjeller mellom bokstavar tekstar som er opprinneleg autorisert i russisk og fiksjon omsett til russisk frå 11 språk. Tekstene er representert med frekvensbaserte funksjonar som inneheld strukturære og leksiske eigenskapar for språk. Binær klassifikasjonsverdiar tyder på at bokstavarske omsetjingar kan skiljast frå ikkje- omsetjingar med nøyaktighet frå 82 til 92% avhengig av kjeldespråket og funksjonssettet. Fleirklassesklassifikasjon stadfestar at omsetjingar frå langt språk er meir skilt frå ikkje- omsetjingar enn omsetjingar frå språk som er typologisk nær russisk. Det viser også at omsetjingar frå same familiske kjeldespråk deler translationiske eigenskapar. Strukturelle funksjonar returnerer meir konsistentne resultat enn funksjonar som tilhøyrer eksterne ressursar og hentar leksiske eigenskapar til tekstar i både translationese oppdaging og kjeldespråk-identifikasjonspråk.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă un studiu traducător bazat pe datele paralele din Corpul Național Rus (RNC). Am explorat diferențele dintre textele literare scrise inițial în limba rusă și ficțiunea tradusă în limba rusă din 11 limbi. Textele sunt reprezentate cu caracteristici bazate pe frecvență care captează proprietățile structurale și lexicale ale limbajului. Rezultatele clasificării binare indică faptul că traducerile literare pot fi distinse de cele neconvertite cu o precizie cuprinsă între 82% și 92% în funcție de limba sursă și setul de caracteristici. Clasificarea multiclasă confirmă faptul că traducerile din limbi îndepărtate sunt mai distincte de non-traduceri decât traducerile din limbi care sunt tipologic apropiate de rusă. De asemenea, demonstrează că traducerile din limbile sursă din aceeași familie au proprietăți traducătoare. Caracteristicile structurale returnează rezultate mai consistente decât caracteristicile care se bazează pe resurse externe și capturează proprietățile lexicale ale textelor atât în activitățile de detectare a traducerii, cât și în identificarea limbii sursă.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en translationesisk studie baserad på parallella data från Ryska nationella kåren (RNC). Vi undersökte skillnader mellan litterära texter ursprungligen skrivna på ryska och skönlitteratur översatt till ryska från 11 språk. Texterna representeras med frekvensbaserade funktioner som fångar strukturella och lexikala egenskaper hos språket. Binära klassificeringsresultat indikerar att litterära översättningar kan särskiljas från icke-översättningar med en noggrannhet på mellan 82 och 92% beroende på källspråk och funktionsuppsättning. Klassindelning i flera klasser bekräftar att översättningar från avlägsna språk skiljer sig mer från icke-översättningar än översättningar från språk som är typologiskt nära ryska. Det visar också att översättningar från samma familje källspråk delar translationesiska egenskaper. Strukturella funktioner ger mer konsekventa resultat än funktioner som förlitar sig på externa resurser och fångar upp lexikala egenskaper hos texter i både översättningsdetektering och källspråkidentifiering.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ රුසියානු ජාතික කෝර්පුස් වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය දත්ත අධිරූපයෙන් පරිවර්තනය කරනවා. අපි රුසියානු වලින් පිළිබඳ වලින් අතර වෙනස් කරලා තියෙනවා රුසියානු වලින් වලින් රුසියානු වලින් 11 වල භාෂාවේ සංස්ථාපනය සහ ලෙක්සිකල් විශේෂතාවන් අල්ලගන්න ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියෙන් පෙන්වන්නේ. බායිනාරි විශේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කි ගොඩක් වාර්තාවක් විශේෂණය තහවුරු කරනවා කියලා දුරස්ථ භාෂාවක් වලින් භාෂාවක් වලින් භාෂාවක් වලින්  ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්නයි එකම පවුලේ මුළු භාෂාවන් වලින් පරිවර්තන විශේෂතාවන් කියලා. නිර්මාණය විශේෂ විශේෂතාවන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය විශේෂතාවට වඩා විශේෂතාවන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථා', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxay soo bandhigtaa waxbarasho turjumista ah oo ku saleysan takhasusyada lambarka ah ee Ruushka Korpus (RNC). Waxaannu baaraynay kala duwanaanshaha u dhexeeya qoraalka litterka ee asalka ugu horeeyey oo lagu qoray afka Ruushka iyo farshaxanka lagu turjumay Ruushka 11 luuqadood. Qoraayinka waxaa lagu muujiyaa tayooyin ku saleysan frequency-based oo qabsada qalabka iyo xuquuqyada luuqada. Xirfaha fasalka labaad waxay ku jeedaan in turjumaadda farshaxanka ah looga beddeli karo turjumaadda aan la turjumin, si rasmi ah looga beddeli karo 82-92% iyadoo ku xiran luqada asalka iyo bandhigga. Takhasuska fasalka badan waxay xaqiijiyaan in turjumaadda luuqadaha fog ay ka duwan yihiin turjumaadda luuqadaha sida caadiga ah u dhow Ruushka. Waxaa sidoo kale looga muujiyaa in turjumaadda luuqadaha asalka ah ay ka qeybiyaan hantida turjumaadda. Xiriikhda dhismaha waxaa dib u soo celinaya matooyin la mid ah oo ka mid ah fursado ku tiirsashada rasmiga dibadda iyo qabsashada alaabta xuquuqda la xiriira qoraalka iyo baaritaanka aqoonsiga luqada source.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ روسی ملی کورپوس (RNC) کی پارالی ڈیٹوں پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے کہ ایک ٹرنسلیٹن تحقیق کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے روسی اور افسانہ میں لکھی ہوئی لکھی پیغام کے درمیان اختلاف کی تحقیق کی ہے جو 11 زبانوں سے روسی میں ترجمہ کیا گیا ہے۔ ٹیکسٹ فرکانسی بنیاد رکھی ہوئی ویژگی کے ساتھ نمایش کی جاتی ہیں جو زبان کی ساختار اور لکسیکل ویژگی کو پکڑتے ہیں. بیناری کلاسیفوں کا نتیجہ نشان دیتا ہے کہ لکھی ترجمہ غیر ترجمہ سے ایک دقیق سے 82 تا 92% سے متفاوت ہو سکتی ہے سورج زبان اور فکریت سٹ پر مطابق۔ بہت سی کلاس کلاسیک کی تصدیق کرتی ہے کہ دور زبانوں سے ترجمہ غیر ترجمہ کی زبانوں سے زیادہ متفاوت ہیں جو روسی کے نزدیک ہیں۔ یہ بھی دکھاتا ہے کہ ایک خاندان کے سراسر زبانوں سے ترجمہ کرنا ویسی خصوصیات کا شریک ہے۔ Structural features return more consistent results than features based on external resources and capturing both translationese detection and source language identification tasks.', 'ta': '@ info நாங்கள் ஆரம்ப ஆசிரிஷ் மற்றும் கதைப்பாட்டு 11 மொழிகளிலிருந்து ரஷ்ய மொழிகளில் மொழிபெயர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ள ஆச மொழியின் கட்டுப்பாடு மற்றும் லெக்சிகிய பண்புகளை பிடிக்கும் சரத்தில் அடிப்படையான குணங்களுடன் உரைகள் குறி இருநிலை வகைப்படுத்தல் முடிவுகள் மூலத்தின் மொழி மற்றும் பண்புகள் அமைப்பை சார்ந்து கொண்டு 82 ல் இருந்து 92% வரை சரியான மொழிமொழியை மற்று பல வகுப்பு வகுப்பு வகுப்பு உறுதிப்படுத்துகிறது தொலைதூர மொழிகளில் இருந்து மொழிபெயர்ப்புகள் மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளை மொழிகளில மொழிமொழிகளில் இருந்து மொழிமாற்றங்கள் மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளை மொழிமாற்றும் பண்புகளை பகிர்ந்து கொள அமைப்பு குணங்கள் வெளி வளங்களை விட சார்ந்த தன்மைகளை விட முறையான முடிவுகளை திருப்பும் மற்றும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் மூலம', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja prevodnu studiju na temelju paralelnih podataka ruskog nacionalnog korpusa (RNC). Istražili smo razlike između književnih tekstova koje su originalno autorizirane na ruskom i fikciji prevedene na ruski od 11 jezika. Teksti su predstavljeni sa karakteristikama na frekvenciji koja uključuju strukturne i leksičke vlasništvo jezika. Резултати бинарне класификације показују да литературни преводи могу да се различе од непревода с точностью од 82 до 92% зависимо от настављања источних езика и функција. Višeklasna klasifikacija potvrđuje da su prevodi iz dalekih jezika različitiji od ne-prevoda nego prevodi od jezika koji su tipološki bliski ruskom. Takođe pokazuje da prevodi iz istog porodičnog izvora jezika dijele prevodne vlasništva. Strukturalne funkcije vraćaju konsekventnije rezultate nego karakteristike koje se oslanjaju na vanjske resurse i uhvate leksičke vlasništvo teksta u zadatkima za otkrivanje i identifikaciju izvornog jezika.', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz Ruscha National Corpus (RNC) bilan parallel maʼlumot asosida tarjima qiladigan tillarini koʻrsatiladi. Biz Ruscha va fikr tilida rasmlar bilan rasm matnlar orasidagi o'zgarishni 11 tillardan tarjima qildik. The texts are represented with frequency-based features that capture structural and lexical properties of language.  @ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cung cấp một nghiên cứu phiên bản dựa trên các dữ liệu song từ tập đoàn quốc gia Nga (RNC). Chúng tôi đã tìm hiểu những sự khác nhau giữa các văn bản văn học nguyên gốc của Nga và hư cấu dịch thành tiếng Nga từ 11. The text are represented with tần số based characters that captured structure and lexical properties of language. Kết quả thoại phân loại văn học cho thấy có thể phân biệt dịch văn học với độ chính xác từ 82 đến 92. phụ thuộc vào ngôn ngữ gốc và bộ đặc trưng. Phân loại đa tầng xác nhận rằng dịch từ những ngôn ngữ xa khác biệt với không dịch, hơn là dịch từ những ngôn ngữ khác nhau, theo phân loại, gần với Nga. Nó cũng chứng minh rằng dịch từ ngôn ngữ nguồn giống nhau chia sẻ tính chất dịch chuyển. Các tính năng cấu trúc mang lại kết quả phù hợp hơn các tính năng phụ thuộc vào tài nguyên bên ngoài và nắm giữ tính chất độc của văn bản trong cả các nhiệm vụ phát hiện dịch và nhận dạng ngôn ngữ nguồn.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een translationees onderzoek gebaseerd op de parallelle gegevens van het Russische Nationale Korpus (RNC). We hebben de verschillen onderzocht tussen literaire teksten die oorspronkelijk in het Russisch zijn geschreven en fictie die uit elf talen in het Russisch is vertaald. De teksten zijn vertegenwoordigd met frequentiegebaseerde kenmerken die structurele en lexicale eigenschappen van taal vastleggen. Binaire classificatieresultaten geven aan dat literaire vertalingen kunnen worden onderscheiden van niet-vertalingen met een nauwkeurigheid variërend van 82 tot 92% afhankelijk van de brontaal en feature set. Een meerklassenclassificatie bevestigt dat vertalingen uit verre talen zich meer onderscheiden van niet-vertalingen dan vertalingen uit talen die typologisch dicht bij het Russisch staan. Het toont ook aan dat vertalingen uit brontalen van dezelfde familie vertaalde eigenschappen delen. Structurele functies leveren consistentere resultaten op dan functies die afhankelijk zijn van externe bronnen en lexicale eigenschappen van teksten vastleggen bij zowel translationese detectie als brontaal identificatie taken.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en translationesisk undersøgelse baseret på parallelle data fra det russiske nationalkorps (RNC). Vi undersøgte forskelle mellem litterære tekster oprindeligt forfattet på russisk og fiktion oversat til russisk fra 11 sprog. Teksterne er repræsenteret med frekvensbaserede funktioner, der fanger strukturelle og leksikske egenskaber af sprog. Binære klassifikationsresultater indikerer, at litterære oversættelser kan skelnes fra ikke-oversættelser med en nøjagtighed på mellem 82 og 92% afhængigt af kildesprog og funktionssæt. Klassificering i flere klasser bekræfter, at oversættelser fra fjerntliggende sprog adskiller sig mere fra ikke-oversættelser end oversættelser fra sprog, der er typologisk tæt på russisk. Det viser også, at oversættelser fra kildesprog af samme familie deler oversættelsesegenskaber. Strukturelle funktioner giver mere ensartede resultater end funktioner, der er afhængige af eksterne ressourcer og indfanger teksters leksikiske egenskaber i både oversættelsesdetektion og kildesprogeidentifikationsopgaver.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя преводаческо изследване въз основа на паралелни данни от Руския национален корпус (РНК). Изследвахме разликите между литературните текстове, които първоначално са автори на руски език, и художествената литература, преведена на руски език от 11 езика. Текстовете са представени с честотни характеристики, които улавят структурните и лексикалните свойства на езика. Резултатите от бинарната класификация показват, че литературните преводи могат да бъдат разграничени от непреводите с точност от 82 до 92% в зависимост от изходния език и набор от функции. Многокласната класификация потвърждава, че преводите от далечни езици са по-различни от непълените, отколкото преводите от езици, които са типологично близки до руския. Той също така демонстрира, че преводите от еднофамилни езици споделят свойствата на превода. Структурните характеристики връщат по-последователни резултати от функциите, разчитащи на външни ресурси и улавящи лексикалните свойства на текстовете както при задачите за откриване на превод, така и при идентифициране на изходния език.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt eine translationale Studie vor, die auf den parallelen Daten des Russischen Nationalkorpus (RNC) basiert. Wir untersuchten Unterschiede zwischen literarischen Texten, die ursprünglich auf Russisch verfasst wurden, und Fiktion, die aus elf Sprachen ins Russische übersetzt wurde. Die Texte werden mit frequenzbasierten Merkmalen dargestellt, die strukturelle und lexikalische Eigenschaften der Sprache erfassen. Binäre Klassifizierungsergebnisse deuten darauf hin, dass literarische Übersetzungen von Nicht-Übersetzungen mit einer Genauigkeit von 82 bis 92% je nach Ausgangssprache und Merkmalssatz unterschieden werden können. Die Mehrklassenklassifikation bestätigt, dass Übersetzungen aus fernen Sprachen sich von Nicht-Übersetzungen unterscheiden als Übersetzungen aus Sprachen, die typologisch nah am Russischen sind. Es zeigt auch, dass Übersetzungen aus Quellsprachen derselben Familie translationesische Eigenschaften teilen. Strukturelle Merkmale liefern konsistentere Ergebnisse als Funktionen, die auf externe Ressourcen angewiesen sind und lexikalische Eigenschaften von Texten sowohl bei der translationalen Erkennung als auch bei der Quellspracherkennung erfassen.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menunjukkan sebuah studi terjemahan berdasarkan data paralel dari Korpus Nasional Rusia (RNC). Kami mengeksplorasi perbedaan antara teks sastra yang pertama ditulis dalam bahasa Rusia dan fiksi terjemahkan ke bahasa Rusia dari 11 bahasa. Teks dipilih dengan karakteristik berdasarkan frekuensi yang menangkap properti struktur dan lexik bahasa. Hasil klasifikasi binari menunjukkan bahwa terjemahan sastra dapat dibedakan dari non-terjemahan dengan akurasi yang berlangsung dari 82 sampai 92% tergantung pada bahasa sumber dan set fitur. Klasifikasi multikelas mengkonfirmasi bahwa terjemahan dari bahasa jauh lebih berbeda dari non-terjemahan daripada terjemahan dari bahasa yang tipologis dekat dengan Rusia. Ini juga menunjukkan bahwa terjemahan dari bahasa sumber keluarga yang sama berbagi properti terjemahan. Structural features return more consistent results than features relying on external resources and capturing lexical properties of texts in both translationese detection and source language identification tasks.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta utafiti wa tafsiri kwa kutumia taarifa za usambazaji kutoka Shirika la Taifa la Urusi (RNC). Tulitafuta tofauti kati ya maandiko ya fasihi yaliyoandikwa kwa asili ya Kirusi na hadithi zilizotafsiriwa kuwa Urusi kutoka lugha 11. Maandishi yanawakilishwa na vipengele vya kiwango ambavyo vinavyotumia muundo na utaalam wa lugha. Matokeo ya usambazaji wa msingi yanaonyesha kuwa tafsiri za fasihi zinaweza kutofautishwa na tafsiri isiyo na maana yenye uhakika kuanzia asilimia 82 hadi 92 zinategemea lugha na seti ya rasilimali. Tafsiri za darasa nyingi zinathibitisha kuwa tafsiri kutoka lugha mbali ni tofauti zaidi na tafsiri isiyo na utafsiri kutoka lugha ambazo kwa kawaida ni karibu na Urusi. Pia inaonyesha kwamba tafsiri kutoka lugha hizo za familia zinazohusisha utafsiri. Tamko za miundombinu zinarudia matokeo yenye msimamo zaidi ya vipengele vinavyotegemea rasilimali za nje na kupata vifaa vya viwanda vya lexico katika tafsiri na kazi za kutambua lugha za asili.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz Rus Milli Korpus (RNC) tarapyndan parallel maglumatlara daýanýan bir terjime edişi görkezýär. Biz edebiýarly metinler arasynda ilkinji Rusça we faýllaryň arasynda 11 dilden terjime edilen farklygyny gözledik. Metinler dili strukturlary we leksiýaly häsiýetleri taýýarlanan çyzgytlar bilen suratlandyrylýar. Ikinji ýygnak netijesi edebiýat terjimeleri 82-92 % den çeşme dilinden we karakterlere taýýarlanan terjimelerden tapawutlar diýip görkezilýär. Birnäçe synp birleşmeleri uzak dillerden terjime edilmelerden Rusça ýakyn dillerden terjime edilmelerden has baglanýandygyny takyklaýar. Munuň üçin bir maşgala çeşmelerinden terjime edilen terjime edilen özellikleri paýlaşýar. strukturlar çykyş şekilleri daşarydaky çeşmelere we terjime edilen çykyş we çeşme dilinde leksiýal hasaplanjak netijesinden köpräk netijesi yzarlar.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n translationese studie gebaseer op die parallele data van die Russiese Nasionale Korpus (RNC). Ons het verskille tussen literarie teks oorspronklik oorgeskryf in Russiese en fiction oorsettel na Russiese van 11 tale. Die teks word voorgestel met frekwensiegebaseerde funksies wat strukturele en leksiese eienskappe van taal opneem. Binêre klassifikasie resultate wys dat literarie vertalings kan wees afgeskil van nie- vertalings met 'n presisie van 82 tot 92% afhanklik van die bron taal en funksie stel. Multiklasklasklassifikasie bevestig dat vertalings van afstand taal meer onderskeur is van nie- vertalings as vertalings van tale wat tipologies naby Russiese is. Dit bevestig ook dat vertalings van dieselfde familie bron tale deur translationese eienskappe deel. Struktuurale funksies terugkeer meer konsistente resultate as funksies wat op eksterne hulpbronne vertrou en leksiese eienskappe van tekste in beide translationese opskrywing en bron taal identifikasie taak.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet një studim përkthyes bazuar në të dhënat paralele nga Korpi Kombëtar Rus (RNC). Ne eksploruam dallimet midis teksteve letrare fillimisht të shkruara në rusisht dhe fiksionit të përkthyer në rusisht nga 11 gjuhë. Tekstet janë përfaqësuar me karakteristika bazuar në frekuencë që kapin pronësitë strukturore dhe lexike të gjuhës. Rezultatet e klasifikimit binar tregojnë se përkthimet letërore mund të dallohen nga jo-përkthimet me një saktësi që varion nga 82 deri 92% në varësi të gjuhës dhe përcaktimit të burimit. Multiclass classification confirms that translations from distant languages are more distinct from non-translations than translations from languages that are typologically close to Russian.  It also demonstrates that translations from same-family source languages share translationese properties.  Karakteristikat strukturore kthejnë rezultate më konsistente sesa karakteristikat që mbështeten në burimet e jashtme dhe kapin pronësitë lexike të teksteve në detyrat e zbulimit të përkthimit dhe identifikimit të gjuhës burimore.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ከሮሽኛ የብሔራዊ ኮርፓስ (RNC) በተያያያዩ ዳታ ላይ የተመሳሳይ የትርጉም ትርጓሜዎችን ያቀርባል፡፡ በመጀመሪያው በሮሽኛ እና በንግግር የተጻፈውን በሐሳብ ጽሑፎች መካከል ልዩነትን መረመርን ከ11 ቋንቋዎች ወደ ራሽኛ ተዘጋጅተናል፡፡ የጽሑፎች የቋንቋን ግንኙነት እና የሜክሲካዊ ምርጫዎችን በሚያዙ በቁጥጥር ላይ በሚያሳየው አቀፍ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን ቋንቋ እና የፊደል ቅርጽ በመጠቀም ላይ ከ82 እስከ 92 በመቶ የተለየ ትርጉም እንዲለይ የሚችል የሐሳብ ትርጉም ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ ብዙ ክፍል መግለጫ ከሩቅ ቋንቋዎች ትርጓሜዎች በተለይታ ከቋንቋዎች ይልቅ የተለየ ነው፡፡ እንደዚህም ደግሞ ከቤተሰብ ቋንቋዎች ትርጓሜዎችን ትርጓሜዎችን ለመተርጓሜ እዝነትን እንዲያካፍሉ ያሳያል፡፡ የሥርዓት ምርጫዎች ውጪ ሀብት ላይ ከሚታመሙ እና የጽሑፎችን የሌክሲካዊ ምርጫዎች በመግለጽ እና የsource ቋንቋ identification ስራዎችን ከመጠቀም የሚጨምሩ ፍሬዎችን በመለስ ይመለሳሉ።', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է թարգմանման ուսումնասիրություն, որը հիմնված է Ռուսաստանի ազգային կորպուսի (ՌՆԿ) զուգահեռ տվյալների վրա: Մենք ուսումնասիրեցինք տարբերությունները գրական տեքստների միջև, որոնք սկզբնական հեղինակում էին ռուս լեզվով, և արձակագրությունը, որը թարգմանվում էր ռուս լեզվով 11 լեզվով: Տեքստերը ներկայացված են հաճախականությամբ հիմնված հատկություններով, որոնք ներկայացնում են լեզվի կառուցվածքային և լեքսիկական հատկությունները: Երկունական դասակարգման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ գրական թարգմանությունները կարող են տարբերվել ոչ թարգմանություններից, որոնց ճշգրտությունը 82-92 տոկոսից է տարբերվում, կախված աղբյուր լեզվից և հատկություններից: Բազմադասարանային դասակարգումը հաստատում է, որ հեռավոր լեզուներից թարգմանությունները առավել տարբերվում են ոչ թարգմանություններից, քան թարգմանությունները լեզուներից, որոնք տիպոլոգիապես մոտ են Ռուսաստանին: It also demonstrates that translations from same-family source languages share translationese properties.  Կառուծային հատկությունները վերադարձնում են ավելի համապատասխանատու արդյունքներ, քան արտաքին ռեսուրսների վրա հիմնված հատկությունները և տեքստների լեքսիկական հատկությունները վերցնելը թարգմանությունների հայտնաբերման և աղբյուր լեզուների հայտն', 'az': 'Bu kağıt Rus Ulusal Korpus (RNC) tərəfindən paralel məlumatlarına dayanan bir tərcümə tərzini göstərir. Biz yazılı mətnlər arasında ilk olaraq Rus və fikirlərdə yazılmış fərqlərə keşf etdik ki, 11 dildən Rus dilinə çevrildi. Mətnlər dillərin strukturlu və leksik özelliklərini tutan frekans-tabanlı xüsusiyyətlərlə göstərildir. İkili klasifikasiya sonuçları yazılı tercümələrin 82-92%-dən istiqamətlə çevirilmədiyini göstərir. Çoxlu sınıf klasifikasiyası, uzaq dillərdən tercümələrin Rusya dillərinin tərcümələrindən daha çox fərqli olduğunu təsdiqləyir. Bu da bir ailə mənbə dillərindən tərcümələrin tərcümələri tərcümələrin tərcümələri tərcümələrindən paylaşır. Struktural xüsusiyyətlər daxili kaynaklara təvəkkül edən və hər ikisinin translatyonlu tanıtma və mənbə dil tanıtma işlərində mətnlərin leksik xüsusiyyətlərinin əlaqəsindən daha sürəkli sonuçlarını qaytarır.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা রাশিয়ান জাতীয় কোর্পাস (আরএনসি) থেকে প্যারালেল ডাটা ভিত্তিক একটি অনুবাদের গবেষণা উপস্থাপন করছে। আমরা সাহিত্যের লেখাগুলোর মধ্যে পার্থক্য খুঁজে বের করেছি যা প্রথমে রাশিয়ান এবং ফিকেশনে লেখা হয়েছে রুশ ভাষ এই টেক্সটের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হচ্ছে ফ্রেঞ্চ ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে যা ভাষার কাঠামো এবং লেক্সিক্যাল ব Binary classification results indicate that literary translations can be distinguished from non-translations with an accuracy ranging from 82 to 92% depending on the source language and feature set.  বহুক্ষেত্রের বিভাগ নিশ্চিত করে যে দূরবর্তী ভাষার অনুবাদ অনুবাদ অনুবাদ অনুবাদের থেকে বেশি ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষায় যা সা একই পরিবারের সূত্রের ভাষার অনুবাদ অনুবাদ অনুবাদ অনুবাদের ভাষায় ভাগাভাগি ভাগাভাগি ভাগাভাগি ভা কৌশলের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর ফলাফল বাইরের সম্পদের উপর নির্ভর করার চেয়েও বেশী সংস্থার ফিরে আসে এবং অনুবাদের ভাষার পরিচয় এবং উৎস পরিচয়ের কাজে লেক্সিকাল ব', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja prevodnu studiju na temelju paralelnih podataka ruskog nacionalnog korpusa (RNC). Istražili smo razlike između književnih tekstova iz početka autorizovanih na ruskom i fikciji prevedeno na ruski od 11 jezika. Teksti su predstavljeni sa karakteristikama na frekvenciji koja uključuju strukturne i leksičke vlasti jezika. Binarni rezultati klasifikacije ukazuju na to da se literarni prevodi mogu razlikovati od nepromijenjenih prevoda sa preciznošću od 82 do 92% u ovisnosti o nastavku izvornog jezika i karakteristika. Klasifikacija višeklase potvrđuje da su prevodi iz dalekih jezika različitiji od prevoda od jezika koje su tipološki blizu ruske. Također pokazuje da prevodi iz istih porodičnih izvorskih jezika dijele prevodne vlasništva. Strukturalne funkcije vraćaju konsekventnije rezultate nego karakteristike koje se oslanjaju na vanjske resurse i uhvate leksičke vlasništvo teksta u zadatku identifikacije i izvornog jezika.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta un estudi de traducció basat en les dades paralleles del Corpus Nacional de Rusia (RNC). Vam explorar les diferències entre els textos literaris originalment escrits en russo i la ficció traduïts en russo d'onze llengües. Els textos estan representats amb característiques basades en freqüències que capturen les propietats estructurals i lècsiques del llenguatge. Els resultats de la classificació binaria indican que les traduccions literaries poden distingir-se de les no traduccions amb una precisió que varia del 82 al 92% segons el llenguatge d'origen i el conjunt de característiques. La classificació multiclasse confirma que les traduccions de llengües llunyanes són més diferents de les no traduccions que les de llengües tipològicament properes del russo. També demostra que les traduccions de les mateixes llengües de font familiar comparteixen propietats de traducció. Les característiques estructurals retornan resultats més consistents que les que confien en recursos externs i capturan propietats lècsiques dels textos tant en les tasques de detecció de traducció com d'identificació del llenguatge de fonts.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje translační studii založenou na paralelních datech z Ruského národního sboru (RNC). Zkoumali jsme rozdíly mezi literárními texty původně psanými v ruštině a fikcí přeloženými do ruštiny z jedenácti jazyků. Texty jsou reprezentovány frekvenčně založenými prvky, které zachycují strukturální a lexikální vlastnosti jazyka. Výsledky binární klasifikace ukazují, že literární překlady lze odlišit od nepřekladů s přesností od 82 do 92% v závislosti na zdrojovém jazyce a sadě funkcí. Vícetřídní klasifikace potvrzuje, že překlady ze vzdálených jazyků jsou více odlišné od nepřekladů než překlady z jazyků, které jsou typologicky blízké ruštině. Také ukazuje, že překlady ze zdrojových jazyků stejné rodiny sdílejí vlastnosti překladu. Strukturální funkce přinášejí konzistentnější výsledky než funkce spoléhající na externí zdroje a zachycující lexikální vlastnosti textů jak při překladatelské detekci, tak při identifikaci zdrojového jazyka.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja prevodnu studiju na temelju paralelnih podataka ruskog nacionalnog korpusa (RNC). Istražili smo razlike između književnih tekstova iz početka autoriziranih na ruskom i fikcijskom prevedenom na ruski od 11 jezika. Teksti su predstavljeni s karakteristikama na temelju frekvencije koje uključuju strukturne i leksičke vlasti jezika. Binarni rezultati klasifikacije ukazuju na to da književni prevodi mogu biti odvojeni od nepromijenjenih prevoda sa preciznošću od 82 do 92% ovisno o nastavku izvornog jezika i karakteristika. Klasifikacija višeklase potvrđuje da su prevodi iz dalekih jezika različitiji od prevoda od jezika koji su tipološki bliski ruskom. Također pokazuje da prevodi iz istih obiteljskih izvorskih jezika dijele prevodne vlasništva. Strukturalne funkcije vraćaju konsekventnije rezultate nego karakteristike koje se oslanjaju na vanjske resurse i uhvaćenje leksičkih vlasništva teksta u zadatkima za otkrivanje i identifikaciju izvornog jezika.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitatakse Vene Rahvuskorpuse (RNC) paralleelsetel andmetel põhinev translationese uuring. Uurisime erinevusi algselt venekeelse kirjanduse ja 11 keelest venekeelse tõlgitud ilukirjanduse vahel. Tekstid on esitatud sageduspõhiste omadustega, mis kajastavad keele struktuurilisi ja leksikaalseid omadusi. Binaarse klassifitseerimise tulemused näitavad, et kirjanduslikke tõlkeid saab eristada mittetõlketest täpsusega 82–92% sõltuvalt lähtekeelest ja funktsioonide kogumist. Mitmeklassiline klassifikatsioon kinnitab, et kaugete keelte tõlked eristuvad rohkem mittetõlketest kui tõlked keeltest, mis on tüpoloogiliselt lähedased vene keelele. Samuti näitab see, et sama perekonna lähtekeeltest pärit tõlked jagavad tõlkimise omadusi. Struktuurilised funktsioonid annavad ühtlasemaid tulemusi kui välisressurssidel põhinevad funktsioonid ja hõlmavad tekstide leksikaalseid omadusi nii tõlkekaeli tuvastamise kui lähtekeele tuvastamise ülesannetes.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitetään käännöstutkimus, joka perustuu Venäjän kansalliskunnan (RNC) rinnakkaistietoihin. Tutkimme eroja alun perin venäjänkielisten kirjallisten tekstien ja venäjänkielisten 11 kielestä käännetyn fiktion välillä. Tekstit on esitetty taajuuspohjaisilla ominaisuuksilla, jotka kuvaavat kielen rakenteellisia ja leksikaalisia ominaisuuksia. Binääriluokituksen tulokset osoittavat, että kirjalliset käännökset voidaan erottaa muista kuin käännöksistä, joiden tarkkuus vaihtelee 82–92% lähdekielestä ja ominaisuuksista riippuen. Moniluokkainen luokitus vahvistaa, että kaukaisilta kieliltä tulevat käännökset eroavat enemmän ei-käännöksistä kuin käännökset kieliltä, jotka ovat typologisesti lähellä venäjää. Se osoittaa myös, että saman perheen lähdekielten käännökset jakavat käännösominaisuuksia. Rakenteelliset ominaisuudet tuottavat johdonmukaisempia tuloksia kuin ulkoisiin resursseihin perustuvat ominaisuudet, jotka tallentavat tekstien sanastoominaisuuksia sekä käännöksen tunnistus- että lähdekielen tunnistustehtävissä.', 'ko': '본고는 러시아 국가어료고(RNC)의 평행 데이터를 바탕으로 번역 연구를 진행한다.우리는 최초로 러시아어로 창작된 문학 텍스트와 11개 언어에서 러시아어로 번역된 소설 간의 차이를 탐구했다.텍스트는 주파수를 바탕으로 하는 특징으로 이러한 특징은 언어의 구조와 어휘 특성을 포착했다.이원 분류 결과 원어와 특징집에 따라 문학 번역과 비번역의 정확도는 82%에서 92% 사이였다.여러 종류의 분류가 증명하듯이 먼 언어에서 온 번역이 유형적으로 러시아어에 가까운 언어에서 온 번역보다 비번역과 더욱 다르다.또한 같은 소스 언어에서 온 번역이translationese 속성을 공유하고 있음을 나타낸다.번역 검측과 원시 언어 식별 임무에서 구조적 특징은 외부 자원에 의존하고 텍스트 어휘 속성을 포획하는 특징보다 일치하는 결과를 되돌려준다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک مطالعه تغییرات را بر اساس داده\u200cهای پارالی از کورپ ملی روسیه (RNC) نشان می\u200cدهد. ما اختلافات بین متن\u200cهای کتاب\u200cنویسی که در ابتدایی در روسیه و افسانه\u200cهای نویسی به روسیه از ۱۱ زبان ترجمه شده\u200cایم تحقیق کردیم. متن\u200cها با ویژگی\u200cهای بنیاد فرکانس نشان داده می\u200cشوند که ویژگی\u200cهای ساختار و زبانی زبان را می\u200cگیرند. نتایج تجارت دویینی نشان می دهد که ترجمه\u200cهای نوشته\u200cای می\u200cتوانند از ترجمه\u200cهای غیر\u200cترجمه جدا شوند با دقیقیتی که از 82 تا 92 درصد بستگی به زبان منبع و مجموعه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای منبع است. کلاس چندین کلاس تایید می\u200cکند که ترجمه\u200cها از زبان\u200cهای دور از ترجمه\u200cهای غیر\u200cترجمه\u200cها بیشتر از ترجمه\u200cها از زبان\u200cها که به نوع\u200cشناسی نزدیک روسیه هستند. همچنین نشان می\u200cدهد که ترجمه\u200cها از زبانهای منبع یک خانواده ویژه\u200cهای ترجمه را شریک می\u200cکنند. ویژگی\u200cهای ساختاری نتیجه\u200cهای پایدار بیشتر از ویژگی\u200cهایی که بر منابع خارجی اعتماد دارند و ویژگی\u200cهای زبانی از متن\u200cها در مورد شناسایی\u200cهای ترجمه و زبان\u200cهای منبع می\u200cگیرند.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljena prevajalska študija, ki temelji na vzporednih podatkih ruskega narodnega korpusa (RNC). Raziskovali smo razlike med literarnimi besedili, prvotno avtorskimi v ruščini, in fikcijskimi besedili, prevedenimi v ruščino iz 11 jezikov. Besedila so predstavljena s frekvenčnimi značilnostmi, ki zajemajo strukturne in leksikalne lastnosti jezika. Rezultati dvojne klasifikacije kažejo, da se literarni prevodi lahko razlikujejo od neprevodov z natančnostjo od 82 do 92%, odvisno od izvornega jezika in nabora funkcij. Večrazredna klasifikacija potrjuje, da so prevodi iz oddaljenih jezikov bolj različni od neprevodov kot prevodi iz jezikov, ki so tipološko blizu ruskemu jeziku. Prav tako kaže, da prevodi iz iste družine izvornih jezikov delijo prevajalske lastnosti. Strukturne značilnosti prinašajo doslednejše rezultate kot značilnosti, ki se opirajo na zunanje vire in zajemajo leksikalne lastnosti besedil pri prevajanju in identifikaciji izvornega jezika.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki gunakake tresnaning panjenengan sing basa dadi paralelel karo corpus Nalikar Rusi (DNC). Awak dhéwé éntukno panggon sampeyan itèké gambar kelas telu kuwi bisa ngupakan ning resno karo hak-hak sing terusan ning 11 barang Russisa. textattr Refs AllProgressBar Jejaring structural settings', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג מחקר תרגום מבוסס על נתונים מקבילים של הקורפוס הלאומי הרוסי (RNC). חקרנו את ההבדלים בין טקסטים ספרתיים שנכתבו במקור ברוסית ודמיונים שנתרשמו לרוסי מ-11 שפות. הטקסטים מייצגים עם תכונות מבוססים על תדירות שמתפסות תכונות מבנה וקסמיות של שפה. תוצאות מסווג בינריות מצביעות כי התרגשות הספרתיות יכולות להבדיל מאין התרגשות עם מדויקה מגוונת מ-82 ל-92% תלוי בשפה המקורית וקבוצת תכונות. Multiclass classification confirms that translations from distant languages are more distinct from non-translations than translations from languages that are typologically close to Russian.  It also demonstrates that translations from same-family source languages share translationese properties.  תכונות מבנה מחזירות תוצאות קבועות יותר מאשר תכונות שמסומכים על משאבים חיצוניים ולתפוס תכונות לקסיות של טקסטים בשני משימות זיהוי שפת תורגם ומקור.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun na zo da wata fassarar fassararsa a based on the parallel data from the RNC National Corbus (RNC). Ba mu rarraba diffaniki a tsakanin littafan littafi da aka rubuta a farkon da aka fassara a cikin Ruushi da fassarar zuwa harshen 11. An nuna littãfin da wasu fasanni na ƙayyade farat-maras da ke kãma properties na rubutu da leksisi. Faramarrar fassarar da labari na ƙidãya sun nuna cewa za'a rarraba fassarori na littafin da wani tsari na tsakanin 82 zuwa 92, yana daidaita kan harshen maɓallin maganar da za'a daidaita. Tsarin daraja mai yawa na gaskata cẽwa fassarori daga harshen wuri mai nĩsa za'a tsakanin su daga fassarar-tarjibu daga harshen waɗanda aka typically ke kusanta Ruushi. Yana nuna fassarori daga lugha da ke samun sa'an nan, sunã share properties of fassarar. Furofati na ƙidido na mayar da matsala mafi consista ko wasu fassarar masu ƙayyade kan rasilin na ƙarƙashin, kuma sunã kãma properties na littafin kifi na fassarar da kuma sunayen lugha na fassarar.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རྒྱ་ནག་ཀྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ནང་ནས་དབུས་གཏོང་གི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྩོམ་འབྲི་ཡི་གེའི་དབར་གྱི་ཁྱད་པར་དག་ལ་རྩོམ་ཤིག་བྱས་ཆོས་རྣམས་དང་གསར་གཏོང་ནང་སྤྲོད་རྩོམ་པ་དང ཡི་གེས་ཚིག་འདི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་ཁ་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ངོ་བོར་ཡིག་དང་ཐོག་བཀོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གཞི་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ Binary classification results indicate that literary translations can be distinguished from non-translations with an accuracy ranging from 82 to 92% depending on the source language and feature set. སྐད་ཡིག་ཐག་རིང་ནས་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་མིན་འདུག འདིས་ཀྱང་ནང་ཚང་མོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཆ་མཚུངས་ཡིན་པ Structural features return more consistent results than features relying on external resources and capturing lexical properties of texts in both translationese detection and source language identification tasks.'}
{'en': 'Sentiment Analysis in Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text with Unsupervised Data Normalization', 'pt': 'Análise de sentimento em texto télugo-inglês de código misto com normalização de dados não supervisionada', 'es': 'Análisis de sentimientos en texto telugu e inglés con código mixto con normalización de datos no supervisada', 'ar': 'تحليل المشاعر في نص التيلجو-الإنجليزي المختلط بالرمز مع تطبيع البيانات غير الخاضع للإشراف', 'fr': 'Analyse des sentiments dans un texte telugu et anglais mixte avec normalisation des données non supervisée', 'ja': '監督されていないデータの正規化を伴うコード混合テルグ語-英語テキストでのセンチメント分析', 'ru': 'Анализ настроений в кодово-смешанном телугу-английском тексте с неконтролируемой нормализацией данных', 'hi': 'Unsupervised डेटा सामान्यीकरण के साथ कोड-मिश्रित तेलुगु-अंग्रेजी पाठ में भावना विश्लेषण', 'zh': '有无监数规范化代码混合泰卢固语-英语文本之情析', 'ga': 'Anailís Mothúchán i dTéacs Cód-Measctha Teileagúis-Béarla le Normalú Sonraí Gan Mhaoirseacht', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ανάλυση συναισθημάτων σε μικτό τελούγκου-αγγλικό κείμενο με μη εποπτευόμενη τυποποίηση δεδομένων', 'kk': 'Код араластырылған Telugu- ағылшын мәтіндегі Sentiment анализациясы қолданылмаған деректер нормализациясы', 'it': 'Analisi dei sentimenti in testo telugu-inglese misto con normalizzazione dei dati non sorvegliata', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Sentiment Analysis in Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text with Unsupervised Data Normalization', 'ml': 'കോഡ്- Mixed Telugu- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പദാവലി', 'lt': 'Sentiment Analysis in Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text with Unsupervised Data Normalization', 'mt': 'Analiżi tas-Sentiment fit-Test tat-Telugu-Ingliż imħallat bil-Kodiċi b’Normalizzazzjoni tad-Dejta Mhux Sorveljata', 'mn': 'Sentiment Analysis in Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text with Unsupervised Data Normalization', 'hu': 'Érzelmelemzés kódkevert telugu-angol szövegben felügyeletlen adatszolgáltatással', 'no': 'Sentimental analyse i teksten med mellom kodeflikt Telugu- engelsk med ikkje- spesifisert datanormalisering', 'ro': 'Analiza sentimentelor în text telugu-engleză combinat cu coduri cu normalizarea datelor nesupravegheate', 'so': 'Analyse in Code-Mixed Telugu-Ingiriis text with Unsupervised Data Normalization', 'sr': 'Analiza sentimenta u tekstu Telugu-engleskog miješanog koda sa neodržavanom normalizacijom podataka', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Känsleanalys i kodblandad telugu-engelsk text med oövervakad datanormalisering', 'ur': 'کڈ- میکس- انگلیسی ٹیلوگو- انگلیسی ٹیکسٹ میں سنٹیمینٹ تحلیل غیر محفوظت ڈاٹ نارمولیزی کے ساتھ', 'pl': 'Analiza sentymentów w tekście telugu-angielskim mieszanym kodem z normalizacją danych niekontrolowanych', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத தரவு இயல்பாக்குதலுடன் குறியீடு- கலக்கப்பட்ட ட டெல்கு- ஆங்கிலம் உரை', 'vi': 'Bản phân tích cảm xúc trong Văn bản Telug-English với chưa giới hạn tiêu hóa dữ liệu', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Анализ на сентимента в кодово смесен телугу-английски текст с нестандартна нормализация на данните', 'nl': 'Sentimentanalyse in code-gemengde Telugu-Engelse tekst met onbeheerde gegevensnormalisatie', 'da': 'Følelsesanalyse i kodeblandet telugu-engelsk tekst med ukontrolleret datanormalisering', 'hr': 'Analiza osjetljivosti u tekstu Telugu-engleskog miješanog koda s neodržavanom normalizacijom podataka', 'de': 'Sentimentanalyse in Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text mit unbeaufsichtigter Datennormalisierung', 'id': 'Analisi Sentiment dalam Teks Telugu-Inggris Bercampur Kode dengan Normalisasi Data Tidak Disupervisi', 'fa': 'تحلیل احساسات در متن Telugu- انگلیسی با معمولی داده\u200cهای غیرقابل حفاظت', 'ko': '무감독 데이터 규범화 코드 혼합 테루고어 영어 텍스트 감정 분석', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Sentiment in Code-Mixed Telugu-English text with Unwatched Data Normalization', 'af': 'Sentiment Analiseer in Kode- gemengde Telugu- Engels Teks met Ononderwerpende Data Normaliseering', 'sq': 'Analiza e ndjenjave në tekstin e përzier në kod Telugu-Anglisht me Normalizimin e të dhënave të Pambikqyrura', 'tr': 'Mazmunladyk Maglumaty Dämelemelemeleri bilen Sentiment Taýramlygy', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Kod-Karışılmış Telugu-İngilizə Metninin Sentiment Analizi', 'bn': 'কোড- মিক্সেড টেলুগু- ইংরেজি টেক্সটে সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ অনভারভাইভারেট ডাটা স্বাভারেশন', 'bs': 'Analiza sentimenta u tekstu Telugu-engleskog spojenog koda sa neodržavanom normalizacijom podataka', 'ca': 'Anàlisi de sentiments en text telugu-anglès combinat amb codi amb normalització de dades sense supervisió', 'cs': 'Sentimentní analýza v kódově smíšeném telugu-anglickém textu s neobsluhovanou datovou normalizací', 'et': 'Sentimentide analüüs koodisegatud telugu-inglise tekstis järelevalveta andmete normaliseerimisega', 'fi': 'Tunteanalyysi koodisekoitetussa telugu-englantilaisessa tekstissä, jossa ei ole valvottua datan normalisointia', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Analiza čustev v telovško-angleškem besedilu s kodo mešanim besedilom z nenadzorovano normalizacijo podatkov', 'he': 'ניתוח הרגשה בטקסט טלוגו-אנגלי מעורבב עם נורמליזציה של נתונים ללא השגחה', 'bo': 'Sentiment Analysis in Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text with Unsupervised Data Normalization', 'jv': 'Sentiment Resolution'}
{'en': 'In a multilingual society, people communicate in more than one language, leading to Code-Mixed data. Sentimental analysis on Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text (CMTET) poses unique challenges. The unstructured nature of the Code-Mixed Data is due to the informal language, informal transliterations, and spelling errors. In this paper, we introduce an annotated dataset for Sentiment Analysis in CMTET. Also, we report an accuracy of 80.22 % on this dataset using novel unsupervised data normalization with a Multilayer Perceptron (MLP) model. This proposed data normalization technique can be extended to any NLP task involving CMTET. Further, we report an increase of 2.53 % accuracy due to this data normalization approach in our best model.', 'ar': 'في مجتمع متعدد اللغات ، يتواصل الناس بأكثر من لغة واحدة ، مما يؤدي إلى بيانات مختلطة الشفرة. يطرح التحليل العاطفي على Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text (CMTET) تحديات فريدة. ترجع الطبيعة غير المهيكلة للبيانات المختلطة في الشفرة إلى اللغة غير الرسمية والترجمات الصوتية غير الرسمية والأخطاء الإملائية. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم مجموعة بيانات مشروحة لتحليل المشاعر في CMTET. أيضًا ، أبلغنا عن دقة تبلغ 80.22٪ في مجموعة البيانات هذه باستخدام تطبيع بيانات جديد غير خاضع للرقابة باستخدام نموذج متعدد الطبقات (MLP). يمكن أن تمتد تقنية تطبيع البيانات المقترحة إلى أي مهمة من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية التي تتضمن CMTET. علاوة على ذلك ، أبلغنا عن زيادة دقة بنسبة 2.53٪ بسبب نهج تطبيع البيانات هذا في أفضل نموذج لدينا.', 'fr': "Dans une société multilingue, les gens communiquent dans plusieurs langues, ce qui donne lieu à des données mixtes de codes. L'analyse sentimentale sur texte mixte telugu et anglais (CMTET) pose des défis uniques. La nature non structurée des données mixtes de code est due au langage informel, aux translittérations informelles et aux fautes d'orthographe. Dans cet article, nous présentons un jeu de données annoté pour l'analyse des sentiments dans CMTET. Nous rapportons également une précision de 80,22\xa0% sur cet ensemble de données en utilisant une nouvelle normalisation de données non supervisée avec un modèle de perceptron multicouche (MLP). Cette technique de normalisation des données proposée peut être étendue à toute tâche de PNL impliquant CMTET. De plus, nous signalons une augmentation de la précision de 2,53\xa0% en raison de cette approche de normalisation des données dans notre meilleur modèle.", 'es': 'En una sociedad multilingüe, las personas se comunican en más de un idioma, lo que genera datos de código mixto. El análisis sentimental del texto telugú-inglés de código mixto (CMTET) plantea desafíos únicos. La naturaleza no estructurada de los datos de código mixto se debe al lenguaje informal, las transliteraciones informales y los errores ortográficos. En este artículo, presentamos un conjunto de datos anotado para el análisis de sentimientos en CMTET. Además, informamos una precisión del 80,22% en este conjunto de datos utilizando una nueva normalización de datos no supervisada con un modelo de Perceptrón Multicapa (MLP). Esta técnica de normalización de datos propuesta se puede extender a cualquier tarea de PNL que implique CMTET. Además, informamos de un aumento de la precisión del 2,53% debido a este enfoque de normalización de datos en nuestro mejor modelo.', 'pt': 'Em uma sociedade multilíngue, as pessoas se comunicam em mais de um idioma, levando a dados Code-Mixed. A análise sentimental do Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text (CMTET) apresenta desafios únicos. A natureza não estruturada dos dados mistos de código se deve à linguagem informal, transliterações informais e erros de ortografia. Neste artigo, apresentamos um conjunto de dados anotado para Análise de Sentimento no CMTET. Além disso, relatamos uma precisão de 80,22% neste conjunto de dados usando nova normalização de dados não supervisionada com um modelo Multilayer Perceptron (MLP). Esta técnica de normalização de dados proposta pode ser estendida a qualquer tarefa de PNL envolvendo CMTET. Além disso, relatamos um aumento de 2,53% de precisão devido a essa abordagem de normalização de dados em nosso melhor modelo.', 'hi': 'एक बहुभाषी समाज में, लोग एक से अधिक भाषाओं में संवाद करते हैं, जिससे कोड-मिश्रित डेटा होता है। कोड-मिश्रित तेलुगु-अंग्रेजी पाठ (सीएमटीईटी) पर भावनात्मक विश्लेषण अद्वितीय चुनौतियां पैदा करता है। कोड-मिश्रित डेटा की असंरचित प्रकृति अनौपचारिक भाषा, अनौपचारिक लिप्यंतरण और वर्तनी त्रुटियों के कारण है। इस पेपर में, हम CMTET में भावना विश्लेषण के लिए एक एनोटेट डेटासेट पेश करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम एक बहुपरत Perceptron (MLP) मॉडल के साथ उपन्यास unsupervised डेटा सामान्यीकरण का उपयोग कर इस डेटासेट पर 80.22% की सटीकता की रिपोर्ट करते हैं। इस प्रस्तावित डेटा सामान्यीकरण तकनीक को सीएमटीईटी से जुड़े किसी भी एनएलपी कार्य तक बढ़ाया जा सकता है। इसके अलावा, हम अपने सर्वश्रेष्ठ मॉडल में इस डेटा सामान्यीकरण दृष्टिकोण के कारण 2.53% सटीकता में वृद्धि की रिपोर्ट करते हैं।', 'ja': '多言語社会では、人々は複数の言語でコミュニケーションを行い、Code - Mixedデータにつながります。コードミックステルグ語-英語テキスト（ CMTET ）に関するセンチメンタルな分析は、独自の課題をもたらします。コードミックスデータの非構造化の性質は、非公式言語、非公式の音訳、スペルミスに起因します。本稿では、CMTETにおけるセンチメント分析のための注釈付きデータセットを紹介する。また、このデータセットでは、多層パーセプトロン（ MLP ）モデルを使用した新規の監視されていないデータ正規化を使用して、80.22 ％の精度が報告されています。この提案されたデータ正規化技術は、CMTETを伴う任意のNLPタスクに拡張することができます。さらに、当社のBESTモデルでは、このデータ正規化アプローチにより、精度が2.53 ％増加したと報告しています。', 'ga': 'I sochaí ilteangach, déanann daoine cumarsáid i níos mó ná teanga amháin, as a dtagann sonraí Cód-mheasctha. Tá dúshláin uathúla ag baint le hanailís sentimental ar Téacs Cód-Measctha Teileagúis-Béarla (CMTET). Is de bharr na teanga neamhfhoirmiúla, na traslitrithe neamhfhoirmiúla, agus earráidí litrithe is cúis le nádúr neamhstruchtúrtha na Sonraí Cód-Mheasctha. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach tacar sonraí anótáilte le haghaidh Anailís Mothúchán in CMTET. Chomh maith leis sin, tuairiscímid cruinneas 80.22% ar an tacar sonraí seo ag baint úsáide as normalú sonraí nua gan mhaoirseacht le samhail Perceptron Ilchiseal (MLP). Is féidir an teicníocht normalaithe sonraí atá beartaithe a leathnú chuig aon tasc NLP a bhaineann le CMTET. Ina theannta sin, tuairiscímid ardú cruinnis 2.53% mar gheall ar an gcur chuige normalaithe sonraí seo inár múnla is fearr.', 'zh': '多言世,以多种语言交流,而代码合数也。 代码合泰卢固语- 英语文本(CMTET)情析独挑战。 代码合数非结构化性非正言,非正音译拼写错误也。 在本文中,我们介了一个用CMTET中情析的带注的数据集。 此外用重感知器(MLP)新型无监数归一化,告其数集80.22%准确率。 此数者规范化术之所及CMTETNLP也。 此外告称,最为佳法规范化,准确性增2.53%。', 'ru': 'В многоязычном обществе люди общаются более чем на одном языке, что приводит к получению смешанных данных. Сентиментальный анализ кодово-смешанного телугу - английского текста (CMTET) ставит уникальные задачи. Неструктурированный характер смешанных данных обусловлен неформальным языком, неформальной транслитерацией и орфографическими ошибками. В этой статье мы вводим аннотированный набор данных для анализа настроений в CMTET. Кроме того, мы сообщаем о точности 80,22% в этом наборе данных с использованием новой неконтролируемой нормализации данных с помощью многослойной модели перцептрона (MLP). Эта предлагаемая методика нормализации данных может быть распространена на любую задачу NLP, связанную с CMTET. Кроме того, мы сообщаем об увеличении точности на 2,53% благодаря такому подходу к нормализации данных в нашей лучшей модели.', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური საზოგადოებაში, ადამიანები უფრო მეტი ერთი ენაში კომუნიკაციენ, რომელიც კოდის შემხვევაში მონაცემებით. Name Code- Mixed Data- ის არსტრუქტურაციული სახელი იქნება ინფორმალური ენაზე, ინფორმალური ტრანსლიტრაციების და მართლის შეცდომაზე. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ CMTET-ში მონიშნული მონაცემების კონტაქტის ანალიზაციის შესახებ ჩვენ ჩვენ შევცვალოთ. ასევე, ჩვენ ამის მონაცემების კონტაქტის 80.22%-ის მარტივის შეტყობინებთ პრომენტი პერცეპტრონი (MLP) მოდელზე პრომენტის ნორმალიზაციას გამოყენებთ. ამ მონაცემების ნორმალიზაციის ტექნოგია შეიძლება გაფართვალობა ყველა NLP დავალებისთვის, რომელიც CMTET-ის შესახებ. შემდეგ, ჩვენ 2.53% წარმოდგენით წარმოდგენით ამ მონაცემების ნორმალიზაციის მიზეზით ჩვენი უკეთესი მოდელში.', 'hu': 'Egy többnyelvű társadalomban az emberek több mint egy nyelven kommunikálnak, ami kódkevert adatokhoz vezet. A Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text (CMTET) érzelmi elemzése egyedülálló kihívásokat jelent. A kódkevert adatok strukturálatlan jellege az informális nyelv, az informális transzliterációk és a helyesírási hibák miatt rejlik. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy jegyzetelt adatkészletet a CMTET Sentiment Analysis-hez. Továbbá 80,22%-os pontosságot jelentünk ezen adatkészleten új, felügyelet nélküli adatszabályozással, Multilayer Perceptron (MLP) modellel. Ez a javasolt adatszabályozási technika kiterjeszthető bármely CMTET-t érintő NLP-feladatra. Ezenkívül a legjobb modellünkben 2,53%-os pontosságnövekedést jelentünk az adatszabályozási megközelítésnek köszönhetően.', 'el': 'Σε μια πολυγλωσσική κοινωνία, οι άνθρωποι επικοινωνούν σε περισσότερες από μία γλώσσες, οδηγώντας σε δεδομένα μικτού κώδικα. Η συναισθηματική ανάλυση του κώδικα-μικτού τελούγκου-αγγλικού κειμένου (CMTET) θέτει μοναδικές προκλήσεις. Η άτυπη φύση των μικτών δεδομένων κώδικα οφείλεται στην άτυπη γλώσσα, τις άτυπες μεταγραφές και τα ορθογραφικά λάθη. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε ένα σχολιασμένο σύνολο δεδομένων για την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων στο CMTET. Επίσης, αναφέρουμε μια ακρίβεια 80,22% σε αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων χρησιμοποιώντας νέα μη επιτηρημένη ομαλοποίηση δεδομένων με ένα μοντέλο πολυστρωματικού Perceptron (MLP). Αυτή η προτεινόμενη τεχνική ομαλοποίησης δεδομένων μπορεί να επεκταθεί σε οποιαδήποτε εργασία που περιλαμβάνει CMTET. Περαιτέρω, αναφέρουμε αύξηση της ακρίβειας 2.53% λόγω αυτής της προσέγγισης ομαλοποίησης δεδομένων στο καλύτερο μοντέλο μας.', 'it': "In una società multilingue, le persone comunicano in più di una lingua, portando a dati codificati. L'analisi sentimentale sul testo telugu-inglese (CMTET) con codice misto pone sfide uniche. La natura non strutturata dei dati misti con codice è dovuta al linguaggio informale, alle traslitterazioni informali e agli errori di ortografia. In questo articolo presentiamo un dataset annotato per l'analisi dei sentimenti in CMTET. Inoltre, riportiamo un'accuratezza dell'80,22% su questo set di dati utilizzando una nuova normalizzazione dei dati non supervisionata con un modello Multilayer Perceptron (MLP). Questa tecnica di normalizzazione dei dati proposta può essere estesa a qualsiasi attività NLP che coinvolge CMTET. Inoltre, riportiamo un aumento del 2,53% di accuratezza dovuto a questo approccio di normalizzazione dei dati nel nostro modello migliore.", 'kk': 'Көптеген тілдер қоғамдарында адамдар бірнеше тілден байланысты, код- араластырылған деректерге көмектеседі. Код араластырылған Telugu- ағылшын мәтіні (CMTET) синтиминалды анализ бірнеше мәселелерді көрсетеді. Код араластырылған деректердің құрылмаған қасиеті мәліметті тіл, мәліметті аудару және емле қатесінің себебі болады. Бұл қағазда CMTET-де Sentiment анализациясы үшін белгіленген деректер жиынын келтіреміз. Сонымен қатар, біз бұл деректер жинағында 80,22% деген дұрыстығын бірнеше қабаттар процецептроны (MLP) үлгісімен романдық өзгертілмеген деректерді нормализациялау арқылы хабарлаймыз. Бұл келтірілген деректерді нормализациялау техникасы CMTET деген NLP тапсырмасына келтіруге болады. Қосымша, бұл деректерді нормализациялау тәртібіміздің ең жақсы үлгісінде 2,53% дұрыстығын өзгертіп береміз.', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbėje visuomenėje žmonės bendrauja daugiau kaip viena kalba, todėl gaunami mišrūs kodekso duomenys. Sentimentinė analizė, susijusi su „Code Mixed Telugu-English Text“ (CMTET), kelia unikalių iššūkių. Nestruktūrizuotas Mišrių duomenų kodekso pobūdis yra susijęs su neoficialiąja kalba, neoficialiais transliteracijomis ir rašybos klaidomis. Šiame dokumente pristatome anotuotą duomenų rinkinį jautrumo analizei CMTET. Be to, pranešime apie 80,22 % tikslumą šiame duomenų rinkinyje naudojant naują nepastebimą duomenų normalizavimą naudojant daugiasluoksnį Perceptron (MLP) model į. Šis siūlomas duomenų normalizavimo metodas gali būti išplėstas ir apimti bet kokias NLP užduotis, susijusias su CMTET. Be to, pranešime apie 2,53 proc. tikslumo padidėjimą dėl šio duomenų normalizavimo metodo mūsų geriausiame modelyje.', 'mk': 'Во мултијазичко општество, луѓето комуницираат на повеќе од еден јазик, што води до податоци мешани со код. Сентименталната анализа на телугу- англискиот текст (CMTET) со мешан код претставува уникатни предизвици. Неструктурната природа на кодовите мешани податоци е поради неформалниот јазик, неформалните транслитерации и грешки во правописот. Во овој весник, претставуваме анотиран податок за анализа на чувствата во CMTET. Also, we report an accuracy of 80.22% on this dataset using novel unsupervised data normalization with a Multilayer Perceptron (MLP) model.  Оваа предложена техника за нормализација на податоците може да се прошири на било која NLP задача која вклучува CMTET. Покрај тоа, пријавуваме зголемување на прецизноста од 2,53 отсто поради овој пристап на нормализација на податоците во нашиот најдобар модел.', 'ms': 'Dalam masyarakat berbilang bahasa, orang berkomunikasi dalam lebih dari satu bahasa, yang membawa kepada data campuran Kod. Name Sifat tidak terstruktur Data Tercampur Kod disebabkan bahasa tidak rasmi, transliterasi tidak rasmi, dan ralat ejaan. In this paper, we introduce an annotated dataset for Sentiment Analysis in CMTET.  Juga, kita laporkan ketepatan 80.22% pada set data ini menggunakan normalisasi data yang tidak diawasi yang baru dengan model Perceptron Multilayer (MLP). Teknik normalisasi data yang dicadangkan ini boleh dilambangkan ke mana-mana tugas NLP yang melibatkan CMTET. Lagipun, kita melaporkan peningkatan akurasi 2.53% kerana pendekatan normalisasi data ini dalam model terbaik kita.', 'mt': "F’soċjetà multilingwi, in-nies jikkomunikaw f’aktar minn lingwa waħda, li twassal għal dejta mħallta mal-Kodiċi. Analiżi sensittiva dwar it-Test tat-Telugwu mħallat mal-Kodiċi u l-Ingliż (CMTET) toħloq sfidi uniċi. In-natura mhux strutturata tad-dejta mħallta mal-Kodiċi hija minħabba l-lingwa informali, it-traslitterazzjonijiet informali, u żbalji fl-ortografija. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nintroduċu sett ta’ dejta annotat għall-Analiżi tas-Sentimenti f’CMTET. Barra minn hekk, nirrappurtaw preċiżjoni ta' 80.22% fuq dan is-sett ta' dejta bl-użu ta' normalizzazzjoni ġdida tad-dejta mhux sorveljata b'mudell ta' Perseptron Multilayer (MLP). Din it-teknika ta’ normalizzazzjoni tad-dejta proposta tista’ tiġi estiża għal kwalunkwe kompitu NLP li jinvolvi CMTET. Barra minn hekk, nirrappurtaw żieda ta' preċiżjoni ta' 2.53% minħabba dan l-approċċ ta' normalizzazzjoni tad-dejta fl-aħjar mudell tagħna.", 'pl': 'W wielojęzycznym społeczeństwie ludzie komunikują się w więcej niż jednym języku, co prowadzi do powstawania danych z kodem mieszanym. Analiza sentymentalna tekstu telugu-angielskiego (CMTET) stawia unikalne wyzwania. Nieustrukturyzowany charakter danych mieszanych kodem wynika z nieformalnego języka, nieformalnych transliteracji i błędów pisowni. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy anotatowany zestaw danych do analizy sentymentów w CMTET. Raportujemy również dokładność 80,22% na tym zbiorze danych przy użyciu nowej normalizacji danych bez nadzoru z modelem wielowarstwowego perceptronu (MLP). Proponowana technika normalizacji danych może być rozszerzona na dowolne zadanie NLP obejmujące CMTET. Ponadto zgłaszamy wzrost dokładności 2,53% dzięki temu podejściu normalizacji danych w naszym najlepszym modelu.', 'ml': 'ഒരു പല ഭാഷ സമൂഹത്തില്\u200d, ആളുകള്\u200d ഒരു ഭാഷയില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നു, കോഡ്-മിക്സിഡ് ഡേറ്റായിരിക്കുന്നു. കോഡ്- മിക്സെഡ് ടെലുഗ്ലി- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പദാവലിയുടെ (CMTET) സെനിറ്റമെന്റാല്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നത് വ്യത്യാസങ് കോഡ്- മിക്സഡ് ഡേറ്റായുടെ സ്വഭാവം അനുയോജ്യമായ ഭാഷ, അനുയോജ്യമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, അക്ഷരസഞ്ചരിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പിശകുകള്\u200d കാരണം. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, സിഎംടെറ്റിലെ സെന്റെന്\u200dറ് അന്യായീസിന് വേണ്ടി ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഈ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് സെറ്റില്\u200d 80. 22 ശതമാനം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. നോവല്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കാത്ത ഡേറ്റാ സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒര This proposed data normalization technique can be extended to any NLP task involving CMTET.  അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡലിലെ ഡേറ്റാ സാധാരണ നടപടികള്\u200d കാരണം നമ്മള്\u200d 2.53% കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി റിപ്', 'mn': 'Олон хэл нийгэмд хүмүүс нэгээс илүү хэл дээр холбоотой, Код-холбоотой мэдээллүүд руу холбоотой. Код-холбогдсон Телугу-Англи хэлний текст (CMTET) дээрх мэдрэлийн шинжилгээ нь бусад сорилтуудыг бий болгодог. Код-холбогдсон өгөгдлийн бүтээгдэхүүний байгаль нь биеийн хэл, биеийн хэлбэрүүд, бичилгээний алдаа учраас байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид CMTET-д Sentiment Analysis-ын анзаарсан өгөгдлийн санг танилцуулдаг. Мөн бид энэ өгөгдлийн санд 80.22% тодорхойлолт өгөгдлийн хувьд олон давхар Perceptron (MLP) загвартай шинэчлэлгүй өгөгдлийг хэрэглэж байна. Энэ санал дэвшүүлсэн өгөгдлийн нормализацийн техник нь CMTET-тэй холбогдсон ямар ч NLP үйл ажилд нэмэгдэж болно. Дараа нь бид энэхүү өгөгдлийн нормализацийн арга загварын тулд 2.53% зөв байдал нэмэгдсэн байна.', 'no': 'I eit fleirspråk samfunn kommuniserer folk i fleire enn eitt språk, som fører til kodeflikte data. Sentimental analyse på tekst med mellom koden Telugu- engelsk (CMTET) gjer unike utfordringar. Den ikkje strukturerte naturen av kodeflikte data er grunnen av informalt språk, informalt transliterasjon og stavefeil. I denne papiret introduserer vi eit oppmerkte dataset for Sentiment Analysis i CMTET. Vi rapporterer også ein nøyaktig 80,22% på denne datasettet ved hjelp av rom utan oppretta datanormalisering med eit multilayer Perceptron (MLP) modell. Dette første datanormaliseringsteknika kan utvidast til alle NLP- oppgåver med CMTET. I tillegg rapporterer vi ei økning av 2,53% nøyaktighet på grunn av denne datanormaliseringslinjen i vår beste modellen.', 'si': 'බොහොම භාෂාවක් සමාජයෙන්, මිනිස්සු එකක් වඩා භාෂාවට සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, කෝඩ් මික්ස් තොරතුරු ලඟ Name Name මේ පැත්තේ, අපි CMTET වලට සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්ෂිත දත්ත සෙට් එකක් තියෙනවා. ඒවගේම, අපි මේ දත්ත සූදානයේ 80.22% කිරීමක් වාර්තා කරනවා මාත්\u200dරපත්ත සාමාන්\u200dය කරන්න බැහැරි දත්ත සාමාන්\u200dය විධානය කරන්න. මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු දත්ත සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවය CMTET සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් හැම NLP වැඩකට වැඩ කරන්න පුලුවන් තවත්, අපි මේ දත්ත සාමාන්\u200dය සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට අපේ හොඳම මෝඩේල් එක්ක 2.53% විශේෂතාවක් වැඩ කරනවා.', 'ro': 'Într-o societate multilingvă, oamenii comunică în mai multe limbi, ceea ce duce la date combinate cu coduri. Analiza sentimentală a textului telugu-englez (CMTET) cu cod mixt reprezintă provocări unice. Natura nestructurată a datelor combinate cu coduri se datorează limbajului informal, transliterărilor informale și erorilor de ortografie. În această lucrare, introducem un set de date adnotat pentru Analiza Sentimentelor în CMTET. De asemenea, raportăm o acuratețe de 80,22% pe acest set de date utilizând normalizarea noilor date nesupravegheate cu un model Multilayer Perceptron (MLP). Această tehnică propusă de normalizare a datelor poate fi extinsă la orice sarcină NLP care implică CMTET. Mai mult, raportăm o creștere de acuratețe de 2,53% datorită acestei abordări de normalizare a datelor în cel mai bun model al nostru.', 'sr': 'U multijezičkom društvu, ljudi komuniciraju više od jednog jezika, što vodi do podataka o mešanju koda. Sentimentalna analiza o tekstu telugu-engleskog spojenog koda (CMTET) predstavlja jedinstvene izazove. Неструктурирана природа код-смешана дана је заради неофициалног језика, неофициалног транслитерације и грешка писања. U ovom papiru predstavljamo notiranu seriju podataka za analizu Sentimenta u CMTET-u. Takoðe, prijavljamo taènost od 80,22% na ovom setu podataka koristeći normalizaciju novog neodreðenog podataka sa modelom Multilayer Perceptron (MLP). Ova predložena tehnika normalizacije podataka može se proširiti na bilo koji zadatak NLP koji uključuje CMTET. Nadalje, prijavljujemo povećanje preciznosti od 2,53% zbog ovog pristupa normalizacije podataka u našem najboljem modelu.', 'sv': 'I ett flerspråkigt samhälle kommunicerar människor på mer än ett språk, vilket leder till kodblandade data. Sentimental analys av kodblandad telugu-engelsk text (CMTET) innebär unika utmaningar. Den ostrukturerade karaktären hos kodblandade data beror på informellt språk, informella transliterationer och stavfel. I denna uppsats introducerar vi ett kommenterat dataset för Sentiment Analysis i CMTET. Dessutom rapporterar vi en noggrannhet på 80,22% på denna datauppsättning med hjälp av ny oövervakad datanormalisering med en Multilayer Perceptron (MLP) modell. Denna föreslagna datanormaliseringsteknik kan utvidgas till alla NLP-uppgifter som involverar CMTET. Vidare rapporterar vi en ökning med 2,53% noggrannhet på grund av denna datanormaliseringsmetod i vår bästa modell.', 'ta': 'பல மொழி சமூகத்தில், மக்கள் ஒரு மொழியில் தொடர்பு கொள்கிறார்கள், குறியீடு-கலக்கப்பட்ட தகவலுக்கு வழிகாட்டுகிறது. குறியீடு- கலக்கப்பட்ட ட டெலுக்கு- ஆங்கிலத்தின் உரை (CMTET) தனிப்பட்ட சவால்களை கொண்டுள்ளது. குறியீடு- கலக்கப்பட்ட தரவுகளின் அடிப்படையாக்கப்படாத இயல்பு அரசாங்க மொழி, தகவல் மாற்றுதல், மற்றும் எழுத்து பிழைகள் காரணம். In this paper, we introduce an annotated dataset for Sentiment Analysis in CMTET.  மேலும், நாம் இந்த தகவல் அமைப்பில் 80. 22% சரியாக அறிவிக்கிறோம் ஒரு Multilayer Perceptron (MLP) மாதிரி இந்த பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட தரவு இயல்பாக்குதல் தொழில்நுட்பம் CMTET உடன் உள்ள எந்த NLP பணிக்கும் நீட்டப்படும். மேலும், நாம் 2.53% சரியான அதிகரிப்பை அறிவிக்கிறோம் எங்கள் சிறந்த மாதிரியில் இந்த தரவு இயல்பான செயல்பாடு', 'ur': 'ایک بہت سی زبان کی اجتماعی میں، لوگوں نے ایک سے زیادہ زبان میں ارتباط کیا ہے، جو کوڈ میکس ڈیٹا کی طرف لے جاتا ہے. کوڈ-میکسٹ ٹیلوگو-انگلیسی پیغام (CMTET) کے بارے میں سنٹیمینٹل تحلیل ہے۔ کوڈ میکسٹ ڈاٹ کی غیر ساختہ طبیعت غیر ساختہ طبیعت غیر ساختہ زبان کی وجہ سے ہے، غیر ساختہ غیر ساختہ باتیں، اور سپے کی غلطی کی وجہ سے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے CMTET میں Sentiment Analysis کے لئے ایک انٹیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کو معرفی کیا ہے. اور ہم اس ڈیٹ سٹ پر 80.22% کی دقیقیقیت کی راپورت کرتے ہیں، ایک چند لائر پرسپٹرون (MLP) موڈل کے ذریعہ مطابق مطابق غیر قابل دکھائی دکھائی کے مطابق۔ This proposed data normalization technique can be extended to any NLP task involving CMTET. اور ہم نے اس ڈیٹا عامل طریقے کے باعث 2.53% دقیقیت کا اضافہ کیا ہے۔', 'so': 'Bulshada luuqadaha kala duduwan dadka waxay ku xiriiraan luuqad ka badan hal luuqad, waxayna ku hoggaamiyaan macluumaad isku qasnaan. Baaritaanka xilliga ee Code-Mixed Telugu-Ingiriis (CMTET) waxay leedahay dhibaatooyin gaar ah. The unstructured nature of the Code-Mixed Data is due to the informal language, informal transliterations, and spelling errors.  Warqadan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaynaa sawir lagu caddeeyey baaritaanka sintada ee CMTET. Sidoo kale waxaan wargelinaynaa saxda 80.22% oo ku saabsan sameynta sameynta waraamka oo a an la ilaalinayn macluumaadka oo la mid ah model Multilayer Perceptron (MLP). Teknonikistan la soo jeeday oo la soo bandhigi karo waxyaabaha la soo saaray oo la xiriira CMTET. Sidoo kale waxaan wargelinaynaa koritaanka 2.53% si saxda ah, sababtoo ah qaababkan la soo saaray ee noocyadan ugu wanaagsan.', 'uz': "Har xil jamiyatlarda odamlar bir tildan ortiq bir tilda bog'liqdir. Kod-Miksed maʼlumotga ega bo'ladi. Name @ info Bu hujjatda, biz CMTET'da Sentiment Analysis uchun taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar satrini anglatamiz. Koʻrsatganda, bu maʼlumotlar tarkibini saqlab qolmagan maʼlumot normalisiyatlarini bir Multilayer Perceptron (MLP) modeli bilan yordamida xabar qilamiz. Name Koʻrsatganda, biz eng yaxshi modeldagi maʼlumot normalization usulida 2.53% aniqligini ko'paymiz.", 'vi': 'Trong một xã hội đa dạng, người ta giao tiếp bằng nhiều ngôn ngữ khác nhau, dẫn đến mã trộn dữ liệu. Bản phân tích đa dạng về Văn bản Telug-English (CMYK) gây ra thử thách độc đáo. Mật Dữ liệu hoà giải không xây dựng được là do ngôn ngữ không chính thức, chuyển dạng không chính thức và lỗi chính tả. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một bộ dữ liệu được ghi chú cho phiên bản phân tích. Chúng tôi cũng báo cáo độ chính xác của 80.2297. trên tập tin này, sử dụng một hệ thống định dạng dữ liệu mới, không giám sát được, với một tỷ lệ nhận phần lớn (MLP). Quá trình bình thường dữ liệu đã được đề nghị có thể được mở rộng cho bất kỳ nhiệm vụ NLP liên quan đến CMYK. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi báo cáo độ chính xác tăng cao 2.cô vì phương pháp phục hồi dữ liệu này trong mô hình tốt nhất.', 'bg': 'В многоезичното общество хората комуникират на повече от един език, което води до смесени с кодове данни. Сентименталният анализ на кодово смесен телугу-английски текст (СМТЕТ) поставя уникални предизвикателства. Неструктурираният характер на смесените кодове данни се дължи на неформалния език, неформалните транслитерации и правописни грешки. В тази статия представяме анотиран набор от данни за анализ на сентимента в ЦМТЕТ. Също така, докладваме за точност от 80.22% на този набор от данни, използвайки нова ненадвидена нормализация на данните с многослоен модел на перцептрон (МЛП). Тази предложена техника за нормализиране на данните може да бъде разширена до всяка задача на НЛП, включваща CMTET. Освен това, отчитаме увеличение с 2.53% точност поради този подход за нормализиране на данните в най-добрия ни модел.', 'nl': 'In een meertalige samenleving communiceren mensen in meer dan één taal, wat leidt tot Code-Mixed data. Sentimentale analyse op Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text (CMTET) brengt unieke uitdagingen met zich mee. De ongestructureerde aard van de Code-Mixed Data is te wijten aan de informele taal, informele transliteraties en spelfouten. In dit artikel introduceren we een geannoteerde dataset voor Sentiment Analysis in CMTET. Ook rapporteren we een nauwkeurigheid van 80,22% op deze dataset met behulp van nieuwe ongetoezichte data normalisatie met een Multilayer Perceptron (MLP) model. Deze voorgestelde data normalisatie techniek kan worden uitgebreid tot elke NLP taak waarbij CMTET betrokken is. Verder rapporteren we een toename van 2,53% nauwkeurigheid als gevolg van deze data normalisatie benadering in ons beste model.', 'hr': 'U multijezičkom društvu, ljudi komuniciraju više od jednog jezika, što vodi do podataka o mješavanju koda. Sentimentalna analiza o tekstu Telugu-engleskog spojenog koda (CMTET) predstavlja jedinstvene izazove. Nestrukturirana priroda mješanih podataka zbog neoficialnog jezika, neoficialnih transliteracija i grešaka pisanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo annotiranu kompletu podataka za analizu sentimenta u CMTET-u. Također, prijavljujemo preciznost od 80,22% na ovom setu podataka koristeći normalizaciju novog neodređenog podataka s modelom Multilayer Perceptron (MLP). Ova predložena tehnika normalizacije podataka može se proširiti na bilo koji zadatak NLP uključujući CMTET. Nadalje, prijavljujemo povećanje to čnosti od 2,53% zbog ovog pristupa normalizacije podataka u našem najboljem modelu.', 'da': 'I et flersproget samfund kommunikerer folk på mere end ét sprog, hvilket fører til kodeblandede data. Sentimental analyse af kode-blandet telugu-engelsk tekst (CMTET) udgør unikke udfordringer. Den ustrukturerede karakter af kodeblandede data skyldes det uformelle sprog, uformelle translitterationer og stavefejl. I denne artikel introducerer vi et kommenteret datasæt til Sentiment Analysis i CMTET. Desuden rapporterer vi en nøjagtighed på 80,22% på dette datasæt ved hjælp af nye uautoriseret datanormalisering med en Multilayer Perceptron (MLP) model. Denne foreslåede datanormaliseringsteknik kan udvides til enhver NLP-opgave, der involverer CMTET. Desuden rapporterer vi en stigning på 2,53% nøjagtighed på grund af denne datanormalisering tilgang i vores bedste model.', 'de': 'In einer mehrsprachigen Gesellschaft kommunizieren Menschen in mehr als einer Sprache, was zu Code-Mixed-Daten führt. Sentimentale Analyse von Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text (CMTET) stellt einzigartige Herausforderungen dar. Die unstrukturierte Natur der Code-Mixed Data ist auf die informelle Sprache, informelle Transliterationen und Rechtschreibfehler zurückzuführen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen kommentierten Datensatz für Sentiment Analysis in CMTET vor. Außerdem berichten wir über eine Genauigkeit von 80,22% auf diesem Datensatz unter Verwendung einer neuartigen unüberwachten Datennormalisierung mit einem Multilayer Perceptron (MLP)-Modell. Diese vorgeschlagene Datennormalisierungstechnik kann auf jede NLP-Aufgabe mit CMTET erweitert werden. Weiterhin berichten wir von einer Erhöhung der 2,53% Genauigkeit aufgrund dieses Datennormalisierungsansatzes in unserem besten Modell.', 'id': 'Dalam masyarakat berbilang bahasa, orang berkomunikasi dalam lebih dari satu bahasa, yang menyebabkan data campuran kode. Analisi sensor pada Teks Telugu-Inggris (CMTET) campuran Kode mengakibatkan tantangan unik. Alam yang tidak terstrukturasi dari Data Bercampur Kode adalah karena bahasa informal, transliterasi informal, dan kesalahan ejaan. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan sebuah set data anotasi untuk Analisi Sentiment di CMTET. Juga, kami melaporkan akurasi 80,22% pada set data ini menggunakan normalisasi data yang baru tidak diawasi dengan model Perceptron Multilayer (MLP). Teknik normalisasi data yang diusulkan ini dapat diperoleh ke setiap tugas NLP yang melibatkan CMTET. Further, we report an increase of 2.53% accuracy due to this data normalization approach in our best model.', 'ko': '다언어 사회에서 사람들은 다양한 언어로 교류를 하여 코드와 데이터가 혼합된다.코드 혼합 테루고어 영어 텍스트(CMTET)의 감정 분석에 독특한 도전을 던졌다.코드 혼합 데이터의 비구조화 성질은 비공식 언어, 비공식 음역과 맞춤법 오류로 인한 것이다.본고에서 CMTET 정서 분석에 사용되는 주석이 있는 데이터 집합을 소개했다.또한 새로운 무감독 데이터 규범화와 다중감지기(MLP) 모델을 사용하여 이 데이터 집합에 대한 정확도가 80.22% 라고 보고했다.이런 데이터 규범화 기술은 CMTET와 관련된 모든 NLP 작업까지 확장할 수 있다.그 밖에 우리는 우리의 가장 좋은 모델에서 이러한 데이터 표준화 방법을 채택했기 때문에 정확도가 2.53% 높아졌다고 보고했다.', 'sw': 'Katika jamii ya lugha mbalimbali, watu huwasiliana na zaidi ya lugha moja, wakipelekea takwimu za Mijingo. Uchambuzi wa mara kwa mara kwenye Taarifa ya Mitandao ya Telugu-Kiingereza (CMTET) una changamoto za kipekee. Taarifa zisizo na ujenzi wa Taarifa zilizotengenezwa ni kutokana na lugha isiyo rasmi, tafsiri isiyo rasmi, na makosa ya kusoma. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha seti ya taarifa zilizotajwa kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa Wakati katika CMTET. Pia, tunaripoti uhakika wa asilimia 80.22 kwenye seti hii ya takwimu kwa kutumia riwaya isiyohifadhiwa ya taarifa kwa mtindo wa Perceptron (MLP). This proposed data normalization technique can be extended to any NLP task involving CMTET.  Zaidi ya hayo, tunaripoti kuongezeka kwa asilimia 2.53 kwa sababu ya mbinu hii ya utaratibu wa data katika mtindo wetu bora.', 'fa': 'در جامعه های زیادی زبان، مردم با بیشتر از یک زبان ارتباط می کنند که به داده های مختلف قانون متصل می شوند. تحلیل مجموعه درباره متن Telugu-English Mixed Code (CMTET) چالش\u200cهای متفاوتی را نشان می\u200cدهد. طبیعت غیرساخته\u200cای از داده\u200cهای مختلف کد به سبب زبان غیر\u200cاساسی، ترجمه\u200cنامه\u200cهای غیر\u200cاساسی و اشتباه\u200cهای نوشتن است. در این کاغذ، ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات مشخص شده برای تحلیل Sentiment در CMTET معرفی می کنیم. همچنین، ما با استفاده از روزنامه\u200cسازی داده\u200cهای غیرقابل حفاظت با یک مدل متعدد لایه پرسپترون (MLP) گزارش می\u200cکنیم که دقیق 80.22 درصد در این مجموعه داده\u200cها را گزارش می\u200cدهیم. این تکنیک نورمیزی داده پیشنهاد می\u200cتواند به هر کار NLP که شامل CMTET باشد گسترش داده شود. بعدش، ما به خاطر این دستور عامل کردن داده ها در بهترین مدل ما افزایش دقیق 2.53 درصد گزارش می دهیم.', 'tr': "Birnäçe dilli jemgyýetde, adamlar bir dilden köp dilde habarlaşýar, Kod Karışylyk Maglumatyna gidýärler. Telugu-Iňlisçe Metin (CMTET) barada Sentimental analýşiň beýleki kynçylyklary bar. Ködleme karıştırılýan Maglumatyň düzümlenmedi tebigaty resmi dil, resmi terjime edip we ymla hatalarynyň sebäbi. Bu kagyzda, CMTET'de Sentiment Analyzasy üçin ýazyklanan veri setini tanyşdyrýarys Munuň üçin, biz bu maglumat düzeninde 80.22% dogrylygyny Multilayer Perceptron (MLP) nusgasyna ulanýarys. Bu tekniki CMTET'de dahil edilen NLP buýrukyna gollaşdyrylyp biler. Mundan soňra, biz bu maglumat normalizasyonyň nusgasymyzda 2.53% dogrudygyny aýdyp görýäris.", 'af': "In 'n veelvuldige samelewing, kommuniseer mense in meer as een taal, wat lei na Code-Mixed data. Sentimentaal analisie op Kode- gemengde Telugu- Engels Teks (CMTET) stel unieke uitdrukkings. Die onstruktureerde natuur van die Kode- gemengde Data is vanweë die onformele taal, onformele transliterasies en speletjie foute. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons 'n notateerde datastel vir Sentiment Analysis in CMTET. Ons rapporteer ook 'n presies van 80. 22% op hierdie datastel deur gebruik van novel ononderwerpende data normalisering met 'n Multilayer Perceptron (MLP) model. Hierdie voorgestelde data normalisering tekniks kan uitgebrei word na enige NLP taak wat by CMTET invoer. Verder, ons rapporteer 'n verhoog van 2.53% presies vanweë hierdie data normalisering toegang in ons beste model.", 'sq': 'Në një shoqëri shumëgjuhëse, njerëzit komunikojnë në më shumë se një gjuhë, duke çuar në të dhënat e përziera me kod. Analiza ndjesore e tekstit të përzier telugu-anglez (CMTET) paraqet sfida unike. The unstructured nature of the Code-Mixed Data is due to the informal language, informal transliterations, and spelling errors.  Në këtë letër, ne prezantojmë një set të dhënash të anotuar për Analizën e Sentimenteve në CMTET. Gjithashtu, raportojmë një saktësi prej 80.22% në këtë grup të dhënash duke përdorur normalizim të ri të të dhënave të pazgjidhura me një model Perceptron Multilayer (MLP). Kjo teknikë e propozuar normalizimi i të dhënave mund të zgjerohet në çdo detyrë NLP që përfshin CMTET. Për më tepër, raportojmë një rritje me 2.53% saktësi për shkak të kësaj metode normalizimi të të dhënave në model in tonë më të mirë.', 'am': 'በብዛት ቋንቋ ማኅበረሰብ፣ ሰዎች በአንድ ቋንቋ የሚጨምሩ፣ የኮድ-Mixed ዳታዎችን በመመራቸው፡፡ የኮድ-Mixed Telugu-እንግሊዘኛ ጽሑፍ (CMTET) የተለየ ጥያቄዎችን አቀረበ፡፡ የኮድ-Mixed ዳታ ሥርዓት ክፍለ ቋንቋ፣ informal transliteration እና የጽሑፍ ስህተት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም CMTET ውስጥ የሳንቲት Analysis የሚያስታውቀውን ዳታተር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እንደዚህም፣ በጉዳዩ ላይ ያልጠበቀው ዳታዎችን ማቀናቀል በመጠቀም የ80.22 በመቶ ቁጥጥርን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ይህ የተዘጋጀ ዳታ ማቀናቀል ቴክክኖጂ CMTET በሚያገኘው ማንኛውም NLP ስራ ይዘረጋል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ በመልካም ዓይነታችን የዳታ ትምህርት ሥርዓት ምክንያት 2.53 በመቶ የሚያበዛውን ቁጥጥር እናስባለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Բազլեզու հասարակության մեջ մարդիկ հաղորդակցվում են ավելի քան մեկ լեզվով, ինչը հանգեցնում է կոդի խառնված տվյալների: Կոդի խառնված տելոգո-անգլերեն տեքստի (ԿՄԹԵԹ) զգայական վերլուծությունը առանձնահատուկ մարտահրավեր է առաջացնում: Կոդի խառնված տվյալների անկառուցվածքային բնույթը պատճառ է ոչ տեղեկատվական լեզուն, ոչ տեղեկատվական տրանսգրականություններին և ուղղագրության սխալներին: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեկ annoted տվյալների համակարգ զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար: Մենք նաև հայտարարում ենք 80.22 տոկոսի ճշգրտությունը այս տվյալների համակարգի վրա, օգտագործելով նոր անվերահսկված տվյալների նորմալիզացիա բազմաշերտ Պերցեպտոնի (MLP) մոդելի միջոցով: Այս նախագծված տվյալների նորմալիզացիայի տեխնիկան կարող է ընդլայնվել ցանկացած ՆԼՊ խնդիր, որը ներառում է ԿՄԹԵԹ: Ավելին, մենք հայտարարում ենք 2.53 տոկոսի ճշգրտության աճ մեր լավագույն մոդելի տվյալների նորմալիզացիայի հետևանքով:', 'az': "ńįnsanlar √ßoxlu dil toplumunda bir dild…ôn √ßox il…ô, Kod-Mixed m…ôlumatlarńĪna yol a √ßar. Kod-KarńĪŇümńĪŇü Telugu-ńįngilizce Metni (CMTET) bar…ôsind…ôki Sentimental analizi t…ôhsil edir. Kod KarńĪŇütńĪrńĪlmńĪŇü Veril…ôrin qurulmadńĪńüńĪ t…ôbi…ôti informal dil, informal transliteration v…ô yazńĪlńĪm hatalarńĪna g√∂r…ôdir. Bu kańüńĪzda, CMTET'd…ô Sentiment Analizi √ľ√ß√ľn bildirilmiŇü veril…ôn qurńüunu tanńĪyńĪrńĪq. Daha sonra, bu veri qutusunda 80.22%-in dońüruluńüunu bildiririk ki, √ßoxlu-katlńĪ Perceptron (MLP) modeli il…ô yazńĪlmayan veril…ôr normalizasyonu vasit…ôsil…ô. Bu t…ôblińü edilmiŇü veril…ôn normalizasyon tekniki CMTET il…ô birlikd…ô olan h…ôr NLP iŇüin…ô uzaqlaŇüdńĪrńĪla bil…ôr. Daha sonra, bu m…ôlumatlarńĪn normalizasyon metodlarńĪnńĪn …ôn yaxŇüńĪ modelimizd…ô 2.53% …ôdal…ôtinin artńĪńüńĪnńĪ bildiririk.", 'bs': 'U multijezičkom društvu, ljudi komuniciraju više od jednog jezika, što vodi do podataka o mešanju koda. Sentimentalna analiza o tekstu telugu-engleskog spojenog koda (CMTET) predstavlja jedinstvene izazove. Nestrukturirana priroda pomiješanih podataka je zbog neformalnog jezika, neformalnih transliteracija i grešaka pisanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo notiranu seriju podataka za analizu Sentimenta u CMTET-u. Također, prijavljujemo preciznost od 80,22% na ovom setu podataka koristeći normalizaciju novel a neodređenih podataka sa modelom Multilayer Perceptron (MLP). Ova predložena tehnika normalizacije podataka može se proširiti na bilo koji zadatak NLP uključujući CMTET. Nadalje, prijavljujemo povećanje preciznosti od 2,53% zbog ovog pristupa normalizacije podataka u našem najboljem modelu.', 'bn': 'একটি বহুভাষার সমাজে মানুষ এক ভাষায় যোগাযোগ করে, যার ফলে কোড-মিক্সেড ডাটা নিয়ে যোগাযোগ করে। কোড-মিক্সেড টেলুগু-ইংরেজী টেক্সট (সিএমটেটি) বিশ্লেষণ বিশ্লেষণ বিশ্লেষণ বিভিন্ন চ্যালেঞ্জের জন্য। কোড-মিক্সেড ডাটার অকার্যকর প্রকৃতি অনুষ্ঠান ভাষা, আনুষ্ঠানিক ভাষা এবং বানান ভুলের কারণে। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সিএমটেটে সেন্টেমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের জন্য একটি বিস্তারিত তথ্য সেট পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই। এছাড়াও, আমরা এই ডাটাসেটে ৮০. ২২% সম্পর্কে সঠিকভাবে রিপোর্ট করি একটি বহুসংরক্ষিত তথ্য স্বাভাবিক ব্যবহার করে একটি মডেল (এমএলপি) নিয়ে। This proposed data normalization technique can be extended to any NLP task involving CMTET.  এছাড়াও, আমরা আমাদের সেরা মডেলে এই তথ্য স্বাভাবিকভাবে বৃদ্ধির কারণে ২.', 'ca': "En una societat multilingüe, la gent es comunica en més d'una llengua, portant a dades combinades amb codi. L'anàlisi sensorial del text telugu-anglès combinat amb codi (CMTET) pose reptes únics. La naturalesa no estructurada de les dades combinades amb el codi es deu a la llengua informal, les transliteracions informals i els errors ortogràfics. En aquest article introduim un conjunt de dades anotats per a l'an àlisi de sentiments al CMTET. També informem d'una precisió del 80,22% en aquest conjunt de dades fent servir una nova normalització de dades no supervisades amb un model de Perceptron Multilayer (MLP). Aquesta tècnica de normalització de dades proposada es pot estendre a qualsevol tasca NLP que implique CMTET. També informem d'un augment de la precisió del 2,53% a causa d'aquest enfocament de normalització de dades en el nostre millor model.", 'cs': 'V mnohojazyčné společnosti lidé komunikují ve více než jednom jazyce, což vede k datům smíšeným kódem. Sentimentální analýza kódově smíšeného telugu-anglického textu (CMTET) představuje jedinečné výzvy. Nestrukturovaná povaha kódově smíšených dat je způsobena neformálním jazykem, neformálními transliteracemi a pravopisnými chybami. V tomto článku představujeme anotovaný datový soubor pro analýzu sentimentů v CMTET. Dále uvádíme přesnost 80,22% této datové sady pomocí nové normalizace bez dozoru s vícevrstvým Perceptronovým modelem (MLP). Tato navržená technika normalizace dat lze rozšířit na jakoukoliv NLP úlohu zahrnující CMTET. Dále hlásíme zvýšení 2,53% přesnosti díky tomuto přístupu normalizace dat v našem nejlepším modelu.', 'et': 'Mitmekeelses ühiskonnas suhtlevad inimesed rohkem kui ühes keeles, mille tulemuseks on koodisegatud andmed. Koodi segatud telugu-inglise teksti (CMTET) sentimentaalne analüüs tekitab ainulaadseid väljakutseid. Koodiseguandmete struktureerimata olemus on tingitud mitteametlikust keelest, mitteametlikest transliteratsioonidest ja õigekirjavigadest. Käesolevas töös tutvustame CMTETi tunnete analüüsi annoteeritud andmekogumit. Samuti teatame selle andmekogumi täpsusest 80,22%, kasutades uut järelevalveta andmete normaliseerimist mitmekihilise Perceptroni (MLP) mudeliga. Seda kavandatud andmete normaliseerimise meetodit saab laiendada mis tahes NLP ülesandele, mis hõlmab CMTET. Lisaks teatame 2,53% täpsuse suurenemisest tänu sellele andmete normaliseerimise lähenemisviisile meie parimal mudelil.', 'fi': 'Monikielisessä yhteiskunnassa ihmiset kommunikoivat useammalla kuin yhdellä kielellä, mikä johtaa koodisekoitettuun dataan. Tunteellinen analyysi koodisekoitetusta telugu-englantilaisesta tekstistä (CMTET) asettaa ainutlaatuisia haasteita. Koodiekoitetun tiedon rakenteeton luonne johtuu epävirallisesta kielestä, epävirallisista transliteraatioista ja oikeinkirjoitusvirheistä. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme CMTETin sentimenttianalyysiä varten annotoidun aineiston. Raportoimme myös 80,22% tarkkuuden tässä aineistossa käyttämällä uutta valvomatonta tietojen normalisointia Multilayer Perceptron (MLP) -mallilla. Tämä ehdotettu tietojen normalisointitekniikka voidaan laajentaa mihin tahansa NLP-tehtävään, johon liittyy CMTET. Lisäksi raportoimme 2,53%:n tarkkuuden parantuneen tämän tiedon normalisointimenetelmän ansiosta parhaassa mallissamme.', 'ha': 'Daga cikin jamii masu mulki, mutane sunã yin magana da akan harshe guda, kuma sunã shirya data da aka haɗa kodi-Mixed. Anarari na zaman shawara kan Code-Mixed teleugu-Ingiriya (CMTeT) na ƙunsa da masu buƙata. @ action: button Ga wannan takardan, za mu nuna wani tsari da aka sanar da wa Analysari na zaman shawara cikin CMTeT. Kayan haka, muna buga wani tsari na 80.22% a kan wannan daidaita database da ke amfani da tsarin tsari na yanzu da tsarin data da aka tsare shi da wani misali na Muljeri Perceptron (MLP). @ info: whatsthis Furan, Munã ƙara wajen kashi na 2.53% da hakki, saboda wannan hanyowa na tsari da data a cikin misalinmu mafi kyãwo.', 'he': 'בחברה רבת שפות, אנשים מתקשרים יותר משפה אחת, ומובילים למידע מעורבב קוד. ניתוח רגשי על טלוגו-אנגלי טקסט מעורבב קוד (CMTET) יוצר אתגרים ייחודיים. הטבע הבלתי מבושל של הנתונים המערובים של קוד הוא בגלל השפה הפרשמית, העברות הפרשמיות, ושגיעות איתוי. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים קבוצת נתונים מצוינת לניתוח רגשות ב CMTET. בנוסף, אנו מדווחים מדויקת של 80.22% על קבוצת נתונים זו בשימוש נורמליזציה נתונים חדשה ללא משגיחה עם דוגמא מרובת שכבות פרספקטרון (MLP). טכניקת נורמליזציה הנתונים המוצעת הזו יכולה להירחב לכל משימה NLP שמעניינת CMTET. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מדווחים עלייה של 2.53% בדיקת בגלל גישת נורמליזציה של נתונים זו במודל הטוב ביותר שלנו.', 'jv': "Nang sampeyan akeh langkung sampeyan, wong-wong liyané luwih akeh langkung sampeyan, dadi sing wis ngawe kode-Mixed. Sentimental edasi kanggo kode-Mixed Daftar Gak Cocok-Mixed Nang pemilih iki, kita mulai akeh dadi nggawe sentiment Resolution kanggo SMMET. We've report an exact of 8.22% on this dataset Using new data normal alization with a Multilayer Percepron (MLP) model. Layout Lakok, awake dhéwé ngertuakaké kanggo nambah 2.3% sing apik dadi kanggo dadi Normalisi iki ning model sing luwih apik.", 'sk': 'V večjezični družbi ljudje komunicirajo v več kot enem jeziku, kar vodi do mešanih kod podatkov. Sentimentalna analiza kodno mešanega telugu-angleškega besedila (CMTET) predstavlja edinstvene izzive. Nestrukturirana narava kodno mešanih podatkov je posledica neformalnega jezika, neformalnih transliteracij in črkovalnih napak. V tem prispevku predstavljamo označen nabor podatkov za analizo sentimenta v CMTET. Prav tako poročamo o 80,22-odstotni natančnosti tega nabora podatkov z uporabo novega nenadzorovane normalizacije podatkov z Multilayer Perceptron (MLP). Ta predlagana tehnika normalizacije podatkov se lahko razširi na vsako nalogo NLP, ki vključuje CMTET. Poleg tega poročamo o povečanju natančnosti za 2,53% zaradi tega pristopa normalizacije podatkov v našem najboljšem modelu.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་མང་ཆེ་བའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་མི་མང་གིས་སྐད་ཡིག་གཅིག་ལས་མཐུན་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Sentimental analysis on Code-Mixed Telugu-English Text (CMTET) poses unique challenges. སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་མེད་པའི་རང་བཞིན་སྒྲིག འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་CMTET ནང་གི་Sentiment Analysis སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་བཀོད འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་80.22% ཡིན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བདེན་སྟངས་ཞིག་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན་པས། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནི་NLP ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་CMTET་ཡོད་པ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་དབྱིབས་ཆེན་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་རྐྱེན་ཚད་2.53%ཐོག་ཙམ་སྙན་'}
{'en': 'Making Your Tweets More Fancy : Emoji Insertion to Texts', 'pt': 'Tornando seus tweets mais sofisticados: inserção de emojis em textos', 'es': 'Hacer que tus tweets sean más sofisticados: inserción de emojis en textos', 'fr': "Rendez vos tweets plus sophistiqués\xa0: insertion d'emoji dans les textes", 'ar': 'جعل تغريداتك أكثر فخامة: إدراج الرموز التعبيرية في النصوص', 'ja': 'あなたのツイートをよりファンシーに：テキストへの絵文字の挿入', 'ru': 'Сделайте ваши твиты более причудливыми: вставка эмодзи в тексты', 'zh': '使君推文更花哨,表情符号插到文本', 'hi': 'अपने Tweets को और अधिक फैंसी बनाना: ग्रंथों के लिए इमोजी सम्मिलन', 'ga': 'Ag Déanamh Níos Mó Do Thvuíteanna: Cur Isteach Emoji ar Théacsanna', 'hu': 'Hogy a tweetjeid még divatosabbak legyenek: Emoji beillesztés a szövegekbe', 'ka': 'თქვენი Tweets- ის გავაკეთება უფრო ძალიან საშუალებელი: ტექსტის Emoji- ს დაყენება', 'el': 'Κάνοντας τα τουίτ σας πιο φανταχτερά: Εισαγωγή σε κείμενα', 'it': 'Rendere i tuoi tweet più fantasiosi: inserimento di emoji ai testi', 'lt': 'Making Your Tweets More Fancy: Emoji Insertion to Texts', 'ms': 'Membuat Tweet anda lebih mewah: Sisip Emoji ke Teks', 'mk': 'Making Your Tweets More Fancy: Emoji Insertion to Texts', 'ml': 'Making Your Tweets More Fancy: Emoji Insertion to Texts', 'mt': 'Li tagħmel it-Tweets tiegħek aktar imħabbra: Emoji Insertion to Texts', 'pl': 'Sprawiając, że twoje tweety są bardziej fantazyjne: Emoji wkładanie do tekstów', 'ro': 'Faceți-vă tweeturile mai sofisticate: inserarea emoji în texte', 'no': 'Lagar Tweets dine meir fancy: Emoji- innsetjing til tekstar', 'si': 'ඔයාගේ ට්විට් වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න: එමෝජියා පාළුවට ඇතුළත් කරන්න', 'so': 'Faahfaahin dheeraad ah ka sameynta Tweetka: Isticmaalka qoraalka', 'sv': 'Gör dina tweets mer fantasifulla: Emoji infogning i texter', 'mn': 'Tweets-г илүү гайхалтай болгодог: Emoji-г текст руу орлуулах', 'kk': 'Твиттеріңізді таңдау: Мәтіндерге эмози ендіру', 'ta': 'Making Your Tweets More Fancy: Emoji Insertion to Texts', 'sr': 'Postavljanje vaših Tweets Fancy: Emoji Insertion na tekst', 'ur': 'اپنا ٹویٹ اضافہ کر رہا ہے: ایموجی ٹیکسٹ میں اضافہ کرنا', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Làm cho thời trang của bạn tươi sáng hơn: Emoji thêm vào văn bản.', 'bg': 'Направете вашите туитове по-фантастични: Вмъкване на емоджи в текстове', 'nl': 'Je Tweets Fancy maken: Emoji invoegen in teksten', 'da': 'Gør dine tweets mere fantasifulde: Emoji indsætning til tekster', 'de': 'Machen Sie Ihre Tweets ausgefallener: Emoji Einfügen in Texte', 'id': 'Membuat Tweets Anda Lebih Fancy: Emoji Insertion to Texts', 'hr': 'Učiniti vaše Tweets Fancy: Emoji ubacanje u tekst', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن تویتهای شما جالبتر: وارد کردن Emoji به متن\u200cها', 'ko': '당신의 트윗을 더욱 색다르게 하기: 텍스트에 이모티콘을 삽입합니다', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza Twita Wapendekezo zaidi: Kuingiza Mitandao ya Ujumbe', 'tr': 'Tweetiňizi Gaýd Etmek: Emoji Metine girdirme', 'sq': 'Duke bërë Tweets tuaj më të bukur: Insertimi Emoji në tekste', 'am': 'Tweets More Fancy: Emoji Insertion to Text', 'af': 'Maak jou tweets meer Fancy: Emoji Invoering na Teks', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'তোমার টুইটার আরো দারুণ বানাচ্ছে: লেখায় ইমোজি যোগাযোগ করো', 'az': 'T칬vetl톛rinizi Daha g칲cl칲 yaratmaq: Emoji Metinl톛r톛 daxil etm톛k', 'bs': 'Postavljam tvoje Tweets Fancy: Emoji ubacanje u tekst', 'ca': "Fent els teus tweets més fantàstics: Inserció d'Emoji als textos", 'et': 'Teed oma tweets rohkem fantastiliseks: Emoji lisamine tekstidele', 'cs': 'Vytváření vašich tweetů více fantazie: Emoji vložení do textů', 'fi': 'Tee tweeteistäsi enemmän fancy: Emoji lisäys teksteihin', 'jv': 'Ngomongke Tuwitankmu luwih mpungan: emuji dipisung Teks', 'sk': 'Naredite vaše tweete bolj fancy: Vstavljanje emojev v besedila', 'he': 'הופך את הטוויטים שלך יותר מדהימים: הוספת Emoji לטקסטים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཁྱོད་ཀྱི་Tweets་ལ་Fancy ་སྦྱར་དུ་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ། Emoji་ཡི་གེ་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་བཙུགས'}
{'en': 'In the social media, users frequently use small images called emojis in their posts. Although using emojis in texts plays a key role in recent communication systems, less attention has been paid on their positions in the given texts, despite that users carefully choose and put an emoji that matches their post. Exploring positions of emojis in texts will enhance understanding of the relationship between emojis and texts. We extend an emoji label prediction task taking into account the information of emoji positions, by jointly learning the emoji position in a tweet to predict the emoji label. The results demonstrate that the position of emojis in texts is a good clue to boost the performance of emoji label prediction. Human evaluation validates that there exists a suitable emoji position in a tweet, and our proposed task is able to make tweets more fancy and natural. In addition, considering emoji position can further improve the performance for the irony detection task compared to the emoji label prediction. We also report the experimental results for the modified dataset, due to the problem of the original dataset for the first shared task to predict an emoji label in SemEval2018.', 'ar': 'في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، كثيرًا ما يستخدم المستخدمون صورًا صغيرة تسمى الرموز التعبيرية في منشوراتهم. على الرغم من أن استخدام الرموز التعبيرية في النصوص يلعب دورًا رئيسيًا في أنظمة الاتصال الحديثة ، فقد تم إيلاء اهتمام أقل لمواقعهم في النصوص المحددة ، على الرغم من أن المستخدمين يختارون بعناية ويضعون رمزًا تعبيريًا يطابق منشوراتهم. سيعزز استكشاف مواقف الرموز التعبيرية في النصوص من فهم العلاقة بين الرموز التعبيرية والنصوص. نقوم بتوسيع مهمة التنبؤ بتسمية الرموز التعبيرية مع مراعاة معلومات مواقع الرموز التعبيرية ، من خلال التعرف بشكل مشترك على موضع الرموز التعبيرية في تغريدة للتنبؤ بتسمية الرموز التعبيرية. توضح النتائج أن موضع الرموز التعبيرية في النصوص يعد دليلًا جيدًا لتعزيز أداء تنبؤ تسمية الرموز التعبيرية. يتحقق التقييم البشري من وجود موضع رمز تعبيري مناسب في تغريدة ، ومهمتنا المقترحة قادرة على جعل التغريدات أكثر فخامة وطبيعية. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يمكن أن يؤدي النظر في موضع الرموز التعبيرية إلى تحسين أداء مهمة الكشف عن المفارقة مقارنةً بتنبؤ ملصق الرموز التعبيرية. قمنا أيضًا بالإبلاغ عن النتائج التجريبية لمجموعة البيانات المعدلة ، نظرًا لمشكلة مجموعة البيانات الأصلية للمهمة المشتركة الأولى للتنبؤ بعلامة رموز تعبيرية في SemEval2018.', 'fr': "Sur les réseaux sociaux, les utilisateurs utilisent fréquemment de petites images appelées emojis dans leurs publications. Bien que l'utilisation d'émojis dans les textes joue un rôle clé dans les systèmes de communication récents, moins d'attention a été accordée à leur position dans les textes donnés, malgré le fait que les utilisateurs choisissent et mettent soigneusement un emoji correspondant à leur publication. L'exploration de la position des émojis dans les textes permettra de mieux comprendre la relation entre les émojis et les textes. Nous développons une tâche de prédiction d'étiquette d'emoji en tenant compte des informations relatives à la position des emojis, en apprenant conjointement la position de l'émoji dans un tweet afin de prédire l'étiquette de l'émoji. Les résultats démontrent que la position des émojis dans les textes est un bon indice pour améliorer les performances de prédiction des étiquettes d'emoji. L'évaluation humaine confirme qu'il existe une position d'emoji appropriée dans un tweet, et notre tâche proposée est capable de rendre les tweets plus sophistiqués et plus naturels. En outre, la prise en compte de la position des emojis peut encore améliorer les performances de la tâche de détection d'ironie par rapport à la prédiction d'étiquette d'emoji. Nous rapportons également les résultats expérimentaux pour le jeu de données modifié, en raison du problème du jeu de données d'origine pour la première tâche partagée visant à prédire une étiquette d'emoji dans SemEval2018.", 'pt': 'Nas redes sociais, os usuários costumam usar pequenas imagens chamadas emojis em suas postagens. Embora o uso de emojis em textos tenha um papel fundamental nos sistemas de comunicação recentes, menos atenção tem sido dada às suas posições nos textos fornecidos, apesar de os usuários escolherem cuidadosamente e colocarem um emoji que corresponda à sua postagem. Explorar as posições dos emojis nos textos melhorará a compreensão da relação entre emojis e textos. Estendemos uma tarefa de previsão de rótulo de emoji levando em consideração as informações de posições de emoji, aprendendo em conjunto a posição de emoji em um tweet para prever o rótulo de emoji. Os resultados demonstram que a posição dos emojis nos textos é uma boa pista para aumentar o desempenho da previsão de rótulos de emojis. A avaliação humana valida que existe uma posição adequada de emoji em um tweet, e nossa tarefa proposta é tornar os tweets mais sofisticados e naturais. Além disso, considerar a posição do emoji pode melhorar ainda mais o desempenho da tarefa de detecção de ironia em comparação com a previsão do rótulo do emoji. Também relatamos os resultados experimentais para o conjunto de dados modificado, devido ao problema do conjunto de dados original para a primeira tarefa compartilhada para prever um rótulo de emoji no SemEval2018.', 'es': 'En las redes sociales, los usuarios utilizan con frecuencia pequeñas imágenes llamadas emojis en sus publicaciones. Aunque el uso de emojis en los textos desempeña un papel clave en los sistemas de comunicación recientes, se ha prestado menos atención a sus posiciones en los textos dados, a pesar de que los usuarios eligen y colocan cuidadosamente un emoji que coincida con su publicación. Explorar las posiciones de los emojis en los textos mejorará la comprensión de la relación entre emojis y textos. Ampliamos una tarea de predicción de etiquetas de emojis teniendo en cuenta la información de las posiciones de los emojis, mediante el aprendizaje conjunto de la posición del emoji en un tweet para predecir la etiqueta del emoji. Los resultados demuestran que la posición de los emojis en los textos es una buena pista para mejorar el rendimiento de la predicción de etiquetas emoji. La evaluación humana valida que existe una posición emoji adecuada en un tweet, y nuestra tarea propuesta es capaz de hacer que los tuits sean más elegantes y naturales. Además, tener en cuenta la posición del emoji puede mejorar aún más el rendimiento de la tarea de detección de ironía en comparación con la predicción de la etiqueta emoji. También informamos los resultados experimentales para el conjunto de datos modificado, debido al problema del conjunto de datos original para la primera tarea compartida para predecir una etiqueta emoji en SemEval2018.', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया में यूजर्स अक्सर अपनी पोस्ट में इमोजी नाम की छोटी-छोटी तस्वीरों का इस्तेमाल करते हैं। यद्यपि ग्रंथों में इमोजी का उपयोग करना हाल के संचार प्रणालियों में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है, दिए गए ग्रंथों में उनकी स्थिति पर कम ध्यान दिया गया है, इसके बावजूद उपयोगकर्ता सावधानीपूर्वक एक इमोजी चुनते हैं और डालते हैं जो उनकी पोस्ट से मेल खाता है। ग्रंथों में इमोजी की स्थिति की खोज इमोजी और ग्रंथों के बीच संबंधों की समझ को बढ़ाएगी। हम इमोजी लेबल की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक ट्वीट में संयुक्त रूप से इमोजी की स्थिति सीखकर इमोजी पदों की जानकारी को ध्यान में रखते हुए एक इमोजी लेबल भविष्यवाणी कार्य का विस्तार करते हैं। परिणामों से पता चलता है कि ग्रंथों में इमोजी की स्थिति इमोजी लेबल भविष्यवाणी के प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा देने के लिए एक अच्छा सुराग है। मानव मूल्यांकन सत्यापित करता है कि एक ट्वीट में एक उपयुक्त इमोजी स्थिति मौजूद है, और हमारा प्रस्तावित कार्य ट्वीट्स को अधिक फैंसी और प्राकृतिक बनाने में सक्षम है। इसके अलावा, इमोजी स्थिति पर विचार करने से इमोजी लेबल भविष्यवाणी की तुलना में विडंबना का पता लगाने के कार्य के लिए प्रदर्शन में और सुधार हो सकता है। हम संशोधित डेटासेट के लिए प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों की भी रिपोर्ट करते हैं, जो SemEval2018 में एक इमोजी लेबल की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए पहले साझा कार्य के लिए मूल डेटासेट की समस्या के कारण है।', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアでは、ユーザーは投稿に絵文字と呼ばれる小さな画像を頻繁に使用します。 テキストに絵文字を使用することは、最近のコミュニケーションシステムで重要な役割を果たしていますが、ユーザーが慎重に自分の投稿に一致する絵文字を選択して配置するにもかかわらず、指定されたテキストの位置にはあまり注意が払われていません。 テキスト内の絵文字の位置を探ることで、絵文字とテキストの関係を理解することができます。 絵文字の位置情報を考慮して絵文字ラベル予測タスクを拡張し、ツイートで絵文字の位置を共同学習して絵文字ラベルを予測します。 結果は、テキスト内の絵文字の位置が、絵文字ラベル予測のパフォーマンスを向上させるための良い手がかりであることを示しています。 人間の評価は、ツイートに適切な絵文字の位置があることを検証し、提案されたタスクは、ツイートをよりファンシーで自然なものにすることができます。 また、絵文字位置を考慮することで、絵文字ラベル予測と比較して、皮肉検出タスクの性能をさらに向上させることができる。 また、SemEval 2018で絵文字ラベルを予測する最初の共有タスクの元のデータセットの問題により、修正されたデータセットの実験結果も報告します。', 'zh': '在社交媒体,用户常用表情符号小像。 虽近信系统用表情符号起着关键作用,虽用户详择而置其帖表情符号,然其在文本则罕所关注。 寻表情符号在文本中,将增表情符号解。 共学推文表情符号位以占表情符号,以广表情符号位之表情符号。 结果表明,表情符号在文本中者表情符号表识性能之善者也。 人工评验得其表情符号,吾事可使推文益花哨自然。 此外,比表情符号标测,虑表情符号位可进一步提高刺检之性也。 又言改定数实验,由SemEval2018中占表情符号标首共原始数据集也。', 'ru': 'В социальных сетях пользователи часто используют небольшие изображения, называемые эмодзи, в своих постах. Хотя использование эмодзи в текстах играет ключевую роль в последних системах связи, меньше внимания уделяется их позициям в данных текстах, несмотря на то, что пользователи тщательно выбирают и ставят эмодзи, соответствующие их посту. Изучение позиций эмодзи в текстах улучшит понимание взаимосвязи между эмодзи и текстами. Мы расширяем задачу предсказания смайликов с учетом информации о позициях смайликов, совместно изучая позицию смайликов в твите для предсказания смайликов. Результаты демонстрируют, что положение эмодзи в текстах является хорошей подсказкой для повышения производительности прогнозирования смайликов. Оценка человека подтверждает, что в твите есть подходящая позиция эмодзи, и наша предлагаемая задача способна сделать твиты более модными и естественными. Кроме того, рассмотрение положения эмодзи может еще больше улучшить производительность задачи обнаружения иронии по сравнению с предсказанием этикетки эмодзи. Мы также сообщаем об экспериментальных результатах для модифицированного набора данных из-за проблемы с исходным набором данных для первой общей задачи прогнозирования ярлыка эмодзи в SemEval2018.', 'ga': 'Ar na meáin shóisialta, is minic a úsáideann úsáideoirí íomhánna beaga ar a dtugtar emojis ina bpoist. Cé go bhfuil príomhról ag baint le húsáid emojis i dtéacsanna i gcórais chumarsáide le déanaí, níor tugadh aird níos lú ar a seasaimh sna téacsanna a tugadh, in ainneoin go roghnaíonn úsáideoirí go cúramach agus go gcuireann siad emoji a oireann dá bpostáil. Trí shuímh emojis i dtéacsanna a iniúchadh, cuirfear le tuiscint ar an ngaol idir emojis agus téacsanna. Déanaimid tasc réamh-mheasta lipéad emoji a leathnú agus faisnéis faoi shuíomhanna emoji á gcur san áireamh, trí shuíomh emoji a fhoghlaim i gcomhpháirt tweet chun an lipéad emoji a thuar. Léiríonn na torthaí gur leid maith é suíomh emojis i dtéacsanna chun feidhmíocht thuar lipéad emoji a threisiú. Deimhníonn meastóireacht dhaonna go bhfuil suíomh emoji oiriúnach i dtvuít, agus tá an tasc atá beartaithe againn in ann tweets a dhéanamh níos boige agus níos nádúrtha. Ina theannta sin, má chuirtear san áireamh suíomh emoji is féidir an fheidhmíocht don tasc braite íoróin a fheabhsú tuilleadh i gcomparáid le tuar lipéad emoji. Tuairiscímid freisin na torthaí turgnamhacha don tacar sonraí modhnaithe, mar gheall ar fhadhb an bhunachair shonraí don chéad tasc roinnte chun lipéad emoji a thuar i SemEval2018.', 'hu': 'A közösségi médiában a felhasználók gyakran használnak hangulatos kis képeket posztjaikban. Bár az emojik szövegekben való használata kulcsszerepet játszik a legutóbbi kommunikációs rendszerekben, kevesebb figyelmet fordítottak az adott szövegekben való pozíciójukra, annak ellenére, hogy a felhasználók gondosan választanak és helyeznek el egy emojit, amely megfelel a posztjuknak. Az emojik szövegekben található pozícióinak feltárása javítja az emojik és a szövegek kapcsolatának megértését. Kibővítjük az emoji címke előrejelzési feladatot, figyelembe véve az emoji pozíciók információit, azáltal, hogy közösen tanuljuk meg az emoji pozíciót egy tweetben, hogy előrejelezzük az emoji címkét. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy az emojik helyzete a szövegekben jó nyom az emoji címke előrejelzés teljesítményének növeléséhez. Az emberi értékelés igazolja, hogy van egy megfelelő emoji pozíció egy tweetben, és javasolt feladatunk képes arra, hogy a tweeteket finomabbá és természetesebbé tegyük. Ezenkívül az emoji pozíció figyelembevétele tovább javíthatja az irónia felismerési feladat teljesítményét az emoji címke előrejelzéséhez képest. Jelentjük továbbá a módosított adatkészlet kísérleti eredményeit, az eredeti adatkészlet problémája miatt az első megosztott feladat esetében, amely egy emoji címke előrejelzésére irányul a SemEval2018-ban.', 'el': 'Στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, οι χρήστες χρησιμοποιούν συχνά μικρές εικόνες που ονομάζονται στις δημοσιεύσεις τους. Αν και η χρήση σε κείμενα παίζει βασικό ρόλο στα πρόσφατα συστήματα επικοινωνίας, έχει δοθεί λιγότερη προσοχή στις θέσεις τους στα κείμενα, παρά το γεγονός ότι οι χρήστες επιλέγουν προσεκτικά και βάζουν ένα που ταιριάζει με τη δημοσίευσή τους. Η εξερεύνηση θέσεων σε κείμενα θα ενισχύσει την κατανόηση της σχέσης μεταξύ των και των κειμένων. Επεκτείνουμε μια εργασία πρόβλεψης ετικετών λαμβάνοντας υπόψη τις πληροφορίες των θέσεων μαθαίνοντας από κοινού τη θέση σε ένα tweet για να προβλέψουμε την ετικέτα. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η θέση των σε κείμενα είναι μια καλή ένδειξη για την ενίσχυση της απόδοσης της πρόβλεψης ετικετών. Η ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση επιβεβαιώνει ότι υπάρχει μια κατάλληλη θέση σε ένα tweet, και το προτεινόμενο καθήκον μας είναι σε θέση να κάνουμε τα tweets πιο φανταχτερά και φυσικά. Επιπλέον, εξετάζοντας τη θέση μπορεί να βελτιώσει περαιτέρω την απόδοση για την εργασία ανίχνευσης ειρωνείας σε σύγκριση με την πρόβλεψη ετικετών. Επίσης αναφέρουμε τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα για το τροποποιημένο σύνολο δεδομένων, λόγω του προβλήματος του αρχικού συνόλου δεδομένων για την πρώτη κοινή εργασία πρόβλεψης μιας ετικέτας στο SemEval2018.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიაში, მომხმარებელი ძალიან გამოყენებს პატარა სურათები, რომელიც ემიზები სახელში. მაგრამ ტექსტში ემოიზების გამოყენება გასაკუთრებული კომუნიკაციის სისტემებში უფრო მეტი პროლია, მაგრამ უფრო მეტი აღმოჩენა მისი პოზიციების პოზიციაში, მაგრამ მომხმარებელი აღ ვოჯიზების პოზაციების გამოყენება ტექსტში იქნება ემოჯიზების და ტექსტების შორის შესახების შესახებ. ჩვენ ემოჯი წარმოდგენის მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემების ინფორმაციას გადავიყენებთ, რომელიც ემოჯი პოციაციის ინფორმაციას ერთადერთად ვისწავლოთ ემოჯი პოციაციას გა წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ ტექსტში ემოჯიზების პოზაცია კარგი კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც ემოჯიზების წარმოდგენების გამოყენება. ადამიანის განსაზღვრება გავაკეთებს, რომ საჭირო ემოჯი პოციციაცია გარგებულია ტვირში, და ჩვენი მოძლევებული დავაკეთება შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ ტვირების უფრო ფექციელ დამატებით, ემოჯი პოციაციას შეიძლება უფრო მეტად გაუქმნელოთ იპონიის განვიხოვრების პარამეტრებისთვის, როგორც ემოჯია წერტილის განვიხოვრებაზე ჩვენ ასევე გამოცდილობთ ექსპერიმენტიური მონაცემების შედეგი მონაცემების შედეგი პრობლემების გამოსახულება პირველი გაყოფილი დავალებისთვის, რომელიც SemEval2018-ში ემოჯი ნი', 'it': "Nei social media, gli utenti usano spesso piccole immagini chiamate emoji nei loro post. Anche se l'utilizzo di emoji nei testi gioca un ruolo chiave nei sistemi di comunicazione recenti, meno attenzione è stata dedicata alle loro posizioni nei testi dati, nonostante gli utenti scelgano e inseriscano con attenzione un emoji che corrisponda al loro post. Esplorare le posizioni delle emoji nei testi migliorerà la comprensione della relazione tra emoji e testi. Estendiamo un compito di previsione delle etichette emoji tenendo conto delle informazioni delle posizioni emoji, imparando congiuntamente la posizione emoji in un tweet per prevedere l'etichetta emoji. I risultati dimostrano che la posizione delle emoji nei testi è un buon indizio per migliorare le prestazioni della previsione delle etichette emoji. La valutazione umana conferma che esiste una posizione emoji adatta in un tweet, e il nostro compito proposto è in grado di rendere i tweet più fantasiosi e naturali. Inoltre, considerare la posizione emoji può migliorare ulteriormente le prestazioni per l'attività di rilevamento dell'ironia rispetto alla previsione dell'etichetta emoji. Riportiamo anche i risultati sperimentali per il dataset modificato, a causa del problema del dataset originale per il primo compito condiviso di prevedere un'etichetta emoji in SemEval2018.", 'ms': 'Dalam media sosial, pengguna sering menggunakan imej kecil yang dipanggil emoji dalam pos mereka. Walaupun menggunakan emojis dalam teks bermain peran utama dalam sistem komunikasi baru-baru ini, kurang perhatian telah diberikan pada kedudukan mereka dalam teks yang diberikan, walaupun pengguna memilih dan meletakkan emoji yang sepadan dengan pos mereka. Menjelaskan kedudukan emoji dalam teks akan meningkatkan pemahaman hubungan antara emoji dan teks. Kami memperluas tugas ramalan label emoji dengan mempertimbangkan maklumat kedudukan emoji, dengan belajar kedudukan emoji bersama dalam tweet untuk meramalkan label emoji. The results demonstrate that the position of emojis in texts is a good clue to boost the performance of emoji label prediction.  Evaluasi manusia sahkan bahawa terdapat kedudukan emoji yang sesuai dalam tweet, dan tugas kami diusulkan boleh membuat tweet lebih mewah dan semulajadi. In addition, considering emoji position can further improve the performance for the irony detection task compared to the emoji label prediction.  Kami juga melaporkan hasil percubaan bagi set data yang diubah suai, disebabkan masalah set data asal untuk tugas berkongsi pertama untuk meramalkan label emoji dalam SemEval2018.', 'ml': 'സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയില്\u200d, ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d എപ്പോസിസ് എന്ന ചെറിയ ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പാഠങ്ങളില്\u200d ഇമോജിസ് ഉപയോഗിച്ചാലും അടുത്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കിലും അവയുടെ സ്ഥാനത ടെക്സ്റ്റില്\u200d ഇമോജിസിന്റെ സ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് ഇമോജിക്കും ടെക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന് ഇമോജിയുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കണക്കാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഇമോജി ലേബറ്റ് പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയുടെ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d  The results demonstrate that the position of emojis in texts is a good clue to boost the performance of emoji label prediction.  മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d തെളിയിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന് തെളിയിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ടൂട്ടില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രായമായ ഇമോജി സ് കൂടാതെ, ഇമോജിയുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തെക്കുറിച്ച്, ഇമോജി ലേബിലെ പ്രവചനത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടി പരിഹാസത്തിന്റെ പ് മാറ്റം വരുത്തിയ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളും റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d2018ല്\u200d ഒരു ഇമോജി ലേബറ്റ് പ്രവചിക', 'kk': 'Әлеуметтік медиақта пайдаланушылар көпшілік элементтер деп аталатын кішкентай кескіндерді қолданады. Жаңа коммуникациялық жүйелерде көңіл мәтіндерінің көңіл түрін қолдану үшін, келтірілген мәтіндерінің орналасуында көңіл түрде тұрады. Пайдаланушылар өзінің мәтіндеріне сәйкес келетін эмо Мәтіндегі көңіл мәтіндерінің орналасуын зерттеу көңіл мәтіндер мен мәтіндер арасындағы қатынасын түсінуге көтереді. Эмодж жарлықтарының мәліметін есептеп, эмодж жарлықтарының орналасуын біріктіру үшін тейтетіндегі эмодж жарлықтарының орналасуын біріктіріп, эмодж жарлығын таңдау тапсырм Нәтижелер мәтіндегі көңіл мәтіндегі көңіл мәтіндегі көңіл мәтіндегі көңіл мәтіндегі көңіл мәтіндегі нәтижесін көңілдіру үшін Адамдық оқиғалардың жақсы эмоджи орналасуын тексеру керек. Біздің тапсырмамыз тапсырмаларды жақсы және табиғатты жасауға болады. Келесіден қоса, emoji жарлығының тапсырмасының артықшылығын көбірек тапсырмасының артықшылығын өзгертуге болады. Сонымен қатар бірінші ортақ тапсырманың алғашқы ортақ тапсырмасының көзгертілген деректер жиының туралы өзгертілген деректер жиынының тәжірибесінің нәтижесін хабарлаймыз. SemEva', 'lt': 'Socialinėje žiniasklaidoje naudotojai dažnai naudoja mažus vaizdus, vadinamus emojis savo pareigūnuose. Although using emojis in texts plays a key role in recent communication systems, less attention has been paid on their positions in the given texts, despite that users carefully choose and put an emoji that matches their post.  Eksploatuojant emodžių pozicijas tekstuose bus geriau suprantamas emodžių ir tekstų santykis. We extend an emoji label prediction task taking into account the information of emoji positions, by jointly learning the emoji position in a tweet to predict the emoji label.  Rezultatai rodo, kad emodžių padėtis tekstuose yra geras požymis emodžių etiketės prognozės veiksmingumui padidinti. Žmogaus vertinimas patvirtina, kad tweete egzistuoja tinkama emoji pozicija, ir mūsų siūloma užduotis gali padaryti tweetus labiau fancy ir natural. In addition, considering emoji position can further improve the performance for the irony detection task compared to the emoji label prediction.  Taip pat pranešame apie eksperimentinius modifikuoto duomenų rinkinio rezultatus dėl pirminio duomenų rinkinio problemos, susijusios su pirmąja bendra užduotimi prognozuoti emoji etiketę SemEval2018.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн хэвлэлд хэрэглэгчид эмужийн нэртэй жижиг зураг ихэвчлэн ашигладаг. Сүүлийн харилцааны системд эмужийг ашиглах нь чухал үүрэг тоглодог ч гэсэн, хэрэглэгчид анхаарал хангалттай сонгож, эмужийг тайлбарлах нь бага байдаг. Эможийн байр сургуулиудыг судлах нь эможи болон текст хоорондын харилцааны тухай ойлголтыг нэмэгдүүлнэ. Эмоджийн байрлалын мэдээллийг хамтдаа суралцаж, эмоджийн загварыг тодорхойлдохын тулд бид эмоджийн загварын таамаглалтын даалгаварыг нэмэгдүүлнэ. Үүний үр дүнд эможийн байр суурь нь эможийн загварын таамаглалтын үр дүнг нэмэгдүүлэх сайн тодорхойлолтой гэдгийг харуулдаг. Хүн төрөлхтний дүгнэлт нь tweet дээр зөв эможийн байр суурь байдаг гэдгийг баталдаг. Бидний санал өгсөн үйлдэл нь tweets-г илүү гайхалтай, байгалийн болон гайхалтай болгож чадна. Мөн эможийн байр суурь нь эможийн загварын таамаглалттай харьцуулахад илүү сайжруулж чадна. Бид мөн SemEval2018 оны эможийн загварыг таамаглах анхны хуваалцагдсан ажлын асуудлын тулд өөрчлөгдсөн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнг тайлбарлаж байна.', 'mk': 'Во социјалните медиуми корисниците често користат мали слики наречени емоџии во нивните постови. Иако употребата на емоџии во текстите игра клучна улога во неодамнешните комуникациски системи, помалку внимание се обраќа на нивните позиции во дадените тексти, и покрај тоа што корисниците внимателно избираат и ставаат емоџи кои се совпаѓаат со нивниот Истражувањето на позициите на емоџиите во текстите ќе го подобри разбирањето на односот помеѓу емоџиите и текстите. Ја прошируваме задачата за предвидување на емоџи со оглед на информациите за емоџи позициите, заедно учејќи ја емоџи позицијата на твит за предвидување на емоџи ознака. The results demonstrate that the position of emojis in texts is a good clue to boost the performance of emoji label prediction.  Човечката оценка потврдува дека постои соодветна емоџи позиција на твит, и нашата предложена задача е во можност да ги направи твитовите пофантастични и природни. Покрај тоа, разгледувањето на позицијата на емоџи може понатаму да ја подобри резултатот на идентификацијата на иронијата во споредба со предвидувањето на етикетата на емоџи. Ние, исто така, ги известуваме експерименталните резултати за модифицираниот компјутер на податоци, поради проблемот со оригиналниот компјутер на податоци за првата заедничка задача за предвидување на емоџи етикета во SemEval2018.', 'no': 'I sosiale mediane brukar ofte små bilete kalla emojis i postane sine. Selv om å bruka emojis i tekstar spelar ein nøkkelrolle i nyleg kommunikasjonssystemet, har mindre oppmerksomhet blitt betalt på posisjonane sine i dei oppgjevne tekstane, selv om brukarar forsiktig vel og legg ei emoji som passar med posten sine. Utforsking av posisjonar på emojis i tekstar vil forbetra forståelse av forholdet mellom emojis og tekstar. Vi utvidar eit førehandsvising av emoji- merkelappen med informasjon om emoji- posisjonar, ved å læra emoji- posisjonen i ein tweet for å foregå emoji- merkelappen. Resultatet viser at posisjonen av emojis i tekst er ein god kluss for å styra utviklinga av emoji-merkelappen. Evalueringa av menneske er gyldig at det finst ein passande emoji-posisjon i ein tweet, og vår foreslått oppgåve er i stand til å gjera tweet meir fancy og naturleg. I tillegg kan du forstå emoji-posisjonen forbetra utviklinga for oppgåva for irony-oppdaging i sammenligning med foregåva av emoji-merkelappen. Vi rapporterer også eksperimentelle resultatene for den endra datasettet på grunn av problemet med den opprinnelige datasettet for den første delte oppgåva for å foregå ein emoji-merkelapp i semiEval2018.', 'ro': 'În rețelele de socializare, utilizatorii folosesc frecvent imagini mici numite emojis în postările lor. Deși utilizarea emojiurilor în texte joacă un rol cheie în sistemele de comunicare recente, s-a acordat mai puțină atenție pozițiilor lor în textele date, în ciuda faptului că utilizatorii aleg cu atenție și pun un emoji care se potrivește mesajului lor. Explorarea pozițiilor emojis în texte va spori înțelegerea relației dintre emojis și texte. Extindem o sarcină de predicție a etichetei emoji luând în considerare informațiile pozițiilor emoji, învățând împreună poziția emoji într-un tweet pentru a prezice eticheta emoji. Rezultatele demonstrează că poziția emojilor în texte este un indiciu bun pentru a spori performanța predicției etichetelor emoji. Evaluarea umană confirmă că există o poziție emoji adecvată într-un tweet, iar sarcina noastră propusă este capabilă să facă tweet-urile mai sofisticate și mai naturale. În plus, luarea în considerare a poziției emoji poate îmbunătăți și mai mult performanța pentru sarcina de detectare a ironiei în comparație cu predicția etichetei emoji. Raportăm, de asemenea, rezultatele experimentale pentru setul de date modificat, din cauza problemei setului de date original pentru prima sarcină partajată de a prezice o etichetă emoji în SemEval2018.', 'mt': 'Fil-midja soċjali, l-utenti ta’ spiss jużaw immaġni żgħar imsejħa emojis fil-postijiet tagħhom. Għalkemm l-użu tal-emoji fit-testi għandu rwol ewlieni fis-sistemi ta’ komunikazzjoni reċenti, ingħatat inqas attenzjoni fuq il-pożizzjonijiet tagħhom fit-testi partikolari, minkejja li l-utenti jagħżlu u jpoġġu emoji li jaqbel mal-pożizzjoni tagħhom. L-esplorazzjoni tal-pożizzjonijiet tal-emoji fit-testi se ttejjeb il-fehim tar-relazzjoni bejn l-emoji u t-testi. Aħna jestendu kompitu ta’ tbassir tat-tikketta emoji filwaqt li tqis l-informazzjoni tal-pożizzjonijiet emoji, billi jitgħallmu b’mod konġunt il-pożizzjoni emoji f’tweet biex tbassar it-tikketta emoji. The results demonstrate that the position of emojis in texts is a good clue to boost the performance of emoji label prediction.  Human evaluation validates that there exists a suitable emoji position in a tweet, and our proposed task is able to make tweets more fancy and natural.  Barra minn hekk, il-kunsiderazzjoni tal-pożizzjoni tal-emoji tista’ ttejjeb aktar il-prestazzjoni għall-kompitu ta’ detezzjoni tal-ironja meta mqabbel mal-previżjoni tat-tikketta tal-emoji. Aħna nirrappurtaw ukoll ir-riżultati sperimentali għas-sett tad-dejta modifikat, minħabba l-problema tas-sett tad-dejta oriġinali għall-ewwel kompitu kondiviż biex titbassar tikketta emoji f’SemEval2018.', 'so': 'Macluumaadka bulshada waxaa inta badan isticmaalaya sawirro yar oo lagu magacaabaa emojis. Inkastoo isticmaalidda emojiska ee qoraalka ayaa qayb muhiim ah ku ciyaaraya nidaamka macluumaadka ee ugu dhowaad ah, xitaa in kastoo isticmaalayaashu uu si taxadar leh u dooranayo oo uu dhigo emoji oo u eg post-postkooda. Waxbarashada boosaska emojiska ee qoraalka waxaa kordhin doona garashada xiriirka emojiska iyo qoraalka. Waxaannu u fidinnaa shaqo la sii sheegayo qofka emoji ah, iyadoo a an ku qorno macluumaadka meelaha ay leeyihiin emoji, si wadajir ah ayaannu u barno booska emojiga oo tweetka ah si aan u sii sheegno calaamada emoji. Abaalkeedu waxay muujiyaan in meeshii emojis ku qoran qoraalka ay tahay mid aad u wanaagsan in la kordhiyo horumarinta laguu sii sheego qoraalka emoji. Qiimeynta dadku wuxuu xaqiijiyaa in xafiiska emojiga ku habboon uu ku jiro Twitteet, shaqadeenna la soo jeedayna wuxuu ka sameyn karaa tweetka si ka farxiya iyo dabiicadda. Intaas waxaa dheer in la fiiriyo booska emoji lagu sameeyo sameynta sameynta shaqada Finnishka, iyadoo la barbarbarta wixii la sii sheegay calaamada emoji. We also report the experimental results for the modified dataset, due to the problem of the original dataset for the first shared task to predict an emoji label in SemEval2018.', 'pl': 'W mediach społecznościowych użytkownicy często używają małych obrazów zwanych emoji w swoich postach. Chociaż wykorzystanie emoji w tekstach odgrywa kluczową rolę w najnowszych systemach komunikacji, mniej uwagi zwrócono na ich pozycje w danych tekstach, mimo że użytkownicy starannie wybierają i umieszczają emoji pasujące do ich postu. Badanie pozycji emoji w tekstach zwiększy zrozumienie relacji między emoji a tekstami. Rozszerzamy zadanie przewidywania etykiet emoji, biorąc pod uwagę informacje o pozycjach emoji, wspólnie ucząc się pozycji emoji w tweecie, aby przewidzieć etykietę emoji. Wyniki pokazują, że pozycja emoji w tekstach jest dobrą wskazówką do zwiększenia wydajności przewidywania etykiet emoji. Ocena ludzka potwierdza, że w tweecie istnieje odpowiednia pozycja emoji, a nasze proponowane zadanie jest w stanie uczynić tweety bardziej fantazyjnymi i naturalnymi. Ponadto uwzględnienie pozycji emoji może jeszcze bardziej poprawić wydajność zadania wykrywania ironii w porównaniu z przewidywaniem etykiety emoji. Raportujemy również wyniki eksperymentalne dla zmodyfikowanego zbioru danych, ze względu na problem oryginalnego zbioru danych dla pierwszego wspólnego zadania przewidywania etykiety emoji w SemEval2018.', 'sv': 'I sociala medier använder användare ofta små bilder som kallas emojis i sina inlägg. Även om användningen av emojis i texter spelar en nyckelroll i de senaste kommunikationssystemen, har mindre uppmärksamhet ägnats åt deras positioner i de givna texterna, trots att användarna noggrant väljer och sätter in en emoji som matchar deras inlägg. Att utforska positioner för emojis i texter kommer att öka förståelsen för relationen mellan emojis och texter. Vi utökar en emojietikett förutsägelse uppgift med hänsyn till informationen om emojipositioner, genom att gemensamt lära oss emojipositionen i en tweet för att förutsäga emojietiketten. Resultaten visar att placeringen av emojis i texter är en bra ledtråd för att öka prestandan av emojietikett förutsägelse. Mänsklig utvärdering bekräftar att det finns en lämplig emoji position i en tweet, och vår föreslagna uppgift kan göra tweets mer snygga och naturliga. Dessutom kan emoji-positionen ytterligare förbättra prestandan för ironidetekteringsuppgiften jämfört med emoji-etikettens förutsägelse. Vi rapporterar också experimentresultaten för den modifierade datauppsättningen, på grund av problemet med originaldatauppsättningen för den första delade uppgiften att förutsäga en emojietikett i SemEval2018.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයානයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ට පොඩි පින්තූරු පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් ඔවුන්ගේ පො පත්තරේ emoji භාවිතා කරනවා නමුත් අලුත් සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතියේ යතුරු භාවිතාවක් සෙල්ලම් කරනවා නමුත් ඔවුන්ගේ ස්ථානය දෙන්න තියෙන්නේ  emoji ස්ථානය පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පාළුවන් වලට emoji සහ පාළුවන් අතර සම්බන්ධය ගැන විශ්වාස කරයි. අපි emoji ලේබල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරනවා emoji ස්ථානයේ තොරතුරු ගැන බලන්න, emoji ලේබල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ටුයිට් වලින් ඉගෙනගන්න. පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ එමෝජිස් ස්ථානය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට එමෝජි ලේබුල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩි කරන මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා තියෙන්නේ ට්විට් එකේ හොඳ එමෝජි ස්ථානයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, අපේ ප්\u200dර ඒ වගේම, emoji ස්ථානය හිතන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් එමෝජි ලේබල් විශ්වාස සමඟ පරීක්ෂ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියාගන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියාගන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියාගන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියාගන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියාග', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடகங்களில், பயனர்கள் வழக்கமாக சிறிய படங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறார்கள் அவற்றின் பதிவுகளில் emojis என்று பெயர்க உரைகளில் emojis பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டாலும் சமீபத்தில் தொடர்பு முறைமைகளில் ஒரு முக்கிய பங்கு விளையாடுகிறது, கொடுக்கப்பட்ட உரைகளில் அவர்கள் நிலைகளில் குறைந்த உரைகளில் emojis நிலைகளை தெரிந்து உணர்வு மற்றும் உரைகளுக்கிடையில் உள்ள தொடர்பு புரிந்து கொள்ளும். நாம் emoji விளக்கச்சீட்டு முன்வார்வை செய்ய வேண்டிய செயலை எடுத்துக் கொண்டு, emoji நிலைகளின் தகவலை எடுத்துக் கொண்டு, ஒரு தொடர்ந்து உண முடிவு மனித மதிப்பீடு ஒரு தேவையான உணர்வு நிலையில் இருக்கிறது என்பதை சரிபார்க்கிறது, எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட செயல் தொடர்புகளை மிகவ In addition, considering emoji position can further improve the performance for the irony detection task compared to the emoji label prediction.  மாற்றப்பட்ட தரவுத்தளத்திற்கான சோதனையின் முடிவுகளை நாம் அறிவிக்கிறோம், செம்Eval2018ல் ஒரு emoji விளக்கச்சீட்டை முதல் பகிர்ந்த செயல்ப', 'sr': 'U društvenim medijima, korisnici često koriste male slike koje se zovu emoji na svojim postima. Iako korištenje emojis u tekstima ima ključnu ulogu u nedavnim komunikacijskim sistemima, manje je pažnje obraćeno na njihove pozicije u određenim tekstima, uprkos tome da korisnici pažljivo biraju i stavljaju emoji koji odgovara svojim postima. Istraživanje pozicija emoja u tekstima povećaće razumevanje odnosa između emoja i teksta. Proširimo predviđanje emoji-etiketa s obzirom na informacije emoji pozicija, zajedno učeći emoji poziciju u tweetu da predvidimo etiketu emoji. Rezultati pokazuju da je položaj emojis u tekstima dobar trag za povećanje predviđanja emoji etikete. Ljudska procjena potvrđuje da postoji odgovarajuća emoji pozicija u tweetu, a naš predloženi zadatak je u mogućnosti da napravimo tweete lepše i prirodnije. Osim toga, s obzirom na emoji položaj može bolje poboljšati učinkovitost zadatka za otkrivanje ironija u usporedbi s predviđanjem etikete emoji. Takođe prijavljujemo eksperimentalne rezultate za modificiranu setu podataka zbog problema originalnog seta podataka za prvi zajednički zadatak da predvidimo etiketu emoji u SemEval2018.', 'ur': 'سوسیلی میڈیا میں، کارساز اغلب اپنے پوسٹوں میں چھوٹے تصاویر استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ اگرچہ اچھی کمنیٹ سیسٹم میں emojis کا استعمال کرنا ایک کلی رول کھیل رہا ہے، کم توجه ان کی موقعیت کو دکھایا گیا ہے، اگرچہ یہ کارساز اچھی طرح انتخاب کریں اور اپنے پوسٹ کے مطابق مطابق ایک emoji رکھیں۔ ایموجیس کی موقعیت کو متن میں تحقیق کرنا اموجیس اور متن کے درمیان رابطہ کا سمجھنا بڑھائے گا. ہم ایک ایموجی لیبل پیش بینی کا کام پھیلاتے ہیں جو emoji موقعیت کی اطلاعات کو حساب لیتے ہیں، ایک ٹویٹ میں emoji موقعیت کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ سے emoji لیبل کی پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے۔ نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ٹیکسٹوں میں emojis کی موقعیت ایک اچھی نشانی ہے کہ emoji label پیش بینی کی فعالیت کو بڑھائے۔ انسان کا ارزش پورا کرتا ہے کہ ایک ٹویٹ میں ایک مناسب emoji موقعیت موجود ہے، اور ہمارا ارزش کیا گیا ہے کہ ٹویٹوں کو زیادہ فانسی اور طبیعی بنا سکتا ہے۔ اور اضافہ، emoji موقعیت کی توقع سے اضافہ کر سکتا ہے کہ emoji لیبل پیش بینی کے مقابلہ میں اضافہ کرے ہم نے بھی تغییر دیٹا سٹ کے لئے آزمائش نتیجے کا گزارش کرلیا ہے، اس کے سبب جو پہلی مشترک کام کے لئے موجود دیٹا سٹ کے مسئلہ کی وجہ سے ہے کہ SemEval2018 میں ایک ایموجی لیبل کی پیش کرو۔', 'vi': 'Trong các phương tiện xã hội, người dùng thường sử dụng những hình ảnh nhỏ có tên là biểu tượng. Mặc dù việc sử dụng biểu tượng biểu tượng trong văn bản có vai trò quan trọng trong các hệ thống thông tin gần đây, nhưng vẫn ít được chú ý hơn về vị trí của họ trong các văn bản được đưa ra, mặc dù người dùng cẩn thận chọn và đặt một biểu tượng tương ứng với vị trí của họ. Khám phá những vị trí biểu tượng trong văn bản sẽ làm tăng sự hiểu biết về mối quan hệ giữa biểu tượng và văn bản. Chúng ta mở rộng nhiệm vụ dự đoán biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng dựa vào thông tin về những vị trí biểu tượng, bằng cách học biểu tượng trên Twitter để dự đoán biểu tượng biểu tượng. Kết quả chứng minh rằng vị trí của biểu tượng biểu tượng trong văn bản là một đầu mối tốt để tăng khả năng dự đoán biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng. Bài đánh giá con người xác nhận rằng có một vị trí biểu tượng thích hợp trên Twitter, và nhiệm vụ được đề nghị của chúng ta có thể khiến Twitter trở nên hoang đường và tự nhiên hơn. Thêm vào đó, xem xét vị trí biểu tượng biểu tượng có thể cải thiện hiệu suất của nhiệm vụ phát hiện mỉa mai hơn so với dự đoán của biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng. Chúng tôi cũng báo cáo kết quả thử nghiệm cho bộ dữ liệu đã sửa đổi, vì vấn đề của bộ dữ liệu gốc cho nhiệm vụ chia sẻ đầu tiên dự đoán một biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng giá cảm xúc ở SemEvul208.', 'uz': "Socket media da foydalanuvchilar odatda foydalanuvchilar foydalanuvchilar o'zida emojis deb nomli kichkina rasmlarni foydalanadi. Agar textlarda emojis yordamida yangi taʼminlovchi aloqa tizimlarida eng muhim roli oʻynaladi, ammo foydalanuvchilar ularning pochta bilan mos keladigan emoji qo'llanmagan holatlarida juda qisqa raqamli bo'ladi. Matnning emojis joylarini aniqlash emojis va matnlar orasidagi munosabatlarni oshirish mumkin. Biz emoji ma'lumotlarini o'rganish uchun emoji ma'lumotlarini tasavvur qilamiz. emoji yorliqini oldin foydalanish uchun foydalanuvchi joyini birlashtiramiz. @ info: whatsthis Inson qiymatlari Twitterda juda muhim emoji joyi mavjud, va yaxshi vazifasiz Twittlarni yaxshi va tabiiy qilishimiz mumkin. Ko'pchilik, emoji manzilini tasdiqlash imkoniyatini o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'zgartirish mumkin. Biz esa SemEval2018da emoji label kutilmagan birinchi birinchi boʻsh vazifa uchun oʻzgartirilgan maʼlumotlar tartibi natijasi haqida xabar beramiz.", 'nl': "In de sociale media gebruiken gebruikers vaak kleine afbeeldingen genaamd emoji's in hun berichten. Hoewel het gebruik van emoji's in teksten een belangrijke rol speelt in recente communicatiesystemen, is er minder aandacht besteed aan hun posities in de gegeven teksten, ondanks dat gebruikers zorgvuldig kiezen en plaatsen een emoji die past bij hun bericht. Het verkennen van posities van emoji's in teksten zal het begrip van de relatie tussen emoji's en teksten verbeteren. We breiden een voorspellingstak voor emoji-labels uit waarbij rekening wordt gehouden met de informatie van emoji-posities, door gezamenlijk de emoji-positie in een tweet te leren om het emoji-label te voorspellen. De resultaten tonen aan dat de positie van emoji's in teksten een goede aanwijzing is om de prestaties van de voorspelling van emoji-labels te verbeteren. Menselijke evaluatie valideert dat er een geschikte emoji positie in een tweet bestaat, en onze voorgestelde taak is in staat tweets fancy en natuurlijker te maken. Bovendien kan het overwegen van de emoji positie de prestaties voor de ironie detectie taak verder verbeteren in vergelijking met de emoji label voorspelling. We rapporteren ook de experimentele resultaten voor de gewijzigde dataset, vanwege het probleem van de oorspronkelijke dataset voor de eerste gedeelde taak om een emoji label te voorspellen in SemEval2018.", 'da': 'I de sociale medier bruger brugerne ofte små billeder kaldet emojis i deres indlæg. Selvom brugen af emojis i tekster spiller en central rolle i de seneste kommunikationssystemer, er der blevet lagt mindre opmærksomhed på deres positioner i de givne tekster, på trods af at brugerne omhyggeligt vælger og sætter en emoji, der matcher deres indlæg. Udforskning af emojis positioner i tekster vil øge forståelsen af forholdet mellem emojis og tekster. Vi udvider en emojietiket forudsigelsesopgave under hensyntagen til oplysningerne om emojipositioner ved i fællesskab at lære emojipositionen i et tweet for at forudsige emojietiket. Resultaterne viser, at placeringen af emojis i tekster er et godt spor til at øge ydeevnen af emoji etiket forudsigelse. Menneskelig evaluering bekræfter, at der findes en passende emoji position i en tweet, og vores foreslåede opgave er i stand til at gøre tweets mere fancy og naturlig. Desuden kan overvejelse af emoji position yderligere forbedre ydeevnen for ironidetektionsopgaven sammenlignet med emoji etiket forudsigelse. Vi rapporterer også de eksperimentelle resultater for det modificerede datasæt, på grund af problemet med det oprindelige datasæt til den første delte opgave at forudsige en emoji etiket i SemEval2018.', 'de': 'In den sozialen Medien verwenden Nutzer in ihren Beiträgen häufig kleine Bilder, sogenannte Emojis. Obwohl die Verwendung von Emojis in Texten eine Schlüsselrolle in neueren Kommunikationssystemen spielt, wurde weniger Aufmerksamkeit auf ihre Positionen in den gegebenen Texten gelegt, obwohl Benutzer sorgfältig ein Emoji auswählen und setzen, das zu ihrem Beitrag passt. Das Erforschen der Positionen von Emojis in Texten wird das Verständnis der Beziehung zwischen Emojis und Texten verbessern. Wir erweitern eine Emoji-Label-Vorhersageaufgabe unter Berücksichtigung der Informationen von Emoji-Positionen, indem wir gemeinsam die Emoji-Position in einem Tweet lernen, um das Emoji-Label vorherzusagen. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Position von Emojis in Texten ein guter Hinweis ist, um die Leistung der Emoji-Label-Vorhersage zu steigern. Die menschliche Bewertung bestätigt, dass es eine geeignete Emoji-Position in einem Tweet gibt, und unsere vorgeschlagene Aufgabe ist es, Tweets ausgefallener und natürlicher zu machen. Darüber hinaus kann die Berücksichtigung der Emoji-Position die Leistung für die Ironie-Erkennungsaufgabe im Vergleich zur Emoji-Label-Vorhersage weiter verbessern. Wir berichten auch die experimentellen Ergebnisse für den modifizierten Datensatz, aufgrund des Problems des ursprünglichen Datensatzes für die erste gemeinsame Aufgabe, ein Emoji-Label in SemEval2018 vorherzusagen.', 'id': 'Di media sosial, pengguna sering menggunakan gambar kecil yang disebut emoji di pos mereka. Although using emojis in texts plays a key role in recent communication systems, less attention has been paid on their positions in the given texts, despite that users carefully choose and put an emoji that matches their post.  Menjelaskan posisi emoji dalam teks akan meningkatkan pemahaman hubungan antara emoji dan teks. Kami memperluas tugas prediksi label emoji dengan mempertimbangkan informasi dari posisi emoji, dengan bersama belajar posisi emoji dalam tweet untuk prediksi label emoji. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa posisi emoji dalam teks adalah petunjuk yang baik untuk meningkatkan prestasi prediksi label emoji. Evaluasi manusia menyatakan bahwa ada posisi emoji yang cocok dalam tweet, dan tugas kami yang diusulkan dapat membuat tweet lebih mewah dan alami. Selain itu, mempertimbangkan posisi emoji dapat meningkatkan prestasi untuk tugas deteksi ironi dibandingkan dengan prediksi label emoji. We also report the experimental results for the modified dataset, due to the problem of the original dataset for the first shared task to predict an emoji label in SemEval2018.', 'bg': 'В социалните медии потребителите често използват малки изображения, наречени емоджи в своите публикации. Въпреки че използването на емоджи в текстовете играе ключова роля в последните комуникационни системи, по-малко внимание е отделено на позициите им в дадените текстове, въпреки че потребителите внимателно избират и поставят емоджи, който съответства на публикацията им. Изследването на позициите на емоджи в текстовете ще подобри разбирането за връзката между емоджи и текстове. Разширяваме задачата за прогнозиране на етикета на емоджи, като отчитаме информацията за позициите на емоджи, като съвместно изучаваме позицията на емоджи в туит, за да предскажем етикета на емоджи. Резултатите показват, че позицията на емоджи в текстовете е добра следа за повишаване на ефективността на прогнозирането на етикетите на емоджи. Оценката на човека потвърждава, че съществува подходяща позиция на емоджи в туит и нашата предложена задача е в състояние да направи туитовете по-фантастични и естествени. В допълнение, разглеждането на позицията на емоджи може допълнително да подобри производителността на задачата за откриване на ирония в сравнение с прогнозирането на етикета на емоджи. Докладваме и експерименталните резултати за модифицирания набор от данни, поради проблема с оригиналния набор от данни за първата споделена задача за предсказване на етикет на емоджи в СемЕвал2018.', 'fa': 'در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی، کاربران اغلب از تصاویر کوچک به نام emojis در جایگاه\u200cهایشان استفاده می\u200cکنند. اگرچه از استفاده از emojis در متن\u200cها نقش کلید در سیستم ارتباطی اخیر بازی می\u200cکند، توجه کمتر بر موقعیت\u200cهایشان در متن\u200cهای داده شده، با وجود اینکه کاربران با دقت انتخاب می\u200cکنند و ایموجی را می\u200cگذارند که با پوست\u200cهایشان هماهنگ می توسعه موقعیت\u200cهای emojis در متن\u200cها درک رابطه بین emojis و متن\u200cها را بیشتر می\u200cدهد. ما یک کار پیش\u200cبینی برچسب emoji را گسترش می\u200cدهیم با توجه به اطلاعات موقعیت emoji، با همراه یاد گرفتن موقعیت emoji در یک تویت برای پیش\u200cبینی برچسب emoji. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که موقعیت emojis در متن\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهد که نشان خوبی برای افزایش پیش\u200cبینی برچسب\u200cهای emoji است. ارزیابی انسان تصدیق می\u200cکند که موقعیت ایموجی مناسب در یک تویت وجود دارد، و وظیفه پیشنهاد ما قادر است که توئیت\u200cها را افتخار و طبیعی\u200cتر ساخت. در اضافه، با توجه به موقعیت emoji می\u200cتواند عملکرد برای کارهای شناسایی مسخره را در مقایسه با پیش\u200cبینی برچسب emoji بهتر کند. ما همچنین نتایج آزمایشی برای مجموعه داده\u200cهای تغییر داده\u200cشده را گزارش می\u200cدهیم، به دلیل مشکل مجموعه داده\u200cهای اصلی برای اولین کار مشترک برای پیش\u200cبینی یک نقاشی emoji در SemEval 2018.', 'hr': 'U društvenim medijima, korisnici često koriste male slike koje se zovu emoji na svojim mjestima. Iako korištenje emojis u tekstima ima ključnu ulogu u nedavnim komunikacijskim sustavima, manje je pažnje obraćeno na njihove pozicije u određenim tekstima, uprkos tome da korisnici pažljivo biraju i stavljaju emoji koji odgovara svojim postima. Istraživanje pozicija emoja u tekstima povećat će razumijevanje odnosa između emoja i teksta. Proširimo predviđanje emoji oznake s obzirom na informacije emoji pozicija, zajedno učeći emoji poziciju u tweetu kako bi predvidjeli etiketu emoji. Rezultati pokazuju da je položaj emojis u tekstima dobar trag za povećanje učinkovitosti predviđanja emoji etikete. Ljudska procjena potvrđuje da postoji odgovarajuća emoji pozicija u tweetu, a naš predloženi zadatak je u mogućnosti učiniti tweets fantastičnijim i prirodnijim. Osim toga, s obzirom na emoji položaj može bolje poboljšati učinkovitost zadatka za otkrivanje ironija u usporedbi s predviđanjem etikete emoji. Također prijavljujemo eksperimentalne rezultate za modificiranu setu podataka zbog problema originalnog seta podataka za prvi zajednički zadatak kako bi predvidjeli etiketu emoji u SemEval2018.', 'af': "In die sosiale media gebruik gebruikers dikwels klein beelde wat emojis genoem word in hul pos. Alhoewel die gebruik van emojis in teks speel 'n sleutel rol in onlangse kommunikasie stelsels, is minder aandag betaal op hul posisies in die gegewe teks, ten trots dat gebruikers versigtig kies en sit 'n emoji wat ooreenstem hul pos. Verskyn posisies van emojis in teks sal verstanding van die verwanting tussen emojis en teks verbeter. Ons uitbrei 'n emoji etiket voorskou taak wat neem in rekening die inligting van emoji posisies, deur saamstig die emoji posisie in 'n tweet te leer om die emoji etiket te voorskou. Die resultate wys dat die posisie van emojis in teks 'n goeie kleur is om die prestasie van emoji etiket voorskou te vergroot. Die menslike evaluering bevestig dat daar 'n geskikte emoji posisie bestaan in 'n tweet, en ons voorgestelde taak is in staat om tweets meer fancy en natuurlik te maak. In addition, considering emoji position can further improve the performance for the irony detection task compared to the emoji label prediction. Ons rapporteer ook die eksperimentale resultate vir die verander datastel, vanweë die probleem van die oorspronklike datastel vir die eerste gedeelde taak om 'n emoji etiket in SemEval2018 te voorskou.", 'tr': 'Sosyal medýýatlarda, ullançylar köplenç emojis adlanan kiçi suratlary öz postalarynda ulanýarlar. Ýakynda emojis ullanýan a görä ýüz komunikasy sistemalarda a çyk rol çalýar, ýöne ullanýan metinlerde öz ýerlerine has az üns berilýär. Ullançylar öz ýerlerini gowy görkez we ýerlerine täsir bir emoji goýýarlar. Emotiklerin metinlerinde konumlarını açıklamak emojis ve metinler arasındaki ilişkilerini geliştirir. Emojiň ýerlerini üýtgetmek üçin emoji etiket täblisini üýtgederis. Netijeler emoji etiketlerinin öngörümlerini arttırmak üçin emoji metinlerinin durumunun gowy bir ipdir. İnsanyň deňlemesi tweetde ýeterli emoji pozisiýasy bar we teklip eden zadymyz tweetleri has gowy görnüş we tebigy edip bilýär. Emojiň ýerini gözlemek üçin emoji etiket täblisasynyň öňünde görä kanunlaryň netijesini gowurap biler. Biz hem üýtgeden veri setiriniñ netijesini hem çykarypdyk. Bu sebäbi ilkinji üýtgeden zady üçin SemEval2018 da emoji etiketini öňündirmek üçin çykarypdyk.', 'ko': '소셜미디어에서 사용자들은 게시물에 emojis라는 작은 그림을 자주 사용한다.비록 최근의 통신 시스템에서 텍스트에서 이모티콘을 사용하는 것이 관건적인 역할을 하지만 사람들은 이모티콘이 주어진 텍스트에 있는 위치에 대한 관심이 비교적 적다. 비록 사용자는 게시물과 일치하는 이모티콘을 꼼꼼히 선택하고 배치하지만.이모티콘이 텍스트에 있는 위치를 탐색하면 이모티콘과 텍스트 간의 관계에 대한 이해를 깊이 있게 하는 데 도움이 될 것이다.우리는 이모티콘 위치 정보를 고려한 상황에서 추문의 이모티콘 위치를 연합하여 이모티콘 라벨을 예측함으로써 이모티콘 라벨 예측 임무를 확대했다.그 결과 이모티콘이 텍스트에 있는 위치는 이모티콘 라벨의 예측 성능을 향상시키는 좋은 단서로 나타났다.인류 평가는 추문에 적당한 이모티콘 위치가 존재한다는 것을 검증했고 우리가 제시한 임무는 추문을 더욱 신기하고 자연스럽게 할 수 있다.또한 이모티콘 예측보다 이모티콘 위치를 고려하면 반어 검출 임무의 성능을 더욱 높일 수 있다.수정된 데이터 세트의 실험 결과도 보고했는데 이는 SemEval이 2018년 처음으로 이모티콘 라벨을 예측하는 공유 작업에 원시 데이터 세트가 문제가 있었기 때문이다.', 'sw': 'Katika mitandao ya kijamii, watumiaji mara nyingi wanatumia picha ndogo zinazoitwa emojis katika makala zao. Ingawa kwa kutumia emojis katika maandishi inacheza nafasi muhimu katika mfumo wa mawasiliano wa hivi karibuni, hata hivyo, has a hivyo, watumiaji wanachagua kwa makini na kuweka hisia inayolinganisha na makala yao. Kuelezea nafasi za emojis katika maandishi yataongeza uelewa wa uhusiano kati ya emojis na ujumbe. Tunaongeza kazi ya kutabiri alama za emoji kwa kuzingatia taarifa za vituo vya hisia, kwa kujifunza nafasi ya hisia kwa pamoja katika twiti ya kutabiri alama ya emoji. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa nafasi ya emojis katika maandishi ni msingi mzuri wa kuongeza utabiri wa alama za emoji. Utafiti wa binadamu unathibitisha kuwa kuna nafasi sahihi ya hisia katika twiti, na kazi yetu inayopendekezwa inaweza kufanya twiti zenye ubora na asili zaidi. Kwa kuongeza, kuangalia nafasi ya hisia inaweza kuboresha ufanisi wa kazi ya uchunguzi wa kejeli ukilinganisha na utabiri wa alama za hisia. Pia tunaripoti matokeo ya majaribio kwa ajili ya seti ya taarifa zilizobadilishwa, kutokana na tatizo la taarifa za awali kwa kazi ya kwanza zilizoshirikishwa kutabiri alama ya emoji jijini SemEval2018.', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում օգտագործողները հաճախ օգտագործում են փոքրիկ պատկերներ, որոնք կոչվում են էմոջա իրենց տեղադրություններում: Չնայած, որ էմոջայի օգտագործումը տեքստներում կարևոր դեր է խաղում վերջին հաղորդակցման համակարգերում, ավելի քիչ ուշադրություն է դարձվել տվյալ տեքստների դիրքերի վրա, չնայած նրան, որ օգտագործողները ուշադիր ընտրում են և տեղադրում են էմոջայ Էմոջայի դիրքերի ուսումնասիրելը տեքստներում կբարելավի էմոջայի և տեքստների միջև կապը: Մենք ընդլայնում ենք էմոջի պիտակների կանխատեսման խնդիրը, հաշվի առնելով էմոջի դիրքերի տեղեկատվությունը, միասին սովորելով էմոջի դիրքը թվիթի մեջ էմոջի պիտակների կանխատեսելու համար: The results demonstrate that the position of emojis in texts is a good clue to boost the performance of emoji label prediction.  Մարդկային գնահատումը ստուգում է, որ գոյություն ունի համապատասխան էմոջի դիրք թվիթի մեջ, և մեր առաջարկած խնդիրը կարողանում է դարձնել թվիթին ավելի գեղեցիկ և բնական: Ավելին, հաշվի առնելով էմոջի դիրքը, կարող է ավելի լավ բարելավել էմոջի պիտակի կանխատեսումների համեմատած հեղինակության հայտնաբերման խնդրի արդյունքը: Մենք նաև զեկուցում ենք փորձարկումների արդյունքները փոփոխված տվյալների համակարգի համար, քանի որ առաջին ընդհանուր խնդիրների առաջին համակարգի տվյալների համակարգի խնդիրն է, որտեղ կանխատեսվում է էմոջայի պիտակ ՍեմԵվալ 2018-ում:', 'am': 'In the social media, users frequently use small images called emojis in their posts.  ምንም እንኳን የኢሜጂ በጽሑፎች ውስጥ ቢጠቀም፣ በአሁኑ ጊዜ በመግኘት ስርዓት ውስጥ የቁልፍ ሚዛን ያሳያል፤ ምንም እንኳን በተሰጠው ጽሑፎች ውስጥ ተጠቃሚዎች በጽሑፎች ላይ ተቃውሞ ቢመረጡ እና ፖስታቸውን የሚያስተካክሉ ኢሜጂን በመስጠት ያኖራሉ፡፡ የኢሜጂ ቦታዎች በጽሑፎች ውስጥ የኢሜጂ እና ጽሑፎች መካከል ግንኙነትን ማስተዋል ይጨምርላቸዋል፡፡ የemoji ቦታ መረጃዎችን በመጠየቅ የኢሜጂ ቦታዎችን በመጠቀም እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቹ የኢሜጂ ጽሑፎች ውስጥ የኢሜጂ ቦታ የኢሜጂ የኢሜጂ የኢንጂ መዝገብ ትንቢት ለመደነቂያ መልካም ዕውቅት ነው፡፡ የሰው ውጤት የኢሞጂ ስሜት በTwittet ውስጥ እንዳለ ያስተካክላል፤ በተዘጋጀውም ስራችን ትዊተሮችን አብልጦ ያማረ እና ፍጥረት ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የኢሜጂ ስርዓት የኢሜጂ መዝገብ ትንቢት ከሚያሳየው የኢኮኖኒ አካባቢ ስርዓት እንዲጨምር ይችላል፡፡ በሴምEval2018 ውስጥ የኢሜጂ ምልክት ለመቀጠል የመጀመሪያው ትክክል አድራሻ ስራ ላይ የመጀመሪያውን የዳታ ሳጥን ጉዳይ ምክንያት የተፈተናውን ውጤቶች እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে ব্যবহারকারীরা প্রায়শই তাদের পোস্টে ইমোজিক নামে ছোট ছবি ব্যবহার করে। যদিও টেক্সটে ইমোজিক ব্যবহার করে সাম্প্রতিক যোগাযোগ সিস্টেমে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা পালন করে, তবে প্রদত্ত টেক্সটে তাদের অবস্থান কম মনোযোগ প্রদান করা  টেক্সটে ইমোজির অবস্থান বিশ্লেষণের বিষয়টি ইমোজি এবং টেক্সটের মধ্যে সম্পর্কের ব্যাপারে বুঝতে পারে। আমরা ইমোজি লেবেলের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী কাজ বৃদ্ধি করি, ইমোজি অবস্থানের তথ্য হিসেবে বিবেচনা করে, যাতে একত্রে ইমোজি অবস্থান শিখে ইমোজি লেব ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে লেখায় ইমোজির অবস্থান হচ্ছে ইমোজি লেবেলের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী বৃদ্ধি করার জন্য। মানুষের মানুষের মূল্য যুক্তি নিশ্চিত যে টুইটে একটি যথাযথ ইমোজি অবস্থান রয়েছে এবং আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত কাজ টুইটার আরো উৎসাহ ও এছাড়াও, ইমোজি লেবেলের ভবিষ্যতের তুলনায় ইমোজির অবস্থান বিবেচনা করে এমজি লেবেলের ভবিষ্যৎবাণীর তুলনায় পরিহাসের এছাড়াও আমরা পরিবর্তন করা ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফলের প্রতিবেদন প্রদান করি, সেমইভাল২০১৮-এ ইমোজি লেবেলেটের প্রথম শেয়ার করা কাজের জন্য প্', 'bs': 'U društvenim medijima, korisnici često koriste male slike koje se zovu emoji na svojim mjestima. Iako korištenje emojis u tekstima ima ključnu ulogu u nedavnim komunikacijskim sistemima, manje je pažnje obraćeno na njihove pozicije u određenim tekstima, uprkos tome da korisnici pažljivo biraju i stavljaju emoji koji odgovara svojim postima. Istraživanje pozicija emoja u tekstima povećaće razumijevanje odnosa između emoja i teksta. Proširimo predviđanje emoji-etiketa s obzirom na informacije emoji pozicija, zajedno učeći emoji poziciju u tweetu kako bi predvidjeli etiketu emoji. Rezultati pokazuju da je položaj emojis u tekstima dobar trag za povećanje predviđanja emoji etikete. Ljudska procjena potvrđuje da postoji odgovarajuća emoji pozicija u tweetu, a naš predloženi zadatak je u mogućnosti da napravi tweets fantastičnije i prirodnije. Osim toga, s obzirom na poziciju emoji može bolje poboljšati učinkovitost zadatka za otkrivanje ironija u usporedbi s predviđanjem etikete emoji. Također prijavljujemo eksperimentalne rezultate za modificiranu setu podataka zbog problema originalnog seta podataka za prvi zajednički zadatak kako bi predvidjeli etiketu emoji u SemEval2018.', 'sq': 'Në mediat shoqërore, përdoruesit shpesh përdorin imazhe të vogla të quajtura emoxhi në postet e tyre. Megjithëse përdorimi i emojis në tekste luan një rol kyç në sistemet e fundit të komunikimit, më pak vëmendje është kushtuar në pozicionet e tyre në tekstet e dhëna, pavarësisht se përdoruesit zgjedhin me kujdes dhe vendosin një emoji që përputhet me post in e tyre. Shqyrtimi i pozicioneve të emojis në tekste do të rritë kuptimin e marrëdhënieve midis emojis dhe teksteve. Ne zgjerojmë një detyrë parashikimi të etiketës emoji duke marrë parasysh informacionin e pozicioneve emoji, duke mësuar së bashku pozicionin emoji në një tweet për të parashikuar etiketën emoji. Rezultatet tregojnë se pozicioni i emojis në tekste është një udhërrëfyes i mirë për të rritur performancën e parashikimit të etiketës emoji. Vlerësimi njerëzor vlerëson se ekziston një pozicion i përshtatshëm emoji në një tweet dhe detyra jonë e propozuar është në gjendje të bëjë tweetet më të bukur dhe natyrore. Përveç kësaj, konsiderimi i pozicionit emoji mund të përmirësojë më tej performancën për detyrën e zbulimit të ironisë krahasuar me parashikimin e etiketës emoji. Ne raportojmë gjithashtu rezultatet eksperimentale për grupin e të dhënave të modifikuara, për shkak të problemit të grupit origjinal të të dhënave për detyrën e parë të përbashkët për të parashikuar një etiketë emoji në SemEval2018.', 'az': 'Sosyal media içində, istifadəçilər məktublarında emojis adlı kiçik görüntüləri alırlar. Lakin emoji ilə məktublar istifadə etmək yeni komunikasyon sistemlərində çox möcüzə rol çalır, istifadəçiləri məktublarına uyğunlaşan emoji seçməsinə baxmayaraq, onların məktublarında məlumatlarına daha az dikkat verilmişdir. Emojilərin mətnlərdə mövqelərini təhsil etmək emoji və mətnlər arasındakı ilişkilərin anlaşılmasını artırar. Biz emoji pozisyonlarının məlumatlarını hesablayaraq emoji etiketlərinin məlumatlarını öyrəndik, emoji etiketini öyrəndik. Mətnlərdə emoji pozisiyası emoji etiketlərinin öngörünüşünü artırmaq üçün yaxşı bir ipdir. İnsan değerlendirməsi twetdə uyğun emoji pozisiyası var və bizim təklif etdiyimiz işlərimiz twetləri daha təhsil və təhsil edə bilər. Əvvəlcə emoji pozisiyasını düşünərək emoji etiketlərinin öngörünüşü ilə qarşılaşdığı ironi keşif işinin performansını daha da artıra bilər. Biz həmçin in SemEval2018-də emoji etiketini öyrənmək üçün ilk paylaşdırılmış işin problemi üzündən dəyişdirilmiş verilənlər üçün təcrübə nəticələrini də bildiririk.', 'ca': "Als mitjans socials, els usuaris utilitzen sovint imatges petites anomenades emoji en els seus posts. Malgrat que utilitzar emoji en textos té un paper clau en els sistemes de comunicació recents, s'ha prestat menys atenció a les seves posicions en els textos dados, malgrat que els usuaris escollin i posan un emoji que coincideix amb el seu post. Explorar posicions d'emoji en els textos millorarà la comprensió de la relació entre emoji i text. Estendem una tasca de predicció de l'etiqueta emoji tenint en compte la informació de les posicions emoji, aprenent conjuntament la posició emoji en un tweet per predir l'etiqueta emoji. Els resultats demostren que la posició dels emoji en els textos és una bona pista per impulsar el rendiment de la predicció de l'etiqueta emoji. L'evaluació humana valida que hi ha una posició adequada d'emoji en un tweet, i la nostra tasca proposada és capaç de fer els tweets més fantàstics i naturals. A més, considerant la posició d'emoji pot millorar encara més el rendiment de la tasca de detecció d'ironia en comparació amb la predicció de l'etiqueta d'emoji. També informem dels resultats experimentals del conjunt de dades modificat, degut al problema del conjunt de dades original per la primera tasca compartida de predir una etiqueta emoji a SemEval2018.", 'et': 'Sotsiaalmeedias kasutavad kasutajad sageli oma postitustes väikeseid pilte, mida nimetatakse emojideks. Kuigi emojide kasutamine tekstides mängib hiljutistes kommunikatsioonisüsteemides olulist rolli, on nende positsioonidele antud tekstides vähem tähelepanu pööratud, vaatamata sellele, et kasutajad valivad hoolikalt ja panevad emojid, mis sobib nende postitusega. Emojide positsioonide uurimine tekstides parandab emojide ja tekstide vahelise seose mõistmist. Laiendame emoji sildi ennustamise ülesannet, võttes arvesse emoji positsioonide teavet, õppides ühiselt emoji positsiooni säutsu, et ennustada emoji sildi. Tulemused näitavad, et emojide positsioon tekstides on hea vihje emojide märgistuse ennustamise jõudluse suurendamiseks. Inimese hindamine kinnitab, et säutsis on sobiv emoji positsioon ja meie pakutud ülesanne suudab muuta säutsud uhkemaks ja loomulikumaks. Lisaks võib emoji positsiooni kaalumine iroonia tuvastamise ülesande jõudlust veelgi parandada võrreldes emoji sildi prognoosiga. Samuti anname aru muudetud andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused, kuna SemEval2018 esimese jagatud ülesande emoji märgistuse prognoosimise algse andmekogumi probleem on tekkinud.', 'cs': 'Na sociálních médiích uživatelé ve svých příspěvcích často používají malé obrázky zvané emoji. Přestože používání emoji v textech hraje klíčovou roli v nedávných komunikačních systémech, méně pozornosti je věnováno jejich pozici v daných textech, přestože uživatelé pečlivě vybírají a vloží emoji, které odpovídají jejich příspěvku. Prozkoumání pozic emoji v textech zlepší porozumění vztahu mezi emoji a texty. Rozšiřujeme úlohu predikce štítků emoji s ohledem na informace o pozicích emoji tím, že se společně učíme pozici emoji ve tweetu, abychom předpověděli štítek emoji. Výsledky ukazují, že pozice emoji v textech je dobrým vodítkem pro zvýšení výkonnosti predikce etiket emoji. Lidské hodnocení potvrzuje, že ve tweetu existuje vhodná pozice emoji a náš navrhovaný úkol je schopen tweety vytvořit fantazijnější a přirozenější. Kromě toho může zvážení polohy emoji dále zlepšit výkon pro úlohu detekce ironie ve srovnání s predikcí etiket emoji. Dále uvádíme experimentální výsledky upravené datové sady, vzhledem k problému původní datové sady pro první sdílený úkol předpovědět etiketu emoji v SemEval2018.', 'fi': 'Sosiaalisessa mediassa käyttäjät käyttävät kirjoituksissaan usein pieniä kuvia, joita kutsutaan emojiksi. Vaikka emojien käyttö teksteissä on avainasemassa viimeaikaisissa viestintäjärjestelmissä, vähemmän huomiota on kiinnitetty niiden asemaan annetuissa teksteissä, vaikka käyttäjät valitsevat ja asettavat huolellisesti oman postauksensa mukaisen emojin. Emojien asemien tutkiminen tekstissä parantaa ymmärrystä emojien ja tekstien välisestä suhteesta. Laajennamme emoji-tunnisteen ennustamistehtävää ottaen huomioon emoji-asemien tiedot oppimalla yhdessä emoji-aseman tweetissä emoji-tunnisteen ennustamiseksi. Tulokset osoittavat, että emojien sijainti tekstissä on hyvä vihje emojien ennustamisen tehostamiseen. Ihmisen arviointi vahvistaa, että tweetissä on sopiva emoji-asento, ja ehdotettu tehtävämme pystyy tekemään tweeteistä hienompia ja luonnollisempia. Lisäksi emoji-aseman huomioon ottaminen voi parantaa ironian tunnistustehtävän suorituskykyä entisestään emoji-etiketin ennustukseen verrattuna. Raportoimme myös muokatun aineiston kokeelliset tulokset, koska SemEval2018:ssa ensimmäisen jaetun emoji-tunnisteen ennustamistehtävän alkuperäinen aineisto on ongelmallinen.', 'jv': 'Nang media sotiné, pengguna biasane mengko gambar mobil nang epos mobil politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Genjer-genjer langkung pawangan bakal terus ing metu kuwi bisa langkung wigatining sampeyan karo omoji karo texti. Awak dhéwé éntuk tanggal pergunian emuji nggawe nêmên ngerti banjuré informasi nan empji, lan tambah nggambar kok cara empji nêmên tuwit kanggo ngertuan etiket sing omoji. Rejalekan iku ngomongke tindakan Emaji ing pancene iki luwih apik banjur nggawe ngerasahan irumbane ning etiket Emaji. Ngucap Cino politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntuk dadi sing perusahaan kanggo nggawe dataset anyari dadi sing perusahaan kanggo nggawe nggawe barang sampek tanggal dhéwé kanggo uréhku etiket emuji nang semi-2008.', 'sk': 'V družbenih omrežjih uporabniki pogosto uporabljajo majhne slike, imenovane emojis v svojih objavah. Čeprav ima uporaba emojijev v besedilih ključno vlogo v nedavnih komunikacijskih sistemih, je bila manj pozornosti namenjena njihovim položajem v danih besedilih, kljub temu, da uporabniki skrbno izberejo in postavijo emoji, ki se ujema z njihovo objavo. Raziskovanje položajev emojijev v besedilih bo izboljšalo razumevanje razmerja med emojiji in besedili. Razširimo nalogo napovedovanja oznake emoji ob upoštevanju informacij o položajih emoji, tako da skupaj učimo položaj emoji v tweetu za napovedovanje oznake emoji. Rezultati kažejo, da je položaj emojijev v besedilih dober namig za povečanje učinkovitosti napovedovanja oznak emojijev. Človeška ocena potrjuje, da obstaja ustrezen položaj emoji v tweetu, naša predlagana naloga pa je sposobna narediti tweete bolj prefinjene in naravne. Poleg tega lahko upoštevanje položaja emoji dodatno izboljša učinkovitost opravila zaznavanja ironije v primerjavi z napovedjo nalepke emoji. Poročamo tudi eksperimentalne rezultate za spremenjeni nabor podatkov zaradi problematike izvirnega nabora podatkov za prvo skupno nalogo napovedovanja oznake emoji v SemEval2018.', 'ha': 'A cikin mitandai da jamii, masu amfani da wasu zane masu yawa sunã amfani da zanen ƙarami waɗanda aka yi jina "Emjis" cikin posten su. Kuma kõ da ya yi amfani da Emjis cikin littattafai, zai yi wani role na muhimmi a cikin tsarin mawajiyansu na farko, sai an yi ƙaranci ga muhimmanci a cikin matsayin da aka bai wa, kuma ingawa, idan masu amfani da shi ya zãɓi muhimmi kuma ya sami wani foji wanda ya yi daidai da makamporinsu. Yana ƙara fahimci ga mazaɓa cikin littattafai da mutane. Mu shimfiɗa wani aikin abin da aka yi wa hisãbi na Emji, ana sami takardar information na wurãren sigogi, a sami da za\'a sanar da wurin Emji a cikin wani Twitter dõmin ya yi bayani ga alamar Emji. Mataimakin ya nuna cewa wurin da aka kasa cikin takardar mutane ne wani alama mai kyau wa ya boost aikin gabanin bangon ayukan sigogi. Ana ƙaddara mutum na gaskata cewa akwai wani wuri mai daidai ga jiji cikin wani Twitter, kuma aikin mu da aka buƙata, yana iya iya iya samun Twitter masu fancy da halinsa. Da wannan, a sami, idan an yi tunãni ga matsayin jiji, zai iya ƙara gyaran aikin na canje wa aikin nuna na jeri sami da kuma ya sami gabanin ayukan ayuka na Emji. Mu sãka wa matsalan jarraba wa tsarin da aka yi modified, saboda haka matsalar masu haske na tsari wa aikin farko da aka raba shi dõmin ya gabatar da wata alama na Emji a Semevaal2018.', 'he': "בתקשורת החברתית, משתמשים לעתים קרובות משתמשים בתמונות קטנות שנקראות אמוג'ים בתפקידים שלהם. למרות שהשימוש באמוג'ים בטקסטים משחק תפקיד מפתח במערכות תקשורת לאחרונה, קיבל פחות תשומת לב על עמדותיהם בטקסטים הנתונים, למרות שהמשתמשים בוחרים בזהירות ושימו אימוג'י שמתאים לפוסט שלהם. חקירת עמדות של אמוג'ייס בטקסטים תשפר את ההבנה של מערכת היחסים בין אמוג'ייס לטקסטים. אנו ממשיכים את משימה חיזוי תוויט של אמוג'י בהתחשב במידע של עמדות אמוג'י, על ידי ללמוד ביחד את עמדת האימוג'י בטוויט כדי לחזות את תוויט האימוג'י. התוצאות מראות שמצב האמוג'ים בטקסטים הוא רמז טוב כדי להעלות את ההופעה של ציפוי תווית האמוג'י. הערכה האנושית מאשרת שיש עמדה אמוג'י מתאימה בטיוויט, והמשימה המוצעת שלנו מסוגלת לגרום לטיוויטים יותר מפוארים וטבעיים. בנוסף, בהתחשב במצב האמוג'י יכול לשפר עוד את ההופעה של משימת גילוי האירוניה בהשוואה לחזוי תווית האמוג'י. אנחנו גם מדווחים על התוצאות הניסיוניים של קבוצת המידע השתנה, בגלל הבעיה של קבוצת המידע המקורית למשימה המשותפת הראשונה לחזות תווית אמוג'י בסימEval2018.", 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་emojis སྤྱད་ནས་དུས་ཚོད་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་ནང་དུ་གཙོ་ཆེ་བ་ཞིག་དགོས་མིན་ནའང་། ལག་ལེན་པའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་ཡུལ་ནང་དུ་ཉར ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་emojis ཡི་གནས ང་ཚོས་emoji་ཡིག་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལ་སྔོན་ཚུལ་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་དུ་emoji་ཡིག་གནས་ཡུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བཅུག་པ དབྱིབས་འབྲས་ཐོག་གི་emoji་ཡི་གེ་གནས་ཡུལ་ནི་emoji ཁ་ཡིག་གི་སྔོན་རྟགས་ལ་དཀའ་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་དང་། མིའི་རིགས་གཟུགས་ཐང་ནི་ཡོད་པ་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་emoji་གནས་ཡུལ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་རྟོགས་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་། emoji་གནས་ཡུལ་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ལས་སྒྲུང་ཚུལ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཟིན་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་ལ་བརྟན་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Addressing Slot-Value Changes in Task-oriented Dialogue Systems through Dialogue Domain Adaptation', 'ar': 'معالجة تغييرات قيمة الفتحة في أنظمة الحوار الموجهة نحو المهام من خلال تكييف مجال الحوار', 'fr': "Répondre aux changements de valeur des créneaux dans les systèmes de dialogue orientés tâches grâce à l'adaptation du domaine de dialogue", 'es': 'Abordar los cambios en el valor de las ranuras en los sistemas de diálogo orientados a tareas mediante la adaptación', 'pt': 'Lidando com alterações de valor de slot em sistemas de diálogo orientados a tarefas por meio da adaptação de domínio de diálogo', 'ja': 'タスク指向のダイアログシステムにおけるスロット値の変化に対話ドメイン適応を通じて対処する', 'hi': 'संवाद डोमेन अनुकूलन के माध्यम से कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद प्रणालियों में स्लॉट-मान परिवर्तनों को संबोधित करना', 'zh': '因对话领地,解向事时变', 'ru': 'Решение проблем, связанных с изменениями в системах диалога, ориентированных на решение конкретных задач, путем адаптации области диалога', 'ga': 'Aghaidh a thabhairt ar Athruithe Sliotán-Luach i gCórais Chomhphlé atá Dírithe ar Thascanna trí Oiriúnú Fearainn Idirphlé', 'el': 'Αντιμετώπιση αλλαγών τιμών αυλακώσεων σε συστήματα διαλόγου προσανατολισμένα στις εργασίες μέσω προσαρμογής τομέα διαλόγου', 'hu': 'A résidőérték-változások kezelése a feladatorientált párbeszédrendszerekben a párbeszédtartomány-adaptáció segítségével', 'lt': 'Laikotarpių vertės pokyčių į užduotis orientuotose dialogo sistemose sprendimas dialogo domeno pritaikymo būdu', 'it': "Affrontare i cambiamenti del valore slot nei sistemi di dialogo orientati alle attività attraverso l'adattamento del dominio di dialogo", 'mk': 'Адресирање на промените на вредноста на слотовите во системите за дијалог ориентирани на задачите преку адаптација на доменот на дијалогот', 'ms': 'Alamat Perubahan Nilai-Slot dalam Sistem Dialog Berorientasi-Tugas melalui Penyesuaian Domain Dialog', 'ml': 'ജോലി മാറ്റുന്ന ഡയലോഗ് ഡയലോഗ് ഡോമെയിന്\u200d ആഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d വഴിയിലൂടെ സ്ലോട്ട്- മൂല്യം മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെട', 'ka': 'პარამეტრების დიალოგის სისტემებში Slot- Value ცვლილებების მისამართვა', 'kk': 'Тапсырма бағытталған диалог жүйелерінде Slot- Value өзгерістерді диалог домен адаптациясы арқылы адрестіру', 'mn': 'Диалог Домены Адаптациудын дагуу Слот-утгын өөрчлөлтийг тайлбарлах', 'pl': 'Rozwiązywanie zmian wartości slotu w systemach dialogowych zorientowanych na zadania poprzez adaptację domeny dialogowej', 'no': 'Adresserer endringar av slottverdiar i oppgåveorientert dialogsystemet gjennom dialogdomenetilpassing', 'ro': 'Abordarea schimbărilor valorii sloturilor în sistemele de dialog orientate spre activități prin adaptarea domeniului de dialog', 'so': 'Isticmaalka beddelaadka saxda ee ku qoran nidaamka shaqada', 'sv': 'Åtgärda förändringar av kortvärden i uppgiftsorienterade dialogsystem genom anpassning av dialogdomäner', 'ta': 'செயல் முறைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட உரையாடல் முறைமைகளை உரையாடல் தளத்தின் வழியாக மாற்றுதல்', 'ur': 'ڈیلوگ ڈومین اڈپٹیٹ کے ذریعے ٹاکس-oriented ڈیلوگ سیسٹم میں Slot-Value بدلوں کو ادرس کیا جا رہا ہے', 'si': 'ස්ලෝට්- මුල්ය වෙනස් විදිහට සංවාදය සංවාදය පද්ධතියේ ස්ලෝට් විදිහට පද්ධතිය කරන්න', 'mt': "L-indirizzar tat-Tibdil fil-Valur tas-Slot fis-Sistemi ta' Djalogu orjentati lejn ix-Xogħol permezz ta' Adattament għad-Domain ta' Djalogu", 'sr': 'Одрушавање измена слотовне ценности у системима диалога ориентиранах на задаче путем адаптације домена диалога', 'vi': 'Đối phó độ dốc đạt giá trị thay đổi trong hệ thống đối thoại hướng dẫn Nhiệm vụ', 'uz': 'Comment', 'da': 'Løsning af ændringer af pladsværdi i opgaveorienterede dialogsystemer gennem tilpasning af dialogdomæne', 'nl': 'Aanpakken van slotwaardeveranderingen in taakgerichte dialoogsystemen door aanpassing van dialoogdomeinen', 'bg': 'Справяне с промените в слотовата стойност в системите за диалог, ориентирани към задачите, чрез адаптиране на домейна на диалога', 'hr': 'Obraćanje promjena vrijednosti slota u sustavima dijaloga orijentiranih na zadatke kroz prilagodbu domena dijaloga', 'de': 'Bewältigung von Slot-Value-Veränderungen in aufgabenorientierten Dialogsystemen durch Dialogdomänenanpassung', 'id': 'Addressing Slot-Value Changes in Task-oriented Dialogue Systems through Dialogue Domain Adaptation', 'tr': 'Görev Görniş Görniş Opşenleri Görniş Derjesinde Ululyklary Dialog Domaýy Görniş', 'sw': 'Akiandika mabadiliko ya thamani katika Mfumo wa Dialogu wenye kazi kupitia Adaptation Domain Dialogue', 'af': 'Adres van Slot- Waarde Veranderinge in Opdrag- orienteerde dialoog stelsels deur Dialoog Domein Aanpassing', 'ko': '대화역 조정을 통해 작업형 대화 시스템의 시간 간격 변화를 해결합니다', 'fa': 'پشتیبانی تغییرات ارزش Slot- Slot در سیستم\u200cهای محاورۀ مشارکت به کار به طریق تغییر دامنۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Արժեքների և արժեքների փոփոխությունների ուղղությամբ աշխատանքների ուղղությամբ գտնվող հաղորդակցման միջոցով', 'bn': 'Addressing Slot-Value Changes in Task-oriented Dialogue Systems through Dialogue Domain Adaptation', 'az': 'G√∂nd…ôril…ôn Dialoog Sisteml…ôrind…ô Slot-Value DeńüiŇüiklikl…ôri ńįdar…ô Et', 'cs': 'Řešení změn hodnot slotu v dialogových systémech orientovaných na úlohy prostřednictvím adaptace dialogové domény', 'bs': 'Adresa izmjena slot-vrijednosti u sistemima dijaloga orijentiranih na zadatke kroz adaptaciju domena dijaloga', 'fi': 'Tehtävälähtöisten dialogijärjestelmien lähtö- ja saapumisarvojen muutosten käsittely dialogialueiden mukauttamisen avulla', 'et': 'Tegevusele orienteeritud dialoogisüsteemide teenindusaegade muutuste lahendamine dialoogidomeeni kohandamise kaudu', 'sq': 'Duke trajtuar ndryshimet e vlerës së afatit në sistemet e dialogut të orientuar në detyra nëpërmjet adaptimit të domenit të dialogut', 'ca': "Respectar els canvis de valor d'intervals en els sistemes de diàleg orientats a les tasques mitjançant l'adaptació del domini del diàleg", 'he': 'Addressing Slot-Value Changes in Task-oriented Dialogue Systems through Dialogue Domain Adaptation', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Obravnavanje sprememb v sistemih dialoga, usmerjenih v naloge, s prilagajanjem domen dialoga', 'bo': 'བྱ་འགུལ་གྱིས་སྒོ་རྒྱག་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གླེང་མོལ་གྱི་Slot-Value་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཁ་སྐོང་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Recent task-oriented dialogue systems learn a model from annotated dialogues, and such dialogues are in turn collected and annotated so that they are consistent with certain domain knowledge. However, in real scenarios, domain knowledge is subject to frequent changes, and initial training dialogues may soon become obsolete, resulting in a significant decrease in the model performance. In this paper, we investigate the relationship between training dialogues and domain knowledge, and propose Dialogue Domain Adaptation, a methodology aiming at adapting initial training dialogues to changes intervened in the domain knowledge. We focus on slot-value changes (e.g., when new slot values are available to describe domain entities) and define an experimental setting for dialogue domain adaptation. First, we show that current state-of-the-art models for dialogue state tracking are still poorly robust to slot-value changes of the domain knowledge. Then, we compare different domain adaptation strategies, showing that simple techniques are effective to reduce the gap between training dialogues and domain knowledge.', 'pt': 'Sistemas de diálogo orientados a tarefas recentes aprendem um modelo a partir de diálogos anotados, e esses diálogos são, por sua vez, coletados e anotados para que sejam consistentes com determinado conhecimento de domínio. No entanto, em cenários reais, o conhecimento do domínio está sujeito a mudanças frequentes, e os diálogos iniciais de treinamento podem em breve se tornar obsoletos, resultando em uma diminuição significativa no desempenho do modelo. Neste artigo, investigamos a relação entre diálogos de treinamento e conhecimento de domínio e propomos a Adaptação de Domínio de Diálogo, uma metodologia que visa adaptar os diálogos de treinamento inicial às mudanças intervencionadas no conhecimento de domínio. Nós nos concentramos nas mudanças de valor de slot (por exemplo, quando novos valores de slot estão disponíveis para descrever entidades de domínio) e definimos uma configuração experimental para adaptação de domínio de diálogo. Primeiro, mostramos que os modelos atuais de estado da arte para rastreamento de estado de diálogo ainda são pouco robustos para mudanças de valor de slot do conhecimento do domínio. Em seguida, comparamos diferentes estratégias de adaptação de domínio, mostrando que técnicas simples são eficazes para reduzir a lacuna entre diálogos de treinamento e conhecimento de domínio.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de dialogue axés sur les tâches récents apprennent un modèle à partir de dialogues annotés, et ces dialogues sont à leur tour collectés et annotés de manière à être cohérents avec certaines connaissances du domaine. Cependant, dans des scénarios réels, la connaissance du domaine est sujette à de fréquents changements, et les dialogues de formation initiale peuvent rapidement devenir obsolètes, entraînant une diminution significative des performances du modèle. Dans cet article, nous étudions la relation entre les dialogues de formation et les connaissances du domaine, et proposons Dialogue Domain Adaptation, une méthodologie visant à adapter les dialogues de formation initiale aux changements intervenus dans les connaissances du domaine. Nous nous concentrons sur les changements de valeur de créneau (par exemple, lorsque de nouvelles valeurs de créneau sont disponibles pour décrire des entités de domaine) et définissons un paramètre expérimental pour l'adaptation du domaine de dialogue. Tout d'abord, nous montrons que les modèles actuels de pointe pour le suivi de l'état des dialogues sont encore peu robustes face aux changements de valeur des créneaux dans les connaissances du domaine. Ensuite, nous comparons différentes stratégies d'adaptation de domaines, montrant que des techniques simples sont efficaces pour réduire l'écart entre les dialogues de formation et les connaissances du domaine.", 'ar': 'تتعلم أنظمة الحوار الموجه نحو المهام الحديثة نموذجًا من الحوارات المشروحة ، ويتم جمع هذه الحوارات بدورها وتعليقها بحيث تكون متوافقة مع معرفة مجال معين. ومع ذلك ، في السيناريوهات الحقيقية ، تخضع المعرفة بالمجال لتغييرات متكررة ، وقد تصبح حوارات التدريب الأولية عفا عليها الزمن قريبًا ، مما يؤدي إلى انخفاض كبير في أداء النموذج. في هذه الورقة ، نتحرى العلاقة بين حوارات التدريب ومعرفة المجال ، ونقترح تكييف مجال الحوار ، وهي منهجية تهدف إلى تكييف حوارات التدريب الأولية مع التغييرات المتدخلة في معرفة المجال. نحن نركز على تغييرات قيمة الفتحة (على سبيل المثال ، عند توفر قيم جديدة للفواصل الزمنية لوصف كيانات المجال) وتحديد الإعداد التجريبي لتكييف مجال الحوار. أولاً ، نظهر أن أحدث النماذج الحالية لتتبع حالة الحوار لا تزال ضعيفة بشكل جيد لتغييرات قيمة الفتحة لمعرفة المجال. بعد ذلك ، نقوم بمقارنة استراتيجيات تكيف المجال المختلفة ، مما يدل على أن التقنيات البسيطة فعالة لتقليل الفجوة بين حوارات التدريب ومعرفة المجال.', 'es': 'Los sistemas de diálogo orientados a tareas recientes aprenden un modelo a partir de diálogos anotados, y dichos diálogos, a su vez, se recopilan y anotan para que sean consistentes con ciertos conocimientos de dominio. Sin embargo, en escenarios reales, el conocimiento del dominio está sujeto a cambios frecuentes, y los diálogos de capacitación iniciales pueden quedar obsoletos pronto, lo que resulta en una disminución significativa del rendimiento del modelo. En este artículo, investigamos la relación entre los diálogos de capacitación y el conocimiento del dominio, y proponemos la Adaptación del Dominio del Diálogo, una metodología que tiene como objetivo adaptar los diálogos de capacitación iniciales a los cambios intervenidos en el conocimiento del dominio. Nos centramos en los cambios de valor de ranura (por ejemplo, cuando hay nuevos valores de ranura disponibles para describir entidades de dominio) y definimos un entorno experimental para la adaptación del dominio de diálogo. En primer lugar, mostramos que los modelos actuales de vanguardia para el seguimiento del estado del diálogo siguen siendo poco sólidos para los cambios de valor de las ranuras del conocimiento del dominio. Luego, comparamos diferentes estrategias de adaptación de dominios, demostrando que las técnicas simples son eficaces para reducir la brecha entre los diálogos de capacitación y el conocimiento del dominio.', 'ja': '最近のタスク指向の対話システムは、注釈付きの対話からモデルを学習し、そのような対話は、特定のドメイン知識と一致するように収集され、注釈付けされます。 しかし、実際のシナリオでは、ドメイン知識は頻繁に変更され、初期トレーニングのダイアログがすぐに廃止され、モデルのパフォーマンスが大幅に低下する可能性があります。 この論文では、トレーニングダイアログとドメイン知識の関係を調査し、ドメイン知識に介入した変化に初期トレーニングダイアログを適応させることを目的とした方法論であるDialogue Domain Adaptationを提案する。 私たちは、スロット値の変更（たとえば、ドメインエンティティを記述するために新しいスロット値が利用可能な場合）に焦点を当て、ダイアログドメインの適応のための実験的な設定を定義します。 まず、現在の最先端のダイアログ状態トラッキングモデルは、ドメイン知識のスロット値の変更に対して依然として不十分に堅牢であることが示されています。 次に、異なるドメイン適応戦略を比較し、単純なテクニックがトレーニングの対話とドメイン知識の間のギャップを減らすのに効果的であることを示します。', 'zh': '近者向事之对,系统于带注之对,而此语又收注,以与领域相保。 然于实场之中,领地频变,初教或速过,以致模形显降。 本文者,论培训言与域相应,此谓初培训应变之道也。 臣等专注槽值之变(如当新槽直可施于述域实体时),并定义对话域所宜实验性设。 先者,先进之语也,与形于领地之槽值变犹未定也。 然后校其异域之宜,明约术可以缩小培训言语之间相去也。', 'hi': 'हाल के कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद प्रणालियां एनोटेट संवादों से एक मॉडल सीखती हैं, और इस तरह के संवाद बदले में एकत्र और एनोटेट किए जाते हैं ताकि वे कुछ डोमेन ज्ञान के अनुरूप हों। हालांकि, वास्तविक परिदृश्यों में, डोमेन ज्ञान लगातार परिवर्तनों के अधीन है, और प्रारंभिक प्रशिक्षण संवाद जल्द ही अप्रचलित हो सकते हैं, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप मॉडल प्रदर्शन में महत्वपूर्ण कमी हो सकती है। इस पेपर में, हम प्रशिक्षण संवादों और डोमेन ज्ञान के बीच संबंधों की जांच करते हैं, और संवाद डोमेन अनुकूलन का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो डोमेन ज्ञान में हस्तक्षेप किए गए परिवर्तनों के लिए प्रारंभिक प्रशिक्षण संवादों को अनुकूलित करने के उद्देश्य से एक पद्धति है। हम स्लॉट-मान परिवर्तनों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं (उदाहरण के लिए, जब डोमेन संस्थाओं का वर्णन करने के लिए नए स्लॉट मान उपलब्ध होते हैं) और संवाद डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए एक प्रयोगात्मक सेटिंग निर्धारित करते हैं। सबसे पहले, हम दिखाते हैं कि संवाद राज्य ट्रैकिंग के लिए वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक मॉडल अभी भी डोमेन ज्ञान के स्लॉट-मूल्य परिवर्तनों के लिए खराब रूप से मजबूत हैं। फिर, हम विभिन्न डोमेन अनुकूलन रणनीतियों की तुलना करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि प्रशिक्षण संवादों और डोमेन ज्ञान के बीच के अंतर को कम करने के लिए सरल तकनीकें प्रभावी हैं।', 'ru': 'Недавние системы диалога, ориентированные на решение конкретных задач, изучают модель на основе аннотированных диалогов, и такие диалоги, в свою очередь, собираются и аннотируются таким образом, чтобы они соответствовали определенным знаниям в определенной области. Однако в реальных сценариях знания о предметной области подвержены частым изменениям, и первоначальные учебные диалоги вскоре могут устареть, что приведет к значительному снижению эффективности модели. В этой статье мы исследуем взаимосвязь между обучающими диалогами и знаниями об области и предлагаем адаптацию области диалога, методологию, направленную на адаптацию начальных обучающих диалогов к изменениям, происходящим в области знаний. Мы фокусируемся на изменениях значения слота (например, когда доступны новые значения слота для описания сущностей домена) и определяем экспериментальную настройку для адаптации домена диалога. Во-первых, мы показываем, что современные модели отслеживания состояния диалога все еще плохо устойчивы к изменениям в значении области. Затем мы сравниваем различные стратегии адаптации домена, показывая, что простые методы эффективны для сокращения разрыва между обучающими диалогами и знаниями домена.', 'ga': "Foghlaimíonn córais dialóige atá dírithe ar thascanna le déanaí samhail ó chomhphlé anótáilte, agus bailítear agus déantar anótáil ar idirphlé den sórt sin ionas go mbeidh siad comhsheasmhach le heolas fearainn áirithe. Mar sin féin, i gcásanna fíor, tá eolas fearainn faoi réir athruithe minice, agus d'fhéadfadh sé go n-éireoidh idirphlé oiliúna tosaigh as feidhm go luath, rud a fhágann go dtiocfaidh laghdú suntasach ar fheidhmíocht na samhla. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar an ngaol idir idirphlé oiliúna agus eolas fearainn, agus molaimid Oiriúnú Fearainn Idirphlé, modheolaíocht a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige idirphlé oiliúna tosaigh a oiriúnú d'athruithe a ndéantar idirghabháil orthu san eolas fearainn. Dírímid ar athruithe ar luach sliotán (m.sh., nuair a bhíonn luachanna sliotán nua ar fáil chun cur síos a dhéanamh ar eintitis fearainn) agus sainímid socrú turgnamhach le haghaidh oiriúnú an fhearainn idirphlé. Ar an gcéad dul síos, léirímid nach bhfuil na samhlacha úrscothacha reatha le haghaidh rianú stáit idirphlé fós sách láidir maidir le hathruithe ar an eolas fearainn ar shliotán. Ansin, déanaimid comparáid idir straitéisí oiriúnaithe fearainn éagsúla, ag taispeáint go bhfuil teicnící simplí éifeachtach chun an bhearna idir idirphlé oiliúna agus eolas fearainn a laghdú.", 'hu': 'A közelmúltbeli feladatorientált párbeszédrendszerek modellt tanulnak a jegyzetelt párbeszédekből, és ezeket a párbeszédeket viszont összegyűjtik és jegyzetelik, hogy összhangban legyenek bizonyos domain ismeretekkel. Valós forgatókönyvekben azonban a domain ismeretek gyakori változásoknak vannak kitéve, és az alapképzési párbeszédek hamarosan elavultak lehetnek, ami a modell teljesítményének jelentős csökkenését eredményezi. Jelen tanulmányban a képzési párbeszédek és a domain ismeretek közötti kapcsolatot vizsgáljuk, és javaslatot teszünk a Dialogue Domain Adaptációra, egy olyan módszertant, amely célja az alapképzési párbeszédek hozzáigazítása a domain ismeretében bekövetkezett változásokhoz. A résidő-érték változásaira összpontosítunk (pl. amikor új résidő-értékek állnak rendelkezésre a domain entitások leírására), és kísérleti beállításokat határozunk meg a párbeszédtartomány adaptációjára. Először is megmutatjuk, hogy a párbeszédállapotok követésére szolgáló jelenlegi korszerű modellek még mindig kevésbé erősek a domain ismeretek slot-érték változásaira. Ezután összehasonlítjuk a különböző területi adaptációs stratégiákat, bemutatva, hogy az egyszerű technikák hatékonyak a képzési párbeszédek és a területi ismeretek közötti szakadék csökkentésére.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατα συστήματα διαλόγου προσανατολισμένα σε εργασίες μαθαίνουν ένα μοντέλο από σχολιασμένους διαλόγους, και αυτοί οι διάλογοι με τη σειρά τους συλλέγονται και σχολιάζονται έτσι ώστε να είναι σύμφωνοι με ορισμένες γνώσεις τομέα. Ωστόσο, σε πραγματικά σενάρια, η γνώση του τομέα υπόκειται σε συχνές αλλαγές και οι διάλογοι αρχικής κατάρτισης μπορεί σύντομα να ξεπεραστούν, με αποτέλεσμα να μειωθεί σημαντικά η απόδοση του μοντέλου. Στην παρούσα εργασία, διερευνούμε τη σχέση μεταξύ των διαλόγων κατάρτισης και της γνώσης του τομέα, και προτείνουμε την προσαρμογή του τομέα διαλόγου, μια μεθοδολογία που στοχεύει στην προσαρμογή των διαλόγων αρχικής κατάρτισης στις αλλαγές που παρεμβαίνουν στη γνώση του τομέα. Εστιάζουμε σε αλλαγές τιμών κουλοχέρηδων (π.χ., όταν είναι διαθέσιμες νέες τιμές κουλοχέρηδων για να περιγράψουν οντότητες τομέα) και καθορίζουμε μια πειραματική ρύθμιση για προσαρμογή τομέα διαλόγου. Πρώτον, καταδεικνύουμε ότι τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα παρακολούθησης κατάστασης διαλόγου εξακολουθούν να είναι ανεπαρκώς ανθεκτικά στις αλλαγές της γνώσης του τομέα. Στη συνέχεια, συγκρίνουμε διαφορετικές στρατηγικές προσαρμογής του τομέα, δείχνοντας ότι οι απλές τεχνικές είναι αποτελεσματικές για να μειώσουν το χάσμα μεταξύ των διαλόγων κατάρτισης και της γνώσης του τομέα.', 'it': "I recenti sistemi di dialogo orientati alle attività imparano un modello dai dialoghi annotati, e tali dialoghi vengono a loro volta raccolti e annotati in modo che siano coerenti con determinate conoscenze di dominio. Tuttavia, in scenari reali, la conoscenza del dominio è soggetta a frequenti cambiamenti e i dialoghi di formazione iniziale potrebbero presto diventare obsoleti, con conseguente diminuzione significativa delle prestazioni del modello. In questo articolo, esaminiamo la relazione tra dialoghi formativi e conoscenza del dominio, e proponiamo Dialogue Domain Adaptation, una metodologia volta ad adattare i dialoghi di formazione iniziale ai cambiamenti intervenuti nella conoscenza del dominio. Ci concentriamo sui cambiamenti del valore slot (ad esempio, quando sono disponibili nuovi valori slot per descrivere entità di dominio) e definiamo un'impostazione sperimentale per l'adattamento del dominio di dialogo. In primo luogo, mostriamo che gli attuali modelli all'avanguardia per il monitoraggio dello stato di dialogo sono ancora scarsamente robusti ai cambiamenti di valore slot della conoscenza del dominio. Poi, confrontiamo diverse strategie di adattamento del dominio, dimostrando che le tecniche semplici sono efficaci per ridurre il divario tra i dialoghi di formazione e la conoscenza del dominio.", 'mk': 'Неодамнешните дијалошки системи ориентирани на задачите учат модел од анотираните дијалози, а ваквите дијалози се собрани и анотирани за да бидат во согласност со одредено знаење на доменот. Сепак, во реалните сценарија, знаењето на доменот е предмет на често промени, а дијалозите за почетокот на обуката наскоро може да застарат, што резултира со значително намалување на резултатите на моделот. In this paper, we investigate the relationship between training dialogues and domain knowledge, and propose Dialogue Domain Adaptation, a methodology aiming at adapting initial training dialogues to changes intervened in the domain knowledge.  We focus on slot-value changes (e.g., when new slot values are available to describe domain entities) and define an experimental setting for dialogue domain adaptation.  Прво, покажуваме дека актуелните модели за следење на состојбата на дијалогот се сé уште лошо силни за промените во вредноста на слотот на знаењето на доменот. Потоа, ги споредуваме различните стратегии за адаптација на домените, покажувајќи дека едноставните техники се ефикасни за намалување на разликата помеѓу дијалозите за обука и знаењето на домените.', 'lt': 'Neseniai į užduotis orientuotos dialogo sistemos mokosi model į iš anotuotų dialogų, o tokie dialogai savo ruožtu renkami ir anotuoti, kad atitiktų tam tikras srities žinias. However, in real scenarios, domain knowledge is subject to frequent changes, and initial training dialogues may soon become obsolete, resulting in a significant decrease in the model performance.  Šiame dokumente mes tiriame mokymo dialogų ir srities žinių santykius ir siūlome dialogo srities pritaikymą, metodiką, kuria siekiama pritaikyti pradinio mokymo dialogus prie pokyčių, susijusių su srities žiniomis. Mes daugiausia dėmesio skiriame laiko tarpsnių vertės pokyčiams (pvz., kai yra naujų laiko tarpsnių vertės domeno subjektams aprašyti) ir apibrėžiame eksperimentinius dialogo domeno pritaikymo nustatymus. Pirma, parodome, kad dabartiniai dialogo būklės stebėjimo modeliai vis dar yra nepakankamai patikimi siekiant keisti srities žinių laiko tarpsnių vertę. Tada palyginame įvairias prisitaikymo prie srities strategijas, rodančias, kad paprasti metodai yra veiksmingi siekiant sumažinti mokymo dialogų ir srities žinių skirtumą.', 'ms': 'Sistem dialog yang diurus tugas baru-baru ini belajar model dari dialog yang dicatat, dan dialog tersebut berkumpul dan dicatat sehingga ia konsisten dengan pengetahuan domain tertentu. Bagaimanapun, dalam skenario sebenar, pengetahuan domain adalah subjek untuk perubahan yang sering, dan dialog latihan awal mungkin akan segera menjadi obsolete, menghasilkan penurunan yang signifikan dalam prestasi model. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki hubungan antara dialog latihan dan pengetahuan domain, dan melamar Pelarasan Domain Dialog, metodologi yang bertujuan untuk menyesuaikan dialog latihan awal kepada perubahan yang terlibat dalam pengetahuan domain. Kami fokus pada perubahan nilai-slot (cth., apabila nilai slot baru tersedia untuk menggambarkan entiti domain) dan takrifkan tetapan percubaan untuk penyesuaian domain dialog. Pertama, kita tunjukkan bahawa model-state-of-the-art semasa untuk pengesan keadaan dialog masih kurang kuat untuk perubahan nilai-slot pengetahuan domain. Kemudian, kita membandingkan strategi penyesuaian domain yang berbeza, menunjukkan bahawa teknik sederhana berkesan untuk mengurangi jarak antara dialog latihan dan pengetahuan domain.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുതന്നെ ജോലിയുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. അതുപോലുള്ള ഡയലോഗുകള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുകയും വിഷമമാക്കുകയ എന്നാലും യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥത്തില്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200dറെ അറിവ് സാധാരണ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കീഴ്പെടുന്നതാണ്. ആദ്യ പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിന്റെ സംവാദകങ് In this paper, we investigate the relationship between training dialogues and domain knowledge, and propose Dialogue Domain Adaptation, a methodology aiming at adapting initial training dialogues to changes intervened in the domain knowledge.  സ്ലോട്ട്- മൂല്യം മാറ്റുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d പുതിയ സ്ലോട്ട് മൂല്യങ് ആദ്യം, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഡയലോഗ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ട്രാക്കിങ്ങിനുള്ള സ്റ്റേറ്റ് മോഡലുകളുടെ നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയുട പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡൊമെയിനുള്ള അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d സ്ട്രാക്റ്റീജ് ചെയ്യുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന് കാണിക്കുന്നു. പരിശീലനത്ത', 'mt': 'Sistemi ta’ djalogu reċenti orjentati lejn ix-xogħol jitgħallmu mudell minn djalogi annotati, u dawn id-djalogi min-naħa tagħhom jinġabru u jiġu annotati sabiex ikunu konsistenti ma’ ċertu għarfien tad-dominju. Madankollu, fix-xenarji reali, l-għarfien tad-dominju huwa soġġett għal bidliet frekwenti, u d-djalogi tat-taħriġ inizjali jistgħu dalwaqt jiskadu, li jirriżultaw fi tnaqqis sinifikanti fil-prestazzjoni tal-mudell. F’dan id-dokument, ninvestigaw ir-relazzjoni bejn id-djalogi ta’ taħriġ u l-għarfien tad-dominju, u nipproponu l-Adattament tad-dominju tad-Djalogu, metodoloġija bil-għan li tadatta d-djalogi ta’ taħriġ inizjali għal bidliet intervenuti fl-għarfien tad-dominju. Aħna niffokaw fuq bidliet fil-valur tas-slots (e ż., meta jkunu disponibbli valuri ġodda tas-slots biex jiddeskrivu entitajiet tad-dominju) u niddefinixxu sett sperimentali g ħall-adattament tad-dominju tad-djalogu. L-ewwel nett, nuru li l-mudelli attwali l-aktar avvanzati għat-traċċar tal-istat tad-djalogu għadhom ftit robusti għat-tibdil fil-valur tas-slots tal-għarfien tad-dominju. Then, we compare different domain adaptation strategies, showing that simple techniques are effective to reduce the gap between training dialogues and domain knowledge.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე დავალებული დიალოგის სისტემები მოდელის შესწავლობა მოდელის შესახებ მონიტურებული დიალოგიდან, და ასეთი დიალოგიები კოლექცია და მონიტურებულია, რომ ისინი განსაკუთრებული დიო მაგრამ, რეალური სინარიოში, დიომინის ცნობილებები ხშირად ცვლილებების მიხედვით, და საწყისო განაკლების დიალოგიები შეიძლება ბრლოდ გახდება, რომელიც მოდელური მუშაობის შემცი ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ შევხედავთ განაკეთებული დიალოგიების და დიალოგიის ცნობიერების შესახებ და დავიწყებთ დიალოგის დიალოგის დიალოგის ადაპტიფიკაცია, მეტოლოგია, რომელიც საზოგადოება დავიწყებთ სა ჩვენ სლოტის მნიშვნელობის ცვლილებების ფონსკურება (მაგალითად, როდესაც ახალი სლოტის მნიშვნელობები დახსნა დიომინის ელექტიტების განსაზღვრებისთვის) და დიალოგის დიომინის პირველი, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მიმდინარე სურათის მოდელები დიალოგის სურათის შენახველისთვის არაფერად ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან დიალოგის ცვლილების მოცვლილებისთ შემდეგ, ჩვენ განსხვავებული დიომინის აკაპტიფიკაციის სტრატიგიების შემდგენება, რომელიც ჩვენ აკეთებთ, რომ მარტივი ტექნოგიები ეფექტიურია განსხვავებას განს', 'mn': 'Саяхан ажлын ориентиролт диалог системүүд анзаарсан диалогуудын загварыг суралцаж байна. Ийм диалогууд цуглуулж, анзаарч байдаг. Тэд зарим мэдлэгтэй байдаг. Гэхдээ жинхэнэ хувилбаруудын тухай мэдлэг ихэвчлэн өөрчлөлт хийгддэг бөгөөд эхний сургалтын диалогууд удалгүй зовоогүй болж болох бөгөөд загварын үйл ажиллагааны үндсэн багасгаж болно. Энэ цаасан дээр бид суралцах диалог болон мэдлэг хоорондын харилцааныг судалж, диалог доминийн адаптацийг санал болгож, эхний суралцах диалогуудыг зохион байгуулах арга зам зориулсан. Бид слотын утгын өөрчлөлт дээр анхаарлаа анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлж (жишээ нь, холбооны нэгжүүдийг тайлбарлахад шинэ слотын утгыг ашиглах үед) диалог домены загварын туршилтын тодорхойлдог. Эхлээд бид диалог орнуудын дагуулах орнуудын орчин үеийн загваруудыг харуулж байгаа нь холбооны мэдлэгийнхээ slot-үнэ өөрчлөлтийг бага зэрэг хүчтэй байгааг харуулж байна. Дараа нь бид өөр төрлийн зохион байгуулах стратегийг харьцуулж, сургалтын диалог болон мэдлэг хоорондын ялгааг багасгах энгийн технологиуд үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы тапсырманың бағытталған диалог жүйелері түсіндірілген диалогтардан моделін үйренеді. Бұл диалогтар бір домен біліміне сәйкес келеді. Бірақ шын сценарияларда доменді білім көптеген өзгертулерге тұрады, және бастапқы оқыту диалогтары жақын болуы мүмкін, бұл үлгі жылдамдығын көптеген. Бұл қағазда, біз оқыту диалогтарының мен доменнің білімі арасындағы қатынасын зерттеп, диалог доменнің адаптациясын, доменнің білімінде өзгерту үшін бастапқы оқыту диалогтарының адаптациясын қолдан Слот- мәндерінің өзгерістеріне (мысалы, домен нысандарын таңдау үшін жаңа слот мәндері бар болса) және диалог домен адаптациясының тәжірибелі параметрлерін анықтаймыз. Біріншіден, біз диалог күйін қадағалау үлгілерінің орындалық моделдері доменнің білімінің слот- мәнінің өзгерістеріне әлі дұрыс жұмыс істейді. Содан кейін, біз әртүрлі домендің адаптациялау стратегияларын салыстырып, кәдімгі техникаларды оқыту диалогтары мен домендің білімі арасындағы аралығын азайту үшін к', 'no': 'Nyleg oppgåveorienterte dialogsystemer lærer eit modell frå oppmerkingsdialogar, og slike dialogar er samla og oppmerkingar slik at dei er konsistent med nokre domenekunnskap. I verkeleg scenarior er imidlertid domenekunnskap subject to frequent changes, og opphavsdialogar kan snart bli foreldra, som fører til ein signifikant nedgang i modellen. I denne papiret undersøker vi forholdet mellom opplæringsdialogar og domenekunnskap, og foreslår dialogvindauget domenetilpassing, ein metodologi for å tilpassa opplæringsdialogar for å endra endringar i domenekunnskap. Vi fokuserer på endringar for slot- verdiar (f. eks. når nye slot- verdiar er tilgjengelege for å beskrive domeneiningar) og definerer ein eksperimentell innstilling for dialogdomenetilpassing. Først viser vi at gjeldande modeller for å spora dialogtilstandar er fortsatt slik sterkt til å endra slot-verdiar i domenekunnskapen. Deretter samanliknar vi ulike domenetilpassingsstrategier, viser at enkle teknikk er effektiv for å redusera mellom opplæringsdialogar og domenekunnskap.', 'pl': 'Najnowsze systemy dialogu zorientowanego na zadania uczą się modelu z adnotacji dialogowych, a takie dialogi z kolei są gromadzone i adnotacjonowane tak, aby były zgodne z pewną wiedzą domeny. Jednak w rzeczywistych scenariuszach wiedza domeny podlega częstym zmianom, a dialogi wstępnego szkolenia mogą wkrótce stać się przestarzałe, co skutkuje znacznym spadkiem wydajności modelu. W niniejszym artykule badamy związek między dialogami szkoleniowymi a wiedzą domenową oraz proponujemy Adaptację Dialogu Domeny, metodologię mającą na celu dostosowanie dialogów szkoleniowych do zmian interweniowanych w wiedzy domenowej. Skupiamy się na zmianach wartości slotów (np. gdy dostępne są nowe wartości slotów do opisu jednostek domeny) i definiujemy eksperymentalne ustawienie adaptacji domeny dialogowej. Po pierwsze, pokazujemy, że obecne najnowocześniejsze modele śledzenia stanu dialogu są nadal słabo solidne na zmiany wartości slotu w wiedzy domeny. Następnie porównujemy różne strategie adaptacji domen, pokazując, że proste techniki są skuteczne, aby zmniejszyć lukę między dialogiem szkoleniowym a wiedzą domeny.', 'ro': 'Sistemele recente de dialog orientate spre sarcini învață un model din dialogurile adnotate, iar astfel de dialoguri sunt, la rândul său, colectate și adnotate astfel încât să fie coerente cu anumite cunoștințe de domeniu. Cu toate acestea, în scenarii reale, cunoștințele de domeniu sunt supuse schimbărilor frecvente, iar dialogurile de formare inițială pot deveni în curând caduce, ceea ce duce la o scădere semnificativă a performanței modelului. În această lucrare, investigăm relația dintre dialogurile de formare și cunoașterea domeniului și propunem Dialogue Domain Adaptation, o metodologie care vizează adaptarea dialogurilor de formare inițială la schimbările intervenite în cunoașterea domeniului. Ne concentrăm pe schimbările valorii sloturilor (de exemplu, atunci când sunt disponibile noi valori sloturi pentru a descrie entitățile de domeniu) și definim o setare experimentală pentru adaptarea domeniului de dialog. În primul rând, arătăm că modelele actuale de ultimă generație pentru urmărirea stării dialogului sunt încă slab robuste pentru schimbările valorii sloturilor ale cunoștințelor de domeniu. Apoi, comparăm diferite strategii de adaptare a domeniului, arătând că tehnicile simple sunt eficiente pentru a reduce decalajul dintre dialogurile de formare și cunoștințele domeniului.', 'sr': 'Недавни диалогови системи ориентирани на задаче научавају модел из анотираних диалога, и такви диалогови су завредно скупени и анотирани тако да су у съответству с определеним знанием домена. Međutim, u stvarnim scenarijama, znanje domena predstavlja česte promjene, a prvi razgovor o obuci uskoro može postati zastarjeli, što bi rezultiralo značajno smanjenje modelnog učinka. U ovom papiru istražujemo odnos između odvjetničkih dijalogova i znanja domena i predlažemo adaptaciju domena dijaloga, metodologiju koja se cilja prilagoditi prvobitnim odvjetničkim dijalogima za promjene interveniranih u znanju domena. Fokusiramo se na promjene vrijednosti slota (npr. kad su dostupne nove vrijednosti slota za opis domena entiteta) i definiramo eksperimentalnu postavku za adaptaciju domena dijaloga. Prvo pokazujemo da su trenutni modeli umetnosti za praćenje država dijaloga još uvek loše robni za promjene vrijednosti slota domena znanja. Onda uspoređujemo različite strategije adaptacije domena, pokazujući da su jednostavne tehnike efikasne za smanjenje razdoblja između odvjetničkih dijaloga i znanja domena.', 'si': 'අලුත් කාර්ය- ප්\u200dරමාණය සංවාදය පද්ධතිය සංවාදයේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, ඒ වගේම සංවාදය සංවාදය සම්බන්ධ වෙලා ඉන්න නමුත්, ඇත්ත සිද්ධ විදියට, ඩෝමේන් දන්නවම සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන්, පටන් ගත්ත සංවා මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරධාන සංවාදය සහ ඩෝමින් දන්න අතර සම්බන්ධය, සහ සංවාදය ඩෝමින් අනුමාණය, ප්\u200dරධාන සංවාදය සඳහා  අපි ස්ලෝට් මුල්ය වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් බලන්න (උදාහරණය, අලුත් ස්ලෝට් මුල්ය ස්ථානය විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් වෙනුව මුලින්ම, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මුලින්ම සංවාද ස්ථානය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිදේශයක් තියෙන ඊට පස්සේ, අපි වෙනස් දේමින් සැකසුම් සැකසුම් සැලසුම් තාක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ දේමින් දන්නවත්', 'so': "Recent task-oriented dialogue systems learn a model from annotated dialogues, and such dialogues are in turn collected and annotated so that they are consistent with certain domain knowledge.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee xaaladaha runta ah aqoonta deegaanka waa in la sameeyaa beddelyo inta badan, oo diyaafada waxbarashada bilowga waxaa laga yaabaa in dhaqso u baabba'o, taasoo sababtooda ku dhaca sameynta modellka. Warqaddan waxaan ka baaraynaa xiriirka u dhexeeya diyaarinta waxbarashada iyo aqoonta deegaanka, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa qalabka ku saabsan macluumaadka ku saabsan beddelinta aqoonta deegaanka. Waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa isbedelka qiimaha bannaanka (tusaale ahaan marka qiimaha cusub e e bannaanta lagu sawiro waxyaabaha deegaanka) waxaana ku sawirannaa qoraal baaritaan oo lagu beddelo guriga diyaarinta. Marka ugu horeysa, waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababka xaaladda farshaxanka ee dowladda lagu soo soconayo ay weli u baabba'aan si ay u beddelaan aqoonta deegaanka. Markaas waxaynu isbarbardhignaa qalabka isbedelka deegaanka oo kala duduwan, waxaynu tusnaynaa in qalabka fudud ay faa’iido u leeyihiin inay ka hoosaysiiyaan gaqafka u dhexeeya diyaarinta waxbarashada iyo aqoonta deegaanka.", 'sv': 'Nya uppgiftsorienterade dialogsystem lär sig en modell från kommenterade dialoger, och sådana dialoger samlas i sin tur in och kommenteras så att de överensstämmer med viss domänkunskap. I verkliga scenarier förändras dock domänkunskapen ofta, och dialogerna om grundutbildning kan snart bli föråldrade, vilket leder till en betydande minskning av modellprestandan. I denna uppsats undersöker vi relationen mellan utbildningsdialoger och domänkunskap och föreslår Dialogue Domain Adaptation, en metod som syftar till att anpassa initiala utbildningsdialoger till förändringar som ingriper i domänkunskapen. Vi fokuserar på förändringar av spelvärden (t.ex. när nya spelvärden finns tillgängliga för att beskriva domänentiteter) och definierar en experimentell inställning för anpassning av dialogdomäner. För det första visar vi att nuvarande state-of-the-art modeller för spårning av dialogtillstånd fortfarande är dåligt robusta för slot-värdeförändringar av domänkunskapen. Sedan jämför vi olika domänanpassningsstrategier och visar att enkla tekniker är effektiva för att minska klyftan mellan utbildningsdialoger och domänkunskap.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் செயல் திருத்தப்பட்ட உரையாடல் முறைமைகள் அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட உரையாடல்களிலிருந்து ஒரு மாதிரி கற்றுக் கொள்கிறார் ஆனால் உண்மையான காட்சியில், களம் அறிவு வழக்கமான மாற்றங்கள் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, ஆரம்ப பயிற்சி உரையாடல் விரைவில் வெறுக்கப்படாது, மாதி இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பயிற்சி உரையாடல் மற்றும் களம் அறிவின் இடையே தொடர்புகளை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் மாற்றும் களம் அறிவின் இடைவெளியில் மாற்றி We focus on slot-value changes (e.g., when new slot values are available to describe domain entities) and define an experimental setting for dialogue domain adaptation.  முதலில், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் உரையாடல் நிலையில் உள்ள- கலை மாதிரிகளின் தற்போதைய நிலையில் உள்ளது பாடல் நிலை பாதையில் உள்ள பின்னர், நாம் வேறு டொமைன் ஒப்பிடும் திட்டங்களை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம். சுலபமான தொழில்நுட்பத்தை காண்பிக்கிறது பயிற்சி உரையாடல', 'ur': 'اچھی طرح کی تابع-oriented ڈیلوگر سیسٹم ایک مدل سکھائی جاتی ہے اور اس طرح کی گفتگو جمع کی جاتی ہے اور مطلع کی جاتی ہے تاکہ وہ ایک دامین علم کے ساتھ مطابق ہیں. لیکن حقیقی سناریوں میں، ڈومین علم بہت زیادہ تغییرات کے ذریعہ موجود ہے، اور آغاز تغییرات کی گفتگو بہت جلد غیر اضطراب ہوسکتی ہے، اور اس کے نتیجہ میں مدل کی عملکرد میں بہت بڑی کمی ہوتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم تعلیم دیالوگ اور دانش کے درمیان رابطہ تحقیق کرتے ہیں، اور ڈیلوگ ڈومین اڈپٹیٹ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک طریقہ جو ڈومین علم میں تغییر کی تغییر کے لئے پہلی ترینس دیالوگوں کو اڈپٹ کرنا چاہتا ہے۔ ہم اسلٹ-ارزش بدلنے پر fokus کرتے ہیں (جیسے کہ جب نو اسلٹ ارزش ڈومین ایٹیونیٹوں کا توصیف کرنے کے لئے موجود ہوتے ہیں) اور ڈومین اڈیٹیٹ کے لئے ایک آزمائش تنظیم کی تعریف کرتے ہیں۔ پہلے، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ موجود حالت-آرت موڈل ڈیلوٹ ٹراک کینگ کے لئے اکثر حالت-آرت موڈل دامین علم کے بدلنے کے لئے زیادہ مضبوط ہیں. اس کے بعد ہم مختلف ڈومین اضافہ استراتژی کے مطابق مقایسہ کرتے ہیں، کہ سادھی تکنیک اضافہ ہوتی ہیں کہ تطابق دیالوگ اور ڈومین علم کے درمیان تفاوت کاٹنے کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Yaqinda ochilgan muloqat tizimi taʼminlovchi muloqat oynalaridan modeli o'rganadi, va bu oynalarni bir necha domen maʼlumoti bilan birlashtirish uchun muloqat turadi. Lekin, haqiqiqiy taqdimotida domen ilim ko'p o'zgarishga qo'shiladi, va boshlash taʼminlovchi dialoglari tez o'zgarishga ega bo'lishi mumkin, bu model bajarishga juda kamaytirish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz muloqatlar va domen ilmiy muloqatlarining orasidagi munosabatlarni tahrirlamiz va Dialog Domen Adaptastasjon usulini o'zgartirish uchun birinchi taʼminlovchi muloqat oynalarini o'zgartirish uchun foydalanamiz. @ info: whatsthis Birinchi so'zda, dialog davlatning joriy holati soni taʼminlovchi modellari hozir domen maʼlumotini oʻzgartirish uchun hech qachon narsa yoʻqoladi. Keyin biz boshqa domen tahrirlash strategilarga kamaytamiz, oddiy tugmalar va muloqat va domen taʼminlovchisi orasidagi gapirishni kamaytirish uchun ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Các hệ thống đối thoại hướng dẫn nhiệm vụ gần đây học cách mô hình từ các ca được ghi chú, và các bộ thoại sẽ được thu thập và ghi chú để chúng phù hợp với một số kiến thức miền. Tuy nhiên, trong các viễn cảnh thực tế, lĩnh vực hiểu biết sẽ bị thay đổi thường xuyên, và các trình duyệt huấn luyện đầu tiên có thể sớm trở nên lỗi thời, dẫn đến một giảm đáng kể khả năng mô hình. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu mối quan hệ giữa các cuộc tranh luận về giáo dục và kiến thức về lĩnh vực, và đề xuất Thích Thích nghi Miền Đào Nha, một phương pháp nhằm hướng thích nghi cuộc khai thác về sự thay đổi đã can thiệp vào kiến thức miền. Chúng tôi tập trung vào các thay đổi giá trị thời gian (v.d., khi có giá trị thời gian mới để miêu tả các thực thể miền) và xác định một thiết lập thử nghiệm để thích nghi miền thoại. Trước hết, chúng tôi cho thấy các mẫu hiện đại để theo dõi tình trạng của đối thoại vẫn không vững để thay đổi giá trị thời gian của kiến thức miền. Sau đó, chúng ta so sánh các chiến lược thích nghi miền khác nhau, cho thấy các kỹ thuật đơn giản có hiệu quả để giảm khoảng cách giữa các cuộc thoại huấn luyện và kiến thức miền.', 'bg': 'Последните системи за диалог, ориентирани към задачите, научават модел от анотираните диалози и такива диалози на свой ред се събират и анотират, така че да са в съответствие с определени познания на областта. Въпреки това, в реални сценарии познанията в областта са обект на чести промени и диалозите за първоначално обучение скоро могат да станат остарели, което води до значително намаляване на производителността на модела. В настоящата статия изследваме връзката между обучителните диалози и познанията в областта и предлагаме методология за адаптиране на диалоговия домейн към промените, намесени в областта на познанията. Фокусираме се върху промените в слотовата стойност (например, когато са налични нови слотови стойности за описание на домейн единици) и дефинираме експериментална настройка за адаптиране на диалоговия домейн. Първо, показваме, че съвременните модели за проследяване на състоянието на диалога все още са слабо устойчиви на промените в стойността на слотове в познанията на домейна. След това сравняваме различни стратегии за адаптация на домейна, показвайки, че простите техники са ефективни за намаляване на разликата между тренировъчните диалози и домейните знания.', 'hr': 'Nedavni dijalogski sustavi orientirani na zadatke uče model iz annotiranih dijaloga, a takvi dijalogi su u okviru skupljeni i annotirani kako bi se u skladu s određenim znanjem domena. Međutim, u stvarnim scenarijama, znanje domena predstavljaju česte promjene, a početni razgovor o obuci uskoro može postati zastarjeli, što bi dovelo do značajnog smanjenja uspješnosti modela. U ovom papiru istražujemo odnos između dijaloga obuke i znanja domena i predlažemo prilagodbu domena dijaloga, metodologiju koja se cilja prilagoditi prvobitnim dijalogima obuke za promjene interveniranih u znanju domena. Fokusiramo se na promjene vrijednosti slota (npr. kad su dostupne nove vrijednosti slota za opis domena entiteta) i definiramo eksperimentalnu postavku za prilagodbu domena dijaloga. Prvo pokazujemo da su trenutni modeli umjetnosti za praćenje država dijaloga još uvijek loše snažni za promjene vrijednosti slota domena znanja. Onda uspoređujemo različite strategije adaptacije domena, pokazujući da su jednostavne tehnike učinkovite za smanjenje razdoblja između obrazovanjskih dijalogova i znanja domena.', 'nl': "Recente taakgerichte dialoogsystemen leren een model van geannoteerde dialogen, en dergelijke dialogen worden op hun beurt verzameld en geannoteerd zodat ze consistent zijn met bepaalde domeinkennis. In reële scenario's is domeinkennis echter onderhevig aan frequente veranderingen en kunnen initiële trainingsdialogen snel verouderd raken, wat resulteert in een aanzienlijke daling van de modelprestaties. In dit artikel onderzoeken we de relatie tussen trainingsdialogen en domeinkennis en stellen we Dialogue Domain Adaptation voor, een methodologie die gericht is op het aanpassen van initiële trainingsdialogen aan veranderingen in de domeinkennis. We richten ons op slot-value veranderingen (bijvoorbeeld wanneer nieuwe slot waarden beschikbaar zijn om domein entiteiten te beschrijven) en definiëren een experimentele setting voor dialoogdomein aanpassing. Ten eerste laten we zien dat de huidige state-of-the-art modellen voor het bijhouden van dialoogstatus nog steeds slecht robuust zijn tegen slot-value veranderingen van de domeinkennis. Vervolgens vergelijken we verschillende domeinadaptatiestrategieën, waaruit blijkt dat eenvoudige technieken effectief zijn om de kloof tussen trainingsdialogen en domeinkennis te verkleinen.", 'da': 'Nyere opgaveorienterede dialogsystemer lærer en model ud fra kommenterede dialoger, og sådanne dialoger indsamles og kommenteres igen, så de er i overensstemmelse med bestemt domæneviden. I virkelige scenarier ændres domæneviden imidlertid hyppigt, og dialoger om grundlæggende uddannelse kan snart blive forældede, hvilket resulterer i et betydeligt fald i modellens ydeevne. I denne artikel undersøger vi forholdet mellem træningsdialoger og domænevindskab og foreslår Dialogue Domain Adaptation, en metode, der tager sigte på at tilpasse grunduddannelsesdialoger til ændringer, der indgrebes i domænevindskabet. Vi fokuserer på ændringer af slot-værdi (f.eks. når nye slot-værdier er tilgængelige til at beskrive domænenheder) og definerer en eksperimentel indstilling for dialog domæne tilpasning. For det første viser vi, at nuværende state-of-the-art modeller til dialog state tracking stadig er dårligt robuste til slot-værdi ændringer af domæneviden. Derefter sammenligner vi forskellige domænetilpasningsstrategier og viser, at enkle teknikker er effektive til at reducere kløften mellem træningsdialoger og domænetilpasning.', 'de': 'Aktuelle aufgabenorientierte Dialogsysteme lernen ein Modell aus annotierten Dialogen, und solche Dialoge werden wiederum gesammelt und kommentiert, so dass sie mit bestimmten Domänenwissen konsistent sind. In realen Szenarien unterliegt das Domänenwissen jedoch häufigen Änderungen, und erste Trainingsdialoge können bald obsolet werden, was zu einer signifikanten Verringerung der Modellleistung führt. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir die Beziehung zwischen Trainingsdialogen und Domänenwissen und schlagen Dialogdomänenanpassung vor, eine Methodik zur Anpassung von Ersttrainingsdialogen an Veränderungen im Domänenwissen. Wir konzentrieren uns auf Slot-Wert-Änderungen (z.B. wenn neue Slot-Werte zur Beschreibung von Domain-Entitäten verfügbar sind) und definieren eine experimentelle Einstellung für Dialogdomänenanpassung. Zunächst zeigen wir, dass aktuelle State-of-the-Art Modelle für Dialogzustandsverfolgung noch unzureichend robust gegen Slot-Value-Änderungen des Domänenwissens sind. Anschließend vergleichen wir verschiedene Anpassungsstrategien und zeigen, dass einfache Techniken effektiv sind, um die Lücke zwischen Trainingsdialogen und Domänenwissen zu verringern.', 'ko': '최근의 임무를 위한 대화 시스템은 주석이 달린 대화에서 하나의 모델을 배우고, 이러한 대화는 특정한 분야의 지식과 일치하도록 수집되고 주석된다.그러나 실제 장면에서 분야 지식이 자주 변화하고 초기 교육 대화가 곧 유행이 지나 모델의 성능이 현저히 떨어질 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 교육 대화와 분야 지식 간의 관계를 연구했고 대화 영역 적응 방법을 제시하여 초기 교육 대화가 분야 지식의 변화에 적응하도록 하고자 한다.우리는 틈새값의 변화에 주목하고 (예를 들어 새로운 틈새값이 필드 실체를 설명할 수 있을 때) 대화역에 맞는 실험 설정을 정의합니다.우선, 우리는 현재 가장 선진적인 대화 상태 추적 모델이 분야 지식의 틈새값 변화에 대한 노봉성이 여전히 매우 나쁘다는 것을 증명했다.그리고 우리는 서로 다른 분야 적응 전략을 비교한 결과 간단한 기술이 교육 대화와 분야 지식 간의 격차를 효과적으로 줄일 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای مشاوره\u200cی مشاوره\u200cی تازه\u200cای از مشاوره\u200cهای مشاوره\u200cای یاد می\u200cگیرند، و این مشاوره\u200cها در حالی که جمع می\u200cشوند و مشاوره می\u200cشوند تا با دانش\u200cهای دامنه\u200cای مشاوره باشند. با این حال، در سناریو واقعی، علم دامنی به تغییرات اغلب تحت تاثیر قرار می گیرد، و گفتگوهای آموزش ابتدایی ممکن است به زودی افتاده شود، به نتیجه کاهش بزرگی در عملکرد مدل. در این کاغذ، ما رابطه بین گفتگوهای آموزش و دانش دامنی را تحقیق می کنیم، و پیشنهاد دادیم تعادل دامنی دامنی دامنی، روش\u200cشناسی که هدف دارد برای تعادل گفتگوهای آموزش ابتدایی برای تغییرات در دانش دامنی است. ما روی تغییرات ارزش slot تمرکز می\u200cکنیم (مثال وقتی ارزش slot جدید برای توصیح عناصر دامنی) و یک تنظیم آزمایشی برای تغییرات دامنی محاورش تعریف می\u200cکنیم. اول، ما نشان می دهیم که مدل\u200cهای موقعیت هنری برای ردیابی موقعیت دیalog هنوز بد قدرتمند به تغییرات ارزشی از دانش دامنی هستند. سپس، ما استراتژی\u200cهای تغییر\u200cسازی دومین مختلف را مقایسه می\u200cکنیم، که نشان می\u200cدهیم که تکنیک ساده\u200cها برای کاهش فاصله بین مشارکت\u200cهای تمرین و دانش دامین موثر هستند.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa mazungumzo ya hivi karibuni unajifunza mfano kutoka katika mazungumzo yanayokerwa, na mazungumzo kama haya yanakusanyika na yanaudhibitishwa ili waweze kuwa na maarifa fulani ya ndani. Hata hivyo, katika hali halisi, maarifa ya ndani yanakabiliwa na mabadiliko ya mara kwa mara, na mazungumzo ya mafunzo ya awali yanaweza kuwa yasiyoeleweka, na yanasababisha kupungua kwa kiwango kikubwa katika utendaji wa mifano. In this paper, we investigate the relationship between training dialogues and domain knowledge, and propose Dialogue Domain Adaptation, a methodology aiming at adapting initial training dialogues to changes intervened in the domain knowledge.  Tunashiria mabadiliko ya thamani ya slot (kwa mfano, wakati thamani mpya za slot zinapatikana kuelezea vitu vya ndani) na kuelezea mvumo wa majaribio kwa ajili ya kubadilisha majadiliano ya ndani ya mazungumzo. Kwanza, tunaonyesha kuwa mifano ya hali ya sanaa ya sasa ya kufuatilia mijadala bado ni mabadiliko mabaya ya maarifa ya ndani. Kisha, tunalinganisha mikakati mbalimbali ya kuboresha ndani, kuonyesha kuwa mbinu rahisi zina ufanisi wa kupunguza tofauti kati ya mazungumzo ya mafunzo na maarifa ya ndani.', 'af': "Onlangse taak-orienteerde dialoog stelsels leer 'n model van aanmerkte dialoog, en sodanige dialoog is in draai versamel en aanmerkte sodat hulle konsistent is met sekere domein kennis. Maar in werklike scenarios is domeinkennis onderwerp op dikwels veranderinge, en die aanvanklike onderwerp dialoog kan gou oortredig word, sodat die resultaat van 'n betekende verduur in die model-prestasie kan word. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek die verhouding tussen onderwerp dialoog en domein kennis en voorstel dialoog domein aanpassing, 'n metodologie wat doel om die aanvanklike onderwerp dialoog te pas om veranderinge in die domein kennis te verander. Ons fokus op slot- waarde veranderinge (bv. wanneer nuwe slot waardes beskikbaar is om domein entiteite te beskryf) en definieer 'n eksperimentale instelling vir dialoog domein aanpassing. Eerste, ons wys dat huidige staat-van-die-kuns-modele vir dialoog staat agtervolg nog slegs kragtig is na slot-waarde veranderinge van die domein kennis. Dan vergelyk ons verskillende domein-adaptasie strategies, wys dat eenvoudige teknike effektief is om die ontbreiding tussen onderwerp dialoog en domein kennis te verminder.", 'sq': 'Sistemet e fundit të dialogut të orientuar ndaj detyrave mësojnë një model nga dialoget e anotuara dhe dialoget e tilla janë nga ana e tyre të mbledhura dhe të anotuara në mënyrë që të jenë konsistente me disa njohuri të domenit. Megjithatë, në skenarë reale, njohuria e domenit është subjekt i ndryshimeve të shpeshta dhe dialogu fillestar i trajnimit mund të bëhet së shpejti i vjetër, duke rezultuar në një rënie të rëndësishme në performancën e modelit. Në këtë letër, ne hetojmë marrëdhëniet midis dialogeve të trainimit dhe njohurive të fushës, dhe propozojmë Dialog Domain Adaptation, një metodologi që synon të përshtatet dialogu fillestar i trainimit ndaj ndryshimeve të ndërhyra në njohuritë e fushës. Ne përqëndrohemi në ndryshimet e vlerës së slot (për shembull, kur vlerat e reja të slot janë në dispozicion për të përshkruar njësitë e domainit) dhe përcaktojmë një përcaktim eksperimental për përshtatjen e domainit të dialogut. Së pari, ne tregojmë se modelet aktuale të gjendjes së artit për gjurmimin e gjendjes së dialogut janë ende keq të fortë ndaj ndryshimeve të vlerës së slot të njohurive të dominit. Pastaj, ne krahasojmë strategji të ndryshme të përshtatjes në fushë, duke treguar se teknikat e thjeshta janë efektive për të reduktuar dallimin midis dialogeve të trajnimit dhe njohurive në fushë.', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር ነገር ግን እውነተኛ ስታይ፣ የውይይት እውቀት ብዙ ለውጦችን ያስገዛል፣ የመጀመሪያ ማኅበረሰብ ማኅበረሰብ ፈጥኖ የማይፈጸም ሊሆን ይችላል፣ በሞዴል አድራጊያው ግንኙነት የሚያጎድል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጦማሪያን ማኅበረሰብ እና የውይይት ማኅበረሰብ መካከል ግንኙነትን እና እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የዶሜን አካላት ለመግለጽ አዲስ ስህተት በተገኘ ጊዜ የስህተት-አካል ለውጦችን እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያው፣ የአሁኑ የ-የ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት ሥርዓት አካባቢ አካሄድ የዶሜን እውቀት ለውጥ እንዲያሰናከል እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የተለየ የዶሜን አካባቢ strategie እናሳይናለን፣ ቀላል ስህተቶች ማኅበረሰብ እና የውይይት እውቀትን ማቀናቀል እንዲያሳስል እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջերս խնդիրների վրա ուղղված հաղորդակցման համակարգերը մոդել են սովորում annoted հաղորդակցված հաղորդակցված հաղորդակցման միջոցով, և այդ հաղորդակցման միջոցով հաղորդակցվում են և annoted, որպեսզի դրանք համապատասխանեն որոշ Այնուամենայնիվ, իրական սցենարներում տիեզերքի գիտելիքները հաճախ փոփոխություններ են ենթարկվում, և սկզբնական ուսուցման պատմությունները շուտով կարող են դառնալ անհնար, ինչը կհանգեցնի մոդելի արդյունքների նշանակալի նվազում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ուսումնասիրությունների և բնագավառի գիտելիքների միջև կապը և առաջարկում ենք Ադագավառի բնագավառի հարմարեցման մեթոդոլոգիա, որի նպատակով է հարմարեցնել սկզբնական ուսումնասիրության բնագավառի բնագավա Մենք կենտրոնանում ենք վայրի արժեքի փոփոխությունների վրա (օրինակ, երբ նոր վայրի արժեքներ հասանելի են վայրի հաստատությունների նկարագրելու համար) և որոշում ենք փորձարկվող սահմանափակումներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են դասախոսում վայր Նախ և առաջ, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ներկայիս ամենաբարձր մոդելները երկրի հետևման համար դեռևս վատ ուժեղ են բնագավառի գիտելիքների արժեքի փոփոխությունների համար: Հետո մենք համեմատում ենք տարբեր բնագավառի հարմարեցման ռազմավարությունները, ցույց տալով, որ պարզ տեխնիկաները արդյունավետ են կրճատելու տարբերությունը վարժեցման և բնագավառի գիտելիքների միջև:', 'id': 'Sistem dialog yang baru-baru ini mengarientasi tugas belajar model dari dialog yang dicatat, dan dialog tersebut pada gilirannya dikumpulkan dan dicatat sehingga mereka konsisten dengan pengetahuan domain tertentu. Namun, dalam skenario nyata, pengetahuan domain mengalami perubahan yang sering, dan dialog pelatihan awal mungkin segera menjadi obsolete, yang menyebabkan penurunan signifikan dalam prestasi model. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki hubungan antara dialog pelatihan dan pengetahuan domain, dan melamar Dialog Domain Adaptation, metodologi yang bertujuan untuk mengadaptasi dialog pelatihan awal untuk perubahan yang terlibat dalam pengetahuan domain. Kami fokus pada perubahan nilai slot (contohnya, ketika nilai slot baru tersedia untuk menjelaskan entitas domain) dan mendefinisikan pengaturan eksperimental untuk adaptasi domain dialog. First, we show that current state-of-the-art models for dialogue state tracking are still poorly robust to slot-value changes of the domain knowledge.  Kemudian, kita membandingkan strategi adaptasi domain yang berbeda, menunjukkan bahwa teknik sederhana efektif untuk mengurangi jarak antara dialog pelatihan dan pengetahuan domain.', 'bs': 'Nedavni dijalogski sustavi orientirani na zadatke naučili su model iz annotiranih dijaloga, a takvi dijalogi su u okviru sakupljeni i annotirani tako da su u skladu sa određenim znanjem domena. Međutim, u stvarnim scenarijama, znanje domena je podloženo čestim promjenama, a početni razgovor o obuci uskoro može postati zastarjeli, što bi dovelo do značajnog smanjenja modelnog učinka. U ovom papiru istražujemo odnos između dijaloga obuke i znanja domena, i predlažemo adaptaciju domena dijaloga, metodologiju koja se cilja prilagoditi prvobitnim dijalogima obuke za promjene interveniranih u znanju domena. Fokusiramo se na promjene vrijednosti slota (npr. kad su dostupne nove vrijednosti slota za opis entiteta domena) i definiramo eksperimentalnu postavku za adaptaciju domena dijaloga. Prvo, pokazujemo da su trenutni modeli umjetnosti za praćenje država dijaloga još uvijek loše moćni za promjene vrijednosti slota znanja domena. Onda uspoređujemo različite strategije adaptacije domena, pokazujući da su jednostavne tehnike učinkovite za smanjenje razdoblja između obrazovanjskih dijaloga i znanja domena.', 'tr': 'Ýakynda görkezilen täblisaň önüne görkezilen dialoog sistemleri ýazylýan dialoglardan bir nusga öwrenýär we şol dialoglar bilgi bilen bir nusga çykýarlar. Ýöne hakyky senarylarda bolsa, domena bilgi köplenç üýtgewlere tema berilýär we başlangyç öwrenme dialoglary çalt öňünde bolup biler, bu sebäpden örän düşürip çykyp biler. Bu kagyzda, biz okuw dialoglary we domena bilgileri arasyndaky baglaýyşyny inceleýäris we dialogy domena adaptasy we domena bilgileri içinde aralanmak üçin başlangıç okuw dialoglaryny üýtgetmek üçin bir methodologiýa teklip edýäris. Biz slot Mykdary üýtgediklerine fokus edýäris (myselýe, haçan täze slot mykdarlaryny diskiýa etmek üçin disponiň bar) we dýalogyň adilamasy üçin bir deneysel düzümlerni bejerýäris. Ilkinji gezek, häzirki möhüm möhüm modleriň dijal durum izlemesi üçin ýok bir şekilde dominiň bilimi üýtgetmegi üçin ýok bolmagyny görkezýäris. Sonra farklı domeny adaptasyon stratejilerini karşılaştırıp, eğitim dialogları ve domeny bilgileri arasındaki boşluğu azaltmak için basit tekniklere etkisiz olduğunu gösteririz.', 'az': 'Son qonaqlarńĪ il…ô danńĪŇüan danńĪŇüma sisteml…ôri danńĪŇümńĪŇü dialoglardan modell…ôri √∂yr…ônir, b√∂y√ľk danńĪŇümalar t…ôkrar toplanńĪr v…ô danńĪŇüńĪrlar ki, onlar b…ôzi domena elmi il…ô uyńüunlaŇüarlar. Ancaq h…ôqiq…ôt scenariolarda, domena elmi √ßox d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôr…ô m…ôxsus edilir, baŇülanńüńĪ√ß t…ôhsil dialoglarńĪ √ßox yaxńĪnlaŇüdńĪrńĪlabilir ki, modell…ôrin performansńĪnńĪn b√∂y√ľk d√ľŇü√ľŇü√ľn√ľ olar. Bu kańüńĪtda, t…ôhsil dialoglarńĪn v…ô domenl…ôrin elmi arasńĪndakńĪ iliŇükisini incidirik, Dialog Domen Adjustasyonu t…ôklif edirik, domenl…ôrin elmi d…ôyiŇüdirilm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn ilk t…ôhsil dialoglarńĪna uyńüunlaŇümaq niyy…ôtind…ô olan bir metodoloji t…ôklif edirik. Biz slot qiym…ôti d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrin…ô fokus edirik (m…ôs…ôl…ôn, yeni slot qiym…ôtl…ôri domeini tanńĪmlamaq √ľ√ß√ľn faydalandńĪńüńĪnda) v…ô dialog domeini uyńüulamaq √ľ√ß√ľn bir imtahan qurńüularńĪnńĪ tanńĪmlńĪyńĪq. ńįlk d…ôf…ô, biz d…ôyiŇüdiririk ki, d…ôyiŇüdirilm…ôk durumu izl…ôm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn h√∂km…ôn d…ôyiŇüdirilmiŇü m√∂vcud modell…ôrin d…ôyiŇüdirilm…ôsi domain bilgisinin slot-value d…ôyiŇüdirilm…ôsin…ô √ßox g√ľcl√ľd√ľr. Sonra, biz m√ľxt…ôlif domena uyńüunlaŇüdńĪrma stratejil…ôrini qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪrńĪq, t…ôhsil dialoglarńĪn v…ô domena elmi arasńĪndakńĪ boŇüluqlarńĪ azaltmaq √ľ√ß√ľn basit teknikl…ôrin faydalńĪ olduńüunu g√∂st…ôr…ôk.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক কাজের মুখোমুখি ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম বিরক্তিকর ডায়ালগ থেকে একটি মডেল শিখে এবং এ ধরনের ডায়ালগ সংগ্রহ করা হয় এবং বিরক্ত করা হয় যাতে তারা নির্দ তবে সত্যিকারের পরিস্থিতিতে ডোমেইনের জ্ঞান প্রায়শ পরিবর্তনের প্রয়োজনীয় এবং প্রাথমিক প্রশিক্ষণের ডায়ালগ শীঘ্রই অসম্ভব হয়ে যায়, যার ফলে মডেলে এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রশিক্ষণের কথোপকথন এবং ডোমেইন জ্ঞানের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক তদন্ত করি এবং ডায়ালগ ডোমেইন এডাপ্যাটেশনের প্রস্তাব করি, যার উদ্দেশ্যে প্রথম প্রশিক্ষণ আমরা স্লোট-মান পরিবর্তনের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি (উদাহরণস্বরূপ, যখন ডোমেইন বস্তুগুলো বর্ণনা করার জন্য নতুন স্লোট মান পাওয়া যায়) এবং ডোমেইনের ডোমে প্রথমত, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে ডায়ালগ রাষ্ট্র ট্র্যাকিং এর বর্তমান অবস্থানের শিল্পের মডেল এখনো খারাপ কাজ করছে ডোমেইনের জ্ঞানের পরিবর তারপর আমরা বিভিন্ন ডোমেইনের আপেটশন কৌশলের তুলনা করি, যেখানে দেখাচ্ছি যে সাধারণ প্রযুক্তি কার্যকর যে প্রশিক্ষণের মধ্যে প্রশিক্ষণ', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset tehtäväkeskeiset dialogijärjestelmät oppivat mallin selittetyistä dialogeista, ja tällaiset dialogit puolestaan kerätään ja merkitään siten, että ne ovat yhdenmukaisia tietyn verkkotunnuksen tietämyksen kanssa. Todellisissa skenaarioissa verkkotieto muuttuu kuitenkin usein, ja peruskoulutusta koskevat vuoropuhelut voivat pian vanhentua, mikä johtaa mallin suorituskyvyn huomattavaan heikkenemiseen. Tässä työssä selvitämme koulutusdialogien ja verkkotiedon välistä suhdetta ja ehdotamme Dialogue Domain Adaptation -menetelmää, jonka tavoitteena on mukauttaa peruskoulutusdialogeja verkkotiedon muutoksiin. Keskitymme slot-arvon muutoksiin (esim. kun uusia slot-arvoja on saatavilla verkkotunnuksen entiteettien kuvaamiseen) ja määritämme kokeellisen asetuksen dialogi-verkkotunnuksen mukauttamiseen. Ensin osoitamme, että nykyiset dialogin tilan seurannan huippumallit ovat edelleen heikosti kestäviä verkkotunnuksen tietojen lähtö-arvojen muutoksille. Tämän jälkeen vertaamme eri toimialojen sopeutumisstrategioita ja osoitamme, että yksinkertaiset tekniikat vähentävät tehokkaasti koulutusdialogien ja verkkotiedon välistä kuilua.', 'ca': "Els sistemes de diàleg recents orientats a les tasques aprenen un model a partir de diàlegs anotats, i aquests diàlegs són recollits i anotats de manera que siguin coherents amb certs coneixements de domini. No obstant això, en escenaris reals, el coneixement de domini està sujet a canvis freqüents, i els diàlegs d'entrenament inicial podrien tornar obsolets aviat, resultant en una disminució significativa del rendiment del model. En aquest paper investigam la relació entre els diàlegs de formació i el coneixement de domini, i proposem Adaptació del domini de diàleg, una metodologia mirant a adaptar els diàlegs de formació inicial als canvis intervenits en el coneixement de domini. Ens centrem en els canvis de valor de slots (per exemple, quan hi ha nous valors de slots disponibles per descriure entitats de domini) i definim una configuració experimental per l'adaptació del domini de diàleg. En primer lloc, demostram que els models actuals d'actualitat per a seguir l'estat del diàleg encara són poc robustos als canvis de valor de slot del coneixement de domini. Després, comparem diferents estratègies d'adaptació de dominis, mostrant que les tècniques senzilles són eficaces per reduir la bretxa entre els diàlegs d'entrenamient i el coneixement de domini.", 'cs': 'Nedávné dialogové systémy orientované na úkoly se učí model z anotovaných dialogů a tyto dialogy jsou zase shromažďovány a anotovány tak, aby byly v souladu s určitými znalostmi domény. Nicméně v reálných scénářích jsou znalosti domény předmětem častých změn a dialogy počátečního školení se mohou brzy stát zastaralými, což vede k výraznému snížení výkonnosti modelu. V tomto článku zkoumáme vztah mezi tréninkovými dialogy a doménovými znalostmi a navrhujeme adaptaci dialogové domény, metodiku zaměřenou na adaptaci dialogových dialogů na změny zasažené do doménových znalostí. Zaměřujeme se na změny hodnot slotů (např. když jsou k dispozici nové hodnoty slotů pro popis entit domény) a definujeme experimentální nastavení pro adaptaci dialogové domény. Nejprve ukazujeme, že současné nejmodernější modely pro sledování stavu dialogu jsou stále špatně robustní vůči změnám hodnoty slotů v oblasti znalostí domény. Následně porovnáváme různé strategie adaptace domén a ukazujeme, že jednoduché techniky jsou účinné ke snížení mezery mezi dialogy tréninku a znalostmi domény.', 'et': 'Hiljutised ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogisüsteemid õpivad anoteeritud dialoogidest mudelit ning neid omakorda kogutakse ja märgitakse nii, et need oleksid kooskõlas teatud valdkondlike teadmistega. Tegelikes stsenaariumides muutuvad valdkondlikud teadmised sageli ning algkoolituse dialoogid võivad peagi aeguneda, mille tulemusena mudeli tulemuslikkus väheneb märkimisväärselt. Käesolevas töös uurime koolitusdialoogide ja valdkondlike teadmiste vahelist seost ning pakume välja dialoogidomeeni kohandamise metoodika, mille eesmärk on kohandada algkoolitusdialooge valdkondlike teadmiste muutustega. Keskendume teenindusaegade väärtuste muutustele (nt siis, kui domeeni olemite kirjeldamiseks on saadaval uued teenindusaegade väärtused) ja määratleme eksperimentaalse seadistuse dialoogidomeeni kohandamiseks. Esiteks näitame, et praegused kaasaegsed dialoogi oleku jälgimise mudelid on ikka veel halvasti vastupidavad teenindusaegade väärtuse muutustele domeeniteadmistes. Seejärel võrdleme erinevaid valdkondlikke kohanemisstrateegiaid, näidates, et lihtsad tehnikad on tõhusad, et vähendada lõhet koolitusdialoogide ja valdkondlike teadmiste vahel.', 'jv': 'dialog-direction Nanging ketoke, ditambah bener scenarno In this paper, we istrage the ratio amongst tutorial dialog and domain awakening, and proposal DialogDialog domain Adjustation, a method method goal at aligning first tutorial dialog to change intermediate in the domain knowning. We Focal Leng First, we show that current state-of-the-arts modes for dialog state tracking are continue pool Unya, kita komparasi alam pancene sampeyan sistem sampeyan, iso nggambaran sistem sampeyan luwih apik kebutaan kanggo kuwi tindakan dialog keamanan karo kesalam pancene.', 'sk': 'Nedavni sistemi dialoga, usmerjeni v naloge, se učijo modela iz označenih dialogov, takšni dialogi pa se zbirajo in označujejo tako, da so skladni z določenim domenskim znanjem. Vendar pa se v realnih scenarijih domensko znanje pogosto spreminja, dialogi o začetnem usposabljanju pa lahko kmalu zastarajo, kar povzroči znatno zmanjšanje uspešnosti modela. V prispevku raziskujemo razmerje med dialogi usposabljanja in domenskim znanjem ter predlagamo metodologijo za prilagajanje dialogov začetnega usposabljanja spremembam v domenskem znanju. Osredotočamo se na spremembe vrednosti rež (npr. ko so na voljo nove vrednosti rež za opis domenskih entitet) in določimo eksperimentalno nastavitev za prilagoditev domene dialoga. Najprej pokažemo, da so sedanji najsodobnejši modeli za sledenje stanju dialoga še vedno slabo robustni za spremembe vrednosti rež v domenskem znanju. Nato primerjamo različne strategije prilagajanja domenskih področij in pokažemo, da so preproste tehnike učinkovite za zmanjšanje vrzeli med dialogi usposabljanja in domenskim znanjem.', 'ha': "Tsarin zauren akwatin bayanin da aka yanzu a yanzu, za'a sanar da wata motel daga zauren akwatin bayanin da aka yi taƙaita, kuma za'a motsa wannan zauren akwatin bayani masu tsawo da kuma aka zartar da su don a sami da ilmi na guda. Amma, a cikin masu gaske, an saka ilmi ga ɗayan mutane masu yawa, kuma za'a iya sãɓa wa zauren akwatin bayani na farko, don ya ƙara ƙari mai girma cikin shirin ayuka. In this paper, we investigate the relationship between training dialogues and domain knowledge, and propose Dialogue Domain Adaptation, a methodology aiming at adapting initial training dialogues to changes intervened in the domain knowledge.  Tuna fokus a kan canza kimar slot-tun (misali, idan za'a iya samar da kima na slot zuwa a bayyana abun duk) kuma Mu ƙayyade wani jarraba wa adadin sautin zauren akwatin bayani. Kayyade, muna nuna cewa misali na-halin-sanar da ke yanzu wa jerin bayani na zauren akwatin bayani na zauren akwatin bayani na zauren akwatin bayani, don a yi amfani da musanyi ga canza kimar-slot-value wa ilmi na guda. Sa'an nan kuma, muna samfani game da juyin adadi dabam-daban, ko kuma Muke nũna, kunnufi masu sauƙi ne dõmin ya ƙara gaura tsakanin mazaɓa da masu tsari da ilmi guda.", 'he': 'מערכות דיאלוגים מסוימות למשימות לאחרונה לומדות דוגמא מדיולוגים מסוימים, ודיולוגים כאלה, בתור מסוימים, אוספים וממסוימים כך שהם מתאימים לידע שטח מסוים. However, in real scenarios, domain knowledge is subject to frequent changes, and initial training dialogues may soon become obsolete, resulting in a significant decrease in the model performance.  בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים את מערכת היחסים בין דיאלוגי אימון לידע בתחום, ומציעים שימוש בתחום דיאלוגי, מטדולוגיה שמתכוונת להסתגל דיאלוגי אימון ראשונים לשינויים שהתערבו בידע התחום. אנו מתמקדים בשינויים בערך המעצר (למשל, כאשר ערכים חדשים של המעצר זמינים לתאר יחידות שטח) ולהגדיר סדרה ניסיונית להתאים לתחום הדיולוג. First, we show that current state-of-the-art models for dialogue state tracking are still poorly robust to slot-value changes of the domain knowledge.  ואז, אנחנו משווה אסטרטגיות שימוש בתחום שונות, מראות שטכניקות פשוטות הן יעילות כדי להפחית את הפער בין דיאלוגי אימון לידע בתחום.', 'bo': 'Recent task-oriented dialog systems learn a model from annotated dialogues, and such dialogues are in turn collected and annotated so that they are consistent with certain domain knowledge. However, in real scenarios, domain knowledge is subject to frequent changes, and initial training dialogues may soon become obsolete, resulting in a significant decrease in the model performance. In this paper, we investigate the relationship between training dialogues and domain knowledge, and propose Dialogue Domain Adaptation, a methodology aiming at adapting initial training dialogues to changes intervened in the domain knowledge. We focus on slot-value changes (e.g., when new slot values are available to describe domain entities) and define an experimental setting for dialog domain adaptation. First, we show that current state-of-the-art models for dialog state tracking are still poorly robust to slot-value changes of the domain knowledge. Then, we compare different domain adaptation strategies, showing that simple techniques are effective to reduce the gap between training dialogs and domain knowledge.'}
{'en': 'Developing a Clinical Language Model for Swedish : Continued Pretraining of Generic BERT with In-Domain Data', 'ar': 'تطوير نموذج للغة السريرية للسويدية: التدريب المسبق المستمر لـ BERT العام مع البيانات داخل المجال', 'es': 'Desarrollo de un modelo de lenguaje clínico para el sueco: preentrenamiento continuo de BERT genérico con datos en el dominio', 'fr': "Développement d'un modèle de langage clinique pour le suédois\xa0: pré-apprentissage continu du BERT générique avec des données dans le domaine", 'pt': 'Desenvolvendo um modelo de linguagem clínica para sueco: pré-treinamento contínuo de BERT genérico com dados no domínio', 'ja': 'スウェーデン語のための臨床言語モデルの開発：ドメイン内データを使用したジェネリックBERTの継続的な事前トレーニング', 'zh': '开瑞典语临床语言模形:用域内数据续预训练通用BERT', 'hi': 'स्वीडिश के लिए एक नैदानिक भाषा मॉडल विकसित करना: इन-डोमेन डेटा के साथ जेनेरिक BERT की निरंतर प्रीट्रेनिंग', 'ru': 'Разработка клинической языковой модели для шведского языка: продолжение предварительной подготовки непатентованного BERT с использованием внутридоменных данных', 'ga': 'Samhail Teanga Chliniciúil a Fhorbairt don tSualainnis: Réamhoiliúint Leantach ar BERT Cineálach le Sonraí san Fhearainn', 'ka': 'კლინიკური ენერგიის მოდელის განვითარება შვედიათისთვის: განვითარება გენერიკური BERT- ის მონაცემებით', 'el': 'Ανάπτυξη ενός μοντέλου κλινικής γλώσσας για τα σουηδικά: Συνέχεια προεπιλογή του γενόσημου με δεδομένα εντός του τομέα', 'hu': 'Klinikai nyelvi modell kidolgozása svéd számára: Általános BERT folyamatos előkészítése domain adatokkal', 'mk': 'Развивање на клинички јазички модел за шведски: Продолжување на преправањето на генералните BERT со податоци во доменот', 'it': 'Sviluppo di un modello di lingua clinica per lo svedese: continua pretrattazione del BERT generico con dati di dominio', 'kk': 'Швеция үшін клиникалық тіл моделін жасау: In- Domain деректерімен жалғастыру жалғастырылады', 'ms': 'Mengembangkan Model Bahasa Klinik untuk Swedia: Teruskan Pretraining BERT Generik dengan Data Dalam Domain', 'lt': 'Švedijos kalbos klinikinio modelio kūrimas: nuolatinis bendro BERT išankstinis mokymas su domeno duomenimis', 'no': 'Utviklinga av ein klinisk språk- modell for svensk: Hald fram overføring av generell BERT med innedomene- data', 'pl': 'Opracowanie modelu języka klinicznego dla szwedzkiego: ciągłe wstępne szkolenie generycznego BERT z danymi wewnątrz domeny', 'mt': 'L-iżvilupp ta’ Mudell Kliniku tal-Lingwa għall-Isvediż: Tkompla t-taħriġ minn qabel tal-BERT Ġeneriku b’Dejta Interna', 'ml': 'സ്വീഡിയന്റെ ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നു: ഇന്\u200d ഡോമെയിന്\u200d ഡേറ്റുകളോടൊപ്പം ജെനറിക് ബെര്\u200dട', 'mn': 'Шведийн клиникийн хэл загварыг хөгжүүлэх: Continued Pretraining of Generic BERT with In-Domain Data', 'sr': 'Razvoj kliničkog jezičkog modela za švedski: nastavljanje pretvaranja generalnih BERT sa podacima u domenu', 'ro': 'Dezvoltarea unui model de limbă clinică pentru suedeză: continuarea prepregătirii BERT generice cu date în domeniu', 'sv': 'Utveckling av en klinisk språkmodell för svenska: Fortsatt preträning av generisk BERT med domändata', 'so': 'Developing Model of Clinical language for Swedish: Continued Pretraining of Generic BERT with In-Domain Data', 'ur': 'سوئڈی کے لئے کلینیکی زبان موڈل ڈولیٹ ڈولیٹ ڈولیٹ کے ساتھ ادامه دی جاتی ہے', 'si': 'ස්වීඩිෂ් වෙනුවෙන් ක්\u200dලිකිනික භාෂා මොඩල් විකාශ කරනවා: දිගටම සාමාන්\u200dය BERT සමග In- Domain Data', 'ta': 'Developing a Clinical Language Model for Swedish: Continued Pretraining of Generic BERT with In-Domain Data', 'vi': 'Phát triển một mô hình ngôn ngữ học lâm sàng cho Thụy Điển: Tiếp tục giả mạo hỗn tạp tạp tạp liên tục với dữ liệu in miền', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Разработване на клиничен езиков модел за шведски: Продължаване на предтренирането на генетични BERT с вътрешни данни', 'nl': 'Ontwikkelen van een klinisch taalmodel voor Zweeds: Voortdurende pretraining van generieke BERT met In-Domain data', 'hr': 'Razvoj kliničkog jezičkog modela za švedski: nastavljanje pretvaranja generalnog BERT sa podacima u domenu', 'id': 'Mengembangkan Model Bahasa Klinik untuk Swedia: Terus mempermainkan BERT Generik dengan Data Dalam Domain', 'ko': '스웨덴어를 위한 임상 언어 모델 개발: 영역 내 데이터 사용 시 공통 BERT 조련 지속', 'da': 'Udvikling af en klinisk sprogmodel for svensk: Fortsat foregivelse af generisk BERT med In-Domain Data', 'de': 'Entwicklung eines klinischen Sprachmodells für Schwedisch: Fortsetzung des Vortrainings von generischem BERT mit In-Domain-Daten', 'sw': 'Kupandisha Modeli ya Lugha ya Kikliniki kwa ajili ya Sweden: Imeendelea mafunzo ya Umoja wa BERT kwa data', 'af': "Ontwikkeling van 'n Kliniese Taal Model vir Sweedse: Gaan voort om Generiese BERT met In- Domein Data", 'sq': 'Developing a Clinical Language Model for Swedish: Continued Pretraining of Generic BERT with In-Domain Data', 'fa': 'توسعه یک مدل زبان کلینیک برای سوئدی: ادامه دادن BERT ژنرالی با اطلاعات در دامن', 'tr': "Şwetçe üçin kliniki dil nusgasyny öwrenmek: In-Domain Maglumaty bilen Generik BERT'yň Pretraining Continued with In-Domain Data", 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Շվեդիայի համար կլինիկական լեզվի մոդելի զարգացումը. Շարունակել է գեներական BER-ի պատրաստումը տիեզերական տվյալների հետ', 'az': "İsveçdi üçün Kliniki Dil Modelini təhsil edir: In-Domain Veriləri ilə Generic BERT'in Pretraining Continued with In-Domain Data", 'bn': 'Name', 'cs': 'Vývoj klinického jazykového modelu pro švédštinu: Pokračující předškolení generického BERT s doménovými daty', 'et': 'Rootsi keele kliinilise mudeli väljatöötamine: üldise BERT-i jätkuv eelõpetamine domeenisiseste andmetega', 'bs': 'Razvoj kliničkog jezičkog modela za švedski: nastavljanje pretvaranja generalnog BERT sa podacima u domenu', 'ca': "Desenvolviment d'un model de llenguatge clínic en suec: Continuació de la préformació de BERT genèric amb dades en domini", 'fi': 'Kliinisen kielimallin kehittäminen ruotsille: Geneerinen BERT:n esikoulutus verkkotunnuksen sisäisillä tiedoilla', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'פיתוח מודל שפת קלינית לשוודית: המשיך להתאמן על BERT גנרלי עם נתונים בתחום', 'jv': 'Developer', 'sk': 'Razvoj kliničnega jezikovnega modela za švedščino: nadaljevanje predurjenja generičnega BERT z notranjimi podatki', 'bo': 'Developing a Clinical Language Model for Swedish: Continued Pretraining of Generic BERT with In-Domain Data'}
{'en': 'The use of pretrained language models, fine-tuned to perform a specific downstream task, has become widespread in NLP. Using a generic language model in specialized domains may, however, be sub-optimal due to differences in language use and vocabulary. In this paper, it is investigated whether an existing, generic language model for Swedish can be improved for the clinical domain through continued pretraining with clinical text. The generic and domain-specific language models are fine-tuned and evaluated on three representative clinical NLP tasks : (i) identifying protected health information, (ii) assigning ICD-10 diagnosis codes to discharge summaries, and (iii) sentence-level uncertainty prediction. The results show that continued pretraining on in-domain data leads to improved performance on all three downstream tasks, indicating that there is a potential added value of domain-specific language models for clinical NLP.', 'es': 'El uso de modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados, ajustados para realizar una tarea específica posterior, se ha generalizado en la PNL. Sin embargo, el uso de un modelo de lenguaje genérico en dominios especializados puede no ser óptimo debido a las diferencias en el uso del idioma y el vocabulario. En este artículo, se investiga si un modelo de lenguaje genérico existente para el sueco puede mejorarse para el dominio clínico mediante una formación previa continua con texto clínico. Los modelos lingüísticos genéricos y específicos del dominio se ajustan y evalúan en tres tareas clínicas representativas de PNL: (i) identificación de la información de salud protegida, (ii) asignación de códigos de diagnóstico de la CIE-10 a los resúmenes de alta y (iii) predicción de incertidumbre a nivel de oración. Los resultados muestran que la capacitación previa continua sobre datos dentro del dominio conduce a un mejor rendimiento en las tres tareas posteriores, lo que indica que existe un potencial valor agregado de los modelos de lenguaje específicos del dominio para la PNL clínica.', 'ar': 'أصبح استخدام نماذج اللغة التي تم ضبطها مسبقًا ، والتي تم ضبطها لأداء مهمة محددة في المراحل النهائية ، منتشرًا في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. ومع ذلك ، قد يكون استخدام نموذج لغة عام في مجالات متخصصة دون المستوى الأمثل بسبب الاختلافات في استخدام اللغة والمفردات. في هذه الورقة ، يتم التحقيق في ما إذا كان يمكن تحسين نموذج اللغة العامة الحالي للسويدية للمجال السريري من خلال استمرار التدريب المسبق مع النص السريري. يتم ضبط النماذج اللغوية العامة والخاصة بالمجال وتقييمها في ثلاث مهام تمثيلية في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية: (1) تحديد المعلومات الصحية المحمية ، (2) تعيين أكواد تشخيص ICD-10 لإخراج الملخصات ، و (3) عدم اليقين على مستوى الجملة تنبؤ. تظهر النتائج أن التدريب المسبق المستمر على البيانات في المجال يؤدي إلى تحسين الأداء في جميع المهام النهائية الثلاثة ، مما يشير إلى وجود قيمة مضافة محتملة لنماذج اللغة الخاصة بالمجال لمعالجة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية السريرية.', 'fr': "L'utilisation de modèles de langage préentraînés, affinés pour effectuer une tâche spécifique en aval, s'est généralisée dans la PNL. L'utilisation d'un modèle linguistique générique dans des domaines spécialisés peut toutefois ne pas être optimale en raison des différences d'utilisation de la langue et de vocabulaire. Dans cet article, nous étudions si un modèle linguistique générique existant pour le suédois peut être amélioré dans le domaine clinique grâce à une préformation continue avec un texte clinique. Les modèles de langage génériques et spécifiques au domaine sont affinés et évalués sur trois tâches cliniques représentatives de la PNL\xa0: (i) identification des informations de santé protégées, (ii) attribution de codes de diagnostic CIM-10 aux résumés de sortie, et (iii) prédiction de l'incertitude au niveau de la phrase. Les résultats montrent que la formation préalable continue sur les données dans le domaine entraîne une amélioration des performances sur les trois tâches en aval, ce qui indique qu'il existe une valeur ajoutée potentielle des modèles de langage spécifiques au domaine pour la PNL clinique.", 'pt': 'O uso de modelos de linguagem pré-treinados, ajustados para realizar uma tarefa específica de downstream, tornou-se difundido na PNL. O uso de um modelo de linguagem genérico em domínios especializados pode, no entanto, ser sub-ótimo devido a diferenças no uso da linguagem e no vocabulário. Neste artigo, investiga-se se um modelo de linguagem genérica existente para o sueco pode ser melhorado para o domínio clínico por meio de pré-treinamento contínuo com texto clínico. Os modelos de linguagem genéricos e específicos de domínio são ajustados e avaliados em três tarefas clínicas representativas de PNL: (i) identificação de informações de saúde protegidas, (ii) atribuição de códigos de diagnóstico da CID-10 para resumos de alta e (iii) incerteza em nível de sentença predição. Os resultados mostram que o pré-treinamento contínuo em dados de domínio leva a um melhor desempenho em todas as três tarefas downstream, indicando que há um potencial valor agregado de modelos de linguagem específicos de domínio para a PNL clínica.', 'ja': '特定の下流タスクを実行するように微調整された事前訓練された言語モデルの使用は、NLPで広まっている。しかしながら、専門領域で一般的な言語モデルを使用することは、言語使用と語彙の違いのために最適ではない場合がある。本論文では、臨床テキストによる継続的な事前訓練を通じて、臨床領域のために既存のスウェーデン語の汎用言語モデルを改善できるかどうかを検討した。汎用およびドメイン固有の言語モデルは、（ ｉ ）保護された健康情報を識別すること、（ ｉ ｉ ） ICD -10診断コードを排出要約に割り当てること、および（ ｉｉｉ ）文レベルの不確実性予測という３つの代表的な臨床ＮＬＰタスクで微調整および評価される。結果は、ドメイン内データの事前トレーニングを継続することが、3つのダウンストリームタスクすべてのパフォーマンスの向上につながることを示し、臨床NLPのためのドメイン固有の言語モデルの潜在的な付加価値があることを示している。', 'zh': '预训言模之用,经微调以行特定下流,NLP中已遍。 然言语词汇异,在专域用通语体,或非理想。 本文讲求可否临床文本预训练改进现瑞典语通用语言模样。 通用和特定于领域之语,以三代表性之临床NLP而微和之:(i)识保护之信,(ii)以ICD-10诊代码分之于放电摘要,及(iii)句级不确定性占。 结果表明,对域内数事可以益三下,明域特定言语临床NLP有潜在之价也。', 'hi': 'एक विशिष्ट डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य करने के लिए पहले से प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग, ठीक-ठाक, एनएलपी में व्यापक हो गया है। विशेष डोमेन में एक सामान्य भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करना, हालांकि, भाषा के उपयोग और शब्दावली में अंतर के कारण उप-इष्टतम हो सकता है। इस पेपर में, यह जांच की जाती है कि क्या स्वीडिश के लिए एक मौजूदा, जेनेरिक भाषा मॉडल को नैदानिक पाठ के साथ निरंतर प्रीट्रेनिंग के माध्यम से नैदानिक डोमेन के लिए बेहतर बनाया जा सकता है। जेनेरिक और डोमेन-विशिष्ट भाषा मॉडल को तीन प्रतिनिधि नैदानिक एनएलपी कार्यों पर ठीक-ठाक और मूल्यांकन किया जाता है: (i) संरक्षित स्वास्थ्य जानकारी की पहचान करना, (ii) सारांश ों को निर्वहन करने के लिए आईसीडी -10 निदान कोड असाइन करना, और (iii) वाक्य-स्तर की अनिश्चितता की भविष्यवाणी। परिणाम बताते हैं कि इन-डोमेन डेटा पर निरंतर प्रीट्रेनिंग सभी तीन डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों पर बेहतर प्रदर्शन की ओर ले जाती है, यह दर्शाता है कि नैदानिक एनएलपी के लिए डोमेन-विशिष्ट भाषा मॉडल का एक संभावित जोड़ा मूल्य है।', 'ru': 'Использование предварительно подготовленных языковых моделей, доработанных для выполнения конкретной задачи ниже по потоку, стало широко распространенным в NLP. Использование типовой языковой модели в специализированных доменах, однако, может быть неоптимальным из-за различий в использовании языка и словарного запаса. В этой статье исследуется, может ли существующая, общая языковая модель для шведского языка быть улучшена для клинической области путем непрерывного предварительного обучения с клиническим текстом. Дженерические и доменно-специфические языковые модели дорабатываются и оцениваются по трем репрезентативным клиническим задачам NLP: (i) выявление защищенной информации о здоровье, (ii) присвоение кодов диагностики ICD-10 для резюме выписок и (iii) прогнозирование неопределенности на уровне предложений. Результаты показывают, что продолжение предварительного обучения по внутридоменным данным приводит к улучшению производительности по всем трем последующим задачам, что указывает на потенциальную добавленную ценность доменно-специфических языковых моделей для клинической NLP.', 'ga': 'Tá úsáid mhúnlaí teanga réamhoilte, mionchoigeartaithe chun tasc sonrach iartheachtacha a dhéanamh, tar éis éirí go forleathan i NLP. D’fhéadfadh, áfach, úsáid a bhaint as múnla cineálach teanga i sainréimsí a bheith fo-optamach mar gheall ar dhifríochtaí in úsáid teanga agus stór focal. Sa pháipéar seo, déantar fiosrú an féidir múnla teanga cineálach don tSualainnis atá ann cheana a fheabhsú don réimse cliniciúil trí réamhoiliúint leanúnach le téacs cliniciúil. Déantar mionchoigeartú agus luacháil ar na samhlacha teanga cineálacha agus a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann ar thrí thasc ionadaíocha NLP: (i) faisnéis faoi chosaint sláinte a shainaithint, (ii) cóid diagnóis ICD-10 a shannadh d’achoimrí a scaoileadh, agus (iii) éiginnteacht ar leibhéal na habairte. réamhinsint. Léiríonn na torthaí go mbíonn feidhmíocht fheabhsaithe ar na trí thasc iartheachtacha ar fad mar thoradh ar réamhoiliúint leanúnach ar shonraí in-fhearainn, rud a thugann le fios go bhféadfadh breisluach féideartha a bheith ag samhlacha teanga a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann do NLP cliniciúil.', 'ka': 'განსაკუთრებული ენის მოდელების გამოყენება, რომელიც განსაკუთრებულია კონფიფიკური downstream დავალებისთვის, NLP-ში უფრო გაფარდება. სპეციალური სახელის მოდელის გამოყენება სპეციალური დიომენში შეიძლება იყოს სპეპტიმალური სახელის გამოყენება და სიტყვებულის განსხვავებებისთვის. ამ დოკუნეში, ისინი განსხვავებულია თუ არა ქგვედის მსგავსი, სენერიკური ენის მოდელი შეიძლება კლინიკური დიომინზე გაუკეთება კლინიკური ტექსტით გაუკეთება. გენერიკური და დომინური განსაკუთრებული ენის მოდელები უკეთესებულია და განსაკუთრებულია სამი გამოსაკუთრებული კლინიკური NLP დავალებისთვის: i) განსაკუთრებული ჯანმრთის ინფორმაციის განსაკუთრება, ii) ICD-10 დიაგონგიზის კოდიების განსაკუთრებ წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ მონაცემის მონაცემების შემდეგ დარწმუნება მონაცემების შესაძლებლობად ყველა სამი მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც კლინიკური NLP-ის მონაცემების პოცენ', 'el': 'Η χρήση προκαθορισμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων, συντονισμένων για την εκτέλεση μιας συγκεκριμένης μεταγενέστερης εργασίας, έχει γίνει ευρέως διαδεδομένη στο NLP. Ωστόσο, η χρήση ενός γενικού γλωσσικού μοντέλου σε εξειδικευμένους τομείς μπορεί να είναι υποβέλτιστη λόγω διαφορών στη χρήση της γλώσσας και το λεξιλόγιο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνάται εάν ένα υπάρχον, γενικό μοντέλο γλώσσας για τα σουηδικά μπορεί να βελτιωθεί για τον κλινικό τομέα μέσω συνεχούς προετοιμασίας με κλινικό κείμενο. Τα γενικά και εξειδικευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα συντονίζονται και αξιολογούνται σε τρία αντιπροσωπευτικά κλινικά καθήκοντα NLP: (i) προσδιορισμός προστατευόμενων πληροφοριών υγείας, (ii) ανάθεση κωδικών διάγνωσης ICD-10 στις περιλήψεις απαλλαγής και (iii) πρόβλεψη αβεβαιότητας σε επίπεδο ποινής. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η συνεχής προεπιλογή σε δεδομένα εντός του τομέα οδηγεί σε βελτιωμένη απόδοση και στις τρεις μεταγενέστερες εργασίες, υποδεικνύοντας ότι υπάρχει μια πιθανή προστιθέμενη αξία των γλωσσικών μοντέλων για την κλινική ΝΛΠ.', 'hu': 'Az előképzett nyelvi modellek használata, amelyeket egy adott downstream feladat elvégzésére finomhangoltak, elterjedt az NLP-ben. Az általános nyelvi modell használata speciális területeken azonban a nyelvhasználat és a szókincs eltérése miatt nem optimális. Ebben a tanulmányban azt vizsgáljuk, hogy egy meglévő, svéd általános nyelvi modell javítható-e a klinikai területen a klinikai szövegekkel történő folyamatos előkészítés révén. Az általános és tartományspecifikus nyelvi modelleket három reprezentatív klinikai NLP feladat alapján finomhangoljuk és értékeljük: (i) védett egészségügyi információk azonosítása, (ii) ICD-10 diagnóziskódok hozzárendelése a kibocsátási összefoglalókhoz és (iii) mondatszintű bizonytalanság előrejelzése. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a tartományon belüli adatok folyamatos előkészítése mindhárom downstream feladat teljesítményének javítását eredményezi, ami azt jelzi, hogy a klinikai NLP esetében potenciálisan hozzáadott értéket jelent a tartományspecifikus nyelvi modellek.', 'it': "L'uso di modelli linguistici pre-addestrati, perfezionati per eseguire uno specifico compito a valle, è diventato diffuso nella PNL. L'utilizzo di un modello linguistico generico in domini specializzati può tuttavia risultare non ottimale a causa delle differenze nell'uso della lingua e nel vocabolario. In questo articolo, si studia se un modello di lingua generica esistente per lo svedese possa essere migliorato per il dominio clinico attraverso un continuo pretraining con testo clinico. I modelli linguistici generici e specifici per il dominio sono perfezionati e valutati su tre compiti clinici rappresentativi di PNL: (i) identificazione di informazioni sanitarie protette, (ii) assegnazione di codici diagnostici ICD-10 ai riassunti di scarico e (iii) previsione dell'incertezza a livello di frase. I risultati mostrano che il continuo pretraining sui dati in-domain porta a migliorare le prestazioni su tutte e tre le attività a valle, indicando che esiste un potenziale valore aggiunto dei modelli linguistici specifici per il dominio per la PNL clinica.", 'mk': 'Користењето на предобучените јазички модели, фино прилагодени за извршување на специфичната задача на потекло, стана широко широко ширено во НЛП. Користењето на генерален јазички модел во специјализираните домени може, сепак, да биде суб-оптимално поради разликите во употребата на јазикот и речникот. Во овој весник се истражува дали постоечкиот, генерален јазички модел за шведски може да се подобри за клиничкиот домен преку продолжено претренирање со клинички текст. Генералните и доменски јазички модели се финетизирани и оценети на три претставни клинички задачи на НЛП: (i) идентификување на заштитени здравствени информации, (ii) доделување на кодови за дијагностика на ИЦД-10 за извршување на резултати и (iii) предвидување на несигурноста на нивото Резултатите покажуваат дека континуираното претренирање на податоците во доменот води до подобрена перформанса на сите три понатамошни задачи, што индицира дека постои потенцијална додадена вредност на моделите на јазик специфични за доменот за клиничките НЛП', 'ms': 'Penggunaan model bahasa yang dilatih sebelum dilatih, ditetapkan untuk melakukan tugas tertentu turun, telah menjadi luas dalam NLP. Menggunakan model bahasa generik dalam domain khusus, bagaimanapun, mungkin sub-optimal disebabkan perbezaan dalam penggunaan bahasa dan vokbulari. Dalam kertas ini, ia disertai sama ada model bahasa yang wujud, generik untuk Swedish boleh diperbaiki untuk domain klinik melalui terus berlatih dengan teks klinik. Model bahasa generik dan domain-spesifik ditetapkan dan ditetapkan pada tiga tugas klinik NLP mewakili: (i) mengenalpasti maklumat kesehatan yang dilindungi, (ii) menyerahkan kod diagnosis ICD-10 untuk mengeluarkan ringkasan, dan (iii) ramalan ketidakpastian tahap kalimat. Hasil menunjukkan bahawa melanjutkan pratolakan pada data dalam domain membawa kepada prestasi yang lebih baik pada semua tiga tugas turun, menunjukkan bahawa terdapat nilai tambahan potensi bagi model bahasa khusus domain untuk NLP klinik.', 'kk': 'Тіл үлгілерін қолдану, нақты төмендегі тапсырманы орындау үшін дұрыс баптау үшін, NLP- де көптеген. Ерекшелікті домендерде жалпы тіл үлгісін қолдану мүмкін, бірақ тілдерді қолдану мен сөздік сөздерінің айырмашылығының көбірек- оптималы болуы мүмкін. Бұл қағазда, Швецияның жалпы тіл үлгісін клиникалық доменге жақсартуға болады, клиникалық мәтінмен жалғастыру арқылы, әдетті тіл үлгісін зерттеуде болады. Жалпы және доменге ерекше тіл үлгілері үш келтірілген клиникалық NLP тапсырмаларында дұрыс түзетілген және бағалады: i) сақталған саулық мәліметін анықтау, (ii) ICD-10 диагностикалық кодтарын тұжырымдамасын жүктеу үшін, және iii) сұлбаның Нәтижелер домендегі деректерге жалғастыруды көрсетеді, клиникалық NLP үшін домендегі тіл моделдерінің қосымша қосымша мәні бар дегенді көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'NLP plačiai paplito išankstinio mokymo kalbų modelių, patobulintų tam tikroms tolesnėms užduotims atlikti. Vis dėlto bendrojo kalbos modelio naudojimas specializuotose srityse gali būti nepakankamai optimalus dėl kalbos naudojimo ir žodyno skirtumų. In this paper, it is investigated whether an existing, generic language model for Swedish can be improved for the clinical domain through continued pretraining with clinical text.  Bendrieji ir konkrečioms sritims būdingi kalbos modeliai yra tiksliai pritaikyti ir vertinami pagal tris tipines klinikines NLP užduotis: i) saugomos sveikatos informacijos nustatymas, ii) ICD-10 diagnostikos kodų skyrimas i šleidimo santraukoms ir iii) sakinių lygio neapibrėžtumo prognozė. Rezultatai rodo, kad tęsiant priešmokyklinį mokymą vietoje esančiais duomenimis, visų trijų tolesnių užduočių rezultatai pagerėja, o tai rodo, kad yra potenciali papildoma nauda konkrečios srities kalbų modeliams klinikiniam NLP.', 'ml': 'പ്രത്യേകിച്ചൊരു പ്രത്യേകം താഴ്വരയുടെ ജോലി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ ഉപയോഗം NLP-ല്\u200d വിശാലമ ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനും പദവിഭാഷയിലും വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും കാരണം സാധാരണ ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതാണ്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള, സ്വീഡിന്റെ സാധാരണ ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നുണ്ടോ എന്ന് അന്വേഷിക്കുന സാധാരണ ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d മൂന്നു പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d NLP ജോലികളില്\u200d മൂന്ന് പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d നല്ല പരിഗണിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു: (i) സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട സുരക്ഷിതമായ വിവരങ്ങള അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ പെയ്യുന്നത് തുടര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. എല്ലാ മൂന്ന് താഴ്വരയുടെയും പ്രകടനത', 'mt': 'L-użu ta’ mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel, imfassla bir-reqqa biex iwettqu xogħol speċifiku downstream, sar mifrux fil-NLP. Madankollu, l-użu ta’ mudell ġeneriku tal-lingwa f’oqsma speċjalizzati jista’ jkun subottimali minħabba differenzi fl-użu tal-lingwa u l-vokabulari. F’dan id-dokument, huwa investigat jekk mudell lingwistiku ġeneriku eżistenti għall-Isvediż jistax jitjieb għad-dominju kliniku permezz ta’ taħriġ minn qabel kontinwu b’test kliniku. Il-mudelli lingwistiċi ġeneriċi u speċifiċi għad-dominju huma aġġustati u evalwati fuq tliet kompiti kliniċi rappreżentattivi tal-NLP: (i) l-identifikazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni protetta dwar is-saħħa, (ii) l-assenjazzjoni ta’ kodiċijiet tad-dijanjosi ICD-10 biex jitneħħew sommarji, u (iii) tbassir ta’ inċertezza fil-livell tas-sentenza. Ir-riżultati juru li t-taħriġ minn qabel kontinwu fuq id-dejta fid-dominju jwassal għal prestazzjoni mtejba fit-tliet kompiti downstream kollha, li jindikaw li hemm valur miżjud potenzjali ta’ mudelli lingwistiċi speċifiċi għad-dominju għal NLP klinika.', 'mn': 'Өнгөрсөн хэл загварын хэрэглээ, тодорхой доорх үйл ажиллагааг хийхэд тодорхойлогдсон, NLP-д өргөн болж байна. Гэхдээ хэл хэрэглэх болон сөз өгүүлбэрийн ялгаатай учраас ерөнхий хэл загварын загварыг ашиглах нь илүү эерэг байж болно. Энэ цаасан дээр Шведийн ерөнхий хэл загвар нь клиникийн хэлбэрээр үргэлжлүүлэхэд эмчилгээний текстэй хурдан сайжруулж болох эсэхийг судалж байна. Дэлхийн болон холбооны тодорхой хэл загварууд нь гурван төлөвлөгөөтэй эмчилгээний NLP даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврыг тодорхойлж байдаг: (i) хамгаалалтай эрүүл мэндийн мэдээллийг тодорхойлж, ii) ICD-10 диагностикийн кодыг жишээ цуглуулах, iii) өгүүлбэрийн хэмжээ Үүний үр дүнд хүрээлэн буй мэдээлэл дээр үргэлжлүүлэх нь клиник НLP-ын доторх хэл загварын нэмэгдсэн утга байгааг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Bruk av språk- modeller som er sett opp for å utføra eit spesifikke nedstrøm- oppgåve, er utvida i NLP. Bruk eit generelt språk- modell i spesialiserte domene kan imidlertid vera sub- optimal på grunn av ulike forskjeller i språk- bruk og ordboka. I denne papiret vert det undersøkt om eit eksisterande, generiske språk-modell for Sverige kan forbetrast for klinisk domenet gjennom kontinuerer pretraining med klinisk tekst. Den generiske og domenespesifikke språk-modellen er fint oppsett og evaluert på tre reprezentativ kliniske NLP-oppgåver: i) identifiserar beskyttet helsinformasjon, ii) tillegg ICD-10-diagnosikodar for å køyra samandrag, og iii) foregåve for usikkerhetsnivå. Resultatet viser at kontinueringsavtrykk på domenedata fører til forbetra utvikling på alle tre nedtrekkoppgåver, som tyder på at det finst ein potensielt lagt verdi av domenespesifikke språk-modeller for klinisk NLP.', 'pl': 'Stosowanie wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych, dostosowanych do wykonywania określonego zadania, stało się powszechne w NLP. Zastosowanie ogólnego modelu językowego w specjalistycznych dziedzinach może jednak być nieoptymalne ze względu na różnice w użyciu języka i słownictwie. W niniejszym artykule badano, czy istniejący, ogólny model języka szwedzkiego można ulepszyć dla dziedziny klinicznej poprzez ciągłe wstępne treningi tekstem klinicznym. Ogólne i specyficzne modele językowe są dostosowywane i oceniane pod kątem trzech reprezentatywnych zadań klinicznych NLP: (i) identyfikacji chronionych informacji zdrowotnych, (ii) przypisywania kodów diagnostycznych ICD-10 do streszczeń zwolnień oraz (iii) przewidywania niepewności na poziomie zdania. Wyniki pokazują, że ciągłe wstępne szkolenie danych wewnątrz domeny prowadzi do poprawy wydajności we wszystkich trzech dalszych zadaniach, co wskazuje na potencjalną wartość dodaną modeli językowych dla klinicznego NLP.', 'ro': 'Utilizarea modelelor lingvistice pre-instruite, reglate fin pentru a efectua o sarcină specifică în aval, a devenit răspândită în PNL. Cu toate acestea, utilizarea unui model lingvistic generic în domenii specializate poate fi suboptimă din cauza diferențelor în utilizarea limbii și vocabular. În această lucrare, este investigat dacă un model de limbă generică existent pentru suedeză poate fi îmbunătățit pentru domeniul clinic prin continuarea pregătirii cu text clinic. Modelele lingvistice generice și specifice domeniului sunt reglate fin și evaluate pe trei sarcini clinice reprezentative ale PNL: (i) identificarea informațiilor protejate privind sănătatea, (ii) atribuirea codurilor de diagnostic ICD-10 rezumatelor de descărcare și (iii) predicția incertitudinii la nivel de frază. Rezultatele arată că continuarea pregătirii datelor din domeniu duce la îmbunătățirea performanțelor pentru toate cele trei sarcini din aval, indicând faptul că există o potențială valoare adăugată a modelelor lingvistice specifice domeniului pentru PNL clinic.', 'sr': 'Korištenje pretreniranih jezičkih modela, fino ispravljenih za izvršavanje određenog zadataka u skloništu, postalo je široko šireno u NLP-u. Upotrebljenje generičnog jezičkog model a u specijalizovanim domenama, međutim, može biti podoptimalno zbog razlika u upotrebi jezika i rečenika. U ovom papiru istražuje se da li postojeći, generični jezički model za švedski može biti poboljšan za klinički domen kroz nastavku pretrenja kliničkim tekstom. Generički i domenički jezički modeli su ispravni i procjenjivani na tri reprezentativna klinička zadatka NLP-a: i) identifikacija zaštićenih zdravstvenih informacija, ii) određivanje kodova dijagnoze ICD-10 za ispuštanje sažetaka, i iii) predviđanje neodređenosti na razini rečenica. Rezultati pokazuju da nastavljanje pretkivanja podataka u domenu dovede do poboljšanja učinka na svih tri zadataka, ukazujući na to da postoji potencijalna dodana vrijednost jezičkih modela za klinički NLP-a.', 'so': 'Isu isticmaalka modellada afka hore, oo aad u sameynayso shaqo gaar ah oo hoos-dureer ah, waxay ku ballaadhan tahay NLP. Si kastaba ha ahaatee isticmaalka tusaale ahaan luqada caadiga ah ee goobaha gaarka ah waxaa suurtogal ah in ay ku jirto iskala bedelan isticmaalka luqada iyo luqada. Warqaddan waxaa lagu baarayaa in tusaale ahaan afka Iswidishka oo dabiiqada ah looga horumarin karo xarunta hooyada iyo dhallaanka marka lagu sii raadinayo qoraal dhaqaale. Tusaalada afka caadiga ah ee gudaha iyo deegaanka waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa oo lagu qiimeeyaa saddex shaqooyin oo wakiilka ah ee NLP: (i) aqoonsashada macluumaadka caafimaadka la ilaaliyey, (ii) u qaybsada codsiga cudurada diagnosnadda ee ICD-10 si uu u soo dejiyo summariyo, iyo (iii) wixii la soo sheegay heerka aan la hubin. Midhaha la soo jeedo waxay tusaysaa in lagu sii daabacay macluumaadka gudaha lagu soo daayay uu horumarinayo sameynta sameynta saddexda shaqooyin oo dhan ee webiga hoose ka socda, waxayna caddaynaysaa in qiimaha lagu daro qiimaha afka gaarka ah ee afka gudaha ee NLP.', 'sv': 'Användningen av förkränade språkmodeller, finjusterade för att utföra en viss nedströmsuppgift, har blivit utbredd inom NLP. Att använda en generisk språkmodell i specialiserade domäner kan dock vara suboptimalt på grund av skillnader i språkanvändning och ordförråd. I denna uppsats undersöks om en befintlig generisk språkmodell för svenska kan förbättras för den kliniska domänen genom fortsatt fortbildning med klinisk text. De generiska och domänspecifika språkmodellerna finjusteras och utvärderas på tre representativa kliniska NLP-uppgifter: (i) identifiera skyddad hälsoinformation, (ii) tilldela ICD-10 diagnoskoder till sammanfattningar av urladdning och (iii) förutsäga osäkerhet på meningsnivå. Resultaten visar att fortsatt fortbildning av in-domain data leder till förbättrad prestanda för alla tre nedströmsuppgifter, vilket indikerar att det finns ett potentiellt mervärde av domänspecifika språkmodeller för klinisk NLP.', 'ur': 'نڈرینڈ زبان مدل کا استعمال، ایک خاص لائنڈرینڈ کام کرنے کے لئے بہترین تنظیم کیا گیا ہے، NLP میں پھیلا گیا ہے۔ زبان استعمال اور لکھنے والی اختلاف کے باعث مختلف دومین میں ایک عمومی زبان مدل استعمال کرنا ممکن ہے. اس کاغذ میں اس کا تحقیق کیا جاتا ہے کہ سوئدی کے لئے ایک موجود، عمومی زبان موڈل کو کلینیکی ڈومین کے لئے بہتر کر سکتا ہے، کلینیکی ٹیکسٹ کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ تحقیق کرنے کے ذریعہ۔ جنریک اور ڈومین ویسی زبان کی مدل تین نمایشن کلینیکی NLP کے کاموں پر اچھی طرح تغییر کیا جاتا ہے: i) محفوظت سلامتی معلومات کی شناسایی کرتا ہے, (ii) ICD-10 ڈاگنیس کوڈ کا مقرر کیا جاتا ہے، اور (iii) sentence-level uncertainty prediction. نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ڈومین میں ڈیٹ پر پرٹرین ادھر رہی ہے تو تمام تین ڈونٹریم کے کاموں میں عملکرد بہتر ہوتی ہے، جو دکھاتے ہیں کہ کلینیکی NLP کے لئے ڈومین کے خاص زبان مدلکوں کا ایک امکانات زیادہ مقدار ہے۔', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ඩ් භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් වල භාවිතා කරන්න, විශේෂ විශේෂ පහත් වැඩ කරන්න, NLP වල විස්තර විසින් විස භාෂාව භාවිතා සහ භාෂාව භාවිතා සහ භාෂාවිතාවයේ විශේෂ ක්\u200dරමයක් තියෙන සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිතාවක් භාවිත මේ පත්තරේ ඒක පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ස්වීඩිෂ් වල සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා The generic and domain-discrete language Model are Fine-tuned and evaluted on three repositive climatic NLP Jobs: (i) ID-ing ආරක්ෂිත ආරක්ෂක තොරතුරු සඳහා සඳහා සඳහා ICD-10 Diagonais codes to discCharge summits, and (Ii) dictionary-level non-determinance forecast. ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ ඩෝමේන් දත්තේ තියෙන්නේ සියලුම වැඩේ තුනක් විශේෂ කරනවා කියලා', 'ta': 'முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரிகளின் பயன் Using a generic language model in specialized domains may, however, be sub-optimal due to differences in language use and vocabulary.  இந்த காக்கியத்தில், இது சோதிக்கப்படுகிறது, ஸ்வீடியனுக்கான ஒரு இருக்கும் பொதுவான மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி முன்னேற்றப்படுமா என்பத பொதுவான மற்றும் domain- குறிப்பிட்ட மொழி மாதிரிகள் மூன்று பிரதிநிதியாளர் NLP செயல்களில் நன்றாக துண்டிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் மதிப்பிடப்படுகிறது: (i) பாதுகாப்பான சுகாதாரச்  @ info: whatsthis', 'uz': 'Name Tafsilotlar uchun umumiy til modelidan foydalanish mumkin, ammo tilda foydalanish va vositalar boʻlishi uchun tub- optik boʻlishi mumkin. In this paper, it is investigated whether an existing, generic language model for Swedish can be improved for the clinical domain through continued pretraining with clinical text.  Umumiy va domen-specific tilning modellari uchta taʼminlovchi NLP vazifalarda yaxshi va qiymatlaydi: (i) муҳофизлик лозим маълумотларни аниқлаш, (ii) ҳужжатларни тақдим этиш учун ICD-10 diagnosis kodini yaratish va (iii) ҳужжат darajasi haqiqiqiyligini bajarish uchun kutilmadi. Natijalar, domen maʼlumotlarida davom etishni davom etishda uchta taʼminlovchi vazifalarga bajarishini bajaradi. Bu yerda, klinikal NLP uchun domen-specific tillar modellarining qiymatini qoʻshish mumkin.', 'vi': 'Việc sử dụng các mô hình ngôn ngữ sẵn sàng, chỉnh sửa cẩn thận để thực hiện một nhiệm vụ xuôi dòng cụ thể, đã phổ biến tại Njala. Tuy nhiên, sử dụng một mô hình ngôn ngữ chung trong lĩnh vực đặc biệt có thể không tối ưu bởi sự khác nhau trong ngôn ngữ và ngôn ngữ. Trong tờ giấy này, điều tra xem có thể cải thiện mô hình ngôn ngữ chung của Thụy Điển trong lĩnh vực lâm sàng bằng việc sản xuất trước với đoạn lâm sàng. Các mô hình ngôn ngữ chung và đặc trưng miền được chỉnh sửa cẩn thận và đánh giá dựa trên ba công việc đại biểu của ngôn ngữ NIP: Kết quả cho thấy việc tiếp tục sản xuất trước dữ liệu nội bộ dẫn đến một hiệu suất tốt hơn trong ba nhiệm vụ xuôi dòng, cho thấy có một giá trị cộng tiềm năng của mô hình ngôn ngữ cụ thể miền cho đài NLP lâm sàng.', 'bg': 'Използването на предварително обучени езикови модели, усъвършенствани за изпълнение на конкретна задача надолу по веригата, стана широко разпространено в НЛП. Използването на общ езиков модел в специализирани области обаче може да бъде подоптимално поради различията в използването на езика и речника. В настоящата статия се изследва дали съществуващ, генеричен езиков модел за шведски език може да бъде подобрен за клиничната област чрез продължаване на предобучение с клиничен текст. Генералните и специфичните за областта езикови модели са прецизни и оценени по три представителни клинични задачи за НЛП: (i) идентифициране на защитена здравна информация, (ii) определяне на диагностични кодове на МКД-10 за обобщенията от освобождаване от отговорност и (iii) прогнозиране на несигурността на ниво изречение. Резултатите показват, че продължителното предобучение на данни в областта води до подобрено представяне на трите задачи надолу по веригата, което показва, че има потенциална добавена стойност на специфичните за областта езикови модели за клинична НЛП.', 'da': 'Anvendelsen af foruddannede sprogmodeller, finjusteret til at udføre en bestemt downstream opgave, er blevet udbredt i NLP. Brug af en generisk sprogmodel på specialiserede domæner kan dog være suboptimal på grund af forskelle i sprogbrug og ordforråd. I denne artikel undersøges det, om en eksisterende generisk sprogmodel for svensk kan forbedres for det kliniske domæne gennem fortsat foruddannelse med klinisk tekst. De generiske og domænespecifikke sprogmodeller finjusteres og evalueres på tre repræsentative kliniske NLP-opgaver: (i) identificering af beskyttede sundhedsoplysninger, (ii) tildeling af ICD-10 diagnosekoder til udskrivningsresuméer og (iii) usikkerhedsforudsigelse på sætningsniveau. Resultaterne viser, at fortsat forudtræning af in-domain data fører til forbedret ydeevne på alle tre downstream opgaver, hvilket indikerer, at der er en potentiel merværdi af domænespecifikke sprogmodeller for klinisk NLP.', 'nl': 'Het gebruik van vooraf getrainde taalmodellen, verfijnd om een specifieke downstream taak uit te voeren, is wijdverbreid geworden in NLP. Het gebruik van een generiek taalmodel in gespecialiseerde domeinen kan echter suboptimaal zijn vanwege verschillen in taalgebruik en woordenschat. In dit artikel wordt onderzocht of een bestaand, generiek taalmodel voor Zweeds verbeterd kan worden voor het klinische domein door voortdurende pretraining met klinische tekst. De generieke en domeinspecifieke taalmodellen worden verfijnd en geëvalueerd op drie representatieve klinische NLP-taken: (i) het identificeren van beschermde gezondheidsinformatie, (ii) het toewijzen van ICD-10-diagnosecodes aan ontslagsamenvattingen, en (iii) onzekerheidsvoorspelling op zinsniveau. De resultaten tonen aan dat voortdurende pretraining op in-domain data leidt tot verbeterde prestaties op alle drie de downstream taken, wat aangeeft dat er een potentiële toegevoegde waarde is van domeinspecifieke taalmodellen voor klinische NLP.', 'de': 'Der Einsatz von vortrainierten Sprachmodellen, die auf eine bestimmte nachgelagerte Aufgabe abgestimmt sind, ist in NLP weit verbreitet. Die Verwendung eines generischen Sprachmodells in spezialisierten Domänen kann jedoch aufgrund von Unterschieden im Sprachgebrauch und Vokabular suboptimal sein. In dieser Arbeit wird untersucht, ob ein bestehendes, generisches Sprachmodell für Schwedisch durch kontinuierliche Vortraining mit klinischem Text für den klinischen Bereich verbessert werden kann. Die generischen und domänenspezifischen Sprachmodelle werden auf drei repräsentativen klinischen NLP-Aufgaben abgestimmt und bewertet: (i) Identifizierung geschützter Gesundheitsinformationen, (ii) Zuweisung von ICD-10-Diagnosecodes zu Entladungszusammenfassungen und (iii) Vorhersage von Unsicherheiten auf Satzebene. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass ein kontinuierliches Vortraining von In-Domain-Daten zu einer verbesserten Leistung bei allen drei nachgelagerten Aufgaben führt, was darauf hindeutet, dass domänenspezifische Sprachmodelle einen potenziellen Mehrwert für klinische NLP bieten.', 'hr': 'Korištenje pretkišenih jezičkih modela, fino ispravljenih za izvršavanje određenog donjeg zadatka, postalo je široko šireno u NLP-u. Međutim, korištenje generičkog jezičkog model a u specijaliziranim domenama može biti podoptimalno zbog razlika u upotrebi jezika i riječnika. U ovom papiru istražuje se da li postojeći, generični jezički model za švedski može biti poboljšan za klinički domet kroz nastavku pretkivanja kliničkim tekstom. Obični i domene specifični jezički modeli su ispravni i procjenjivani na tri reprezentativna klinička zadatka NLP-a: i) identifikacija zaštićenih zdravstvenih informacija, ii) određivanje kodova dijagnoze ICD-10 za ispuštanje sažetaka, i iii) predviđanje neodređenosti razine kazne. Rezultati pokazuju da nastavljanje pretkivanja podataka u domenu dovede do poboljšanja učinka na svih tri donjeg zadataka, ukazujući na to da postoji potencijalna dodana vrijednost jezičkih modela za klinički NLP-a specifičnih domena.', 'ko': 'NLP에서는 특정 다운스트림 임무를 수행하기 위해 미세 조정된 사전 훈련 언어 모델을 사용하는 것이 보편화되었다.그러나 언어 사용과 어휘의 차이로 인해 전문 분야에서 통용 언어 모델을 사용하는 것이 최우선일 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 지속적인 임상 텍스트 예훈련을 통해 기존의 스웨덴어 통용 언어 모델을 개선할 수 있는지를 연구했다.세 가지 대표적인 임상 NLP 임무 중 유니버설과 분야의 특정 언어 모델을 미세하게 조정하고 평가했다. (i) 보호된 건강 정보를 식별하고 (ii) 퇴원을 위해 ICD-10 진단 코드를 분배하고 (iii) 문장 수준의 불확실성 예측이다.그 결과 영역 내 데이터에 대한 지속적인 예훈련이 세 가지 하위 임무의 성능을 모두 향상시킬 수 있다는 것은 영역 특정 언어 모델이 임상 NLP에 잠재적인 부가가치가 있음을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'استفاده از مدلهای زبانی پیش ریخته شده، برای انجام یک کار خاص پایین پایین، در NLP گسترده شده است. با این وجود، استفاده از یک مدل زبان عمومی در دامنهای متخصص ممکن است به دلیل تفاوت در استفاده از زبان و واژه\u200cهای زبان زیر optimal باشد. در این کاغذ، تحقیق می\u200cشود که آیا یک مدل زبان معمولی برای سوئدی می\u200cتواند برای دامنه کلینیکی از طریق تحقیر کردن با متن کلینیکی در حال پیشرفت شود. مدلهای زبان ژنرال و دامین ویژه\u200cای بر سه وظیفه\u200cی کلینیک NLP معرفی و ارزیابی می\u200cشوند: i) مشخص اطلاعات سلامتی محافظت می\u200cکنند, (ii) مشخص کدهای تشخیص ICD-10 برای تحویل جمع\u200cها و (iii) پیش\u200cبینی بی\u200cمطمئنی سطح جمله\u200cها. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که ادامه\u200cگیری از داده\u200cهای دامنه\u200cی دامنه\u200cها به انجام\u200cدهنده\u200cی تمام سه کارهای پایین\u200cترین، بهتر می\u200cشود و نشان می\u200cدهد که ارزش اضافه\u200cای از مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای برای NLP کلینیک وجود دارد.', 'sw': 'Utumiaji wa mifano ya lugha iliyopigwa, kwa ujumla wa kutekeleza kazi maalum ya mito, umekuwa mkubwa katika NLP. Kwa kutumia muundo wa lugha ya kawaida katika maeneo maalumu, hata hivyo, unaweza kuwa na matumaini kwa sababu ya tofauti katika matumizi ya lugha na lugha. Katika karatasi hii, inachunguzwa kama muundo wa lugha ya kawaida kwa ajili ya Sweden unaweza kuboreshwa kwa ajili ya maeneo ya kliniki kwa njia ya kuendelea kujieleza kwa kutumia ujumbe wa kliniki. The generic and domain-specific language models are fine-tuned and evaluated on three representative clinical NLP tasks: (i) identifying protected health information, (ii) assigning ICD-10 diagnosis codes to discharge summaries, and (iii) sentence-level uncertainty prediction.  Matokeo yanaonyesha kwamba kuendelea kutengenezwa kwa takwimu za ndani inapelekea kuongezeka performance katika kazi zote tatu za mito ya chini, ikionyesha kuwa kuna uwezekano wa kuongeza thamani ya mifano maalum ya lugha za ndani kwa ajili ya NLP kliniki.', 'tr': "Öň ýalňyş dil nusgalarynyň ullanyşy, beýleki a şak täsirini ýerine ýetirmek üçin ajaýyp edildi, NLP'de ýaparaýar. Diller we sözleriň üýtgeşikleri üçin ýagdaý dil nusgasyny ullanyp biler. Bu kagyzda, Şwesiýa üçin bar, general dil nusgasy kliniki domenada kliniki metin bilen süýtgedip bilmeýändigini soradylar. Umumy we domena takyk dil nusgalary üç temel kliniki NLP buýrukynda dyýarlylýar we çözilýär: (i) gorkulýan saglyk maglumatyny tanyýar, (ii) ICD-10 dyýançylyk ködlerini sumatlary taýýarlamak üçin, we (iii) sözlem-derejesi gorkunçylygy önlemlerde. Netijenler domençe maglumatlary önlemek dowamynyň hemme üç a şak zadyň üstünde täsirleşmesini gowulaşdyrýandygyny görkezýär, kliniki NLP üçin domençe takyk dil modelleriniň eklenýän deň bardygyny görkezýär.", 'id': 'Penggunaan model bahasa yang dilatih sebelum dilatih, disesuaikan untuk melakukan tugas tertentu downstream, telah menjadi luas di NLP. Menggunakan model bahasa generik dalam domain khusus mungkin, bagaimanapun, menjadi sub-optimal karena perbedaan dalam penggunaan bahasa dan vocabulari. Dalam kertas ini, diselidiki apakah model bahasa yang ada, generik untuk Swedia dapat diperbaiki untuk domain klinik melalui melanjutkan pretraining dengan teks klinik. Model bahasa generik dan domain-spesifik dipersiapkan dan diavaluasi pada tiga tugas NLP klinik yang mewakili: (i) mengidentifikasi informasi kesehatan yang dilindungi, (ii) mengatur kode diagnosis ICD-10 untuk melepaskan ringkasan, dan (iii) prediksi ketidakpastian tingkat kalimat. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa melanjutkan perkelahian pada data dalam domain menyebabkan prestasi yang lebih baik pada tiga tugas turun, menunjukkan bahwa ada potensi nilai tambahan dari model bahasa domain-spesifik untuk NLP klinik.', 'af': "Name Die gebruik van 'n algemeen taal model in spesialiseerde domeine kan egter sub- optimal wees vanweë verskille in taal gebruik en woordeboek. In hierdie papier is dit ondersoek of 'n bestaande, generieke taal model vir Sweedse vir die kliniese domein verbeter kan word deur voortgaan voortreking met kliniese teks. Die generieke en domein-spesifieke taal modele is fyn-geïnstalleer en evalueer op drie reprezentante kliniese NLP-opdragte: i) beskermde gesondike inligting identifiseer, ii) ICD-10-diagnose-kode toewys om opsommings te uitlaai, en iii) sentence-vlak onbevestigheid voorskou. Die resultate vertoon dat voortdurende voortreking op in-domein data lei na verbeterde prestasie op alle drie onderstreem taak, aanduidelik dat daar 'n potensieele bygevoeg waarde van domein-spesifieke taal modele vir kliniese NLP is.", 'sq': 'Përdorimi i modeleve të gjuhës së parastërvitur, të rregulluara për të kryer një detyrë të veçantë poshtë rrjedhës, është bërë i përhapur gjerësisht në NLP. Përdorimi i një modeli gjeneral gjuhësh në fusha të specializuara, megjithatë, mund të jetë nënoptimal për shkak të dallimeve në përdorimin e gjuhës dhe fjalorin. Në këtë letër, hetohet nëse një model gjuhësh ekzistues gjeneral për suedezin mund të përmirësohet për domenin klinik nëpërmjet trajnimit të vazhdueshëm me tekstin klinik. Modelet gjenerike dhe specifike gjuhësh janë të përshtatshme dhe vlerësuar në tre detyra përfaqësuese të NLP-së: (i) identifikimi i informacionit të mbrojtur shëndetësor, (ii) caktimi i kodeve të diagnostikës ICD-10 për të shkarkuar përmbledhjet dhe (iii) parashikimi i pasigurisë në nivelin e dënimit. Rezultatet tregojnë se parastërvitja e vazhdueshme e të dhënave në domeni çon në përmirësimin e performancës në të tre detyrat poshtë, duke treguar se ka një vlerë të shtuar potenciale të modeleve gjuhësore specifike për domenin për NLP klinike.', 'am': 'የተጠቃሚ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች፣ የተለየ ውጤት አድራሻ ለመፈጸም ጥሩ፣ በNLP ውስጥ ስፋት ሆኖአል፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሞዴል በመጠቀም ግን በቋንቋ በተጠቃሚ እና የመዝገበኛ ቋንቋ በተለየ ልዩ ምክንያት መሠረት ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የስዊድን ቋንቋ ሞዴል ለኪሎኒካሌ ድሜን ማሻለል ይችላል፡፡ የውይይት እና ዲሜን-የተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች ሞዴላዎች በሦስት የፕሬዚዳንት ፕሮግራም ስራ ላይ የተጠቃሚ እና የተመሳሳይ:(i) የሚጠበቅ የጤና መረጃ ማግኘት (ii) የሚታወቅ የICD-10 ድምፅ ኮዶች ማሳየት እና (iii) የፍርድ-ደረጃ ግንኙነት የማይታወቅ ቅድሚያ እንዲያሳዩ ነው፡፡ ፍሬቶቹ በዲሞን ዳታ ላይ መዝገብ ሲዘጋጁ በሦስቱ ውኃ በሚፈስሱ ስራ ሁሉ ላይ የድምፅ ውጤት እንዲያሳድግ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Նախադասավորված լեզվի մոդելների օգտագործումը, բարձրացված հատուկ հետագա խնդիր կատարելու համար, դարձավ տարածված ՆԼՊ-ում: Այնուամենայնիվ, հատուկ ոլորտներում ընդհանուր լեզվի մոդելի օգտագործումը կարող է ենթաօպտիմալ լինել լեզվի օգտագործման և բառարանի տարբերությունների պատճառով: Այս թղթի մեջ ուսումնասիրում է, արդյոք շովեդի գոյություն ունեցող, ընդհանուր լեզվի մոդելը կարող է բարելավվել կլինիկական ոլորտում, շարունակելով կլինիկական տեքստով նախապատրաստվել: Սովորական և տիեզերական լեզվի մոդելները բարձրացված են և գնահատվում երեք ներկայացուցիչ կլինիկական ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքների վրա. i) պաշտպանված առողջապահության ինֆորմացիա հայտնաբերելու, i) ախտորոշության կոդի տրամադրելու համար համառոտագրություններ արտադրելու համար, և i)  Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ անընդհատ ներկայացված տվյալների նախադասությունը հանգեցնում է բարելավելու արդյունքներին բոլոր երեք հետագա խնդիրների համար, ինչը ցույց է տալիս, որ գոյություն ունի ներկայացված արժեքը բնագավառներում հատուկ լեզվի մոդե', 'az': 'NLP-də çox genişlənir. Dil istifadəsində və sözlərdə fərqli fərqlər üzündən müxtəlif domenalarda generiki dil modelini istifadə etmək mümkün ola bilər. Bu kağızda, İsveçə üçün mövcud, generiki dil modeli klinik domenası üçün daha yaxşılaşdırılır və klinik metinlər ilə sürəkləndirilir. Üstünlük və domain-specific dil modelləri üç temsilci klinik NLP i şində təmin edilir: i) qorunulmuş sağlığın məlumatlarını tanıyır; ii) ICD-10 diagnosis kodlarını təhrif etmək üçün təhrif edilir, və iii) cümlənin səviyyəsi təhlükəsizlik təhlükəsizlik. Sonuçlar, domenin məlumatlarında sürəklənmək sürəklənməsi, kliniki NLP üçün domenin müəyyən dil modellerinin mümkün qiyməti olduğunu göstərir.', 'bn': 'ভাষার মডেল ব্যবহার, নির্দিষ্ট একটি নির্দিষ্ট তথ্য প্রদর্শনের জন্য ভাষার মডেল, এনএলপিতে ব্যাপক হয়ে গেছে। বিশেষ ডোমেইনে একটি সাধারণ ভাষার মডেল ব্যবহার করে ভাষা ব্যবহার এবং শব্দভাণ্ডারের ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন এই কাগজটিতে এটি অনুসন্ধান করা হয়েছে যে সুইডিশের জন্য একটি বিদ্যমান, সাধারণ ভাষার মডেল কি ক্লিনিক্যাল ডোমেইনের জন্য উন্নতি পাওয়া যা সাধারণ এবং ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট ভাষার মডেল তিনটি প্রতিনিধি ক্লিনিক্যাল এনএলপি কাজের উপর ভালোভাবে পরিচিত এবং মূল্যায়ন করা হয়: (i) সুরক্ষিত স্বাস্থ্য তথ্য চিহ্নিত করা, (ii) সংক্ষেপে ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ডোমেইনের তথ্যের উপর বৃষ্টি পাওয়া যাচ্ছে তিনটি নিচের নিচের কাজে প্রভাব বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করা হয়েছে, যার ফলে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ক্লিনিক', 'cs': 'Používání předem trénovaných jazykových modelů, jemně vyladěných pro provádění konkrétních následných úkolů, se v NLP rozšířilo. Použití obecného jazykového modelu ve specializovaných doménách však může být suboptimální kvůli rozdílům v používání jazyka a slovní zásobě. V tomto článku je zkoumáno, zda existující generický jazykový model pro švédštinu lze zlepšit pro klinickou doménu pokračujícím předškolením s klinickým textem. Obecné a doménově specifické jazykové modely jsou doladěny a hodnoceny na třech reprezentativních klinických úkolech NLP: (i) identifikace chráněných zdravotních informací, (ii) přiřazení diagnózních kódů ICD-10 ke shrnutím absolvování a (iii) predikce nejistoty na úrovni věty. Výsledky ukazují, že pokračující předškolení dat v doméně vede ke zlepšení výkonu všech tří následných úkolů, což naznačuje, že existuje potenciální přidaná hodnota doménově specifických jazykových modelů pro klinickou NLP.', 'bs': 'Korištenje pretkivnih jezičkih modela, fino ispravljenih za izvršavanje određenog nedalekog zadatka, postalo je široko šireno u NLP-u. Međutim, korištenje generičkog jezičkog model a u specijaliziranim domenama može biti podoptimalno zbog razlika u upotrebi jezika i rečnika. U ovom papiru se istražuje da li postojeći, generični jezički model za švedski može biti poboljšan za klinički domet kroz nastavku pretkivanja kliničkim tekstom. Obični i domenički jezički modeli su ispravni i procjenjivani na tri predstavnika kliničkih zadataka NLP-a: i) identifikacija zaštićenih zdravstvenih informacija, ii) određivanje kodova dijagnoze ICD-10 za ispuštanje sažetaka, i iii) predviđanje nejasnosti na razini kazne. Rezultati pokazuju da nastavljanje pretkivanja podataka u domenu dovede do poboljšanja učinka na svih tri zadataka u donjem nivou, ukazujući na to da postoji potencijalna dodana vrijednost jezičkih modela za klinički NLP-a.', 'ca': "L'ús de models de llenguatge pré-instruits, ajustats per a fer una tasca específica a avall, s'ha generalitzat a NLP. Però utilitzar un model de llenguatge genèric en dominys especialitzats pot ser sub-optimal degut a diferències en l'ús de llenguatges i vocabulari. In this paper, it is investigated whether an existing, generic language model for Swedish can be improved for the clinical domain through continued pretraining with clinical text.  Els models de llenguatge genèrics i específics per domini s'ajusten i s'evaluen en tres tasques clíniques representatives de la NLP: (i) identificar informació sanitària protegida, (ii) atribuir codis de diagnòstic ICD-10 a descarregar resumes, i (iii) predir incertituds en nivell de frases. Els resultats mostren que la continuació de la pré-formació de dades en domini porta a millorar el rendiment de totes les tres tasques avall, indicant que hi ha un potencial valor afegit de models de llenguatge específics per domini per a NLP clínica.", 'et': 'NLP-s on laialt levinud eelõpetatud keelemudelite kasutamine, mis on täpselt häälestatud konkreetse järgmise etapi ülesande täitmiseks. Üldise keelemudeli kasutamine spetsialiseeritud valdkondades võib siiski olla ebaoptimaalne keelekasutuse ja sõnavara erinevuste tõttu. Käesolevas töös uuritakse, kas olemasolevat rootsi keele üldist mudelit saab kliinilises valdkonnas täiustada kliinilise teksti jätkuva eelõppe abil. Üldisi ja valdkonnapõhiseid keelemudeleid täpsustatakse ja hinnatakse kolme tüüpilise kliinilise uue õppekava ülesande alusel: i) kaitstud terviseteabe kindlakstegemine, ii) vabastamise kokkuvõtetele ICD-10 diagnostikakoodide määramine ja iii) lausetaseme määramatuse prognoosimine. Tulemused näitavad, et valdkonnasiseste andmete jätkuv eelõpetamine toob kaasa kõigi kolme järgmise etapi ülesande tulemuslikkuse paranemise, mis näitab, et kliinilise uue õppekava valdkonnaspetsiifilistel keelemudelitel on võimalik lisandväärtus.', 'fi': 'NLP:ssä on laajalle levinnyt esikoulutettujen kielimallien käyttö, joka on hienosäädetty tietyn loppupään tehtävän suorittamiseksi. Yleisen kielimallin käyttäminen erikoisaloilla voi kuitenkin olla epäoptimaalista kielten käytön ja sanaston erojen vuoksi. Tässä artikkelissa tutkitaan, voidaanko olemassa olevaa, geneeristä ruotsin kielen mallia parantaa kliinisellä alalla jatkamalla esikoulutusta kliinisellä tekstillä. Yleisiä ja toimialueekohtaisia kielimalleja hiotaan ja arvioidaan kolmessa kliinisessä NLP-tehtävässä: (i) suojatun terveystiedon tunnistaminen, (ii) ICD-10 diagnostiikkakoodien antaminen vastuuvapauden yhteenvetoihin ja (iii) lausetason epävarmuuden ennustaminen. Tulokset osoittavat, että verkkotunnusten tietojen jatkuva esikoulutus parantaa suorituskykyä kaikissa kolmessa jatkovaiheen tehtävässä, mikä osoittaa, että verkkotunnuskohtaisten kielimallien mahdollinen lisäarvo kliinisessä NLP:ssä on.', 'jv': 'Ngawe ngubah model sing paling kelangan bangsa, akeh-tau nggawe gerakan kelangan sing dibutuhe, dumadhi iki ning NLP. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepul iki, dadi nyongsusi kapan kelas kuwi, padha kelas nggawe ngubah ingkang Suwedhi. The generic and domain The output show that continue presining on in-domain data puts to advanced output on all 3 downtream tasks, pointing that there is a likely additional value of domain-special language modes for clicking NLP.', 'sk': 'Uporaba predtreniranih jezikovnih modelov, natančno prilagojenih za izvajanje določene naloge, je postala razširjena v NLP. Uporaba generičnega jezikovnega modela v specializiranih področjih pa lahko ni optimalna zaradi razlik v uporabi jezika in besedišču. V prispevku raziskujemo, ali je mogoče obstoječi generični jezikovni model za švedščino izboljšati za klinično področje z nadaljnjim predusposabljanjem s kliničnim besedilom. Splošni in domensko specifični jezikovni modeli so natančno prilagojeni in ocenjeni na podlagi treh reprezentativnih kliničnih nalog NLP: (i) opredelitev zaščitenih zdravstvenih informacij, (ii) dodelitev diagnostičnih kod ICD-10 povzetkom izpusta in (iii) napoved negotovosti na ravni stavka. Rezultati kažejo, da nadaljnje predusposabljanje na področju podatkov vodi k izboljšanju učinkovitosti pri vseh treh nadaljnjih nalogah, kar kaže, da obstaja potencialna dodana vrednost domenskih jezikovnih modelov za klinično NLP.', 'he': 'השימוש במודלים שפות מתאמנים מראש, מתאימים על מנת לבצע משימה מתקדמת מסוימת, הפך להתפשט רחב ב-NLP. Using a generic language model in specialized domains may, however, be sub-optimal due to differences in language use and vocabulary.  בעיתון הזה, חוקרים אם מודל שפה קיים, גנרלי לשוודית יכול להשתפר עבור התחום הקליני באמצעות שימוש מחדש עם טקסט קליני. דוגמני השפה הגנריים ומסופרים לתחום מתאימים ומעריכים בשלושה משימות קליניות של NLP: (i) זיהוי מידע בריאות מוגן, (ii) להסגיר קודים אבחנה ICD-10 כדי לשחרר סדרות, ולiii) צפוי אי-בטוחות ברמה המשפטים. The results show that continued pretraining on in-domain data leads to improved performance on all three downstream tasks, indicating that there is a potential added value of domain-specific language models for clinical NLP.', 'ha': "Yi amfani da misãlai na zaman harshen, mai kyau-tuned ga tafiyar da wani aikin da aka ƙayyade dimitam, ya kasance mai faɗa ɗawa cikin NLP. Yi amfani da wani misali na harshe na ɗabi'a cikin wurãre masu ƙayyade, amma, za'a iya zama sub-Optical kwamfyuta don a sãɓa wa difyinin amfani da harshen da tsarin. Yana tambaya cikin wannan takardan, ko an ƙara wata misãlin harshen mai zaman zuwa Iswidishki ko an canza shi a kyautata wa Domin da aka ƙayyade shi kafin. Motolin harshen da aka ƙayyade bakwai da ke gyãra kuma an ƙaddara su a kan aikin nan nan nan na rubutun na-NLP: (i) mai gane tsaron maganar afya, (ii) mai gaura kodi na ICD-10 ga sigogin da za'a zartar da ƙarami, da kuma (i) wani abu na fassarar-bango da ba'a sani ba. Mataimakin ta nuna cewa ana daɗa ɗe mutane a cikin-Domen, yana ƙara mafiya performance a kan duk aikin nan uku na ƙarami, kuma yana nũna cewa there ana ƙara kimar da aka ƙayyade misãlai na-cikin-harshen wa NLP na ƙayyade.", 'bo': 'སྔོན་པ་བཟོ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་ལག་སྟར་བ། དེ་ནི་ཉེ་འཁོར་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ཅིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཅན་གྱི་domein་ནང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་རྐྱེན་གྱིས འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གཞི་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཡིན་ནའང་སྒྲུང་དང་མཉམ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་མིན་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ The generic and domain-specific language models are fine-tuned and evaluated on three representative clinical NLP tasks: (i) identifying protected health information, (ii) assigning ICD-10 diagnosis codes to discharge summaries, and (iii) sentence-level uncertainty prediction. The results show that continued pretraining on in-domain data leads to improved performance on all three downstream tasks, indicating that there is a potential added value of domain-specific language models for clinical NLP.'}
{'en': 'Frustration Level Annotation in Latvian Tweets with Non-Lexical Means of Expression', 'es': 'Anotación de nivel de frustración en tuits letones con medios de expresión no léxicos', 'fr': "Annotation du niveau de frustration dans les tweets lettons avec des moyens d'expression non lexicaux", 'ar': 'التعليق التوضيحي لمستوى الإحباط في التغريدات اللاتفية بوسائل غير معجمية للتعبير', 'pt': 'Anotação de nível de frustração em tweets letões com meios de expressão não lexicais', 'ja': 'ラトビア語のツイートにおける非言語的な表現手段による挫折レベルの注釈', 'hi': 'अभिव्यक्ति के गैर-लेक्सिकल साधनों के साथ लातवियाई ट्वीट्स में निराशा स्तर एनोटेशन', 'zh': '拉脱维亚推文挫折感水平注非词汇表达方式', 'ru': 'Аннотация уровня разочарования в латвийских твитах с нелексическими средствами выражения', 'ga': 'Anótáil ar an Leibhéal Frustrachais i dTweetanna na Laitvia le Meáin Léirithe Neamhfhoclóra', 'hu': 'Frusztrációs szintű megjegyzés lett tweetekben nem lexikai kifejezési eszközökkel', 'el': 'Παρατηρήσεις επιπέδου απογοήτευσης στα λεττονικά με μη Λεξικά μέσα έκφρασης', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Annotazione del livello di frustrazione in tweet lettoni con mezzi di espressione non lessicali', 'kk': 'Латвиялық tweets- тізбектерінде лексикалық емес өрнектің орташасынан жаңарту деңгейі', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d അല്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകളുമായി ലാത്വിയന്\u200d ടൂട്ടികളിലെ ഫ്രൂട്രേഷന്\u200d നില അറിയിപ്പുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Annotazzjoni tal-Livell ta’ Frustrazzjoni fit-Tweets Latvjani b’Mezzi ta’ Espressjoni Mhux Lessiċi', 'mn': 'Латвийн tweets-д жимс хэмжээний хэмжээний нээлт', 'lt': 'Fraustracijos lygio anotacija Latvijos Tweetuose, kuriuose vartojamos ne leksinės išraiškos priemonės', 'no': 'Frustrasjonsnivå- notasjon i latinske tweeter med ikkje- leksiske uttrykk', 'mk': 'Анотација на нивото на фрустрација на латовски твитови со нелексикални средства за изразување', 'ms': 'Annotasi Aras Frustrasi dalam Tweets Latvia dengan Means Non-Lexical of Expression', 'pl': 'Annotacja poziomu frustracji w łotewskich tweetach z nieleksykalnymi środkami wyrażenia', 'sr': 'Annotacija nivoa frustracije na latinskim tweetima sa neleksičkim sredstvima izražavanja', 'ro': 'Adnotare la nivelul de frustrare în Tweeturi letone cu mijloace de exprimare non-lexicale', 'so': 'Frustration Level Annotation in Latvian Tweets with Non-Lexical Means of expression', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Notering på frustrationsnivå i lettiska tweets med icke-Lexiska uttrycksmedel', 'ta': 'Frustration Level Annotation in Latvian Tweets with Non-Lexical Means of Expression', 'ur': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thông báo cấp nước hoa trên người Latvia với các phương pháp phản xạ khác nhau', 'uz': 'Name', 'hr': 'Annotacija nivoa plodova na latinskim tweetima s neleksičkim sredstvima izražavanja', 'nl': 'Annotatie op frustratieniveau in Letse Tweets met niet-Lexicale uitdrukkingsmiddelen', 'da': 'Anmærkning af frustrationsniveau i lettiske tweets med ikke-Lexiske udtryksmidler', 'bg': 'Анотация на нивото на разочарование в латвийски туитове с нелексични изразни средства', 'de': 'Frustrationsebene Annotation in lettischen Tweets mit nicht-Lexikalen Ausdrucksmitteln', 'ko': '라트비아 추문에서 비어휘 표현 방식의 낙담 정도 주석', 'id': 'Annotasi Tingkat Frustrasi dalam Tweets Latvia dengan Means Non-Lexical of Expression', 'fa': 'اظهار سطح میوه گیاهی در تویتهای لاتیویی با وسیله\u200cهای غیر سکسیکی از اظهار', 'sw': 'Tamko la kiwango cha Kulima katika twita za Kilatvia kwa Wasio na Wasio wa Kilexico', 'tr': 'Ýetmäniň derejesi Ýagtylamak', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Anotacioni i nivelit të frustrimit në tweetet letonisht me mjete jo-leksike shprehjeje', 'am': 'የፍሬት ደረጃ Annotation in Latvian Tweets with Non-Lexical Means of Expression', 'hy': 'Frustration Level Annotation in Latvian Tweets with Non-Lexical Means of Expression', 'bn': 'ল্যাটভিয়ান টুইটারে ফসট্রেশন স্তরের ঘোষণা', 'az': "Laxtiyal캼 Tweets'l톛rd톛 칐l칞칲s칲 칐l칞칲s칲 olmayan 캻fad톛 Ortamlar캼 il톛 Frustration Level Annotation", 'bs': 'Annotacija nivoa frustracije na latinskim tweetima sa neleksičkim sredstvima izražavanja', 'ca': "Anotació del nivell de frustració en tuits lettons amb mitjans d'expressió no Lexics", 'cs': 'Anotace úrovně frustrace v lotyšských tweetech s nelexiálními výrazovými prostředky', 'et': 'Frustratsioonitaseme annotatsioon läti tweetides mittekeksiliste väljendusvahenditega', 'fi': 'Turhautumistason huomautus latvialaisissa tweeteissä, joissa on ei-leksikoisia ilmaisuvälineitä', 'sk': 'Anotacija ravni frustracije v latvijskih tweetih z neleksičnimi izraznimi sredstvi', 'he': 'ציון רמת התעללות בטוויטים לטובניים עם אמצעי הביטוי לא לקסיים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'འོད་མུ་ཚོའི་དབྱིབས་འགའ་སྡུད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་བསྐྲུན་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ།', 'jv': 'undo-type'}
{'en': 'We present a neural-network-driven model for annotating frustration intensity in customer support tweets, based on representing tweet texts using a bag-of-words encoding after processing with subword segmentation together with non-lexical features. The model was evaluated on tweets in English and Latvian languages, focusing on aspects beyond the pure bag-of-words representations used in previous research. The experimental results show that the model can be successfully applied for texts in a non-English language, and that adding non-lexical features to tweet representations significantly improves performance, while subword segmentation has a moderate but positive effect on model accuracy. Our code and training data are publicly available.', 'ar': 'نقدم نموذجًا مدفوعًا بالشبكة العصبية للتعليق على كثافة الإحباط في تغريدات دعم العملاء ، استنادًا إلى تمثيل نصوص التغريدات باستخدام ترميز كيس من الكلمات بعد المعالجة باستخدام تجزئة الكلمات الفرعية جنبًا إلى جنب مع الميزات غير المعجمية. تم تقييم النموذج على التغريدات باللغتين الإنجليزية واللاتفية ، مع التركيز على جوانب تتجاوز تمثيلات كيس الكلمات الخالصة المستخدمة في البحث السابق. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أنه يمكن تطبيق النموذج بنجاح على النصوص بلغة غير الإنجليزية ، وأن إضافة ميزات غير معجمية لتمثيلات التغريدات يؤدي إلى تحسين الأداء بشكل كبير ، في حين أن تقسيم الكلمات الفرعية له تأثير معتدل ولكنه إيجابي على دقة النموذج. كودنا وبيانات التدريب متاحة للجمهور.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um modelo orientado por rede neural para anotar a intensidade da frustração em tweets de suporte ao cliente, baseado na representação de textos de tweets usando uma codificação bag-of-words após o processamento com segmentação de subpalavras juntamente com recursos não lexicais. O modelo foi avaliado em tweets nos idiomas inglês e letão, focando em aspectos além das representações puras de bag-of-words usadas em pesquisas anteriores. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o modelo pode ser aplicado com sucesso para textos em um idioma diferente do inglês e que adicionar recursos não lexicais às representações de tweet melhora significativamente o desempenho, enquanto a segmentação de subpalavras tem um efeito moderado, mas positivo, na precisão do modelo. Nosso código e dados de treinamento estão disponíveis publicamente.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un modèle piloté par un réseau neuronal pour annoter l'intensité de la frustration dans les tweets de support client, basé sur la représentation des textes de tweets à l'aide d'un encodage de sac de mots après traitement avec segmentation de sous-mots avec des fonctionnalités non lexicales. Le modèle a été évalué sur des tweets en anglais et en letton, en se concentrant sur des aspects allant au-delà des simples représentations en sac de mots utilisées dans les recherches précédentes. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que le modèle peut être appliqué avec succès à des textes dans une langue autre que l'anglais, et que l'ajout de caractéristiques non lexicales aux représentations de tweets améliore considérablement les performances, tandis que la segmentation des sous-mots a un effet modéré mais positif sur la précision du modèle. Notre code et nos données de formation sont accessibles au public.", 'es': 'Presentamos un modelo basado en redes neuronales para anotar la intensidad de la frustración en los tuits de atención al cliente, basado en la representación de textos de tuits mediante una codificación de bolsa de palabras después de procesarlos con segmentación de subpalabras junto con funciones no léxicas. El modelo se evaluó en tuits en inglés y letón, centrándose en aspectos más allá de las representaciones puras de bolsas de palabras utilizadas en investigaciones anteriores. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el modelo se puede aplicar con éxito para textos en un idioma que no sea inglés y que agregar características no léxicas a las representaciones de tuits mejora significativamente el rendimiento, mientras que la segmentación de subpalabras tiene un efecto moderado pero positivo en la precisión del modelo. Nuestro código y nuestros datos de entrenamiento están a disposición del público.', 'ja': '私たちは、サブワードセグメンテーションと非フレキシカル機能を組み合わせて処理した後に符号化された単語袋を使用してツイートテキストを表現することに基づいて、カスタマーサポートのツイートにフラストレーション強度をアノテーションするためのニューラルネットワークドリブンモデルを提示します。このモデルは、英語とラトビア語のツイートで評価され、これまでの研究で使用された純粋な単語のバッグ表現を超えた側面に焦点が当てられた。実験結果は、非英語言語のテキストにモデルをうまく適用でき、ツイート表現に非フレキシカルな機能を追加するとパフォーマンスが大幅に向上することを示していますが、サブワードセグメンテーションはモデルの精度に中程度ながらプラスの効果があります。当社のコードとトレーニングデータは一般に公開されています。', 'zh': '设一神经网络驱动之体,以注客户支推文之挫强,盖处理子词分非词汇特徵而用词袋编码以表文本。 英语与拉脱维亚语推文,重存纯词外。 实验结果表明可以成功于非英语,推文可以成非词汇可以显能,而子词分对模型准确性有度而极其化。 吾代码训练数明矣。', 'ru': 'Представляем нейросетевую модель для аннотирования интенсивности разочарования в твитах поддержки клиентов, основанную на представлении твитовых текстов с использованием кодировки bag-of-words после обработки с сегментацией подслова вместе с нелексическими признаками. Модель оценивалась на основе твитов на английском и латвийском языках с акцентом на аспектах, выходящих за рамки чистого представления в виде мешка слов, использовавшегося в предыдущих исследованиях. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что модель может быть успешно применена для текстов на неанглийском языке, и что добавление нелексических признаков в твит представления значительно улучшает производительность, в то время как сегментация подслова оказывает умеренное, но положительное влияние на точность модели. Наш код и обучающие данные являются общедоступными.', 'hi': 'हम ग्राहक सहायता ट्वीट्स में हताशा की तीव्रता को एनोटेट करने के लिए एक तंत्रिका-नेटवर्क-संचालित मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो गैर-लेक्सिकल विशेषताओं के साथ सबवर्ड विभाजन के साथ प्रसंस्करण के बाद बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड्स एन्कोडिंग का उपयोग करके ट्वीट ग्रंथों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने पर आधारित है। मॉडल का मूल्यांकन अंग्रेजी और लातवियाई भाषाओं में ट्वीट्स पर किया गया था, जो पिछले शोध में उपयोग किए जाने वाले शुद्ध बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड्स प्रतिनिधित्व से परे पहलुओं पर ध्यान केंद्रित करता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि मॉडल को गैर-अंग्रेजी भाषा में ग्रंथों के लिए सफलतापूर्वक लागू किया जा सकता है, और यह कि ट्वीट अभ्यावेदन में गैर-लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं को जोड़ने से प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार होता है, जबकि सबवर्ड विभाजन का मॉडल सटीकता पर मध्यम लेकिन सकारात्मक प्रभाव पड़ता है। हमारे कोड और प्रशिक्षण डेटा सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair múnla néar-tiomáinte líonra chun déine frustrachas a nótáil i tweets tacaíochta custaiméirí, bunaithe ar ionadaíocht a dhéanamh ar théacsanna tweet ag baint úsáide as mála-de-focail ionchódú tar éis próiseála le deighilt fofhocail mar aon le gnéithe neamhfhoclóra. Rinneadh measúnú ar an tsamhail ar thíteanna i mBéarla agus i dteangacha Laitvis, ag díriú ar ghnéithe lasmuigh de na hionadaíochtaí fíor-mhála focal a úsáideadh i dtaighde roimhe seo. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha gur féidir an tsamhail a chur i bhfeidhm go rathúil ar théacsanna i dteanga neamh-Bhéarla, agus go bhfeabhsaítear feidhmíocht go suntasach trí ghnéithe neamhfhoclóra a chur le huiríll tweet, agus tá éifeacht measartha ach dearfach ag deighilt fofhocail ar chruinneas múnla. Tá ár gcód agus ár sonraí oiliúna ar fáil go poiblí.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მივიღეთ ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელს, რომელიც კლიენტების მხარდაჭერების ტრესტრაციის ინტენსტივის მონაცემულებაში, რომელიც გამოყენებულიან ტექსტის გამოყენებაზე, რომელიც კონტრაციის კონტრაციის კონ მოდელის შესახებ ინგლისური და ლატვიანური ენების ტვირტებზე გაუმუშავებულია, რომელიც წინა სწორედ გამოყენებული სიტყვების გამოსახულებებისთვის არსებულია. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი ჩვენებს, რომ მოდელის შესაძლებელად ტექსტის შესაძლებლობა ანგლისური ენაში, და რომელიც არ-ლექსიკალური შესაძლებლობების დამატება გამოსახულებლად მნიშვნელოვანია გამოსახულება, როცა სუბ ნაქთრვ კჲეთ თ რპვნთნჟკთ ოჲეაპკთ ჟა ოსბლთფნჲ ეჲჟრარყფნთ.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο που βασίζεται σε νευρωνικό δίκτυο για την παρατήρηση έντασης απογοήτευσης στα tweets υποστήριξης πελατών, βασισμένο στην αναπαράσταση κειμένων tweets χρησιμοποιώντας μια τσάντα λέξεων κωδικοποίηση μετά την επεξεργασία με τμηματοποίηση υπολέξεων μαζί με μη λεξικά χαρακτηριστικά. Το μοντέλο αξιολογήθηκε σε tweets στην αγγλική και τη λετονική γλώσσα, εστιάζοντας σε πτυχές πέρα από τις καθαρές αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων που χρησιμοποιήθηκαν στην προηγούμενη έρευνα. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί επιτυχώς σε κείμενα σε μη αγγλική γλώσσα και ότι η προσθήκη μη λεξικών χαρακτηριστικών στις αναπαραστάσεις βελτιώνει σημαντικά την απόδοση, ενώ η κατακερματισμός των λέξεων έχει μέτρια αλλά θετική επίδραση στην ακρίβεια του μοντέλου. Ο κώδικας και τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης μας είναι διαθέσιμα στο κοινό.', 'hu': 'Egy neurális hálózatvezérelt modellt mutatunk be az ügyfélszolgálati tweetekben a frusztráció intenzitásának jegyzetelésére, amely a tweet szövegek ábrázolásán alapul, egy zsák-of-word kódolással történő feldolgozás után alszó szegmentációval és nem lexikális funkciókkal együtt. A modellt angol és lett nyelvű tweeteken értékeltük, a korábbi kutatások során használt tiszta szózsák ábrázolásokon túli aspektusokra összpontosítva. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a modell sikeresen alkalmazható nem angol nyelvű szövegekre, és hogy a nem lexikális funkciók hozzáadása a tweet reprezentációkhoz jelentősen javítja a teljesítményt, míg az alszó szegmentáció mérsékelt, de pozitív hatással van a modell pontosságára. Kódunk és képzési adataink nyilvánosan hozzáférhetők.', 'kk': 'Біз клиенттердің tweets қолдауындағы фрастрациялық теңдігін белгілеу үшін невралды желінің бағытталған үлгісін таңдаймыз. Твиттер мәтіндерін сөздердің кодтамасын өзгертіп, субсөздердің сегментациясын бірге лексикалық Бұл үлгі ағылшын және Латвиян тілдерінде теңеттер бойынша бағалады. Алдыңғы зерттеулерде қолданылатын таза сөздердің артындағы аспектеріне көздейтін. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер үлгісін ағылшын тілі емес мәтіндер үшін сәтті қолдануға болады, және тейтету үшін лексикалық емес мүмкіндіктерді қосу үшін әсеріктерді өзгертеді, бірақ субсөздің сегментациясы үлгісін Біздің кодымыз мен оқыту деректеріміз көпшілікті қол жеткізеді.', 'it': "Presentiamo un modello basato sulla rete neurale per annotare l'intensità della frustrazione nei tweet dell'assistenza clienti, basato sulla rappresentazione dei testi dei tweet utilizzando una codifica bag-of-words dopo l'elaborazione con segmentazione delle subparole insieme a caratteristiche non lessicali. Il modello è stato valutato su tweet in lingua inglese e lettone, concentrandosi su aspetti al di là delle semplici rappresentazioni bag-of-words utilizzate nella ricerca precedente. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il modello può essere applicato con successo per i testi in una lingua non inglese e che l'aggiunta di caratteristiche non lessicali alle rappresentazioni dei tweet migliora significativamente le prestazioni, mentre la segmentazione delle subparole ha un effetto moderato ma positivo sulla precisione del modello. Il nostro codice e i dati di formazione sono disponibili pubblicamente.", 'lt': 'Mes pristatome nerviniu tinklu pagrįstą model į, skirtą užfiksuoti nusivylimo intensyvumą klientų rėmimo tweetuose, grindžiamą tweeto tekstų pateikimu naudojant žodžių maišelį koduojant po apdorojimo subžodžių segmentacija kartu su nekleksiniais požymiais. Šis modelis buvo vertinamas tweetuojant anglų ir latvių kalbomis, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant aspektams, kurie nėra susiję su ankstesniuose tyrimuose naudojamais grynaisiais žodžių maišeliais. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad model į galima sėkmingai taikyti tekstams ne anglų kalba, ir kad neleksinių savybių įtraukimas į tweeto paveikslus gerokai pagerina rezultatus, o subžodžių segmentavimas daro vidutinį, bet teigiamą poveikį modelio tikslumui. Our code and training data are publicly available.', 'mk': 'Презентираме модел управуван со нервна мрежа за анотирање на интензитетот на фрустрација на твитовите за поддршка на клиентите, базиран на претставување на текстите на твитовите со користење на кодирање на торба со зборови по обработувањето со сегментација на подзборовите заедно со нелексички каракт Моделот беше проценет на твитови на англиски и латвиски јазик, фокусирајќи се на аспекти надвор од чистите репрезентации кои се користат во претходното истражување. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека моделот може да биде успешно аплициран за текстите на неанглиски јазик и дека додавањето нелексички карактеристики на претставувањата на Твитер значително ја подобрува резултатот, додека сегментацијата на подзборовите има умерен, но позитивен ефект на пре Нашиот код и податоците за обука се јавно достапни.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan model pemacu rangkaian saraf untuk anotasi intensiti frustrasi dalam tweet sokongan pelanggan, berdasarkan mewakili teks tweet menggunakan pengekodan beg-perkataan selepas memproses dengan segmen subperkataan bersama-sama dengan ciri-ciri bukan-leksikal. Model ini diteliti pada tweet dalam bahasa Inggeris dan Latvia, fokus pada aspek di luar perwakilan beg-perkataan murni yang digunakan dalam kajian terdahulu. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model boleh berjaya dilaksanakan untuk teks dalam bahasa bukan bahasa Inggeris, dan bahawa menambah ciri-ciri bukan-leksikal kepada perwakilan tweet meningkatkan prestasi secara signifikan, sementara segmen subkata mempunyai kesan sederhana tetapi positif pada ketepatan model. Kod dan data latihan kita tersedia secara awam.', 'ml': 'കസ്റ്റമറില്\u200d നിരാശപ്രേരിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d  മോഡല്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും ലാത്വിയന്\u200d ഭാഷകളിലും ടൂട്ടുകളിലും പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെട്ടു. മുമ്പ് പഠനത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ശുദ്ധവാക് പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് അല്ലാത്ത പദാവലികള്\u200dക്ക് മോഡല്\u200d വിജയകരമായി പ്രയോഗിക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. ടൂട്ടില്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക നമ്മുടെ കോഡും പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങളും പ്രത്യേകം ലഭ്യമാണ്.', 'mt': 'We present a neural-network-driven model for annotating frustration intensity in customer support tweets, based on representing tweet texts using a bag-of-words encoding after processing with subword segmentation together with non-lexical features.  Il-mudell ġie evalwat fuq tweets bl-Ingliż u bil-Latvjan, b’enfasi fuq aspetti lil hinn mir-rappreżentazzjonijiet puri tal-borża tal-kliem użati fir-riċerka preċedenti. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-mudell jista’ jiġi applikat b’suċċess għat-testi f’lingwa mhux Ingliża, u li ż-żieda ta’ karatteristiċi mhux lexiċi mar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-tweet ittejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni, filwaqt li s-segmentazzjoni tas-sottokliem għandha effett moderat iżda pożittiv fuq il-preċiżjoni tal-mudell. Il-kodiċi u d-dejta tagħna dwar it-taħriġ huma disponibbli għall-pubbliku.', 'mn': 'Бид хэрэглэгчийн тусламжтайгаар бухимдалтын хүчирхийллийг анзааруулахын тулд мэдрэлийн сүлжээний хөдөлгөөнтэй загварыг илэрхийлдэг. Твиттэй текстүүдийг илэрхийлдэг нь суб-үг хэмжээний хэмжээний дараа хэмжээний хэмжээний код Энэ загвар нь Англи, Латвийн хэл дээр бичлэг дээр дүгнэсэн. Өмнөх судалгаанд хэрэглэгдсэн цэвэр үгний илэрхийлэл дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлсэн. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд загвар Англи хэл биш хэл дээр амжилттай хэрэглэгдэж болох боломжтой болж байна. Твитт илэрхийллийн бус хэлбэрүүдийг нэмэх нь үйл ажиллагааг үнэхээр сайжруулж чадна. Бидний код болон сургалт өгөгдлийн мэдээллийг олон нийтэд хэрэглэгддэг.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy model oparty na sieci neuronowej do adnotacji intensywności frustracji w tweetach obsługi klienta, oparty na reprezentowaniu tekstów tweetów za pomocą worka-of-words kodowania po przetworzeniu z segmentacją podsłów wraz z funkcjami nieleksykalnymi. Model został oceniony na tweetach w języku angielskim i łotewskim, koncentrując się na aspektach wykraczających poza czysty worek słów stosowanych w poprzednich badaniach. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że model można z powodzeniem zastosować do tekstów w języku nieangielskim, a dodanie cech nieleksykalnych do reprezentacji tweetów znacznie poprawia wydajność, podczas gdy segmentacja podsłów ma umiarkowany, ale pozytywny wpływ na dokładność modelu. Nasz kod i dane szkoleniowe są publicznie dostępne.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm un model bazat pe rețeaua neurală pentru adnotarea intensității frustrarii în tweeturile de asistență pentru clienți, bazat pe reprezentarea textelor tweet folosind o codificare sac-of-words după procesarea cu segmentarea subcuvintelor împreună cu caracteristici non-lexicale. Modelul a fost evaluat pe tweet-uri în limbile engleză și letonă, concentrându-se pe aspecte dincolo de reprezentările pur sac de cuvinte folosite în cercetările anterioare. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul poate fi aplicat cu succes pentru texte într-o limbă non-engleză și că adăugarea de caracteristici non-lexicale la reprezentările tweet îmbunătățește semnificativ performanța, în timp ce segmentarea subcuvintelor are un efect moderat, dar pozitiv asupra acurateții modelului. Codul și datele noastre de instruire sunt disponibile public.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit neuralnettverk-drivt modell for å merke frustrasjonsintensitet i klientstøtte for tweeter, basert på å representera tweetetekstar ved å bruka ein pakk med ord-koding etter å handsama med underord-segmentasjon saman med ikkje-leksiske funksjonar. Modellen ble evaluert på tweets på engelsk og latinsk språk, fokusert på aspektane over dei reine pakke av ord-representasjonane som brukar i tidlegare forskning. Eksperimentale resultatene viser at modellen kan vellykkeleg brukast for tekstar i eit ikkje-engelsk språk, og at legg til ikkje-leksiske funksjonar til tweet-representasjonar er betydelig forbetra utviklinga, mens underordsegmentasjonen har ein moderat, men positivt effekt på modellenøyaktighet. Våre kode og treningsdata er offentlig tilgjengeleg.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo model koji je vodio neuralnu mrežu za annotaciju frustracione intenzitete u tweetima podrške klijenata, na temelju zastupanja teksta tweet a koristeći kodiranje vrećice reèi nakon obrade sa segmentacijom podrijeèi zajedno sa neleksičkim karakteristikama. Model je procenio na tweets na engleskim i latinskim jezicima, fokusirajući se na aspekte izvan čiste tašne reči koje su koristile u prethodnim istraživanjima. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da se model može uspešno primjenjivati na tekstove na ne-engleskom jeziku, i da dodavanje ne-leksičkih karakteristika za tvitetske predstave značajno poboljšava izvodnju, dok segmentacija podriječi ima umjeren ali pozitivan efekat na model tačnost. Naši kod i podaci o obuci su javno dostupni.', 'so': "Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa model-wado neurada ah oo ku saabsan faa'iidada dhaqdhaqaaqnimada macaamiisha ee isticmaalaya qoraalka tweetka oo isticmaalaya baaski hadal kooban ka dib marka lagu baaraandegayo qeyb-qayb-qoraalka hoose iyo waxyaabo aan lexico aheyn. Tusaale ahaan waxaa lagu qiimeeyay Tweetka afka Ingiriiska iyo Luqada Latvian, isagoo ku kalsoonaya arrimaha ka baxsan xariijiyada hadalka saafiga ah ee baaraandegista hore lagu isticmaalay. Midhaha imtixaanka waxaa tusi kara in tusaale ahaan looga codsan karo qoraal af Ingiriis ah oo aan af Ingiriis ahayn, waxaana ku dari kara faa’iido aan leksikal aheyn in loo kordhiyo muuqashada, xittaa kooxaha hoose-hadalka waxaa ku saabsan faa'iido saxda model. Macluumaadyadayada aqoonsiga iyo waxbarashaduba waxay ku jiraan bayaan.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en neuralt nätverksdriven modell för att kommentera frustrationsintensitet i kundsupporttweets, baserad på att representera tweettetexter med hjälp av en påse-of-word kodning efter bearbetning med underordssegmentering tillsammans med icke-lexikala funktioner. Modellen utvärderades på tweets på engelska och lettiska språk, med fokus på aspekter utöver den rena påse-of-word representation som använts i tidigare forskning. De experimentella resultaten visar att modellen kan användas framgångsrikt för texter på ett icke-engelskt språk, och att tillägg av icke-lexikala funktioner till tweet representationer avsevärt förbättrar prestandan, medan underordssegmentering har en måttlig men positiv effekt på modellnoggrannheten. Vår kod och utbildningsdata är allmänt tillgängliga.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරදේශ කරනවා න්\u200dයුරාල් ජාලය ප්\u200dරදේශයක් සඳහා බැග් වචන සංකේෂණය සමඟින් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් සමග විශේෂණය කරන්න පස්සේ බැග් වචන සංකේෂ මොඩේලය ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ලැට්වියාන් භාෂාවල් වලින් ට්විට් වලින් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ, පසුගිය පරීක්ෂණයේ  පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ මොඩල් එක සමහරවිට ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාවක් නැති ලේඛික භාෂාවක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සඳහ අපේ කෝඩ් සහ ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශ වෙන්න පුළුවන්.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئورل-نیٹورک-ڈریوی موڈل کو مشتری حمایت ٹویٹوں میں ناراحت کی تنگی کا اظہار کرنے کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں، جو ٹویٹ ٹیکسٹ کو دکھانے پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے اس کے بعد سوبرویڈ سیگنٹ کے ساتھ غیر لکسیکل فوائل کے ساتھ پردازش کرنے کے بعد ایک بسگ یہ موڈل انگلیسی اور لاتیوی زبانوں میں ٹویٹوں پر مطابق کیا گیا تھا، جو پہلے تحقیقات میں استعمال کیا گیا تھا پاکیزہ باتوں کے بغل سے منتظر ہیں۔ آزمائش نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ موڈل ناانگلیسی زبان میں متخصص کے لئے موفقیت کے ساتھ کاروبار کر سکتا ہے، اور جو ٹویٹ نمایشناموں کے لئے غیر لکسیکل ویژگی ویژگی ویژگی کی ویژگی کا اضافہ کرنا بہت اضافہ کرتا ہے، حالانکہ سوبرویڈ سپٹمنٹ موڈل د ہمارا کوڈ اور تربیت ڈیٹا ظاہر طور پر موجود ہیں.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் இயக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியை காண்பிக்கிறோம். அலட்சியமான விருப்பத்திற்கான துணை குறியீட்டை குறியீட்டை குறியீட்டை குறியீட்டில இந்த மாதிரி முந்தைய ஆய்வில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட சுத்தமான வார்த்தைகளின் குறிப்பிடுகளை மேலும் ஆங்கிலத்தில் மற்றும் லாட் சோதனை முடிவு எங்கள் குறியீடு மற்றும் பயிற்சி தகவல் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'uz': "Biz foydalanuvchi foydalanuvchining foydalanuvchiga qo'shish uchun neyrol tarmoq modeli hozir qilamiz. Twitt matnlarini qo'shish mumkin. Ushbu soʻzning bir suhbat soʻzni qoʻllab qo'yishdan keyin ikkinchi so'zlarni boshqarish imkoniyatlari bilan birlashtirish mumkin. Name Tekshirish natijalari esa modeli ingliz tilida matnlarni muvaffaqiyatli qoʻllash mumkin, va bu xabarlar uchun hech qanday leksikal xususiyatlarni qoʻshish imkoniyatlarini juda oshirish mumkin, va tub soʻzning qismlarini taʼminlovchi modelning tashkilotligini aniqlash mumkin. Kodlash va taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlarimiz publicly mavjud.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình mạng lưới thần kinh để ghi chú cường độ thất vọng trong các tweet hỗ trợ khách hàng, dựa trên cách đại diện các văn bản trên Twitter, dùng một gói chữ mã sau khi xử lý phân đoạn chữ phụ cùng với các tính năng không phải từ. Mô hình đã được đánh giá trên tweet bằng tiếng Anh và Latvia, tập trung vào các khía cạnh khác hơn những diễn tả bằng lời trong nghiên cứu trước. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy mô hình này có thể được áp dụng thành công cho văn bản bằng ngôn ngữ không phải tiếng Anh, và rằng việc thêm các tính năng không phải chữ viết vào các biểu hiện trên Twitter cải thiện hiệu suất đáng kể, trong khi phân đoạn chữ con có tác động vừa phải nhưng tích cực lên độ chính xác mô hình. Mật mã và dữ liệu đào tạo của chúng tôi công khai.', 'bg': 'Представяме модел за анотиране на интензивността на неудовлетвореността в туитове за поддръжка на клиенти, базиран на представяне на текстове в туитове с помощта на кодиране на торба с думи след обработка с сегментация на поддума заедно с нелексикални функции. Моделът е оценен на туитове на английски и латвийски език, фокусирайки се върху аспекти отвъд чистите репрезентации, използвани в предишни изследвания. Експерименталните резултати показват, че моделът може успешно да бъде приложен за текстове на неанглийски език и че добавянето на нелексикални характеристики към представянето на туитове значително подобрява производителността, докато сегментацията на поддумите има умерен, но положителен ефект върху точността на модела. Нашите кодове и данни за обучение са публично достъпни.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo model koji se vodi na neuralnu mrežu za annotaciju frustracijske intenzitete u tweetima podrške klijenata, temeljeno na zastupanju teksta tweet a koristeći kodiranje vrećice riječi nakon obrade s segmentacijom podriječi zajedno s neleksičkim karakteristikama. Model je procijenjen na tweets na engleskim i latinskim jezicima, fokusirajući se na aspekte izvan čistog predstavljanja riječi koje se koriste u prethodnim istraživanjima. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da se model može uspješno primjenjivati na tekste na jeziku ne-engleskog, a da dodavanje ne-leksičkih karakteristika na tvitetske predstave značajno poboljšava učinkovitost, dok segmentacija podriječja ima umjeren ali pozitivan učinak na tačnost modela. Naši kod i podaci o obuci su javno dostupni.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en neural-netværksdrevet model til notering af frustrationsintensitet i kundesupporttweets, baseret på repræsentation af tweet-tekster ved hjælp af en pose-of-word kodning efter behandling med underordssegmentering sammen med ikke-leksikske funktioner. Modellen blev evalueret på tweets på engelsk og lettisk sprog, med fokus på aspekter ud over de rene taske-of-word repræsentationer, der blev brugt i tidligere forskning. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at modellen med succes kan anvendes til tekster på et ikke-engelsk sprog, og at tilføjelse af ikke-leksikale funktioner til tweet repræsentationer markant forbedrer ydeevnen, mens underordssegmentering har en moderat, men positiv effekt på modelnøjagtigheden. Vores kode og træningsdata er offentligt tilgængelige.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een neuraal-netwerk gedreven model voor het annoteren van frustratie intensiteit in customer support tweets, gebaseerd op het weergeven van tweet teksten met behulp van een zak-met-woorden codering na verwerking met subwoordsegmentatie samen met niet-lexicale functies. Het model werd geëvalueerd op tweets in het Engels en Lets, waarbij de nadruk lag op aspecten die verder gaan dan de pure bag-of-words representaties die in vorig onderzoek werden gebruikt. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat het model succesvol kan worden toegepast op teksten in een niet-Engelse taal, en dat het toevoegen van niet-lexicale functies aan tweet representaties de prestaties aanzienlijk verbetert, terwijl subwoordsegmentatie een matig maar positief effect heeft op de nauwkeurigheid van het model. Onze code en trainingsgegevens zijn openbaar beschikbaar.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein neuronales Netzwerk-getriebenes Modell zur Annotation der Frustrationsintensität in Kundensupport-Tweets, basierend auf der Darstellung von Tweet-Texten mittels einer Sack-of-Words-Codierung nach Verarbeitung mit Subword-Segmentierung zusammen mit nicht-lexikalischen Features. Das Modell wurde anhand von Tweets in englischer und lettischer Sprache evaluiert, wobei der Fokus auf Aspekte jenseits der reinen Wortbeutel-Repräsentationen lag, die in früheren Forschungen verwendet wurden. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das Modell erfolgreich auf Texte in einer nicht-englischen Sprache angewendet werden kann und dass das Hinzufügen von nicht-lexikalischen Features zu Tweet-Darstellungen die Performance signifikant verbessert, während die Subword-Segmentierung einen moderaten, aber positiven Effekt auf die Modellgenauigkeit hat. Unsere Code- und Trainingsdaten sind öffentlich verfügbar.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan model yang didorong jaringan saraf untuk menganoterasi intensitas frustrasi dalam tweet dukungan pelanggan, berdasarkan mewakili teks tweet menggunakan kotak-kata pengekodan setelah memproses dengan segmentasi subword bersama dengan fitur non-lexical. Model ini diuji pada tweet dalam bahasa Inggris dan Latvia, fokus pada aspek di luar persembahan kotak-kata murni yang digunakan dalam penelitian sebelumnya. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model dapat diaplikasikan dengan sukses untuk teks dalam bahasa bukan bahasa Inggris, dan bahwa menambahkan fitur bukan-leksikal pada represensi tweet meningkatkan prestasi yang signifikan, sementara segmen kata bawah memiliki efek moderat tetapi positif pada akurasi model. Kode dan data latihan kita tersedia publik.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل راهنمایی به شبکه عصبی برای آگاهی شدت ناراحتی در تویتهای پشتیبانی مشتریان را نشان می دهیم، بر اساس نمایش متن\u200cهای توئیت با استفاده از کیف\u200cهای کودک کلمه بعد از پرداخت با جدایی\u200cهای زیر کلمه با ویژه\u200cهای غیر زبان\u200cشناسی. این مدل بر روی توئیت\u200cها در زبان انگلیسی و لاتیوی ارزیابی شد که روی نقطه\u200cهای خالص کیف کلمه\u200cها که در تحقیقات قبلی استفاده می\u200cشوند تمرکز می\u200cکند. نتایج آزمایشی نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل می\u200cتواند به موفقیت برای متن\u200cها در زبان غیر انگلیسی کاربرد شود، و اضافه کردن ویژه\u200cهای غیر زبان\u200cگویی برای نمایش\u200cدهندگان توئیت به معنی عملکرد را بهتر می\u200cکند، در حالی که بخش\u200cدهندگان زیر کلمه\u200cها اثر مت کد و اطلاعات آموزش ما به طور عمومی در دسترس هستند.', 'tr': 'Biz müşterileriň tweetlerinde frustrasyon şiddetlerini a ýdyrmak üçin näyral şebeke sürüjili modelini terjime edip otyrýarys, subsöz segmentasyonuň bilen leksiýal däldikleri bilen işleýän soňra tweet tekstlerini ulanan çöpden soňra ködleme taýýarlapdyr. Bu nusga iňlisçe we latiw dilinde tuýtlar bilen deňlendirildi, öňki araştyrmada ulanylan täze sözler üçin üns berýärdi. Denediw netijesi hatlary hatda modeliniň üstüne Iňlis dilinde metin üçin uygulanabilir we tweet etmek üçin lukmanyň üýtgeşmelerini örän gowurarlar, sübsöz segmentasynda moder we möhüm eser bar. Biziň kodymyz we bilim maglumatymyz publika mejbur.', 'ko': '우리는 고객이 추문을 지원하는 좌절의 강도를 설명하는 신경 네트워크 구동 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 자사 분할과 비어휘 특징 처리 후 추문 텍스트를 표시하기 위해 한 봉지의 단어 인코딩을 사용한다.이 모델은 영어와 라트비아어의 트윗에서 평가를 했고 이전 연구에서 사용된 순수한 문자 표시 이외의 부분에 중점을 두었다.실험 결과에 따르면 이 모델은 비영어 텍스트에 성공적으로 응용될 수 있고 트위터 표시에 비어휘 특징을 첨가하면 성능을 현저히 높일 수 있으며 자어의 절분은 모델의 정확성에 중등하지만 적극적인 영향을 미친다.우리의 코드와 교육 데이터는 공개된 것이다.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n neural-netwerk-gedrywe model vir annotering frustrasie intensiteit in kliënt ondersteunde tweets, gebaseer op te stel tweet teks wat gebruik 'n sak van woorde kodering na verwerking met subwoord segmentasie saam met non-leksiese funksies. Die model is geevalueer op tweets in Engels en Latviaanse tale, gefokuseer op aspekte buite die suiwer sak-woorde-voorstellings gebruik in vorige forsoek. Die eksperimentale resultate vertoon dat die model suksesvol vir teks in 'n nie-Engels taal aanwend kan word, en dat by die byvoeg van non-leksiese funksies na tweet voorstellings betekeurig verbeter funksie, terwyl subwoord segmentasie 'n moderate maar positiewe effek op model presies. Ons kode en oefening data is openlik beskikbaar.", 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mtindo wa mitandao ya kijamii kwa kutangaza ongezeko la kukata tamaa katika wateja wa twiti, kwa kutumia ujumbe wa twita kwa kutumia ujumbe wa maneno yanayoandikwa baada ya kuchukuliwa kwa mgawanyiko wa neno la chini pamoja na tabia zisizo za kisaikolojia. Mfano huo ulivutiwa kwenye twiti za lugha za Kiingereza na Kilatinsa, ukijikita kwenye mambo zaidi ya uwakilishi wa maneno safi uliotumika katika utafiti uliopita. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa modeli inaweza kutumika mafanikio kwa lugha isiyo ya Kiingereza, na kwamba kuongeza vipengele vya kiserikali vya twita kwa uwakilishi wa twita kuboresha ufanisi, wakati mchanganyiko wa maneno ya chini una athari ya kisasa lakini yenye chanya juu ya uhalisia wa mifano. Takwimu zetu na mafunzo zinapatikana hadharani.', 'am': 'አካባቢ ቃላትን በመጠቀም በተቃራኒ ቃላት አካባቢ እና ሳይሌክሲ አካባቢ በተቃራኒ አካባቢ እና የሀገር አካባቢ አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሞዴላው በንግግሊዝና በLatvian ቋንቋዎች ላይ በትዊተሮች ላይ ተረጋገጠ፤ የቀድሞው ትምህርት ውስጥ በተጠቃሚ የንጹሕ የቃላት መልዕክቶች በተለየ ጥሩ ቋንቋዎች ማዕከላዊ ቋንቋዎች ተቃውሞ ይታያል፡፡ ፈተናው ፍሬዎች ምሳሌው በንግግሊዝኛ ቋንቋ ሳይሆን በጽሑፎች ላይ የተሻለ መሆኑን የሚያሳየው፣ እናም የሌክሲካዊ ምርጫዎች ሳይሆን በትዊተር መልዕክቶችን በመጨመር በጥቅማት ያሳድጋል፡፡ የኮድ እና ማህበረሰብ ዳታዎቻችን በግልጽ የተገኘ ናቸው፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një model të përdorur nga rrjeti nervor për të shënuar intensitetin e frustrimit në tweetet e mbështetjes së klientëve, bazuar në përfaqësimin e teksteve të tweetit duke përdorur një çantë-fjalësh kodimi pas përpunimit me segmentimin e nënfjalëve së bashku me karakteristikat jo-lexike. Modeli u vlerësua në tweetet në gjuhën angleze dhe letone, duke u përqëndruar në aspekte përtej përfaqësimeve të pastra të thesarit të fjalëve të përdorura në kërkimet e mëparshme. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli mund të aplikohet me sukses për tekstet në një gjuhë jo-angleze dhe se shtimi i karakteristikave jo-leksikale në përfaqësimet e tweetit përmirëson ndjeshëm performancën, ndërsa segmentimi i nënfjalëve ka një efekt të moderuar por pozitiv në saktësinë e modelit. Our code and training data are publicly available.', 'az': 'Biz müşterilərin dəstək twetlarında frustrasyon a ğıllığını bildirmək üçün nöral-ağ təşkil edən modeli təşkil edirik. Üb sözlər segmentasiyası ilə birlikdə leksik olmayan özelliklərlə birlikdə işlədikdən sonra tweet mətnlərini təşkil edirik. Model İngilizce və Latvija dillərində tweets olaraq değerlendirildi, əvvəlki araştırmalarda istifadə edilən təmiz çəkidə sözlərin tərzlərindən ötrü tərzlərinə odaqlanırdı. Müxtəlif sonuçlar göstərir ki, modeli İngilizci dili olmayan mətnlərə müvəffəqiyyətlə uygulanabilir, və tweet göstərilmələrinə layiq olmayan fəaliyyətlərin əlavə edilməsi çox xeyirli olar, altsözlər segmentasiyası modellərin doğruluğuna müvəffəqiyyət edər. Bizim kodumuz və təhsil məlumatlarımız açıq-aşkar mövcuddur.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo model koji je vodio neuromrežu za annotaciju frustracijskog intenziteta u tweetima podrške klijentima, na temelju zastupanja teksta tweet a koristeći kodiranje vrećice riječi nakon obrade sa segmentacijom podriječi zajedno sa neleksičkim karakteristikama. Model je procijenjen na tweets na engleskim i latinskim jezicima, fokusirajući se na aspekte izvan čistih predstavljanja riječi koje su koristile u prethodnim istraživanjima. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da se model može uspješno primjenjivati na tekstove na non-engleskom jeziku, i da dodavanje ne-leksičkih karakteristika na tvitetske predstave značajno poboljšava učinkovitost, dok segmentacija podriječi ima umjeren ali pozitivan učinak na tačnost model a. Naši kod i podaci o obuci su javno dostupni.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նյարդային ցանցով հիմնված մոդել, որը նշում է հիասթափման ինտենսիվությունը հաճախորդների աջակցության թվիթերում, հիմնված թվիթերի տեքստների ներկայացման վրա՝ օգտագործելով բառերի պայուսակի կոդավորումը ենթաբառերի սեգմետրացիայի հետ միասին ոչ լեք Մոդելը գնահատվել է անգլերենով և լատիներենով թվիթերի վրա, կենտրոնացնելով այն ասպեկտների վրա, որոնք դուրս են գալիս նախորդ հետազոտություններում օգտագործված մաքուր բառերի ներկայացումներից: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մոդելը հաջողությամբ կարող է կիրառվել ոչ անգլերեն լեզվով տեքստների համար, և որ ոչ լեքսիկական հատկություններ ավելացնելը թվիթերի ներկայացումների վրա նշանակալի բարելավում է արտադրողությունը, մինչդեռ ենթաբառերի սեգրակցի Մեր կոդը և ուսուցման տվյալները հանրային հասանելի են:', 'ca': "Presentam un model guiat per la xarxa neural per anotar la intensitat de frustració en els tweets de suport al client, basat en representar els textos de tweet utilitzant una borsa de paraules codificant després de processar amb segmentació de subparaules juntament amb característiques no lècsiques. El model va ser avaluat en tweets en llengües d'anglès i letona, centrant-se en aspectes més enllà de les representacions pures de paraules utilitzades en recerca anterior. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el model es pot aplicar amb èxit als textos en una llengua no anglesa, i que afegir característiques no llexiques a les representacions de tweet millora significativament el rendiment, mentre que la segmentació de subparaules té un efecte moderat però positiu en la precisió del model. El nostre codi i les dades d'entrenament estan disponibles al públic.", 'cs': 'Představujeme model řízený neuronovou sítí pro anotaci intenzity frustrace ve tweetech zákaznické podpory, založený na reprezentaci tweetových textů pomocí sáčku slov kódování po zpracování segmentací podslov spolu s nelexikálními funkcemi. Model byl hodnocen na tweetech v anglickém a lotyšském jazyce, se zaměřením na aspekty mimo čisté sáčky slov používané v předchozím výzkumu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že model lze úspěšně aplikovat na texty v neanglickém jazyce a že přidání nelexikálních vlastností do tweetových reprezentací výrazně zlepšuje výkon, zatímco segmentace podslov má mírný, ale pozitivní vliv na přesnost modelu. Náš kód a údaje o školení jsou veřejně dostupné.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নিউরেল-নেটওয়ার্ক-চালানো মডেল উপস্থাপন করছি ক্যাটমারের সমর্থনে হতাশার শক্তিশালী টুইট ব্যবহার করার জন্য। টুইট টেক্সটের প্রতিনিধিত্বে টুইটের টেক্সট প্রতিন এই মডেলটি ইংরেজি এবং ল্যাটভিয়ান ভাষায় টুইটে মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছিল, পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণায় ব্যবহৃত পরিষ্কার ব্যাগ-অফ-শব্দের প পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে মডেলটি সফলভাবে ইংরেজি ভাষায় টেক্সটের জন্য প্রয়োগ করতে পারে এবং টুইটের প্রতিনিধিদের টুইটে অলেক্সিকাল বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি কর আমাদের কোড এবং প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'fi': 'Esittelemme neuroverkkovetoisen mallin turhautumisen intensiteetin merkitsemiseksi asiakastukitweeteissä, joka perustuu tweetteksteiden esittämiseen sanapussikoodauksella, kun se on käsitelty alasanasegmentoinnilla ja ei-leksikaalisilla ominaisuuksilla. Mallia arvioitiin twiitteillä englanniksi ja latviaksi keskittyen aikaisemmissa tutkimuksissa käytettyjen puhtaan sanapussin representaatioiden lisäksi. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallia voidaan soveltaa menestyksekkäästi muihin kuin englanninkielisiin teksteihin ja että ei-leksikaalisten ominaisuuksien lisääminen twiittiesityksiin parantaa merkittävästi suorituskykyä, kun taas alasanasegmentoinnilla on kohtalainen mutta positiivinen vaikutus mallin tarkkuuteen. Koodimme ja koulutustietomme ovat julkisesti saatavilla.', 'et': 'Tutvustame neurovõrgupõhist mudelit frustratsiooni intensiivsuse märgistamiseks klienditugi säutsides, mis põhineb säutside tekstide esitamisel sõnakoti kodeerimise abil pärast töötlemist alamsõna segmenteerimisega koos mitteleksikaalsete funktsioonidega. Mudelit hinnati inglise- ja lätikeelsete säutsude põhjal, keskendudes varasemates uuringutes kasutatud puhtast sõnakotist väljapoole jäävatele aspektidele. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et mudelit saab edukalt rakendada mitte-inglise keeles olevatele tekstidele ning et mittekeksikaalsete funktsioonide lisamine säutsu esitustele parandab oluliselt jõudlust, samas kui alamsõna segmenteerimisel on mõõdukas, kuid positiivne mõju mudeli täpsusele. Meie kood ja koolitusandmed on avalikult kättesaadavad.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מודל נוהג ברשת עצבית להציג אינטנסיביות התסכול בטיוויטים בתמיכה לקוחות, מבוסס על מייצג טקסטים טוויטים בשימוש שק של מילים קודם לאחר העבודה עם סגרטציה של מילים תחת יחד עם תכונות לא לקסיות. הדוגמא הוערכה על טוויטים בשפות אנגלית ולטבית, המרכז על היבטים מעבר למציגת שקית מילים טהורה שמשתמשת במחקר קודם. התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות שהדוגמאל ניתן להשתמש בהצלחה לטקסטים בשפה לא אנגלית, ושהוספת תכונות לא לקסיות לייצגות טוויט משפר באופן משמעותי את ההופעה, בזמן שלסגמנטציה של מילים מתחת יש השפעה ממוצעת אבל חיובית על מדויקת דוגמאל. הקוד והנתונים האימונים שלנו זמינים לציבור.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nevronsko omrežje usmerjen model za označevanje intenzivnosti frustracije v tweetih za podporo strankam, ki temelji na predstavitvi besedil tweetov z uporabo kodiranja vrečke besed po obdelavi s segmentacijo podbesed skupaj z neleksikalnimi funkcijami. Model je bil ocenjen na tweetih v angleškem in latvijskem jeziku, osredotočen pa je bil na vidike, ki presegajo predstavitve čiste vreče besed, uporabljene v prejšnjih raziskavah. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je model mogoče uspešno uporabiti za besedila v neangleškem jeziku in da dodajanje neleksikalnih značilnosti pri predstavitvah tweetov bistveno izboljša učinkovitost, medtem ko ima segmentacija podbesed zmeren, a pozitiven učinek na natančnost modela. Naša koda in podatki o usposabljanju so javno dostopni.', 'jv': 'In Model kuwi nggunakake tuatuk kanggo tuwit ning ingkang karo ingkang lan lan kelas, ingkang dipun-ingkang supoyo supoyo barang mangan kuwi padha-sanga sing arep dipulangan kanggo ranjut ujian. Reulti sing paling-lisane bukane Awakdhéwé karo perangkat kuwi nggawé, dadi nggawé.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wani misali wanda aka haramta zuwa neural don ya sanar da cewa mai yanke tsammãni a cikin mataimaki na mataimaki, a kan wakilishi littattafai na Twitter, ana yi amfani da wani zane-zane-zane-zane kodi bayan an yi aiki da segmentation na subword sami da wasu sifati na-leksisi. An ƙaddara motsi a kan harshen Ingiriya da Lariya, ana yi muhimmi zuwa masu sakan baya masu tsari da masu maganar da aka amfani da shi a gaba ɗaya. Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa, za'a iya sakan misalin misalin a cikin harshen Ingiriya ba'a Ingiriya, kuma a ƙara wasu misfealum na-leksisi zuwa wato-mutane na gyara mai girma, kuma a lokacin da segment ɗin-faɗi ya sami wani mai moderate, kuma yana da amfani mai tabbatarwa kan shiryuwar misalin. Ana sami kodi da umarninMu.", 'bo': 'We present a neural-network-driven model for annotating frustration intensity in customer support tweets, based on representing tweet texts using a bag-of-words encoding after processing with subword segmentation together with non-lexical features. མ་དབུགས་འདི་ནི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་ལྷན་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་གི་གློག་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་བ་དང་། experimental results show that the model can be successfully applied for texts in a non-English language, and that adding non-lexical features to tweet representations significantly improves performance, while subword segmentation has a moderate but positive effect on model accuracy. ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་དང་སློབ་གྲྭར་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་།'}
{'en': 'System Combination for Grammatical Error Correction Based on Integer Programming', 'ar': 'توليفة النظام لتصحيح الأخطاء النحوية بناءً على البرمجة الصحيحة', 'pt': 'Combinação de sistemas para correção de erros gramaticais com base em programação inteira', 'fr': "Combinaison de systèmes pour la correction d'erreurs grammaticales basée sur la programmation en nombres entiers", 'es': 'Combinación de sistemas para la corrección de errores gramaticales basada en programación de enteros', 'ja': '整数プログラミングに基づく文法的誤り訂正のためのシステムの組み合わせ', 'zh': '盖规画之语法纠错系统组合也', 'hi': 'पूर्णांक प्रोग्रामिंग पर आधारित व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार के लिए सिस्टम संयोजन', 'ru': 'Комбинация системы для коррекции грамматических ошибок на основе целочисленного программирования', 'ga': 'Teaglaim Chórais le haghaidh Ceartú Earráide Gramadaí Bunaithe ar Ríomhchlárú Slánuimhir', 'el': 'Συνδυασμός συστήματος για τη γραμματική διόρθωση σφαλμάτων με βάση τον ακέραιο προγραμματισμό', 'hu': 'Rendszerkombináció az egész programozás alapján nyelvtani hibajavításhoz', 'it': 'Combinazione di sistema per la correzione degli errori grammaticali basata sulla programmazione integrale', 'kk': 'Бүтін сан бағдарламасына негізделген граматикалық қателерді түзету үшін жүйелік комбинациясы', 'lt': 'Gramatinių klaidų koregavimo sistemos derinys, pagrįstas visais programavimais', 'mk': 'Системска комбинација за корекција на граматски грешки базирана на целосно програмирање', 'ms': 'Kombinasi Sistem untuk Pembetulan Ralat Grammatik Berdasarkan Perprogram Integer', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പ്രോഗ്രാമിങ്ങിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം കോമ്പിണേഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Kombinazzjoni tas-Sistema għall-Korrezzjoni ta’ Żbalji Grammatiċi Ibbażata fuq Programmazzjoni Integri', 'no': 'Systemkombinasjon for grammatisk feilretting basert på heiltal program', 'mn': 'Грамматикийн алдаа зөвшөөрөлтийн системийн нэгтгэл бүхэл програмчлалын үндсэн', 'pl': 'Kombinacja systemu do korekcji błędów gramatycznych w oparciu o programowanie całkowite', 'ro': 'Combinație de sistem pentru corectarea erorilor gramaticale bazată pe programarea întregii', 'sr': 'Sistemska kombinacija za ispravu greške na temelju celog programiranja', 'so': 'Combination of System Combination for Grammatical Error Correction Based on Programming Integer', 'si': 'ග්\u200dරාමාටිකල් දෝෂාව සඳහා පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධය', 'sv': 'Systemkombination för grammatisk felkorrigering baserad på heltalsprogrammering', 'ta': 'முழு நிரல் நிரல் அடிப்படையில் சார்ந்த பிழை திருத்தத்திற்கான அமைப்பு சேர்ப்பு', 'ka': 'სისტემის კომბინაცია გრამიტური შეცდომის კონფიგურაციაზე', 'ur': 'گرامیٹیکل خطا اصلاح کے لئے سیسٹم کی کمbination Integer پروگرامینگ پر بنیاد ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kết hợp hệ thống cho lỗi máy tính', 'hr': 'Kombinacija sustava za korištenje greške na temelju cijelog programiranja', 'da': 'Systemkombination til korrektion af grammatisk fejl baseret på helprogrammering', 'nl': 'Systeemcombinatie voor grammaticale foutcorrectie op basis van integer programmering', 'bg': 'Системна комбинация за корекция на граматични грешки въз основа на цялостно програмиране', 'id': 'System Combination for Grammatical Error Correction Based on Integer Programming', 'de': 'Systemkombination zur grammatischen Fehlerkorrektur auf Basis von Integer-Programmierung', 'fa': 'ترکیب سیستم برای اصلاح خطای گرماتیک بر اساس برنامه\u200cبندی کل', 'sw': 'System Combination for Grammatical Error Correction Based on Integer Programming', 'sq': 'System Combination for Grammatical Error Correction Based on Integer Programming', 'tr': 'Kalam Programlamasynda Buýruk', 'hy': 'Գրամատիկ սխալների ուղղելու համակարգը, հիմնված ամբողջ ծրագրավորումների վրա', 'af': 'Stelsel Kombinasie vir Gramatiese Fout Korreksie Gebaseer op Heelgetal Programming', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'az': 'B칲t칲n Say캼 Programlamas캼na dayanan Gramatik Hata D칲z톛ltm톛si', 'bn': 'গ্রামাটিক্যাল ত্রুটি সংস্কারের জন্য সিস্টেম কমবাইনার', 'ca': 'Combinació del sistema per a corregir errors gramàtics basada en programació integral', 'cs': 'Systémová kombinace pro gramatickou korekci chyb založená na integer programování', 'bs': 'Sistemska kombinacija za ispravu greške na temelju cijelog programiranja', 'et': 'Süsteemi kombinatsioon grammatiliste vigade parandamiseks tervikprogrammeerimisel', 'fi': 'Järjestelmäyhdistelmä kokonaisohjelmointiin perustuvaa kielioppisten virheiden korjausta varten', 'ko': '정수 계획 기반의 문법 오류 수정 시스템 조합', 'jv': 'System', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'שילוב מערכת לתיקון שגיאות גרמטיות מבוסס בתכנית שלמה', 'sk': 'Sistemska kombinacija za slovnično popravljanje napak na podlagi celotnega programiranja', 'bo': 'Grammatical Error Correction Based on Integer Programming'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose a system combination method for grammatical error correction (GEC), based on nonlinear integer programming (IP). Our method optimizes a novel F score objective based on error types, and combines multiple end-to-end GEC systems. The proposed IP approach optimizes the selection of a single best system for each grammatical error type present in the data. Experiments of the IP approach on combining state-of-the-art standalone GEC systems show that the combined system outperforms all standalone systems. It improves F0.5 score by 3.61 % when combining the two best participating systems in the BEA 2019 shared task, and achieves F0.5 score of 73.08 %. We also perform experiments to compare our IP approach with another state-of-the-art system combination method for GEC, demonstrating IP’s competitive combination capability.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نقترح طريقة دمج نظام لتصحيح الخطأ النحوي (GEC) ، بناءً على برمجة الأعداد الصحيحة غير الخطية (IP). تعمل طريقتنا على تحسين هدف درجة F الجديد بناءً على أنواع الأخطاء ، وتجمع بين أنظمة GEC متعددة من طرف إلى طرف. يعمل نهج IP المقترح على تحسين اختيار أفضل نظام منفرد لكل نوع خطأ نحوي موجود في البيانات. تُظهر تجارب نهج IP على الجمع بين أحدث أنظمة GEC المستقلة أن النظام المدمج يتفوق على جميع الأنظمة المستقلة. يعمل على تحسين درجة F0.5 بنسبة 3.61٪ عند الجمع بين أفضل نظامين مشاركين في المهمة المشتركة BEA 2019 ، ويحقق درجة F0.5 بنسبة 73.08٪. نقوم أيضًا بإجراء تجارب لمقارنة نهج الملكية الفكرية الخاص بنا مع طريقة دمج نظام متطورة أخرى لـ GEC ، مما يدل على القدرة التنافسية للملكية الفكرية.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos um método de combinação de sistemas para correção de erros gramaticais (GEC), baseado em programação inteira não linear (IP). Nosso método otimiza um novo objetivo de pontuação F com base nos tipos de erro e combina vários sistemas GEC de ponta a ponta. A abordagem IP proposta otimiza a seleção de um único melhor sistema para cada tipo de erro gramatical presente nos dados. Experimentos da abordagem IP na combinação de sistemas GEC autônomos de última geração mostram que o sistema combinado supera todos os sistemas autônomos. Ele melhora a pontuação F0.5 em 3,61% ao combinar os dois melhores sistemas participantes na tarefa compartilhada BEA 2019 e atinge a pontuação F0.5 de 73,08%. Também realizamos experimentos para comparar nossa abordagem de IP com outro método de combinação de sistemas de última geração para GEC, demonstrando a capacidade de combinação competitiva do IP.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons une méthode de combinaison de systèmes pour la correction d'erreur grammaticale (GEC), basée sur la programmation entière non linéaire (IP). Notre méthode optimise un nouvel objectif de score F basé sur les types d'erreurs et combine plusieurs systèmes GEC de bout en bout. L'approche IP proposée optimise la sélection d'un seul meilleur système pour chaque type d'erreur grammaticale présent dans les données. Les expériences de l'approche IP sur la combinaison de systèmes GEC autonomes de pointe montrent que le système combiné surpasse tous les systèmes autonomes. Il améliore le score F0.5 de 3,61\xa0% en combinant les deux meilleurs systèmes participants à la tâche partagée BEA 2019, et atteint le score F0.5 de 73,08\xa0%. Nous réalisons également des expériences pour comparer notre approche IP avec une autre méthode de combinaison de systèmes de pointe pour GEC, démontrant ainsi la capacité de combinaison compétitive d'IP.", 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos un método de combinación de sistemas para la corrección de errores gramaticales (GEC), basado en la programación de enteros no lineal (IP). Nuestro método optimiza un objetivo de puntuación F novedoso basado en los tipos de error y combina múltiples sistemas GEC de principio a fin. El enfoque de PI propuesto optimiza la selección de un único mejor sistema para cada tipo de error gramatical presente en los datos. Los experimentos del enfoque IP sobre la combinación de sistemas GEC independientes de última generación muestran que el sistema combinado supera a todos los sistemas independientes. Mejora la puntuación de F0.5 en un 3.61% al combinar los dos mejores sistemas participantes en la tarea compartida de BEA 2019, y logra una puntuación de F0.5 del 73,08%. También realizamos experimentos para comparar nuestro enfoque de PI con otro método de combinación de sistemas de última generación para GEC, lo que demuestra la capacidad de combinación competitiva de IP.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम nonlinear पूर्णांक प्रोग्रामिंग (IP) के आधार पर व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार (GEC) के लिए एक सिस्टम संयोजन विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारी विधि त्रुटि प्रकारों के आधार पर एक उपन्यास एफ स्कोर उद्देश्य को अनुकूलित करती है, और कई एंड-टू-एंड जीईसी सिस्टम को जोड़ती है। प्रस्तावित IP दृष्टिकोण डेटा में मौजूद प्रत्येक व्याकरणिक त्रुटि प्रकार के लिए एक एकल सर्वोत्तम सिस्टम के चयन को अनुकूलित करता है। अत्याधुनिक स्टैंडअलोन जीईसी प्रणालियों के संयोजन पर आईपी दृष्टिकोण के प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि संयुक्त प्रणाली सभी स्टैंडअलोन प्रणालियों को मात देती है। यह बीईए 2019 साझा कार्य में दो सर्वश्रेष्ठ भाग लेने वाली प्रणालियों के संयोजन पर 3.61% द्वारा F0.5 स्कोर में सुधार करता है, और 73.08% का F0.5 स्कोर प्राप्त करता है। हम जीईसी के लिए एक और अत्याधुनिक सिस्टम संयोजन विधि के साथ हमारे आईपी दृष्टिकोण की तुलना करने के लिए प्रयोग भी करते हैं, जो आईपी की प्रतिस्पर्धी संयोजन क्षमता का प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ja': '本稿では、非線形整数プログラミング(IP)に基づく文法誤り訂正(GEC)のためのシステム組み合わせ法を提案する。当社の方法は、エラータイプに基づいて新規のFスコア目標を最適化し、複数のエンドツーエンドのGECシステムを組み合わせます。提案されているIPアプローチは、データに存在する各文法的エラータイプの単一のベストシステムの選択を最適化します。最先端のスタンドアロンGECシステムを組み合わせるIPアプローチの実験は、組み合わせられたシステムがすべてのスタンドアロンシステムよりも優れていることを示しています。BEA 2019の共有タスクに参加している2つの最高のシステムを組み合わせると、F0.5スコアが3.61%向上し、F0.5スコアは73.08%に達します。また、IPアプローチをGECの他の最先端のシステム組み合わせ法と比較する実験を行い、IPの競合的な組み合わせ能力を実証しています。', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы предлагаем метод системной комбинации для грамматической коррекции ошибок (GEC), основанный на нелинейно-целочисленном программировании (IP). Наш метод оптимизирует новую цель оценки F на основе типов ошибок и объединяет несколько сквозных систем GEC. Предлагаемый подход IP оптимизирует выбор одной лучшей системы для каждого грамматического типа ошибки, присутствующего в данных. Эксперименты IP-подхода по совмещению современных автономных систем GEC показывают, что комбинированная система превосходит все автономные системы. Он улучшает оценку F0.5 на 3,61% при объединении двух лучших систем-участников в общей задаче БЭА 2019 и достигает оценки F0.5 73,08%. Мы также выполняем эксперименты для того чтобы сравнить наш подход IP с другим современным методом сочетания системы для GEC, демонстрируя возможность сочетания IP конкурентоспособную.', 'zh': '本文立一本非线性整数规画(IP)语法纠错系统组合法(GEC)。 吾法以非类优化新颖之F评分,合数端到端GEC统。 所建IP法,每语法错误类型优化最善。 先进GECIP法实验明,合统者优于独立。 BEA 2019 共事,以两至善与统合,F0.5 得分高 3.61%,以成 73.08% F0.5 得分。 吾实验之,比吾IP之先进GEC,以观IP之争能。', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh teaglaim córais chun earráidí gramadaí a cheartú (GEC), bunaithe ar ríomhchlárú slánuimhir neamhlíneach (IP). Déanann ár modh cuspóir scór F nua a bharrfheabhsú bunaithe ar chineálacha earráide, agus comhcheanglaíonn sé córais iolracha GEC ceann go ceann. Leis an gcur chuige IP atá beartaithe, déantar rogha an chórais aonair is fearr a roghnú do gach cineál earráide gramadaí atá sna sonraí. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar an gcur chuige IP maidir le córais GEC neamhspleácha úrscothacha a chomhcheangal go sáraíonn an córas comhcheangailte gach córas neamhspleách. Feabhsaíonn sé scór F0.5 3.61% nuair a chomhcheanglaíonn sé an dá chóras rannpháirteacha is fearr i dtasc comhroinnte BEA 2019, agus baintear scór F0.5 de 73.08%. Déanaimid turgnaimh freisin chun ár gcur chuige IP a chur i gcomparáid le modh teaglaim córais úrscothach eile do GEC, ag taispeáint cumas teaglaim iomaíoch IP.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban egy nemlineáris egész programozáson (IP) alapuló nyelvtani hibakorrekció rendszerkombinációs módszerét javasoljuk. Módszerünk egy új F pontszám célkitűzést optimalizál a hibatípusok alapján, és több end-to-end GEC rendszert kombinál. A javasolt IP megközelítés optimalizálja az egyetlen legjobb rendszer kiválasztását minden egyes nyelvtani hibatípushoz. A legkorszerűbb önálló GEC rendszerek kombinálására irányuló IP megközelítés kísérletei azt mutatják, hogy a kombinált rendszer minden önálló rendszert felülmúlja. Javítja az F0-t. 5 pontszám 3,61%-kal, amikor a BEA 2019 közös feladatában a két legjobb résztvevő rendszert kombinálja, és eléri F0. 5 pontszám 73,08%. Kísérleteket végezünk továbbá, hogy összehasonlítsuk IP megközelítésünket egy másik korszerű GEC rendszerkombinációs módszerrel, bizonyítva az IP versenyképes kombinációs képességét.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο συνδυασμού συστημάτων για τη διόρθωση γραμματικών σφαλμάτων (GEC), βασισμένη σε μη γραμμικό ακέραιο προγραμματισμό (IP). Η μέθοδος μας βελτιστοποιεί ένα νέο στόχο βαθμολόγησης με βάση τους τύπους σφαλμάτων και συνδυάζει πολλαπλά ολοκληρωμένα συστήματα GEC. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση βελτιστοποιεί την επιλογή ενός ενιαίου καλύτερου συστήματος για κάθε τύπο γραμματικού σφάλματος που υπάρχει στα δεδομένα. Τα πειράματα της προσέγγισης για τον συνδυασμό των υπερσύγχρονων αυτόνομων συστημάτων δείχνουν ότι το συνδυασμένο σύστημα ξεπερνά όλα τα αυτόνομα συστήματα. Βελτιώνει το F0. 5.βαθμολογία κατά 3.61% όταν συνδυάζουν τα δύο καλύτερα συμμετέχοντα συστήματα στην κοινή εργασία και επιτυγχάνουν F0. 5 βαθμολογία 73.08%. Πραγματοποιούμε επίσης πειράματα για να συγκρίνουμε την προσέγγισή μας με μια άλλη προηγμένη μέθοδο συνδυασμού συστημάτων για την GEC, αποδεικνύοντας την ανταγωνιστική ικανότητα συνδυασμού της IP.', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo un metodo di combinazione di sistema per la correzione degli errori grammaticali (GEC), basato sulla programmazione integrale non lineare (IP). Il nostro metodo ottimizza un nuovo obiettivo di punteggio F basato sui tipi di errore e combina più sistemi end-to-end GEC. L'approccio IP proposto ottimizza la selezione di un singolo sistema migliore per ogni tipo di errore grammaticale presente nei dati. Esperimenti dell'approccio IP sulla combinazione di sistemi GEC standalone all'avanguardia dimostrano che il sistema combinato supera tutti i sistemi standalone. Migliora F0. 5 punteggio del 3,61% combinando i due migliori sistemi partecipanti al compito condiviso BEA 2019, e raggiunge F0. 5 punteggio del 73,08%. Eseguiamo anche esperimenti per confrontare il nostro approccio IP con un altro metodo di combinazione di sistemi all'avanguardia per GEC, dimostrando la capacità di combinazione competitiva di IP.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда грамматикалық қателерді түзету (GEC) үшін жүйелік түрлендіру әдісін таңдаймыз. Жолсызық бүтін бағдарламалардың (IP) негізінде. Біздің әдіміміз, қате түрлеріне негізделген F оқу мақсатын оптимизациялау және бірнеше соңғы GEC жүйелерін біріктіреді. Келтірілген IP қасиеті деректерде бар әрбір грамматикалық қате түрінде жалғыз жүйенің таңдауын оптимизациялайды. Бірлестірілген жүйелік жүйелерді жалғыз жүйелерді біріктіру үшін IP арқылы тәжірибесін көрсетеді. Бұл F0 жақсы. БЕА 2019 жылы ортақ тапсырманың екі ең жақсы қатысу жүйелерін біріктіргенде 5 нәтижесі 3,61% болып, F0 жеткізеді. 5 нөмірі 73, 08%. Мұндай-ақ IP қасиеттерімізді GEC үшін басқа орындау жүйесінің біріктіру әдісімен салыстыру үшін эксперименттерді жасаймыз. IP-нің біріктіру мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome sistemų derinimo metodą gramatinių klaidų koregavimui (GEC), pagrįstą nelinijiniu sveikojo skaičiaus programavimu (IP). Mūsų metodas optimizuoja naują F rezultato tikslą, pagrįstą klaidų tipais, ir derina įvairias GEC sistemas nuo galo iki galo. Siūlomu IP metodu optimizuojama pasirinkti vieną geriausią kiekvieno duomenų gramatinės klaidos tipo sistemą. TL metodo, skirto moderniausioms atskiroms GEC sistemoms derinti, eksperimentai rodo, kad kombinuota sistema viršija visas atskiras sistemas. Jis pagerina F0. 5 rezultatas – 3,61 proc., kai jungiamos dvi geriausiai dalyvaujančios sistemos bendroje 2019 m. BEA užduotyje, ir pasiekiama F0. 5 balai 73, 08%. Taip pat atliekame eksperimentus, kad palygintume savo IP metodą su kitu pažangiausiu GEC sistemų derinimo metodu, įrodančiu IP konkurencinį derinimo gebėjimą.', 'mk': 'Во овој документ, предложуваме системска комбинација метод за корекција на граматичките грешки (GEC), базирана на нелинијарна целосна програма (IP). Нашиот метод оптимизира нова објективна оценка Ф базирана на типовите на грешки, и комбинира повеќе системи од крај до крај ГЕЦ. Предложениот ИП пристап го оптимизира изборот на еден најдобар систем за секој граматски тип грешка присутен во податоците. Експериментите на ИП пристапот на комбинацијата на најсовремените самостојни системи ГЕЦ покажуваат дека комбинираниот систем ги надминува сите самостојни системи. Тоа го подобрува Ф0. 5 поени за 3,61 отсто кога се комбинираат двата најдобри системи кои учествуваат во заедничката задача на БЕА 2019 и постигнуваат Ф0. 5 поени од 73,08%. Исто така, спроведуваме експерименти за да го споредиме нашиот ИП пристап со друг најсовремен системски комбинациски метод за ГЕЦ, демонстрирајќи ја конкурентната комбинациска способност на ИП.', 'ms': 'In this paper, we propose a system combination method for grammatical error correction (GEC), based on nonlinear integer programming (IP).  Kaedah kami optimize objektif skor F baru berdasarkan jenis ralat, dan menggabungkan sistem GEC berakhir-akhir berbilang. Pencapaian IP yang diusulkan optimize pemilihan satu sistem terbaik untuk setiap jenis ralat grammatik yang ada dalam data. Experiments of the IP approach on combining state-of-the-art standalone GEC systems show that the combined system outperforms all standalone systems.  Ia meningkatkan F0. 5 skor dengan 3.61% apabila menggabungkan dua sistem berpartisipasi terbaik dalam tugas berkongsi BEA 2019, dan mencapai F0. 5 skor 73.08%. Kami juga melakukan eksperimen untuk membandingkan pendekatan IP kami dengan kaedah kombinasi sistem terbaik lain untuk GEC, menunjukkan kemampuan kombinasi kompetitif IP.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodu ta’ kombinazzjoni tas-sistema għall-korrezzjoni ta’ żbalji grammatiċi (GEC), ibbażat fuq ipprogrammar mhux lineari ta’ numru sħiħ (IP). Il-metodu tagħna ottimizza għan ġdid tal-punteġġ F ibbażat fuq tipi ta’ żbalji, u jikkombina diversi sistemi GEC minn tarf sa tarf. L-approċċ IP propost ottimizza l-għa żla tal-aħjar sistema waħda għal kull tip ta’ żball grammatiku preżenti fid-dejta. L-esperimenti tal-approċċ IP dwar il-kombinazzjoni ta’ sistemi tal-GEC awtonomi tal-aktar avvanzati juru li s-sistema kkombinata taqbeż is-sistemi awtonomi kollha. Jittejjeb F0. 5 punteġġ bi 3.61% meta jiġu kkombinati ż-żewġ sistemi l-aħjar parteċipanti fil-kompitu kondiviż BEA 2019, u jikseb F0. 5 punteġġ ta’ 73.08%. Aħna nagħmlu wkoll esperimenti biex inqabblu l-approċċ IP tagħna ma’ metodu ieħor ta’ kombinazzjoni tas-sistema l-aktar avvanzat għall-GEC, li juri l-kapaċità kompetittiva ta’ kombinazzjoni tal-IP.', 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d തെറ്റിനുള്ള സിസ്റ്റം കൂട്ടുക രീതി നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പിശക് തരം അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഒരു നോവല്\u200d എഫ് സ്കോര്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200dട്ടിനെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരുപാട് അവസാനിക്കുന് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഐപി നടപടി ഡാറ്റായിലുള്ള എല്ലാ ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന ഓരോ പിശകിനും ഒരു  കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dത്ത സിസ്റ്റം ജിസി സിസ്റ്റം കൂട്ടുമ്പോള്\u200d ഐപി പ്രോഗത്തിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു അത് F0 മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തും. BEA 2019-ലെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പങ്കെടുക്കുന്ന രണ്ട് സിസ്റ്റീമുകളെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d 5 സ്കോര്\u200d 3. 61% കൊണ്ട് എഫ്0 ന്  73. 08%. We also perform experiments to compare our IP approach with another state-of-the-art system combination method for GEC, demonstrating IP's competitive combination capability.", 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ სისტემის კომბინეციური მეტი გრამიტური შეცდომის კომბინეციის (GEC) განსაზღვრება, რომელიც არლინიერი მთელი პროგრამიზაციის ჩვენი მეტი პრომენტის F წერტილის მიზეზი მიზეზიან შეცდომების ტიპების ბაზეზი და GEC სისტემის ბევრი დასასრულებაში შემყვებს. პროგრამეტური IP მიღება მონაცემებისთვის ერთადერთი უკეთესი სისტემის არჩევა ყველა გრამეტური შეცდომა ტიპის მონაცემებისთვის. IP მოწყობილობის გამოცდილება GEC სისტემების განმავლობაში, რომელიც კომბიზებული სისტემები ყველა განმავლობაში გავაკეთებს. ეს უფრო მეტია F0. 5 წერტილი 3,61% დამატებით, როცა ორი ნაი-საკეთესო დამატებული სისტემის გადამატებით BEA 2019 წერტილი საქმე, და F0 მიიღებს. 5 წერტილი 73.08%. ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთებთ ექსპერიმენტები, რომ ჩვენი IP პროგრამის შესაბამისთვის სხვა სისტემის კომბიუნციური მეტი GEC-სთვის, რომელიც IP-ის კომბიუნციური კო', 'pl': 'W artykule zaproponowano metodę kombinacji systemów korekcji błędów gramatycznych (GEC), opartą na nieliniowym programowaniu całkowitym (IP). Nasza metoda optymalizuje nowy cel punktu F w oparciu o typy błędów i łączy wiele kompleksowych systemów GEC. Proponowane podejście IP optymalizuje wybór pojedynczego najlepszego systemu dla każdego typu błędu gramatycznego obecnego w danych. Eksperymenty podejścia IP dotyczące łączenia najnowocześniejszych samodzielnych systemów GEC pokazują, że połączony system przewyższa wszystkie samodzielne systemy. Poprawia F0. 5-wynik o 3,61% przy połączeniu dwóch najlepszych systemów uczestniczących w wspólnym zadaniu BEA 2019 i osiągnięciu F0. 5-wynik 73,08%. Przeprowadzamy również eksperymenty w celu porównania naszego podejścia IP z inną najnowocześniejszą metodą łączenia systemów dla GEC, wykazując konkurencyjne możliwości łączenia IP.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem o metodă de combinație de sistem pentru corectarea erorilor gramaticale (GEC), bazată pe programarea întregilor neliniare (IP). Metoda noastră optimizează un nou obiectiv de scor F bazat pe tipurile de erori și combină mai multe sisteme GEC end-to-end. Abordarea IP propusă optimizează selectarea unui singur sistem cel mai bun pentru fiecare tip de eroare gramaticală prezent în date. Experimentele abordării IP privind combinarea sistemelor GEC independente de ultimă generație arată că sistemul combinat depășește toate sistemele independente. Îmbunătăţeşte F0. 5 punctează cu 3,61% atunci când combină cele mai bune două sisteme participante în sarcina comună BEA 2019 și atinge F0. 5 scor de 73,08%. De asemenea, efectuăm experimente pentru a compara abordarea noastră IP cu o altă metodă de combinație de sisteme de ultimă generație pentru GEC, demonstrând capacitatea competitivă de combinație a IP.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид грамматикийн алдаа зөвшөөрүүлэх (GEC) системийн нэгтгэл аргыг сануулдаг. Бидний арга нь F оноо зорилгоог алдаа төрлийн төрлийн үндсэн, олон төрлийн GEC системийг нэгтгэдэг. Өөрчлөлтийн IP арга баримт өгөгдлийн грамматик алдаа бүрийн хамгийн сайн системийн сонголтыг сайжруулдаг. GEC системийг нэгтгэх IP арга хэмжээний туршилтын туршилт нь холбоотой систем бүх ганцаараа үйлдвэрлэж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулдаг. Энэ нь F0-г сайжруулдаг. BEA 2019 оны хамгийн сайн оролцогчдын системийг нэгтгэхэд 3.61% тооны хувьд 5 тооны хувьд, F0-г гаргадаг. 5 тоо 73.08%. Мөн бид IP аргыг GEC-ийн өөр төрлийн урлагийн системтэй харьцуулахын тулд туршилт хийдэг. IP-ийн өрсөлдөөний нийлүүлэлтийн чадварыг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi eit systemkombinasjonsmetode for grammatisk feilretting (GEC), basert på ikkje-lineær heiltalprogramming (IP). Metoden vårt optimaliserer eit nytt F- poengmål basert på feiltypar, og kombinerer fleire GEC- systemar til slutten. Den foreslåde IP-tilnærminga optimaliserer utvalet av ei enkelt beste system for kvar grammatisk feiltype som finst i data. Eksperimentar av IP-tilnærminga ved kombinasjon av GEC-systemet som er samstundes for kunsten viser at kombinasjonssystemet utfører alle samstundes systemar. Det forbetrar F0. 5 poeng med 3,61% når det kombinerer to beste deltakende systema i BEA 2019 delt oppgåve, og når det gjer F0. 5 poeng med 73,08%. Vi utfører også eksperimenter for å samanlikna IP-tilnærminga vårt med ein annen kombinasjonsmetode for kjøringssystemet for GEC, som demonstrerer komprimeringskapasiteten for IP.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxan ku qoran qoraalka, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab u soo wadashada nidaamka oo lagu hagaajiyo xaflada grammatika (GEC), iyadoo ku saleysan programming la-integer (IP). Metalkeena waxaa loo bedelaa saxda F-score oo ku saleysan noocyada qaladka, wuxuuna isku biiriyaa nidaamka GEC ee ugu dambeeya dhamaadka. Dhaqdhaqaaqa IP ee la soo jeeday wuxuu optimizaa doorashada nidaam kaliya ee ugu wanaagsan oo u qoran caymiska khaladda grammatika ee macluumaadka ku jira. Imtixaanka IP-ka ee ku xidhiidha xaaladda-art-alone GEC-systemka waxay muujiyaan in nidaamka isku-xidhan uu soo saaraa nidaamka oo dhan oo taagan. waxay kordhisaa F0. 5 score waxay ku jirtaa 3.61% marka la isku biiriyo labada nidaam ee ugu fiican qayb-qayb-gelinta BEA 2019, waxayna gaadhaa F0. 5 koox oo ah 73,08 boqolkiiba. Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa imtixaanka aan IP-ka dhigno qaab kale oo ay u sameyn karto xaalad kale oo farshaxan ah ee GEC, oo muujinta awoodda iskutallada IP.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi en systemkombinationsmetod för grammatisk felkorrigering (GEC), baserad på icke-linjär heltalsprogrammering (IP). Vår metod optimerar ett nytt F-poängmål baserat på feltyper och kombinerar flera end-to-end GEC-system. Den föreslagna IP-metoden optimerar valet av ett enda bästa system för varje grammatisk feltyp som finns i data. Experiment av IP-metoden med att kombinera toppmoderna fristående GEC-system visar att det kombinerade systemet överträffar alla fristående system. Det förbättrar F0. 5 poäng med 3,61% när de två bästa deltagande systemen kombineras i BEA 2019 delade uppgift, och uppnår F0. 5 poäng på 73,08%. Vi utför också experiment för att jämföra vår IP-metod med en annan state-of-the-art systemkombinationsmetod för GEC, vilket visar IP:s konkurrenskraftiga kombinationsförmåga.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo sistemski metod kombinacije za gramatičku korekciju grešaka (GEC), zasnovan na neolinearnom celom programiranju (IP). Naša metoda optimizira objekt novog F rezultata na osnovu tipa greška i kombinira višestruke sisteme GEC-a do kraja. Predloženi pristup IP optimizira izbor jednog najboljeg sistema za svaku gramatičku vrstu greške koji su prisutni u podacima. Eksperimenti IP pristupa kombinacije stanja umjetnosti samih GEC sustava pokazuju da kombinacijski sistem iznosi sve sami sisteme. Poboljšava F0. 5 rezultata za 3,61% kada se kombinira dva najbolja sudjelujuća sistema u zajedničkom zadatku BEA 2019 i postigne F0. 5 rezultata 73,08%. Takođe izvodimo eksperimente da usporedimo naš IP pristup sa drugim metodom kombinacije stanja umetnosti za GEC, pokazujući konkurentnu sposobnost kombinacije IP-a.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் வரையறை பிழை திருத்தம் (GEC), அடிப்படையிலான முழு முழு நிரல் நிரலில் அடிப்படையிலாக ஒரு அமைப்பு இணைப்பு  எங்கள் முறைமை பிழை வகைகளை அடிப்படையில் ஒரு புதிய F மதிப்பு பொருளை முன்னேற்றுகிறது, பல முடிவு முடிவில் இருந்து முடிவ The proposed IP approach optimizes the selection of a single best system for each grammatical error type in the data. IP செயல்பாட்டின் சோதனை அது F0 மேம்படுத்துகிறது. BEA 2019ல் இரண்டு சிறந்த பங்கீட்டு அமைப்புகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கும்போது 5 புள்ளிகள் 3. 61% பெருக்கினால் F0 பெறுகிறது. 73. 08 சதவிகிதம் 5 புள்ளி ஜிஜிசிக்கான மற்றொரு நிலையில் கலை முறைமையை ஒப்பிடுவதற்காக நாம் எங்கள் IP முறைமையை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம், ஐபின் போராட்டியான இண', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ විධානයක් සැකසුම් විධානය (GEC) සඳහා පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ විධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශ අපේ විධානය F ස්කෝර් අක්ෂේත්මයක් වැරදි වර්ගයක් අධාරිත විදිහට සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, සහ GEC පද්ධතියක් අවසා ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත IP ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා දත්තේ තියෙන හොඳම පද්ධතියක් තෝරාගන්න හොඳම පද්ධතියක් තෝරාගන්න. IP පරීක්ෂණයේ පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් GEC පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ සියලුම පද්ධතිය සියලුම ස්ථානය ප ඒක F0 වැඩ කරනවා. BEA 2019 වැඩි වැඩේ හොඳම පද්ධති දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ 3.61% විතරයි, ඒ වගේම F0 වෙනුවෙන්. 73.08% අංක 5. අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා අපේ IP විදියට GEC වෙනුවෙන් තත්වය සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, IP ගේ සම්බන්ධ', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک سیستم کی ترکیب طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں گراماتیکی خطا اصلاح (GEC) کے لئے، نالینیاری تمام پوروگرامینگ (IP) پر بنیاد. ہمارا طریقہ ایک نوم F اسکور موجود کو غلط طریقوں پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے اور بہت سی سیستموں کو جمع کرتا ہے۔ پیشنهاد IP تقریبا ایک بہترین سیسٹم کا انتخاب کرتا ہے ہر گراماتیکی خطا ٹائپ کے لئے جو دکھائی میں موجود ہے. IP دستور کی آزمائش جو GEC سیسٹموں کے سامنے استاندارٹ کی حالت میں جمع کرتی ہے وہ دکھاتا ہے کہ جمع سیسٹم تمام استاندارٹ سیسٹموں سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ یہ F0 کو بہتر کرتا ہے. جب BEA 2019 میں دو بہترین مشارکت سیستموں کو ترکیب کرنے کے لئے 3.61% سے پانچ اسکور کرتا ہے اور F0 کو پہنچتا ہے۔ 73.08% کی 5 اسکور۔ ہم نے بھی آزمائش کیا ہے کہ ہمارے IP طریقے کو GEC کے لئے دوسرے ایٹیٹ سیستم کی ترکیب طریقے سے مقایسہ کرنے کے لئے اور IP کی ترکیب قابلیت کو دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz qoʻllanmalar qoʻshish uchun grammatikal xato toʻgʻri (GEC) asosida yaratilgan tizimni birlashtirish usulini tahrirlash. Bizning usulida xato turlari asosida yangi F score obʼektini moslash va bir nechta oxirgi GEC tizimini birlashtirish. Name Name U F0'ni oshadi. 5 score by 3.61% when combining the two best participating systems in the BEA 2019 shared task, and achieves F0. 73. 08%. Biz IP usulini GEC uchun boshqa holat-sanat tizim birlashtirish usulini bajaramiz va IP'ning kompyuterga qo'yish imkoniyatini koʻrsatish.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp tổ hợp hệ thống để sửa lỗi sai sai sai theo cả từ trình độ không tuyến (IP). Cách của chúng tôi tối đa một mục tiêu số điểm F mới, dựa trên các kiểu lỗi, và kết hợp nhiều hệ thống trí tuệ khắp nơi. Cách tiếp cận IP dự kiến tối ưu chọn một hệ thống tốt nhất cho mỗi kiểu lỗi sai theo ngữ pháp có trong dữ liệu. Thử nghiệm phương pháp IP nhằm kết hợp các hệ thống duy nhất của GEC vượt trội cho thấy rằng hệ thống cấu trúc hoàn toàn vượt trội. Nó cải thiện con F0. Năm điểm bằng 3.61. khi kết hợp hai hệ thống tham gia tốt nhất trong nhiệm vụ được chia sẻ của Bear và đạt được F0. 5 ghi số 73.08 Name Chúng tôi cũng làm thí nghiệm để so s ánh phương pháp IP với một phương pháp tổ hợp hệ thống kiểu hiện đại khác cho GEC, hiển thị khả năng kết hợp cạnh tranh của IP.', 'da': "I denne artikel foreslår vi en systemkombination metode til grammatisk fejlkorrektion (GEC), baseret på ikke-lineær heltalsprogrammering (IP). Vores metode optimerer et nyt F score mål baseret på fejltyper og kombinerer flere end-to-end GEC-systemer. Den foreslåede IP-tilgang optimerer udvælgelsen af et enkelt bedste system for hver grammatisk fejltype til stede i dataene. Eksperimenter med IP-metoden med at kombinere state-of-the-art enkeltstående GEC-systemer viser, at det kombinerede system overgår alle enkeltstående systemer. Det forbedrer F0. 5 scorer med 3,61% ved at kombinere de to bedste deltagende systemer i BEA 2019 delte opgave, og opnår F0. 5 score på 73,08%. Vi udfører også eksperimenter for at sammenligne vores IP-tilgang med en anden state-of-the-art systemkombinationsmetode til GEC, der demonstrerer IP's konkurrencedygtige kombinationskapacitet.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме системен комбиниран метод за корекция на граматични грешки (ГЕК), базиран на нелинейно програмиране на цели числа (ИП). Нашият метод оптимизира нова цел за оценка въз основа на типовете грешки и комбинира множество системи от край до край. Предложеният подход оптимизира избора на една единствена най-добра система за всеки тип граматична грешка, присъстваща в данните. Експериментите на подхода за комбиниране на най-съвременни самостоятелни системи показват, че комбинираната система надминава всички самостоятелни системи. Подобрява F0. 5 точки с 3.61% при комбиниране на двете най-добри участващи системи в споделената задача и постига Ф0. 5 резултат от 73,08%. Също така извършваме експерименти, за да сравним нашия подход с друг съвременен метод за комбиниране на системи за ГЕК, демонстрирайки конкурентната комбинация на ИП.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu kombinacije sustava za korištenje gramatičkih grešaka (GEC), temeljenu na neolinearnom cijelom programiranju (IP). Naša metoda optimizira cilj novog F rezultata na temelju tipa grešaka i kombinira višestruke sustave GEC-a do kraja. Predloženi pristup IP optimizira izbor jednog najboljeg sustava za svaku gramatičku vrstu greške u podacima. Eksperimenti pristupa IP-a o kombiniranju stanja umjetnosti samih GEC sustava pokazuju da kombinirani sustav iznosi sve sami sustave. Poboljšava F0. 5 rezultata za 3,61% kada se kombiniraju dva najbolja sudjelovanja sustava u zajedničkom zadatku BEA 2019 i postigne F0. 5 rezultata 73,08%. Također provodimo eksperimente kako bi usporedili naš IP pristup s drugim metodom kombinacije stanja umjetnosti za GEC, pokazujući konkurentnu sposobnost kombinacije IP-a.', 'nl': "In dit artikel stellen we een systeemcombinatiemethode voor grammaticale foutcorrectie (GEC) voor, gebaseerd op niet-lineaire integer programmering (IP). Onze methode optimaliseert een nieuw F score objectief op basis van fouttypen en combineert meerdere end-to-end GEC systemen. De voorgestelde IP-benadering optimaliseert de selectie van een enkel best systeem voor elk grammaticale fouttype aanwezig in de gegevens. Experimenten met de IP-benadering om state-of-the-art standalone GEC-systemen te combineren tonen aan dat het gecombineerde systeem beter presteert dan alle standalone systemen. Het verbetert F0. 5 score met 3.61% bij het combineren van de twee best deelnemende systemen in de BEA 2019 gedeelde taak, en behaalt F0. 5 score van 73,08%. We voeren ook experimenten uit om onze IP-benadering te vergelijken met een andere state-of-the-art systeemcombinatiemethode voor GEC, waardoor IP's concurrerende combinatiemogelijkheden aantoont.", 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine Systemkombinationsmethode zur grammatischen Fehlerkorrektur (GEC) vor, die auf der nichtlinearen Ganzzahlprogrammierung (IP) basiert. Unsere Methode optimiert ein neuartiges F-Score-Ziel basierend auf Fehlertypen und kombiniert mehrere End-to-End GEC-Systeme. Der vorgeschlagene IP-Ansatz optimiert die Auswahl eines einzigen besten Systems für jeden grammatikalischen Fehlertyp, der in den Daten vorhanden ist. Experimente des IP-Ansatzes zur Kombination modernster eigenständiger GEC-Systeme zeigen, dass das kombinierte System alle eigenständigen Systeme übertrifft. Es verbessert F0. 5-Punkte um 3,61% bei Kombination der beiden am besten teilnehmenden Systeme in der gemeinsamen Aufgabe BEA 2019 und erreicht F0. 5-Punktzahl von 73,08%. Wir führen auch Experimente durch, um unseren IP-Ansatz mit einer anderen hochmodernen Systemkombinationsmethode für GEC zu vergleichen und die wettbewerbsfähige Kombinationsfähigkeit von IP zu demonstrieren.', 'id': "In this paper, we propose a system combination method for grammatical error correction (GEC), based on nonlinear integer programming (IP).  Metode kami optimisasi objek skor F baru berdasarkan tipe kesalahan, dan menggabungkan beberapa sistem GEC akhir-akhir. pendekatan IP yang diusulkan optimisasi pemilihan satu sistem terbaik untuk setiap tipe kesalahan grammatik yang ada dalam data. Eksperimen pendekatan IP pada kombinasi sistem GEC standar state-of-the-art menunjukkan bahwa sistem kombinasi melampaui semua sistem standar. Ini meningkatkan F0. 5 skor dengan 3,61% ketika menggabungkan dua sistem berpartisipasi terbaik dalam BEA 2019 berbagi tugas, dan mencapai F0. 5 skor 73,08%. We also perform experiments to compare our IP approach with another state-of-the-art system combination method for GEC, demonstrating IP's competitive combination capability.", 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia ya muunganiko wa mfumo kwa ajili ya uharibifu wa makosa ya grammatiki (GEC), kwa kutumia programu ya jumla isiyo na msingi (IP). Utawala wetu unawezesha lengo la riwaya F kwa kutumia aina mbalimbali za makosa, na kuunganisha mfumo wa GEC mwishoni mwa mwisho. Mtandao wa IP unapendekezwa unawezesha uchaguzi wa mfumo mzuri wa kila a in a ya makosa ya kigrammatiki inayopatikana kwenye taarifa. Tatizo la mbinu za IP kuhusu kuunganisha hali ya msimamo wa sanaa za GEC zinaonyesha kwamba mfumo wa pamoja unafanya mifumo yote ya msimamo pekee. Inaboresha F0. 5 score by 3.61% when combining the two best participating systems in the BEA 2019 shared task, and achieves F0. score 5 ya asilimia 73.08. Pia tunafanya majaribio ili kulinganisha mbinu yetu ya IP na njia nyingine ya mfumo wa mfumo wa mfumo wa sanaa kwa ajili ya GEC, kuonyesha uwezo wa kuunganisha mashindano ya IP.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, gramatik hata düzeltmek üçin sistem kombinatsiyasyny teklip edip görýäris (GEC), çyzgylyk beýleki rakam programlamasyna daýanýar. Biziň ýüregimiz hata hillere daýanýan bir F sanat hedefini optimizeýär we birnäçe soňra GEC sistemlerini birleşdirýär. Önerlenen IP yaklaýyşy hemme gramatik hata hili üçin ýeke bir sistemiň seçgisini optimizlaýar. IP yaklaýyşynyň GEC sistemleriniň birleştirme durumynda ýalňyşlyk sistemleriniň birleşmesinde çykyp bilýär. F0 gowy görýär. BEA 2019-njy paýlaşan işi bilen 2 iň gowy goşulýan sistemalary birleşdirýände 5 sany 3.61% we F0 tapylýar. 5 sany 73.08%. Biz hem IP ýagdaýymyzy GEC üçin başga bir ýagdaýynda s üýtgetmek üçin deneyleri çykarýarys. IP ýagdaýynyň döwletli birleşme ukyplaryny görkez.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, propozojmë një metodë kombinimi të sistemit për korrektimin e gabimeve grammatike (GEC), bazuar në programimin jo-linear të numrave të plota (IP). Metoda jonë optimizon një objektiv të ri rezultati F bazuar në tipet e gabimeve dhe kombinon shumë sisteme GEC nga fundi në fund. Përqasja e propozuar IP optimizon zgjedhjen e një sistemi të vetëm më të mirë për çdo lloj gabimi grammatik të pranishëm në të dhënat. Eksperimentet e qasjes IP mbi kombinimin e sistemeve GEC të pavarur të state-of-the-art tregojnë se sistemi i kombinuar mbizotëron të gjitha sistemet e pavarur. Kjo përmirëson F0. 5 shënon me 3.61% kur kombinojnë dy sistemet më të mira pjesëmarrëse në detyrën e përbashkët të BEA 2019 dhe arrin F0. 5 pikë 73.08%. Ne kryejmë gjithashtu eksperimente për të krahasuar qasjen tonë IP me një metodë tjetër të kombinimit të sistemit më të lartë për GEC, duke demonstruar aftësinë e kombinimit konkurrues të IP.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما روش ترکیب سیستم برای اصلاح خطای گراماتیک (GEC) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، بر اساس برنامه\u200cریزی کل\u200cهای ناخط (IP). روش ما یک هدف نقطه F نویس را بر اساس نوع خطا بهترین می\u200cکند و سیستم\u200cهای GEC متعدد می\u200cکند. دستور پیشنهاد IP انتخاب یک سیستم بهترین برای هر نوع خطای گراماتیک که در داده\u200cها وجود دارد بهترین می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cهایی از طریق IP در ترکیب سیستم\u200cهای GEC تنها ایالت هنر نشان می\u200cدهند که سیستم ترکیب تمام سیستم\u200cهای تنهایی را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد. F0 رو بهتر ميکنه پنج امتیاز با ۳.۶۱ درصد وقتی دو سیستم\u200cهای بهترین مشترک در کار مشترک BEA 2019 را ترکیب می\u200cکند و F0 را می\u200cرساند. 5 امتياز 73.08%. ما همچنین آزمایش\u200cها را انجام می\u200cدهیم تا طریق IP را با یک روش ترکیب سیستم هنری دیگر برای GEC مقایسه کنیم، و نشان می\u200cدهیم توانایی ترکیب پیوند IP را نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም ውስጥ ሳይlinear አካባቢ ፕሮግራም (IP) የተመሳሳይ የgrammatical ስህተት ማቀናጃ የስርዓት ማቀናጃ ሥርዓት እናሳልቃለን፡፡ የኢሜይል አካሄዱን የስህተት ዓይነቶች በመሠረት የሚደረገውን የነጥብ F score አካባቢ እና ብዙ መጨረሻ ወደ መጨረሻ የGEC ስርዓቶች እንዲያቆማል፡፡ የተዘጋጀው የIP ሥርዓት መግለጫ በአዳራዎች ውስጥ ላለው የግራማቲካዊ ስህተት ዓይነት የተደረገውን የተመረጠውን የተሻለ ስርዓት ይሻላል። የIP ሥርዓት ፈተናዎች የ-የ-art-ብቻውን GEC ስርዓቶች ማቀናቀል የሚያሳየው የግንኙነቱ ስርዓት ሁሉ ብቻውን ስርዓት እንዲያወጣ ነው፡፡ F0 ይሻላል። 5 ነጥብ በ3.61 በመቶ በBEA 2019 የተለየውን ሁለቱን የበለጠ ተካፋፊዎች ሲያሰናከል F0 ሲደርስ ነው፡፡ 5 ነጥብ 73.08 በመቶ እና የIP ተቃዋሚውን አካባቢ እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'ko': '본고는 비선형 정수 계획(IP)을 바탕으로 하는 문법 오류 수정 시스템 조합 방법(GEC)을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 오류 유형을 바탕으로 새로운 F 점수 목표를 최적화하고 여러 개의 끝에서 끝까지의 GEC 시스템을 결합시켰다.제안된 IP 메서드는 데이터에 존재하는 각 구문 오류 유형에 대해 단일 최적 시스템 선택을 최적화합니다.IP 방법은 가장 선진적인 독립 GEC 시스템을 조합하는 실험에서 조합 시스템의 성능이 모든 독립 시스템보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.F0이 향상되었습니다.5. BEA 2019 공유 퀘스트에서 두 개의 최적 참여 시스템을 결합하여 3.61%를 득점하여 F0에 도달한다.5점으로 73.08%를 차지했다.우리는 또한 우리의 IP 방법과 GEC의 또 다른 가장 선진적인 시스템 조합 방법을 비교하여 IP의 경쟁 조합 능력을 보여 주었다.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք համակարգի համադրման մեթոդ գրամատիկական սխալների ուղղության համար, հիմնված ոչ գծային ամբողջ թվերի ծրագրավորումների վրա (IP). Մեր մեթոդը օպտիմացնում է F-ի նոր գնահատականը, հիմնված սխալների տեսակների վրա, և համադրում է բազմաթիվ վերջ-վերջ գենետիկ համակարգեր: Պատրաստված IP մոտեցումը օպտիմացնում է տվյալներում գտնվող յուրաքանչյուր գրամատիկ սխալների համար ընտրված մեկ լավագույն համակարգի ընտրությունը: Ինտերնետային մոտեցումների փորձարկումները, որոնք վերաբերում են ամենաբարձր առանձին համակարգերին, ցույց են տալիս, որ համակարգը գերազանցում է բոլոր առանձին համակարգերին: Այն բարելավում է F0-ը: 5 գնահատում է 3.61 տոկոսով, երբ միավորվում են 2019-ի BEA-ի երկու լավագույն մասնակցության համակարգերը, և հասնում է F0-ին: 73.8 տոկոսի 5 գնահատականը: Մենք նաև փորձեր ենք կատարում, որպեսզի համեմատենք մեր IP մոտեցումը մեկ այլ լավագույն համակարգի համադրման մեթոդի հետ, որը ցույց է տալիս IP-ի մրցակցության համադրման ունակությունը:', 'az': "Bu kağızda, gramatik xəta düzəltməsi (GEC) üçün sistem kombinatsiyası metodlarını təklif edirik, səhifələri olmayan bütün sayı proqrammalarına dayanan. Bizim metodumuz xəta növlərinə dayanan yeni F score objektisini optimizləyir və çoxlu end-to-end GEC sistemlərini birləşdirir. Məlumatlarda olan hər grammatik xəta növü üçün bir sistemin seçimini optimizləyir. GEC sistemlərini birləşdirmək üçün IP təcrübəsinin təcrübəsi ilə birləşdirilməsi göstərir ki, birləşdirilmiş sistemin bütün tək-təkrar sistemlərindən üstün olduğunu göstərir. Bu F0'u yaxşılaşdırır. BEA 2019 ilə paylaşan işləri birləşdirdikdə 2 yaxşı paylaşan sistemləri birləşdirdikdə 5 dəqiqə 3,61%-ə verir və F0'u başa çatdırır. 5 puç 73,08%. Biz həmçinin IP metodlarını GEC üçün başqa bir şəkildə-sanat sistemi kombinatsiyası metodları ilə qarşılaşdırmaq üçün təcrübələr etdik, IP müəllif kombinatsiyası qabiliyyətini göstərdik.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা গ্রামাটিক্যাল ত্রুটিক সংশোধনের জন্য একটি সিস্টেম সম্মিলন পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি অলাইনিয়ার ইউনিটার প্রোগ্রাম আমাদের পদ্ধতি ভুল ধরনের ভিত্তিতে একটি নভেল F স্কোরের উদ্দেশ্য অপ্রায়শিক্ষা করে এবং বেশ কয়েকটি শেষ-পর্যন্ত GEC সিস্টেম প্রস্তাবিত আইপি পদক্ষেপ তথ্যে উপস্থিত প্রত্যেক গ্রামাটিক্যাল ত্রুটি ধরনের জন্য একটি সেরা সিস্টেমের নির্ব জিসি সিস্টেম সম্মিলন করার জন্য আইপি প্রতিক্রিয়ার পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে একত্রিত সিস্টেম সকল স্থানীয় সিস্টেমের এটা F0 এর উন্নতি। বিয়া ২০১৯ সালের দুই ভালো অংশগ্রহণকারী সিস্টেম সম্মিলন করে এবং এফ০ পেয়েছে। ৭৩. ০৮ শতাংশের ৫ স্কোর। এছাড়াও আমরা আমাদের আইপি প্রতিযোগিতার ক্ষমতা প্রদর্শন করি জিসির জন্য আরেকটি রাষ্ট্র-শিল্প-সিস্টেম সম্মিলনের মাধ্যমে তুলনা করার জন্য পরীক', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo sistemski kombinacijski metod za gramatičku korekciju greške (GEC), zasnovan na neolinearnom cijelom programiranju (IP). Naša metoda optimizira cilj novog F rezultata na temelju tipa grešaka i kombinira višestruke sisteme GEC-a do kraja. Predloženi pristup IP optimizira izbor jednog najboljeg sistema za svaku gramatičku vrstu greške koji su prisutni u podacima. Eksperimenti pristupa IP-a o kombinaciji stanja umjetnosti samih GEC sustava pokazuju da kombinacijski sistem nadmaže svim samim sistemima. Pobolji F0. 5 rezultata za 3,61% kada se kombinira dva najbolja sudjelujuća sistema u zajedničkom zadatku BEA 2019 i postigne F0. 5 rezultata 73,08%. Također izvršavamo eksperimente da usporedimo naš IP pristup sa drugim metodom kombinacije stanja umjetnosti za GEC, pokazujući konkurentnu sposobnost kombinacije IP-a.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, proposem un mètode de combinació del sistema per a corregir errors gramàtics (GEC), basat en programació no linear de nombres enters (IP). El nostre mètode optimitza un nou objectiu de puntuació F basat en tipus d'error i combina múltiples sistemes GEC de final a final. L'enfocament IP proposat optimitza la selecció d'un únic millor sistema per cada tipus d'error gramàtic present en les dades. Els experiments de l'enfocament IP en combinar els sistemes GEC autònoms d'última generació demostren que el sistema combinat supera tots els sistemes autònoms. millora F0. 5 puntuacions del 3,61% al combinar els dos millors sistemes participants de la BEA 2019 comparteixen tasca, i aconsegueix F0. 5 puntuacions del 73,08%. També fem experiments per comparar el nostre enfocament IP amb un altre mètode de combinació de sistema més avançat per a GEC, demostrant la capacitat de combinació competitiva de IP.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme metodu kombinace systémů pro korekci gramatických chyb (GEC), založenou na nelineárním celočíselném programování (IP). Naše metoda optimalizuje nový cíl F skóre založený na typech chyb a kombinuje více end-to-end GEC systémů. Navržený IP přístup optimalizuje výběr jednoho nejlepšího systému pro každý typ gramatické chyby přítomný v datech. Experimenty IP přístupu na kombinaci nejmodernějších samostatných systémů GEC ukazují, že kombinovaný systém překonává všechny samostatné systémy. Zlepšuje F0. 5.skóre o 3,61% při kombinaci dvou nejlepších účastnících se systémů ve sdíleném úkolu BEA 2019 a dosahuje F0. 5 skóre 73,08%. Dále provádíme experimenty pro porovnání našeho IP přístupu s jinou nejmodernější metodou kombinace systémů pro GEC, což prokáže konkurenční kombinační schopnost IP.', 'et': 'K채esolevas t철철s pakume v채lja s체steemikombinatsioonimeetodi grammatilise veaparanduse (GEC), mis p천hineb mittelineaarsel t채isarvuprogrammeerimisel (IP). Meie meetod optimeerib uut F skoori eesm채rki, mis p천hineb veat체체pidel ja 체hendab mitu otsast otsa GEC s체steemi. Pakutud IP l채henemine optimeerib 체he parima s체steemi valikut iga grammatilise veat체체bi jaoks andmetes. Intellektuaalomandi l채henemisviisi katsed kaasaegsete eraldiseisvate GEC-s체steemide kombineerimisel n채itavad, et kombineeritud s체steem 체letab k천iki eraldiseisvaid s체steeme. See parandab F0. 5 tulemus 3,61% v천rra, kui kombineerida kaks parimat osalevat s체steemi BEA 2019 jagatud 체lesandes, ja saavutab F0. 5 skoor 73, 08%. Samuti teeme katseid, et v천rrelda oma IP l채henemist teise kaasaegse GEC s체steemide kombinatsioonimeetodiga, n채idates IP konkurentsiv천imelist kombinatsiooniv천imet.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n stelsel kombinasie metode vir grammatiese fout korreksie (GEC), gebaseer op onlineêre heelgetal program (IP). Ons metode optimaliseer 'n roman F telling objekte gebaseer op fout tipes, en kombineer veelvuldige end-to-end GEC stelsels. Die voorgestelde IP-toegang optimaliseer die keuse van 'n enkele beste stelsel vir elke grammatiese fout tipe wat in die data voorsien is. Eksperimente van die IP-toegang op die kombinasie van state-of-the-art standalone GEC stelsels vertoon dat die kombinasie stelsel uitvoer alle standalone stelsels. Dit verbeter F0. 5 punte deur 3.61% wanneer die twee beste deelde stelsels in die BEA 2019 gemeenskap word en F0 bereik word. 5 telling van 73.08%. Ons het ook eksperimente uitgevoer om ons IP-toegang te vergelyk met 'n ander staat-van-die-kuns stelsel kombinasie metode vir GEC, wat die IP se samenskaplike kombinasie kapasiteit vertoon.", 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme system combination method for grammatical error correction (GEC), joka perustuu epälineaariseen kokonaislukuohjelmointiin (IP). Menetelmämme optimoi uuden F-pistetavoitteen virhetyyppeihin perustuen ja yhdistää useita end-to-end GEC-järjestelmiä. Ehdotettu IP-lähestymistapa optimoi yhden parhaan järjestelmän valinnan kullekin aineistossa esiintyvälle kielioppivirhetyypille. IP-menetelmän kokeilut huippuluokan erillisten GEC-järjestelmien yhdistämisestä osoittavat, että yhdistetty järjestelmä suoriutuu kaikista erillisistä järjestelmistä paremmin. Se parantaa F0:ta. 5 pistettä 3,61% yhdistettäessä kaksi parasta osallistuvaa järjestelmää BEA 2019 jaettuun tehtävään, ja saavuttaa F0. 5 pisteet 73,08%. Teemme myös kokeita, joissa verrataan IP-lähestymistapaamme toiseen GEC:n nykyaikaiseen järjestelmäyhdistelmämenetelmään ja osoitetaan IP:n kilpailukykyinen yhdistelmäkyky.', 'jv': 'In this paper, we proposal a System combining method for gram graphical error rection (GEC), supported on nonlinear entiger program (ip). Awakdhéwé sistem pertualisar batir F puntuan bukisakno batir urip, lan akeh sistem end-to-end GEC Global Gebudhak perintah barêng kelas ip nang sampeyan akeh-sampeyan GEC sistem sing ngawe barang nggawe sistem sing ditambah akeh saben. Punika dipoleh F0. 5 sampeyan luwih 3.60% sing ditambah sampeyan iki sistem sing wis dipun nggawe barang BEA 2011 lan sampeyan nganggo F0. 5 Puntuan We tamben effectual testing kanggo komparasi ning PID method sing wis ana karo state-of-the-art s sistem combining method nggo GEC, nggawe daemongken mbindeksi kapasitasi ip.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo metodo sistemske kombinacije za popravljanje slovničnih napak (GEC), ki temelji na nelinearnem programiranju celih števil (IP). Naša metoda optimizira nov cilj F ocene na podlagi vrst napak in združuje več sistemov GEC od konca do konca. Predlagani pristop IP optimizira izbiro enega najboljšega sistema za vsako vrsto slovnične napake, prisotne v podatkih. Poskusi pristopa IP pri kombiniranju najsodobnejših samostojnih GEC sistemov kažejo, da kombinirani sistem presega vse samostojne sisteme. Izboljša F0. 5 rezultat za 3,61% pri združevanju dveh najboljših sodelujočih sistemov v skupni nalogi BEA 2019 in doseže F0. 5 ocena 73,08%. Izvajamo tudi poskuse, s katerimi primerjamo naš IP pristop z drugo najsodobnejšo metodo kombinacije sistemov za GEC, kar dokazuje konkurenčno kombinacijo IP.', 'ha': "In this paper, we propose a system combination method for grammatical error correction (GEC), based on nonlinear integer programming (IP).  Tsarin Mu na amfani da wata nau'in F-nau'in gabani, yana ƙarfafa wasu na'urar GEC-daban-zuwa-ƙari. Tsarin IP da aka buƙata, yana son zaɓen shirin wata na'ura mai kyau wa kowace nau'in ɓata na grammaci wanda ke cikin data. Tajararin aikin IP da ke haɗa halin-state-of-the-art wanda ake tsaya na zaman shawarar GEC, yana nuna cewa, na'urar da suka koma ta samar da duk system masu da ke daidaita. Yana ƙara F0. 5 score by 3.61% idan sun haɗa biyu mafi kyaun shirin fassarar cikin BEA 2019, kuma ya isa F0. 5 nau'in 73,08%. Yana samun jarrabãwa dõmin mu sami aikin IP da wani halin-na-tsari na-sanar da GEC, kuma za mu nuna awon komai da IP.", 'bo': "In this paper, we propose a system combination method for grammatical error correction (GEC), based on nonlinear integer programming (IP). Our method optimizes a novel F score objective based on error types, and combines multiple end-to-end GEC systems. གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་IP་གཟུགས་སྟངས་ན་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་བདེན་བཤད་ཀྱི་རེད། Experiments of the IP approach on combining state-of-the-art standalone GEC systems show that the combined system outperforms all standalone systems. དེ་ནི་F0 ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད། BEA 2019་ཡི་དོན་ལ་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་པའི་དུས་ཚོད་ལ་ འགྲོ་སྐྱོད་རུང་བའི་མ་ལག་གཉིས་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡམས་པའི་སྐབས་ཀྱི་ཕྱུར་འགྲོ་བ་བྱུང 73.08% ཚིག་གྲངས 5 We also perform experiments to compare our IP approach with another state-of-the-art system combination method for GEC, demonstrating IP's competitive combination capability.", 'he': "בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שיטת שילוב מערכת לתיקון שגיאות גרמטית (GEC), מבוססת על תוכנת מספר שלם לא לינרית (IP). השיטה שלנו אופטימית אובייקטיבי ציון F חדש מבוסס על סוגי טעויות, ומשולבת מערכות GEC מרובות סוף-סוף. הגישה IP המוצעת אופטימית את הבחירה של מערכת אחת הטובה ביותר לכל סוג שגיאה גרמטית הנוכחי בנתונים. ניסויים של הגישה IP על שילוב מערכות GEC עצמאות מוקדמות מראים שהמערכת המשולבת מפעילה את כל מערכות עצמאות. זה משפר את F0. 5 נקודות ב-3.61% כששולבים את שתי המערכות השתתפות הטובות ביותר במשימה המשותפת של BEA 2019, ושיגים F0. 5 נקודות של 73.08%. We also perform experiments to compare our IP approach with another state-of-the-art system combination method for GEC, demonstrating IP's competitive combination capability."}
{'en': 'Naturalness Evaluation of Natural Language Generation in Task-oriented Dialogues Using BERT', 'ar': 'تقييم الطبيعة لتوليد اللغة الطبيعية في الحوارات الموجهة نحو المهام باستخدام BERT', 'pt': 'Avaliação de Naturalidade da Geração de Linguagem Natural em Diálogos Orientados a Tarefas Usando BERT', 'fr': "Évaluation de la naturalité de la génération du langage naturel dans les dialogues orientés sur les tâches à l'aide du BERT", 'es': 'Evaluación de la naturalidad de la generación de lenguaje natural en diálogos orientados a tareas mediante BERT', 'ja': 'BERTを使用した課題指向の対話における自然言語生成の自然性評価', 'ru': 'Оценка естественности генерации естественного языка в ориентированных на задачу диалогах с использованием BERT', 'zh': '用BERT对对自然语言自然性评估', 'hi': 'BERT का उपयोग कर कार्य उन्मुख संवादों में प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी का मूल्यांकन', 'ga': 'Meastóireacht Nádúrthachta ar Ghiniúint Teanga Nádúrtha in Idirphlé Tasc-dhírithe ag Úsáid CRET', 'ka': 'ბერტის გამოყენება', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση της φυσικότητας της δημιουργίας φυσικής γλώσσας σε διαλόγους προσανατολισμένους στα καθήκοντα χρησιμοποιώντας το BERT', 'hu': 'Természetes nyelv generálásának természetességi értékelése feladatorientált párbeszédekben BERT segítségével', 'it': 'Valutazione della naturalezza della generazione del linguaggio naturale in dialoghi orientati alle attività utilizzando BERT', 'kk': 'BERT қолданылатын тапсырманың бағытталған диалогтарында натуралдық тілді құру оқиғасы', 'ms': 'Naturalness Evaluation of Natural Language Generation in Task-oriented Dialogues Using BERT', 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ടി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ജോലികളില്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രജനനത്തിന്റെ സ്വാഭാവികമായ പരിശോധന', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл төрөлхтөн байгалийн үнэлгээ БЕРТ хэрэглэх', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni tan-Naturalità tal-Ġenerazzjoni tal-Lingwi Naturali f’Djalogi orjentati lejn ix-Xogħol bl-użu tal-BERT', 'lt': 'Gamtos kalbų generacijos gamtos vertinimas pagal užduotis orientuotuose dialoguose naudojant BERT', 'no': 'Naturelsevaluering av naturspråk generering i oppgåveorienterte dialogar ved bruk av BERT', 'pl': 'Ocena naturalności generowania języka naturalnego w dialogach zorientowanych na zadania przy użyciu BERT', 'mk': 'Оценка на природноста на генерацијата на природен јазик во дијалози ориентирани на задачите користејќи BERT', 'ro': 'Evaluarea naturalității generarii limbajului natural în dialoguri orientate spre sarcini folosind BERT', 'sr': 'Оцена природности генерације природног езика у диалоговима ориентираним на задаче користи BERT', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව නිර්මාණය සම්බන්ධතාවක් සංවාදයක් වෙනුවෙන් ස්වභාවික විශ්ලේෂණය', 'so': 'Qiimeynta dhalashada afka asalka ah ee isticmaalka BERT', 'sv': 'Naturlighetsutvärdering av generering av naturligt språk i arbetsinriktade dialoger med hjälp av BERT', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி உருவாக்கத்தின் சார்ந்த உரையாடலில் BERT பயன்படுத்தி இயல்பான மொழி உருவாக்கத்தின் மதிப்பு', 'ur': 'BERT کے استعمال کے لئے توسعہ کی طبیعی زبان پیدائش کی نسبت کی نابیعی ارزش', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tự nhiên đánh giá ngôn ngữ tự nhiên trong các hộp thoại hướng dẫn làm nhiệm vụ.', 'da': 'Evaluering af natursproggenerering i opgaveorienterede dialoger ved hjælp af BERT', 'nl': 'Naturaliteitsevaluatie van het genereren van natuurlijke taal in taakgerichte dialoog met behulp van BERT', 'hr': 'Evaluacija prirodnog jezika generacije prirodnog jezika u dijalogovima orijentiranim na zadatke korištenjem BERT-a', 'de': 'Natürlichkeitsbewertung der Generierung natürlicher Sprache in aufgabenorientierten Dialogen mit BERT', 'id': 'Evaluasi Kealaman dari Generasi Bahasa Alami dalam Dialog Orientasi Tugas Menggunakan BERT', 'sw': 'Uchunguzi wa Uzalishaji wa Lugha ya asili katika Dialoga zinazoelekezwa kazi kwa kutumia BERT', 'fa': 'ارزیابی طبیعی نسل زبان طبیعی در محاورهای مستقیم به کار استفاده از BERT', 'ko': 'BERT 기반의 임무형 대화 자연 언어 생성의 자연도 평가', 'bg': 'Оценка на естествеността на генерирането на естествен език в задачи ориентирани диалози с помощта на BERT', 'tr': "BERT'i ullanýan Tebiýal Dili Jeniýetlenýän Taýýarlama", 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i natyrës i Gjenerimit të Gjuhave Natyrore në Dialogët e orientuar në detyra duke përdorur BERT', 'af': 'Natuurlikheid Evaluering van Natuurlike Taal Generasie in Opdragorienteerde Dialoog Gebruik BERT', 'am': "BERT በተጠቃሚ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'T톛bi톛tli Dil M톛xluqat캼n캼n T톛bi톛tli Q톛rcl톛nm톛si', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի ստեղծման բնական գնահատականը գործի ուղղությամբ խոսակցություններում BER-ի օգտագործման միջոցով', 'bs': 'Evaluacija prirodnog jezika generacije prirodnog jezika u dijalogima orijentiranim na zadatku Koristeći BERT', 'bn': 'বিরেট ব্যবহার করে কাজ-পরিচিত ডায়ালগে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রজন্মের স্বাভাবিক মূল্যায়ন', 'ca': 'Naturalness Evaluation of Natural Language Generation in Task-oriented Dialogues Using BERT', 'cs': 'Hodnocení přirozenosti generování přirozeného jazyka v dialogech orientovaných na úkoly s využitím BERT', 'et': 'Loodusliku keele genereerimise looduslikkuse hindamine ülesandepõhistes dialoogides BERTi abil', 'fi': 'Luonnollisen kielen tuottamisen luonnollisuuden arviointi tehtävälähtöisissä vuoropuheluissa BERT:n avulla', 'jv': 'AllProgressBarUpdates', 'sk': 'Ocena naravnosti ustvarjanja naravnega jezika v nalogo usmerjenih dialogih z uporabo BERT', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'הערכה טבעית של יצירת שפות טבעיות בדיולוגים ממוקדים למשימות באמצעות BERT', 'bo': 'ལཱ་ཡུལ་གྱིས་མཐོང་སྣུམ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཀྱི་དཔྱད་ཚད་ལྟར་ཞིབ་འཇུག་སྟངས་འདྲ་བྱེད་སྤྱོད་ BERT'}
{'en': 'This paper presents an automatic method to evaluate the naturalness of natural language generation in dialogue systems. While this task was previously rendered through expensive and time-consuming human labor, we present this novel task of automatic naturalness evaluation of generated language. By fine-tuning the BERT model, our proposed naturalness evaluation method shows robust results and outperforms the baselines : support vector machines, bi-directional LSTMs, and BLEURT. In addition, the training speed and evaluation performance of naturalness model are improved by transfer learning from quality and informativeness linguistic knowledge.', 'fr': "Cet article présente une méthode automatique pour évaluer le caractère naturel de la génération du langage naturel dans les systèmes de dialogue. Alors que cette tâche était auparavant rendue par un travail humain coûteux et fastidieux, nous présentons cette nouvelle tâche d'évaluation automatique du naturel du langage généré. En affinant le modèle BERT, la méthode d'évaluation de la naturalité que nous proposons montre des résultats robustes et surpasse les lignes de base\xa0: machines à vecteurs de support, LSTM bidirectionnels et BLEURT. En outre, la vitesse de formation et les performances d'évaluation du modèle de naturalité sont améliorées par un apprentissage par transfert à partir de connaissances linguistiques de qualité et informatives.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um método automático para avaliar a naturalidade da geração de linguagem natural em sistemas de diálogo. Embora essa tarefa tenha sido anteriormente processada por meio de trabalho humano caro e demorado, apresentamos esta nova tarefa de avaliação automática da naturalidade da linguagem gerada. Ao ajustar o modelo BERT, nosso método de avaliação de naturalidade proposto mostra resultados robustos e supera as linhas de base: máquinas de vetor de suporte, LSTMs bidirecionais e BLEURT. Além disso, a velocidade de treinamento e o desempenho de avaliação do modelo de naturalidade são aprimorados pela transferência de aprendizado de conhecimento linguístico de qualidade e informatividade.', 'ar': 'يقدم هذا البحث طريقة آلية لتقييم طبيعية توليد اللغة الطبيعية في أنظمة الحوار. بينما تم تقديم هذه المهمة سابقًا من خلال عمالة بشرية باهظة الثمن وتستغرق وقتًا طويلاً ، فإننا نقدم هذه المهمة الجديدة المتمثلة في التقييم الطبيعي التلقائي للغة التي تم إنشاؤها. من خلال ضبط نموذج BERT ، تُظهر طريقتنا المقترحة لتقييم الطبيعة نتائج قوية وتتفوق على الخطوط الأساسية: آلات المتجهات الداعمة ، و LSTM ثنائية الاتجاه ، و BLEURT. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، تم تحسين سرعة التدريب وأداء التقييم لنموذج الطبيعة من خلال نقل التعلم من المعرفة اللغوية عالية الجودة والمعلوماتية.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un método automático para evaluar la naturalidad de la generación del lenguaje natural en los sistemas de diálogo. Si bien esta tarea se realizaba anteriormente a través de un trabajo humano costoso y lento, presentamos esta nueva tarea de evaluación automática de la naturalidad del lenguaje generado. Al ajustar el modelo BERT, nuestro método de evaluación de la naturalidad propuesto muestra resultados sólidos y supera a las líneas de base: máquinas de vectores de soporte, LSTM bidireccionales y BLEURT. Además, la velocidad de entrenamiento y el rendimiento de evaluación del modelo de naturalidad se mejoran mediante la transferencia del aprendizaje del conocimiento lingüístico de calidad e informatividad.', 'ja': '対話システムにおける自然言語生成の自然性を評価するための自動手法を提示した。このタスクは、以前は高価で時間のかかる人間の労働を通じてレンダリングされていましたが、生成された言語の自動自然性評価という新規のタスクを提示します。BERTモデルを微調整することにより、提案された自然性評価法は、堅牢な結果を示し、ベースラインを上回る：サポートベクターマシン、双方向LSTM、およびBLEURT。また，言語知識の質と情報性からの転移学習により，自然性モデルの訓練スピードと評価パフォーマンスを向上させる．', 'hi': 'यह पेपर संवाद प्रणालियों में प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी की स्वाभाविकता का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए एक स्वचालित विधि प्रस्तुत करता है। जबकि यह कार्य पहले महंगे और समय लेने वाले मानव श्रम के माध्यम से प्रदान किया गया था, हम उत्पन्न भाषा के स्वचालित प्राकृतिकता मूल्यांकन के इस उपन्यास कार्य को प्रस्तुत करते हैं। BERT मॉडल को ठीक-ट्यूनिंग करके, हमारी प्रस्तावित प्राकृतिकता मूल्यांकन विधि मजबूत परिणाम दिखाती है और बेसलाइन को मात देती है: वेक्टर मशीनों, द्वि-दिशात्मक LSTMs और BLEURT का समर्थन करें। इसके अलावा, प्राकृतिकता मॉडल के प्रशिक्षण की गति और मूल्यांकन प्रदर्शन को गुणवत्ता और सूचनात्मकता भाषाई ज्ञान से सीखने के हस्तांतरण द्वारा बेहतर बनाया जाता है।', 'zh': '本文发自评对话系统中自然语言生成自然性法。 虽前以贵耗时力成,而自言自自然性评新。 微BERT模样,自然性评见稳健,且优于基线:扶向量机,双向LSTMBLEURT。 至于质信息性移学,自然性形质性。', 'ru': 'В данной работе представлен автоматический метод оценки естественности генерации естественного языка в диалоговых системах. В то время как эта задача ранее выполнялась дорогостоящим и трудоемким человеческим трудом, мы представляем эту новую задачу автоматической оценки естественности сгенерированного языка. При тонкой настройке модели BERT предлагаемый нами метод оценки естественности показывает надежные результаты и превосходит базовые линии: опорные векторные машины, двунаправленные LSTM и BLEURT. Кроме того, скорость обучения и эффективность оценки модели естественности повышаются за счет передачи обучения на основе качественных и информативных лингвистических знаний.', 'ga': 'Cuirtear i láthair sa pháipéar seo modh uathoibríoch chun nádúrthacht giniúna nádúrtha teanga i gcórais chomhphlé a mheas. Cé gur tugadh an tasc seo roimhe seo trí shaothar daonna costasach agus am-íditheach, cuirimid i láthair an tasc nua seo maidir le measúnú uathoibríoch nádúrthachta ar theanga ginte. Trí mhúnla BERT a mhionchoigeartú, léiríonn ár modh measúnaithe nádúrthachta atá beartaithe torthaí láidre agus sáraíonn sé na bunlínte: meaisíní veicteora tacaíochta, LSTM déthreocha, agus BLEURT. Ina theannta sin, feabhsaítear luas oiliúna agus feidhmíocht mheastóireachta na samhla nádúrthachta trí fhoghlaim a aistriú ó eolas teanga cáilíochta agus faisnéiseach.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány egy automatikus módszert mutat be a természetes nyelvgeneráció természetességének értékelésére a párbeszédrendszerekben. Miközben ezt a feladatot korábban drága és időigényes emberi munkával végeztük, bemutatjuk a generált nyelv automatikus természetességértékelésének új feladatát. A BERT modell finomhangolásával javasolt természetességi értékelési módszerünk robusztus eredményeket mutat, és meghaladja az alapvonalakat: támogató vektorgépek, kétirányú LSTMs és BLEURT. Emellett a természetességi modell képzési sebességét és értékelési teljesítményét javítja a minőségi és információs nyelvtudásból származó tanulás átadásával.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს ავტომატური მეტი, რომელიც დიალოგური სისტემებში ნაირადი ენის წარმოიქმნის ნაირადგილურობას. თუმცა ეს საქმე წინ იყო ცოტა და დროის გამოყენებელი ადამიანის სამუშაო, ჩვენ ჩვენ ახლა ეს პრომენტიური სამუშაო დავამუშავებთ შექმნილი ენის ავტომატური ნატ BERT მოდელის შესახებ, ჩვენი მოძლევებული ნატრალურნალური განსაზღვრების მეტი ჩვენი შესახებ ძალიან წარმოდგენება და გავამუშავებს ბაზის ხაზები: ვაკტორის მაქსინტები, ორგანიზღვრებული LSTMs და BL დამატებით, ნატრალური მოდელის სწავლება და ინფორმატიურობის ინფორმატიურობის ინფორმატიკური ცნობიდან გასწავლებით გაუკეთებულია.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια αυτόματη μέθοδο αξιολόγησης της φυσικότητας της δημιουργίας φυσικής γλώσσας στα συστήματα διαλόγου. Ενώ αυτή η εργασία είχε προηγουμένως αποδοθεί μέσω δαπανηρής και χρονοβόρης ανθρώπινης εργασίας, παρουσιάζουμε αυτό το νέο έργο της αυτόματης αξιολόγησης της φυσικότητας της παραγόμενης γλώσσας. Με την τελειοποίηση του μοντέλου, η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος αξιολόγησης της φυσικότητας παρουσιάζει ισχυρά αποτελέσματα και ξεπερνά τις γραμμές βάσης: διανυσματικές μηχανές υποστήριξης, αμφίδρομη και BLEURT. Επιπλέον, η ταχύτητα κατάρτισης και η απόδοση αξιολόγησης του μοντέλου φυσικότητας βελτιώνονται με τη μεταφορά μάθησης από γλωσσικές γνώσεις ποιότητας και πληροφορικότητας.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un metodo automatico per valutare la naturalezza della generazione del linguaggio naturale nei sistemi di dialogo. Mentre questo compito è stato precedentemente reso attraverso costoso e dispendioso lavoro umano, presentiamo questo nuovo compito di valutazione automatica della naturalezza del linguaggio generato. Perfezionando il modello BERT, il nostro metodo di valutazione della naturalità proposto mostra risultati solidi e supera le linee di base: macchine vettoriali di supporto, LSTMs bidirezionali e BLEURT. Inoltre, la velocità di formazione e le prestazioni di valutazione del modello di naturalezza sono migliorate trasferendo l'apprendimento dalla conoscenza linguistica di qualità e informativa.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз диалог жүйелерінде табиғи тілдерді құру тәуелдігін бағалау үшін автоматты түрде тәсілді көрсетеді. Бұл тапсырма алдында бағатты және уақытты адамдардың жұмыс істеу арқылы көрсетілді, біз жасалған тілді автоматты түрде тәуелсіздік оқиғаны көрсетедік. BERT үлгісін дұрыс түзету арқылы, біздің негізгі нәтижелерді және негізгі сызықтарды көрсетеді: вектор машиналарын қолдау, екі бағытты LSTMs және BLEURT. Қосымша, натуралдық үлгісінің оқыту жылдамдығы мен оқыту мүмкіндігі сапатты және мәліметтік лингвистикалық білімдерден оқыту арқылы жақсартылады.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas automatinis metodas natūralios kalbos kūrimo natūralumui dialogo sistemose įvertinti. Nors ši užduotis anksčiau buvo atlikta dėl brangios ir ilgai trunkančios žmogaus darbo, mes pristatome šią naują užduotį, susijusią su automatiniu sukauptos kalbos natūralumo vertinimu. Patikslindami BERT model į, mūsų siūlomas natūralumo vertinimo metodas rodo patikimus rezultatus ir yra didesnis už bazines vertes: paramos vektorių mašinas, dvikryptis LSTM ir BLEURT. Be to, mokymo greitis ir gamtos modelio vertinimo rezultatai gerinami perduodant mokymąsi iš kokybiškų ir informacinių kalbų žinių.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan kaedah automatik untuk menilai kebiasaan generasi bahasa alam dalam sistem dialog. Sementara tugas ini dahulu dihasilkan melalui kerja manusia yang mahal dan memakan masa, kami memperkenalkan tugas baru ini untuk penilaian alami automatik bahasa yang dijana. Dengan menyesuaikan model BERT, kaedah penilaian keseluruhan yang kami cadangkan menunjukkan keputusan yang kuat dan melampaui garis dasar: mesin vektor sokongan, LSTM dua arah, dan BLEURT. Selain itu, kelajuan latihan dan prestasi penilaian model kebiasaan diperbaiki dengan pemindahan belajar dari kualiti dan maklumat pengetahuan bahasa.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta metodu awtomatiku biex tiġi evalwata n-natura tal-ġenerazzjoni naturali tal-lingwi fis-sistemi ta’ djalogu. Filwaqt li dan il-kompitu preċedentement sar permezz ta’ xogħol uman għali u li jieħu ħafna ħin, aħna nippreżentaw dan il-kompitu ġdid ta’ evalwazzjoni awtomatika tan-naturalità tal-lingwa ġġenerata. Billi l-mudell BERT jiġi rfinut, il-metodu ta’ evalwazzjoni tan-naturalità propost tagħna juri riżultati robusti u jaqbeż il-linji bażi: magni ta’ appoġġ għall-vetturi, LSTMs bidirezzjonali, u BLEURT. Barra minn hekk, il-veloċità tat-taħriġ u l-prestazzjoni tal-evalwazzjoni tal-mudell tan-naturalità jittejbu bit-trasferiment tat-tagħlim mill-għarfien lingwistiku tal-kwalità u tal-informatività.', 'mk': 'This paper presents an automatic method to evaluate the naturalness of natural language generation in dialogue systems.  Додека оваа задача претходно беше извршена преку скапа и временска човечка работа, ја претставуваме оваа нова задача на автоматска проценка на природноста на генерираниот јазик. Со финетизирање на моделот БЕРТ, нашиот предложен метод на проценка на природноста покажува силни резултати и ги надминува основните линии: машини за поддршка на векторите, двоупредени ЛСТМ и БЛЕРТ. Покрај тоа, брзината на обуката и извршноста на проценката на моделот на природноста се подобруваат со трансфер на учење од квалитетно и информативно јазичко знаење.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d സ്വാഭാഷ തലമുറതലമുറയുടെ സ്വാഭാവികമായ സ്വാഭാവികമായി പരിഗണിക്കാന്\u200d സ മുമ്പ് ഈ ജോലി വിലയ്ക്കും സമയം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന മനുഷ്യരുടെ ജോലിയിലൂടെ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരുന്നപ്പോള്\u200d, സ്വാഭാവികമായ സ ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡല്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d മാറ്റിക്കൊണ്ട്, നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച സ്വാഭാവികമായ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d രോബോസ്റ്റ് ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. ബേസ്റ്റലൈനുകള്\u200d പ് കൂടാതെ, സ്വാഭാവികമായ മോഡലിന്റെ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വേഗത്തിലും വിലയിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു. ഗുണവും വിവരങ്', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас диалог системд байгалийн хэлний бүтээлтийн байгалийн байгалийг үнэлэх автоматик аргыг харуулдаг. Энэ ажил өмнө нь үнэтэй, цаг хугацаанд хэрэглэдэг хүн төрөлхтний ажиллагаар рэндэрлэгдсэн ч бид үүнийг бий болгосон хэлний автоматик байгалийн шалгалтын шинэ ажиллагааг тайлбарлаж байна. БЕРТ загварыг тодорхойлоход бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн байгалийн үнэлгээний арга нь хүчтэй үр дүнг харуулж, үндсэн шулуунуудыг илэрхийлж чаддаг: вектор машинуудыг дэмжих, хоёр шулууны LSTMs болон BLEURT. Түүнчлэн, байгалийн загварын дасгал хөдөлгөөн хурд, үнэлэх үйл ажиллагаа нь сайн сайжруулагддаг. Сургуулиуд нь чанар, мэдээлэл ухааны хэлний мэдлэгийг шилжүүлж байна.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono automatyczną metodę oceny naturalności generowania języka naturalnego w systemach dialogu. Podczas gdy zadanie to było wcześniej realizowane poprzez drogą i czasochłonną pracę ludzką, prezentujemy to nowatorskie zadanie automatycznej oceny naturalności wygenerowanego języka. Poprzez dostosowanie modelu BERT, nasza proponowana metoda oceny naturalności pokazuje solidne wyniki i przewyższa linie podstawowe: wsparcie maszyn wektorowych, dwukierunkowe LSTMy i BLEURT. Ponadto szybkość szkolenia i wydajność oceny modelu naturalności ulegają poprawie dzięki transferowi nauki z jakości i informacyjności wiedzy językowej.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă o metodă automată de evaluare a naturalității generarii limbajului natural în sistemele de dialog. Deși această sarcină a fost realizată anterior prin muncă umană costisitoare și consumatoare de timp, prezentăm această sarcină nouă de evaluare automată a naturalității limbajului generat. Prin ajustarea fin a modelului BERT, metoda noastră de evaluare a naturalității propusă prezintă rezultate robuste și depășește liniile de bază: mașini vectoriale de suport, LSTMs bidirecționale și BLEURT. În plus, viteza de formare și performanța de evaluare a modelului naturalității sunt îmbunătățite prin transferul de învățare din cunoștințe lingvistice de calitate și informativitate.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser ein automatisk metode for å evaluera naturligheten av naturspråk i dialogsystemet. Mens denne oppgåva tidlegare blir teikna gjennom dyppa og tidsforbra menneskelige arbeid, presenterer vi denne novelle oppgåva med automatisk naturelt evaluering av oppretta språk. Ved å finna BERT-modellen, viser vårt foreslått naturalet evalueringsmetode robust resultat og utfører grunnlinjene: støtte vektormaskiner, bi-retning LSTMs og BLEURT. I tillegg vert opplæringsfarten og evalueringseffekten av naturleg modell forbetra ved å overføra læring frå kvaliteten og informativ språk.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu soo bandhigaa qaab asal ah oo ku qiimeeya dhalashada afka dabiicadda ee nidaamka dialogka. Markii horay shaqadaas lagu soo celiyey shaqada dadka oo qiimo qaali ah iyo wakhti-isticmaalka dadka, waxaynu soo bandhignaa shaqada warqadan oo ah qiimeynta dabiicadda ee afka dhalay. Tusaalada BERT si fiican u hagaajinta, qaababkayaga lagu soo jeeday qiimeynta dabiicadda ah wuxuu tusaa resultiyada robust iyo wuxuu sameeyaa asalka hoose: kaalmeynta jidhka wadista, hal-toos LSTMs iyo BLEURT. Intaas waxaa dheer in waxbarashada iyo qiimeynta sameynta dabiicadda waxaa lagu beddelaa in lagu beddelo barashada aqoonta luqada iyo aqoonta macluumaadka.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව පද්ධතියේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරභාවිතයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක වි මේ වැඩේ කලින් ගොඩක් ගොඩක් වෙලාවක් සහ වෙලාවක් නිර්මාණය කරපු මිනිස්සුන්ගේ වැඩේ වලින්, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක ස් BERT මොඩේලය සඳහා හොඳින් සැකසුම් කරනවා, අපේ සැකසුම් ස්වභාවික විශ්ලේෂණ විධානය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වගේම ඒ වගේම, ස්වභාවික වේගය සහ අවශ්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාවයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපනය සහ අවශ්\u200dයාත්', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja automatsku metodu da proceni prirodnost generacije prirodnog jezika u dijalogskim sistemima. Iako je ovaj zadatak prethodno proizveden skupom i vremenskim ljudskim radom, predstavljamo ovaj novi zadatak automatske prirodne procjene proizvedenog jezika. Pripremajući model BERT, naša predložena metoda procjene prirodnosti pokazuje robne rezultate i iznosi osnovne linije: podrška vektorskim mašinama, dvosmjerne LSTMs i BLEURT. Osim toga, brzina obuke i provedba procjene modela prirodnosti poboljšavaju prijenos učenja iz kvalitete i informativnosti jezičkih znanja.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en automatisk metod för att utvärdera naturligheten hos naturligt språkskapande i dialogsystem. Medan denna uppgift tidigare utfördes genom dyrt och tidskrävande mänskligt arbete, presenterar vi denna nya uppgift med automatisk naturhetsutvärdering av genererat språk. Genom att finjustera BERT-modellen visar vår föreslagna metod för utvärdering av naturlighet robusta resultat och överträffar baslinjerna: stödvektormaskiner, tvåriktade LSTMs och BLEURT. Dessutom förbättras utbildningshastigheten och utvärderingen av naturlighetsmodellen genom överföring av lärande från språkkunskaper av kvalitet och informativitet.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் உரையாடல் முறைமைகளில் இயல்பான மொழி உருவாக்கத்தின் இயற்கையை மதிப்பதற்கு ஒரு தானியங்கிய முறையை கொடுக இந்த செயல் முன்னால் விலையானது மற்றும் நேரத்தில் செலவுபடும் மனித வேலையினால், நாம் தானாகவே உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மொழியின் தானாகவே இயல் BERT மாதிரியை நன்றாக துண்டிக்கும் பொழுது, எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட இயற்கையான மதிப்பீடு முறைமையில் ரோப்ட் முடிவுகளை காட்டுகிறது அடிப்படையில் ம கூடுதலாக, இயல்பான மாதிரியின் பயிற்சியின் வேகம் மற்றும் மதிப்பீடு செயல்பாடு மாதிரியும் தரம் மற்றும் அறிவில்லாத மொழிய', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ سٹیموں میں طبیعی زبان کی نسل کی طبیعیت کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے آٹوٹی طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے. اگرچہ یہ کام پہلے بہت خرد اور زمانہ مصرف کرنے والے انسان کے کام کے ذریعہ بنا دیا گیا تھا، ہم نے پیدا کی زبان کی آٹوٹی طبیعت کا ارزیابہ دکھایا ہے. BERT موڈل کو خوب تنظیم کرنا کے ذریعہ، ہماری پیشنهاد کی طبیعت کی ارزیابی کا طریقہ مضبوط نتائج دکھاتا ہے اور بنسٹ لینوں کو زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے: ویکتور ماشین کی مدد کرتا ہے، دوسری طریقہ کی LSTMs اور BLEURT. اس کے علاوہ، طبیعت موڈل کی تعلیم کی سرعت اور ارزیابی کی فعالیت کی تعلیم کیفیت اور غیر معلومات کی زبان علم سے سیکھنے کے ذریعہ بہتر ہوتی ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu vazifani avval qiymati va vaqt ishlab chiqarish orqali qo'llangan paytda, biz avtomatik yaratilgan tillarning tabiiy qiymatini o'rganamiz. BERT modelini yaxshi ko'rsatish bilan, bizning taʼminlovchi tabiiy qiymatning usuli robot natijalarini ko'rsatadi va asosiy natijalarini bajaradi: vektor maskinelarini qoʻllash, bir xil LSTMs va BLEURT. Ko'pchilik, tabiiy modelning tajribasining tezligi va qiymatlarini o'rganishni o'rganish sifatida o'rganish va haqiqida maʼlumot tillarni o'rganish orqali bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cung cấp một phương pháp tự động để đánh giá tính tự nhiên của tạo ngôn ngữ tự nhiên trong hệ thống đối thoại. Trong khi nhiệm vụ này đã được hoàn thành bởi công việc nhân loại tốn kém và tốn thời gian, chúng tôi giới thiệu công việc mới này về tự nhiên đánh giá ngôn ngữ tạo ra. Bằng cách chọn lọc hoàn hảo kiểu BERT, phương pháp đánh giá tự nhiên của chúng ta cho thấy kết quả mạnh mẽ và hoàn thiện bản gốc: cỗ máy vector, LSD hai hướng, và tiếng bíp. Hơn nữa, tốc độ đào tạo và hiệu quả đánh giá của mô hình tự nhiên được cải thiện nhờ việc học dựa trên chất lượng và kiến thức về ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя автоматичен метод за оценка на естествеността на генерирането на естествен език в диалогови системи. Докато тази задача преди това е била изпълнена чрез скъп и отнемащ време човешки труд, ние представяме тази нова задача за автоматична оценка на естествеността на генерирания език. Чрез фина настройка на модела предложеният ни метод за оценка на естествеността показва стабилни резултати и превъзхожда базовите линии: поддържащи векторни машини, двупосочни ЛСТМ и БЛЕРТ. Освен това скоростта на обучение и оценката на модела за естественост се подобряват чрез трансфер на обучение от качествено и информативно езиково знание.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en automatisk metode til at vurdere naturligheden af naturlig sproggenerering i dialogsystemer. Mens denne opgave tidligere blev udført gennem dyrt og tidskrævende menneskeligt arbejde, præsenterer vi denne nye opgave med automatisk naturlighedsevaluering af genereret sprog. Ved at finjustere BERT-modellen viser vores foreslåede metode til evaluering af naturlighed robuste resultater og overgår basislinjerne: støttevektormaskiner, tovejsede LSTMs og BLEURT. Desuden forbedres uddannelseshastigheden og evalueringsresultaterne af naturlighedsmodellen ved at overføre læring fra sprogkundskaber af kvalitet og informativitet.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een automatische methode om de natuurlijkheid van het genereren van natuurlijke taal in dialoogsystemen te evalueren. Terwijl deze taak eerder werd uitgevoerd door dure en tijdrovende menselijke arbeid, presenteren we deze nieuwe taak van automatische natuurlijkheidsevaluatie van gegenereerde taal. Door het BERT-model te verfijnen, toont onze voorgestelde methode voor natuurlijkheidsevaluatie robuuste resultaten en overtreft de basislijnen: ondersteunende vectormachines, bi-directionele LSTMs en BLEURT. Bovendien worden de trainingssnelheid en evaluatieprestaties van het natuurlijkheidsmodel verbeterd door het overdragen van leren vanuit taalkennis van kwaliteit en informatief vermogen.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan metode otomatis untuk mengevaluasi alami generasi bahasa alami dalam sistem dialog. Sementara tugas ini sebelumnya dilakukan melalui pekerjaan manusia yang mahal dan memakan waktu, kami mempersembahkan tugas baru ini dari evaluasi alami otomatis bahasa yang dihasilkan. Dengan memperbaiki model BERT, metode evaluasi alami kami yang diusulkan menunjukkan hasil yang kuat dan melampaui batas dasar: mesin vektor dukungan, LSTM bidireksi, dan BLEURT. In addition, the training speed and evaluation performance of naturalness model are improved by transfer learning from quality and informativeness linguistic knowledge.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag wird eine automatische Methode vorgestellt, um die Natürlichkeit natürlicher Sprachgenerierung in Dialogsystemen zu bewerten. Während diese Aufgabe zuvor durch teure und zeitraubende menschliche Arbeit gelöst wurde, stellen wir diese neuartige Aufgabe der automatischen Naturlichkeitsbewertung der erzeugten Sprache vor. Durch die Feinabstimmung des BERT-Modells zeigt unsere vorgeschlagene Methode zur Bewertung der Natürlichkeit robuste Ergebnisse und übertrifft die Basislinien: Stützvektormaschinen, bidirektionale LSTMs und BLEURT. Darüber hinaus werden die Trainingsgeschwindigkeit und Evaluationsleistung des Natürlichkeitsmodells durch Transferlernen aus qualitativem und informativem Sprachwissen verbessert.', 'ko': '본고는 대화 시스템의 자연 언어 생성의 자연성을 자동으로 평가하는 방법을 제시했다.비록 이 임무는 이전에 비싸고 시간이 소모되는 인력을 통해 이루어졌지만, 우리는 언어의 자연도를 자동으로 평가하는 새로운 임무를 제기했다.마이크로버트 모델을 통해 우리가 제시한 자연도 평가 방법은 안정적인 결과를 나타냈고 기선인 벡터기 지원, 양방향 LSTM과 BLEURT보다 우수했다.또한 질과 정보성 언어 지식에서 학습을 옮겨 자연도 모델의 훈련 속도와 평가 성능을 향상시켰다.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha njia ya kujitegemea ya kutathmini uhalisia wa uzalishaji wa lugha asili katika mifumo ya mazungumzo. Wakati kazi hii hapo awali ilitolewa kwa njia ya kazi ghali na matumizi ya muda wa binadamu, tunaweka kazi hii ya riwaya ya uchunguzi wa asili ya lugha zilizotengenezwa. Kwa kutumia muundo mzuri wa BERT, njia yetu ya uchunguzi wa asili inayopendekezwa inaonyesha matokeo ya ubaguzi na yanaonyesha misingi ya msingi: mashine ya kusaidia vector, mfumo wa utaratibu wa LST na BLEURT. Zaidi ya hayo, kiwango cha mafunzo na utendaji wa muundo wa asilia unaboreshwa kwa kuhamisha kujifunza kwa ubora na maarifa ya lugha isiyo na taarifa.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ روش خودکار را برای ارزیابی طبیعی نسل زبان طبیعی در سیستم\u200cهای محاوره نشان می\u200cدهد. در حالی که این وظیفه قبلاً از طریق کارهای انسان گران و زمان مصرف شده بود، ما این وظیفه جدید را از ارزیابی طبیعت خودکار از زبان تولید می کنیم. با توجه به مدل BERT، روش ارزیابی طبیعت پیشنهاد ما نتایج قوی را نشان می دهد و پایین\u200cهای پایین را انجام می دهد: دستگاه\u200cهای ویکتور پشتیبانی، LSTMs دو طرف و BLEURT. علاوه بر این، سرعت آموزش و ارزیابی مدل طبیعی با انتقال یادگیری از دانش زبان\u200cشناسی کیفیت و اطلاعات بهتر می\u200cشود.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz tebigy dil döredijileriniň dogruçylygyny barlamak üçin awtomatik bir yöntemi görkezýär. Bu zady öň wagtyň pahalı we wagtlary ýüze biljek adamlaryň işi bilen berildiginde, biz bu zady döredilen dilleriň otomatik tebigatlarynyň barlamasynyň täze zadyny görkeýäris. BERT modelini iyileştirerek teklif ettiğimiz doğallik değerlendirme metodumuzda güçlü sonuçları ve temel hatlarını gösterir: vektör makinelerini, iki yönde LSTMs ve BLEURT şeklinde destekleyin. Munuň üçin, tebigatnalyk nusgasynyň dermanynyň dermanlygy we informatiýatlyk dilinden öwrenmeleri göçürmek bilen ýüzelendirilýär.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja automatsku metodu za procjenu prirodnosti generacije prirodnog jezika u dijalogskim sustavima. Iako je ovaj zadatak prethodno proizveden skupom i vremenskim ljudskim radom, predstavljamo ovaj novi zadatak automatske prirodne procjene proizvedenog jezika. Pripremajući model BERT, naš predloženi metod procjene prirodnosti pokazuje jak rezultat i iznosi početne linije: podrška vektorskim strojevima, dvosmjerne LSTMs i BLEURT. Osim toga, brzina obuke i provedba procjene modela prirodnosti poboljšavaju se prijenosnjem učenja iz kvalitete i informativnosti jezičkih znanja.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም በአካባቢ ቋንቋ ትውልድ ውስጥ በጥያቄ ስርዓት ውስጥ የፍጥረት የቋንቋ ትውልድ የሚያስተካክል የራሳቸውን ሥርዓት ያቀርባል፡፡ ይህ ስራ አስቀድሞ የከበረ እና በጊዜው በሚጠቀም የሰው ድካም በተመለከተ ጊዜ፣ የፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ ማረጋገጫ የአባታዊ የፍጥረት አካሄድን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ BERT ሞዴል በመጠቀም፣ የተለመነውን የፍጥረት ማረጋገጫ ዘዴችን የረጢት ፍሬቶችን እና መሠረትን የሚያሳየው: የዌctor መሣሪያዎች፣ አስተዳዳደር LST እና BLEURT በተጨማሪም፣ የፍጥረት ሞዴል ፈጥኖ እና ማስታወቂያውን ከጥሩ እና የቋንቋዊ እውቀት በመለወጥ ይሻላል፡፡', 'sq': 'This paper presents an automatic method to evaluate the naturalness of natural language generation in dialogue systems.  Ndërsa kjo detyrë ishte kryer më parë nëpërmjet punës njerëzore të shtrenjtë dhe të konsumueshme kohe, ne paraqesim këtë detyrë të re të vlerësimit automatik të natyrës së gjuhës së gjeneruar. Duke përmirësuar modelin BERT, metoda jonë e propozuar e vlerësimit të natyrës tregon rezultate të forta dhe përmirëson linjat bazë: mjetet e mbështetjes për vektorët, LSTMs dy-drejtuese dhe BLEURT. Përveç kësaj, shpejtësia e trajnimit dhe performanca e vlerësimit të modelit të natyrës përmirësohen duke transferuar mësimin nga cilësia dhe informacionaliteti i njohurive gjuhësore.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n outomatiese metode om die natuurlikheid van natuurlike taal generasie in dialoog stelsels te evalueer. Alhoewel hierdie taak voorheen deur koste en tyd-gebruikte menslike arbeid gewerk is, voorsien ons hierdie nuwe taak van outomatiese natuurlikheid evaluering van gegenereerde taal. Deur fyn-tuning van die BERT model, vertoon ons voorgestelde natuurlike evalueringsmetode sterk resultate en uitvoer die basisline: ondersteun vektor masjiene, bi-rigting LSTMs en BLEURT. In addition, the training speed and evaluation performance of naturalness model is improved by transfer of learning from quality and informativeness linguistic knowledge.", 'hy': "Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է ավտոմատիկ մեթոդ, որպեսզի գնահատենք բնական լեզվի ստեղծման բնական էությունը երկխոսային համակարգերում: Մինչդեռ այս խնդիրը նախկինում արվել է թանկ և ժամանակ պահանջող մարդկային աշխատանքի միջոցով, մենք ներկայացնում ենք ստեղծված լեզվի ավտոմատիկ բնական գնահատման այս նոր խնդիրը: ԲԵՌԹ մոդելի բարելավման միջոցով մեր նախագծված բնական գնահատման մեթոդը ցույց է տալիս ուժեղ արդյունքներ և արտադրում է հիմնական գծերը' աջակցող վեկտորների մեքենաներ, երկուղղահայաց LSMT-ներ և ԲԼԵՌԹ-ներ: Ավելին, բնական մոդելի ուսումնասիրության արագությունը և գնահատման արդյունքը բարելավվում են, փոխանցելով ուսումնասիրությունը որակից և ինֆորմատիվությունից լեզվաբանական գիտելիքներից:", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রজন্মের প্রাকৃতিক প্রজন্মের স্বাভাবিক প্রজন্মের বিষয় এই কাজের পূর্বে দামী এবং সময়-ভক্তি মানুষের শ্রমের মাধ্যমে এই কাজ প্রদান করা হয়েছে, আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষার স্বাভাবিক নির্মাণের এই উপন বেরেটি মডেলের মাধ্যমে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত স্বাভাবিক মূল্যের মাধ্যমে রোবটের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে এবং বেসেলাইনের ভেক্টর মেশিন, বাই-সরাসরি এলসিএস এবং বিলিউ এছাড়াও প্রাকৃতিক মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণের গতি এবং মূল্য প্রদর্শনের ফলে মান এবং তথ্যহীন ভাষার জ্ঞান থেকে শিক্ষা প্রদান করা হয়েছে।', 'az': 'Bu kağıt məlumatı sistemlərində təbiətli dil nəzəriyyətini təhsil etmək üçün avtomatik bir metod göstərir. Bu işin əvvəlcə mal və vaxtlı istifadə edən insan işi ilə əvəz olunduğu halda, biz bu yeni işi yaratdığı dilin otomatik doğallıqlıq değerlendirməsini göstəririk. BERT modelini düzəltmək üçün, təklif edilmiş doğallıqlıq değerlendirmək metodumu möhkəm sonuçlarını göstərir və temel çətinləri aşkar edir: vektor makinelərini dəstəkləyir, iki yönəlli LSTMs və BLEURT. Əvvəlcə, təhsil sürəti və təhsil modelinin təhsil etdiyi təhsil və qiyməti təhsil etdiyi təhsil və məlumatlıq dilindən öyrənməsi ilə təhsil edilir.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta un mètode automàtic per avaluar la naturalitat de la generació de llenguatges naturals en els sistemes de diàleg. Mentre aquesta tasca havia estat feta anteriorment a través del treball humà costós i consumint temps, presentem aquesta nova tasca d'evaluació automàtica de la naturalesa del llenguatge generat. Al perfeccionar el model BERT, el nostre mètode proposat d'evaluació de la naturalesa mostra resultats robustos i supera les línies de base: màquines de suport de vectors, LSTM bidireccionals i BLEURT. A més, la velocitat d'entrenament i el rendiment d'evaluació del model de naturalesa s'milloren transferint l'aprenentatge del coneixement lingüístic de qualitat i informativitat.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja automatsku metodu za procjenu prirodnosti generacije prirodnog jezika u dijalogskim sistemima. Iako je ovaj zadatak prethodno proizveden skupom i vremenskim ljudskim radom, predstavljamo ovaj novi zadatak automatske prirodne procjene proizvedenog jezika. Pripremajući model BERT, naš predloženi metod procjene prirodnosti pokazuje jak rezultat i iznosi osnovne linije: podrška vektorskim mašinama, dvosmjernicalnim LSTMsima i BLEURT. Osim toga, brzina obuke i provedba procjene modela prirodnosti poboljšavaju se prijenosnjem učenja iz kvalitete i informativnosti jezičkih znanja.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje automatickou metodu hodnocení přirozenosti generování přirozeného jazyka v dialogových systémech. Zatímco tento úkol byl dříve proveden drahou a časově náročnou lidskou prací, představujeme tento nový úkol automatického vyhodnocování přirozenosti generovaného jazyka. Naše navržená metoda vyhodnocování přirozenosti díky jemnému ladění modelu BERT ukazuje robustní výsledky a překonává základní linie: podpůrné vektorové stroje, obousměrné LSTMy a BLEURT. Kromě toho se rychlost tréninku a hodnotící výkon modelu přirozenosti zlepšuje přenosem učení z kvalitních a informativních jazykových znalostí.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli esittelee automaattisen menetelmän luonnollisen kielen tuottamisen arvioimiseksi dialogijärjestelmissä. Vaikka tämä tehtävä suoritettiin aikaisemmin kalliilla ja aikaa vievällä ihmistyöllä, esittelemme tämän uuden tehtävän, joka koskee generoidun kielen automaattista luonnollisuuden arviointia. BERT-mallia hienosäätämällä ehdotettu luonnollisuuden arviointimenetelmä osoittaa vankkoja tuloksia ja suoriutuu paremmin perusverkostoista: tukivektorikoneet, kaksisuuntaiset LSTMs ja BLEURT. Lisäksi luontaisuusmallin koulutusnopeutta ja arviointikykyä parannetaan siirtämällä oppimista laadusta ja informatiivisuudesta kielitaidosta.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö tutvustab automaatset meetodit looduskeele genereerimise loomulikkuse hindamiseks dialoogisüsteemides. Kuigi see ülesanne oli varem täidetud kalli ja aeganõudva inimtöö kaudu, esitleme seda uudset ülesannet genereeritud keele loomulikkuse automaatse hindamise ülesannet. BERT mudeli täpsustamisega näitab meie kavandatud loomulikkuse hindamise meetod tugevaid tulemusi ja ületab lähtejooni: toetusvektor masinad, kahesuunalised LSTMd ja BLEURT. Lisaks parandatakse loomulikkuse mudeli koolituse kiirust ja hindamise tulemuslikkust õppimise ülekandmisega kvaliteedi- ja informatiivsetest keeleteadmistest.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מציג שיטה אוטומטית כדי להעריך את טבעיות יוצר שפת טבעית במערכות דיאלוג. בזמן שהמשימה הזאת הושלמה קודם דרך עבודה אנושית יקרה ובזמן, אנו מציגים את המשימה החדשה הזו של הערכת טבעיות אוטומטית של שפה יוצרת. על ידי התאים של דוגמנית BERT, שיטת הערכת הטבע המוצעת שלנו מראה תוצאות חזקות ומעברת את קווי הבסיס: מכונות ויקטורים תמיכה, LSTMs ביכיווניים, ו BLEURT. In addition, the training speed and evaluation performance of naturalness model are improved by transfer learning from quality and informativeness linguistic knowledge.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da wata metode farat ɗaya dõmin a evaluate the natural of zauren harshen asili cikin tsarin zauren akwatin bayanin zauren akwatin bayani. A lokacin da aka buɗe wannan aikin a gabãni an cika aikin mutum mai kyauta da mai amfani da lokaci, ko kuma muna halatar da wannan yanzu na aikin farat-natural na ƙidãya wa lugha wanda ya ƙãga. Ga ku gyara shirin ayuka na BERT, shirin evaluation na rayuwar da aka buƙata, yana nuna matsalar bakwai da kuma yana samar da bakin ayuka: mataimaki masu sakan kwamfyuta, da masu shirya LTRM da BLEURT. Ina ƙara, mafarin mafarin aiki da evaluation game da cikakken misalin na naturaci, za'a ƙarfafa kwamfyutan a motsi da za'a sanar da in tsari da kuma ma'abũcin linguistic.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljena avtomatska metoda za ocenjevanje naravnosti generiranja naravnega jezika v dialognih sistemih. Medtem ko je bila ta naloga predhodno opravljena z dragim in dolgotrajnim človeškim delom, predstavljamo to novo nalogo avtomatskega ocenjevanja naravnosti generiranega jezika. Z natančnim nastavitvijo modela BERT predlagana metoda ocenjevanja naravnosti pokaže robustne rezultate in presega osnovne črte: podporni vektorski stroji, dvosmerni LSTMi in BLEURT. Poleg tega se hitrost usposabljanja in ocenjevalna uspešnost modela naravnosti izboljšata s prenosom učenja iz kakovostnega in informativnega jezikovnega znanja.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki sistem ngewehhot sistem otomatik kanggo kuwi nggawe duluran kanggo ndewat nglanggar tarjamahan ning sistem dialog. Nom wayah nyong wektu ngomong nek diguwah akeh lanjur lan aku-pas kuwi nggawe nguasai perbudhakan, kita nganggep kuwi nyuang nggawe barang otomatik kanggo kelompok tarjamahan kanggo ngilangno liwih apik. Jejaring Nambah, ndelangno langgambar lan kuwi nggawe gerasane nggawe model pribadhakan bakal luwih bantuan ing nggawe kaliwat lan ingkang alam-alam kuwi kesempatan.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་སྟངས་སྟོན་པ། དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ལས་འགུལ་འདི་སྔོན་མ་དུ་བཏུབ་དང་དུས་གཏན་མཁན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་འདི་བསྒྲགས་ནུས་མེད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་རང By fine-tuning the BERT model, our proposed naturalness evaluation method shows robust results and outperforms the baselines: support vector machines, bi-directional LSTMs, and BLEURT. ད་དུས་ཀྱང་། སྤྲོ་སྟངས་རང་རིག་རྩལ་གྱི་མགྱོག་ཚད་དང་རིམ་པ་ལྟར་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་ཤེས་ཚད་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Active Learning for Interactive Relation Extraction in a French Newspaper’s Articles', 'fr': "Apprentissage actif pour l'extraction interactive de relations dans les articles d'un journal français", 'es': 'Aprendizaje activo para la extracción interactiva de relaciones en los artículos de un periódico francés', 'ar': 'التعلم النشط لاستخراج العلاقات التفاعلية في مقالات إحدى الصحف الفرنسية', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem ativa para extração de relações interativas em artigos de um jornal francês', 'ja': 'フランスの新聞の記事におけるインタラクティブな関係抽出のためのアクティブラーニング', 'zh': '法语报纸文章交互式取而学之', 'hi': 'एक फ्रांसीसी समाचार पत्र के लेख में इंटरैक्टिव संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए सक्रिय सीखना', 'ru': 'Активное обучение для интерактивного извлечения отношений в статьях французской газеты', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Ghníomhach le haghaidh Sliocht Caidreamh Idirghníomhach i Nuachtán Fraincis Airteagail', 'el': 'Ενεργή Μάθηση για τη Διαδραστική Εξόρυξη Σχέσεων σε Άρθρα Γαλλικής Εφημερίδας', 'hu': 'Aktív tanulás az interaktív kapcsolat kivonásához egy francia újság cikkeiben', 'it': "Apprendimento attivo per l'estrazione interattiva delle relazioni negli articoli di un giornale francese", 'kk': 'Француз жаңалықтарының мақалаларында интерактивті қатынас тарқату үшін белсенді оқыту', 'lt': 'Aktyvus mokymasis interaktyvių santykių ekstrakcijai Prancūzijos laikraščio straipsniuose', 'ms': 'Name', 'ka': 'Name', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Attiv għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet Interattivi fl-Artikoli ta’ Gazzetta Franċiża', 'mn': 'Француз сэтгүүлийн баримтуудад интерактив харилцааны хамааралтын хайлтыг хадгалахын тулд актив суралцах', 'no': 'Aktivt læring for interaktiv relasjonspakking i artiklar frå eit fransk nettpapir', 'pl': 'Aktywne uczenie się interaktywnej ekstrakcji relacji w artykułach francuskiej gazety', 'ro': 'Învățare activă pentru extragerea relațiilor interactive în articolele unui ziar francez', 'ml': 'ഫ്രെഞ്ച് പത്രത്തിലെ കലാഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇന്റര്\u200dവെക്റ്റീവ് ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി സജ്ജീവമായ പഠി', 'mk': 'Активно учење за екстракција на интерактивни односи во статиите на францускиот весник', 'sr': 'Aktivno učenje za izvlačenje interaktivnih odnosa u članovima francuskih novina', 'so': "Active Learning for Interactive Relation s Extraction in a French newspaper's Articles", 'ta': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'ایک فرانسوی نیویسپیپٹر کے ارتباط اٹھانے کے لئے فعال یادہانی', 'sv': 'Aktivt lärande för interaktiv relation extraktion i en fransk tidnings artiklar', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học hành cho tương tác Tương phản trong tờ báo Pháp', 'hr': 'Aktivno učenje za izvlačenje interaktivnih odnosa u članovima francuskih novina', 'de': 'Aktives Lernen zur interaktiven Beziehungsextraktion in den Artikeln einer französischen Zeitung', 'da': 'Aktiv læring til interaktiv relation uddrag i en fransk avis artikler', 'bg': 'Активно обучение за интерактивна връзка извличане в статиите на френски вестник', 'ko': '프랑스 신문 기사에서 상호작용 관계 추출의 주동적 학습', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa ajili ya kutengeneza uhusiano wa kati katika Makala ya Gazeti la Kifaransa', 'nl': 'Actief Leren voor Interactieve Relatie Extractie in de Artikelen van een Franse krant', 'af': "Aktiewe leer vir Interaktiewe Relasie Uitpakking in 'n Franse Nuuspapier se Artikels", 'sq': 'Mësimi aktiv për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve interaktive në artikujt e gazetës franceze', 'id': 'Pelajaran Aktif untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan Interaktif dalam artikel Koran Perancis', 'fa': 'یادگیری فعال برای اخراج ارتباط Interactive در مقاله روزنامه فرانسوی', 'tr': 'Fransuzça Gazeteleriniň Senedleri içinde Interaktiv Derjesi Açmak üçin aktiw öwrenmek', 'hy': 'Ակտիվ սովորելը ինտերակտիվ հարաբերությունների արտահանման համար Ֆրանսիական թերթի հոդվածներում', 'az': 'Fransız Gazetelərin Mətniklərində Interaktiv İlişkisi Çıkarması üçün Etkinlik Öyrənməsi', 'bs': 'Aktivno učenje za izvlačenje interaktivnih odnosa u članovima francuskih novina', 'ca': "Aprendència activa per l'extracció de relacions interactives en els artículos d'un diari francès", 'cs': 'Aktivní učení pro interaktivní extrakci vztahů ve francouzských novinách', 'fi': 'Aktiivinen oppiminen interaktiiviseen suhteeseen poimitusta ranskalaisen sanomalehden artikkeleista', 'am': 'ፋይል s ን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'et': 'Aktiivne õpe interaktiivsete suhete väljavõtmiseks Prantsuse ajalehe artiklites', 'bn': 'ফ্রেঞ্চ সংবাদপত্রের আর্টিকেলে ইন্টারেক্টিভেট সম্পর্ক বিদেশের জন্য সক্রিয় শিক্ষা শিক্ষা', 'sk': 'Aktivno učenje za interaktivno razmerje v člankih francoskega časopisa', 'jv': 'FindOK', 'he': 'למידה פעילה להוציא יחסים אינטראקטיביים במאמרים של עיתון צרפתי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': "French Newspaper's Articles ཐོག་ཏུ་Interactive Relation Extraction for Active Learning"}
{'en': 'Relation extraction is a subtask of natural langage processing that has seen many improvements in recent years, with the advent of complex pre-trained architectures. Many of these state-of-the-art approaches are tested against benchmarks with labelled sentences containing tagged entities, and require important pre-training and fine-tuning on task-specific data. However, in a real use-case scenario such as in a newspaper company mostly dedicated to local information, relations are of varied, highly specific type, with virtually no annotated data for such relations, and many entities co-occur in a sentence without being related. We question the use of supervised state-of-the-art models in such a context, where resources such as time, computing power and human annotators are limited. To adapt to these constraints, we experiment with an active-learning based relation extraction pipeline, consisting of a binary LSTM-based lightweight model for detecting the relations that do exist, and a state-of-the-art model for relation classification. We compare several choices for classification models in this scenario, from basic word embedding averaging, to graph neural networks and Bert-based ones, as well as several active learning acquisition strategies, in order to find the most cost-efficient yet accurate approach in our French largest daily newspaper company’s use case.', 'pt': 'A extração de relações é uma subtarefa do processamento de linguagem natural que tem visto muitas melhorias nos últimos anos, com o advento de arquiteturas complexas pré-treinadas. Muitas dessas abordagens de última geração são testadas contra benchmarks com frases rotuladas contendo entidades marcadas e exigem pré-treinamento importante e ajuste fino em dados específicos da tarefa. No entanto, em um cenário de caso de uso real, como em uma empresa jornalística dedicada principalmente a informações locais, as relações são de tipo variado e altamente específico, praticamente sem dados anotados para tais relações, e muitas entidades co-ocorrem em uma frase sem serem relacionado. Questionamos o uso de modelos supervisionados de última geração em tal contexto, onde recursos como tempo, poder computacional e anotadores humanos são limitados. Para se adaptar a essas restrições, experimentamos um pipeline de extração de relações baseado em aprendizado ativo, consistindo em um modelo leve baseado em LSTM binário para detectar as relações que existem e um modelo de última geração para classificação de relações. Comparamos várias opções para modelos de classificação neste cenário, desde a média básica de incorporação de palavras até redes neurais gráficas e baseadas em Bert, bem como várias estratégias de aquisição de aprendizado ativo, a fim de encontrar a abordagem mais econômica e precisa em nosso Caso de uso da maior empresa francesa de jornais diários.', 'ar': 'استخلاص العلاقة هو مهمة فرعية لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية التي شهدت العديد من التحسينات في السنوات الأخيرة ، مع ظهور البنى المعقدة المدربة مسبقًا. يتم اختبار العديد من هذه الأساليب الحديثة مقابل معايير مع جمل معنونة تحتوي على كيانات مميزة ، وتتطلب تدريبًا مسبقًا مهمًا وضبطًا دقيقًا للبيانات الخاصة بالمهمة. ومع ذلك ، في سيناريو حالة الاستخدام الحقيقي كما هو الحال في شركة جريدة مخصصة في الغالب للمعلومات المحلية ، تكون العلاقات من نوع خاص ومتنوع للغاية ، مع عدم وجود بيانات مشروحة تقريبًا لمثل هذه العلاقات ، والعديد من الكيانات تحدث بشكل مشترك في جملة دون أن تكون ذات صلة. نحن نتساءل عن استخدام أحدث النماذج الخاضعة للإشراف في مثل هذا السياق ، حيث تكون الموارد مثل الوقت وقوة الحوسبة والمعلقات البشرية محدودة. للتكيف مع هذه القيود ، نجرب خط أنابيب استخراج علاقة قائم على التعلم النشط ، يتكون من نموذج ثنائي خفيف الوزن قائم على LSTM لاكتشاف العلاقات الموجودة ، ونموذج حديث لتصنيف العلاقة. نقارن العديد من الخيارات لنماذج التصنيف في هذا السيناريو ، من متوسط تضمين الكلمات الأساسية ، إلى الشبكات العصبية الرسومية والشبكات القائمة على بيرت ، بالإضافة إلى العديد من استراتيجيات اكتساب التعلم النشط ، من أجل العثور على النهج الأكثر فعالية من حيث التكلفة والأكثر دقة في منطقتنا. أكبر حالة استخدام لشركة صحيفة يومية فرنسية.', 'fr': "L'extraction de relations est une sous-tâche du traitement du langage naturel qui a connu de nombreuses améliorations ces dernières années, avec l'avènement d'architectures pré-entraînées complexes. Bon nombre de ces approches de pointe sont testées par rapport à des points de référence avec des phrases étiquetées contenant des entités étiquetées, et nécessitent une formation préalable importante et un ajustement précis des données spécifiques aux tâches. Cependant, dans un scénario d'utilisation réel, comme dans une entreprise de journaux principalement dédiée à l'information locale, les relations sont de type varié et très spécifique, avec pratiquement aucune donnée annotée pour de telles relations, et de nombreuses entités coexistent dans une phrase sans être liées. Nous remettons en question l'utilisation de modèles de pointe supervisés dans un tel contexte, où les ressources telles que le temps, la puissance de calcul et les annotations humaines sont limitées. Pour nous adapter à ces contraintes, nous expérimentons un pipeline d'extraction de relations basé sur l'apprentissage actif, composé d'un modèle léger basé sur LSTM binaire pour détecter les relations existantes, et d'un modèle de pointe pour la classification des relations. Nous comparons plusieurs choix de modèles de classification dans ce scénario, de la moyenne par intégration de mots aux réseaux de neurones graphiques et à ceux basés sur BERT, ainsi que plusieurs stratégies d'acquisition d'apprentissage actif, afin de trouver l'approche la plus rentable et la plus précise dans notre plus grand quotidien français cas d'utilisation de l'entreprise.", 'zh': '所关自然语言理一子,近年随杂预训练架构,多所改进。 先进之法,多以准试,有包标记句,特定于任数预训练调。 然于实用例之中,如一家务本息报纸公司中,各有高特定之类,几无此注数,而诸体同出而不相关。 吾等质疑于此背景下用有监督之最先进者,其间日月,计算能力与人伦注器等资源有限。 试之于学,道之于LSTM,制轻量级之于二进制,检之于实,与一之于先。 于是校其分数,销其本词,神经网络其图形,Bert其算法,及数学取策,以得于吾国之大日报公司之用例最具成本效益而最正者也。', 'es': 'La extracción de relaciones es una subtarea del procesamiento del lenguaje natural que ha experimentado muchas mejoras en los últimos años, con la llegada de arquitecturas complejas previamente entrenadas. Muchos de estos enfoques de vanguardia se prueban con puntos de referencia con oraciones etiquetadas que contienen entidades etiquetadas, y requieren una importante capacitación previa y un ajuste fino de los datos específicos de la tarea. Sin embargo, en un escenario de caso de uso real, como en una empresa de periódicos dedicada principalmente a la información local, las relaciones son de tipo variado y altamente específico, prácticamente sin datos anotados para tales relaciones, y muchas entidades coexisten en una oración sin estar relacionadas. Ponemos en duda el uso de modelos supervisados de vanguardia en ese contexto, donde los recursos como el tiempo, la potencia de cálculo y los anotadores humanos son limitados. Para adaptarnos a estas restricciones, experimentamos con un proceso de extracción de relaciones basado en el aprendizaje activo, que consiste en un modelo ligero basado en LSTM binario para detectar las relaciones que sí existen, y un modelo de vanguardia para la clasificación de relaciones. Comparamos varias opciones de modelos de clasificación en este escenario, desde el promedio básico de incrustación de palabras hasta redes neuronales gráficas y basadas en BERT, así como varias estrategias de adquisición de aprendizaje activo, con el fin de encontrar el enfoque más rentable y preciso en nuestro periódico más grande de Francia caso de uso de la empresa.', 'hi': 'संबंध निष्कर्षण प्राकृतिक लैंगेज प्रसंस्करण का एक उप-कार्य है जिसने हाल के वर्षों में जटिल पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित आर्किटेक्चर के आगमन के साथ कई सुधार देखे हैं। इनमें से कई अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों को टैग किए गए निकायों वाले लेबल वाले वाक्यों के साथ बेंचमार्क के खिलाफ परीक्षण किया जाता है, और कार्य-विशिष्ट डेटा पर महत्वपूर्ण पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण और ठीक-ट्यूनिंग की आवश्यकता होती है। हालांकि, एक वास्तविक उपयोग-मामले के परिदृश्य में जैसे कि एक समाचार पत्र कंपनी में ज्यादातर स्थानीय जानकारी के लिए समर्पित, संबंध विविध, अत्यधिक विशिष्ट प्रकार के होते हैं, ऐसे संबंधों के लिए वस्तुतः कोई एनोटेट डेटा नहीं होता है, और कई संस्थाएं संबंधित होने के बिना एक वाक्य में सह-घटित होती हैं। हम इस तरह के संदर्भ में पर्यवेक्षित अत्याधुनिक मॉडल के उपयोग पर सवाल उठाते हैं, जहां समय, कंप्यूटिंग शक्ति और मानव एनोटेटर जैसे संसाधन सीमित हैं। इन बाधाओं के अनुकूल होने के लिए, हम एक सक्रिय-सीखने आधारित संबंध निष्कर्षण पाइपलाइन के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं, जिसमें मौजूद संबंधों का पता लगाने के लिए एक बाइनरी एलएसटीएम-आधारित हल्के मॉडल शामिल हैं, और संबंध वर्गीकरण के लिए एक अत्याधुनिक मॉडल। हम इस परिदृश्य में वर्गीकरण मॉडल के लिए कई विकल्पों की तुलना करते हैं, बुनियादी शब्द एम्बेडिंग औसत से, ग्राफन्यूरल नेटवर्क और बर्ट-आधारित लोगों के साथ-साथ कई सक्रिय सीखने की अधिग्रहण रणनीतियों के लिए, ताकि हमारे फ्रांसीसी सबसे बड़े दैनिक समाचार पत्र कंपनी के उपयोग के मामले में सबसे अधिक लागत-कुशल अभी तक सटीक दृष्टिकोण मिल सके।', 'ja': '関係抽出は、複雑な事前訓練されたアーキテクチャの登場により、近年多くの改善が見られた自然言語処理のサブタスクです。 これらの最先端のアプローチの多くは、タグ付けされたエンティティを含むラベル付けされた文章を備えたベンチマークと比較してテストされ、タスク固有のデータに関する重要な事前トレーニングと微調整が必要です。 しかし、ほとんどがローカル情報に特化した新聞社のような実際のユースケースのシナリオでは、関係は多様で、非常に具体的なタイプであり、そのような関係についての注釈付きのデータはほとんどなく、多くのエンティティは関連性のない文章で共存しています。 時間、コンピューティングパワー、人間のアノテーターなどのリソースが限られているこのような文脈での監視された最先端モデルの使用に疑問を呈しています。 これらの制約に適応するために、存在する関係を検出するためのバイナリLSTMベースの軽量モデルと関係分類のための最先端モデルからなるアクティブラーニングベースの関係抽出パイプラインを実験しました。 このシナリオでは、基本的な単語の埋め込み平均から、ニューラルネットワークとBERTベースのグラフ、そしていくつかのアクティブな学習取得戦略まで、分類モデルのいくつかの選択肢を比較し、フランス最大の毎日新聞社のユースケースで最もコスト効率が高く、正確なアプローチを見つけることができます。', 'ru': 'Извлечение отношений является подзадачей естественной обработки языка, которая в последние годы претерпела множество улучшений с появлением сложных предварительно обученных архитектур. Многие из этих современных подходов протестированы по сравнению с контрольными показателями с маркированными предложениями, содержащими помеченные сущности, и требуют важной предварительной подготовки и доработки данных по конкретным задачам. Однако в реальном сценарии использования, как, например, в газетной компании, занимающейся главным образом местной информацией, отношения носят разнообразный, весьма специфический характер, практически без аннотированных данных для таких отношений, и многие субъекты сопутствуют в предложении, не будучи связанными между собой. Мы ставим под сомнение использование современных моделей под наблюдением в таком контексте, когда такие ресурсы, как время, вычислительная мощность и человеческие аннотаторы, ограничены. Чтобы адаптироваться к этим ограничениям, мы экспериментируем с конвейером извлечения отношений на основе активного обучения, состоящим из двоичной облегченной модели на основе LSTM для обнаружения существующих отношений и современной модели для классификации отношений. Мы сравниваем несколько вариантов классификационных моделей в этом сценарии, от усреднения при встраивании базовых слов до графических нейронных сетей и сетей на основе BERT, а также несколько стратегий активного обучения, чтобы найти наиболее рентабельный, но точный подход в сценарии использования нашей крупнейшей французской ежедневной газетной компании.', 'ga': 'Is fothasc é eastóscadh caidrimh de phróiseáil teanga nádúrtha a chonacthas go leor feabhsuithe le blianta beaga anuas, le teacht na hailtireachta casta réamhoilte. Déantar go leor de na cineálacha cur chuige úrscothacha seo a thástáil i gcoinne tagarmharcanna le habairtí lipéadaithe ina bhfuil eintitis chlibeáilte, agus éilíonn siad réamhoiliúint agus mionchoigeartú tábhachtach ar shonraí tasc-shonracha. I gcás úsáide fíor, áfach, mar shampla i gcuideachta nuachtáin a bhíonn tiomanta go príomha d’eolas áitiúil, tá caidreamh éagsúil, an-sonrach, gan mórán sonraí anótáilte le haghaidh caidreamh den sórt sin, agus comhtharlaíonn go leor eintiteas in abairt gan a bheith. gaolmhar. Ceistímid úsáid samhlacha úrscothacha maoirsithe ina leithéid de chomhthéacs, áit a bhfuil teorainn le hacmhainní ar nós am, cumhacht ríomhaireachta agus anótálaithe daonna. Chun oiriúnú do na srianta sin, déanaimid triail le píblíne eastósctha caidrimh atá bunaithe ar fhoghlaim ghníomhach, arb é atá ann samhail éadrom dhénártha LSTM-bhunaithe chun an caidreamh atá ann a bhrath, agus samhail úrscothach maidir le haicmiú gaol. Déanaimid comparáid idir roghanna éagsúla maidir le samhlacha aicmithe sa chás seo, ó mheánú leabú focal bunúsach, go líonraí néaracha graif agus cinn atá bunaithe ar Bert, chomh maith le roinnt straitéisí gníomhacha sealbhaithe foghlama, chun an cur chuige is costéifeachtaí agus is cruinne a fháil inár gcuid. Cás úsáide cuideachta nuachtán laethúil na Fraince is mó.', 'hu': 'A kapcsolatkitermelés a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás egyik alterülete, amely az elmúlt években számos fejlődést tapasztalt, komplex, előre képzett architektúrák megjelenésével. Ezek közül a legkorszerűbb megközelítések közül számos olyan referenciaérték alapján tesztelnek, amelyek címkézett entitásokat tartalmaznak, és fontos előképzést és finomhangolást igényelnek a feladatspecifikus adatok tekintetében. Egy valós használati forgatókönyvben azonban, mint például egy olyan újságíró cégnél, amely leginkább helyi információval foglalkozik, a kapcsolatok változatos, rendkívül specifikus típusúak, gyakorlatilag nincsenek jegyzetelt adatok az ilyen kapcsolatokra, és sok entitás együtt jelenik meg egy mondatban anélkül, hogy kapcsolatba lépne. Megkérdőjelezzük a felügyelt, korszerű modellek használatát olyan kontextusban, ahol az erőforrások, mint az idő, a számítástechnikai teljesítmény és az emberi megjegyzések korlátozottak. Ezekhez a korlátozásokhoz való alkalmazkodás érdekében egy aktív tanulási alapú kapcsolat extrakciós csővezetékkel kísérletezünk, amely egy bináris LSTM alapú könnyű modellből áll a létező kapcsolatok felismerésére, és egy korszerű modellből áll a kapcsolatok osztályozására. Ebben a forgatókönyvben számos osztályozási modellt hasonlítunk össze, az alapvető szó beágyazásától kezdve a grafikonos neurális hálózatokig és Bert alapú hálózatokig, valamint számos aktív tanulási stratégiáig, hogy megtaláljuk a legköltséghatékonyabb, mégis pontos megközelítést francia legnagyobb napilap cégünk használati esetében.', 'ka': 'Relative extraction is a subtask of natural langage processing that has seen many improvements in recent years, with the advent of complex pre-trained architectures. ამ სურათის ბევრი შესაძლებლობების უფრო მეტი მოწყობილობიან, რომლებიც მარკულებული სიტყვები აქვს მარკულებული ელემენტები, და იჭირდება მნიშვნელოვანი საწყისო დასწავლობა და დასწავლო მაგრამ, რეალური გამოყენების სენარიოში, როგორც ახალი კომპანიაში, სამუშაოდ ლოკალური ინფორმაციისთვის განსაზღვრებული, ძალიან განსაზღვრებული ტიპის შესახებ, რომელიც არაფერად ასეთი შესახებისთვის მონაცემები არ ჩვენ შევაკითხვეთ მოდელების გამოყენება ასეთი კონტექსტში, სადაც რესურსები, როგორც დრო, კომპიუტურაციის ძალიან და ადამიანის ანოტატორიები უდრის. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტის განსაზღვრებისთვის ექსპერიმენტის განსაზღვრებისთვის ექსპერიმენტის კონტაქქციის კონტაქციის მიერ დაბათებული კონტაქციის კონტაქციის მიერ, რომელიც LSTM-დაბათებული ბინარი მარტივი ჩვენ ამ სინარიოში რამდენიმე მონიშნულებს კლასიფიკაციის მოდელებისთვის შემდგენებთ, საშუალო სიტყვებისთვის, საშუალოდ ნეიროლური ქსელების და ბერტის დაბათებული სტრატიგიებისთვის, და რამდენიმე აქტიური სწავლების სტრატიგიების სტრატიგიების შე', 'it': "L'estrazione delle relazioni è una sottomissione dell'elaborazione del langage naturale che ha visto molti miglioramenti negli ultimi anni, con l'avvento di complesse architetture pre-addestrate. Molti di questi approcci all'avanguardia sono testati su benchmark con frasi etichettate contenenti entità taggate e richiedono importanti pre-formazione e messa a punto dei dati specifici per attività. Tuttavia, in un vero e proprio scenario d'uso come in un'azienda giornalistica prevalentemente dedicata all'informazione locale, le relazioni sono di tipo vario e altamente specifico, con praticamente nessun dato annotato per tali relazioni, e molte entità convivono in una frase senza essere correlate. Mettiamo in discussione l'uso di modelli supervisionati all'avanguardia in un contesto in cui risorse come il tempo, la potenza di calcolo e gli annotatori umani sono limitati. Per adattarci a questi vincoli, sperimentiamo con una pipeline di estrazione delle relazioni basata sull'apprendimento attivo, costituita da un modello leggero basato su LSTM binario per rilevare le relazioni esistenti e da un modello all'avanguardia per la classificazione delle relazioni. Confrontiamo diverse scelte per i modelli di classificazione in questo scenario, dalla media di base del word embedding, a reti neurali grafiche e basate su Bert, oltre a diverse strategie di acquisizione di apprendimento attivo, al fine di trovare l'approccio più economico e preciso nel caso d'uso della nostra più grande società di quotidiani francesi.", 'kk': 'Қатынасын тарқату - жаңа жылдарда көп жақсартуларды көрген, комплексті алдын- оқылған архитектуралардың архитектуралардың көп жақсартуларының көп сұрауы. Бұл суреттің көпшілігінің көпшілігі белгіленген мәліметтердің белгіленген мәліметтердің белгілеріне қарсы тексеріледі, және тапсырманың ерекше мәліметтерінде маңызды алдын- оқыту және Бірақ, қағаз компаниясында, көпшілігі жергілікті мәліметтерге қатынау үшін, қатынастар өзгертілген, арнаулы түрі, бұл қатынастар үшін жарияланған деректер жоқ, және көптеген нысандар сұрақтарымен біріктірілген. Біз бұл контексті бақылау үлгілерінің пайдалануын сұрақ береміз. Уақыт, есептеу қуатты және адамның жаңалықтаушылары шектелген ресурстар. Бұл шектеулерге адаптациялау үшін біз белсенді оқыту үшін шығару каналының негізінде тәжірибелеріміз, барлық қатынастарды анықтау үшін LSTM негізіндегі бинарлық жетілдіру үлгісін, және қатынастар үлгісінің күй- жайы Біз бұл сценариядағы классификациялық үлгілер үшін бірнеше таңдау таңдауларын, негізгі сөздерден, невралдық желілерді және Берт негізделгендерді графикалық желілерді, бірнеше белсенді оқыту стратегияларын салыстырып, французша ең үлкен күндел', 'lt': 'Santykių gavyba yra natūralaus kalbos perdirbimo paklausa, kuri pastaraisiais metais buvo daug patobulinta, atsirandant sudėtingoms iš anksto parengtoms architektūroms. Daugelis šių pažangiausių metodų bandomi pagal lyginamuosius kriterijus su pažymėtais sakiniais, kuriuose yra pažymėtų subjektų, ir reikalingi svarbūs išankstiniai mokymai ir patikslinimai konkrečioms užduotims būdingiems duomenims. Tačiau realiame naudojimo scenarijuje, pavyzdžiui, laikraščių bendrovėje, daugiausia skirtame vietos informacijai, santykiai yra įvairūs, labai specifiniai, beveik nenurodyti tokių santykių duomenys, o daugelis subjektų bendradarbiauja sakinyje nesusiję. Mes abejojame, ar naudojami prižiūrimi moderniausi modeliai tokiomis aplinkybėmis, kai ištekliai, pvz., laikas, kompiuterinė galia ir žmogiškieji anotatoriai, yra riboti. Siekiant prisitaikyti prie šių apribojimų, eksperimentuojame su aktyvaus mokymosi pagrindu pagrįstu santykių ekstrahavimo vamzdynu, sudarytu iš dviejų LSTM pagrįstų lengvųjų santykių nustatymo modelio ir naujausio santykių klasifikavimo modelio. Palyginame keletą klasifikavimo modelių pasirinkimų šiame scenarijuje: nuo pagrindinio žodžio įtraukimo vidurkio iki nervinių tinklų grafiko ir Bert pagrindu grindžiamų tinklų, taip pat kelių aktyvaus mokymosi strategijų, kad būtų rastas ekonomiškiausias ir tiksliausias požiūris mūs ų didžiausios Prancūzijos kasdienio laikraščio bendrovės naudojimo atveju.', 'ms': 'Ekstrasi hubungan adalah subtask proses bahasa semulajadi yang telah melihat banyak peningkatan dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, dengan muncul arkitektur yang kompleks pra-dilatih. Many of these state-of-the-art approaches are tested against benchmarks with labelled sentences containing tagged entities, and require important pre-training and fine-tuning on task-specific data.  Bagaimanapun, dalam skenario kasus-kes sebenar seperti dalam syarikat surat khabar kebanyakan dedikasi kepada maklumat setempat, hubungan adalah jenis berbeza, sangat spesifik, dengan hampir tiada data yang dicatat untuk hubungan seperti itu, dan banyak entiti berlaku sama dalam kalimat tanpa berkaitan. Kami mempertanyakan penggunaan model terbaik yang diawasi dalam konteks seperti ini, di mana sumber seperti masa, kuasa komputer dan annotator manusia adalah terbatas. To adapt to these constraints, we experiment with an active-learning based relation extraction pipeline, consisting of a binary LSTM-based lightweight model for detecting the relations that do exist, and a state-of-the-art model for relation classification.  Kami membandingkan beberapa pilihan untuk model klasifikasi dalam skenario ini, dari pembatasan perkataan as as, ke graf rangkaian saraf dan rangkaian berasaskan Bert, serta beberapa strategi pembelajaran aktif, untuk mencari pendekatan yang paling rental tetapi tepat dalam kes penggunaan syarikat akhbar harian Perancis terbesar kami.', 'mk': 'Екстракцијата на односите е подпрашање на природното процесирање на јазици кое има видено многу подобрувања во последниве години, со појавата на комплексни предобучени архитектури. Many of these state-of-the-art approaches are tested against benchmarks with labelled sentences containing tagged entities, and require important pre-training and fine-tuning on task-specific data.  Сепак, во вистински сценарио за случај на употреба, како што е во новинарското претпријатие посветено претежно на локални информации, односите се од различни, високо специфични типови, со виртуелно никакви анотирани податоци за вакви односи, и многу ентитети се соопштаат во реченица без да се Се сомневаме во употребата на надгледувани најнови модели во ваков контекст, каде ресурсите како што е времето, компјутерската моќ и човечките анотатори се ограничени. За да се прилагодиме на овие ограничувања, експериментираме со гасовод за екстракција на односи базирани на активно учење, кој се состои од бинарен лесен модел базиран на ЛСТМ за детектирање на односите кои постојат, и најсовремен модел за класификација на односите. Ние споредуваме неколку избори за класификациски модели во овој сценарио, од основното вклучување на зборови просечно, до графикување на невровните мрежи и оние базирани на Берт, како и неколку активни стратегии за набавување на учење, со цел да го најдеме најефикасен, но точен пристап во случајот на користење на нашето најголем', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή σχέσεων είναι μια υποεργασία της επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας που έχει σημειώσει πολλές βελτιώσεις τα τελευταία χρόνια, με την έλευση σύνθετων προ-εκπαιδευμένων αρχιτεκτονικών. Πολλές από αυτές τις προηγμένες προσεγγίσεις δοκιμάζονται σε σχέση με δείκτες αναφοράς με επισημάνσεις που περιέχουν οντότητες με ετικέτες και απαιτούν σημαντική προεκπαίδευση και συντονισμό σε συγκεκριμένα δεδομένα εργασίας. Ωστόσο, σε ένα πραγματικό σενάριο χρήσης, όπως σε μια εταιρεία εφημερίδων που ασχολείται κυρίως με την τοπική πληροφόρηση, οι σχέσεις είναι ποικίλου, ιδιαίτερα συγκεκριμένου τύπου, με σχεδόν κανένα σχολιασμένο στοιχείο για τέτοιες σχέσεις, και πολλές οντότητες συμβαίνουν σε μια πρόταση χωρίς να σχετίζονται. Αμφισβητούμε τη χρήση εποπτευόμενων μοντέλων τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε ένα τέτοιο πλαίσιο, όπου οι πόροι όπως ο χρόνος, η υπολογιστική δύναμη και οι ανθρώπινοι σχολιαστές είναι περιορισμένοι. Για να προσαρμοστούμε σε αυτούς τους περιορισμούς, πειραματιζόμαστε με έναν αγωγό εξαγωγής σχέσεων βασισμένο στην ενεργό μάθηση, που αποτελείται από ένα δυαδικό ελαφρύ μοντέλο για την ανίχνευση των σχέσεων που υπάρχουν, και ένα μοντέλο τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για την ταξινόμηση σχέσεων. Συγκρίνουμε διάφορες επιλογές για μοντέλα ταξινόμησης σε αυτό το σενάριο, από τη βασική ενσωμάτωση λέξεων, μέχρι τα νευρωνικά δίκτυα γραφής και αυτά που βασίζονται στο Μπερτ, καθώς και διάφορες στρατηγικές ενεργού εκμάθησης, προκειμένου να βρούμε την πιο αποδοτική αλλά ακριβή προσέγγιση στην περίπτωση χρήσης της μεγαλύτερης γαλλικής εταιρείας ημερήσιας εφημερίδας μας.', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni hija sottotalba għall-ipproċessar tal-lingwa naturali li rat ħafna titjib f’dawn l-a ħħar snin, bil-ħolqien ta’ arkitetturi kumplessi mħarrġa minn qabel. Ħafna minn dawn l-avviċinamenti l-aktar avvanzati huma ttestjati kontra punti ta’ riferiment b’sentenzi ttikkettati li fihom entitajiet ittikkettati, u jeħtieġu taħriġ minn qabel u aġġustament importanti fuq dejta speċifika għall-kompiti. Madankollu, f’xenarju reali ta’ użu bħal f’kumpanija ta’ gazzetti li l-aktar hija ddedikata għall-informazzjoni lokali, ir-relazzjonijiet huma ta’ tip varjat, speċifiku ħafna, b’prattikament l-ebda dejta annotata għal tali relazzjonijiet, u ħafna entitajiet iseħħu flimkien f’sentenza mingħajr ma jkunu relatati. We question the use of supervised state-of-the-art models in such a context, where resources such as time, computing power and human annotators are limited.  Biex nadattaw għal dawn ir-restrizzjonijiet, a ħna qed nagħmlu esperimenti b’pajpijiet ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet ibbażati fuq it-tagħlim attiv, li jikkonsistu f’mudell ħafif binarju bbażat fuq LSTM biex jinstabu r-relazzjonijiet li jeżistu, u mudell l-aktar avvanzat għall-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet. Aħna nqabblu diversi għażliet għal mudelli ta’ klassifikazzjoni f’dan ix-xenarju, minn medja bażika ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ kliem, sa netwerks newrali grafiċi u dawk ibbażati fuq Bert, kif ukoll diversi strateġiji ta’ akkwist attiv ta’ tagħlim, sabiex jinstab l-aktar approċċ kosteffiċjenti iżda preċiż fil-każ ta’ użu tal-akbar kumpanija Franċiża ta’ kuljum tagħna.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത കൊല്ലങ്ങളില്\u200d വളരെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നുവെന്ന് സ്വാഭാവികമായ ലാങ്കേജ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ ഉപജോലിയാണ് ബന്ധ ഈ രാജ്യത്തിലെ അധികപേരും ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200dക്കെതിരായി പരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. ടാഗ്ഗേഡ് വസ്തുക്കളുടെ ഉള്\u200dപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്ള ബെന്\u200dമ എന്നാലും യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പത്രത്തില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യേക വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d ബന്ധ നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയിലെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു. സമയത്തെപ്പോലെ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d, ശക ഈ തടസ്സങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം പൂര്\u200dത്തീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ബൈനര്\u200d എസ്റ്റിംഎം അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു ലൈറ്റ് മോഡലിന ഈ സിനാറിയിലെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കേഷന്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് നമ്മള്\u200d പല തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നുണ്ട്, അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും, ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റുകളും ബെര്\u200dട്ട് അടിസ്ഥാനമായിട്ടുള്ള വാക്കുകളും ഗ്രാ', 'mn': 'Хариулт татах нь байгалийн хэлбэрийн үйлдвэрлэлийн доогуур юм. Энэ нь сүүлийн жилүүдэд маш олон сайжруулалтыг харсан бөгөөд комплекс сургалтын өмнө сургалтын архитектуруудын ирээдтэй. Ихэнх урлагийн арга баримтуудын ихэнх нь тэмдэглэгдсэн өгүүлбэртэй тэмдэглэгдсэн өгүүлбэртэй тэмдэглэгдсэн үг эсрэг шалгаж, ажлын тодорхой мэдээллийн тухай чухал урлагийн өмнө сургалт болон тодорхойлох шаардлагатай. Гэхдээ мэдээллийн компанид ихэнхдээ орон нутгийн мэдээллийн тухай төлөвлөгдсөн жинхэнэ хэрэглээний тухай хувилбарт харилцаа өөр өөр, тодорхой төрлүүд байдаг. Ийм харилцааны тухай ихэнх мэдээллүүд байхгүй байдаг. Бид хэрэглэгдсэн урлагийн байр суурь загварын хэрэглээ ийм нөхцөлд асууж байна. Хугацаа, тооцоолох эрх мэдэл, хүн төрөлхтний тэмдэглэгчид хязгаарлагддаг. Эдгээр хязгаарлуудыг адаптын тулд бид холбоотой холбоотой актив суралцах суралцах холбоотой холбоотой туршилт хийдэг. Энэ холбоотой LSTM-д байдаг холбоотой хэмжээний холбоотой загвар, холбоотой хэмжээний урлагийн загвар юм. Бид энэ хувилбарт хэд хэдэн хувилбар загварын сонголтуудыг харьцуулж, үндсэн хэлбэрээс дундаж, мэдрэлийн сүлжээ болон Берт суурилсан загваруудыг график, мөн олон актив сургалтын худалдааны стратеги, Французын хамгийн өндөр бүтээмжтэй, гэхдээ бидний хамгийн томоохон цаасан', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja relacji jest podzadaniem naturalnego przetwarzania języka, które w ostatnich latach odnotowało wiele ulepszeń, wraz z pojawieniem się złożonych wstępnie przeszkolonych architektur. Wiele z tych najnowocześniejszych podejść jest testowanych na podstawie wskaźników referencyjnych z oznaczonymi zdaniami zawierającymi oznaczone podmioty i wymagają ważnego wstępnego szkolenia i dostosowania danych specyficznych dla zadania. Jednak w rzeczywistym scenariuszu użytkowania, takim jak w firmie gazetowej głównie dedykowanej informacji lokalnej, relacje są zróżnicowane, bardzo specyficzne, praktycznie brak adnotacji danych dla takich relacji, a wiele podmiotów współwystępuje w zdaniu bez powiązania. Kwestionujemy stosowanie nadzorowanych najnowocześniejszych modeli w takim kontekście, w którym zasoby takie jak czas, moc obliczeniowa i człowiek są ograniczone. Aby dostosować się do tych ograniczeń, eksperymentujemy z rurociągiem ekstrakcji relacji opartym na aktywnym uczeniu się, składającym się z binarnego modelu lekkiego opartego na LSTM do wykrywania istniejących relacji oraz najnowocześniejszego modelu klasyfikacji relacji. Porównujemy kilka wyborów modeli klasyfikacyjnych w tym scenariuszu, od podstawowego uśrednienia osadzenia słów, po wykresowane sieci neuronowe i oparte na Bert, a także kilka aktywnych strategii nabywania nauki, aby znaleźć najbardziej opłacalne i dokładne podejście w przypadku użycia naszej największej francuskiej firmy dziennej.', 'no': 'Ekstraksjon av relasjon er ein underspørjing av naturleg langagehandsaming som har sett mange forbedringar i tidlegare år, med utviklinga av komplekse føretrainerte arkitektur. Mange av desse tilnærmingane i kunsten vert testa mot benchmarker med merkelige setningar som inneheld merkelige einingar, og krev viktig føreøving og finnstilling på oppgåvelege data. Men i eit verkeleg bruksforskjenning som i ein avvikkompaniet som hovudsakelig spesifisert til lokale informasjon, er forholdet av varierte, svært spesifikke type, med praktisk ingen oppmerkte data for slike forhold, og mange einingar samtidig skjer i eit setning utan å vera relatert. Vi spør om bruken av kontrollerte modeller i slik kontekst, der ressursar som tid, datakraft og menneske annotatorar er begrenset. For å tilpassa desse begrensene, eksperimenterer vi med ein aktiv læring basert på relasjon med ekstraksjonsrøyr, som inneheld ein binær LSTM-basert lettvekt-modell for å oppdaga forholdene som finst, og eit kunstmodell for relasjonsklassifikasjon. Vi samanliknar fleire val for klassifikasjonsmodular i denne scenarien, frå grunnleggjande ord som innebygger gjennomsnittet, til grafen av neuralnettverk og Bert-baserte, og fleire aktive læringsstrategier for å finna den mest kostnadseffektivste, men nøyaktige tilnærming i bruken av våre fransk største daglige journalekompaniet.', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija odnosa je podpitanje prirodnog obrađivanja jezika koji je u poslednjih godina vidio mnoge poboljšanja, s dolaskom kompleksnog predobučenog arhitektura. Mnogi od tih pristupa umjetnosti su testirani protiv kriterija sa označenim rečenicama koje sadrže označene entitate, i zahtevaju važnu predobuku i finalizaciju podataka o specifičnim zadacima. Međutim, u stvarnom scenariju za upotrebu, kao što je u novinskoj kompaniji uglavnom posvećenoj lokalnoj informaciji, odnosi su različiti, vrlo specifični tip, sa praktično nikakvim notiranim podacima za takve odnose, a mnoge entitate se sarađuju u rečenici bez veze. Pitamo korištenje nadzornih modela umjetnosti u takvom kontekstu, gde su resursi poput vremena, računalne moći i ljudske annotatore ograničene. Da bismo se prilagodili ovim ograničenjima, eksperimentirali smo sa aktivnim učenjem baziranim na odnosu na pipeliniji ekstrakcije, koji se sastoji od binarnog model a lagane težine na LSTM-u za otkrivanje odnosa koje postoje, i modela umetnosti za klasifikaciju odnosa. Uspoređujemo nekoliko izbora za klasifikacijske modele u ovom scenariju, od osnovne reči uključujuće srednje reči, do grafika neuronskih mreža i na Bertu baziranih, kao i nekoliko aktivnih strategija prikupljanja učenja, kako bi pronašli najkoštanog, ali tačan pristup u slučaju upotrebe naše najveće dnevnje novine kompanije.', 'sv': 'Relationsutvinning är en subaktivitet av naturlig langage bearbetning som har sett många förbättringar under de senaste åren, med tillkomsten av komplexa förinställda arkitekturer. Många av dessa toppmoderna metoder testas mot riktmärken med märkta meningar som innehåller taggade entiteter, och kräver viktig fortbildning och finjustering av uppgiftsspecifika data. Men i ett verkligt användningsscenario, som i ett tidningsföretag som huvudsakligen ägnar sig åt lokal information, är relationerna av varierande, mycket specifik typ, med praktiskt taget inga kommenterade data för sådana relationer, och många enheter förekommer samtidigt i en mening utan att vara relaterade. Vi ifrågasätter användningen av övervakade toppmoderna modeller i ett sådant sammanhang, där resurser som tid, datorkraft och mänskliga kommentatorer är begränsade. För att anpassa oss till dessa begränsningar experimenterar vi med en aktiv inlärningsbaserad relationsextraktionspipeline, bestående av en binär LSTM-baserad lättviktsmodell för att upptäcka de relationer som finns, och en state-of-the-art modell för relationsklassificering. Vi jämför flera val för klassificeringsmodeller i detta scenario, från grundläggande ordinbäddning medelvärde, till grafneurala nätverk och Bert-baserade nätverk, samt flera strategier för aktiv inlärning, för att hitta det mest kostnadseffektiva men exakta tillvägagångssättet i vårt franska största dagstidningsföretags användningsfall.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණය තමයි ස්වභාවික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දැක්කා ගිය අවුරුද්දු වලින් ස මේ ස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වලින් ලේබල් කරලා තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියෙන්න තියෙ නමුත්, ඇත්ත ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විදිහට ස්ථානික තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, සම්බන්ධතාවන් වෙනස් විශේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා නිරීක්ෂාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ අනිවාර්යාත්මක විදියට, කාලයක් වගේ, පරිගණන බලය සහ මේ අවධානය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, අපි සක්\u200dරිය-ඉගෙනීමේ සම්බන්ධ පායිප්ලින් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න සම්බන්ධ විදිහට අපි මේ සිනාරියෝ වල විශේෂ මොඩල් වලට විකල්පයක් තේරුම් කරනවා, මූලික වචන සම්පූර්ණ වචන සම්පූර්ණ වචන සහ බර්ට්ස්ථාවිත විකල්පයක් ග්\u200dරාෆ්ට් ජාතික ජාතික ව', 'ta': 'சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகளில் பல முன்னேற்றங்களை பார்த்துள்ளார் இந்த நிலையில் பெரும்பாலான- கலை முறைமைகள் சோதிக்கப்பட்ட செய்தி குறிப்பிட்ட வாக்குகளுடன் குறிப்பிட்ட வாக்குகளுக்கு எதிராக பென்கா However, in a real use-case scenario such as in a newspaper company mostly dedicated to local information, relations are varied, highly specific type, with virtually no annotated data for such relations, and many entities coincide in a sentence without connecting. நாம் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட நிலையில் கலை மாதிரிகளின் பயன்பாட்டை கேள்வி செய்கிறோம். நேரத்திற்கு, கணிப்பாடு சக்தி மற்றும் மனித அச் இந்த கட்டுப்பாடுகளை ஒப்பீடு செய்ய, நாம் செயல்படுத்தும் தொடர்பு வெளியீட்டு பைப்பைல் சோதிக்கிறோம், இருந்து LSTM-அடிப்படையில் உள்ள தொடர்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் ம நாம் இந்த பார்வையில் வகுப்பு மாதிரிகளுக்கு பல விருப்பங்களை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம், அடிப்படை வார்த்தை உள்ள சராசரியாக உள்ளது, புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மற்றும் பெர்ட் அடிப்படையாளர்களை வரைகலாம், மற்றும் பல இயங', 'ro': 'Extracția relațiilor este o subactivitate a prelucrării langajului natural care a înregistrat multe îmbunătățiri în ultimii ani, odată cu apariția unor arhitecturi complexe pre-instruite. Multe dintre aceste abordări de ultimă generație sunt testate în raport cu criteriile de referință cu propoziții etichetate care conțin entități etichetate și necesită pregătire prealabilă și reglare fină a datelor specifice sarcinilor. Cu toate acestea, într-un scenariu real de utilizare, cum ar fi într-o companie de ziare dedicată în mare parte informației locale, relațiile sunt de tip variat, extrem de specific, practic fără date adnotate pentru astfel de relații, iar multe entități apar într-o propoziție fără a fi legate. Punem la îndoială utilizarea modelelor supravegheate de ultimă oră într-un astfel de context, în care resursele precum timpul, puterea de calcul și adnotatorii umani sunt limitate. Pentru a ne adapta la aceste constrângeri, experimentăm cu o conductă de extracție a relațiilor bazată pe învățare activă, constând dintr-un model binar LSTM ușor pentru detectarea relațiilor care există și un model de ultimă generație pentru clasificarea relațiilor. Comparăm mai multe opțiuni pentru modelele de clasificare în acest scenariu, de la media de bază a încorporării cuvintelor, la rețelele neurale grafice și cele bazate pe Bert, precum și mai multe strategii de achiziție a învățării active, pentru a găsi cea mai rentabilă abordare în cazul de utilizare al celei mai mari companii de ziare franceze.', 'ur': 'رابطہ اٹھانے کا ایک مطالبہ ہے جسے اگلے سالوں میں بہت سی سوداگری دیکھی ہے، جسے پیچیدہ پیش آموزش کی معماری کے ساتھ آگئی ہے. ان کی بہت سی موجودات کی تقریبیں بنچم مارک کے مقابلے میں آزمائش کی جاتی ہیں جن کے ذریعے نقطہ لکھی ہوئی جماعتوں میں لکھی ہوئی جماعتوں کے ساتھ ہے، اور کام کے معاملہ میں اچھی پیش آموزش اور اچھی تنظیم کی ضرورت ہے. However, in a real use-case scenario such as a newspaper company most dedicated to local information, relations are varied, highly specific type, with virtually no annotated data for such relations, and many entities are co-occurring in a sentence without being related. ہم ایسے موقعیت میں نظارت کی موڈل کے استعمال سے سوال کرتے ہیں جہاں موقع، کمپیوٹر قدرت اور انسان کے اذیت کرنے والے محدود ہیں. ان محدودیتوں کے ساتھ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک فعال-سیکھنے کی تعلیم کے ساتھ آزمائش کریں گے جو اضافہ پائيپ لین پر بنیاد ہے، اس میں ایک دوئناری LSTM-بنیاد لایٹوز موڈل ہے جو موجود ہیں، اور ایک ارتفاع کے لئے آرتی موڈل ہے۔ ہم نے اس سناریو میں بہت سی انتخاب کے مطابق تقسیم نمونے کے لئے مقایسہ کیا ہے، بنیادی کلمات سے متوسط کلمات کے مطابق، نئورل نیٹورک اور برٹ بنیاد رکھنے والے، اور بہت سی فعال یاد لینے کے استراتژیات کے مطابق، تاکہ ہمارے فرانسوی کے سب سے بڑے روزانی کاغذ کمپنی کے استعمال کے مطابق بہت', 'so': 'Soo saarista xiriirka waa baaritaanka dhaqaalaha dabiicadda ah oo arkay horumarin badan ee sanadkii ugu dambeeyey, iyadoo ay ku dhaqdhaqaaqdaan dhismaha la tababaray oo adag. Dhaqdhaqaaqyada farshaxanka badan waxaa la imtixaamayaa waxyaabaha la qoray oo ku yaala alaabta lagu qoray, waxaana loo baahan yahay macluumaad muhiim ah oo ku saabsan waxbarasho horumar ah iyo hagitaan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, sida shirkad wargeyska ugu badan ee macluumaadka degmada ah, xiriirku waa kala duwan yihiin, si gaar ah, si aan ugu dhowaan macluumaad dhibaato leh xiriirka caynkaas ah, isla markaasna qaar entiti badan waxay ku dhacaan xukun aan la xiriirin. Waxaynu ka waydiinnaa isticmaalka noocyada farshaxanka ah sida marka ay ku xadgudbaan hantida, xisaabinta xoogga iyo dadka dhibaataysa. Si a an u dhigno qasabkaas, waxaynu ku tijaabinaynaa sawir iskuul ah oo ku saleysan iskuul xiriir ah, waxaana ka mid ah model fudud oo labaad oo LSTM ku saleysan si aan u ogaano xiriirka ay jiraan, iyo model-ka farshaxanta xiriirka. Waxaynu isbarbardhignaa noocyada fasaxa, taas oo ah hadalka aasaasiga ah oo kor u baxaya, si aan u sameynno shabakadaha neurada iyo kuwa ku qoran Bert, sidoo kale qalabka waxbarashada waxqabadka ah, si aan u helno hababka ugu qiimo-faa’iidada weli si saxda ah ee isticmaalka shirkadeena ugu weyn ee maalin kasta ee faransa.', 'vi': 'Việc khai thác tương quan là một yêu cầu kiến trúc bẩm sinh đã được cải tiến nhiều trong những năm gần đây, với sự xuất hiện các kiến trúc phức tạp được rèn luyện. Rất nhiều phương pháp hiện đại được thử thách dựa trên điểm hẹn với các câu có nhãn có các thực thể gắn thẻ, và yêu cầu những khóa huấn luyện quan trọng về các dữ liệu đặc nhiệm. Tuy nhiên, trong một trường hợp thực tế như trong một công ty báo chí chủ yếu dành cho thông tin địa phương, các mối quan hệ khác nhau, rất đặc biệt, với hầu như không có dữ liệu ghi chú cho các mối quan hệ đó, và nhiều thực thể đồng hành trong một câu chưa có liên quan. Chúng tôi đặt câu hỏi về việc sử dụng các mô hình hiện đại được giám sát trong một trường hợp, nơi có giới hạn tài nguyên như thời gian, sức mạnh tính toán và nghệ thuật con người. Để thích nghi với những giới hạn này, chúng tôi thử nghiệm với một đường ống dẫn hấp dẫn kết quả tích cực, gồm một mô hình nhị phân dạng nhẹ dựa trên LSD để phát hiện các mối quan hệ tồn tại, và một mô hình hiện đại về phân tích liên quan. Chúng tôi so s ánh nhiều lựa chọn cho các mô hình phân loại trong trường hợp này, từ từ cơ bản chứa số trung bình hóa hóa, cho các mạng thần kinh và các phương án dựa vào Bert, cũng như nhiều chiến lược tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích tích hành động, để tìm phương pháp hiệu quả và chính xác nhất trong trường hợp sử dụng của công ty báo hàng ngày Pháp lớn nhất.', 'uz': "Ulanishni tashqi qilish asboblar jarayonlarining tub vazifasi, yangi yillarda ko'p yaxshi o'zgarishni ko'rdi, murakkab o'rganilgan maktablarni tajriba qilish bilan ko'proq yaxshi ko'rinadi. Ushbu holatning ko'pchilik holati qoidalari imkoniyatlaridan foydalanish mumkin va vazifaning xossa maʼlumotda muhim soʻzning oldini ishlatish kerak. Lekin, maktabda lokal maʼlumot bilan ishlatilgan gazeti kompaniyasidagi haqiqiqiy foydalanuvchi scenarida, aloqatlarning turli, juda katta hususiyat turli. Bunday aloqalar uchun hech qanday bogʻ'liq maʼlumot yoʻq, va ko'pchilik maʼlumotlar bir bir bir terminalda boshlanadi. Biz taʼminlovchi shaxsiy modellarning foydalanishini savol qilamiz. Bu holatda, masalan vaqt, kompyuterni va inson annotatorlar cheksiz. Bu qatlamlarni o'zgartirish uchun, biz aktiv o'rganish tuzilishi asosiy bog'liq tuzilishi pipelinin bilan o'rganamiz. Ulanish darajasini aniqlash uchun ikkita LSTM asosida yaratilgan bir nuqta modeli bor. Biz bu scenarida darajalashtirish modellariga bir necha choʻplarni kamaytamiz, o'rtacha so'zlarning asosiy so'zdan, neyrol tarmoqlarini va Bert asosida ko'plab o'rganish strategilarga kamaytamiz, va faqat ko'plab o'rganish imkoniyatlarini o'rganish uchun Fransuzning eng eng katta qismi foydalanuvchi va eng yaxshi ko'plab o'rganish darajalarimizni o'rg", 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija odnosa je podpitanje prirodnog obradivanja jezika koja je vidjela mnoge poboljšanja u posljednjih godina, s dolaskom kompleksnog predobučenog arhitektura. Mnogi od tih pristupa umjetnosti testiraju se protiv kriterija s označenim rečenicama koje sadrže označene entitate te zahtijevaju važnu predobuku i ispravnu prilagodbu podataka za određene zadatke. Međutim, u stvarnom scenariju primjene, poput novinske tvrtke uglavnom posvećene lokalnim informacijama, odnosi su od različitih, vrlo specifičnih vrsta, s praktično nikakvim označenim podacima za takve odnose, a mnogi entiteti se sarađuju u kazni bez veze. Pitamo korištenje nadzornih modela umjetnosti u takvom kontekstu, gdje su resursi poput vremena, računalne moći i ljudskih annotatora ograničeni. Da bismo se prilagodili ovim ograničenjima, eksperimentirali smo s aktivnim učenjem baziranim na odnosu na cijevi ekstrakcije, koji se sastoji od binarnog model a lagane težine osnovanog na LSTM-u za otkrivanje odnosa koje postoje, i modela stanja umjetnosti za klasifikaciju odnosa. Uspoređujemo nekoliko izbora za klasifikacijske modele u ovom scenariju, od osnovne riječi uključujuće srednje vrijednosti, do grafika neuronskih mreža i na Bertu baziranih, kao i nekoliko aktivnih strategija prikupljanja učenja kako bi pronašli najkoštačniji i tačan pristup u slučaju uporabe naše najveće dnevnje novine tvrtke.', 'nl': 'Relatie extractie is een subtaak van natuurlijke langage verwerking die de afgelopen jaren veel verbeteringen heeft doorgemaakt, met de komst van complexe voorgetrainde architecturen. Veel van deze state-of-the-art benaderingen worden getest aan de hand van benchmarks met gelabelde zinnen die gelabelde entiteiten bevatten, en vereisen belangrijke pre-training en fine-tuning op taakspecifieke gegevens. Echter, in een echt use-case scenario, zoals in een krantenbedrijf dat zich voornamelijk toelegt op lokale informatie, zijn relaties van gevarieerd, zeer specifiek type, met vrijwel geen geannoteerde gegevens voor dergelijke relaties, en veel entiteiten komen samen in een zin voor zonder verwant te zijn. We vragen het gebruik van supervisored state-of-the-art modellen af in een context waarin middelen zoals tijd, rekenkracht en menselijke annotatoren beperkt zijn. Om ons aan deze beperkingen aan te passen, experimenteren we met een active-learning based relationextraction pipeline, bestaande uit een binair LSTM-gebaseerd lichtgewicht model voor het detecteren van de bestaande relaties en een state-of-the-art model voor relatiecolassificatie. We vergelijken verschillende keuzes voor classificatiemodellen in dit scenario, van basis woord embedding gemiddeld tot grafiek neurale netwerken en Bert gebaseerde netwerken, evenals verschillende actieve leeracquisitiestrategieën, om de meest kostenefficiënte en nauwkeurige aanpak te vinden in de use case van ons grootste Franse dagblad bedrijf.', 'bg': 'Екстракцията на отношенията е подзадача на естествената обработка на langage, която е видяла много подобрения през последните години, с появата на сложни предварително обучени архитектури. Много от тези най-съвременни подходи са тествани спрямо показатели с етикетирани изречения, съдържащи маркирани обекти, и изискват важно предварително обучение и фино настройване на специфичните за задачата данни. Въпреки това, в реален сценарий на използване, като например във вестникарска компания, посветена предимно на местната информация, отношенията са от различен, силно специфичен тип, с практически никакви анотирани данни за такива отношения и много субекти се срещат съвместно в изречение, без да са свързани. Поставяме под въпрос използването на надзорни съвременни модели в такъв контекст, в който ресурси като време, изчислителна мощност и човешки анотатори са ограничени. За да се адаптираме към тези ограничения, експериментираме с канал за извличане на релации, базиран на активно обучение, състоящ се от двоичен модел за откриване на релациите, които съществуват, и модерен модел за класификация на релациите. Сравняваме няколко избора за класификационни модели в този сценарий, от основно вграждане на думи, до графични невронни мрежи и базирани на Берт, както и няколко стратегии за активно придобиване на обучение, за да намерим най-рентабилния и точен подход в случая на използване на нашата най-голяма френска ежедневна компания.', 'de': 'Beziehungsextraktion ist eine Teilaufgabe der natürlichen Sprachverarbeitung, die in den letzten Jahren viele Verbesserungen erfahren hat, mit dem Aufkommen komplexer vorgetrainierter Architekturen. Viele dieser State-of-the-Art Ansätze werden anhand von Benchmarks mit markierten Sätzen mit getaggten Entitäten getestet und erfordern wichtige Vor- und Feinabstimmungen auf aufgabenspezifischen Daten. In einem realen Anwendungsszenario, wie in einer Zeitungsfirma, die sich hauptsächlich auf lokale Informationen konzentriert, sind Beziehungen jedoch von unterschiedlichem, sehr spezifischem Typ, ohne annotierte Daten für solche Beziehungen, und viele Entitäten treten in einem Satz zusammen, ohne verwandt zu sein. Wir hinterfragen den Einsatz von überwachten State-of-the-Art Modellen in einem solchen Kontext, in dem Ressourcen wie Zeit, Rechenleistung und menschliche Annotatoren begrenzt sind. Um sich an diese Einschränkungen anzupassen, experimentieren wir mit einer Active-Learning-basierten Beziehungsextraktionspipeline, bestehend aus einem binären LSTM-basierten Leichtbaumodell zur Erkennung der bestehenden Beziehungen und einem State-of-the-Art-Modell zur Beziehungsklassifizierung. In diesem Szenario vergleichen wir verschiedene Optionen für Klassifizierungsmodelle, von der einfachen Mittelung der Worteinbettung über neuronale Netze und Bert-basierte Netze bis hin zu mehreren aktiven Lernerwerbsstrategien, um den kosteneffizientesten und präzisesten Ansatz im Anwendungsfall unseres größten Tageszeitungsunternehmens Frankreichs zu finden.', 'da': 'Relation ekstraktion er en underopgave af naturlig langage behandling, der har set mange forbedringer i de seneste år, med fremkomsten af komplekse prætrænede arkitekturer. Mange af disse state-of-the-art tilgange testes mod benchmarks med mærkede sætninger, der indeholder mærkede enheder, og kræver vigtig foruddannelse og finjustering af opgavespecifikke data. Men i et reelt use-case scenarie som i et avisvirksomhed, der hovedsageligt er dedikeret til lokal information, er relationer af varieret, meget specifik type, med stort set ingen annoterede data for sådanne relationer, og mange enheder forekommer samtidig i en sætning uden at være relateret til hinanden. Vi sætter spørgsmålstegn ved brugen af overvågede state-of-the-art modeller i en sådan sammenhæng, hvor ressourcer som tid, computerkraft og menneskelige annotatorer er begrænsede. For at tilpasse os disse begrænsninger eksperimenterer vi med en aktiv læring baseret relationsudvinding pipeline, bestående af en binær LSTM-baseret letvægtsmodel til detektering af de relationer, der eksisterer, og en state-of-the-art model til relationsklassificering. Vi sammenligner flere muligheder for klassifikationsmodeller i dette scenario, fra grundlæggende ordindlejring gennemsnit, til graf neurale netværk og Bert-baserede netværk, samt flere aktive læringserhvervelsesstrategier, for at finde den mest omkostningseffektive, men nøjagtige tilgang i vores franske største dagblades brugscase.', 'ko': '관계 추출은 자연 언어 처리의 하위 임무로 최근 몇 년 동안 복잡한 예비 훈련 체계 구조의 출현에 따라 많은 개선을 얻었다.이러한 가장 선진적인 방법 중 많은 것이 표기 실체를 포함하는 표기 문장의 기준에 따라 테스트된 것이기 때문에 특정한 임무의 데이터에 대해 중요한 예비 교육과 미세한 조정이 필요하다.그러나 실제 용례 장면에서 예를 들어 현지 정보에 주력하는 신문사에서 관계는 각양각색이고 고도로 특정한 유형으로 이런 관계의 주석 데이터가 거의 없고 많은 실체가 한 문장에 동시에 나타나 관련이 없다.우리는 이러한 자원(예를 들어 시간, 계산 능력과 인공 주석기)의 유한한 환경에서 감독을 받는 가장 선진적인 모델을 사용해야 한다고 의심한다.이러한 제약에 적응하기 위해 우리는 주동적인 학습을 바탕으로 하는 관계 추출 파이프를 시도했다. 이 파이프는 2진법 LSTM을 바탕으로 하는 경량급 모델을 포함하고 실제 존재하는 관계를 검사하는 데 사용되며 관계 분류에 사용되는 최신 모델을 포함한다.이런 상황에서 우리는 몇 가지 분류 모델의 선택을 비교했다. 기본 단어가 평균적으로 도형신경 네트워크와 버트 기반의 네트워크, 그리고 몇 가지 주동적인 학습 획득 전략을 삽입하여 우리 프랑스 최대 일간지의 용례에서 가장 원가적이고 정확한 방법을 찾을 수 있도록 했다.', 'sw': 'Utoa wa uhusiano ni jukumu la utaratibu wa utoaji wa mazingira wa asili ambalo limeona maendeleo mengi katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, kwa matumizi ya majengo yaliyo na mafunzo makubwa. Matokeo mengi ya hali hii ya sanaa yanajaribiwa dhidi ya bendera zilizo na sentensi zilizoonyesha zenye vifaa vya alama, na wanahitaji mafunzo muhimu na mafunzo mazuri katika takwimu maalum za kazi. Hata hivyo, katika hali halisi ya matumizi kama vile katika kampuni ya magazeti yenye ujumla wa taarifa za ndani, mahusiano yanatofautiana na a in a maalum, na kwa hakika hakuna taarifa zinazoudhi kwa mahusiano kama hayo, na vitu vingi vinginevyo vinatokea hukumu isipokuwa na uhusiano. Tunauliza matumizi ya mifano inayotawala kwenye hali ya sanaa katika muktadha huo, ambapo rasilimali kama vile muda, huduma za umeme na wachochezaji wa binadamu zimepungua. Ili kukabiliana na vikwazo hivi, tunajaribu kwa mfumo wa kujifunza kwa msingi wa mahusiano, ukijumuisha modeli yenye mwanga wa LSTM binafsi kwa kutambua mahusiano yanayopo, na mtindo wa hali ya sanaa kwa ajili ya kutangaza usambazaji wa mahusiano. Tunawalinganisha chaguo kadhaa za mifano katika eneo hili, kutoka kwa neno la msingi linaloongezeka kwa wastani, kuelekeza mitandao ya kijamii na wale wenye asili ya Bert, pamoja na mikakati kadhaa ya kujifunza kwa ajili ya kutafuta njia yenye ufanisi zaidi lakini yenyewe sahihi katika matumizi ya kampuni yetu kubwa ya kila siku ya Ufaransa.', 'id': 'Ekstraksi hubungan adalah subtask dari proses bahasa alam yang telah melihat banyak peningkatan dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, dengan muncul arsitektur kompleks pra-terlatih. Banyak dari pendekatan state-of-the-art ini diuji melawan benchmarks dengan kalimat yang ditabel yang mengandung entitas ditabel, dan membutuhkan praselatihan dan penyesuaian penting pada data khusus tugas. Namun, dalam skenario kasus-kasus nyata seperti di perusahaan surat kabar kebanyakan dedikasi kepada informasi lokal, hubungan adalah tipe yang berbeda, sangat spesifik, dengan hampir tidak ada data yang dicatat untuk hubungan seperti itu, dan banyak entitas yang sama-sama terjadi dalam kalimat tanpa berhubungan. Kami mempertanyakan penggunaan model terbaik yang diawasi dalam konteks seperti ini, dimana sumber daya seperti waktu, kekuatan komputer dan anotator manusia terbatas. Untuk beradaptasi dengan batas-batas ini, kami eksperimen dengan saluran ekstraksi hubungan berdasarkan pelajaran aktif, yang terdiri dari model ringan berdasarkan LSTM binari untuk mendeteksi hubungan yang ada, dan model terbaik untuk klasifikasi hubungan. Kami membandingkan beberapa pilihan untuk model klasifikasi dalam skenario ini, dari pembangunan kata dasar, ke grafik jaringan saraf dan jaringan Bert, serta beberapa strategi pengakuan pelajaran aktif, untuk menemukan pendekatan yang paling efisien tapi akurat dalam kasus penggunaan perusahaan koran harian Perancis terbesar kami.', 'sq': "Zgjidhja e marrëdhënieve është një nënkërkesë e procesimit natyror të gjuhës që ka parë shumë përmirësime në vitet e fundit, me ardhjen e arkitekturave komplekse të paratrajnuara. Many of these state-of-the-art approaches are tested against benchmarks with labelled sentences containing tagged entities, and require important pre-training and fine-tuning on task-specific data.  Megjithatë, në një skenar të vërtetë përdorimi-rasti të tillë si në një kompani gazetash kryesisht të përkushtuar informacionit lokal, marrëdhëniet janë të llojit të ndryshëm, shumë specifik, me praktikisht asnjë të dhënë të anotuar për marrëdhënie të tilla dhe shumë njësi bashkëndodhin në një fjalim pa qenë të lidhur. Ne pyesim përdorimin e modeleve të mbikqyrur më të lartë në një kontekst të tillë, ku burimet si koha, fuqia kompjuterike dhe anotatorët njerëzorë janë të kufizuar. Për t'u përshtatur këtyre kufizimeve, ne eksperimentojmë me një tubacion ekstraktimi të marrëdhënieve të bazuar në mësim aktiv, që përbëhet nga një model i lehtë të bazuar në LSTM për zbulimin e marrëdhënieve që ekzistojnë, dhe një model më i lartë për klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve. We compare several choices for classification models in this scenario, from basic word embedding averaging, to graph neural networks and Bert-based ones, as well as several active learning acquisition strategies, in order to find the most cost-efficient yet accurate approach in our French largest daily newspaper company's use case.", 'fa': 'اخراج رابطه یک سؤال از پردازش زبان طبیعی است که در سال های اخیر خیلی پیشرفت را دیده است، با پیشرفت معماری پیش آموزش پیچیده است. بسیاری از این روش\u200cهای وضعیت هنری در مقابل برچسب\u200cها با جمله\u200cهای برچسب\u200cشده که دارند برچسب\u200cهای برچسب\u200cشده\u200cاند آزمایش می\u200cشوند و نیاز دارند پیش آموزش و تنظیم مهم در داده\u200cهای ویژه\u200cی کار باشند. ولی در یک سناریو واقعی از پرونده\u200cهای استفاده مانند در یک شرکت روزنامه\u200cها که بیشتر برای اطلاعات محلی مشخص شده\u200cاند، رابطه\u200cها از نوع مختلف، بسیار خاص هستند، با تقریباً هیچ داده\u200cای مشخص شده برای این رابطه نیستند، و بسیاری از شرکت\u200cها در یک مجله بدون ارتباط همکار ما از استفاده از مدل های موقعیت هنر تحت نظر می پرسیم در این موقعیت که منابع مثل زمان، قدرت محاسبه و آگاهی انسان محدود هستند. برای تغییر دادن به این محدودیت، ما با یک رابطه با یادگیری فعال بر اساس لوله اخراج آزمایش می کنیم، که از یک مدل سبک سبک بر اساس LSTM ساخته شده است، برای شناسایی رابطه\u200cهایی که وجود دارند، و یک مدل هنری برای classification رابطه است. ما چندین انتخاب برای مدل\u200cهای مختصات در این سناریو، از کلمه\u200cهای بنیادی که متوسط\u200cتر است، تا شبکه\u200cهای عصبی و متوسط\u200cهای برت، و چندین استراتژی\u200cهای یادگیری فعال فعال را مقایسه می\u200cکنیم، برای پیدا کردن بهترین روش\u200cهای مفید\u200cتر و دقیق در مورد استفاده از شرکت روزنامه\u200cهای فرانسوی ما.', 'af': "Verhouding uittrek is 'n ondersoek van natuurlike langverwerking wat baie verbeteringe in onlangse jaar gesien het, met die voorkoms van kompleks vooraf-opgelei architecturee. Baie van hierdie staat-van-kuns-toegang is getest teen benchmarke met etiketeerde setings wat bevat etiketeerde entiteite, en benodig belangrik voor-onderwerp en fyn-tuning op taak-spesifieke data. Maar in 'n werklike gebruik-geval scenario soos in 'n nuuspapier maatskappy wat meeste aan plaaslike inligting geassosieer is, is verwante van verskeie, baie spesifieke tipe, met virtueel geen notasieerde data vir sodanige verwantings nie, en baie entiteite sal in 'n seting voorkom sonder om te wees verwante. Ons vra die gebruik van die ondersoekte state-of-the-art modele in so 'n konteks waar hulpbronne soos tyd, rekenaar krag en menslike annotators is beperk. Om hierdie beheininge te pas, eksperimenteer ons met 'n aktiewe-leer gebaseerde verhouding van uittrekking pyplyn, wat bestaan van 'n binêre LSTM-gebaseerde liggewig model vir die verhouding wat bestaan, en 'n staat-van-die-kuns-model vir verhouding klasifikasie. Ons vergelyk verskeie keuses vir klasifikasie modele in hierdie scenario, van basiese woord ingesluit middelste, na graf neuralnetwerke en Bert-gebaseerde een, en ook verskeie aktiewe leer aanvang strategies, om die mees koste-effektief nog presies toegang te vind in ons Frans grootste daglige koerant maatskappy se gebruik geval.", 'hy': 'Հաբերությունների վերացումը բնական լեզուների վերլուծության ենթախնդիր է, որը վերջին տարիների ընթացքում շատ բարելավումներ է տեսել, բարդ նախապատրաստված ճարտարապետությունների առաջացման հետ: Many of these state-of-the-art approaches are tested against benchmarks with labelled sentences containing tagged entities, and require important pre-training and fine-tuning on task-specific data.  Այնուամենայնիվ, իրական սցենարիայում, ինչպես օրինակ թերթերի ընկերությունում, որը հատկապես նվիրված է տեղական տեղեկատվությանը, հարաբերությունները տարբեր, շատ կոնկրետ տեսակի են, առանց որևէ գրված տվյալների նման հարաբերությունների համար, և շատ կազմակերպություններ համատեղվում են նախադասության մեջ առանց կա Մենք կասկածում ենք վերահսկված ամենաբարձր մոդելների օգտագործումը այնպիսի կոնտեքստում, որտեղ ռեսուրսները, ինչպիսիք են ժամանակը, համակարգչային ուժը և մարդկային annoտորները սահմանափակված են: Այս սահմանափակումներին հարմարվելու համար մենք փորձում ենք ակտիվ ուսումնասիրության հիմնված հարաբերությունների դուրս հանելու խողովակաշարի միջոցով, որը կազմված է երկարագույն LSMT հիմնված թեթև մոդելի գոյություն ունեցող հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերելու համար, և հարաբերությունների դասակարգումների ամենաբար Մենք համեմատում ենք մի քանի տարբերակներ դասակարգման մոդելների համար այս սցենարիայում, սկսած ընդհանուր ընդհանուր բառերի ընդհանուրից մինչև գրաֆիկական նյարդային ցանցեր և Bert-ի հիմնված ցանցեր, ինչպես նաև մի քանի ակտիվ ուսումնասիրության գնահատման ռազմավարություններ, որպեսզի գտնենք ամենաարդյունավետ, բայց ճշ', 'am': 'የግንኙነት ግንኙነት የፍጥረተ ረጅም ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ብዙዎቹ የሀገር-አርእስት ግንኙነት በተጨማሪው አካባቢዎች በተጨማሪው አካላቶች ላይ በሚደረጉ benchmarks ላይ ይሞክራሉ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ በመጀመሪያ ለቅርብ መረጃዎች በተለየ የጋዜጠኛ ጉዳይ ጉዳይ፣ ግንኙነት በተለየ፣ በተለየ የተለያየ ዓይነት፣ በተለየ የግንኙነት መረጃዎች በተለየ፣ እና ብዙ አካባቢዎች ሳይታወቁ በተፈረደበት ፍርድ ውስጥ ይኖራሉ፡፡ በተመለከተው የድረ ገጽ አካባቢ እና የሰው ተቃውሞ የሚቆጠሩ ሀብት እንደጊዜው፣ ኃይል እና የሰው ተቃውሞ የሚቆጠሩ ናቸው ብለን እንጠይቃለን፡፡ እነዚህን ግንኙነት ለመቀበል፣ የሁኔታ ግንኙነት ለመግለጥ እና የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ለመግለጽ የሚኖረውን የሁለተኛ LSTM-መሠረት ቀላል ሞዴል እና የሥርዓት-አርእስት ዓይነት ለግንኙነት ግንኙነት ማሳየት እና የክፍለ ሥርዓት ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በዚህ ስታይናው ውስጥ ለትክክል ዓይነቶች የሚደረገውን ብዙዎችን ምርጫዎች፣ ጠቃሚ ቃላት፣ የነዌርብ መረብ እና በቤርት የሚኖሩትን እና ብዙ ተማሪ ዘርጊዎችን እና የፍሪስዳን የዕለት ወራት ክፍል የሚጠቅመውን የፍሬስጥነት ጥናት እናገኝ ዘንድ እናስተያየዋለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija odnosa je podpitanje prirodnog obradivanja jezika koji je u poslednjih godina vidio mnoge poboljšanja, s dolaskom kompleksnog predobučenog arhitektura. Mnogi od tih pristupa umjetnosti testiraju se protiv kriterija s označenim rečenicama koje sadrže označene entitate, i zahtijevaju važnu predobuku i ispravnu prilagodbu podataka o specifičnim zadacima. Međutim, u stvarnom scenariju za upotrebu kao što je u novinskoj kompaniji uglavnom posvećenoj lokalnoj informaciji, odnosi su od različitih, vrlo specifičnih vrsta, s praktično nikakvim notiranim podacima za takve odnose, a mnoge entitate se sarađuju u rečenici bez veze. Pitamo korištenje nadzornih modela umjetnosti u takvom kontekstu, gdje su resursi poput vremena, računalne moći i ljudskih annotatora ograničeni. Da bismo se prilagodili ovim ograničenjima, eksperimentirali smo sa aktivnim učenjem baziranim na odnosu na pipeliniji ekstrakcije, koji se sastoji od binarnog model a lagane težine na LSTM-u za otkrivanje odnosa koje postoje, i modela stanja umjetnosti za klasifikaciju odnosa. Uspoređujemo nekoliko izbora za klasifikacijske modele u ovom scenariju, od osnovne riječi uključujuće prosječnost, do grafika neuronskih mreža i na Bertu baziranih, kao i nekoliko aktivnih strategija prikupljanja učenja, kako bismo pronašli najkoštačniji i tačan pristup u slučaju upotrebe naše najveće dnevnje novine kompanije.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে প্রাকৃতিক ল্যাঙ্গেজ প্রক্রিয়ার সাবক্ষেত্রে যোগাযোগ বের করা হয়েছে, যা সাম্প্রতিক বছরে অনেক উন্নতি দেখ বেনমার্কের বিরুদ্ধে অনেক রাষ্ট্রের ক্ষেত্রে পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে যার মধ্যে ট্যাগ বিষয়বস্তু আছে তাদের লেবেল করা বেনমার্কের বিরুদ্ধে এবং ক তবে একটি সত্যিকারের ব্যবহার-কেসের দৃশ্যে যেমন স্থানীয় তথ্যের জন্য বিশেষ করে একটি সংবাদপত্র কোম্পানীতে সম্পর্ক বিভিন্ন, অত্যন্ত নির্দিষ্ট ধরনের, যাদের সম্পর্কের জন্য ক We question the use of supervised state-of-the-art models in such a context, where resources such as time, computing power and human annotators are limited.  এই ধরনের নিয়ন্ত্রণের সাথে যোগাযোগ করার জন্য আমরা একটি সক্রিয়-শিক্ষার ভিত্তিক সম্পর্ক বিনিময়ের পাইপেলাইনের সাথে পরীক্ষা করছি, যার মধ্যে একটি বাইনারি এলএসএমএস ভিত্তিক হাল্কা ম এই দৃশ্যে আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি পছন্দের তুলনা করি, মৌলিক শব্দের মধ্য থেকে গড়ে যাচ্ছে, নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক এবং বার্ট ভিত্তিক কোম্পানির ব্যবহারের মামলা থেকে, আর বেশ কয়েকটি সক্রিয় শিক্ষা পেতে পারে কৌশলের', 'tr': 'Syýallar çykarmak, geçen ýyllarda birnäçe gelişmeleri görmän tebigy dil işlemeginiň astyny soramakdır. Şu möhüm-sanat golaýlarynyň köpüsi etitlenýän sözler bilen etitlenýän etiketlere garşy bardyr we taýýarlanmagynyň üstünde wajyp öň-okuwçylygy we düzeltmegi gerek. Ýöne, gazet kompaniýasynda köplenç ýerleri maglumatlara wezip eden ýaly nusgasynda, baglaşyklary daşypdyr we munuň ýaly baglaşyklary üçin hiç hili görkezilen maglumatlar ýok we köp sanat bir sözlemde bolýar. Biz öz gözlemýän möhüm nusgalaryň ullanyşyny şöyle bir kontekstde soraýarys, wagt ýaly çeşmeler, güç hasaplamak we adamlaryň töwekilişleri çykypdyr. Bu çöplüklere üýtgetmek üçin, biz aktiw öwrenmek üçin çykyş pipeliniň daýan ýar bir synap çykýarys. Bu synpdaky LSTM binary ýagdaý baglanyşlaryň ahyrlamasy üçin bir nusga ýagdaýy çykarmak üçin bir nusga çykýar we syýahat sistemasy üçin bir nusga çykýar. Biz bu senaryýada klasifikasyon nusgalarynyň birnäçe saýlawlaryny, esasy s özlerinden, neural şebekelerinden we Bert daýanýan şebekelerinden, we birnäçe aktiw öwrenme strategiýalaryny çykarmak üçin we Fransuzça günlük gazet kompaniýasynyň ullanyşynyň has ynamly hasaplamak üçin gurnalaşdyrýarys.', 'cs': 'Extrakce vztahů je podúkol zpracování přirozeného jazyka, který zaznamenal v posledních letech mnoho zlepšení, s příchodem složitých předškolených architektur. Mnohé z těchto nejmodernějších přístupů jsou testovány na základě referenčních hodnot s označenými větami obsahujícími označené entity a vyžadují důležité předškolení a jemné ladění dat specifických pro úkoly. Nicméně, v reálném scénáři užití, jako je v novinové společnosti většinou věnující se místním informacím, jsou vztahy různorodého, velmi specifického typu, prakticky bez anotovaných dat pro tyto vztahy, a mnoho subjektů se spolu vyskytuje ve větě, aniž by bylo spojeno. Zpochybňujeme využití moderních modelů pod dohledem v takovém kontextu, kde jsou zdroje jako čas, výpočetní výkon a lidské anotátory omezené. Abychom se přizpůsobili těmto omezením, experimentujeme s aktivním učením založeným na extrakci vztahů, skládajícím se z binárního modelu založeného na LSTM pro detekci vztahů, které existují, a nejmodernějšího modelu pro klasifikaci vztahů. Porovnáváme několik možností klasifikačních modelů v tomto scénáři, od základních průměrů pro vkládání slov, přes grafové neuronové sítě a Bertovy sítě, stejně jako několik aktivních strategií akvizice učení, abychom naši největší francouzskou deníkovou společnost nalezli nákladově efektivnější a přesný přístup.', 'fi': 'Suhteiden uuttaminen on luonnollisen langage-käsittelyn alatehtävä, joka on parantunut viime vuosina monimutkaisten esikoulutettujen arkkitehtuurien myötä. Monia näistä huippuluokan lähestymistavoista testataan vertailuarvoihin, joissa on merkittyjä kokonaisuuksia sisältäviä lauseita, ja ne edellyttävät tärkeää esikoulutusta ja tehtäväkohtaisten tietojen hienosäätöä. Kuitenkin todellisessa käyttötapauskenaariossa, kuten sanomalehtiyrityksessä, joka keskittyy pääasiassa paikalliseen tietoon, suhteet ovat vaihtelevia, erittäin erityisiä, eikä tällaisista suhteista käytännössä ole merkintöjä, ja monet yhteisöt esiintyvät rinnakkain lauseessa ilman sukulaisuutta. Kyseenalaistamme valvottujen huippumallien käyttöä tällaisessa tilanteessa, jossa resursseja, kuten aikaa, laskentatehoa ja inhimillisiä merkintöjä, ovat rajalliset. Sopeutuaksemme näihin rajoituksiin kokeilemme aktiiviseen oppimiseen perustuvaa relaatiouuttoputkea, joka koostuu binäärisestä LSTM-pohjaisesta kevyestä mallista olemassa olevien suhteiden havaitsemiseksi ja uusimmasta mallista relaatioluokitusta varten. Vertailemme tässä skenaariossa useita luokittelumallivaihtoehtoja sanan upottamisen keskiarvoista graafisiin neuroverkkoihin ja Bert-pohjaisiin verkkoihin sekä useisiin aktiivisiin oppimisstrategioihin löytääksemme kustannustehokkaimman mutta tarkan lähestymistavan ranskalaisen suurimman sanomalehtiyhtiömme käyttötapauksessa.', 'az': 'İlişkilər çıxarılması son illərdə çox yaxşılıqları gördüyü təbiətli dil işləməsinin altı soruşmasıdır. Bu məlumatların çoxunu etiketli məlumatlar içərisində etiketli cümlələr olan benchmarklərə qarşı sınağa çəkilir və işin məlumatlarında möhkəm əvvəlcə təhsil və təhsil edilməsi lazımdır. Lakin, çox yerli məlumatlara bağlı olan gazet şirkətində həqiqət istifadə məlumatlarında, əlaqələr müxtəlif, çox müxtəlif məlumatlardandır, bu məlumatlar üçün çox məlumatlar yoxdur, və çox məlumatlar məlumatların əlaqəsi olmadan bir cümlədə istifadə edirlər. Biz bu cür məlumatlarda mühafizə edilmiş məlumatların istifadəsini soruşuruq ki, zaman, hesablama gücü və insan məlumatlarının sınırlı olduğu yerlərdir. Bu müddətlərə uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün, biz hərəkətli öyrənmək boru çizgisinə dayanan bir əlaqə ilə təcrübə edirik. İkili LSTM tabanlı hafif a ğırlıq modeli var olan ilişkileri keşfetmək üçün, və ilişkil klasifikasiyası üçün sanat modeli. Biz bu scenariyada klasifikasyon modellərinin bir neçə seçimləri ilə, həmçin in əs as s özlərin ortalamasından, nöral ağlarına və Bert-in şa edilənlərə, həmçinin çoxlu aktif öyrənmə stratejilərinə qarşılaşdırırıq ki, Fransızca ən çox günlük kağıt kompaniyasının istifadə edilməsi üçün ən qiymətli, hətta daha doğru yolu tapmaq üçün.', 'et': 'Suhete ekstraheerimine on loodusliku langage töötlemise alamülesanne, mida on viimastel aastatel palju parandatud, sest on tekkinud keerukad eelkoolitud arhitektuurid. Paljusid neist tipptasemel lähenemisviisidest testitakse võrdlusaluste alusel märgistatud lausetega, mis sisaldavad märgistatud olemeid, ning need nõuavad olulist eelkoolitust ja ülesandepõhiste andmete täpsustamist. Kuid reaalse kasutusjuhtumi stsenaariumi puhul, nagu näiteks ajalehtefirmas, mis on pühendatud peamiselt kohalikule teabele, on suhted mitmekesised, väga spetsiifilised, praktiliselt puuduvad selliste suhete kohta märgitud andmed ning paljud üksused esinevad lauses, ilma et nad oleksid seotud. Me seame kahtluse alla järelevalvega kaasaegsete mudelite kasutamise sellises kontekstis, kus sellised ressursid nagu aeg, arvutusvõimsus ja inimmärkmed on piiratud. Nende piirangutega kohanemiseks eksperimenteerime aktiivõppel põhinevat seoste ekstraheerimistorustikku, mis koosneb binaarsest LSTM-põhisest kergemudelist olemasolevate suhete tuvastamiseks ja kaasaegsest seoste klassifitseerimise mudelist. Võrdleme selles stsenaariumis mitmeid klassifitseerimismudelite valikuid, alates sõna põhilisest manustamisest kuni graafiliste närvivõrkude ja Berti-põhiste võrkudeni ning mitmete aktiivse õppimise strateegiateni, et leida kõige kulutõhusam, kuid täpne lähenemine meie Prantsusmaa suurima päevalehtefirma kasutusjuhtumis.', 'ca': "Relation extraction is a subtask of natural langage processing that has seen many improvements in recent years, with the advent of complex pre-trained architectures.  Molts d'aquests enfocaments més avançats són testats en comparació amb punts de referència amb frases etiquetades que contenen entitats etiquetades, i requereixen important pré-entrenament i ajustament en dades específices de les tasques. However, in a real use-case scenario such as in a newspaper company mostly dedicated to local information, relations are of varied, highly specific type, with virtually no annotated data for such relations, and many entities co-occur in a sentence without being related.  We question the use of supervised state-of-the-art models in such a context, where resources such as time, computing power and human annotators are limited.  To adapt to these constraints, we experiment with an active-learning based relation extraction pipeline, consisting of a binary LSTM-based lightweight model for detecting the relations that do exist, and a state-of-the-art model for relation classification.  Comparem diverses opcions per a models de classificació en aquest escenari, des de la mitjana de paraules bàsiques d'incorporació, a les xarxes neural s gràfics i les basades en Bert, com a diverses estratègies d'adquisició activa d'aprenentatge, per trobar l'enfocament més cost-eficient però precis en el cas d'ús de la nostra empresa diaria francesa més gran.", 'jv': 'AllProgressBar politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nanging, macem coro iso nggambar kelas nang empresa Perintah sing dipunangé awak dhéwé karo informasi sing gak bener, perusahaan kang dipunangé, sing apik dhéwé, nganggo perusahaan podho sing ora ono terus apik karo nganggo perusahaan nyong, lan akeh alam sing sakdurungé kapan nek ketahan. Awak dhéwé kesempatan sistem sistem sistem-perusahaan-perusahaan karo ngono sakjane sampek, kawur kalomoran lagi nggawe nguasar sistem lan tambah bantuan sampek. Genjer-genjer Awak dhéwé nggerarangké karo akeh pilihan kanggo model sing kelas nang sekondirno iki, nik awak dhéwé sing beraksi sing nggawe gerakan, nggawe netawak dhéwé karo bert sing basa gambar, lan akèh sing paling-sistem sing nyebutaké perbudhakan kanggo ngerasakno winih sing gak nggawe gerakan akeh perusahaan, kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang-sistem sing beraksi', 'sk': 'Ekstrakcija relacij je podnaloga obdelave naravnega langage, ki se je v zadnjih letih z nastopom kompleksnih vnaprej usposobljenih arhitektur dosegla veliko izboljšav. Mnogi od teh najsodobnejših pristopov so testirani glede na referenčne vrednosti z označenimi stavki, ki vsebujejo označene entitete, in zahtevajo pomembno predusposabljanje in natančno prilagajanje podatkov za posamezne naloge. Vendar pa so v resničnem scenariju primera uporabe, kot je v časopisnem podjetju, ki je večinoma posvečeno lokalnim informacijam, odnosi različnih, zelo specifičnih vrst, skoraj brez označenih podatkov za take odnose, mnogi subjekti pa se soočajo v stavku, ne da bi bili povezani. Sprašujemo se o uporabi nadzorovanih najsodobnejših modelov v takem kontekstu, kjer so viri, kot so čas, računalniška moč in človeški označevalniki, omejeni. Da bi se prilagodili tem omejitvam, eksperimentiramo s plinovodom za ekstrakcijo relacij, ki temelji na aktivnem učenju, sestavljenim iz binarnega lahkega modela LSTM za odkrivanje obstoječih relacij in najsodobnejšega modela za klasifikacijo relacij. V tem scenariju primerjamo več možnosti klasifikacijskih modelov, od osnovnega povprečnega vključevanja besed do grafičnih nevronskih omrežij in Bertovih omrežij ter več aktivnih strategij pridobivanja učenja, da bi našli najbolj stroškovno učinkovit in natančen pristop v primeru uporabe našega največjega francoskega dnevnega časopisnega podjetja.', 'ha': "Extractin Relation is a sub-aikin managi natura which has garnered many improvements in most of the few years lately, with the ent of the Complicated pre-Training architecture. Aka jarraba masu yawa daga wannan halin-sanatarwa don a motsa bongon-matsayin da aka rubũta magana mai ƙunsa da abubuwa masu tagogi, kuma yana ƙayyade muhimu wa zaman shawarar da mai kyau kan data na ƙayyade aikin. A lokacin da ke cikin wani halin da aka yi amfani da shi, kamar a cikin wani firma na magazin da aka ƙayyade wa maɓalli, masu husũma na daban-daba, masu haske, kuma bã da data wanda aka yi cũtarwa ga wannan masu husũma, kuma da wasu abubuwa masu yawa sun koma cikin wani wuni da ba su yi danganta ba. Munã tambayar su da amfani da masu tsari da halin-sanawa, a cikin muhimmada, inda manyan abinci kamar lokaci, lissafar mutane da masu zartar da mutane sun ƙayyade. Ga ka daidaita zuwa waɗannan hanyõyin, za'a jarraba da wani misalin mai amfani da kwamfyuta masu aikin da aka sani, yana cikin wata misalin haske na LTRM-da baka biyu, dõmin ka gane dangani ga haɗi masu da ke da shi, da wata misãlin-state-of-art wa fassarar mazaɓa. Tuna samfani masu kamfani masu fasalin misãlai da ke cikin wannan tsohon, daga maganar mafi ƙaranci, zuwa ga grafi masu tsarin neural da masu baka Bert, da kuma masu sami akan tsarin mutane masu karatun da amfani da masu karatun karatun da faransa, dõmin a sami mafiya amfani da masu amfani da akan karatun masu yinin rubutu na faransa.", 'he': 'חולץ מערכת יחסים הוא תחת שאלה של עיבוד שפה טבעי שראה שיפורים רבים בשנים האחרונות, עם ההופעה של ארכיטקטורות מורכבות מאומנות מראש. רבים מהגישות המיוחדות האלה נבחנות נגד נקודות רמז עם משפטים מסוממים שמכילים יחידות מסוממות, ומדרשים שימוש קדם-אימון חשוב ומתאים מיוחדים על נתונים מסויימים למשימות. בכל אופן, בתרחיש שימוש אמיתי כמו בחברת עיתונים המקודשת בעיקר למידע מקומי, יחסים הם מסוג שונה, מאוד ספציפי, עם כמעט שום נתונים מועטפים עבור יחסים כאלה, וישויות רבות מתרחשות במשפט מבלי להיות קשורים. אנו מפקפקים בשימוש בדוגמנים מופקדים במצב המיוחד בקשר כזה, שבו משאבים כמו זמן, כוח מחשב ומציאות אנושיות מוגבלות. כדי להתאים למחובות האלה, אנו מנסים עם צינור חידוש מערכת יחסים מבוסס על לימוד פעיל, שמתכיל ממודל קל מבוסס על LSTM בינרי אנחנו משוותים מספר בחירות לדוגמנים מסווגים בתרחיש הזה, מהמילה בסיסית שמכילה בממוצע, לגרף רשתות עצביות וברשתות מבוססות ברט, כמו גם מספר אסטרטגיות לימוד פעילות, כדי למצוא את הגישה הכי יעילה, אך מדויקת בתיק השימוש של חברת העיתונים הצרפתית הגדולה ביותר ביותר שלנו.', 'bo': "རྒྱུ་དངོས་འབྲེལ་འདི་ནི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་གསུམ་ཅིག་ཡིན་པས། འདས་པའི་ལོ་ངོ་ཚོའི་ནང་གི་འཕྱུར་རིམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ Many of these state-of-the-art approaches are tested against benchmarks with labelled sentences containing tagged entities, and require important pre-training and fine-tuning on task-specific data. ཡིན་ནའང་། དེའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོང་འབྲེལ་ཁང་ཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ལྟ་བུ་འདྲ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཚོད་དང་། རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་རང་བཞིན་པའི་མིག་སྒྲིག་ཆས་ཀྱི་བྱ་རིམ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ་དང་། དེ་འདྲ་བའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས To adapt to these constraints, we experiment with an active-learning based relation extraction pipeline, consisting of a binary LSTM-based lightweight model for detecting the relations that do exist, and a state-of-the-art model for relation classification. We compare several choices for classification models in this scenario, from basic word embedding averaging, to graph neural networks and Bert-based ones, as well as several active learning acquisition strategies, in order to find the most cost-efficient yet accurate approach in our French largest daily newspaper company's use case."}
{'en': 'ROFF-A Romanian Twitter Dataset for Offensive Language', 'pt': 'ROFF - Um conjunto de dados do Twitter romeno para linguagem ofensiva', 'ja': 'ROFF -不快な言語のルーマニアのTwitterデータセット', 'ar': 'ROFF - مجموعة بيانات رومانية على Twitter للغة الهجومية', 'fr': 'ROFF - Un jeu de données Twitter en roumain pour un langage offensant', 'es': 'ROFF: un conjunto de datos de Twitter rumano para lenguaje ofensivo', 'hi': 'ROFF - आक्रामक भाषा के लिए एक रोमानियाई चहचहाना डेटासेट', 'zh': 'ROFF - 罗马尼亚语Twitter攻击性语数集', 'ga': 'ROFF - Tacar Sonraí Twitter Rómánach le haghaidh Teanga Ionsaitheach', 'ru': 'ROFF - румынский набор данных Twitter для оскорбительного языка', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'ROFF - Román Twitter adatkészlet a támadó nyelvhez', 'el': 'ROFF 58A Ρουμανικό σύνολο δεδομένων Twitter για προσβλητική γλώσσα', 'it': 'ROFF - Un set di dati Twitter rumeno per il linguaggio offensivo', 'lt': 'ROFF - Rumunijos Twitter duomenų rinkinys žalingai kalbai', 'kk': 'ROFF - Румынша Твиттер тілінің деректер қоры', 'mk': 'ROFF - Романски датотек на Твитер за навредлив јазик', 'ms': 'ROFF - Set Data Twitter Romania untuk Bahasa Meninggal', 'ml': 'റോഫ്- ഒരു റോമാനിയന്\u200d ടൂട്ടര്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് ഓഫെന്\u200dസിവ് ഭാഷ', 'mt': "ROFF - Sett ta' Dejta Rumen fuq Twitter għal Lingwa Offensiva", 'mn': 'ROFF - Ромын Твиттер өгөгдлийн санал', 'no': 'ROFF – Eit rumensk Twitter- databaset for Offensive Language', 'pl': 'ROFF 58A Rumuński zestaw danych Twittera dla języka ofensywnego', 'ro': 'ROFF - Un set de date Twitter românesc pentru limba ofensivă', 'sr': 'ROFF - Rumunski Twitter podatak za neposlušni jezik', 'so': 'ROFF - A Romanian Twitter Dataset for Offensive Language', 'sv': 'ROFF - En rumänsk Twitter dataset för offensivt språk', 'si': 'ROFF - රෝමානියාන් ට්විටර් දත්ත සඳහා', 'ur': 'روف - ایک رومین ٹویٹر ڈاتسٹ', 'ta': 'ROFF - ஒரு ரோமனியன் தொடர்பு தகவல் அமைப்புName', 'uz': 'ROFF - A Romanian Twitter Dataset for Offensive Language', 'vi': 'ROFF..Một bảng dữ liệu mạng trên Twitter của Romani Name', 'bg': 'Румънски набор от данни за офанзивен език в Туитър', 'nl': 'ROFF F8A Roemeense Twitter Dataset voor offensieve taal', 'hr': 'ROFF - Rumunski Twitter podaci za neposlušni jezik', 'da': 'ROFF - Et rumænsk Twitter datasæt til offensivt sprog', 'de': 'ROFF 58A Rumänischer Twitter Datensatz für Offensive Sprache', 'id': 'ROFF - Dataset Twitter Rumania untuk Bahasa Meninggal', 'fa': 'ROFF - یک اطلاعات توئیتر رومانی برای زبان ناپذیر', 'ko': 'ROFF - 루마니아 트위터의 공격적인 언어 데이터 세트', 'sw': 'ROFF - Taarifa za Twita za KiRomania kwa ajili ya Lugha ya Uhuru', 'af': 'Stencils', 'tr': 'ROFF - Ofesli Diller üçin bir rumynça Twitter maglumaty', 'sq': 'ROFF - Një paketë të dhënash rumune për Twitter për gjuhën ofensive', 'hy': 'ROF - Ռումինական Թվիթերի տվյալներ օֆանսիվ լեզվի համար', 'az': 'ROFF - N칬qsanl캼 Dil 칲칞칲n Romal캼 Twitter veril톛nl톛ri', 'am': 'ROFF - የሮማኒያን ትዊተር ዳታ', 'bn': 'ROFF - অফেন্সিভ ভাষার জন্য রোমানিয়ান টুইটার ডাটাসেট', 'cs': 'ROFF 58A Rumunský Twitter Dataset pro útočný jazyk', 'ca': 'ROFF - Un conjunt de dades rumun de Twitter per a llenguatges ofensius', 'bs': 'ROFF - Rumunski Twitter podatak za neposlušni jezik', 'et': 'ROFF - Rumeenia Twitteri andmekogum ründava keele jaoks', 'fi': 'ROFF - Romanian Twitter-tietosarja hyökkäävää kieltä varten', 'jv': 'paper size', 'he': 'ROFF - קבוצת נתונים טוויטר רומנית לשפה פגיעה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'ROFF - romunski Twitter podatkovni niz za napadalni jezik', 'bo': 'ROFF - A Romanian Twitter Dataset for Offensive Language'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the annotation process of an offensive language data set for Romanian on social media. To facilitate comparable multi-lingual research on offensive language, the annotation guidelines follow some of the recent annotation efforts for other languages. The final corpus contains 5000 micro-blogging posts annotated by a large number of volunteer annotators. The inter-annotator agreement and the initial automatic discrimination results we present are in line with earlier annotation efforts.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le processus d'annotation d'un ensemble de données linguistiques offensantes pour le roumain sur les réseaux sociaux. Pour faciliter la recherche multilingue comparable sur le langage offensant, les directives d'annotation suivent certains des récents efforts d'annotation pour d'autres langues. Le corpus final contient 5000 billets de microblogging annotés par un grand nombre d'annotateurs bénévoles. L'accord entre les annotateurs et les premiers résultats de discrimination automatique que nous présentons sont conformes aux efforts d'annotation antérieurs.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe el proceso de anotación de un conjunto de datos de lenguaje ofensivo para el rumano en las redes sociales. Para facilitar la investigación multilingüe comparable sobre el lenguaje ofensivo, las pautas de anotación siguen algunos de los esfuerzos de anotación recientes para otros idiomas. El corpus final contiene 5000 publicaciones de microblogueo anotadas por un gran número de anotadores voluntarios. El acuerdo entre anotadores y los resultados iniciales de discriminación automática que presentamos están en línea con los esfuerzos de anotación anteriores.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o processo de anotação de um conjunto de dados de linguagem ofensiva para romeno nas mídias sociais. Para facilitar a pesquisa multilíngue comparável sobre linguagem ofensiva, as diretrizes de anotação seguem alguns dos esforços recentes de anotação para outros idiomas. O corpus final contém 5.000 postagens de microblog anotadas por um grande número de anotadores voluntários. O acordo entre anotadores e os resultados iniciais de discriminação automática que apresentamos estão alinhados com os esforços de anotação anteriores.', 'ja': '本稿では、ソーシャルメディア上のルーマニア語の不快な言語データセットの注釈プロセスについて説明する。不快な言語に関する同等の多言語研究を容易にするために、注釈ガイドラインは他の言語の最近の注釈作業の一部に従っています。最終コーパスには、多数のボランティアアノテーターが注釈を付けた5000件のマイクロブログ投稿が含まれています。アノテーター間の合意と当社が提示する初期の自動差別結果は、以前のアノテーションの取り組みと一致しています。', 'zh': '本文社交媒体上罗马尼亚语攻击性语数集注。 为便于犯性言语类多语言,注指南循近语。 终语料库包5000微博帖,多所志愿者注。 臣等所上注释者,与初自分别,与前注同。', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة عملية التعليقات التوضيحية لمجموعة بيانات لغة مسيئة للرومانية على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. لتسهيل البحث متعدد اللغات القابل للمقارنة حول اللغة الهجومية ، تتبع إرشادات التعليقات التوضيحية بعض جهود التعليقات التوضيحية الحديثة للغات أخرى. تحتوي المجموعة النهائية على 5000 تدوين مصغر تم شرحها بواسطة عدد كبير من المعلقين المتطوعين. تتماشى اتفاقية المُضيف التوضيحي ونتائج التمييز التلقائي الأولية التي نقدمها مع جهود التعليقات التوضيحية السابقة.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar phróiseas anótála thacar sonraí teanga maslach don Rómáinis ar na meáin shóisialta. Chun taighde ilteangach inchomparáide ar theanga maslach a éascú, leanann na treoirlínte anótála cuid de na hiarrachtaí anótála a rinneadh le déanaí ar theangacha eile. Tá 5000 post micreabhlagála sa chorpas deiridh agus tá anótáil déanta orthu ag líon mór nótaíoirí deonacha. Tá an comhaontú idir-anóadóirí agus na torthaí idirdhealaithe uathoibríocha tosaigh a chuirimid i láthair ag teacht le hiarrachtaí anótála níos luaithe.', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается процесс аннотирования набора данных оскорбительного языка для румынского языка в социальных сетях. Чтобы облегчить сопоставимые многоязычные исследования оскорбительных формулировок, руководящие принципы по аннотированию следуют некоторым из недавних усилий по аннотированию для других языков. Окончательный корпус содержит 5000 микроблогов, аннотированных большим числом добровольных аннотаторов. Соглашение между аннотаторами и первоначальные результаты автоматической дискриминации, которые мы представляем, согласуются с предыдущими усилиями по аннотированию.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर सोशल मीडिया पर रोमानियाई के लिए एक आक्रामक भाषा डेटा सेट की एनोटेशन प्रक्रिया का वर्णन करता है। आक्रामक भाषा पर तुलनीय बहुभाषी अनुसंधान की सुविधा के लिए, एनोटेशन दिशानिर्देश अन्य भाषाओं के लिए हाल के कुछ एनोटेशन प्रयासों का पालन करते हैं। अंतिम कॉर्पस में 5000 माइक्रो-ब्लॉगिंग पोस्ट शामिल हैं जो बड़ी संख्या में स्वयंसेवक एनोटेटरों द्वारा एनोटेट किए गए हैं। अंतर-एनोटेटर समझौते और हमारे द्वारा प्रस्तुत प्रारंभिक स्वचालित भेदभाव परिणाम पहले के एनोटेशन प्रयासों के अनुरूप हैं।', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი სოციალური მედიაში პოციალური მუშაობისთვის მონაცემების მონაცემების ანოტაციის პროცესი. დამხმარებელი მრავალენგური შესწავლობა საფუნქციური ენაზე, ამოტაციის მოწყობილობები შემდეგ სხვა ენათებისთვის მომხმარებელი მოწყობილობა. საბოლოო კორპუსში 5000 მიკრობლოგური პოსტი, რომლებიც დიდი ბოლონტური ანტოტორიები დააწერა. ჩვენ ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ თავისწორეები და პირველი ავტომატური დისკრიმინაციის შედეგები არიან წინასწორედ წინასწორეების ნაწილად.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a román nyelvi sértő adatkészlet jegyzetelési folyamatát a közösségi médián. A sértő nyelvekkel kapcsolatos összehasonlítható, többnyelvű kutatás megkönnyítése érdekében a megjegyzésekre vonatkozó irányelvek követik a közelmúltbeli megjegyzéseket más nyelvekre vonatkozóan. A végső korpusz 5000 mikroblogos bejegyzést tartalmaz, amelyeket számos önkéntes kommentátor jegyzett meg. A megjegyzések közötti megállapodás és az általunk bemutatott automatikus diszkriminációs eredmények összhangban vannak a korábbi megjegyzésekkel.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il processo di annotazione di un set di dati linguistici offensivi per il rumeno sui social media. Per facilitare la ricerca multilingue comparabile sul linguaggio offensivo, le linee guida di annotazione seguono alcuni dei recenti sforzi di annotazione per altre lingue. Il corpus finale contiene 5000 post di micro-blogging annotati da un gran numero di commentatori volontari. L'accordo inter-annotatore e i primi risultati automatici di discriminazione che presentiamo sono in linea con i precedenti sforzi di annotazione.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas pažeidžiamos kalbos duomenų rinkinio, skirto rumunų kalbai socialinėje žiniasklaidoje, anotacijos procesas. Siekiant palengvinti palyginamus daugiakalbius tyrimus offensinės kalbos srityje, anotacijos gairėse atsižvelgiama į kai kurias pastarąsias pastangas anotuoti kitas kalbas. Galutiniame korpuse yra 5000 mikroblogų postų, kuriuos užrašė daug savanorių. Tarp annotatorių susitarimas ir pirminiai mūsų pateikti automatinės diskriminacijos rezultatai atitinka ankstesnes pastangas.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува процесот на анотација на набор на навредливи јазички податоци за романецот на социјалните медиуми. За да се олесни споредливото мултијазичко истражување за офанзивниот јазик, насоките за анотација следат некои од неодамнешните напори за анотација за други јазици. Последниот корпус содржи 5000 микро-блогирачки постови кои беа анотирани од голем број доброволци. Интеранотаторскиот договор и првичните резултати на автоматска дискриминација кои ги претставуваме се во согласност со претходните напори за анотација.', 'ml': 'This paper describes the annotation process of an offensive language data set for Romanian on social media.  അപമാനകരമായ ഭാഷയെക്കുറിച്ച് ഏറ്റവും തുല്യമായ പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ ഗവേഷണം ലഭിക്കാന്\u200d ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്നതിനായി, മറ്റു ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക്  അവസാനത്തെ കോര്\u200dപ്പൂസില്\u200d 5,000 മൈക്രോ ബ്ലോഗിങ്ങ് പോസ്റ്റുകളുണ്ട്. ഒരുപാട് സ്വേച്ഛിക്കുന്ന സ്വതന്ത്രാ ഇന്റര്\u200dനാട്ടറിന്റെ അഭിപ്രായത്തിലുള്ള കരാരും ആദ്യ വ്യത്യാസവിവേചനത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങളും നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുണ്ടാകുന', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan proses anotasi set data bahasa yang menyerang untuk bahasa Romania pada media sosial. Untuk memudahkan penyelidikan berbilang-bahasa yang boleh dibandingkan pada bahasa yang menyerang, panduan anotasi mengikut beberapa usaha anotasi baru-baru ini untuk bahasa lain. Korpus terakhir mengandungi 5000 pos mikro-blog yang dicatat oleh sejumlah besar penganut sukarelawan. Kesepakatan antar-annotator dan hasil diskriminasi automatik awal yang kita hadapi adalah sesuai dengan usaha annotasi sebelumnya.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τη διαδικασία σχολιασμού ενός συνόλου δεδομένων προσβλητικής γλώσσας για τα ρουμανικά στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Για να διευκολυνθεί η συγκρίσιμη πολύγλωσση έρευνα για την προσβλητική γλώσσα, οι κατευθυντήριες γραμμές σχολιασμού ακολουθούν ορισμένες από τις πρόσφατες προσπάθειες σχολιασμού για άλλες γλώσσες. Το τελικό σώμα περιέχει 5000 μικροblogging δημοσιεύσεις σχολιασμένες από μεγάλο αριθμό εθελοντών σχολιαστών. Η συμφωνία μεταξύ σχολιαστών και τα αρχικά αποτελέσματα αυτόματης διάκρισης που παρουσιάζουμε είναι σύμφωνη με τις προηγούμενες προσπάθειες σχολιασμού.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Ромын хэлний мэдээллийг нийгмийн мэдээлэл дээр зориулах үйл явцыг тайлбарладаг. Хүмүүсийн хэл дээр харьцуулагдах олон хэл судалгааг ашиглах тулд тэмдэглэх удирдлага нь өөр хэл дээр саяхан нээлттэй хичээл хийдэг. Эцсийн корпус нь олон сайн дурын сэтгэл хөдлөгч нарын анзаарсан 5000 микро-блог захидал бий. Бидний одоогоор байгаа автоматическийн ялгааны үр дүн нь өмнө нь илтгэлцүүлэх хичээлдэй холбоотой.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver annotasjonsprosessen for eit offensiv språk- data sett for rumensk på sosiale media. For å letta sammenlignbare fleirspråksforskning på offensiv språk, følgjer notasjonshjelpelinjene nokre av dei siste uttrykkingane for andre språk. Den siste korpusen inneheld 5000 mikro- blogging- postar annoterate av eit stor tal av frivilleggjarar. Interannotatorsavtalen og den første automatiske diskriminasjonskontrollen vi presenterer er i line med tidlegare uttrykk for annotasjonar.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje proces adnotacji obraźliwego zbioru danych językowych dla rumuńskiego w mediach społecznościowych. Aby ułatwić porównywalne wielojęzyczne badania nad językiem obraźliwym, wytyczne dotyczące adnotacji są zgodne z niektórymi z ostatnich wysiłków adnotacyjnych dla innych języków. Ostateczny korpus zawiera 5000 mikroblogowych postów adnotacyjnych przez dużą liczbę wolontariuszy. Porozumienie między adnotatorami i początkowe wyniki automatycznej dyskryminacji, które przedstawiamy, są zgodne z wcześniejszymi wysiłkami adnotacyjnymi.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз Румындық тіл деректерін социалдық медиақта орнату процесін анықтайды. Тіл туралы көп тілді зерттеулерді салыстыру үшін, жазбалардың бағыттаулары басқа тілдер үшін жаңа жазбалардың әрекеттерінің кейбіріне сәйкес келеді. Соңғы корпус 5000 микро- блог жіберушілері бар. Бірнеше көп бойынша бойынша көп бойынша бойынша жаңартушылар жазылады. Жазбалардың арасындағы келесі мен бастапқы автоматты дискриминациялық нәтижелеріміз бұрынғы жазбалардың әрекеттеріне сәйкес келеді.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie procesul de adnotare a unui set de date lingvistice ofensatoare pentru limba română pe rețelele de socializare. Pentru a facilita cercetarea comparabilă multilingvă privind limbajul ofensator, orientările de adnotare urmează unele dintre eforturile recente de adnotare pentru alte limbi. Corpusul final conține 5000 de articole de micro-blogging adnotate de un număr mare de adnotatori voluntari. Acordul inter-adnotator și rezultatele inițiale ale discriminării automate pe care le prezentăm sunt în concordanță cu eforturile anterioare de adnotare.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සාමාජික මිඩියාවේ රෝමානියානු ගොනු භාෂා දත්ත සැකසුම් කරපු ක්\u200dරියාවක් ප්\u200dරකාර අපරාධ භාෂාව සඳහා විශේෂ භාෂාව සමාන්\u200dය විදියට සමාන්\u200dය විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න, අන්තිම භාෂාව සඳහා අන අන්තිම කොර්පස් එකේ 5000ක් මයික්රෝ බ්ලෝග් පොස්ට්ස් එකක් තියෙනවා විශාල ස්වායෝජිකයෙන් සංචාරකය අන්තර්ජනය සම්බන්ධය සහ පටන් ගත්ත ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය විශේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිපත්තියක් අපි දැන් ඉන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිපත්ති අ', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje proces annotacije ofanzivnih jezičkih podataka za rumunske na društvenim medijima. Da bi se olakšalo usporedno višejezičko istraživanje o ofanzivnom jeziku, uputstva za annotaciju prate neke od nedavnih napora za annotaciju drugih jezika. Posljednji korpus sadrži 5000 mikro-blogging postova annotiranih velikim brojem dobrovoljnih annotatora. Međuannotatorski sporazum i prvi automatski rezultati diskriminacije koje predstavljamo su u skladu sa ranijim naporima za annotaciju.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran baaraandegista macluumaadka caafimaadka ee afka Rooma looga dhigay shabakadda bulshada. Si loo fududeeyo waxbarashada luuqadaha kala duduwan oo la barbaranayo luuqadaha dhibka ah, hagitaanka caafimaadku waxay raacaan hawlaha la xiriira ee ugu dambeeyey ee luuqadaha kale. Qoriga ugu dambeeya waxaa ku jira 5000 boostada micro-blogging oo ay ku dhibaataysnaayeen rag badan oo iskaa qabsada. The inter-annotator agreement and the initial automatic discrimination results we present are in line with earlier annotation efforts.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver kommenteringsprocessen för en stötande språkdatauppsättning för rumänska på sociala medier. För att underlätta jämförbar flerspråkig forskning om stötande språk följer kommenteringsriktlinjerna några av de senaste kommenteringsinsatserna för andra språk. Den slutliga korpusen innehåller 5000 mikroblogginlägg kommenterade av ett stort antal frivilliga kommentatorer. Interkommentatoravtalet och de inledande automatiska diskrimineringsresultaten som vi presenterar ligger i linje med tidigare kommentarer.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தை அறிவிக்கிறது சமூக ஊடகங்களில் ரோமானியனுக்கான ஒரு மோசமான மொழி தரவு அமைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாட ஒப்பிடும் பல மொழிகளின் ஆராய்ச்சியை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு, அறிவிப்பு நேர்வழிகாட்டிகள் மற்ற மொழிகளுக்கு சமீபத்தில் சில அரட The final corpus contains 5000 micro-blogging posts annotated by a large number of volunteer annotators.  இடைவெளிப்பாட்டு ஒப்பந்தம் மற்றும் முதல் தானியங்கி தீர்ப்பு முடிவுகள் நாம் தற்போது இருக்கிறோம் முன்னால்', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ سوسیل میڈیا میں رومانی کے لئے ایک ناپسندیدہ زبان ڈیٹا سیٹ کی آگاہ کی پروسس کا مفصل بیان کرتا ہے. اس کے لئے بہت سی زبان کی تحقیقات کے مطابق مطابق بہت سی زبان کی تحقیقات کو آسان کرنے کے لئے، اپنا تحقیقات ہدایت لینڈ دوسری زبانوں کے لئے بہت سی اخیر تحقیقات کے مطابق پیچھے چ آخری کورپوس میں 5000 میکروٹ بلاگ کے پوسٹ ہیں جو بہت سی آرام خواہشات کرنے والوں کے ذریعے اظہار کی گئی ہیں. ہم نے پہلے آگاہ کرنے کی کوشش کے ساتھ ملے ہیں.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-proċess ta’ annotazzjoni ta’ sett ta’ dejta tal-lingwa offensiva għar-Rumen fuq il-midja soċjali. Sabiex tiġi ffaċilitata r-riċerka komparabbli multilingwi dwar lingwa offensiva, il-linji gwida tal-annotazzjoni jsegwu xi wħud mill-isforzi reċenti ta’ annotazzjoni għal lingwi oħra. Il-korpus finali fih 5000 post ta’ mikroblogging annotat minn numru kbir ta’ annotaturi volontarji. Il-ftehim bejn l-annotaturi u r-riżultati inizjali ta’ diskriminazzjoni awtomatika li nippreżentaw huma konformi ma’ sforzi ta’ annotazzjoni preċedenti.', 'uz': "Бу саҳифа Румий маълумотларда тажовузкорлик маълумотни кўриб беради. Ko'pchilik tillarda bir necha tillar o'rganishni foydalanish uchun, taʼminlovchi qoidalar boshqa tillar uchun bir necha taʼminlov qiladigan tashkilotlardan foydalanadi. Oxirgi korpusda 5,000 mikro-blogging postlari bor va ko'p ko'pchilik ta'minlovchi taʼminlovchilar bilan bog'liq. Inter-annotator heshiisi va avtomatik avtomatik ajratish natijalari birinchi tajriba qilish natijalarida birinchi tajriba harakat qilish orqali.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả quá trình ghi chú về một bộ dữ liệu ngôn ngữ tấn công cho người Rumani trên mạng xã hội. Để dễ dàng nghiên cứu ngôn ngữ tấn công có nhiều ngôn ngữ, hướng dẫn ghi chú theo một số trong những nghiên cứu mới nhất về các ngôn ngữ khác. The final Corpus chứa 5000 vi blog post được ghi chú bởi một số lượng lớn các nhà biên bản tình nguyện. Thỏa thuận liên hiệp và kết quả phân biệt tự động đầu tiên chúng ta đưa ra đều phù hợp với các nỗ lực ghi chú trước đây.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва процеса на анотация на офанзивен езиков набор от данни за румънски език в социалните медии. За да се улеснят сравнимите многоезични изследвания на обидните езици, насоките за анотация следват някои от последните усилия за анотация на други езици. Окончателният корпус съдържа 5000 микроблогски публикации, анотирани от голям брой доброволни анотатори. Споразумението между анотаторите и първоначалните резултати от автоматичната дискриминация, които представяме, са в съответствие с по-ранните усилия за анотация.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver annoteringsprocessen af et stødende sprogdatasæt for rumænsk på sociale medier. For at lette sammenlignelig flersproget forskning om stødende sprog følger retningslinjerne for anmærkninger nogle af de seneste anmærkningsbestræbelser for andre sprog. Det endelige korpus indeholder 5000 mikroblogindlæg kommenteret af et stort antal frivillige kommentatorer. Den inter-annotator-aftale og de første automatiske resultater af diskrimination, vi præsenterer, er i overensstemmelse med tidligere noteringsbestræbelser.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft het annotatieproces van een aanstootgevende taalgegevensset voor Roemeens op sociale media. Om vergelijkbaar meertalig onderzoek naar aanstootgevende taal te vergemakkelijken, volgen de annotatierichtlijnen enkele van de recente annotatieinspanningen voor andere talen. Het laatste corpus bevat 5000 micro-blogging posts geannoteerd door een groot aantal vrijwilligers. De inter-annotator overeenkomst en de eerste automatische discriminatieresultaten die we presenteren zijn in overeenstemming met eerdere annotatie inspanningen.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje proces annotacije uvredljivih jezičkih podataka za rumunske na društvenim medijima. Za olakšanje usporednog višejezičkog istraživanja o uvredljivom jeziku, uputstva za annotaciju prate neke od nedavnih napora za annotaciju drugih jezika. Posljednji korpus sadrži 5000 mikro-blogging postova annotiranih velikim brojem dobrovoljnih annotatora. Međuannotatorski sporazum i početni rezultati automatske diskriminacije koje predstavljamo su u skladu s ranijim naporima za annotaciju.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt den Annotationsprozess eines offensiven Sprachdatensatzes für Rumänisch in sozialen Medien. Um eine vergleichbare mehrsprachige Forschung zu offensiver Sprache zu ermöglichen, folgen die Annotationsrichtlinien einigen der jüngsten Annotationsbemühungen für andere Sprachen. Das endgültige Korpus enthält 5000 Mikroblogging-Beiträge, die von einer großen Anzahl freiwilliger Annotatoren kommentiert wurden. Die Inter-Annotator-Vereinbarung und die ersten automatischen Diskriminierungsergebnisse, die wir präsentieren, stehen im Einklang mit früheren Annotationsbemühungen.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan proses anotasi dari set data bahasa offensive untuk bahasa Rumania di media sosial. Untuk memudahkan penelitian berbagai bahasa yang dapat dibandingkan tentang bahasa yang menyerang, arah anotasi mengikuti beberapa usaha anotasi baru-baru ini untuk bahasa lain. The final corpus contains 5000 micro-blogging posts annotated by a large number of volunteer annotators.  Kesepakatan inter annotator dan hasil diskriminasi otomatis awal yang kita hadapi sesuai dengan usaha annotasi sebelumnya.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ روزنامه فرایند آگاهی داده\u200cهای زبان تجاوز برای رومانی در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی توصیف می\u200cکند. برای آسانی\u200cسازی تحقیقات متعدد زبان\u200cهای مقایسه بر روی زبان\u200cهای تجاوز، رهبری\u200cهای نوشته\u200cها بعضی از تلاشهای اخیر نوشته\u200cها برای زبان\u200cهای دیگر پیروی می\u200cکنند. آخرین کورپوس شامل ۵۰۰۰ میکرووبلاگ است که توسط تعداد زیادی از آشنا کنندگان داوطلب شده است. توافق بین\u200cنویسنده\u200cها و نتیجه\u200cهای جدایی اولیه\u200cای که پیش\u200cفرستاده\u200cایم با تلاش\u200cهای اظهار پیشین هستند.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mchakato wa taarifa za lugha za kutisha zilizowekwa kwa ajili ya raia wa Romania kwenye mitandao ya kijamii. Ili kusaidia tafiti za lugha mbalimbali zinazofanana na lugha mbalimbali zinazohusu matusi, miongozo ya kutangaza yanafuatilia baadhi ya juhudi za hivi karibuni za kutangaza kwa lugha nyingine. Shirika la mwisho lina makala 5,000 za kublogu micro zilizotajwa na matangazo mengi ya wanaojitolea. Makubaliano ya kushangaza pamoja na matokeo ya mwanzo ya ubaguzi wa kujitegemea yanalinganishwa na jitihada za mapema za uchochezi.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz sosyal medýädäler üçin Romaniýanyň adalat dil maglumatynyň ýazylmagyny tassyýar. Gürjükli diller barada ýalňyşlyk bilen köp diller barlamagy üçin, duýdurma düzlemleri başga diller üçin soňky duýdurma çabalaryny yzarlar. Soňky korpus 5000 mikro-blogging postlarda birnäçe gönüllü adamlar tarapyndan duýýan. Aýaratçylar ylalaşyklary we şu wagtyň başlangyç awtomatik diskriminasiň netijesi öňki duýdurma çabalary bilen çykypdyr.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf die annotasie proses van 'n offensive taal data stel vir Rumunieërs op sosiale media. Om vergelykbare multi-taalske forsoek op offensivele taal te maak, volg die annotasie-gidsline sommige van die onlangse annotasie versoeke vir ander tale. Die eindelike korpus bevat 5000 mikro-blogging-pos wat deur 'n groot aantal vrywillige annotators aangekies word. Die inter-annotator-ooreenkoms en die aanvanklike outomatiese diskriminasie resultate wat ons voorsien is in lyn met vroeëre annotasie versoeke.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan procesin e anotacionit të një grupi të dhënash ofensive gjuhësh për rumunët në media sociale. Për të lehtësuar kërkimin shumëgjuhësor të krahasueshëm mbi gjuhën ofensive, udhëzimet e anotacionit ndjekin disa nga përpjekjet e fundit të anotacionit për gjuhë të tjera. The final corpus contains 5000 micro-blogging posts annotated by a large number of volunteer annotators.  Marrëveshja ndër-anotatore dhe rezultatet fillestare automatike të diskriminimit që prezantojmë janë në përputhje me përpjekjet e mëparshme të anotacionit.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የሮማኒያን በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የሚያስጨንቀው የቋንቋ ዳታዎችን የሚያሳውቀው ግንኙነት ይናገራል፡፡ በቋንቋ ላይ በሚያጋራው ብዙዎችን ቋንቋዎች ምርመራ ለማግኘት፣ የአሁኑን መግለጫ መግለጫ ለሌሎች ቋንቋዎች የሚደረጉትን አንዳንዶችን የአሳተተ ድጋፍ ለመከተል ነው፡፡ የመጨረሻው ካርፓስ በብዙ ፈቃድ የተጠቃሚዎች ተቃውሞ የሚያስጨንቋቸው 5,000 ሚክሮሎ ጦማር ጽሑፎች አላቸው፡፡ የአካባቢው እና የመጀመሪያው ውይይት እና የመጀመሪያው ውይይት የልማድ ውጤቶች አስቀድሞ በአሳማሚ ጉዳይ ላይ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է ռոմանացիների համար սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում գրավիչ լեզվի տվյալների համակարգը: Որպեսզի հնարավոր լինի համեմատական բազմալեզու ուսումնասիրություններ, գրառումների ուղղությունները հետևում են տարբեր լեզուների վերջին գրառումների որոշ փորձերին: Վերջին կորպոսը պարունակում է 5000 միկրոբլոգի գրառումներ, որոնք նշում են բազմաթիվ կամավոր նշորողներ: Նոտորատորների միջև համաձայնությունը և սկզբնական ավտոմատիկ խտրականության արդյունքները, որոնք մենք ներկայացնում ենք, համապատասխանում են նախկին նոտորատորների ջանքերին:', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধে রোমানিয়ান সামাজিক মিডিয়াতে রোমানীয় ভাষার তথ্যের বিরক্তিকর বিষয়টি বর্ণনা করেছে। আক্রান্ত ভাষায় অনেক ভাষার সাথে তুলনায় গবেষণা সহজযোগিতা করার উদ্দেশ্যে এই বিস্তারিত নীতি অন্য ভাষার জন্য সাম্প্রতিক ক ক চূড়ান্ত কোর্পাসের মধ্যে ৫০০০ মাইক্রো ব্লগিং পোস্ট রয়েছে বিশাল স্বেচ্ছাসেবক বিবেচনা করেছে। প্রথম স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বৈষম্যের ফলাফল আমরা উপস্থিত হচ্ছি আগের বিরক্তিকর প্রচেষ্টার মাধ্যমে।', 'az': 'Bu kağıt Romalı dil məlumatının sosyal media üçün təşkil edilən təşkil sürətini təsdiqləyir. Həddi dil barəsində müxtəlif çoxlu dil araştırmalarını asanlaşdırmaq üçün, məlumatların rəhbər yolları başqa dillər üçün son xəbərdarlıq çabalarının bəzisinə uyur. Son korpus 5000 mikro-blogging məlumatlarını çox gönülləşdirənlər tarafından bildirdi. İşləyici anlaşmalar və başlangıcı avtomatik diskriminasiya sonuçlarımız əvvəlki annotasyon çabaları ilə müəyyən edilmişdir.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje proces annotacije ofanzivnih jezičkih podataka za rumunske na društvenim medijima. Za olakšanje usporednog multijezičkog istraživanja o uvredljivom jeziku, uputstva za annotaciju prate neke od nedavnih napora za annotaciju drugih jezika. Posljednji korpus sadrži 5000 mikro-blogging postova annotiranih velikim brojem dobrovoljnih annotatora. Međuannotatorski sporazum i početni automatski rezultati diskriminacije koje predstavljamo su u skladu sa ranijim naporima za annotaciju.', 'ko': '본고는 소셜 미디어에서 루마니아인들에게 공격적인 언어 데이터 집합을 표시하는 과정을 묘사한다.공격적인 언어에 대한 비교할 수 있는 다중 언어 연구를 편리하게 하기 위해 주석 안내서는 다른 언어의 최근 주석 작업에 따랐다.최종 어료 라이브러리에는 5000편의 웨이보 게시물이 포함되어 있으며, 대량의 지원자 주석원이 주석을 달았다.주석자 간의 일치성과 우리가 보여준 초기 자동 식별 결과는 초기 주석 작업과 일치한다.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje proces anotace urážlivého jazykového datového souboru pro rumunštinu na sociálních médiích. Aby bylo možné usnadnit srovnatelný vícejazyčný výzkum urážlivého jazyka, pokyny pro anotaci se řídí některými z nedávných anotací pro jiné jazyky. Konečný korpus obsahuje 5000 mikroblogových příspěvků anotovaných velkým počtem dobrovolníků. Dohoda mezi anotátory a počáteční výsledky automatické diskriminace, které prezentujeme, jsou v souladu s dřívějšími anotacemi.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el procés d'anotació d'un conjunt de dades ofensives de llenguatge per a rumà als mitjans socials. Per facilitar la investigació multillengua comparable sobre llenguatges ofensives, les directrices d'anotació segueixen alguns dels esforços recents d'anotació per altres llenguatges. El corpus final conté 5000 microblogues anotats per un gran nombre d'anotators voluntaris. L'acord entre anotators i els resultats inicials de discriminació automàtica que presentem estan en consonància amb els esforços anteriors d'anotació.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse rumeenia keele solvava andmekogumi annoteerimist sotsiaalmeedias. Selleks et hõlbustada võrreldavat mitmekeelset solvava keele uurimist, järgitakse märgistussuunistes mõningaid hiljutisi muude keelte märgistamise jõupingutusi. Lõplik korpus sisaldab 5000 mikroblogipostitust, millel on suur hulk vabatahtlikke annotatoreid. Anotatsioonidevaheline kokkulepe ja meie esitatud esialgsed automaatse diskrimineerimise tulemused on kooskõlas varasemate anotatsioonijõupingutustega.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan romanian loukkaavan kieliaineiston huomautusprosessia sosiaalisessa mediassa. Hyökkäävän kielen vertailukelpoisen monikielisen tutkimuksen helpottamiseksi huomautusohjeet noudattavat joitakin viimeaikaisia huomautuksia muille kielille. Lopullinen korpus sisältää 5000 mikrobloggauspostausta, joihin on merkitty suuri määrä vapaaehtoisia annotaattoreita. Huomattajien välinen sopimus ja esittelemämme alustavat automaattiset syrjintätulokset ovat linjassa aikaisempien merkintöjen kanssa.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambarang pancen dadi nggawe barang nggawe dolanan ingkang rumani kanggo media soti. Name Ngawe kang perusahaan langkung sampeyan kanggo tukang karo akeh-langkung kanggo tukang karo alwih, ingkang alih kanggo tukang tarjamahan karo perusahaan kanggo langgambar sing wis ana. Terus coral tuku ana limangatus limangatus dipulunggunaké limangatus nggawe jinahane neng akeh liyane rasané. Tulungan inter-awak sing karo perusahaan kelas tualke semester hukum sing nguasai nèng iki dadi, nik awak dhéwé kuwi tanggal nggawe barang kelas tualke.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faﾉ預ﾉ預 jarrabar zartar da data na harshen zartar da wanda aka tsare wa Rumori a kan mitandai da jamii. To, don ka sauﾆ兮ﾆ兮ra fassarar littafa masu daidaita a kan harshen mai fassari, shiryoyin ayuka na sanarwa, sunﾃ｣ biyar wasu aikin sanarwa na nan kwanan zuwa ga wasu harshe. Ganda na ﾆ兮rshen Corbas yana da makala 5,000 micro-logogi waﾉ預nda aka yi wa haske da wasu mataimaka masu motsi. Agreen-mai taﾉ殿 da matsalar ta fara-fara da taki farat ﾉ預ya masu samu'a da aikin bayani na bayani.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את תהליך ההערות של קבוצת מידע לשפה פגיעה לרומני במדיה חברתית. כדי להקל על מחקר רב-שפתי שווה על שפת פגיעה, המדרכים של הערות עוקבים אחרי כמה מאמצי הערות האחרונים לשפות אחרות. הקורפוס האחרון מכיל 5000 פרסומות של מיקרובלוגים שמשמעות על ידי מספר גדול של ציונים מתנדבים. ההסכם בין המציאות והתוצאות ההבדל האוטומטי הראשוניות שאנחנו מציגים מתאימים למאמצי ההציאות הקודמים.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan postopek označevanja žaljivega jezikovnega nabora podatkov za romunščino na družbenih omrežjih. Za olajšanje primerljivih večjezičnih raziskav žaljivega jezika smernice za opombe sledijo nekaterim nedavnim prizadevanjem za opombe za druge jezike. Končni korpus vsebuje 5000 mikroblogovskih objav z oznakami velikega števila prostovoljcev. Sporazum med opombami in začetni rezultati avtomatske diskriminacije, ki jih predstavljamo, so v skladu s prejšnjimi prizadevanji za opomba.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་རོམ་མེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྐད་རིགས་དང་སྦྱར་མཐུན་རུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྒྱལ་སྤྱིའི་དོན་ཡུལ་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་དུས་ཡོད་ཆེན་པོ་༥༠༠་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཚོད་འབྲེལ་མི་དང་འགོ་འཛུགས་པའི་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་གི་གནད་སྡུ'}
{'en': 'Monitoring Fact Preservation, Grammatical Consistency and Ethical Behavior of Abstractive Summarization Neural Models', 'es': 'Monitoreo de la preservación de hechos, la coherencia gramatical y el comportamiento ético de los modelos neuronales de resumen abstractivo', 'ar': 'مراقبة حفظ الحقائق والاتساق النحوي والسلوك الأخلاقي للنماذج العصبية للتلخيص التجريدي', 'fr': 'Surveillance de la préservation des faits, de la cohérence grammaticale et du comportement éthique des modèles neuronaux de synthèse abstraite', 'pt': 'Monitoramento da preservação de fatos, consistência gramatical e comportamento ético de modelos neurais de sumarização abstrativa', 'ja': '抽象的要約ニューラルモデルの事実保存、文法的一貫性、倫理的行動のモニタリング', 'hi': 'निगरानी तथ्य संरक्षण, व्याकरणिक स्थिरता और अमूर्त Summarization तंत्रिका मॉडल के नैतिक व्यवहार', 'zh': '监控抽象总结神经模形之事存、语法一致性伦行', 'ru': 'Мониторинг сохранения фактов, грамматической последовательности и этического поведения нейронных моделей абстрактного обобщения', 'ga': 'Monatóireacht ar Chaomhnú Fíoras, Comhsheasmhacht Ghramadaí agus Iompar Eiticiúil Múnlaí Néaracha Achoimrithe Teibí', 'el': 'Παρακολούθηση της διατήρησης γεγονότων, της γραμματικής συνοχής και της ηθικής συμπεριφοράς των αφηρημένων συνοπτικών Νευρικών Μοντέλων', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიური კომპანიზაციაციის ნეირალური მოდელების მონართვა', 'kk': 'Абстрактивті тұжырымдамасын қалдыру, граматикалық констанциялық және эфикалық қасиеттерін бақылау', 'hu': 'Az absztraktív összefoglaló modellek ténymegőrzése, nyelvtani konzisztenciája és etikai viselkedése monitorozása Neurális modellek', 'it': 'Monitoraggio della conservazione dei fatti, coerenza grammaticale e comportamento etico dei modelli neurali di sintesi astratta', 'mk': 'Мониторинг за зачувување на факти, граматска конзистентност и етичко однесување на апстрактивните неурални модели за резултат', 'ml': 'ഫാക്റ്റ് സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതും ഗ്രാമ്മാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള സ്വഭാവം, അബ്ട്രാക്ടികേറ്റിവ് ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റ', 'lt': 'Neuralinių modelių suvestinių faktų išsaugojimas, gramatinis nuoseklumas ir etinis elgesys', 'mt': 'Monitoring Fact Preservation, Grammatical Consistency and Ethical Behavior of Abstractive Summarization Neural Models', 'no': 'Overvaking av konsistens og etisk oppførsel av abstraktive sammendragsmodular', 'pl': 'Monitorowanie zachowania faktów, spójności gramatycznej i etycznego zachowania abstrakcyjnych modeli neuronalnych', 'ro': 'Monitorizarea conservării faptelor, coerenţei gramaticale şi comportamentului etic al modelelor neurale de sinteză abstractă', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ хадгалах, грамматикийн харилцаа, абстрактив тодруулах мэдрэлийн загваруудын этикийн үйл ажиллагаа', 'si': 'නිරීක්ෂණය ඇත්ත ආරක්ෂණය, ග්\u200dරාමාටික් සංවිධානය සහ භාවිතාව සම්පූර්ණ සංවිධානය නිර්මාණය', 'ms': 'Pemantauan Fakta, Konsistensi Grammatik dan Perilaku Etik Model Neural Penapisan Abstraktif', 'so': 'Monitoring Fact Preservation, Grammatical Consistency and Ethical Behavior of Abstractive Summarization Neural Models', 'sv': 'Övervakning av faktakovervakning, grammatisk konsistens och etiskt beteende hos abstrakta summeringsmodeller Neurala modeller', 'ta': 'கண்காணிப்பு, சுருக்கம் சுருக்கமாக்குதல் நெய்யுரு மாதிரிகளின் சிறப்பு', 'sr': 'Monitoriranje očuvanja činjenica, Gramatične konsistencije i etičkog ponašanja abstraktivne rezervacije neuronskih modela', 'ur': 'حقیقت حفاظت کی نظارت، Grammatical Consistency اور Ethical Behaviour of Abstractive Summarization Neural Models', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bảo tồn thực tế, liên kết nhạc kịch và hành vi đạo đức của thuật điển hình thần kinh.', 'bg': 'Консервация на фактите, граматическа последователност и етично поведение на абстрактивно обобщаване на невралните модели', 'da': 'Overvågning af faktableholdelse, grammatisk konsistens og etisk adfærd af abstrakte opsummeringsmodeller Neurale modeller', 'id': 'Pemantauan Fakta, Konsistensi Grammatik dan Perilaku Etik Model Neural Abstractive Summarization', 'ko': '추상적 요약 신경 모델의 사실 보존, 문법 일치성과 도덕 행위를 감시하다', 'fa': 'مواظب حفاظت حقیقت، هماهنگی Grammatical and Ethical Behaviour of Abstractive Summarization Neural Models', 'hr': 'Monitoriranje očuvanja činjenica, Gramatične konsistencije i etičkog ponašanja abstraktivnog rezervacije neuronskih modela', 'nl': 'Monitoring van feitenbehoud, grammaticale consistentie en ethisch gedrag van abstracte samenvattingsneuronale modellen', 'tr': 'Monitoring Fact Preservation, Grammatical Consistency and Ethical Behavior of Abstractive Summarization Neural Models', 'de': 'Beobachtung von Faktenerhaltung, Grammatischer Konsistenz und Ethik von abstraktiven Zusammenfassungen neuronaler Modelle', 'af': 'Besigtig fakte opslaan, Gramatiese konsistensie en etiese gedrag van abstraktiewe opsomming Neurale Modelle', 'sq': 'Monitorimi i ruajtjes së fakteve, konsistencës Gramatike dhe sjelljes etike të modeleve neuronale të përmbledhjes abstraktive', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Faylı Saqlama, Gramatik Konistenci və Etik Davranışı', 'sw': 'Kufuatilia Uhudhuri wa Ukurasa, Udhibiti wa Kitakwimu na tabia ya Kiethili ya Utangazaji Mkuu', 'bs': 'Monitoriranje očuvanja činjenica, Gramatične konsistencije i etičkog ponašanja abstraktivne rezervacije neuronskih modela', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մոդելների վերահսկողական պահպանությունը, գրամմատիկական համապատասխանությունը և էթիկական վարքագիծը', 'ca': 'Monitoring Fact Preservation, Grammatical Consistence and Ethical Behaviour of Abstractive Summarization Neural Models', 'cs': 'Sledování zachování faktů, gramatické konzistence a etického chování abstraktního shrnutí neuronových modelů', 'et': 'Järelevalvefaktide säilitamine, grammatiline järjepidevus ja eetiline käitumine abstraktsete kokkuvõtete neuromudelites', 'bn': 'ফ্যাক্ট সংরক্ষণ, গ্রামেটিক্যাল কনসিস্টেন্সি এবং ঐতিহ্যবাহী আচরণ', 'fi': 'Abstraktien yhteenvetomallien teorian säilyttäminen, kielioppisen johdonmukaisuuden ja eettisen käyttäytymisen seuranta', 'jv': 'MonMonitor Actual Presentation, Graftecal Konsistensi lan Etik Gedit Duration of absolutetraction Samuralisation Neral Modes', 'sk': 'Spremljanje ohranjanja dejstev, slovnične skladnosti in etičnega vedenja abstraktivnih povzetkov nevralnih modelov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מעקב על שמירת עובדות, תועלת גראמטית ומתנהגות אתית של מודלים נוירואלים מסדרים', 'bo': 'Monitoring Fact Preservation, Grammatical Consistency and Ethical Behavior of Abstractive Summarization Neural Models'}
{'en': 'The paper describes a system for automatic summarization in English language of online news data that come from different non-English languages. The system is designed to be used in production environment for media monitoring. Automatic summarization can be very helpful in this domain when applied as a helper tool for journalists so that they can review just the important information from the news channels. However, like every software solution, the automatic summarization needs performance monitoring and assured safe environment for the clients. In media monitoring environment the most problematic features to be addressed are : the copyright issues, the factual consistency, the style of the text and the ethical norms in journalism. Thus, the main contribution of our present work is that the above mentioned characteristics are successfully monitored in neural automatic summarization models and improved with the help of validation, fact-preserving and fact-checking procedures.', 'ar': 'تصف الورقة نظامًا للتلخيص التلقائي باللغة الإنجليزية لبيانات الأخبار عبر الإنترنت التي تأتي من لغات مختلفة غير الإنجليزية. تم تصميم النظام لاستخدامه في بيئة الإنتاج لمراقبة الوسائط. يمكن أن يكون التلخيص التلقائي مفيدًا جدًا في هذا المجال عند تطبيقه كأداة مساعدة للصحفيين حتى يتمكنوا من مراجعة المعلومات المهمة فقط من القنوات الإخبارية. ومع ذلك ، مثل كل حل برمجي ، يحتاج التلخيص التلقائي إلى مراقبة الأداء وبيئة آمنة مضمونة للعملاء. في بيئة مراقبة وسائل الإعلام ، فإن السمات الأكثر إشكالية التي يجب معالجتها هي: قضايا حقوق النشر والاتساق الواقعي وأسلوب النص والمعايير الأخلاقية في الصحافة. وبالتالي ، فإن المساهمة الرئيسية لعملنا الحالي هي أن الخصائص المذكورة أعلاه يتم رصدها بنجاح في نماذج التلخيص التلقائي العصبي وتحسينها بمساعدة إجراءات التحقق من الصحة وحفظ الحقائق والتحقق من الحقائق.', 'fr': "L'article décrit un système de synthèse automatique en anglais de données d'actualités en ligne provenant de différentes langues autres que l'anglais. Le système est conçu pour être utilisé dans un environnement de production pour la surveillance des supports. Le résumé automatique peut être très utile dans ce domaine lorsqu'il est utilisé comme outil d'assistance pour les journalistes afin qu'ils puissent consulter uniquement les informations importantes des chaînes d'information. Cependant, comme pour toute solution logicielle, la synthèse automatique nécessite une surveillance des performances et un environnement sûr pour les clients. Dans un environnement de surveillance des médias, les aspects les plus problématiques à aborder sont\xa0: les questions de droits d'auteur, la cohérence factuelle, le style du texte et les normes éthiques dans le journalisme. Ainsi, la principale contribution de nos travaux actuels est que les caractéristiques mentionnées ci-dessus sont surveillées avec succès dans des modèles de synthèse automatique neuronale et améliorées à l'aide de procédures de validation, de préservation des faits et de vérification des faits.", 'es': 'El documento describe un sistema para el resumen automático en inglés de datos de noticias en línea que provienen de diferentes idiomas distintos del inglés. El sistema está diseñado para usarse en entornos de producción para el monitoreo de medios. El resumen automático puede ser muy útil en este campo cuando se aplica como una herramienta de ayuda para que los periodistas puedan revisar solo la información importante de los canales de noticias. Sin embargo, como todas las soluciones de software, la sumarización automática necesita supervisión del rendimiento y un entorno seguro garantizado para los clientes. En el entorno de monitoreo de medios, las características más problemáticas que deben abordarse son: las cuestiones de derechos de autor, la coherencia de los hechos, el estilo del texto y las normas éticas en el periodismo. Por lo tanto, la principal contribución de nuestro trabajo actual es que las características mencionadas anteriormente se monitorean con éxito en modelos de resumen automático neuronal y se mejoran con la ayuda de procedimientos de validación, preservación de datos y verificación de hechos.', 'pt': 'O artigo descreve um sistema para sumarização automática em língua inglesa de dados de notícias online provenientes de diferentes línguas não inglesas. O sistema foi projetado para ser usado em ambiente de produção para monitoramento de mídia. A sumarização automática pode ser muito útil neste domínio quando aplicada como uma ferramenta auxiliar para jornalistas para que eles possam revisar apenas as informações importantes dos canais de notícias. No entanto, como toda solução de software, a sumarização automática precisa de monitoramento de desempenho e ambiente seguro garantido para os clientes. No ambiente de monitoramento de mídia as características mais problemáticas a serem abordadas são: as questões de direitos autorais, a consistência factual, o estilo do texto e as normas éticas no jornalismo. Assim, a principal contribuição do nosso presente trabalho é que as características acima mencionadas são monitoradas com sucesso em modelos de sumarização automática neural e melhoradas com a ajuda de procedimentos de validação, preservação de fatos e verificação de fatos.', 'zh': '本文述一以英语自总非英语言语在线新闻数。 其统计用于生产境内媒体监控。 自摘要为记者者,自摘要于此,可以观新闻频道之要。 然与每软件解决方案同,自摘要客户,性能自安。 媒体监测之至者,版权事一致性文本,新闻业之道也。 是以功效之要,神经自成监测,验其实核其助而改进之。', 'ja': '英語以外の異なる言語からのオンラインニュースデータを英語で自動的に要約するシステムについて説明した。本システムは、メディア監視のための生産環境で使用されるように設計されています。自動要約は、ニュースチャンネルからの重要な情報だけを確認できるように、ジャーナリストのヘルパーツールとして適用すると、このドメインで非常に役立ちます。ただし、すべてのソフトウェアソリューションと同様に、自動要約にはパフォーマンスの監視と、クライアントにとって安全な環境が必要です。メディア監視環境では、最も問題となる特徴は、著作権の問題、事実の一貫性、テキストのスタイル、ジャーナリズムにおける倫理規範です。したがって、本研究の主な貢献は、上述した特徴が、ニューラルオートマチックサマリゼーションモデルでうまく監視され、検証、事実保持、事実確認の手順を活用して改善されることである。', 'hi': 'पेपर ऑनलाइन समाचार डेटा की अंग्रेजी भाषा में स्वचालित सारांश के लिए एक प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है जो विभिन्न गैर-अंग्रेजी भाषाओं से आते हैं। सिस्टम को मीडिया निगरानी के लिए उत्पादन वातावरण में उपयोग करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है। पत्रकारों के लिए एक सहायक उपकरण के रूप में लागू होने पर स्वचालित सारांशीकरण इस डोमेन में बहुत सहायक हो सकता है ताकि वे समाचार चैनलों से केवल महत्वपूर्ण जानकारी की समीक्षा कर सकें। हालांकि, हर सॉफ़्टवेयर समाधान की तरह, स्वचालित सारांशीकरण को प्रदर्शन की निगरानी और ग्राहकों के लिए सुरक्षित वातावरण का आश्वासन देने की आवश्यकता होती है। मीडिया निगरानी वातावरण में सबसे अधिक समस्याग्रस्त विशेषताएं हैं जिन्हें संबोधित किया जाना है: कॉपीराइट मुद्दे, तथ्यात्मक स्थिरता, पाठ की शैली और पत्रकारिता में नैतिक मानदंड। इस प्रकार, हमारे वर्तमान कार्य का मुख्य योगदान यह है कि उपर्युक्त विशेषताओं को तंत्रिका स्वचालित सारांशीकरण मॉडल में सफलतापूर्वक मॉनिटर किया जाता है और सत्यापन, तथ्य-संरक्षण और तथ्य-जांच प्रक्रियाओं की मदद से सुधार किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'В статье описывается система автоматического обобщения на английском языке данных новостей, поступающих из различных неанглоязычных источников. Система предназначена для использования в производственной среде для мониторинга среды. Автоматическое обобщение может быть очень полезным в этой области, когда применяется в качестве вспомогательного инструмента для журналистов, чтобы они могли просматривать только важную информацию из новостных каналов. Однако, как и любое программное решение, автоматическое обобщение требует мониторинга производительности и обеспечения безопасной среды для клиентов. В среде мониторинга СМИ наиболее проблематичными являются: вопросы авторского права, фактологическая последовательность, стиль текста и этические нормы в журналистике. Таким образом, основным вкладом нашей настоящей работы является то, что вышеуказанные характеристики успешно отслеживаются в нейронных моделях автоматического обобщения и улучшаются с помощью процедур валидации, сохранения фактов и проверки фактов.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar cur síos ar chóras chun achoimriú uathoibríoch a dhéanamh i mBéarla ar shonraí nuachta ar líne a thagann ó theangacha éagsúla nach Béarla iad. Tá an córas deartha le húsáid i dtimpeallacht táirgthe chun monatóireacht a dhéanamh ar na meáin. Is féidir le hachoimriú uathoibríoch a bheith an-chabhrach sa réimse seo nuair a chuirtear i bhfeidhm é mar uirlis chabhrach d’iriseoirí ionas gur féidir leo athbhreithniú a dhéanamh ar an bhfaisnéis thábhachtach ó na bealaí nuachta amháin. Mar sin féin, cosúil le gach réiteach bogearraí, ní mór monatóireacht a dhéanamh ar fheidhmíocht agus timpeallacht shábháilte a chinntiú do na cliaint san achoimre uathoibríoch. I dtimpeallacht mhonatóireachta na meán is iad na gnéithe is mó fadhbanna a gcaithfear aghaidh a thabhairt orthu ná: na saincheisteanna cóipchirt, an chomhsheasmhacht fhíorasach, stíl an téacs agus na noirm eiticiúla san iriseoireacht. Mar sin, is é an príomh-rannchuidiú dár gcuid oibre faoi láthair ná go ndéantar monatóireacht rathúil ar na saintréithe thuasluaite i múnlaí néaracha achoimrithe uathoibríocha agus go bhfeabhsaítear iad le cabhair ó bhailíochtú, caomhnú fíricí agus nósanna imeachta seiceála fíricí.', 'el': 'Η εργασία περιγράφει ένα σύστημα αυτόματης σύνοψης στην αγγλική γλώσσα δεδομένων ειδήσεων που προέρχονται από διαφορετικές μη αγγλικές γλώσσες. Το σύστημα έχει σχεδιαστεί για να χρησιμοποιηθεί στο περιβάλλον παραγωγής για την παρακολούθηση μέσων. Η αυτόματη σύνοψη μπορεί να είναι πολύ χρήσιμη σε αυτόν τον τομέα όταν εφαρμόζεται ως βοηθητικό εργαλείο για τους δημοσιογράφους, έτσι ώστε να μπορούν να εξετάσουν μόνο τις σημαντικές πληροφορίες από τα κανάλια ειδήσεων. Ωστόσο, όπως κάθε λύση λογισμικού, η αυτόματη σύνοψη χρειάζεται παρακολούθηση απόδοσης και εξασφαλισμένο ασφαλές περιβάλλον για τους πελάτες. Στο περιβάλλον παρακολούθησης των μέσων ενημέρωσης τα πιο προβληματικά χαρακτηριστικά που πρέπει να αντιμετωπιστούν είναι: τα ζητήματα πνευματικής ιδιοκτησίας, η πραγματική συνέπεια, το ύφος του κειμένου και οι ηθικοί κανόνες στη δημοσιογραφία. Έτσι, η κύρια συμβολή της παρούσας εργασίας μας είναι ότι τα παραπάνω χαρακτηριστικά παρακολουθούνται επιτυχώς σε μοντέλα νευρωνικής αυτόματης σύνοψης και βελτιώνονται με τη βοήθεια διαδικασιών επικύρωσης, διατήρησης γεγονότων και ελέγχου γεγονότων.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja a különböző nem angol nyelvű online híradatok automatikus angol nyelvű összefoglalásának rendszerét. A rendszert úgy tervezték, hogy gyártási környezetben használják a média monitorozására. Az automatikus összefoglalás nagyon hasznos lehet ebben a területen, ha segítő eszközként alkalmazzák az újságírók számára, hogy csak a fontos információkat tudják áttekinteni a hírcsatornákból. Azonban, mint minden szoftver megoldás, az automatikus összefoglalás teljesítményfigyelést és biztonságos környezetet igényel az ügyfelek számára. A média monitoring környezetben a legproblémásabb jellemzők a következők: a szerzői jogi kérdések, a tényszerűség, a szöveg stílusa és az újságírás etikai normái. Jelen munkánk fő hozzájárulása tehát az, hogy a fent említett jellemzőket sikeresen monitorozzuk neurális automatikus összefoglaló modellekben, és javítjuk validálási, ténymegőrzési és ténymegőrzési eljárások segítségével.', 'ka': 'პარამეტრი აღწერა ინგლისური ინგლისური სახელის სისტემა, რომელიც განსხვავებული ინგლისური ენებიდან გამოიყენება. სისტემა განაზღვრებულია, რომ მედია მონიტორისთვის გამოყენება გამოყენებაში. ამ დიომინში ავტომატური სიმბოლობა შეიძლება იყოს ძალიან მოსახმარებელი, როდესაც ჯერნალისტებისთვის დახმარებელი ხელსაწყო, რადგან ისინი შეუძლებელია გავაკეთოთ მაგრამ, როგორც ყველა პროგრამის გარეშე, ავტომატიკური გარეშე უნდა გამოყენება და კლიენტებისთვის დარწმუნება სრული გარეშე. მედია მონიტორის გარეშე საზოგადოებაში ყველაზე პრობლემატიური განსაზომილებები უნდა დაწყენება: საზოგადომის პრობლემები, ფაქტიური შესაძლებლობა, ტექსტის სტილი და ეტიკალ ამიტომ, ჩვენი მიმდინარე სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაო დამატება იყო, რომ სამუშაო გამოსახულებული პროცესების შესაძლებლოდ ნეიროლური ავტომატიკური დამატება მოდელში მონარჩენა და დაახლოებით გადა', 'it': "L'articolo descrive un sistema per la sintesi automatica in lingua inglese dei dati di notizie online provenienti da diverse lingue non inglesi. Il sistema è progettato per essere utilizzato in ambiente di produzione per il monitoraggio dei supporti. La sintesi automatica può essere molto utile in questo settore quando viene applicata come strumento di aiuto per i giornalisti in modo che possano rivedere solo le informazioni importanti dai canali di notizie. Tuttavia, come ogni soluzione software, la sintesi automatica richiede un monitoraggio delle prestazioni e un ambiente sicuro garantito per i clienti. Nell'ambiente di monitoraggio dei media le caratteristiche più problematiche da affrontare sono: le questioni relative al copyright, la coerenza dei fatti, lo stile del testo e le norme etiche nel giornalismo. Pertanto, il contributo principale del nostro lavoro attuale è che le caratteristiche di cui sopra sono monitorate con successo in modelli di sintesi neurale automatica e migliorate con l'aiuto di procedure di convalida, conservazione dei fatti e controllo dei fatti.", 'kk': 'Қағаз ағылшынша тілдерден басқа жаңалық деректерді ағылшын тілінде автоматты түрде жазылу жүйесін анықтайды. Бұл жүйе медиа бақылау үшін шығару ортасында қолданылады. Журналистерге көмектесу құралы ретінде автоматты түрлендіру осы доменде көмектесу мүмкін болады, сондықтан олар жаңалық арналардың маңызды мәліметін тек қарай алады. Бірақ, әрбір бағдарлама шешімі секілді, автоматты түрде тұжырымдамасын бақылау және клиенттерге қауіпсіздік ортасын қауіпсіздік беру керек. Медиа бақылау ортасында көмектесетін мәселелердің ең мәселелері: автордық құқықтар мәселелері, шындық тәуелсіздік, мәтіннің стилі мен журналистік нормалары. Сонымен, қазіргі жұмысының негізгі қатынасы - жоғардағы қасиеттері невралды автоматты түрде жазылу үлгілерінде сәтті бақылады және тексеру, факт сақтау және факт тексеру процедурлерінің көмегімен жақсартылады.', 'lt': 'Dokumente aprašoma sistema, pagal kurią anglų kalba automatiškai apibendrinami internetiniai naujienų duomenys, gaunami iš skirtingų ne anglų kalbų. Sistema skirta naudoti gamybos aplinkoje žiniasklaidos stebėsenai. Automatinė santrauka gali būti labai naudinga šioje srityje, kai ji naudojama kaip pagalbinė priemonė žurnalistams, kad jie galėtų peržiūrėti tik svarbią informaciją iš naujienų kanalų. Tačiau, kaip ir kiekvienas programinės įrangos sprendimas, automatinei santraukai reikia stebėti veiklos rezultatus ir užtikrinti saugią aplinką klientams. Žiniasklaidos stebėsenos aplinkoje svarbiausi probleminiai aspektai yra autorių teisių klausimai, faktinis nuoseklumas, teksto stilius ir etikos normos žurnalistijoje. Taigi pagrindinis mūsų dabartinio darbo indėlis yra tai, kad pirmiau minėtos charakteristikos sėkmingai stebimos naudojant neurologinių automatinių santraukų modelius ir patobulinamos taikant patvirtinimo, faktų išsaugojimo ir faktų tikrinimo procedūras.', 'ms': 'Kertas menggambarkan sistem untuk ringkasan automatik dalam bahasa Inggeris data berita online yang berasal dari bahasa bukan Inggeris yang berbeza. Sistem direka untuk digunakan dalam persekitaran produksi untuk pengawasan media. Perringkasan automatik boleh sangat berguna dalam domain ini apabila dilaksanakan sebagai alat pembantu bagi wartawan supaya mereka boleh melaksanakan semula maklumat penting dari saluran berita. Namun, seperti setiap penyelesaian perisian, pengurusan automatik memerlukan pengawasan prestasi dan persekitaran yang selamat untuk pelanggan. Dalam persekitaran pemantauan media, ciri-ciri yang paling problematik yang perlu diselesaikan adalah: isu hak cipta, konsistensi fakta, gaya teks dan norm etika dalam wartawan. Oleh itu, kontribusi utama kerja kita sekarang ialah bahawa ciri-ciri yang disebut di atas berjaya diawasi dalam model penglihatan otomatik saraf dan diperbaiki dengan bantuan pengesahihan, penyimpanan fakta dan prosedur pemeriksaan fakta.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് അല്ലാത്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വരുന്ന ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകാര്യങ്ങളുടെ സ്വയമായി സം മീഡിയ നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം പ്രൊട്ടേഷന്\u200d പരിസ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതാണ്. വാര്\u200dത്ത ചാനലില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രം അവര്\u200dക്ക് വിവരം മാത്രം പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുമ്പോള്\u200d ഈ ഡൊമെയില്\u200d  എന്നാലും, എല്ലാ സോഫ്റ്റ്\u200cവെയര്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പോലെത്തന്നെയാണ്, സ്വയം കുരുക്കം സംബന്ധിച്ചിടത്തോളം ക്ല മീഡിയ പരിസ്ഥാനത്ത് നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും പ്രശ്നമുള്ള പ്രശ്നമുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d: പകര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d, യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മുടെ ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ജോലിയുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാഗമെന്തെന്നാല്\u200d മുകളില്\u200d പറഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന വ്യക്തിത്വവിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d സ്വയമായി സംസാരി', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Англи хэл дээр автоматжуулах системийг Англи хэл дээр олон англи хэл биш байдаг мэдээллийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийн системийг тайлбарладаг. Энэ систем медиа ажиллагаанд үйлдвэрлэлийн орчинд хэрэглэгддэг. Хэрвээ сэтгүүлчдийн тусламжтайгаар хэрэглэгдэхэд автоматтын тодорхойлолт энэ холбоонд маш тусламжтай байж болно. Тэд мэдээллийн арга замаас чухал мэдээллийг шинэчлэх боломжтой. Гэхдээ програм хангамжийн шийдвэр бүр шиг автоматжуулалт хэрэглэгчид ажиллагааны ажиллагааг удирдах, аюулгүй орчин хэрэгтэй. Мэдээллийн мэдээллийн хандлагын орчинд хамгийн асуудлыг удирдах хамгийн асуудлууд нь: хуулийн эрхийн асуудлууд, үнэндээ байдал, текст болон сэтгүүлийн загварын төлөвлөгөө. Иймээс бидний одоогийн ажлын гол түлхүүр дүнг нь дээр дурсамжлагдсан чадваруудыг мэдрэлийн автоматик тодруулах загвар дээр амжилттай харуулж, үнэндээ хадгалах, үнэндээ хадгалах, үнэндээ шалгах процедурын тусламжтайгаар сайжруулсан.', 'no': 'Papiret skildrar eit system for automatisk samandringa i engelsk språk av nettinformasjon som kjem frå ulike ikkje-engelske språk. Systemet er designert for å bruka i produksjonsmiljøet for media overvaking. Automatisk samandringa kan vera veldig nyttig i denne domenet når det er brukt som hjelpeverktøy for jornalista, slik at dei kan gjennomgå berre dei viktige informasjonane frå nye kanalane. Men, slik som kvar programløysing, treng automatisk sammendraging for å overvaka utviklingane og sikre på trygg miljø for klientene. I media-overvaking er dei mest problematiske funksjonane som skal adresserast er: opphavsrett, faktiske konsistens, tekststilen og etiske norme i journalism. Dette er den viktigste bidraga av vårt gjeldande arbeid at dei oppgjevne karakteristikaren er suksessfull overvåka i neirale automatiske sammendragsmodular og forbetra med hjelp av validasjon, feilbehov og faktiskkontrollsprosedyrar.', 'mk': 'Во весникот се опишува систем за автоматска резултатација на англискиот јазик на онлајн вести податоци кои доаѓаат од различни неанглиски јазици. Системот е дизајниран да се користи во производската средина за мониторинг на медиумите. Автоматска резултатација може да биде многу корисна во овој домен кога се применува како помошна алатка за новинарите за да можат да ги прегледаат само важните информации од новинските канали. Сепак, како и секое софтверско решение, на автоматското резултатирање му треба мониторинг на резултатот и осигурување на безбедната средина за клиентите. In media monitoring environment the most problematic features to be addressed are: the copyright issues, the factual consistency, the style of the text and the ethical norms in journalism.  Thus, the main contribution of our present work is that the above mentioned characteristics are successfully monitored in neural automatic summarization models and improved with the help of validation, fact-preserving and fact-checking procedures.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea descrie un sistem de rezumare automată în limba engleză a datelor de știri online care provin din diferite limbi non-engleze. Sistemul este conceput pentru a fi utilizat în mediul de producție pentru monitorizarea suporturilor. Rezumatul automat poate fi foarte util în acest domeniu atunci când este aplicat ca instrument de ajutor pentru jurnaliști, astfel încât aceștia să poată revizui doar informațiile importante din canalele de știri. Cu toate acestea, ca orice soluție software, rezumatul automat necesită monitorizarea performanței și un mediu sigur asigurat pentru clienți. În mediul de monitorizare media, cele mai problematice caracteristici care trebuie abordate sunt: problemele drepturilor de autor, consecvența faptuală, stilul textului și normele etice în jurnalism. Astfel, contribuția principală a lucrării noastre prezente este că caracteristicile menționate mai sus sunt monitorizate cu succes în modelele de rezumare automată neurală și îmbunătățite cu ajutorul procedurilor de validare, conservare a faptelor și verificare a faptelor.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano system automatycznego podsumowywania w języku angielskim danych wiadomości internetowych pochodzących z różnych języków nieangielskich. System przeznaczony jest do stosowania w środowisku produkcyjnym do monitorowania mediów. Automatyczne podsumowanie może być bardzo pomocne w tej dziedzinie, gdy jest stosowane jako narzędzie pomocne dla dziennikarzy, dzięki czemu mogą oni przeglądać tylko ważne informacje z kanałów wiadomości. Jednak, jak każde rozwiązanie oprogramowania, automatyczne podsumowanie wymaga monitorowania wydajności i zapewnienia klientom bezpiecznego środowiska. W środowisku monitoringu mediów najbardziej problematycznymi cechami do rozwiązania są: kwestie praw autorskich, spójność faktyczna, styl tekstu oraz normy etyczne w dziennikarstwie. W związku z tym głównym wkładem naszej obecnej pracy jest fakt, że wyżej wymienione cechy są z powodzeniem monitorowane w neuronowych modelach automatycznego podsumowywania i ulepszane za pomocą procedur walidacji, zachowania faktów i sprawdzania faktów.', 'mt': 'Id-dokument jiddeskrivi sistema għal sommarju awtomatiku fil-lingwa Ingliża tad-dejta tal-a ħbarijiet onlajn li ġejjin minn lingwi differenti mhux Ingliżi. Is-sistema hija ddisinjata biex tintuża fl-ambjent tal-produzzjoni għall-monitoraġġ tal-midja. Is-sommarju awtomatiku jista’ jkun utli ħafna f’dan il-qasam meta jiġi applikat bħala għodda ta’ għajnuna għall-ġurnalisti sabiex ikunu jistgħu jirrevedu biss l-informazzjoni importanti mill-kanali tal-a ħbarijiet. However, like every software solution, the automatic summarization needs performance monitoring and assured safe environment for the clients.  Fl-ambjent tal-monitoraġġ tal-midja l-aktar karatteristiċi problematiċi li għandhom jiġu indirizzati huma: il-kwistjonijiet tad-drittijiet tal-awtur, il-konsistenza fattwali, l-istil tat-test u n-normi etiċi fil-ġurnaliżmu. Għalhekk, il-kontribut ewlieni tax-xogħol preżenti tagħna huwa li l-karatteristiċi msemmija hawn fuq jiġu mmonitorjati b’suċċess f’mudelli ta’ sommarju awtomatiku newrali u mtejba bl-għajnuna ta’ proċeduri ta’ validazzjoni, preservazzjoni tal-fatti u verifika tal-fatti.', 'si': 'පත්තරේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා ඉංග්\u200dරියානු භාෂයේ ඉන්ග්\u200dරියාන් භාෂයේ අන්තර්ජා පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පද්ධතිය භාවිත කරන්න සැකසුම් කරනවා. ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සංවේදනය විතරයි මේ ඩොමේන් එකේ හොඳ උදව්වක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් ජාතිකයන්ට උදව්වක් විදියට ප නමුත්, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් විසරණය වගේ, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් සංවේදනය පරීක්ෂණය සහ සුරක්ෂිත වාතාවය මාධ්\u200dයමය පරීක්ෂණා වාතාවේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ: ප්\u200dරශ්නය අයිතිකාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඇත්ත සාමාන ඉතින්, අපේ දැන් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධානය තමයි උපරික්ෂණ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය සමහරවිට පරීක්ෂණය', 'sv': 'Uppsatsen beskriver ett system för automatisk sammanfattning på engelska av nyhetsdata på nätet som kommer från olika icke-engelska språk. Systemet är utformat för att användas i produktionsmiljö för medieövervakning. Automatisk sammanfattning kan vara till stor hjälp på denna domän när den används som hjälpverktyg för journalister så att de kan granska bara viktig information från nyhetskanalerna. Liksom alla programvarulösningar behöver dock den automatiska sammanfattningen prestandaövervakning och säker miljö för kunderna. I medieövervakningsmiljön är de mest problematiska aspekterna upphovsrättsfrågor, faktaunderstämmelsen, textens stil och de etiska normerna inom journalistiken. Därför är det viktigaste bidraget i vårt nuvarande arbete att ovan nämnda egenskaper framgångsrikt övervakas i neurala automatiska sammanfattningsmodeller och förbättras med hjälp av validering, faktabaserad och faktakontroll förfaranden.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் தன்னியக்கமாக சுருக்கத்தை ஆங்கிலம் மொழியில் விவரிக்கும் ஒரு அமைப்பை விவரிக்கும் பல மொழிகளில் இருந்து  ஊடக கண்காணிப்பதற்கான உருவாக்க சூழலில் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் அமைப்பு வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. @ info ஆயினும், ஒவ்வொரு மென்பொருள் தீர்வுப் போன்று, தானாகவே சுருக்கம் செய்தல் வாங்கியவர்களுக்கு செயல்பாடு நோட்டம்  ஊடகத்தை கண்காணிக்கும் சூழலில் மிகவும் சிக்கலான குணங்களை முகவரிக்க வேண்டும் என்பது: நகல் உரிமை பிரச்சனைகள், உண்மையான பொருத்தம், உரையின இப்போது எங்கள் தற்போதைய வேலையின் முக்கிய பங்கு என்னவென்றால் மேலே குறிப்பிட்ட செயல்கள் வெற்றிகரமாக கண்காணிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது புதிய சுருக்க முறைமை', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ نے انگلیسی زبان میں اپنا اولاین نیویٹ ڈائٹے کے لئے ایک سیسٹم کی توضیح دی ہے جو مختلف غیر انگلیسی زبانوں سے آتی ہے۔ سیسٹم کی طراحی کی گئی ہے کہ میڈیا موانٹر کے لئے پیدائش آنٹرنیٹ میں استعمال کیا جائے۔ جب مجلسوں کے لئے مددگار ابزار کے طور پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے تو یہ صرف اخبار چنال سے اہم معلومات کی روشن کر سکتے ہیں۔ However, like every software solution, the automatic summarization needs performance monitoring and assured safe environment for the clients. میڈیا موتور کی نظارت میں بہترین مشکلات کی تعریف یہ ہیں: کاپیرائیٹ کے مسئلہ، حقیقی تعریف، متن کی استیل اور روزنامی کے اخلاقی قوموں میں۔ اسی طرح، ہمارے اگلے کام کی اصلی حصہ یہ ہے کہ اوپر ذکر کیے ہوئے خصوصیات مفید طور پر نائرول آٹوٹی تعریف نمونڈل میں نظارت کی جاتی ہیں اور validation, fact-conservation اور fact-checking procedures کے مدد سے بہتر ہوتی ہیں.', 'so': 'Qoraalka warqaddu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaam lagu soo summariyo oo ku qoran afka Ingiriiska oo macluumaadka warbixinta internetka ah oo ka soo baxa luuqado aan Ingiriis ahayn. nidaamka waxaa lagu sameeyaa in lagu isticmaalo deegaanka soo saarista si ay u ilaaliso daryeelka media. Helitaanka iskaa ah oo aad u caawinaya marka ay macluumaadka muhiimka ah ee kanaalada warbixinta ka soo bandhigi karaan macluumaadka warbixinta. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, sida xafiiska software oo dhan macaamiisha waxaa u baahan in lagu ilaaliyo daryeelka bandhigyada iyo in lagu xaqiijiyo deegaanka ammaanka ah. Xiriirka ilaalinta macluumaadka waxaa loola macaamiloodaa arimaha dhibaatada ugu daran: arrimaha xuquuqda, dhaqdhaqaalaha runta ah, tababarka qoraalka iyo xeerarka asalka ah ee diiwaangelinta. Sidaa darteed shaqadeeda ugu horeeyaa waa in takhasuska hore ee la soo sheegay waxaa lagu liibaaniyaa sameynta qorsheynta naadiga oo bilowga ah iyo in lagu hagaajiyo caawimaadda xaqiijinta, ilaalinta xaqiiqnimada iyo baaritaanka xaqiiqda.', 'sr': 'U novinama opisuje sistem za automatski sažetak na engleskom jeziku podataka o novinama koji dolaze iz različitih ne-engleskih jezika. Sistem je dizajniran da se koristi u proizvodnjem okruženju za praćenje medija. Automatska sažetka može biti veoma korisna u ovom domenu kada se primjenjuje kao pomoæni alat za novinare tako da mogu pregledati samo važne informacije iz novinskih kanala. Međutim, kao i svako rešenje softvera, automatska sažetka treba pratiti provedbu i osigurati sigurno okruženje klijenata. U medijskom praćenju najproblematičnijih karakteristika koje treba rešiti su: pitanja autorskih prava, činjenična konsekvencija, stil teksta i etičke norme novinarstva. Stoga, glavni doprinos našeg sadašnjeg rada je da se navedene karakteristike uspešno prate u modelima neuralnog automatskog sažetanja i poboljšavaju pomoć procedura za validaciju, zaštitu činjenica i provjeru činjenica.', 'uz': 'Qogʻoz boshqa ingliz tildan keladigan tarjima haqida avtomatik tahrirlash tizimini anglatadi. Name @ info Lekin, har bir dastur muvaffaqiyatsiz kabi, avtomatik qisqaruv avtomatik tahrirlash uchun taʼminlovchi va xavfsiz muhitini tahrirlash kerak. In media monitoring environment the most problematic features to be addressed are: the copyright issues, the factual consistency, the style of the text and the ethical norms in journalism.  Bunday qilib, bizning joriy ishimizning asosiy qiziqaruvchisi, yuqorida taʼminlovchi xususiyatlarni neyralik avtomatik tahrirlash modelidagi muvaffaqiyatli monitorlanadi va tasdiqlash, haqiqiqiy saqlash va faktni tekshirish vazifalari yordamida bajarildi.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy mô tả một hệ thống cho việc tổng kết bằng tiếng Anh của các dữ liệu tin tức trực tuyến đến từ những ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Hệ thống được thiết kế để sử dụng trong môi trường sản xuất để theo dõi truyền thông. Việc tổng quát tự động có thể rất hữu ích trong lĩnh vực này khi được sử dụng như một công cụ trợ giúp cho các phóng viên, để họ có thể xem lại những thông tin quan trọng từ các kênh tin tức. Tuy nhiên, giống như mọi giải pháp phần mềm, việc tổng kết luận tự động cần kiểm soát hiệu suất và đảm bảo môi trường an toàn cho khách hàng. Trong môi trường giám sát truyền thông, những vấn đề khó khăn nhất cần giải quyết là: các vấn đề về tác quyền, sự tương đồng thực tế, phong cách của văn bản và các quy tắc đạo đức trong báo chí. Sự đóng góp chính trong công việc hiện tại của chúng ta là các đặc điểm được theo dõi thành công trong các mô hình tổng kết tự động thần kinh và được cải thiện nhờ sự xác thực và các thủ tục kiểm tra thực tế.', 'da': 'Artiklen beskriver et system til automatisk opsummering på engelsk af online nyhedsdata, der kommer fra forskellige ikke-engelske sprog. Systemet er designet til at blive brugt i produktionsmiljø til medieovervågning. Automatisk opsummering kan være meget nyttig på dette område, når det anvendes som et hjælpeværktøj til journalister, så de kan gennemgå blot de vigtige oplysninger fra nyhedskanalerne. Men ligesom alle softwareløsninger kræver den automatiske opsummering overvågning af ydeevnen og sikret sikkert miljø for kunderne. I medieovervågningsmiljøet er de mest problematiske træk, der skal løses, ophavsretsspørgsmålene, den faktiske konsistens, tekstens stil og de etiske normer i journalistik. Således er det vigtigste bidrag af vores nuværende arbejde, at ovennævnte karakteristika overvåges med succes i neurale automatiske opsummeringsmodeller og forbedres ved hjælp af validering, fact-bevaring og fact-kontrol procedurer.', 'bg': 'Статията описва система за автоматично обобщаване на английски език на онлайн новинарски данни, които идват от различни чужди езици. Системата е проектирана да се използва в производствена среда за мониторинг на медиите. Автоматичното обобщаване може да бъде много полезно в тази област, когато се прилага като помощен инструмент за журналисти, така че те да могат да прегледат само важната информация от новинарските канали. Въпреки това, както всяко софтуерно решение, автоматичното обобщаване се нуждае от мониторинг на производителността и гарантирана безопасна среда за клиентите. В средата за мониторинг на медиите най-проблемните особености, които трябва да бъдат разгледани, са: проблемите с авторското право, фактическата последователност, стилът на текста и етичните норми в журналистиката. По този начин основният принос на настоящата ни работа е, че горепосочените характеристики се наблюдават успешно в невронни автоматични модели за обобщаване и се подобряват с помощта на процедури за валидиране, запазване на фактите и проверка на фактите.', 'de': 'Der Beitrag beschreibt ein System zur automatischen Zusammenfassung von Online-Nachrichtendaten aus verschiedenen nicht-englischen Sprachen in englischer Sprache. Das System ist für den Einsatz in Produktionsumgebungen zur Medienüberwachung konzipiert. Die automatische Zusammenfassung kann in diesem Bereich sehr hilfreich sein, wenn sie als Hilfsmittel für Journalisten eingesetzt wird, um nur die wichtigen Informationen aus den Nachrichtenkanälen zu überprüfen. Wie jede Softwarelösung erfordert die automatische Zusammenfassung jedoch eine Leistungsüberwachung und eine sichere Umgebung für die Kunden. Im Medienmonitoringumfeld sind die problematischsten Aspekte: die Urheberrechtsfragen, die sachliche Konsistenz, der Stil des Textes und die ethischen Normen im Journalismus. Der Hauptbeitrag unserer vorliegenden Arbeit besteht daher darin, dass die oben genannten Merkmale erfolgreich in neuronalen automatischen Zusammenfassungsmodellen überwacht und mit Hilfe von Validierungs-, Faktenerhaltenden und Faktenchecking-Verfahren verbessert werden.', 'id': 'Kertas menggambarkan sistem untuk penghasilan otomatis dalam bahasa Inggris dari data berita online yang berasal dari bahasa yang berbeda bukan bahasa Inggris. The system is designed to be used in production environment for media monitoring.  Persingkatan otomatis dapat sangat membantu dalam domain ini ketika diterapkan sebagai alat bantuan untuk jurnalis sehingga mereka dapat merevisi hanya informasi penting dari saluran berita. Namun, seperti setiap solusi perangkat lunak, penghasilan otomatis membutuhkan pengawasan prestasi dan memastikan lingkungan aman untuk klien. Dalam lingkungan pemantauan media yang paling problematik yang harus diselesaikan adalah: masalah hak cipta, konsistensi fakta, gaya teks dan norma etik dalam jurnalisme. Jadi, kontribusi utama dari pekerjaan kita saat ini adalah bahwa karakteristik yang disebutkan di atas berhasil diawasi dalam model penglihatan otomatis saraf dan diperbaiki dengan bantuan validasi, pemeliharan fakta dan prosedur pemeriksaan fakta.', 'ko': '본고는 서로 다른 비영어 언어에서 온 온라인 뉴스 데이터를 영어로 자동으로 요약하는 온라인 뉴스 데이터 자동 요약 시스템을 묘사한다.이 시스템은 생산 환경에서의 미디어 모니터링에 사용되도록 설계되었다.자동 요약은 이 분야에서 매우 유용하다. 왜냐하면 기자들의 보조 도구로 뉴스 채널에서 온 중요한 정보만 볼 수 있기 때문이다.그러나 모든 소프트웨어 솔루션과 마찬가지로 자동 요약은 성능 모니터링과 고객에게 안전한 환경을 제공해야 한다.미디어 모니터링 환경에서 가장 해결해야 할 문제는 판권 문제, 사실의 일치성, 텍스트의 스타일과 뉴스 업계의 도덕 규범이다.따라서 우리가 현재 하고 있는 주요 공헌은 상술한 특징이 신경 자동 요약 모델에서 성공적으로 감시되고 검증, 사실 보존과 사실 검사 절차의 도움으로 개선되었다는 것이다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hilo linaelezea mfumo wa kutoa muhtasari wa kujitegemea kwa lugha ya Kiingereza ya taarifa za habari za mtandaoni zinazotoka katika lugha mbalimbali isiyo ya Kiingereza. Mfumo unaundwa kutumika katika mazingira ya uzalishaji kwa ajili ya kufuatilia vyombo vya habari. Ujumbe wa kujitegemea unaweza kuwa na ufanisi mkubwa katika eneo hili pale wanapomtumiwa kama zana ya msaidizi kwa waandishi wa habari ili waweze kufuatilia taarifa muhimu kutoka kwenye chaneli za habari. Hata hivyo, kama ilivyo kwa kila suluhisho la programu, upatikanaji wa muhtasari wa kujitegemea unahitaji ufuatiliaji wa ufuatiliaji na kuhakikisha mazingira salama kwa wateja. In media monitoring environment the most problematic features to be addressed are: the copyright issues, the factual consistency, the style of the text and the ethical norms in journalism.  Kwa hiyo, mchango mkuu wa kazi yetu kwa sasa ni kwamba takwimu hizo zilizotajwa hapo juu zinaweza kufuatiliwa kwa mafanikio katika mifano ya muhtasari wa kisasa na kuboreshwa kwa msaada wa kuthibitisha, kuhifadhia ukweli na utafiti wa ukweli.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz beýleki iňlis dilinden gelen haberler maglumatynyň Iňlis dilinden awtomatik taýýarlanmasy üçin sistemini tassyýar. Bu sistem medya gözetlemek üçin önüm çevresinde ullanılýar. Häzirki žurnalistler üçin ýardaşçy görkezilişinde awtomatik duşurmek bu domanda örän kömek edip biler bu ýerde. Olar täzelikler kanallardan möhüm maglumatlary bejerip bilerler. Ýöne, her softwaryň çözümi ýaly, awtomatik taýýarlama işlemçiliki gözlemäge gerek we müşterileriň howply baglanyşygyny ynamsal. Maglumaty gözlemäge çevresinde çözmeli iň kynçylykly özellikler şol bolýar: autortik meseleleri, faktal durumy, metin biçiminde we žurnalistiň etik normalary. Şol sebäpli, häzirki işimiziň esasy nusgasy şudyr ki, üstündeki çykyşlaryň üstüne näyral otomatik jemgyýet nusgasynda gözleýän we janlaşdyrylmagyň, fakty goramak we fakty barlamak prosedürleri bilen gowylaşdyrylýar.', 'nl': 'Het artikel beschrijft een systeem voor automatische samenvatting in de Engelse taal van online nieuwsgegevens die afkomstig zijn uit verschillende niet-Engelse talen. Het systeem is ontworpen voor gebruik in productieomgeving voor mediabewaking. Automatische samenvatting kan zeer nuttig zijn in dit domein wanneer toegepast als een helper tool voor journalisten, zodat ze alleen de belangrijke informatie van de nieuwskanalen kunnen bekijken. Echter, net als elke softwareoplossing, vereist de automatische samenvatting prestatiebewaking en een veilige omgeving voor de klanten. In de media monitoring omgeving zijn de meest problematische kenmerken: de auteursrechtelijke kwesties, de feitelijke consistentie, de stijl van de tekst en de ethische normen in de journalistiek. De belangrijkste bijdrage van ons huidige werk is dus dat de bovengenoemde kenmerken met succes worden gemonitord in neurale automatische samenvattingsmodellen en verbeterd met behulp van validatie, fact-conserving en fact-checking procedures.', 'sq': 'Gazeta përshkruan një sistem për përmbledhjen automatike në gjuhën angleze të të dhënave të lajmeve online që vijnë nga gjuhë të ndryshme jo-angleze. Sistemi është dizajnuar për të përdorur në mjedisin e prodhimit për mbikqyrjen e medias. Përshkrimi automatik mund të jetë shumë i dobishëm në këtë fushë kur aplikohet si një mjet ndihmës për gazetarët në mënyrë që ata të mund të shqyrtojnë vetëm informacionin e rëndësishëm nga kanalet e lajmeve. Megjithatë, si çdo zgjidhje programi, përmbledhja automatike ka nevojë për mbikqyrje të performancës dhe mjedis të sigurt për klientët. Në mjedisin e mbikqyrjes së medias karakteristikat më problematike që duhet trajtuar janë: çështjet e të drejtave të autorit, konsistenca faktike, stili i tekstit dhe normat etike në gazetari. Kështu, kontributi kryesor i punës sonë të tanishme është se karakteristikat e përmendura më lart janë mbikqyrur me sukses në modelet e përmbledhjes nervore automatike dhe përmirësuar me ndihmën e vlerësimit, ruajtjes së fakteve dhe procedurave të kontrollimit të fakteve.', 'af': "Die papier beskryf 'n stelsel vir outomatiese opsomming in Engels taal van online nuusdata wat van verskillende non- English taal kom. Die stelsel is ontwerp om gebruik te word in produksie omgewing vir media monitoring. Outomatiese opsomming kan baie nuttig wees in hierdie domein wanneer toewend word as 'n hulper nutsprogram vir journaliste sodat hulle net die belangrike inligting van die nuuskanale kan hersien. Maar soos elke sagteware oplossing, behoort die outomatiese opsomming van prestasie monitorering en seker veilige omgewing vir die kliënte. In media monitoring omgewing moet die mees problematiese eienskappe aangespreek word: die kopieregte, die faktiese konsistensie, die styl van die teks en die etiese norme in journalisme. Daarom, die hoofbydrang van ons huidige werk is dat die bo-mentioneerde karakteristieke suksesvol in neurale automatiese opsomming modele monitoreer word en met die hulp van geldigheid, feit-opserving en feit-opsomming prosedure verbeter is.", 'hr': 'U novinama opisuje sustav za automatsku sažetku na engleskom jeziku podataka o internetskim vijestima koji dolazi iz različitih ne-engleskih jezika. Sistem je dizajniran da se koristi u proizvodnjem okruženju za praćenje medija. Autonomska sažetka može biti vrlo korisna u ovom domenu kada se primjenjuje kao alat pomoći novinarima kako bi mogli pregledati samo važne informacije iz novinskih kanala. Međutim, kao i svako rješenje softvera, automatska sažetka treba pratiti provedbu i osigurati sigurno okruženje klijenata. U medijskom praćenju najproblematičnijih karakteristika koje treba riješiti su: pitanja autorskih prava, činjenična konsekvencija, stil teksta i etičke norme novinarstva. Stoga, glavni doprinos našeg sadašnjeg rada je da se navedene karakteristike uspješno prate u modelima neuralnog automatskog sažetka i poboljšavaju pomoći postupka potvrde, očuvanja činjenica i provjere činjenica.', 'az': 'Kağıt, müxtəlif dili olmayan İngilizə dilindən gələn online xəbərlər verilənlərin İngilizə dilində avtomatik təmizləmə sistemini təsbiq edir. Sistem mediya gözləməsi üçün təhsil çevresində istifadə edilmək üçün tasarlanmışdır. Yazılımlar üçün yardımçı vasitəsi olaraq istifadə edildiyi zaman bu domanda avtomatik təmizləmə çox faydalı olar ki, onlar haqq kanallarından möhüm məlumatları təmizləsinlər. Lakin, hər proqramma çətinlikləri kimi, avtomatik təmizlənməsi müşterilər üçün təhlükəsizlik və təhlükəsizlik təhlükəsizlik məlumatına ihtiyacı var. Mədyənin gözləmə çevresində ən problematik xüsusiyyətlər çəkiləcək məsələlərdir: copyright məsələlər, faktal konsistenci, mətnin stili və žurnalistikdə etik normlar. Beləliklə, bizim hüzurumuzdakı işimizin ən böyük səbəbi, yuxarıdaki xüsusiyyətlərin nöral avtomatik təmizləmə modellərində müvəffəqiyyətlə gözlənməsi və təsdiqlənməsi, fakt qoruması və fakt təsdiqlənməsi proseslərinin köməyi ilə yaxşılaşdırılması.', 'am': 'የፕሬዝዳንት መልዕክት ከልዩ ልዩ እንግሊዘኛ ቋንቋዎች የመጣውን የኢንጂልኛ ዜና ዳራዎችን በራሱ ማሳተርነት የሚያሳውቀው ሲስተም ይናገራል፡፡ ሲስተምሩ ለሚዲያ መስኮት ለመጠቀም የሚጠቀም ሆኗል፡፡ የዜና ቻይሎች የተጠቃሚ መረጃ ብቻ ለመመለስ ሲችሉ የጦማሪያዎች ረዳት መሆኑን በመጠቀም ጊዜ በዚህ ዶሜን ውስጥ እጅግ የሚጠቅመ ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን እንደ ሶፍትዌር ሁሉ መፍትሄ፣ የራሱ ማሳየት ለclients የድምፅ ማደናቂያ እና የደኅንነት አካባቢ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በአዲስ ሚዲያ ጉዳይ ውስጥ የሚጠይቁት የመከራ ምርጫዎች: የቅጂ መብት ጉዳዮች፣ እውነተኛው ውሳኔነት፣ የጽሑፉን ዓይነት እና የጦማሪክ ትክክል ትክክል ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም የአሁኑን ሥራችን ዋና ጥያቄ ነው፣ በላይኛው የተባለው የሥርዓት ምርጫዎች በናውሮው አውቶማቲካዊ አካባቢ እና በማስተካከል፣ እውነትን በመጠበቅ እና የእውነትን ማረጋገጫ ሥርዓት በመጠቀም የተሻሉ ናቸው፡፡', 'hy': 'Թղթին նկարագրում է անգլերենով ավտոմատիկ համառոտագրման համակարգը առցանց նորությունների տվյալների, որոնք տարբեր ոչ անգլերենով են գալիս: Այս համակարգը նախագծված է որպեսզի օգտագործվի արտադրողական միջավայրում լրատվամիջոցների մոնիտորների համար: Ավտոմատիկ համառոտագրությունը կարող է շատ օգտակար լինել այս ոլորտում, երբ կիրառվում է որպես լրագրողների օգնական գործիք, որպեսզի նրանք կարողանան վերանայել նորությունների կարևոր տեղեկատվությունը: Այնուամենայնիվ, ինչպես յուրաքանչյուր ծրագրային լուծում, ավտոմատիկ համառոտագրությունը հարկավոր է հաճախորդների գործողությունների վերահսկման և ապահով միջավայր: ԶԼՄ-ի մոնիտորների միջավայրում ամենախնդիրները, որոնք պետք է լուծվի, հետևյալն են՝ հեղինակային իրավունքների խնդիրները, փաստական համապատասխանությունը, տեքստի ոճը և լրագրության բարոյական նորմերը: Այսպիսով, մեր ներկայիս աշխատանքի հիմնական ներդրումն այն է, որ վերևում նշված հատկությունները հաջողությամբ վերահսկվում են նեյրոնային ավտոմատիկ համառոտագրման մոդելներում և բարելավվում են հավասարման, փաստերի պահպանության և փաստերի ստուգումների միջոցով:', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک سیستم برای جمع\u200cآوری خودکار در زبان انگلیسی از داده\u200cهای خبری آنلاین که از زبانهای غیر انگلیسی متفاوت آمده است توصیف می\u200cکند. سیستم طراحی شده تا در محیط تولید برای تماشا رسانه استفاده شود. جمع\u200cآوری خودکار در این دامنه می\u200cتواند در حالی که به عنوان ابزار کمک برای روزنامه\u200cکنندگان کاربرد می\u200cشود بسیار کمک کننده باشد تا بتوانند فقط اطلاعات مهم را از کانال\u200cهای خبری بررسی کنند. ولی مثل هر راه حل نرم\u200cافزار، جمع\u200cآوری اتوماتیک نیاز به مراقبت عملکرد و محیط امن برای مشتریان است. در محیط تماشاگر رسانه\u200cها بهترین ویژه\u200cهای مشکلی که باید دریافت شود اینه: مسائل copyright، هماهنگی حقیقی، طرح متن و نوشته\u200cهای اخلاقی در روزنامه است. بنابراین، رضایت اصلی کار ما این است که ویژگی های بالا در مدل\u200cهای جمع کردن عصبی موفق شده\u200cاند و با کمک تأیید، حفاظت حقیقت و بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cهای حقیقت بهتر شده\u200cاند.', 'bn': 'অনলাইন সংবাদ তথ্যের অনলাইন ভাষায় স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের একটি সিস্টেম বর্ণনা করেছে যা বিভিন্ মিডিয়া পর্যবেক্ষণের জন্য এই সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপ যখন সাংবাদিকদের সাহায্য হিসেবে প্রয়োগ করা হয়, তখন সংবাদ চ্যানেল থেকে গুরুত্ব তবে প্রত্যেক সফটওয়্যার সমাধানের মত, স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সংক্ষিপ্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত পর্যবেক্ষণ ও নিশ্চিত পরিব প্রচার মাধ্যম পরিবেশ পর্যবেক্ষণে সবচেয়ে সমস্যার বৈশিষ্ট্য হচ্ছে: কপিরাইট বিষয়গুলো, সত্যিকারের সাধারণ, লেখার ধরন এবং সাংবাদিকতার নৈতিক নীতি তাই আমাদের বর্তমান কাজের প্রধান অবদান হচ্ছে যে উপরের উল্লেখিত বৈশিষ্ট্য নিউরুল সংক্রান্ত মডেলে সফলভাবে পর্যবেক্ষণ করা হয়েছে এবং বৈধ, সত্য সংরক্ষণ এবং সত্য পর', 'ca': "El paper descriu un sistema de resum automàtic en anglès de dades de notícies en línia que provenen de diferents llengües no angleses. El sistema està dissenyat per a ser utilitzat en el medi de producció per a monitoritzar els mitjans. La resumida automàtica pot ser molt útil en aquest domini quan s'aplica com una eina d'ajuda per als periodistes per poder revisar només la informació important dels canals de notícies. Tot i així, com cada solució de software, la resumida automàtica necessita un seguiment del rendiment i un entorn segur per als clients. En el medi de monitorització, les característiques més problemàtiques que s'han de abordar són: els problemes dels drets d'autor, la consistencia factual, l'estil del text i les normes ètiques del periodisme. Així doncs, la principal contribució de la nostra feina actual és que les característiques mencionades són monitoritzats amb èxit en models de resum neural automàtic i millorats amb l'ajuda de procediments de validació, conservació de fets i verificació de fets.", 'et': 'Töös kirjeldatakse süsteemi automaatseks kokkuvõtmiseks inglise keeles erinevatest mitte-inglise keeltest pärinevate online-uudiste andmete kohta. Süsteem on mõeldud kasutamiseks tootmiskeskkonnas meedia jälgimiseks. Automaatne kokkuvõte võib selles valdkonnas olla väga kasulik, kui seda rakendatakse ajakirjanike abivahendina, et nad saaksid vaadata üle ainult olulise teabe uudistekanalitest. Samas, nagu iga tarkvaralahendus, vajab automaatne kokkuvõte jõudluse jälgimist ja klientidele turvalist keskkonda. Meediaseire keskkonnas tuleb kõige probleemsemaks käsitleda autoriõiguse küsimusi, faktilist järjepidevust, teksti stiili ja ajakirjanduse eetilisi norme. Seega on meie käesoleva töö peamine panus selles, et eespool nimetatud omadusi jälgitakse edukalt neuroautomaatsetes kokkuvõtlusmudelites ja parandatakse valideerimise, faktide säilitamise ja faktide kontrollimise protseduuride abil.', 'cs': 'Příspěvek popisuje systém automatického shrnutí dat online zpravodajství pocházejících z různých neanglických jazyků v anglickém jazyce. Systém je určen pro použití ve výrobním prostředí pro monitorování médií. Automatické shrnutí může být v této oblasti velmi užitečné, pokud je aplikováno jako pomocný nástroj pro novináře, aby mohli přezkoumat jen důležité informace ze zpravodajských kanálů. Nicméně, stejně jako každé softwarové řešení, automatické shrnutí vyžaduje monitorování výkonu a zajištění bezpečného prostředí pro klienty. V prostředí monitoringu médií jsou nejvíce problematické rysy, které je třeba řešit: otázky autorských práv, faktická konzistence, styl textu a etické normy v žurnalistice. Hlavním přínosem naší práce je tedy, že výše uvedené charakteristiky jsou úspěšně monitorovány v neuronových automatických souhrnných modelech a zlepšovány pomocí validačních, faktových a faktových kontrolních postupů.', 'fi': 'Artikkeli kuvaa järjestelmää, jolla eri kieliltä tulevien uutisten automaattista yhteenvetoa englannin kielellä voidaan tehdä. Järjestelmä on suunniteltu käytettäväksi tuotantoympäristössä median seurantaan. Automaattinen yhteenveto voi olla erittäin hyödyllistä tällä alalla, kun sitä käytetään apuvälineenä toimittajille, jotta he voivat tarkastella vain tärkeitä tietoja uutiskanavista. Kuitenkin, kuten jokainen ohjelmistoratkaisu, automaattinen yhteenveto tarvitsee suorituskyvyn seurantaa ja taattu turvallinen ympäristö asiakkaille. Mediamonitorointiympäristössä ongelmallisimpia tekijöitä ovat tekijänoikeuskysymykset, faktojen johdonmukaisuus, tekstin tyyli ja journalismin eettiset normit. Tämän työn tärkein panos on, että edellä mainittuja ominaisuuksia seurataan menestyksekkäästi neuroautomaattisissa yhteenvetomalleissa ja parannetaan validointi-, faktojen säilyttämis- ja faktojen tarkistusmenetelmien avulla.', 'bs': 'U novinama opisuje sistem za automatsku sažetku na engleskom jeziku podataka o novinama koji dolaze iz različitih ne-engleskih jezika. Sistem je dizajniran da se koristi u proizvodnjoj okolini za praćenje medija. Automatska sažetka može biti vrlo korisna u ovom domenu kada se primjenjuje kao alat pomoći novinarima tako da mogu pregledati samo važne informacije iz novinskih kanala. Međutim, kao i svako rješenje softvera, automatska sažetka treba pratiti provedbu i osigurati sigurno okruženje klijenata. U okruženju praćenja medija najproblematičnije je rešenje: pitanja autorskih prava, činjenična konsekvencija, stil teksta i etičkih norma novinarstva. Stoga, glavni doprinos našeg sadašnjeg rada je da se navedene karakteristike uspješno prate u modelima neuralnog automatskog sažetka i poboljšavaju pomoći procedura za validaciju, zaštitu činjenica i provjeru činjenica.', 'jv': 'Perintah bener tentang sistem kanggo nggawe resmi awon kanggo langgambar ingkang data online sing dumateng sak idiomatan sing sampeyan Inggris. Sistem kang disenyari kanggo kelangan penggunaké kanggo mbanjurasi media Sampeyan automatically Soalé, kaya saben mbukak perangkat-sistem, akeh sampek automatik kudu ngubah mulasar kanggo ngilangno sistêm sing ora keamanan kanggo ngilangno bantên Nang media ngubungke peringatan langkung wigatining perbudhakan langkung wigatining ketahan karo hal dikenakno sing diradiradirakno: kesempatan Copyright, nguasai perusahaan, Ndeleng kotak lan nglanga etik kanggo Peringatan Punika, akeh pengguna nggawe lan uwis saiki, akeh dumadhi kanggo ngerasah cara-cara sing nguasai iki ning ngerasah maneh da bisa nguasai perusahaan Neral Automatik sing bisa bantuan karo hal dadi nggunakake kapan, iso nguasai nggunakake karo perusahaan langgar.', 'ha': "Kanjanas na bayyana wani na'ura wa kurarin farat ɗaya cikin harshen Ingiriya na data na masu bastarwa na ɗabi'a da ke zo daga harshen Ingiriya daban-daban. An ƙayyade system don a yi amfani da shi cikin mazaɓa wa tsarin media. Kurarin farat ɗaya, za'a iya amfani da shi cikin wannan wuri idan an applet shi kamar wani zane mai taimako wa journalisin, dõmin su iya iya canza bayani kawai da yanzu muhimu daga kanal na lãbãri. However, like every software solution, the automatic summarization needs performance monitoring and assured safe environment for the clients.  A cikin muhallin manyan mutane da za'a tambaye su masu haske mafi tsananin matsayi sune: masu motsi na rubutu, da gaskiyar consinci, salin matsayi da shiryoyin littafa cikin jaruni. Kayyarin aikin da ke kai yanzu ni'a, an sami mafiya babban tsari a cikin misãlai na tsurare farat ɗaya kuma aka kyautata game da taimakon masu tsari, tsari da kuma checking fakti.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem za avtomatsko povzemanje podatkov o spletnih novicah, ki prihajajo iz različnih ne-angleških jezikov, v angleškem jeziku. Sistem je zasnovan za uporabo v proizvodnem okolju za spremljanje medijev. Samodejno povzemanje je lahko zelo koristno na tem področju, če se uporablja kot pomočno orodje za novinarje, tako da lahko pregledajo samo pomembne informacije iz novinarskih kanalov. Vendar pa tako kot vsaka programska rešitev potrebuje samodejno povzemanje delovanja in zagotovljeno varno okolje za stranke. V okolju medijskega spremljanja so najbolj problematične lastnosti, ki jih je treba obravnavati: vprašanja avtorskih pravic, skladnost dejstev, slog besedila in etične norme v novinarstvu. Glavni prispevek našega dela je, da se zgoraj omenjene značilnosti uspešno spremljajo v modelih nevronske avtomatske povzetke in izboljšujejo s pomočjo postopkov validacije, ohranjanja dejstev in preverjanja dejstev.', 'he': 'העיתון מתאר מערכת לסיוריזציה אוטומטית בשפה אנגלית של מידע חדשות באינטרנט שמגיע משפות שונות לא אנגליות. The system is designed to be used in production environment for media monitoring.  הסכם אוטומטי יכול להיות מאוד מועיל בתחום הזה כאשר תופע ככלי עוזר לעיתונאים כדי שהם יכולים לבדוק רק את המידע החשוב מערוצי החדשות. בכל אופן, כמו כל פתרון תוכנה, הסכם האוטומטי זקוק למעקב ביצועים ומבטיח סביבה בטוחה ללקוחות. בסביבה של מעקב התקשורת, הפרטים הבעיתיים ביותר שיש להתמודד איתם הם: בעיות זכויות עובד, התקבלות העובדית, הסגנון של הטקסט והנורמות האתיות בעיתונאות. ככה, התרומה העיקרית של העבודה הנוכחית שלנו היא שהאופיינים הנזכרים על-ידי נמצאים בהצלחה במודלים של סאמריזציה אוטומטית עצבית ושתפרו בעזרת הליך האישור, שמירת עובדות ובדיקות עובדות.', 'bo': 'ཤོག མ་ལག་འདི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ལྟ་རྟོག་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་སྒྲ་བརྙན་ཕྱོགས་ནང་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་དགོས་པ རང་འགུལ ཡིན་ནའང་མཉེན སྒྲ་བརྙན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་སྟངས་ནང་དུ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བའི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་མཁན་དག་གཙོ་བོ་འདྲ་ཡིན། པར་དབང་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་གནས་ཚུལ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་ད་ལྟ་ཀློག་གི་རྩ་བའི་གོ་སྐབས་ནི་ཐོག་མའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཐོག་ལས་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད་པའི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་སྟངས་ལ་རྗེས་བྱེད་སྟངས་ནང་གི་'}
{'en': 'Improving Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction with Self-Ensemble Noise Filtering', 'ar': 'تحسين استخراج العلاقة الخاضع للإشراف عن بُعد باستخدام فلترة ضوضاء المجموعة الذاتية', 'pt': 'Melhorando a Extração de Relação Supervisionada à Distância com Filtragem de Ruído de Autoconjunto', 'es': 'Mejora de la extracción de relaciones supervisadas a distancia con filtrado de ruido de autoensamblaje', 'fr': "Amélioration de l'extraction de relations supervisée à distance grâce au filtrage du bruit auto-ensemble", 'ja': '自己組織化ノイズフィルタリングによる遠隔監視下の関係抽出の改善', 'hi': 'स्व-Ensemble शोर फ़िल्टरिंग के साथ दूर पर्यवेक्षित संबंध निष्कर्षण में सुधार', 'zh': '因自集成噪声滤波更进远督提取', 'ru': 'Улучшение дистанционно контролируемой экстракции отношений с самоустанавливающейся шумовой фильтрацией', 'ga': 'Eastóscadh Caidrimh Faoi Mhaoirseacht a Fheabhsú le Scagadh Torainn Féin-Ensemble', 'hu': 'A távolról felügyelt kapcsolatok kivonásának javítása önegységes zajszűréssel', 'el': 'Βελτίωση εξ αποστάσεως εποπτευόμενης εξαγωγής σχέσεων με φιλτραρίσματος θορύβου αυτοσυγκροτημάτων', 'kk': 'Өзіңізге жетілдірілген дыбыс сүзгісімен қатынасын қашықтық қатынас тарқатуын жақсарту', 'it': "Migliorare l'estrazione di relazioni supervisionate a distanza con il filtro del rumore auto-insieme", 'lt': 'gerinti nuotoliniu būdu kontroliuojamų santykių ekstrakciją su savarankišku triukšmo filtravimu', 'ms': 'Improving Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction with Self-Ensemble Noise Filtering', 'ka': 'სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა', 'mk': 'Подобрување на оддалечено надгледуваната екстракција на односите со самоосигурувачко филтрирање на бучава', 'ml': 'സ്വയം അസാധാരണമില്ലാത്ത നോസ് ഫില്\u200dറ്റര്\u200dടിങ്ങുമായി സ്വയം പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെട്ട ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന', 'no': 'Å forbetra ekstraksjon av avstanden overvåka relasjonar med filteret med sjølvutvida støy', 'mt': 'It-titjib tal-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni sorveljata mill-bogħod permezz tal-filtrazzjoni tal-istorbju li tinġabar lilu nnifsu', 'mn': 'Өөрийгөө хүлээн зөвшөөрөх үнсэлтэй хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай сайжруулах', 'pl': 'Poprawa ekstrakcji relacji z nadzorem na odległość dzięki filtrowaniu szumów Self-Ensemble', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea extracției relațiilor supravegheate la distanță cu filtrarea zgomotului auto-ansamblu', 'sv': 'Förbättra avlägset övervakad relationsextraktion med brusfiltrering med självensemble', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Horumarinta ka soo saarista xiriirka la xiriira jimicsiga', 'ta': 'தானாகவே பார்க்கப்பட்ட தொடர்பு பிரித்தெடுப்பு மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டது தன்னியக்க ஒளி வடிகட்டியுடன்', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje izvlačenja udaljenog nadzornog odnosa sa filtriranjem samoušivog glasa', 'ur': 'دور نظارت والی رابطہ اٹھانے کے ساتھ اضافہ کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng cường độ phân phối cách xa với bộ lọc nhiễu', 'bg': 'Подобряване на дистанционно контролираното извличане на отношенията с филтриране на шума от самосъстав', 'da': 'Forbedring af fjernovervåget relationsudvinding med selvstændig støjfiltrering', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje izvlačenja udaljenog nadziranog odnosa sa filtriranjem vlastitog glasa', 'nl': 'Verbetering van op afstand begeleide relatieontwikkeling met Self-Ensemble Noise Filtering', 'de': 'Verbesserung der Fernüberwachten Beziehungsextraktion mit Self-Ensemble Noise Filtering', 'id': 'Menembangkan Ekstraksi Hubungan DiSupervisi Jauh Dengan Penapis Suara Ditunjukkan Sendiri', 'fa': 'بهتر کردن اخراج رابطه\u200cهای مراقبت دور با پالایه صوتی خودش', 'ko': '자체 집적 잡음 필터로 원격 감독 관계 추출 개선', 'af': 'Verbeter afstand ondersoekte verhouding uitpak met Self- Ensembleerde Styl Filtering', 'am': 'undo-type', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Kujitolewa kwa Kuhusiana na Uchaguzi wa Noa linaloweza kujitegemea', 'tr': 'Öz Ululyk Sesli Hatlary bilen Gaýd Edilýär', 'hy': 'Հեռու վերահսկվող հարաբերությունների արտադրման բարելավումը ինքնազգալի աղմուկի ֆիլտրման միջոցով', 'sq': 'Duke përmirësuar ekstraksionin e marrëdhënieve të mbikqyrura nga larg me filtrimin e zhurmës të vetë-sigurueshme', 'az': '√Ėz-geniŇül…ôndiril…ôn s…ôs filtrl…ôyicisi il…ô uzaqlaŇüdńĪrńĪlmńĪŇü ńįliŇükil…ôri ∆Źlav…ô Et', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নোস ফিল্টারিং দ্বারা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সম্পর্ক এক্সট্র্যাক্ট্র', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje izvlačenja udaljenog nadzornog odnosa sa filtriranjem vlastitog glasa', 'ca': "Mellorar l'extracció de relacions remotament supervisades amb filtrar ruïu autoassegurable", 'et': 'Kaugjärelevalvega seotud suhete eemaldamise parandamine isekompleksseeruva müra filtreerimisega', 'cs': 'Zlepšení extrakce vztahů s dálkovým dohledem pomocí filtrování šumu Self-Ensemble', 'fi': 'Kaukana valvotun suhteen poiston parantaminen itsemuodostuvalla melusuodatuksella', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah Njupuk Bawih-Ngerawat Distant', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje odstranjevanja odnosov z daljnim nadzorom s filtriranjem hrupa', 'he': 'שיפור מחלקת מערכת יחסים משומרת מרחק עם מסנן רעש בעצמו', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཕན་ཚུན་བལྟས་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཕྱིར་འདྲེན་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Distantly supervised models are very popular for relation extraction since we can obtain a large amount of training data using the distant supervision method without human annotation. In distant supervision, a sentence is considered as a source of a tuple if the sentence contains both entities of the tuple. However, this condition is too permissive and does not guarantee the presence of relevant relation-specific information in the sentence. As such, distantly supervised training data contains much noise which adversely affects the performance of the models. In this paper, we propose a self-ensemble filtering mechanism to filter out the noisy samples during the training process. We evaluate our proposed framework on the New York Times dataset which is obtained via distant supervision. Our experiments with multiple state-of-the-art neural relation extraction models show that our proposed filtering mechanism improves the robustness of the models and increases their F1 scores.', 'es': 'Los modelos supervisados a distancia son muy populares para la extracción de relaciones, ya que podemos obtener una gran cantidad de datos de entrenamiento utilizando el método de supervisión a distancia sin anotación humana. En la supervisión a distancia, una oración se considera fuente de una tupla si la oración contiene ambas entidades de la tupla. Sin embargo, esta condición es demasiado permisiva y no garantiza la presencia de información relevante específica de la relación en la oración. Como tal, los datos de entrenamiento supervisados a distancia contienen mucho ruido que afecta negativamente al rendimiento de los modelos. En este artículo, proponemos un mecanismo de filtrado de autoensamblaje para filtrar las muestras ruidosas durante el proceso de capacitación. Evaluamos nuestro marco propuesto en el conjunto de datos del New York Times, que se obtiene mediante supervisión a distancia. Nuestros experimentos con múltiples modelos de extracción de relaciones neuronales de última generación muestran que nuestro mecanismo de filtrado propuesto mejora la robustez de los modelos y aumenta sus puntuaciones F1.', 'fr': "Les modèles supervisés à distance sont très populaires pour l'extraction de relations, car nous pouvons obtenir une grande quantité de données d'entraînement en utilisant la méthode de supervision à distance sans annotation humaine. Dans la surveillance à distance, une phrase est considérée comme la source d'un tuple si la phrase contient les deux entités du tuple. Cependant, cette condition est trop permissive et ne garantit pas la présence d'informations pertinentes spécifiques à la relation dans la phrase. En tant que telles, les données d'entraînement supervisées à distance contiennent beaucoup de bruit, ce qui nuit aux performances des modèles. Dans cet article, nous proposons un mécanisme de filtrage auto-ensemble pour filtrer les échantillons bruyants pendant le processus d'apprentissage. Nous évaluons le cadre proposé sur le jeu de données du New York Times qui est obtenu par supervision à distance. Nos expériences avec plusieurs modèles d'extraction de relations neuronales de pointe montrent que le mécanisme de filtrage que nous proposons améliore la robustesse des modèles et augmente leurs scores F1.", 'pt': 'Modelos supervisionados à distância são muito populares para extração de relações, pois podemos obter uma grande quantidade de dados de treinamento usando o método de supervisão à distância sem anotação humana. Na supervisão à distância, uma sentença é considerada como fonte de uma tupla se a sentença contiver ambas as entidades da tupla. No entanto, essa condição é muito permissiva e não garante a presença de informações relevantes específicas da relação na sentença. Como tal, os dados de treinamento supervisionados à distância contêm muito ruído que afeta negativamente o desempenho dos modelos. Neste artigo, propomos um mecanismo de filtragem de auto-conjunto para filtrar as amostras ruidosas durante o processo de treinamento. Avaliamos nossa estrutura proposta no conjunto de dados do New York Times que é obtido por meio de supervisão à distância. Nossos experimentos com vários modelos de extração de relações neurais de última geração mostram que nosso mecanismo de filtragem proposto melhora a robustez dos modelos e aumenta suas pontuações F1.', 'ar': 'تحظى النماذج الخاضعة للإشراف عن بُعد بشعبية كبيرة لاستخراج العلاقة حيث يمكننا الحصول على كمية كبيرة من بيانات التدريب باستخدام طريقة الإشراف عن بُعد بدون تعليق توضيحي بشري. في الإشراف البعيد ، تُعتبر الجملة مصدرًا لـ tuple إذا كانت الجملة تحتوي على كلا الكيانين في المجموعة. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذا الشرط متساهل للغاية ولا يضمن وجود معلومات خاصة بالعلاقة ذات الصلة في الجملة. على هذا النحو ، تحتوي بيانات التدريب التي يتم الإشراف عليها عن بُعد على الكثير من الضوضاء التي تؤثر سلبًا على أداء النماذج. في هذا البحث ، نقترح آلية تصفية ذاتية التجميع لتصفية العينات الصاخبة أثناء عملية التدريب. نقوم بتقييم إطار العمل المقترح الخاص بنا على مجموعة بيانات New York Times والتي يتم الحصول عليها من خلال الإشراف عن بعد. تُظهر تجاربنا مع العديد من نماذج استخراج العلاقات العصبية الحديثة أن آلية التصفية المقترحة لدينا تعمل على تحسين متانة النماذج وتزيد من درجاتها في F1.', 'ja': '遠隔監視モデルは、人間の注釈なしに遠隔監視法を使用して大量のトレーニングデータを得ることができるため、関係抽出に非常に人気があります。遠隔監督では、文がタプルの両方のエンティティを含む場合、文はタプルのソースと見なされる。ただし、この条件はあまりにも許容性があり、文に関連する関係固有の情報が存在することを保証するものではありません。したがって、遠隔監視されたトレーニングデータには、モデルのパフォーマンスに悪影響を及ぼす多くのノイズが含まれています。本稿では，訓練過程において雑音の多い試料をフィルタリングするための自己組織化フィルタリング機構を提案する．私たちは、ニューヨーク・タイムズのデータセットで提案されたフレームワークを評価します。このフレームワークは、遠隔監督を介して入手されます。複数の最先端の神経関係抽出モデルの実験では、提案されたフィルタリングメカニズムがモデルの堅牢性を向上させ、F 1スコアを増加させることが示されています。', 'zh': '远督模则流行,以可用远程督数,无待人工注也。 远程监中,句含元组二体,则句视为元组源。 然此太宽,不能保句之特定信也。 是以远程督数多噪声,则对模型性不利矣。 本文自集成滤波机制,以漉训练之噪声样本。 臣等于《纽约时报》数据集上估其框架,当数集是以远程监之。 先进之神经取模之实验,言过制以重其鲁棒性,而增其F1分。', 'hi': 'दूर से पर्यवेक्षित मॉडल संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए बहुत लोकप्रिय हैं क्योंकि हम मानव एनोटेशन के बिना दूर के पर्यवेक्षण विधि का उपयोग करके बड़ी मात्रा में प्रशिक्षण डेटा प्राप्त कर सकते हैं। दूर के पर्यवेक्षण में, एक वाक्य को टपल के स्रोत के रूप में माना जाता है यदि वाक्य में ट्यूपल की दोनों संस्थाएं होती हैं। हालांकि, यह स्थिति बहुत अनुमोदित है और वाक्य में प्रासंगिक संबंध-विशिष्ट जानकारी की उपस्थिति की गारंटी नहीं देती है। इस प्रकार, दूर से पर्यवेक्षित प्रशिक्षण डेटा में बहुत शोर होता है जो मॉडल के प्रदर्शन को प्रतिकूल रूप से प्रभावित करता है। इस पेपर में, हम प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया के दौरान शोर नमूनों को फ़िल्टर करने के लिए एक स्व-पहनावा फ़िल्टरिंग तंत्र का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम न्यूयॉर्क टाइम्स डेटासेट पर हमारे प्रस्तावित ढांचे का मूल्यांकन करते हैं जो दूर के पर्यवेक्षण के माध्यम से प्राप्त किया जाता है। कई अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका संबंध निष्कर्षण मॉडल के साथ हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा प्रस्तावित फ़िल्टरिंग तंत्र मॉडल की मजबूती में सुधार करता है और उनके एफ 1 स्कोर को बढ़ाता है।', 'ru': 'Модели с дистанционным контролем очень популярны для извлечения отношений, так как мы можем получить большой объем обучающих данных с помощью метода дистанционного контроля без человеческой аннотации. При дистанционном надзоре приговор считается источником кортежа, если в нем содержатся обе части кортежа. Однако это условие является слишком разрешительным и не гарантирует наличие в предложении соответствующей информации, относящейся к конкретным отношениям. Таким образом, данные дистанционного обучения содержат много шума, который отрицательно влияет на производительность моделей. В данной работе мы предлагаем самосборный фильтрующий механизм для фильтрации шумных образцов в процессе обучения. Мы оцениваем предлагаемую нами структуру на основе набора данных New York Times, который получается в результате дистанционного наблюдения. Наши эксперименты с множеством современных моделей извлечения нейронных отношений показывают, что предлагаемый нами механизм фильтрации улучшает устойчивость моделей и увеличивает их баллы F1.', 'ga': 'Tá an-tóir ar shamhlacha a ndéantar cian-mhaoirseacht orthu maidir le heastóscadh gaol toisc gur féidir linn cuid mhór sonraí oiliúna a fháil ag baint úsáide as an modh maoirseachta i bhfad i gcéin gan nótaí daonna. I gcéin mhaoirseacht, meastar abairt mar fhoinse tuple má tá an dá aonán den tuple san abairt. Mar sin féin, tá an coinníoll seo ró-cheadaitheach agus ní ráthaíonn sé go bhfuil faisnéis ábhartha a bhaineann go sonrach leis san abairt. Mar sin, tá go leor torainn i sonraí oiliúna a ndéantar maoirsiú cianda orthu, rud a chuireann isteach go diúltach ar fheidhmíocht na múnlaí. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid meicníocht scagtha féin-ensemble chun na samplaí torannacha a scagadh amach le linn an phróisis oiliúna. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar ár gcreat molta ar thacar sonraí an New York Times a fhaightear trí chianmhaoirseacht. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh ar mhúnlaí iolracha eastósctha caidrimh néaraigh den scoth go bhfeabhsaíonn ár meicníocht scagtha molta stóinseacht na múnlaí agus go méadaítear a gcuid scóir F1.', 'hu': 'A távolról felügyelt modellek nagyon népszerűek a kapcsolatok kivonásához, mivel nagy mennyiségű képzési adatot tudunk beszerezni a távoli felügyeleti módszerrel emberi jegyzetek nélkül. Távoli felügyeletben egy mondat akkor tekinthető tuple forrásának, ha a mondat tartalmazza a tuple mindkét entitását. Ez a feltétel azonban túlságosan engedélyező, és nem garantálja a vonatkozó kapcsolatspecifikus információk jelenlétét a mondatban. Ezért a távolról felügyelt edzési adatok sok zajt tartalmaznak, ami hátrányosan befolyásolja a modellek teljesítményét. Ebben a tanulmányban egy önösszeállító szűrőmechanizmust javasolunk a zajos minták kiszűrésére az edzési folyamat során. Értékeljük javasolt keretrendszerünket a New York Times adatkészletre, amelyet távoli felügyelet útján kapunk. Több korszerű neurális kapcsolat extrakciós modellel végzett kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy javasolt szűrőmechanizmusunk javítja a modellek robusztusságát és növeli F1 pontszámaikat.', 'el': 'Τα εξ αποστάσεως εποπτευόμενα μοντέλα είναι πολύ δημοφιλή για την εξαγωγή σχέσεων δεδομένου ότι μπορούμε να λάβουμε ένα μεγάλο ποσό δεδομένων κατάρτισης χρησιμοποιώντας τη μέθοδο απομακρυσμένης επίβλεψης χωρίς ανθρώπινη σημείωση. Σε απομακρυσμένη εποπτεία, μια πρόταση θεωρείται ως πηγή ενός διπλώματος εάν η πρόταση περιέχει και τις δύο οντότητες του διπλώματος. Ωστόσο, ο όρος αυτός είναι υπερβολικά επιτρεπτός και δεν εγγυάται την παρουσία σχετικών πληροφοριών σχετικά με τη σχέση στην πρόταση. Ως εκ τούτου, τα εξ αποστάσεως εποπτευόμενα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης περιέχουν πολύ θόρυβο που επηρεάζει αρνητικά την απόδοση των μοντέλων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε έναν αυτο-σύνολο μηχανισμό φιλτραρίσματος για να φιλτράρετε έξω τα θορυβώδη δείγματα κατά τη διάρκεια της διαδικασίας εκπαίδευσης. Αξιολογούμε το προτεινόμενο πλαίσιο για το σύνολο δεδομένων των New York Times, το οποίο λαμβάνεται μέσω μακρινής εποπτείας. Τα πειράματά μας με πολλαπλά σύγχρονα μοντέλα εξαγωγής νευρωνικών σχέσεων δείχνουν ότι ο προτεινόμενος μηχανισμός φιλτραρίσματος βελτιώνει την ανθεκτικότητα των μοντέλων και αυξάνει τις βαθμολογίες τους.', 'ka': 'განმავლობით დანახვა მოდელები ძალიან პოლუბურია პრობლურია პრობლურია პრობლექციისთვის, რადგან ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავიღოთ დიდი განმავლობის მონაცემები, რომელიც ად მარტივი მონახვედში, სიტყვა აღმოჩნდება როგორც წიგნის გამოიყენება თუ სიტყვა არსებობს ორივე წიგნის შესახებ. მაგრამ ეს შესახებ ძალიან დარწმუნებელია და არ დარწმუნება შესახებ სპეციფიკალური შესახებ ინფორმაციაში. როგორც ასეთი, განმავლობაში განმავლობაში მონაცემების მონაცემები მნიშვნელოვანია, რომელიც მოდელების გამოცემების შესაძლებლობას განმავლობაში უფრო ძალია ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდომა საქმენტის ფილტრების მექანსი, რომელიც საქმენო პროცესის განმავლობაში უფრო ძალიან გამოყენება. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ჩვენი პროგრამეტს ნუ იორკრაიმს მონაცემების სახელსაწყოთან, რომელიც გაიღება განმავლობით. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები, რამდენიმე მნიშვნელოვანი ნეიროლური შესახებ ექსპექციის მოდელებით, ჩვენი მინდა ფილტრინური მექანსი მოდელების ძალიან უფრო მეტივად და ჩვენი F1 მოდელები', 'it': "I modelli supervisionati a distanza sono molto popolari per l'estrazione delle relazioni poiché possiamo ottenere una grande quantità di dati di allenamento utilizzando il metodo di supervisione a distanza senza annotazioni umane. Nella supervisione a distanza, una frase è considerata come fonte di una tupla se la frase contiene entrambe le entità della tupla. Tuttavia, questa condizione è troppo permissiva e non garantisce la presenza di informazioni pertinenti specifiche per relazione nella frase. Pertanto, i dati di allenamento controllati a distanza contengono molto rumore che influisce negativamente sulle prestazioni dei modelli. In questo articolo, proponiamo un meccanismo di filtraggio auto-ensemble per filtrare i campioni rumorosi durante il processo di allenamento. Valutiamo il nostro framework proposto sul set di dati del New York Times ottenuto tramite supervisione a distanza. I nostri esperimenti con più modelli di estrazione delle relazioni neurali all'avanguardia mostrano che il nostro meccanismo di filtraggio proposto migliora la robustezza dei modelli e aumenta i loro punteggi F1.", 'lt': 'Nuotoliniu mastu prižiūrimi modeliai yra labai populiarūs santykių išgavimui, nes mes galime gauti daug mokymo duomenų naudojant nuotolinio stebėjimo metodą be žmogaus anotacijos. Nuotolinės priežiūros atveju sakinys laikomas dvigubo dydžio šaltiniu, jei sakinyje yra abu dvigubo dydžio subjektai. Tačiau ši sąlyga yra pernelyg leistina ir neužtikrina atitinkamos santykiams skirtos informacijos pateikimo sakinyje. Taigi toli prižiūrimi mokymo duomenys apima daug triukšmo, kuris neigiamai veikia modelių veiksmingumą. Šiame dokumente siūlome savarankišką filtravimo mechanizmą, skirtą triukšmingiems mėginiams filtruoti mokymo proceso metu. Vertiname savo siūlomą sistemą dėl Niujorko laikraščio duomenų rinkinio, kuris gaunamas nuotolinės priežiūros būdu. Mūsų eksperimentai su įvairiais naujausiais nervinių santykių ekstrahavimo modeliais rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas filtravimo mechanizmas gerina modelių patikimumą ir didina jų F1 rezultatus.', 'kk': 'Қашықтан бақылау үлгілері қатынас тарқату үшін әдемі, өйткені біз адамдардың белгісіз қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы бақылау әдісін қолдануға арналған көп бөлікті деректер Қашықтағы қарау үшін, мәлімет тұптың екі нысандары болса, тұптың көзі ретінде сұралады. Бірақ бұл шарт қатты рұқсат етпейді және сөйлемеде қатынастық қатынастық мәліметтің барлығын қамтамасыз етпейді. Бұл үлгілер үлгілердің істеуіне көп дыбыс бар. Бұл қағазда біз оқыту процесінде дыбыс үлгілерді сүзгілеу механизмін ұсынамыз. Біз Нью Йорк Таймс деректер қорларындағы қолданыстарымызды бағалаймыз. Бұл қашықтағы қашықтағы бақылау арқылы алған. Біздің бірнеше күй- жай невралды қатынас үлгілеріміздің сүзгілеу механизміміз үлгілердің құндылығын жақсартып, олардың F1 нөмірлерін көтереді.', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d ബന്ധം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിന് വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. കാരണം നമുക്ക് വിദൂരമായ നിരീക്ഷിക്കു ദൂരത്തെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d, ഒരു വാക്ക് ടൂപ്പിളിന്റെ സ്രോതസ്സായി കണക്കാക്കുന്നു. വാക്കിന്റെ രണ്ടു വസ എന്നാലും ഈ അവസ്ഥ വളരെ അനുമതിയുള്ളതാണ്. വാക്കില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ബന്ധമുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d ഉറപ്പുവരുത്തല്ല. അതുപോലെ, ദൂരെയായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ട്രെയിനിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് ശബ്ദം ഉണ്ട്. മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രകട ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ശബ്ദത്തിന്റെ ശബ്ദം മാമ്പുകള്\u200d ഫില്\u200dറ്റര്\u200d ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സ്വയം  ന്യൂയോര്\u200dക്ക് ടൈമിന്\u200dറെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് വിലയിച്ച നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഫില്\u200dട്രിങ്ങ് മെയിനിസ്റ്റ് മോഡലിന്റെ റോസ്റ്റ് മെച്ചപ', 'mt': 'Distantly supervised models are very popular for relation extraction since we can obtain a large amount of training data using the distant supervision method without human annotation.  F’superviżjoni distanti, sentenza titqies bħala sors ta’ doppju jekk is-sentenza fiha ż-żewġ entitajiet ta’ doppju. Madankollu, din il-kundizzjoni hija permissiva wisq u ma tiggarantixxix il-preżenza ta’ informazzjoni rilevanti speċifika għar-relazzjoni fis-sentenza. Bħala tali, dejta ta’ taħriġ sorveljata mill-bogħod fiha ħafna storbju li jaffettwa b’mod negattiv il-prestazzjoni tal-mudelli. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mekkaniżmu ta’ filtrazzjoni awtonomu li jiffiltra l-kampjuni storbjużi matul il-proċess ta’ taħriġ. Aħna jevalwaw il-qafas propost tagħna dwar is-sett tad-dejta New York Times li jinkiseb permezz ta’ superviżjoni mill-bogħod. L-esperimenti tagħna b’mudelli ta’ estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni newrali l-aktar avvanzati juru li l-mekkaniżmu ta’ filtrazzjoni propost tagħna jtejjeb ir-robustezza tal-mudelli u jżid il-punteġġi F1 tagħhom.', 'no': 'Avstand-oversikte modeller er svært populære for utpakking av relasjonar sidan vi kan få stor mengda opplæringsdata ved hjelp av den eksterne overvåkingsmetoden utan menneske annotasjon. I ekstern oversikt vert eit setning kalla som ein kilde av ein tuple dersom setninga inneheld begge einingar i tuple. Dette betingelset er imidlertid for tilgjengeleg og garantierer ikkje tilgjengeleg relasjonsspesifikke informasjon i setningen. I tillegg til denne måten inneheld mange støy som negativt påvirkar utviklinga av modelane. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein filtermekanisme for å filtrera ut dei støye prøver i læringsprosessen. Vi evaluerer vårt foreslått rammeverk på datasettet New York Times som blir henta via distant oversikt. Eksperimentane våre med fleire tilstandar av kunsten, neuralrelasjonsmodeller for utpakking viser at vårt foreslått filtermekanisme forbedrar kraftigheten av modelane og øker F1-poeng sine.', 'mn': 'Удалгүй удирдлагатай загварууд хүн төрөлхтний тэмдэглэггүй холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой байдаг. Учир нь бид хүн төрөлхтний тэмдэглэггүй холбоотой удирдлагын өгөгдлийг ашиглаж чадна. Хэрэв хол даалгавар дээр өгүүлбэр нь туулын эх үүсвэр гэж үздэг. Гэвч энэ нөхцөл нь хэтэрхий зөвхөн зөвшөөрөгдлийн харилцааны тодорхой мэдээллийг баталгаагүй. Тийм болохоор, хол дахь удирдлагатай суралцах өгөгдлийн мэдээллийг загварын үйл ажиллагаанд нөлөөлдөг маш олон чимээгүй байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөрсдийгөө цэвэрлэх механизмийг суралцах үйл ажиллагааны үед чимээгүй жишээ цэвэрлэх хэрэгтэй. Бид Нью Йорк Таймс өгөгдлийн сангийн тухай санал дэвшүүлсэн хэмжээсүүдийг үнэлгээд үзнэ. Бидний олон урлагийн мэдрэлийн харилцааны туршилтууд бидний санал зориулах механизм загварын хүчтэй байдлыг сайжруулж F1 оноо нэмэгдүүлж байна.', 'ms': 'Distantly supervised models are very popular for relation extraction since we can obtain a large amount of training data using the distant supervision method without human annotation.  In distant supervision, a sentence is considered as a source of a tuple if the sentence contains both entities of the tuple.  Namun, syarat ini terlalu membenarkan dan tidak menjamin kehadiran maklumat berkaitan-khusus dalam kalimat. Sebagai demikian, data latihan yang diawasi jauh mengandungi banyak bunyi yang mempengaruhi tidak baik prestasi model. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan mekanisme penapisan seluruh diri untuk menapis sampel bunyi semasa proses latihan. Kami menilai kerangka yang kami cadangkan pada set data New York Times yang diperoleh melalui pengawasan jauh. Eksperimen kami dengan beberapa model ekstraksi hubungan saraf state-of-the-art menunjukkan bahawa mekanisme penapisan kami diusulkan meningkatkan kepekatan model dan meningkatkan skor F1 mereka.', 'mk': 'Distantly supervised models are very popular for relation extraction since we can obtain a large amount of training data using the distant supervision method without human annotation.  Во далечниот надзор, реченицата се смета за извор на двојна реченица ако реченицата содржи двата ентитети на двојна реченица. Сепак, овој услов е премногу дозволен и не гарантира присуство на релевантни информации специфични за односите во реченицата. Како таква, податоците за подготвување кои се надгледуваат далеку содржат голема бучава која негативно влијае на резултатите на моделите. Во овој документ, предложуваме механизам за филтрирање на себеси за филтрирање на гласните примероци за време на процесот на обука. Ги проценуваме нашите предложени рамки за податоците на Њујорк Тајмс кои се добиваат преку далечен надзор. Нашите експерименти со многуте модели за екстракција на нервни односи покажуваат дека нашиот предложен филтрирачки механизам ја подобрува силноста на моделите и ги зголемува нивните оценки F1.', 'pl': 'Modele nadzorowane na odległość są bardzo popularne w ekstrakcji relacji, ponieważ możemy uzyskać dużą ilość danych treningowych za pomocą metody nadzoru na odległość bez adnotacji człowieka. W odległym nadzorze zdanie jest uważane za źródło kropki, jeśli zdanie zawiera oba jednostki kropki. Warunek ten jest jednak zbyt dozwolony i nie gwarantuje obecności istotnych informacji specyficznych dla relacji w zdaniu. W związku z tym dane treningowe nadzorowane na odległość zawierają dużo hałasu, co negatywnie wpływa na wydajność modeli. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy samoobsługowy mechanizm filtrowania, aby odfiltrować hałaśliwe próbki podczas procesu treningowego. Oceniamy nasze proponowane ramy w oparciu o zbiór danych New York Times, który jest uzyskiwany za pośrednictwem odległego nadzoru. Nasze eksperymenty z wieloma najnowocześniejszymi modelami ekstrakcji relacji neuronowych pokazują, że proponowany mechanizm filtrowania poprawia solidność modeli i zwiększa ich wyniki F1.', 'ro': 'Modelele supravegheate la distanță sunt foarte populare pentru extragerea relațiilor, deoarece putem obține o cantitate mare de date de instruire folosind metoda de supraveghere la distanță fără adnotări umane. În supravegherea la distanță, o propoziție este considerată sursa unui tuple dacă propoziția conține ambele entități ale tuple. Cu toate acestea, această condiție este prea permisivă și nu garantează prezența informațiilor relevante specifice relației în propoziție. Ca atare, datele de antrenament supravegheate la distanță conțin mult zgomot care afectează negativ performanța modelelor. În această lucrare, propunem un mecanism de filtrare auto-ansamblu pentru a filtra probele zgomotoase în timpul procesului de antrenament. Evaluăm cadrul propus privind setul de date New York Times, obținut prin supraveghere la distanță. Experimentele noastre cu mai multe modele de extracție a relațiilor neurale de ultimă generație arată că mecanismul nostru de filtrare propus îmbunătățește robustețea modelelor și crește scorurile lor F1.', 'so': 'Tusaalada la ilaaliyo waa mid aad u maamuus ah in la soo bixiyo xiriirka, sababtoo ah waxaannu heli karnaa macluumaad badan oo waxbarasho ah, sida loo isticmaali karo qaababka ilaalinta fog oo aan dadka dhibaato la’aan. Rugta fog waxaa looga tirinayaa halka dhagxanka haddii uu ku jiro labada alaabta leh. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shuruudahan waa mid aad u ogol ah, mana garan karo in uu joogo macluumaad gaar ah oo ku saabsan xiriirka. Tusaale ahaan macluumaadka waxbarashada si fog looga ilaaliyo waxaa ku jira cod badan oo saameyn u yeelanaya sameynta modellada. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa meymisyo la filteriyay oo aan ku filimayno samooyinka codka xiliga waxbarashada. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa shuruudaha la soo jeeday ee New York Times dataset oo lagu helay ilaalinta fog. Imtixaankayada oo ku qoran samooyin kala duduwan oo la soo saaray xiliga neurada ayaa muujiya in mekaniyadayada la soo jeeday ay ay kordhiyaan khatarka modellada, wuxuuna kordhiyaa kooxda F1.', 'sr': 'Daljinski nadzorni modeli su veoma popularni za ekstrakciju odnosa jer možemo dobiti veliku količinu podataka o obuci koristeći daleku metodu nadzora bez ljudske annotacije. U daljnjem nadzoru, rečenica se smatra izvorom tuple ako rečenica sadrži oba entiteta tuple. Međutim, ovaj uvjet je prepušten i ne garantuje prisustvo relevantne informacije o specifičnim odnosima u rečenici. Kao takve, daljinski nadzirani podaci o obuci sadrže mnogo buke koja negativno utiče na izvođenje modela. U ovom papiru predlažemo mehanizam filtriranja samopouzdanja da filtriramo bučne uzorke tokom treninga. Procjenjujemo naš predloženi okvir u Njujorku Tajmsu podataka koji je dobijen preko dalekog nadzora. Naši eksperimenti sa višestrukim modelima neuralnih odnosa pokazuju da naš predloženi mehanizam filtreranja poboljšava robotu modela i povećava njihove rezultate F1.', 'sv': 'Distansövervakade modeller är mycket populära för relationsextraktion eftersom vi kan få en stor mängd träningsdata med hjälp av fjärrövervakningsmetoden utan mänsklig notering. Vid avlägsen övervakning betraktas en mening som en källa till en tupel om meningen innehåller båda entiteterna av tupel. Detta villkor är emellertid alltför tillåtande och garanterar inte förekomsten av relevant relationsspecifik information i meningen. Därför innehåller distansövervakade träningsdata mycket buller som påverkar modellernas prestanda negativt. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en självensemblefiltreringsmekanism för att filtrera ut bullriga prover under träningsprocessen. Vi utvärderar vårt föreslagna ramverk på New York Times dataset som erhålls via fjärrövervakning. Våra experiment med flera state-of-the-art neural relations extraction modeller visar att vår föreslagna filtreringsmekanism förbättrar modellens robusthet och ökar deras F1 poäng.', 'si': 'දුරස්ථ විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරසිද්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක දුරස්ථ පරීක්ෂණයෙන්, වාක්ෂණයක් ටුප්ල් වලින් ස්ථානයක් විදිහට තියෙනවා වගේ වාක්ෂණය ටුප්ල් වලින් ත නමුත්, මේ තත්වය ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් වැඩියි, සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු විශේෂ විශේෂ තොරතු ඒ වගේම, දුරටත් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත ගොඩක් ශබ්දයක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම මොඩේල්ස්ගේ ව මේ පත්තරේ අපි ස්වයංග්\u200dරීය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ස්වයංග්\u200dරීය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා. අපි නිව්යෝර්ක් ටායිම්ස් දත්ත සෙට් එකේ අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒක දුරස්ථ පරික්ෂණයෙන්  අපේ පරීක්ෂණාවන් විශේෂ ස්ථානයක් තියෙන්නේ විශේෂ න්\u200dයූරල් සම්බන්ධතා නිර්මාණය නිර්මාණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය', 'ta': 'Distantly supervised models are very popular for relation extraction since we can obtain a large amount of training data using the distant supervision method without human annotation.  தொலைதூர கண்காணிப்பில், ஒரு வாக்கு துப்பாக்கியின் மூலமாக கருதப்படுகிறது இந்த வாக்கியம் இரு பொருளும் இருந்தால ஆனால், இந்த நிலை மிகவும் அனுமதியுள்ளது மற்றும் வாக்கியத்தில் தொடர்பு குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் இருப்பதை உறுதிப்படுத்துவத இது போன்று, தொலைதூர கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட பயிற்சி தரவுகளில் அதிகமான சப்தம் உள்ளது, இது மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாட்டை குற இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பயிற்சி செய்யும் போது சப்தமான மாதிரிகளை வடிகட்டும் முறைமையை வடிகட்டுவதற்காக ஒரு சுதந்தி நாங்கள் தூரத்தில் கண்காணிப்பு மூலம் கிடைக்கப்பட்ட நியூயார்க் டைமாஸ் தகவல் அமைப்பில் எங்கள் முன்னிரு பல நிலையில் இருந்து புதிய உறவு பிரிப்பு மாதிரிகளுடன் எங்கள் சோதனைகளை காண்பிக்கிறது நம்முடைய பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட வடிகட்டி முறைமையை மாதி', 'ur': 'دور کی نظارت کی مدلکوں کے لئے نسبت اخراج کے لئے بہت محبوب ہیں کیونکہ ہم انسان کے اخراج کے بغیر دور کی نظارت طریقے کے مطابق بہت بڑی آموزش دینے والی ڈیٹے حاصل کر سکتے ہیں. دور کی نظر میں ایک فیصلہ کو ایک ٹوپ کے منبع سمجھا جاتا ہے اگر فیصلہ میں دو ٹوپ کے متعلق موجود ہوتا ہے۔ However, this condition is too permissive and does not guarantee the presence of relevant relation-specific information in the sentence. اس طرح، دور سے نظارت یافتہ ترینس ڈیٹے بہت زیادہ صوت لگتی ہے جو مدلکوں کی عملکرد پر ناراحت کرتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک سیدھی سیدھی فیلٹرینگ مکانیسم کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ تدریس پرسس کے درمیان صوتی نمونے کو فیلٹر کرے۔ ہم نے نیویورک تایمز ڈیٹ سٹ کے بارے میں اپنی پیشنهاد فرمود کا ارزش کیا ہے جو دور کی نظر سے ملی جاتی ہے۔ ہماری آزمائش بہت سی حالت کی نئورل رابطہ استخراج موڈلز کے ساتھ دکھاتی ہے کہ ہماری پیشنهاد فیلٹرینگ مکانیسم نے مدلکوں کی طاقت کو بڑھاتی ہے اور ان کی F1 اسکو بڑھاتی ہے.', 'vi': 'Cách chế độ giám sát xa nhau rất phổ biến trong việc tách ra mối quan hệ bởi vì chúng ta có thể kiếm được một lượng lớn dữ liệu đào tạo nhờ phương pháp giám sát xa xôi mà không ghi chú con người. Trong một sự giám sát xa xôi, một câu được coi là nguồn của một ví dụ nếu câu đó chứa cả hai thực thể của đơn vị. Tuy nhiên, điều kiện này quá hạn chế và không đảm bảo sự hiện diện của những thông tin liên quan cụ thể liên quan trong câu đó. Thông tin huấn luyện theo cách xa chứa rất nhiều nhiễu ảnh hưởng xấu đến hiệu suất của mô-đun. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một cơ chế lọc tự lập để lọc ra các mẫu ồn ào trong suốt quá trình huấn luyện. Chúng tôi đánh giá nội dung của chúng tôi về tập tin trên tờ New York Times được thu thập qua sự giám sát xa xôi. Các thí nghiệm với các mô hình liên hệ thần kinh cao cấp nhất cho thấy rằng cơ chế lọc đã đề nghị của chúng ta cải thiện độ bền của các mô-đun và nâng điểm F1 của chúng lên.', 'uz': "Masofadagi taʼminlovchi modellar murakkab chiqarish uchun juda katta mavjud. Chunki biz inson taʼminlovchi bo'lmaydigan boshqarish usuli yordamida juda katta taʼminlovchi maʼlumot olish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Lekin, bu holat juda ruxsat va gapning muhim bogʻ'liq maʼlumotini ishlatmaydi. Shunday qilib, masalan taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar maʼlumotda modellar bajarishga yetarli holatda ko'proq yoʻl bor. Bu qogʻozda, biz o'zimni o'zgartirish mechanisini o'zimiz taʼminlovchi vazifalar davomida to ʻgʻri samollarni filterlash uchun o'zimni o'ylab beramiz. Maʼlumotlar bazasini yangi yordam Times haqida qiymatmiz. Masofadan muvaffaqiyatlar orqali olib tashlangan. Bizning bir necha holat bilan bir necha darajada neyron murakkablik modellarimiz bilan taʼminlovchi imtiyozlarimizni ko'rsatadi, bizning ilova filterlash mechaniyatlarimiz modellarning qobiliyatini oshirish va F1 qiymatlarini oshirish mumkin.", 'hr': 'Daljinski nadzirani modeli su vrlo popularni za ekstrakciju odnosa jer možemo dobiti veliku količinu podataka o obuci koristeći daljinski metod nadzora bez ljudske annotacije. U daljnjem nadzoru, rečenica se smatra izvorom tuple ako rečenica sadrži oba entiteta tuple. Međutim, ovaj uvjet je prepušten i ne garantuje prisutnost relevantnih informacija o specifičnim odnosima u rečenici. Kao što je tako, daljinski nadzirani podaci o obuci sadrže mnogo buke koja negativno utječe na učinkovitost modela. U ovom papiru predlažemo mehanizam filtriranja samostalnih mjera kako bi filtrirali bučne uzorke tijekom treninga. Procjenjujemo naš predloženi okvir za New York Times dataset koji je dobijen preko dalekog nadzora. Naši eksperimenti s višestrukim modelima neuralnih odnosa pokazuju da naš predloženi mehanizam filtracije poboljšava robotu modela i povećava njihove rezultate F1.', 'nl': 'Op afstand begeleide modellen zijn zeer populair voor relatieontwikkeling, omdat we een grote hoeveelheid trainingsgegevens kunnen verkrijgen met behulp van de afstandsbegeleidingsmethode zonder menselijke annotatie. Onder toezicht op afstand wordt een zin beschouwd als een bron van een tupel als de zin beide entiteiten van de tupel bevat. Deze voorwaarde is echter te tolerant en garandeert niet dat relevante relatiespecifieke informatie in de zin aanwezig is. Op afstand begeleide trainingsgegevens bevatten dus veel lawaai wat de prestaties van de modellen negatief beïnvloedt. In dit artikel stellen we een zelfensemble filtermechanisme voor om de ruige samples tijdens het trainingsproces uit te filteren. We evalueren ons voorgestelde kader op de dataset van de New York Times die verkregen wordt via toezicht op afstand. Onze experimenten met meerdere state-of-the-art neural relation extraction modellen tonen aan dat ons voorgestelde filtermechanisme de robuustheid van de modellen verbetert en hun F1 scores verhoogt.', 'id': 'Model yang diawasi jauh sangat populer untuk ekstraksi hubungan karena kita dapat mendapatkan jumlah besar data latihan menggunakan metode pengawasan jauh tanpa anotasi manusia. Dalam pengawasan jauh, kalimat dianggap sebagai sumber dua kali jika kalimat mengandung kedua entitas dua kali. Namun, kondisi ini terlalu permisif dan tidak menjamin kehadiran informasi relasi-spesifik relevan dalam kalimat. Sebagai seperti itu, data latihan yang diawasi jauh mengandung banyak kebisingan yang mempengaruhi negatif prestasi model. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan mekanisme penapisan seluruh diri untuk menapis sampel suara selama proses latihan. Kami mengevaluasi cadangan kami yang diusulkan pada set data New York Times yang diperoleh melalui pengawasan jauh. Eksperimen kami dengan beberapa model ekstraksi hubungan saraf state-of-the-art menunjukkan bahwa mekanisme penapisan kami diusulkan meningkatkan kepekatan model dan meningkatkan skor F1 mereka.', 'de': 'Fernüberwachte Modelle sind für die Beziehungsextraktion sehr beliebt, da wir mit der Fernüberwachungsmethode eine große Menge an Trainingsdaten ohne menschliche Annotation erhalten können. In Fernüberwachung wird ein Satz als Quelle eines Tupels betrachtet, wenn der Satz beide Entitäten des Tupels enthält. Diese Bedingung ist jedoch zu freizügig und garantiert nicht das Vorhandensein relevanter relationsspezifischer Informationen im Satz. Daher enthalten fernüberwachte Trainingsdaten viel Lärm, was sich negativ auf die Leistung der Modelle auswirkt. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen Selbstensemble-Filtermechanismus vor, um die rauschenden Samples während des Trainingsprozesses herauszufiltern. Wir evaluieren unseren vorgeschlagenen Rahmen auf dem Datensatz der New York Times, der durch Fernüberwachung gewonnen wird. Unsere Experimente mit mehreren hochmodernen neuronalen Beziehungsextraktionsmodellen zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagener Filtermechanismus die Robustheit der Modelle verbessert und deren F1-Scores erhöht.', 'ko': '원격 감독 모델은 관계 추출에서 매우 유행하는데 원격 감독 방법을 사용하면 대량의 훈련 데이터를 얻을 수 있고 인공적으로 표시할 필요가 없기 때문이다.원격 모니터링에서 만약에 한 문장이 원조의 두 실체를 동시에 포함한다면 이 문장은 원조의 원천으로 간주된다.그러나 이런 조건이 너무 느슨해서 문장에 관련 관계의 특정한 정보가 존재한다는 것을 보장할 수 없다.따라서 원격 감독의 훈련 데이터는 대량의 소음을 포함하여 모델의 성능에 불리한 영향을 미친다.본고는 훈련 과정에서의 소음 샘플을 필터하기 위해 자체 집적 필터 메커니즘을 제시했다.우리는 원격 감시를 통해 얻은 뉴욕타임스 데이터 집합에서 우리가 제시한 구조를 평가했다.우리가 여러 개의 가장 선진적인 신경관계 추출 모델에 대한 실험을 통해 우리가 제시한 필터 메커니즘이 모델의 노봉성을 높였고 그들의 F1 점수를 높였다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Mradi ulioangaliwa mbali ni maarufu sana kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa uhusiano kwa sababu tunaweza kupata takwimu kubwa za mafunzo kwa kutumia njia ya ufuatiliaji wa mbali bila ya matangazo ya binadamu. Katika ufuatiliaji wa mbali, hukumu inachukuliwa kama chanzo cha chupa kama hukumu hiyo ina vitu vyote viwili vya chupa. Hata hivyo, hali hii inaruhusiwa sana na haihakikisha uwepo wa taarifa maalum za mahusiano kwenye hukumu hiyo. Kwa mfano, takwimu za mafunzo zinazofuatiliwa mbali zina kelele nyingi ambazo zinaathiri ufanisi wa mifano. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kuchuja filamu kwa kujitegemea kuchuja sampuli za kelele wakati wa mchakato wa mafunzo. Tutathmini mfumo wetu wa mapendekezo kwenye seti ya data za New York Times ambayo imepatikana kupitia ufuatiliaji wa mbali. Majaribio yetu yenye mifano mingi ya hali inayohusiana na ubongo wa kisasa yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu wa uchujaji unaopendekezwa unaongeza ubora wa mifano na kuongeza vipimo vyao vya F1.', 'da': 'Afstandsovervågede modeller er meget populære til relationsudtrækning, da vi kan få en stor mængde træningsdata ved hjælp af fjernovervågningsmetoden uden menneskelig annotation. Ved fjernsyn betragtes en sætning som kilde til en tuple, hvis sætningen indeholder begge enheder af tuple. Denne betingelse er imidlertid for tilladende og garanterer ikke tilstedeværelsen af relevante relationsspecifikke oplysninger i sætningen. Derfor indeholder fjernstyrede træningsdata meget støj, som påvirker modellernes ydeevne negativt. I denne artikel foreslår vi en selv-ensemble filtreringsmekanisme til at filtrere de støjende prøver ud under træningsprocessen. Vi evaluerer vores foreslåede rammer på New York Times datasættet, som opnås via fjerntilsyn. Vores eksperimenter med flere state-of-the-art neurale relations ekstraktion modeller viser, at vores foreslåede filtreringsmekanisme forbedrer robustheden af modellerne og øger deres F1 score.', 'bg': 'Моделите с дистанционно наблюдение са много популярни за извличане на релации, тъй като можем да получим голямо количество данни за обучение, използвайки метода на дистанционно наблюдение без човешка анотация. При далечен надзор изречението се счита за източник на двойка, ако изречението съдържа и двете единици на двойка. Това условие обаче е твърде допустимо и не гарантира наличието на съответна специфична за връзката информация в изречението. Като такива, данните за дистанционно контролирано обучение съдържат много шум, който влияе неблагоприятно на производителността на моделите. В настоящата статия предлагаме самоансамбълен филтриращ механизъм за филтриране на шумните проби по време на процеса на обучение. Ние оценяваме нашата предложена рамка за набора от данни на Ню Йорк Таймс, който се получава чрез дистанционен надзор. Експериментите ни с множество съвременни модели за екстракция на невронни взаимоотношения показват, че предложеният ни филтриращ механизъм подобрява здравината на моделите и увеличава техните резултати.', 'fa': 'مدلهای دور نظارت شده برای اخراج رابطه بسیار مشهور هستند، زیرا می توانیم از طریق روش نظارت دور بدون اخراج انسان یک مقدار زیادی از اطلاعات آموزش را دریافت کنیم. در مورد نظارت دور، یک جمله به عنوان منبع یک تابلو به نظر می آید اگر جمله دو تنی از تابلو شامل باشد. ولی این شرایط خیلی اجازه\u200cدهنده است و به وجود اطلاعات مربوط به ارتباط خاص در محکوم تضمین نمی\u200cدهد. به عنوان این، اطلاعات آموزش های دور و دور تحت نظر قرار گرفته، صدای زیادی را دارد که به خطر تأثیر عملکرد مدل ها را تأثیر می دهد. در این کاغذ، ما یک مکانیسم فیلترینگ خود را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا نمونه\u200cهای صوتی را در طول فرایند آموزش فیلترینگ کند. ما چهارچوب پیشنهاد ما را در مجموعه داده های نیویورک تایمز ارزیابی می کنیم که از طریق بررسی دور دریافت شده است. آزمایش های ما با مدل های استخراج روابط عصبی چندین حالت هنری نشان می دهند که مکانیسم فیلترینگ پیشنهاد ما قوی مدل ها را بهتر می کند و امتیاز F1 آنها را افزایش می دهد.', 'tr': 'Uzaklarda g철zle첵채n nusgalar adamlary du첵durma 첵체z체nden uzak g철zle첵채n nusgalary ulanyp bil첵채n 체챌in seretm채ge me힊hur. Uzak챌a nadirim챌e, bir s철zlem tupun 챌e힊mesi di첵ip kabul edil첵채r eger s철zlem tupun her iki zady bolsa. 횦철ne bu 첵agda첵 gaty rugsat beril첵채r we s철zlemde n채hili bagla첵y힊y흫 barlygyny garantyrma첵ar. 힇onu흫 첵aly, uzakdan g철zlenen e휓itim maglumatyny흫 da첵asynda 철r채n g체rr체흫li hatlary흫 eserlerini t채sirle첵채r. Bu kagyzda, okuw prosesynda sesli nusgalary 챌ykarmak 체챌in 철zi-철z체ni ta첵첵arlamak mekanizmany teklip ed첵채ris. Biz New York Times sanatynda teklip eden frameworklarymyzy 챌ykar첵arys. Bu sistemi uzak supervisi첵adan beril첵채r. Bizi흫 birn채챌e m철h체m nokat n채ral baglany힊yk 챌yky힊 modellerimiz teklip eden filtreleme me첵dan챌asyny흫 modelleri흫 g체첵챌ligini gowurap, olary흫 F1 noktalaryny art 첵andygyny g철rkez첵채ris.', 'sq': 'Modelet e mbikqyrura nga larg janë shumë popullore për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve pasi ne mund të marrim një sasi të madhe të dhënash treinimi duke përdorur metodën e mbikqyrjes së largët pa anotacion njerëzor. Në mbikqyrjen e largët, një dënim konsiderohet si një burim i dyfishtë në qoftë se dënimi përmban të dy njësitë e dyfishtë. Megjithatë, kjo kusht është tepër i lejueshëm dhe nuk garanton praninë e informacionit të rëndësishëm të veçantë lidhjeje në dënim. Si e tillë, të dhënat e trajnimit të mbikqyrura nga larg përmban shumë zhurmë që ndikon negativisht në performancën e modeleve. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një mekanizëm filtrimi të vetë-ansamblit për të filtruar muzikat zhurmuese gjatë procesit të trajnimit. We evaluate our proposed framework on the New York Times dataset which is obtained via distant supervision.  Eksperimentet tona me modelet e nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve nervore më të larta tregojnë se mekanizmi ynë i propozuar i filtrimit përmirëson fuqinë e modeleve dhe rrit rezultatet e tyre F1.', 'af': "Afgeleë ondersoekte modele is baie populaar vir verwanting uittrekking omdat ons 'n groot hoeveelheid optrekking data kan kry deur te gebruik die afstand ondersoek metode sonder menslike annotasie. In afgeleë supervisie word 'n seting aangesien as 'n bron van 'n tuple as die seting bevat beide entiteite van die tuple. Maar hierdie voorwaarde is te toegelaat en garantieer nie die aangesig van relevante verwanting-spesifieke inligting in die seting nie. Soos so, afgeleë onderwerp gegee onderwerp data bevat baie geluid wat noodsaaklik die prestasie van die modele beïnvloor. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n self-ensemble filtering mekanisme om die geluide voorbeelde uit te filtreer tydens die oefening proses. Ons evalueer ons voorgestelde raamwerk op die New York Times datastel wat deur afgeleë supervisie ontvang word. Ons eksperimente met veelvuldige state-of-the-art neurale verhouding van uittrekking modele wys dat ons voorgestelde filtering mekanisme die kragtigheid van die modele verbeter en hulle F1 punte vermeerder.", 'az': 'Uzun təhlükəsizli modellər insan təhlükəsizləri olmadan uzaq təhlükəsizlik metodlarını istifadə edə biləcəyimiz üçün qohumluq əlaqəsi üçün çox məşhurdur. Əgər cümlənin hər ikisini tutulmuşsa, bir cümlənin qaynayıcısı olar. Ancaq bu şəkil çox imkansızdır və sözlərdə münasibətli bağlantı məlumatının varlığını garantirməz. Beləcə, uzaq təhsil məlumatları modellərin təhsil edilməsinə müvafiq olaraq təhsil edir. Bu kağızda, təhsil sürətində səslü nümunələri filtrləmək üçün özünüzü süzgürmə mehanizmini təklif edirik. Biz New York Times veri qutusu ilə təklif edilən qurğumuzu çəkiririk ki, uzaq gözətçilik vasitəsilə alınır. Bizim müxtəlif məlumatlarımız nöral əlaqəsi çıxarma modelləri ilə təklif etdiyimiz filtrləmə mehanizmimizin modellərin gücünü daha yaxşılaşdırır və F1 nəticəsini art ırar.', 'bn': 'দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণের মডেল মানুষের বিরুদ্ধে বিভিন্ন প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য খুবই জনপ্রিয় যেহেতু আমরা মানুষের বিভিন্ন মনোযোগ ছা দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণে একটি বাক্য টুপেলের উৎস হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা হয় যদি এই বাক্যের উভয় বস্তু থাকে। তবে এই অবস্থা অনেক অনুমতিক এবং এই বাক্যে সম্পর্ক-নির্দিষ্ট তথ্যের উপস্থিতি নিশ্চিত করে না। যেমন, অনেক দূরে পর্যবেক্ষিত প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যের মধ্যে অনেক শব্দ রয়েছে যা মডেলের প্রভাবিত হয়েছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা নিজেদের নিজেদের ফিল্টারিং মেক্সিমেন্ট প্রস্তাব করি প্রশিক্ষণ প্রক্রিয়ার সময় শব্দের নমুনা ফি আমরা নিউ ইয়র্ক টাইমসের ডাটাসেটে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত ফ্রেমের মূল্যায়ন করি যা দূরের পর্যবেক্ষণের মাধ্যমে প আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত ফিল্টারিং মেক্সিমেন্ট মডেলের রাস্তা বৃদ্ধি করে এবং এফ১ স্কোর বৃদ্ধি করে।', 'bs': 'Daljinski nadzorni modeli su vrlo popularni za ekstrakciju odnosa jer možemo dobiti veliku količinu podataka o obuci koristeći daleku metodu nadzora bez ljudske annotacije. U daljnjem nadzoru, rečenica se smatra izvorom tuple ako rečenica sadrži oba entiteta tuple. Međutim, ovaj uvjet je prepušten i ne garantuje prisutnost relevantne informacije o specifičnim odnosima u rečenici. Kao takve, daljinski nadzirani podaci o obuci sadrže mnogo buke koja negativno utječe na učinku modela. U ovom papiru predlažemo mehanizam filtriranja samoinembliranja da filtriramo bučne uzorke tokom treninga. Procjenjujemo naš predloženi okvir o setu podataka New York Times koji je dobijen putem dalekog nadzora. Naši eksperimenti sa višestrukim modelima neuralnih odnosa pokazuju da naš predloženi mehanizam filtracije poboljšava robotu modela i povećava njihove rezultate F1.', 'ca': "Els models remotament supervisats són molt populars per l'extracció de relacions, ja que podem obtenir una gran quantitat de dades d'entrenament utilitzant el mètode de supervisió remota sense anotació human a. En supervisió remota, una frase es considera una font d'un doble si la frase conté ambdues entitats del doble. Tot i així, aquesta condició és massa permisiva i no garanteix la presença d'informació rellevant específica en la frase. Com a tal, les dades d'entrenament remotament supervisades contén molt soroll que afecta negativament el rendiment dels models. En aquest paper, proposem un mecanisme de filtració d'autoconjunt per filtrar les mostres sorolloses durant el procés d'entrenament. Evaluam el nostre marc proposat sobre el conjunt de dades del New York Times que es obté a través de supervisió remota. Els nostres experiments amb múltiples models d'extracció de relacions neurals d'última generació demostren que el nostre mecanisme de filtració proposat millora la robustet dels models i augmenta les seves puntuacions F1.", 'hy': 'Հեռու վերահսկվող մոդելները շատ հայտնի են հարաբերությունների վերացման համար, քանի որ մենք կարող ենք ստանալ մեծ քանակությամբ ուսուցման տվյալներ օգտագործելով հեռավոր վերահսկման մեթոդը առանց մարդկային նոտացիաների: In distant supervision, a sentence is considered as a source of a tuple if the sentence contains both entities of the tuple.  However, this condition is too permissive and does not guarantee the presence of relevant relation-specific information in the sentence.  Այսպիսով, հեռավոր վերահսկվող ուսուցման տվյալները շատ աղմուկ են պարունակում, ինչը վնաս ազդում է մոդելների գործողություններին: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ինքնահամակարգչային ֆիլտրող մեխանիզմ, որը ֆիլտրում է աղմկոտ նմուշները վարժման ընթացքում: We evaluate our proposed framework on the New York Times dataset which is obtained via distant supervision.  Մեր փորձարկումները նորագույն նյարդային հարաբերությունների վերացման մոդելների հետ ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած ֆիլտրող մեխանիզմը բարելավում է մոդելների ուժեղությունը և աճում է նրանց F1 գնահատականները:', 'am': 'በተመለከተው ሞዴላዎች የግንኙነት አካባቢ ሲሆን ከሩቅ የጦር ማየት ማድረግ ሳይኖር ብዙ ማህበረሰብ ማግኘት እናገኛለን፡፡ In distant supervision, a sentence is considered as a source of a tuple if the sentence contains both entities of the tuple.  ነገር ግን ይህ ሥርዓት እጅግ ፈቃድ ነው፣ የግንኙነት-የተወሰነ መረጃ የፍርዱ ግንኙነት እንዲኖር አያስጠነቅቅም፡፡ እንደዚህ፣ ከሩቅ ተማሪ ዳታዎች የሞዴሎችን ጥያቄ የሚያስጨንቅ ድምፅ ይኖራል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ውስጥ የድምፅ ምሳሌዎችን በማስተማርት ጊዜ የራሳችን ምሳሌ ማጥለቂያ አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሩቅ ጉዳይ ላይ የተገኘውን የኒው ዮርክ ቲም ዳታተር ማድረጊያውን እናስተውልታለን፡፡ የጥንት ግንኙነት አካባቢ አካላዊ ግንኙነት አካባቢ አካባቢነታችን የሞዴሎችን ልብስ እንዲሻል እና የF1 ቁጥሮችን እንዲጨምር ያሳየናል፡፡', 'et': 'Kaugjuhitavad mudelid on väga populaarsed seoste ekstraheerimiseks, kuna me saame suure hulga treeninguandmeid kaugjuhitava meetodi abil ilma inimese märkusteta. Kaugjärelevalves loetakse lauset tupli allikaks, kui lause sisaldab mõlemat tupli üksust. See tingimus on siiski liiga lubav ega taga lauses asjakohase seospõhise teabe olemasolu. Seetõttu sisaldavad kaugjuhitavad treeninguandmed palju müra, mis mõjutab negatiivselt mudelite jõudlust. Käesolevas töös pakume välja iseensemble filtreerimismehhanismi, et filtreerida lärmakad proovid koolitusprotsessi ajal. Hindame oma kavandatud raamistikku New York Timesi andmekogumi kohta, mis saadakse kaugjärelevalve teel. Meie eksperimendid mitmete kaasaegsete närvisuhete ekstraheerimise mudelitega näitavad, et meie kavandatud filtreerimismehhanism parandab mudelite vastupidavust ja suurendab nende F1 skoore.', 'cs': 'Dálkově dohlížené modely jsou velmi oblíbené pro extrakci vztahů, protože můžeme získat velké množství tréninkových dat pomocí metody vzdáleného dohledu bez lidské anotace. Ve vzdáleném dohledu je věta považována za zdroj dvojicíku, pokud věta obsahuje obě entity dvojicíku. Tato podmínka je však příliš tolerantní a nezaručuje přítomnost relevantních informací specifických pro vztah ve větě. Proto vzdáleně kontrolovaná tréninková data obsahují mnoho hluku, který nepříznivě ovlivňuje výkon modelů. V tomto článku navrhujeme samoobsáhlý filtrační mechanismus pro filtrování hlučných vzorků během tréninkového procesu. Vyhodnocujeme náš navržený rámec na datové sadě New York Times, která je získána dálkovým dohledem. Naše experimenty s několika nejmodernějšími modely extrakce neuronových vztahů ukazují, že náš navržený filtrační mechanismus zlepšuje robustnost modelů a zvyšuje jejich skóre F1.', 'fi': 'Kaukana valvotut mallit ovat erittäin suosittuja relaatioiden purkamisessa, koska voimme saada suuren määrän harjoitusdataa etävalvontamenetelmällä ilman ihmisen merkintöjä. Kaukana valvonnassa lause katsotaan tuplan lähteeksi, jos lause sisältää tuplan molemmat entiteetit. Tämä ehto on kuitenkin liian salliva eikä takaa, että lauseessa on merkityksellisiä suhdekohtaisia tietoja. Kaukana valvotussa harjoittelussa on paljon melua, joka vaikuttaa haitallisesti mallien suorituskykyyn. Tässä työssä ehdotamme itsemuodostuvaa suodatusmekanismia meluisten näytteiden suodattamiseksi harjoitusprosessin aikana. Arvioimme ehdotettua viitekehystä New York Timesin aineistosta, joka saadaan etävalvonnan avulla. Kokeemme useilla huippuluokan hermosuhteiden uuttamismalleilla osoittavat, että ehdotettu suodatusmekanismimme parantaa mallien kestävyyttä ja lisää niiden F1-pisteitä.', 'jv': "Distance Where's the word Nanging, condo iki luwih akeh perusahaan lan ora iso nggarangé nunggo perusahaan karo informasi sing apik nggo kelalaman Dijejer-jejer saiki, dadi nguasakno sing luwih dumateng mesthi, ngono cah dumateng sing gak bener nggawe barang model. Nang pebuk iki, kita supoyo perusahaan kanggo mbatalé nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan kanggo ngilangno barang. Awak dhéwé éntuk tanggal nggawe barang nggawe barang nang New Yok Time dataset sing luwih nggambar barang maning. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing karo akeh sistem-sampeyan karo perusahaan anyar tentang karo model sing nyimpen", 'ha': "@ info In tsarin da ke nĩsa, an ƙaddara cewa wata magana kamar kilowa na tufe idan maganar ta ƙunsa da duk abubuwan da aka rubũta. A lokacin da, wannan halin yana da amfani da kuma bã ya tabbatar da presence na ma'abũcin tsari na masu husũma cikin maganar. Kamar wancan, data da aka tsare shi mai nĩsa yana da sauri mai yawa wanda ke kan aikin misãlai, mai sharri. Ga wannan takardan, muna buƙata wani mekanin filteri na kanzu kanzu don ya filteri misãlai na sauri a lokacin da za'a aiki. Tuna ƙaddara firam da aka buƙata a kan data set na New York Times wanda aka iya samun ta daga masani mai nĩsa. Kayan jarrabayenmu da misãlai masu tsari masu fara-gabani na-gaba, yana nũna cewa misalin filininmu da ake buƙata, yana ƙara tufãfin misãlai da kuma yana ƙara score F1.", 'bo': 'ཐག་རིང་གི་མིག་པ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་འབྲེལ་བ་འཕགས་རིས་ཆེན་པོ་ཡིན། གལ་སྲིད་ཐག་རིང་བའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ། ཚིག་རྐང་ཞིག་ནི་tuple ཡི་ཚང་གཉིས་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྣང་ཚུལ་འདི་ལྟར་ཆོག་མེད་པས་ཚིག་སྒྲུང་ནང་གི་གནད་དོན་འབྲེལ་བ་དམིགས་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་མེད། དཔེར་ན། ཐག་རིང་བའི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་བརྩོན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྣང་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པས། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ཚགས་མ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྱི་ཉིད་ཡོག་ཊིམ་སེཊི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་མཐོང་སྣང་བ་དང Our experiments with multiple state-of-the-art neural relation extraction models show that our proposed filtering mechanism improves the robustness of the models and increases their F1 scores.', 'he': 'דוגמנים ששומרים מרחוק הם מאוד פופולריים לחלץ יחסים מכיוון שאנחנו יכולים להשיג כמות גדולה של נתונים אימונים באמצעות שיטת הפיקוח הרחוק ללא הערות אנושית. In distant supervision, a sentence is considered as a source of a tuple if the sentence contains both entities of the tuple.  עם זאת, המצב הזה רשאי מדי ולא מבטיח נוכחות מידע רלוונטי ספציפי מערכת יחסים במשפט. As such, distantly supervised training data contains much noise which adversely affects the performance of the models.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מנגנון מסנן עצמי כדי לסנן את הדגימות הרעשיות במהלך תהליך האימון. אנחנו מעריכים את המסגרת המוצעת שלנו על קבוצת הנתונים של ניו יורק טיימס שנקבלת דרך פיקוח רחוק. Our experiments with multiple state-of-the-art neural relation extraction models show that our proposed filtering mechanism improves the robustness of the models and increases their F1 scores.', 'sk': 'Modeli z daljnim nadzorom so zelo priljubljeni za ekstrakcijo relacij, saj lahko z uporabo metode daljnega nadzora brez človeške opombe pridobimo veliko količino podatkov o vadbi. Pri daljnem nadzoru se stavek šteje za vir dvojice, če stavek vsebuje oba entiteta dvojice. Vendar je ta pogoj preveč dopusten in ne zagotavlja prisotnosti ustreznih informacij, specifičnih za povezavo, v stavku. Podatki o daljnem nadzorovanem treningu tako vsebujejo veliko hrupa, ki negativno vpliva na zmogljivost modelov. V prispevku predlagamo samosestavni filtrirni mehanizem za filtriranje hrupnih vzorcev med procesom usposabljanja. Naš predlagani okvir ocenjujemo na naboru podatkov New York Times, ki je pridobljen z daljnim nadzorom. Naši eksperimenti z več najsodobnejšimi modeli ekstrakcije nevronskih relacij kažejo, da naš predlagani filtrirni mehanizem izboljšuje robustnost modelov in povečuje njihove ocene F1.'}
{'en': 'Transfer-based Enrichment of a Hungarian Named Entity Dataset', 'es': 'Enriquecimiento basado en transferencias de un conjunto de datos de entidades nombradas', 'pt': 'Enriquecimento baseado em transferência de um conjunto de dados de entidade nomeada húngara', 'ar': 'الإثراء القائم على التحويل لمجموعة بيانات كيان مجري مسمى', 'fr': "Enrichissement par transfert d'un ensemble de données d'entité nommée hongroise", 'ja': 'ハンガリーの名前付きエンティティデータセットの転送ベースのエンリッチメント', 'zh': '匈牙利命实体数据集之基于传输', 'hi': 'एक हंगेरियन नामित निकाय डेटासेट का स्थानांतरण-आधारित संवर्धन', 'ru': 'Обогащение на основе переноса набора данных венгерского именованного субъекта', 'ga': 'Saibhriú Bunaithe ar Aistriú ar Thacar Sonraí Aonáin Ainmnithe Ungáiris', 'el': 'Εμπλουτισμός με βάση τη μεταφορά συνόλου δεδομένων ουγγρικής ονομαστικής οντότητας', 'hu': 'Magyarországi elnevezésű szervezeti adatkészlet transzferalapú gazdagítása', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Arricchimento basato su trasferimento di un set di dati ungherese sulle entità nominate', 'kk': 'Венгрия аталған нысандар деректер бағдарламасының көтерілуі', 'lt': 'Vengrijos vardu pažymėtų subjektų duomenų rinkinio turtinimas pagal perdavimus', 'mk': 'Базирано на трансфер на богатство на податок на унгарски ентитет', 'ms': 'Pengkaya berdasarkan pemindahan bagi Set Data Entiti bernama Hungaria', 'ml': 'ഹംഗേരിയന്\u200d പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റി ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ മാറ്റം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്ന ശക്തി', 'mt': 'Enrichment-based Transfer of a Hungarian Named Entity Dataset', 'mn': 'Венгрийн нэрлэгдсэн Entity Dataset', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Wzbogacenie zbioru danych o nazwie węgierskiej jednostki oparte na transferze', 'si': 'Name', 'ro': 'Îmbogățirea bazată pe transfer a unui set de date privind entitățile denumite maghiare', 'so': 'Horumarka wareejinta ee Hungarian magaceeda Entity Dataset', 'sr': 'Podignuće podataka o mađarskoj podaci imenovanoj podaci na prevozu', 'sv': 'Överföringsbaserad berikning av en ungersk namngiven enhetsdataset', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Ngân hàng truyền của một bộ dữ liệu tên Hungary', 'da': 'Overførselsbaseret berigelse af et ungarsk datasæt med navngivet enhed', 'bg': 'Обогатяване на базата на прехвърляне на набор от данни за унгарско назовано образувание', 'hr': 'Objačanje podataka o mađarskom imenovanom području na prijenosu', 'nl': 'Op overdracht gebaseerde verrijking van een Hongaarse naamgevende entiteitdataset', 'ko': '헝가리 명명 실체 데이터 집합의 전송 기반 확장', 'id': 'Perkaya Berdasarkan Transfer dari Dataset Entitas bernama Hungaria', 'tr': 'Name', 'sw': 'Kiongezeko kilichotumwa na Ki-Hungaria', 'de': 'Transferbasierte Anreicherung eines ungarischen Named Entity Datasets', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'تغییر داده\u200cهای اطلاعات entity named Hungarian', 'hy': 'Transfer-based Enrichment of a Hungarian Named Entity Dataset', 'bn': 'Transfer-based Enrichment of a Hungarian Named Entity Dataset', 'bs': 'Obgaćanje podataka o mađarskoj podaci imenovanoj entiteti na prevozu', 'sq': 'Përpasuria me bazë transferimi e një baze të dhënash të njësisë me emër hungareze', 'am': 'undo-type', 'cs': 'Obohacení datové sady maďarských jmenovaných entit založené na přenosu', 'az': 'Mənkar Adlı Entity Datasetinin Transfer-based Enrichment', 'fi': 'Unkarin nimetyn yksikön tietojoukon siirtopohjainen rikastaminen', 'ca': "Enriqueciment basat en transferències d'un conjunt de dades d'entitats húngares", 'et': 'Ungari nimega üksuse andmekogumi ülekandepõhine rikastamine', 'he': 'העשירה מבוססת על העברה של קבוצת נתונים של יחידות בשם הונגרי', 'sk': 'Obogatenje podatkovnega niza madžarskega imenovanega subjekta na podlagi prenosa', 'jv': 'FindOK', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'གནས་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་ལ་རྨས་གཞུང་གི་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་མིང་བཏགས་པའི་ཨ་རིའི་སྐྱེས་སྡུད་གཞུང་ཚབ་'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present a major update to the first Hungarian named entity dataset, the Szeged NER corpus. We used zero-shot cross-lingual transfer to initialize the enrichment of entity types annotated in the corpus using three neural NER models : two of them based on the English OntoNotes corpus and one based on the Czech Named Entity Corpus finetuned from multilingual neural language models. The output of the models was automatically merged with the original NER annotation, and automatically and manually corrected and further enriched with additional annotation, like qualifiers for various entity types. We present the evaluation of the zero-shot performance of the two OntoNotes-based models and a transformer-based new NER model trained on the training part of the final corpus. We release the corpus and the trained model.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم تحديثًا رئيسيًا لمجموعة بيانات الكيان الهنغاري الأولى المسماة ، مجموعة Szeged NER. استخدمنا النقل عبر اللغات بدون طلقة لتهيئة إثراء أنواع الكيانات المشروحة في الجسم باستخدام ثلاثة نماذج NER عصبية: اثنان منها يعتمدان على مجموعة OntoNotes الإنجليزية وواحد على أساس مجموعة الكيانات التشيكية المحددة من نماذج اللغات العصبية متعددة اللغات . تم دمج مخرجات النماذج تلقائيًا مع التعليق التوضيحي NER الأصلي ، وتم تصحيحه تلقائيًا ويدويًا وإثرائه بتعليقات توضيحية إضافية ، مثل المؤهلات لأنواع الكيانات المختلفة. نقدم تقييم أداء اللقطة الصفرية للنموذجين المستندة إلى OntoNotes ونموذج NER الجديد القائم على المحولات والمدرَّب على الجزء التدريبي من المجموعة النهائية. نصدر المجموعة والنموذج المدرب.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons une mise à jour majeure du premier jeu de données d'entités nommées hongrois, le corpus Szeged NER. Nous avons utilisé le transfert linguistique croisé à zéro coup pour initialiser l'enrichissement des types d'entités annotés dans le corpus à l'aide de trois modèles NERO neuronaux\xa0: deux d'entre eux sont basés sur le corpus anglais OnToNotes et un basé sur le Corpus des entités nommées tchèques affinées à partir de modèles de langage neuronal multilingues. La sortie des modèles a été automatiquement fusionnée avec l'annotation NER d'origine, puis corrigée automatiquement et manuellement et enrichie d'annotations supplémentaires, telles que des qualificatifs pour différents types d'entités. Nous présentons l'évaluation de la performance de tir zéro des deux modèles basés sur Ontonotes et d'un nouveau modèle NER basé sur un transformateur formé sur la partie formation du corpus final. Nous publions le corpus et le modèle formé.", 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos una actualización importante del primer conjunto de datos de entidades nombradas húngaras, el corpus NER de Szeged. Utilizamos la transferencia interlingüística de tiro cero para inicializar el enriquecimiento de los tipos de entidad anotados en el corpus utilizando tres modelos neuronales de NER: dos de ellos basados en el corpus OntoNotes en inglés y uno basado en el Corpus de Entidades Nombradas Checo ajustado a partir de modelos multilingües de lenguaje neuronal. La salida de los modelos se fusionó automáticamente con la anotación NER original y se corrigió automática y manualmente y se enriqueció aún más con anotaciones adicionales, como calificadores para varios tipos de entidad. Presentamos la evaluación del rendimiento cero de los dos modelos basados en Ontonotes y un nuevo modelo NER basado en transformadores entrenado en la parte de capacitación del corpus final. Publicamos el corpus y el modelo entrenado.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos uma grande atualização para o primeiro conjunto de dados de entidades nomeadas húngaro, o corpus Szeged NER. Usamos a transferência multilíngue zero-shot para inicializar o enriquecimento de tipos de entidade anotados no corpus usando três modelos NER neurais: dois deles baseados no corpus OntoNotes em inglês e um baseado no corpus tcheco Named Entity Corpus ajustado a partir de modelos de linguagem neural multilíngue . A saída dos modelos foi automaticamente mesclada com a anotação NER original e corrigida automática e manualmente e enriquecida com anotações adicionais, como qualificadores para vários tipos de entidade. Apresentamos a avaliação do desempenho zero-shot dos dois modelos baseados em OntoNotes e um novo modelo NER baseado em transformador treinado na parte de treinamento do corpus final. Liberamos o corpus e o modelo treinado.', 'ja': 'この論文では、最初のハンガリー語で命名されたエンティティデータセットであるSged NERコーパスの大幅な更新を紹介します。私たちは、ゼロショットのクロスリンガル転送を使用して、3つのニューラルNERモデルを使用してコーパスで注釈されたエンティティタイプのエンリッチメントを初期化しました。そのうちの2つは英語のOntoNotesコーパスに基づいており、1つは多言語のニューラル言語モデルから微調整されたチェコの名前付きエンティティコーパスに基づいています。モデルの出力は、元のNERアノテーションと自動的にマージされ、さまざまなエンティティタイプの修飾子のように、自動的および手動で修正され、追加のアノテーションでさらに充実しました。2つのOntoNotesベースのモデルと、最終コーパスのトレーニング部分でトレーニングされた変圧器ベースの新しいNERモデルのゼロショット性能の評価を提示します。コーパスと訓練済みモデルをリリースします。', 'zh': '本文中,首言首匈牙利名实体数集Szeged NER语料库之大更新。 余以零次跨语移初始化用三神经NER在语料库中所注实体之饶:其二基于英语OntoNotes语料库,其一基于捷克名实体语料库,其语料库据多语言神经语言模形微调。 模输自与 NER 注并,手动自正,附注益丰,如诸体之限定符。 言二OntoNotes之新转换器NER零射之评,终于语料库之教也。 发语料库训练。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем существенное обновление первого венгерского набора данных по объектам, Szeged NER corpus. Для инициализации обогащения типов сущностей, аннотированных в корпусе с помощью трех нейронных моделей NER, мы использовали кросс-лингвальную передачу с нулевым выстрелом: две из них основаны на английском корпусе OntoNotes, а одна - на чешском именованном корпусе сущностей, доработанном на основе многоязычных нейронных языковых моделей. Вывод моделей был автоматически объединен с первоначальной аннотацией NER, а также автоматически и вручную исправлен и дополнен дополнительной аннотацией, например, квалификаторами для различных типов сущностей. Мы представляем оценку характеристик с нулевым выстрелом двух моделей на основе OntoNotes и новой модели NER на основе трансформатора, обученной на обучающей части заключительного корпуса. Мы выпускаем корпус и обученную модель.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम पहले हंगेरियन नामित इकाई डेटासेट, Szeged NER कॉर्पस के लिए एक प्रमुख अद्यतन प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमने तीन तंत्रिका एनईआर मॉडल का उपयोग करके कॉर्पस में एनोटेट किए गए एंटिटी प्रकारों के संवर्धन को शुरू करने के लिए शून्य-शॉट क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर का उपयोग किया: उनमें से दो अंग्रेजी ऑनटोनोट्स कॉर्पस पर आधारित हैं और एक चेक नामित एंटिटी कॉर्पस पर आधारित है जो बहुभाषी तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल से ठीक है। मॉडल का आउटपुट स्वचालित रूप से मूल एनईआर एनोटेशन के साथ विलय कर दिया गया था, और स्वचालित रूप से और मैन्युअल रूप से सही किया गया था और विभिन्न एंटिटी प्रकारों के लिए क्वालीफायर की तरह अतिरिक्त एनोटेशन के साथ समृद्ध किया गया था। हम दो OntoNotes-आधारित मॉडल और अंतिम कॉर्पस के प्रशिक्षण भाग पर प्रशिक्षित एक ट्रांसफार्मर-आधारित नए एनईआर मॉडल के शून्य-शॉट प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम कॉर्पस और प्रशिक्षित मॉडल जारी करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid nuashonrú mór i láthair ar an gcéad tacar sonraí aonáin ainmnithe san Ungáir, corpas Szeged NER. D’úsáideamar aistriú tras-teangach gan urchar chun saibhriú na gcineálacha aonán atá anótáilte sa chorpas a thúsú agus úsáid á baint as trí mhúnla néaránach NER: dhá cheann acu bunaithe ar chorpas Béarla OntoNotes agus ceann amháin bunaithe ar Chorpas Aonán Ainmnithe Seiceach arna mhionchoigeartú ó mhúnlaí néartheanga ilteangacha. . Rinneadh aschur na múnlaí a chumasc go huathoibríoch leis an mbunnóta NER, agus ceartaíodh é go huathoibríoch agus de láimh agus saibhríodh é le nótaí breise, amhail cáilitheoirí do chineálacha éagsúla aonán. Cuirimid i láthair an mheastóireacht ar fheidhmíocht an dá shamhail atá bunaithe ar OntoNotes agus samhail nua NER atá bunaithe ar chlaochladán atá oilte ar an gcuid oiliúna den chorpas deiridh. Scaoilimid an corpas agus an múnla oilte.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az első magyarországi elnevezett entitásadatok, a Szegedi NER korpusz jelentős frissítését. A korpuszban megjegyzett entitástípusok gazdagítását három neurális NER modellel inicializáltuk, melyek közül kettő az angol OntoNotes korpuszon alapul, másik pedig a cseh Nevezett Entity Corpus alapján, amelyeket többnyelvű neurális modellekből finomhangoltunk. A modellek kimenetét automatikusan egyesítették az eredeti NER megjegyzéssel, és automatikusan és manuálisan javították és további megjegyzésekkel gazdagították, mint például a különböző entitástípusok minősítése. Bemutatjuk a két OntoNotes alapú modell nulla lövéses teljesítményének értékelését és a végső korpusz edzési részére képzett transzformátor alapú új NER modell transzformátor alapú teljesítményének értékelését. Elengedjük a testet és a képzett modellt.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια σημαντική ενημέρωση στο πρώτο ουγγρικό σύνολο δεδομένων ονομαζόμενης οντότητας, το σώμα της Szeged NER. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε μηδενική διασταυρούμενη μεταφορά για να ξεκινήσουμε τον εμπλουτισμό των τύπων οντοτήτων που σχολιάζονται στο σώμα χρησιμοποιώντας τρία νευρωνικά μοντέλα: δύο από αυτά βασισμένα στο αγγλικό σώμα και ένα βασισμένο στο τσεχικό σώμα Οντότητας που συντονίστηκε από πολύγλωσσα μοντέλα νευρωνικής γλώσσας. Η έξοδος των μοντέλων συγχωνεύθηκε αυτόματα με την αρχική σημείωση και διορθώθηκε αυτόματα και χειροκίνητα και εμπλουτίστηκε περαιτέρω με επιπλέον σχόλια, όπως για διάφορους τύπους οντοτήτων. Παρουσιάζουμε την αξιολόγηση της απόδοσης μηδενικής βολής των δύο μοντέλων με βάση το και ένα νέο μοντέλο με βάση τον μετασχηματιστή εκπαιδευμένο στο εκπαιδευτικό τμήμα του τελικού σώματος. Θα απελευθερώσουμε το σώμα και το εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ პირველი გენდარიის სახელ ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური კოპპუსი, Szeged NER კოპუსი გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ გამოყენეთ 0-სტრიქტის კრესტრიქტის ტრანსტრენსი, რომ კორპუსში მონიშნული ელექტის ტიპების დამატება, რომელიც სამი ნეიროლური NER მოდელების გამოყენებათ: ორივე მათგანი ანგლისური OntoNotes კორპუსზე და ერთი ფექის სახელ ინტერტიტის კ მოდელების გამოსახულება ავტომატურად დაბრუნებულია, როგორც განსხვავებული ინტერტიკის ტიპებისთვის კვალიტაციებისთვის. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ორი OntoNotes-based მოდელების ნულ სტრიქტის გამოყენება და ახალი NER მოდელს, რომელიც განაკეთებულია ბოლო კორპუსის განაკეთებაში. ჩვენ კორპუსს და განსწავლებული მოდელს გადახსნა.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo un importante aggiornamento al primo dataset ungherese denominato entità, il corpus NER di Szeged. Abbiamo usato il trasferimento cross-lingual zero-shot per inizializzare l'arricchimento dei tipi di entità annotati nel corpus utilizzando tre modelli NER neurali: due basati sul corpus inglese OntoNotes e uno basato sul corpo ceco Named Entity Corpus perfezionato da modelli di linguaggio neurale multilingue. L'output dei modelli è stato automaticamente unito all'annotazione NER originale, e automaticamente e manualmente corretto e ulteriormente arricchito con annotazioni aggiuntive, come qualificatori per vari tipi di entità. Presentiamo la valutazione delle prestazioni zero-shot dei due modelli basati su OntoNotes e un nuovo modello NER basato su trasformatori addestrato sulla parte di allenamento del corpus finale. Rilasciamo il corpo e il modello addestrato.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, бірінші Венгрия аталған нысандар деректер жинағына, Szeged NER корпус жаңарту жасадық. Біз корпустың үш невралдық NER үлгілерін қолдану үшін нөл түрлерінің көпшілік тілдерінің көпшілігін бастау үшін нөл түрлерінің көпшілігін қолдандық: екіншісі ағылшын OntoNotes корпус негізінде, екіншісі Чех аталған нысандар корпус кө Моделдердің шығысы автоматты түрде негізгі NER жазбалармен біріктірілген, автоматты түрде және қолмен түзетілген және қосымша жазбалармен қосымша жазбаларды, мысалы, бірнеше нысандардың түрлерінің квали Біз OntoNotes негіздеген екі моделдердің нөл түрлендіру және соңғы корпустың оқыту бөлігінде оқылған NER моделінің жаңа түрлендіруші үлгісін бағалаймыз. Корпус мен оқыту үлгісін ашып тастаймыз.', 'lt': 'In this paper, we present a major update to the first Hungarian named entity dataset, the Szeged NER corpus.  We used zero-shot cross-lingual transfer to initialize the enrichment of entity types annotated in the corpus using three neural NER models: two of them based on the English OntoNotes corpus and one based on the Czech Named Entity Corpus finetuned from multilingual neural language models.  Modelių rezultatai automatiškai sujungti su pradine NER anotacija, automatiškai ir rankiniu būdu pataisyti ir toliau praturtinti papildomomis anotacijomis, pavyzdžiui, skirtingų tipų subjektų kvalifikacijos. Mes pristatome dviejų OntoNotes modelių nulinio nuotraukos rezultatų vertinimą ir naują transformatoriumi pagrįstą NER model į, parengtą galutinio korpuso mokymo dalyje. Mes paleisime korpusą ir treniruotą model į.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan kemaskini utama kepada set data entiti Hungaria bernama pertama, Szeged NER corpus. Kami menggunakan pemindahan saling bahasa 0-shot untuk awalkan kemahiran jenis entiti yang dicatat dalam korpus menggunakan tiga model NER saraf: dua daripada mereka berdasarkan OntoNotes corpus Inggeris dan satu berdasarkan Entity Corpus bernama Czech yang ditetapkan dari model bahasa saraf berbilang bahasa. Output model digabung secara automatik dengan anotasi NER asal, dan secara automatik dan secara manual diperbaiki dan diperiksa lebih lanjut dengan anotasi tambahan, seperti kualifikasi untuk jenis entiti berbeza. Kami memperkenalkan penilaian prestasi tembakan sifar dari dua model berdasarkan OntoNotes dan model NER baru berdasarkan pengubah dilatih pada bahagian latihan korpus akhir. Kita lepaskan korpus dan model terlatih.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме големо обновување на првиот унгарски именуван компјутер на податоци на ентитетите, Сегед НЕР корпус. Користевме нула-снимка крстојазичен трансфер за иницијализирање на богатството на типовите на ентитети кои беа анатизирани во корпусот користејќи три нервни НЕР модели: две од нив базирани на англискиот корпус OntoNotes и една базирана на чешкиот именуван ентитет корпус финетирани од мултијазични не Излезот на моделите беше автоматски спојен со оригиналната анотација НЕР, и автоматски и рачно коригиран и понатаму богат со дополнителна анотација, како квалификатори за различни типови на ентитети. Ние ја претставуваме евалуацијата на нулта снимка на двата модели базирани на OntoNotes и нов модел на НЕР базиран на трансформатор, трениран на делот од тренингот на финалниот корпус. Го ослободиме корпусот и обучениот модел.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw a ġġornament ewlieni għall-ewwel sett ta’ dejta tal-entitajiet imsejjaħ Ungeriż, is-Szeged NER corpus. Użajna trasferiment interlingwistiku b’ritratt żero biex ninzjalizzaw l-arrikkiment ta’ tipi ta’ entitajiet annotati fil-korpus bl-użu ta’ tliet mudelli newrali NER: tnejn minnhom ibbażati fuq l-Ingliż OntoNotes corpus u wieħed ibbażat fuq l-Entità Ismija Ċeka Corpus finaġġustat minn mudelli multilingwistiċi ta’ lingwi newrali. Il-produzzjoni tal-mudelli ngħaqdet awtomatikament mal-annotazzjoni oriġinali NER, u kkoreġut awtomatikament u manwalment u arrikkit aktar b’annotazzjoni addizzjonali, bħall-kwalifikaturi għal diversi tipi ta’ entitajiet. Aħna nippreżentaw l-evalwazzjoni tal-prestazzjoni żero-shot taż-żewġ mudelli bbażati fuq OntoNotes u mudell NER ġdid ibbażat fuq trasformatur imħarreġ fuq il-parti tat-taħriġ tal-korpus finali. Aħna nirrilaxxaw il-korpus u l-mudell imħarreġ.', 'ml': 'In this paper, we present a major update to the first Hungarian named entity dataset, the Szeged NER corpus.  മൂന്നു നെയുറല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നിരീക്ഷണ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കപ്പെട്ട വസ്തുക്കളുടെ സമ്പത്തിന്റെ സമ്പത്തിന്റെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശൂന്യമായി വെടിവെക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ ഉപ മോഡലുകളുടെ ഫലം സ്വയമായി നെആര്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടിയിരുന്നു, സ്വയം ശരിയാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു, കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്തു കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവ രണ്ട് ഓണ്\u200dടോനോട്ട് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡലുകളുടെ പൂജ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തിന്\u200dറെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. മാറ്റപ്പെടു നമ്മള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെയും പരിശീലന മോഡലിനെയും വിടുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид эхний Венгрийн нэрлэгдсэн entity data set, Szeged NER corpus-д хамгийн чухал шинэчлэл гаргасан. Бид хоёр нь Англи OntoNotes корпус дээр суурилсан, хоёр нь олон хэлний мэдрэлийн хэл загвараас суурилсан Чехийн нэртэй Entity Corpus дээр суурилсан. Моделуудын үр дүнг автоматаар НЕР анзаарлаас холбогдож, автоматаар, гараараа зөв, нэмэлт анзаарлаас баялагдсан. Яг олон төрлийн бүтээгдэхүүний квалификатор шиг. Бид OntoNotes-ээр суурилсан хоёр загварын тэгш удаагийн үйл ажиллагааны үнэлгээг, шинэ NER загварын суурилсан шинэ загварыг хамгийн сүүлийн корпусын сургалтын хэсэг дээр суралцагдсан. Бид корпус болон сургалтын загварыг чөлөөлдөг.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy ważną aktualizację pierwszego węgierskiego zbioru danych o nazwie jednostki, korpusu Szegeda NER. Wykorzystaliśmy zero-shot cross-lingual transfer do inicjalizacji wzbogacania typów jednostek adnotacyjnych w korpusie przy użyciu trzech neuronowych modeli NER: dwóch z nich opartych na angielskim korpusie OntoNotes i jeden oparty na czeskim korpusie nazwanym Entity Corpus dostrojonym z wielojęzycznych modeli językowych neuronowych. Wyjście modeli zostało automatycznie połączone z oryginalną adnotacją NER, automatycznie i ręcznie poprawione i dodatkowo wzbogacone o dodatkową adnotację, taką jak kwalifikatory dla różnych typów podmiotów. Przedstawiamy ocenę wydajności zero-shot dwóch modeli opartych na OntoNotes oraz nowego modelu NER opartego na transformatorze przeszkolonego na części szkoleniowej końcowego korpusu. Uwolnimy korpus i trenowany model.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi ein stor oppdatering til den første ungarske dataset med namnet på entitet, Szeged NER corpus. Vi brukte krysspråk-overføring med null-snitt for å starta forstørring av entitetstypar merkt i korpusen med tre neurale NER-modeller: to av dei baserte på engelske OntoNotes corpus og ein basert på Tsjekkiske namnet entitetskorpus finett frå fleirspråk-modeller. Utdata av modellen ble automatisk fletta med den opprinnelige NER- notasjonen, og automatisk og manuelt korrigerte og framleis røyd med ekstra notasjon, som kvalifikarar for ulike entitetstypar. Vi presenterer evalueringa av nullsatt utviklinga av to modelane som er basert på OntoNotes og ein transformeringsbasert ny NER-modell som er trent på øvingsdelen av den siste korpusen. Vi løyser korpusen og den trengte modellen.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm o actualizare majoră a primului set de date cu entități denumite maghiare, corpusul NER Szeged. Am folosit transferul translingvistic zero-shot pentru a inițializa îmbogățirea tipurilor de entități adnotate în corp folosind trei modele NER neurale: două dintre ele bazate pe corpul englez OntoNotes și unul bazat pe corpul ceh Named Entity Corpus fin tunat pe modele de limbaj neural multilingv. Rezultatul modelelor a fost îmbinat automat cu adnotările NER originale și corectat automat și manual și îmbogățit cu adnotări suplimentare, cum ar fi calificatoarele pentru diferite tipuri de entități. Vă prezentăm evaluarea performanței zero-shot a celor două modele bazate pe OntoNotes și a unui nou model NER bazat pe transformator instruit pe partea de formare a corpului final. Eliberăm corpul şi modelul antrenat.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo veliku aktualizaciju prvoj mađarskoj podaci podataka po imenu entiteta, Szeged NER korpusu. Koristili smo krstojezički prebacivanje nule snimke da bi inicijalizirali bogatstvo tipa entiteta annotiranih u korpusu koristeći tri neuralne modela NER-a: dve od njih zasnovane na korpusu engleskog OntoNotes i jedan zasnovan na češkom imenovanom entitetu korpusu izvršenom iz multijezičkih neuralnih modela. Proizvod modela je automatski povezan s originalnim NOR annotacijom, i automatski i ručno ispravljenim i dalje bogatim dodatnim annotacijom, poput kvalifikatora za različite vrste entiteta. Predstavljamo procjenu rezultata nule snimke dva model a baziranog na OntoNotes-u i novog modela NER-a na transformaciji koji je obučen na treningu krajnjeg korpusa. Puštamo korpus i obučeni model.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi en viktig uppdatering av den f繹rsta ungerska namngivna entitetsdataupps瓣ttningen, Szeged NER corpus. Vi anv瓣nde noll-skott cross-lingual transfer f繹r att initiera berikningen av entitetstyper kommenterade i korpusen med hj瓣lp av tre neurala NER-modeller: tv疇 av dem baserade p疇 den engelska OntoNotes-korpusen och en baserad p疇 tjeckiska Named Entity Corpus finjusterade fr疇n flerspr疇kiga neurala spr疇kmodeller. Modellernas resultat sammanfogades automatiskt med den ursprungliga NER-anteckningen och korrigerades automatiskt och manuellt och kompletterades ytterligare med ytterligare anteckningar, som kvalifikationer f繹r olika entitetstyper. Vi presenterar utv瓣rderingen av de tv疇 OntoNotes-baserade modellernas nollskott-prestanda och en transformatorbaserad ny NER-modell utbildad p疇 tr瓣ningsdelen av den slutliga korpusen. Vi sl瓣pper kroppen och den utbildade modellen.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරධාන අවස්ථානයක් පෙන්වන්නේ පළමු හන්ගේරියාන්ගෙරියාන්ගේ නම් තොරතුරු සෙට්, ස්සෙගෙ අපි කොර්පුස් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරලා තියෙන්න සුන්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාවිත කරනවා: ඔවුන්ගේ දෙන්නෙක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ඇන්ටෝ මොඩේල්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති අපි ඔන්ටෝනොට්ස් අධාරිත දෙන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ අන්තිම කොර්පුස් අධාරිත අළුත් NER මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා. අපි කෝර්පස් එක්ක සහ ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙනවා.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxan ku qornaa taariikh weyn ee ugu horeysa Hungariyan ee la magacaabay macluumaadka ee dhamaadka ee Szeged NER. Waxaannu isticmaalnay wareejinta luqadaha nooca ah oo aan kooban lahayn si aan u bilowno hodantinimada noocyada dhamaanka ee qoyska lagu xumeeyey, waxaana isticmaalnay saddex noocyo neural ah ee NER: labadooda oo ku saleysan qoraalka afka Ingiriiska OntoNotes iyo mid ku saleysan qoraalka magaca Czech Entity Corpus oo ka soo bandhigay noocyada afka kala duduwan. Midhaha modellada waxaa si automatic ah loogu soo bandhigay waraaqaha asalka ah ee NER, waxaana lagu saxeeyey si rasmi ah iyo si gacan ah loo hagaajiyey, waxaana lagu kordhiyey dhibaato dheeraad ah, sida qofka aqoonsiga ah noocyo kala duduwan. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qiimeynta sameynta noocyada ku saleysan labada OntoNotes iyo model cusub oo lagu tababaray tababarka ugu dambeeya ee NER. Waxaynu furaynaa midibka tababarida.', 'ta': 'In this paper, we present a major update to the first Hungarian named entity dataset, the Szeged NER corpus.  நாம் பூஜ்ஜியமான மொழி மாற்றம் மாற்ற பயன்படுத்தி கார்புஸ் மூன்று நெருக்கர் மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி குறிப்பிட்ட பொருள் வகைகளின் வளர்ச்சியை ஆரம்பிக்க பயன்படுத்தினோம்: அவை இரண்டு ஆங்கிலத் Name நாம் இரண்டு OntoNotes-based மாதிரிகளின் பூஜ்ஜியத்தின் செயல்பாட்டின் மதிப்பினை காண்பிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் ஒரு மாற்று அடிப்படையான புதிய NER மாத நாம் கோர்பாஸ் மற்றும் பயிற்சி மாதிரி வெளியேறுகிறோம்.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلی ہنگرین کے نام پر ایک بڑا اڈیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ، سجگڈ نیر کورپوس کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے صفر-شٹ کروسٹ زبان ترنسفور کا استعمال کیا تھا کہ کورپوس میں تین نئورل NER موڈل کے مطابق بتایا گیا ہے، ان میں سے دو انگلیسی آنٹنوٹ کورپوس پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں اور ایک چک کے نام دار انٹیٹی کورپوس پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے جو بہت سی زبان کی نئورل زبان موڈل سے پاک ہوا ہے نمڈلوں کا اپوٹٹٹ اتمام سے نیر انٹیٹ کے ساتھ مل گیا تھا، اور اپنے ساتھ سمجھا گیا اور اضافہ انٹیٹ کے ساتھ اضافہ انٹیٹ کے ساتھ اضافہ کیا گیا، جیسے مختلف انٹیٹ ٹیپاؤں کے لئے کیفیفر. ہم نے ان دونوں OntoNotes-based موڈلوں کے صفر-شٹ کی ارزیابی کا ارزیابی پیش کرتا ہے اور ایک تغییر دینے والی نوی NER موڈل کو آخری کورپوس کی تربین کے ٹکڑے پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے. ہم کورپوس اور تعلیم کی مدل کو چھوڑ دیتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz birinchi Hungariyaga ma'lumotlar tizimi haqida yangilikni hozir qilamiz. Biz qoʻshimcha ma'lumotning turlarini uchta neyron NER modellari bilan ishlatish uchun hech narsa tilning tarkibini ishlatdik. Ularning ikkita ingliz tilidagi OntoNotes corpus asosida va biri xizcha nomi Entity Corpus bilan bir necha tilning neyron modellaridan foydalanadi. Name Biz ikkita OntoNotes asosida nuqta shaklga bajarish imkoniyatini ko'rib chiqaramiz va oxirgi kompyuterning tizimini o'rganishga yangi transformer asosida yangi NER modelini o'rganimiz. We release the corpus and the trained model.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một cập nhật quan trọng về bộ dữ liệu thứ nhất của tổ chức Hungary tên là, tập đoàn Szeged NER. Chúng tôi đã dùng truyền ngôn ngữ không bắn chéo nhau để khởi tạo việc làm giàu các loại thực thể được ghi chú trong tập thể bằng ba mẫu nằm trong số đó: hai trong số đó dựa trên tập thể OntoNotes Anh và một dựa trên cấu trúc của Tề, nghĩa thể, được tinh chỉnh chính từ các mô hình thần kinh đa dạng. Sản phẩm của các mô-đun đã tự động được nhập vào sử dụng tối đa gốc, và tự động và tự động sửa chữa và thêm thêm thêm với ghi chú bổ sung, như hiệu ứng cho các kiểu thực thể khác nhau. Chúng tôi giới thiệu đánh giá hiệu suất bắn không của hai mô hình phụ thuộc vào OntoNotes và một mô hình mới dựa vào người máy biến hình được đào tạo trong phần huấn luyện của tập đoàn cuối cùng. Chúng tôi giải phóng y đội và người mẫu được huấn luyện.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме основна актуализация на първия унгарски набор от данни за образувания, корпуса на Шегед НЕР. Използвахме нулев междуезичен трансфер, за да инициализираме обогатяването на типове същества, анотирани в корпуса, като използваме три неврални модела: два от тях базирани на английския корпус и един базиран на чешкия корпус с имена на същества, финизиран от многоезични неврални езикови модели. Изходът на моделите беше автоматично обединен с оригиналната анотация и автоматично и ръчно коригиран и допълнително обогатен с допълнителна анотация, като квалификатори за различни типове обекти. Представяме оценка на ефективността при нулев изстрел на двата модела базирани на ОнтоБележки и трансформаторно базиран нов модел обучен върху тренировъчната част на крайния корпус. Освобождаваме корпуса и тренирания модел.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we een belangrijke update van de eerste Hongaarse named entity dataset, het Szeged NER corpus. We gebruikten zero-shot cross-lingual transfer om de verrijking van entiteittypes geannoteerd in het corpus te initialiseren met behulp van drie neurale NER modellen: twee gebaseerd op het Engelse OntoNotes corpus en één gebaseerd op het Tsjechisch Named Entity Corpus, verfijnd op basis van meertalige neurale taalmodellen. De output van de modellen werd automatisch samengevoegd met de originele NER annotatie, en automatisch en handmatig gecorrigeerd en verder verrijkt met aanvullende annotatie, zoals kwalificaties voor verschillende entiteitstypen. We presenteren de evaluatie van de zero-shot prestaties van de twee OntoNotes-gebaseerde modellen en een transformator-gebaseerd nieuw NER model getraind op het trainingsdeel van het uiteindelijke corpus. We geven het corpus en het getrainde model vrij.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi en vigtig opdatering af det første ungarske navngivne entitetsdatasæt, Szeged NER korpus. Vi brugte zero-shot tværsproget overførsel til at initialisere berigelsen af entitetstyper annoteret i korpuset ved hjælp af tre neurale NER modeller: to af dem baseret på den engelske OntoNotes korpus og en baseret på den tjekkiske navngivne entitetskorpus finjusteret fra flersprogede neurale sprogmodeller. Modellernes output blev automatisk flettet sammen med den oprindelige NER annotation, og automatisk og manuelt korrigeret og yderligere beriget med yderligere annotation, som kvalifikationer for forskellige entitetstyper. Vi præsenterer evalueringen af nul-shot performance af de to OntoNotes-baserede modeller og en transformer-baseret ny NER model trænet på træningsdelen af det endelige korpus. Vi frigiver kroppen og den trænede model.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo veliku aktualizaciju prvoj mađarskoj podaci podataka po imenu entiteta, Szeged NER korpusu. Koristili smo krstojezički prebacivanje nule snimke kako bi se inicijalizirali bogatstvo tipa entiteta annotiranih u korpusu koristeći tri neuralne modela NER-a: dvije od njih zasnovane na engleskom korpusu OntoNotes korpusu i jedan zasnovan na češkom imenovanom entitetu korpusu finiranom iz multijezičkih neuralnih modela. Proizvod modela je automatski povezan s originalnim NOR annotacijom i automatski i ručno ispravljenim i dalje bogatim dodatnim annotacijom, poput kvalifikatora za različite vrste entiteta. Predstavljamo procjenu rezultata nule-pucnjave dva model a na temelju OntoNotes-a i novi modela NER-a na transformatoru obučen na osnovu obuke konačnog korpusa. Puštamo korpus i obučeni model.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 첫 번째 헝가리 명명 실체 데이터 집합인 Szeged-NER 자료 라이브러리에 대해 중대한 업데이트를 진행했다.우리는 세 개의 신경 네트워크 모델을 사용하여 자료 라이브러리에 주석된 실체 유형의 풍부함을 초기화하기 위해 0회 크로스 언어 이동을 사용합니다. 그 중에서 두 개의 영어 OntoNotes 자료 라이브러리는 다중 언어 신경 언어 모델에서 미세하게 조정된 체코 명칭의 실체 자료 라이브러리입니다.모델의 출력은 원본 NER 주석과 자동으로 결합되고 자동 및 수동으로 수정되며 다양한 솔리드 유형의 제한 문자와 같은 추가 주석을 통해 더욱 풍부해집니다.우리는 두 개의 Onto Notes 기반 모델과 트랜스포머 기반의 새로운 NER 모델이 최종 어료 라이브러리의 훈련 부분에서 제로 사격 성능을 평가했다.우리는 어료 라이브러리와 훈련을 거친 모형을 발표했다.', 'id': 'In this paper, we present a major update to the first Hungarian named entity dataset, the Szeged NER corpus.  Kami menggunakan transfer saling bahasa dengan 0 tembakan untuk menginisialisasi pengkaya dari jenis entitas yang dicatat dalam korpus menggunakan tiga model NER saraf: dua dari mereka berdasarkan pada OntoNotes corpus Inggris dan satu berdasarkan Entity Corpus bernama Czech finetuned dari model bahasa saraf multibahasa. Output dari model secara otomatis bergabung dengan anotasi NER asli, dan secara otomatis dan secara manual diperbaiki dan lebih kaya dengan anotasi tambahan, seperti kualifikasi untuk berbagai jenis entitas. Kami mempersembahkan evaluasi prestasi zero-shot dari dua model berdasarkan OntoNotes dan model NER baru berdasarkan transformer dilatih pada bagian pelatihan dari korpus akhir. Kami melepaskan corpus dan model terlatih.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunaweka taarifa kubwa kwa KiHungaria wa kwanza inayoitwa taarifa za vyombo vya habari, kampuni ya Szech NER. Tulitumia uhamishaji wa lugha isiyo na risasi ili kuanzisha utajiri wa aina za entity zilizotajwa katika makampuni hayo kwa kutumia mifano mitatu ya NER ya kiserikali: wawili wao wakitumia makampuni ya Kiingereza OntoNotes na moja kwa kutumia kampuni ya Kizech inayoitwa Entity Corpus imetengenezwa kutoka kwenye mifano ya lugha ya asili ya lugha nyingine. The output of the models was automatically merged with the original NER annotation, and automatically and manually corrected and further enriched with additional annotation, like qualifiers for various entity types.  Tunaweza kuweka tathmini ya utendaji wa picha za mifano miwili yenye msingi wa OntoNotes na modeli mpya ya Mtandao wa Mabadiliko yaliyojifunza kuhusu mafunzo ya mashirika ya mwisho. Tunaachia mkononi na mtindo wa mafunzo.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما به اولین مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای عنوان مجموعه\u200cی مجموعه\u200cی مجموعه\u200cی NER Szeged یک جدید بزرگی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. ما با استفاده از انتقال زبان\u200cهای مختلف صفر استفاده کردیم تا به آغاز کردن نوع\u200cهایی که در کورپوس با استفاده از سه مدل\u200cهای NER عصبی به عنوان سه مدل\u200cهای نیورال استفاده می\u200cکنند: دوتا از آنها بر اساس کورپوس انگلیسی OntoNotes و یکی بر اساس اولیت\u200cهای چک نامیده شده\u200cای که از مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای عصبی\u200c نتیجه مدلها به طور خودکار با نویسندۀ اصلی NER متصل شده و به طور خودکار و دستی درست شده و بیشتر با نویسندۀ اضافه\u200cای ثروتمند شده، مانند قابلیت\u200cکنندگان برای نویسندۀ متفاوتی. ما ارزیابی عملکرد صفر از دو مدل بر اساس OntoNotes و یک مدل جدید NER بر اساس تغییر دهنده آموزش یافته در قسمت تمرین آخرین کورپوس را پیشنهاد می کنیم. ما کورپوس و مدل آموزش رو آزاد ميکنيم', 'sq': 'Në këtë gazetë, ne paraqesim një përditësim të madh në grupin e parë të të dhënave të njësisë së quajtur Hungarez, Korpus NER Szeged. Ne përdorëm transferim zero-shot ndërgjuhës për të inicializuar pasurinë e llojeve të njësive të anotuara në korpus duke përdorur tre modele neurale NER: dy prej tyre bazuar në korpus anglez OntoNotes dhe një bazuar në korpus çek të emëruar njësi finetuned nga modele gjuhësh neurale shumëgjuhëse. Rezultati i modeleve u bashkua automatikisht me anotacionin origjinal NER dhe u korrigjua automatikisht dhe manualisht dhe u pasurua më tej me anotacion shtesë, si kualifikatorët për lloje të ndryshme njësi. Ne paraqesim vlerësimin e performancës zero-shot të dy modeleve me bazë në OntoNotes dhe një model të ri NER me bazë në transformues të stërvitur në pjesën e stërvitjes së korpusit përfundimtar. Ne lirojmë korpusin dhe modelin e trajnuar.', 'af': "In hierdie papier stel ons 'n groot opdatering aan die eerste Hongaarske entiteit-dataset, die Szeged NER corpus. Ons het nul-skoot kruistale oordrag gebruik om die verryking van einiteit tipes wat in die korpus aangekies word deur drie neurale NER modele te gebruik: twee van hulle gebaseer op die Engelske OntoNotes korpus en een gebaseer op die Tschekiske genoem Entiteit Korpus van multilinglike neurale taal modele te laat optrek. Die uitvoer van die modele was outomaties saamgevoeg met die oorspronklike NER annotasie, en outomaties en handkorrigeer en verdere ryk met addisionele annotasie, soos kwalifiseerders vir verskeie entiteittipes. Ons stel die evaluasie van die nul-skoot prestasie van die twee OntoNotes-gebaseerde modele en 'n transformer-gebaseerde nuwe NER model wat op die oefening deel van die eindelike korpus opgelei is. Ons verlos die korpus en die opgelei model.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, Szeged NER korpusynyň ilkinji maňgara adly zat setirine esasy güncelleştirildik. Biz korpusda nähili NER modellerini ulanmak üçin hasaplanýan zatlaryň baýramçylygyny ulandyk: ikisiniň iňlisçe OntoNotes korpusyna daýanýan we bir Çehiň ady Entity Korpusynda gollanýan. Modelleriň netijesi öz-özüne NER täblisasi bilen birleştirildi we olaryň üstini düzeldildi we daşry bir täblisasi bilen baýlaşdyr. OntoNotes tabanly iki nusganyň nul atylygynyň çykyşyny we iňki korpusyň eğitim böleginde bilinen täze bir NER nusgasyny çykýarys. Biz korpusy we bilinmeli nusgany boşadyrys.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የመጀመሪያውን ሀንጋሪያን አካባቢ ዳታተር፣ የSzeged NER ኮፕስስ የተባለውን ትልቅ አዋጅ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ በኮርፓስ ውስጥ የተቃወመ የሆኑት አካባቢ ዓይነት ጥቅም ለመጀመሪያ የzero-shot የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ልውስ ተጠቃሚ ነበር፤ ሁለቱም በንግግሊዝኛ OntoNotes ኮርፓስ እና አንዱ በብዙ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ላይ የተመሳሳይ የቻክክ ስም Entity Corpus በመሠረት ነው፡፡ የሞዴሎቹ ውጤት አቀማመጥ የNER ማስታወሻ በተለየ እና በሐሳብ አስተካክሎ እና በተጨማሪም ማስታወቂያ በተጨማሪው እና በተጨማሪው አካባቢ መጠቀም የተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ የሁለቱን OntoNotes-based models እና የመጨረሻውን ኮርፓስ ትምህርት የተጠቃሚ አዲስ የNER ሞዴል እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ቆርፓስን እና ተማሪዎቹን ሞዴል እናወጣለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք հիմնական վերականգնումներ առաջին հունգարեն կոչվող էության տվյալների համակարգին՝ Սեգեդ ՆԵՌ կորպուսին: Մենք օգտագործեցինք զրոյական խաչլեզվի փոխանցումը, որպեսզի սկսենք մարմնում նշումնավորված էության տիպերի հարստացումը օգտագործելով երեք նյարդային ՆԵՌ մոդել: Դրանցից երկուսը հիմնված են Անգլերենի Օնտոնոտեսի մարմնի վրա և մեկը՝ Չեքիայի կոչվող էության կորպոսի վրա, որն Մոդելների արտադրությունը ինքնաբերաբար միացվեց սկզբնական ՆԵՌ նոտացիայի հետ, և ինքնաբերաբար, ձեռքով վերափոխվեց և ավելի հարստացվեց ավելացված նոտացիայի միջոցով, ինչպիսիք են տարբեր անհատականության տեսակների կոլիֆիլ Մենք ներկայացնում ենք երկու Օնտոնոտեսի հիմնված մոդելների զրոյի արտադրողականության գնահատումը և վերջնական կորպոսի ուսուցման մասում ուսուցանված նոր ՆԵՌ մոդելը: Մենք ազատում ենք կորպոսին և պատրաստված մոդելը:', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine wesentliche Aktualisierung des ersten ungarischen Datensatzes namens Entity vor, dem Szeged NER-Korpus. Wir nutzten Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual Transfer, um die Anreicherung von Entitätstypen zu initialisieren, die im Korpus annotiert wurden. Dabei wurden drei neurale NER-Modelle verwendet: zwei basieren auf dem englischen OntoNotes-Korpus und eines basiert auf dem Czech Named Entity Corpus, das aus mehrsprachigen neuronalen Sprachmodellen fein abgestimmt wurde. Die Ausgabe der Modelle wurde automatisch mit der ursprünglichen NER-Annotation zusammengeführt und automatisch und manuell korrigiert und mit zusätzlichen Annotationen, wie Qualifizierern für verschiedene Entity-Typen, weiter angereichert. Wir präsentieren die Bewertung der Nullschussleistung der beiden OntoNotes-basierten Modelle und eines transformatorbasierten neuen NER-Modells, das auf dem Trainingsteil des endgültigen Korpus trainiert wurde. Wir geben den Korpus und das trainierte Modell frei.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo veliku aktualizaciju prvoj mađarskoj podaci podataka po imenu entiteta, Szeged NER korpusu. Koristili smo krstojezički prebacivanje nule snimke kako bi se inicijalizirali bogatstvo tipa entiteta annotiranih u korpusu koristeći tri neuralne modela NER-a: dvije od njih zasnovane na korpusu engleskog OntoNotes-a i jedan zasnovan na češkom imenovanom entitetu korpusu finiranom iz multijezičkih neuralnih modela. Proizvod modela je automatski ujedinjen s originalnim NOR annotacijom, i automatski i ručno ispravljenim i dalje bogatim dodatnim annotacijom, poput kvalifikatora za različite vrste entiteta. Predstavljamo procjenu rezultata nule snimke dva model a baziranog na OntoNotes-u i novog modela NER-a na transformatoru obučenog na trening dio konačnog korpusa. Puštamo korpus i obučeni model.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, Szeged NER korpusu ilk mağara adlı entity veri qutusuna böyük güncellik göstəririk. Biz korpusda üç nöral NER modellərini istifadə etmək üçün nörf-shot çox dilli tərəflər istifadə etdik: ikisi İngilizci OntoNotes korpusu və birisi Çək Adlı Entity Corpusu çoxlu dil nöral modellərindən qurulmuşdur. Modellərin çıxışı öz-özünə NER məlumatları ilə birləşdirildi, avtomatik və əlində düzəldildi və daha artıq müxtəlif məlumat növlərinin qabiliyyətləri kimi daha çox xərcləndirildi. Biz OntoNotes tabanlı modellərin sıfır-fəsad performansının və transformer-tabanlı yeni NER modeli, son korpusun təhsil edilən təhsil bölümündə təhsil edilmişdir. Biz korpusu və təhsil edilmiş modeli yayındırırıq.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রথম হাঙ্গেরিয়ার তথ্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্য সংক্রান্ত একটি বিশাল আপডেট উপস্থাপন করেছি, যার নাম শ্রে আমরা শুধুমাত্র ক্রস-ভাষাভাষী পরিবর্তন ব্যবহার করেছিলাম কোর্পাসে বিভিন্ন ধরনের সমৃদ্ধের সমৃদ্ধ শুরু করার জন্য: তিন নিউরেল নেটার মডেল ব্যবহার করেছিলাম: তাদের দুই ই ইংরেজি অনটনোট কোর্পা মডেলের আউটপুট স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সংযুক্ত হয়েছে নির্বাচনের সাথে, এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সংশোধন করা হয়েছে এবং আরো সমৃদ্ধ হয়েছে ব আমরা দুই অনটনোট ভিত্তিক মডেল এবং পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক নতুন নেটার মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করেছি। আমরা কোর্পাস এবং প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল ছেড়ে দেব।', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitame olulise uuenduse esimesele Ungari nimega üksuste andmekogumile Szeged NER korpusele. Korpuses märgitud olemitüüpide rikastamise initsialiseerimiseks kasutasime null-shot-keelelist ülekannet kolme neuraalse NER mudeli abil: kaks neist põhinevad inglise OntoNotes korpusel ja üks põhineb Tšehhi nimelise olemi korpusel, mis on peenestatud mitmekeelsetest neuraalkeele mudelitest. Mudelite väljund ühendati automaatselt algse NER-i annotatsiooniga ning parandati automaatselt ja käsitsi ning täiendati täiendavate annotatsioonidega, nagu erinevate olemitüüpide kvalifitseerijad. Esitleme kahe OntoNotes-põhise mudeli ja lõppkorpuse koolitusosal koolitatud trafopõhise uue NER-mudeli nullpõhise jõudluse hindamist. Me vabastame korpuse ja treenitud mudeli.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme významnou aktualizaci první maďarské datové sady jmenovaných entit, korpusu Szeged NER. Pro inicializaci obohacení typů entit anotovaných v korpusu jsme použili nulový cross-jazyčný transfer pomocí tří neuronových NER modelů: dvou z nich založených na korpusu anglického OntoNotes a jeden založený na korpusu českých jmenovaných entit vyladěný z vícejazyčných neuronových jazykových modelů. Výstup modelů byl automaticky sloučen s původní NER anotací a automaticky a ručně opraven a dále obohacen o další anotaci, jako jsou kvalifikátory pro různé typy entit. Představujeme hodnocení nulového výkonu dvou modelů založených na OntoNotes a nového NER modelu založeného na transformátoru trénovaného na tréninkové části konečného korpusu. Uvolníme korpus a trénovaný model.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme merkittävän päivityksen ensimmäiseen unkarilaiseen nimettyyn entiteettiaineistoon, Szeged NER -korpuseen. Alustimme korpuseen merkittyjen entiteettityyppien rikastumisen nolla-shotilla kielienvälisellä siirrolla käyttäen kolmea neuraalista NER-mallia, joista kaksi perustuu englanninkieliseen OntoNotes-korpuseen ja yksi perustuu tšekkiläiseen nimettyyn entiteettikorpuseen, joka on hienosäädetty monikielisistä neurokielimalleista. Mallien tuotos yhdistettiin automaattisesti alkuperäiseen NER-merkintään, korjattiin automaattisesti ja manuaalisesti ja täydennettiin lisämerkinnällä, kuten eri kokonaisuustyypeille. Esittelemme kahden OntoNotes-pohjaisen mallin ja muuntajapohjaisen uuden NER-mallin nollashot-suorituskyvyn arvioinnin, joka on koulutettu loppukorpuksen harjoitusosaan. Vapautamme corpuksen ja koulutetun mallin.', 'ca': "In this paper, we present a major update to the first Hungarian named entity dataset, the Szeged NER corpus.  Vam utilitzar una transfer ència interllengua de fotografies zero per iniciar l'enriqueciment de tipus d'entitats anotats al còrpus utilitzant tres models neurals NER: dos basats en el corpus anglès OntoNotes i un basat en el còrpus cec Named Entity Corpus finat a partir de models multillenguatges neurals. La producció dels models es va fusionar automàticament amb l'anotació original NER, i es va corregir automàticament i manualment i es va enriquecer més amb anotació adicional, com els qualificators de diversos tipus d'entitats. Presentam l'evaluació del desenvolupament zero de dos models basats en OntoNotes i un nou model NER basat en transformadors entrenat en la part d'entrenament del corpus final. Vam alliberar el corpus i el model entrenat.", 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã gaura kodi mai girma zuwa na farkon Hungari wanda aka jina karãtun maɓallin abun, Shirin Szeed NER. Ba mu yi amfani da shifo-shifo na-sifri-lugha ba dõmin ka farata rikin nau'in nau'in abubuwa da misãlai uku masu motsi na NER: biyu na rubutu a kan English OntoNotes Corbas da ɗayan a kan Czech wanda aka ambaci Entity Corbus finjued daga misãlai na harshen multilingular neural. Outputs of shirin ayuka an haɗa shi farat ɗaya da shirin nunowa na NER na farko, kuma an daidaita shi da hannayen farat ɗaya kuma aka rikitar da shi da zartar da ƙaranci, kamar masu tsari wa nau'in abun daban. Tuna halatar da evalucin gyaran-sifo na biyu na OntoNotes da wata misalin na shifo-based na NER wanda aka sanar da shi a kan shirin rabon ƙarshen makampuni. Munã sakar da koruba da misalin wanda aka yi wa sha.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo pomembno posodobitev prvega madžarskega imenovanega nabora podatkov subjektov, korpusa Szeged NER. Z uporabo ničelnega medjezičnega prenosa smo inicializirali obogatitev entitetnih tipov, označenih v korpusu, z uporabo treh nevronskih NER modelov: dva temeljita na angleškem korpusu OntoNotes in eden temelji na češkem imenovanem entitetnem korpusu, izdelanem iz večjezičnih nevronskih jezikovnih modelov. Izhod modelov je bil samodejno združen z originalno opombo NER, samodejno in ročno popravljen in dodatno obogaten z dodatnimi opombami, kot so kvalifikatorji za različne vrste entitet. Predstavljamo oceno zmogljivosti brez strela dveh modela OntoNotes in novega modela NER, ki temelji na transformatorju, usposobljenega na treningu končnega korpusa. Izdali bomo korpus in usposobljen model.', 'jv': 'Nang pepul iki, awak dhéwé ngewehke perusahaan langkung pawaran kanggo nganggo dataset, kawit anjut podho sing isih perusahaan, seneng Cegat NeR. Awak dhéwé nggunakake karo perusahaan-perusahaan anyar-perusahaan kanggo mulasai nggawe nik angkang dibutuhke kuwi tindakan anyari luwih apik dhéwé nang sampek telu model NeR: duruh karo hal sampek sing dibutuhke sak sumunggal Inggris OntNotis output de modelo sing automatically glebutton with the first "NUR" to "Manual Awak dhéwé éntuk kalih perusahaan nggawe barang kelas telu nggawe model sing bisa OntNotin karo model sing basa gambar nggawe transformer sadéwé, oleh nggawe sistem NGR sadéwé, lan uwong saiki gedung kapus tanggal terakhi. Awak dhéwé mbukaké karo model sing nyebutaké.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים עדכון גדול לקבוצת נתונים של היחידות הראשונה בשם הונגרי, הקורפוס "סגיד ניר". We used zero-shot cross-lingual transfer to initialize the enrichment of entity types annotated in the corpus using three neural NER models: two of them based on the English OntoNotes corpus and one based on the Czech Named Entity Corpus finetuned from multilingual neural language models.  התוצאה של הדוגמנים התמזמזה באופן אוטומטי עם הערות המקורית של NER, ומתקנה באופן אוטומטי ובידני ומעשירה נוספת עם הערות נוספת, כמו מיישורים לסוגי יחידות שונים. אנחנו מציגים את הערכה של ההופעה של שני הדוגמנים המבוססים על OntoNotes ובמודל NER חדש המבוסס על מעבר מאומן בחלק האימון של הקורפוס הסופי. We release the corpus and the trained model.', 'bo': 'འོག We used zero-shot cross-lingual transfer to initialize the enrichment of entity types annotated in the corpus using three neural NER models: two of them based on the English OntoNotes corpus and one based on the Czech Named Entity Corpus finetuned from multilingual neural language models. The output of the models was automatically merged with the original NER annotation, and automatically and manually corrected and further enriched with additional annotation, like qualifiers for various entity types. ང་ཚོས་OntoNotes་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་མིག་ཐག་ཡོད་པའི་ཚད་ལྟར་བ་ཐག་ཡོད་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས ང་ཚོས་ཀུང་དབུགས་དང་གཙོ་བོ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཆོག་འདོད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'A Call for Clarity in Contemporary Authorship Attribution Evaluation', 'ar': 'دعوة للتوضيح في تقييم إسناد التأليف المعاصر', 'fr': "Un appel à la clarté dans l'évaluation de l'attribution de la paternité contemporaine", 'pt': 'Um apelo à clareza na avaliação de atribuição de autoria contemporânea', 'es': 'Un llamado a la claridad en la evaluación de atribución de autoría contemporánea', 'ja': '現代の著作権帰属評価における明確さの呼びかけ', 'ru': 'Призыв к ясности в оценке атрибуции современного авторства', 'hi': 'समकालीन लेखकत्व एट्रिब्यूशन मूल्यांकन में स्पष्टता के लिए एक कॉल', 'zh': '吁嗟当世客,属评清白中', 'ga': 'Glao ar Shoiléire i Measúnacht Leithdháilte Údair Chomhaimseartha', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια πρόσκληση για σαφήνεια στη σύγχρονη αξιολόγηση αποδόσεων συγγραφέων', 'hu': 'Felhívás a világosságra a kortárs szerzői tulajdonítás értékelésében', 'it': "Un invito alla chiarezza nella valutazione contemporanea dell'attribuzione dell'autore", 'kk': 'Қазіргі авторитет атрибуттарының түсініктемесін шақыруName', 'lt': 'Skambinimas aiškiai įvertinti šiuolaikinį autoriaus teisių suteikimą', 'ms': 'A Call for Clarity in Contemporary Authorship Attribution Evaluation', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള അധികാരത്തിന്റെ അധികാരത്തിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Sejħa għal Ċarezza fl-Evalwazzjoni tal-Attribuzzjoni tal-Awtorità Kontemporanja', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Un apel pentru claritate în evaluarea atribuirii contemporane a autorității', 'sr': 'Poziv za jasnost u suvremenoj procjeni privlačnosti autoriteta', 'si': 'Name', 'so': "Wixii aad ku codsato caddeynta shahaadada ee hay'adda shaqada", 'sv': 'En uppmaning till tydlighet i samtida authorship Attribution Evaluation', 'mn': 'Орчин үеийн зохиолчдын харилцааны үнэлгээнд тодорхойлолтын дуудлага', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ایک آواز روشنی کے لئے ایک آواز آزمائش کرنا', 'pl': 'Wezwanie do jasności we współczesnej ocenie atrybucji autorskiej', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Cuộc gọi cho sự rõ ràng trong giá trị người nhái.', 'bg': 'Покана за яснота в съвременната оценка на авторското признание', 'hr': 'Poziv za jasnost u vrijednoj procjeni privlačnosti autoriteta', 'da': 'En opfordring til klarhed i vurderingen af nutidig tildeling af forfatterskab', 'de': 'Ein Aufruf zur Klarheit in der Bewertung zeitgenössischer Autorenschaft Attribution', 'nl': 'Een oproep tot duidelijkheid in hedendaagse auteurship attributie evaluatie', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '당대 작가에 대한 귀인 평가에서의 명확한 외침', 'sw': 'Wito wa Uthibitisho wa Tathmini wa Mamlaka ya sasa', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një thirrje për qartësi në vlerësimin e atribucionit të autorisë së përkohshme', 'hy': 'A Call for Clarity in Contemporary Authorship Attribution Evaluation', 'id': 'Sebuah Panggilan untuk Kejelasan dalam Evaluasi Atribusi Autoritas Contemporary', 'tr': 'A ýratyn Awtomatik Taýýarlama Aralygy', 'bs': 'Poziv za jasnost u vrijednoj procjeni privlačnosti autoriteta', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'ca': "Una Llamada de Claresa en l'Evaluació de l'Atribució de l'Autoritat Contemporària", 'az': '䡡竄녲毄넠䷃볉饬汩映쎖竃뱮쎼渠凃뱤狉饴楮즙⁇쎶狃뱮쎼얟⁁牡浡珄넊', 'fi': 'Call for Clarity in Contemporary Authorship Attribution Evaluation', 'et': 'Kontsent selgusele kaasaegses autoriõiguse hindamises', 'bn': 'বিদ্যমান কর্তৃপক্ষের অ্যাট্রিবিউশন প্রমাণে ক্লারির জন্য একটি কল', 'cs': 'Výzva k jasnosti v současném hodnocení atribuce autorství', 'jv': 'Tulung Kemerdekaan nggo Kemerdekaan ning Bukak Tatanan Atribusi', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'sk': 'Razpis k jasnosti v sodobnem avtorskem vrednotenju avtorstva', 'he': 'קריאה להבהירות בערכת ההזדמנות', 'bo': 'དུས་མཚན་རྩོམ་པ་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལྟར་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ཁ་པར་ཞིག་'}
{'en': 'Recent research has documented that results reported in frequently-cited authorship attribution papers are difficult to reproduce. Inaccessible code and data are often proposed as factors which block successful reproductions. Even when original materials are available, problems remain which prevent researchers from comparing the effectiveness of different methods. To solve the remaining problemsthe lack of fixed test sets and the use of inappropriately homogeneous corporaour paper contributes materials for five closed-set authorship identification experiments. The five experiments feature texts from 106 distinct authors. Experiments involve a range of contemporary non-fiction American English prose. These experiments provide the foundation for comparable and reproducible authorship attribution research involving contemporary writing.', 'ar': 'لقد وثقت الأبحاث الحديثة أن النتائج التي تم الإبلاغ عنها في أوراق إسناد التأليف التي يتم الاستشهاد بها بشكل متكرر يصعب إعادة إنتاجها. غالبًا ما يتم اقتراح التعليمات البرمجية والبيانات التي يتعذر الوصول إليها كعوامل تمنع عمليات إعادة الإنتاج الناجحة. حتى في حالة توفر المواد الأصلية ، تظل المشكلات التي تمنع الباحثين من مقارنة فعالية الطرق المختلفة. لحل المشكلات المتبقية - عدم وجود مجموعات اختبار ثابتة واستخدام مجموعات اختبار متجانسة بشكل غير مناسب - تساهم ورقتنا في تقديم مواد لخمس تجارب محددة لتحديد هوية المؤلف. تتميز التجارب الخمس بنصوص من 106 مؤلفًا متميزًا. تتضمن التجارب مجموعة من النثر الإنجليزي الأمريكي الواقعي المعاصر. توفر هذه التجارب الأساس لأبحاث إسناد التأليف القابلة للمقارنة والقابلة للتكرار والتي تتضمن الكتابة المعاصرة.', 'pt': 'Pesquisas recentes documentaram que os resultados relatados em artigos de atribuição de autoria frequentemente citados são difíceis de reproduzir. Códigos e dados inacessíveis são frequentemente propostos como fatores que bloqueiam reproduções bem-sucedidas. Mesmo quando os materiais originais estão disponíveis, persistem problemas que impedem os pesquisadores de comparar a eficácia de diferentes métodos. Para resolver os problemas restantes – a falta de conjuntos de testes fixos e o uso de corpora inadequadamente homogêneos – nosso artigo contribui com materiais para cinco experimentos de identificação de autoria em conjunto fechado. Os cinco experimentos apresentam textos de 106 autores distintos. Os experimentos envolvem uma série de prosa contemporânea em inglês americano de não-ficção. Esses experimentos fornecem a base para pesquisas de atribuição de autoria comparáveis e reproduzíveis envolvendo a escrita contemporânea.', 'fr': "Des recherches récentes ont démontré que les résultats rapportés dans les articles d'attribution de paternité fréquemment cités sont difficiles à reproduire. Le code et les données inaccessibles sont souvent proposés comme des facteurs qui empêchent les reproductions réussies. Même lorsque des matériaux originaux sont disponibles, des problèmes persistent qui empêchent les chercheurs de comparer l'efficacité des différentes méthodes. Pour résoudre les problèmes restants — l'absence d'ensembles de tests fixes et l'utilisation de corpus incorrectement homogènes — notre article fournit des matériaux pour cinq expériences d'identification de la paternité d'un ensemble fermé. Les cinq expériences comprennent des textes de 106 auteurs différents. Les expériences impliquent une gamme de prose anglaise américaine non fictionnelle contemporaine. Ces expériences jettent les bases d'une recherche d'attribution de paternité comparable et reproductible impliquant l'écriture contemporaine.", 'es': 'Investigaciones recientes han documentado que los resultados reportados en los documentos de atribución de autoría que se citan con frecuencia son difíciles de reproducir. El código y los datos inaccesibles a menudo se proponen como factores que bloquean las reproducciones exitosas. Incluso cuando se dispone de materiales originales, persisten problemas que impiden a los investigadores comparar la eficacia de los diferentes métodos. Para resolver los problemas restantes (la falta de conjuntos de pruebas fijos y el uso de cuerpos inapropiadamente homogéneos), nuestro artículo contribuye con materiales para cinco experimentos de identificación de autoría cerrados. Los cinco experimentos presentan textos de 106 autores distintos. Los experimentos involucran una variedad de prosa contemporánea de no ficción inglesa estadounidense. Estos experimentos proporcionan la base para una investigación de atribución de autoría comparable y reproducible que involucra la escritura contemporánea.', 'ja': '最近の研究では、頻繁に引用される著者帰属論文で報告された結果は再現が困難であることが記録されている。アクセス不可能なコードとデータは、成功した複製をブロックする要因として提案されることが多い。オリジナルの資料が入手可能な場合でも問題が残っており、研究者は異なる方法の有効性を比較することができない。残りの問題を解決するために、固定テストセットの欠如と不適切に均質なコーパスの使用は、5つのクローズドセットの著者識別実験のための資料を提供します。この5つの実験には、106人の異なる著者のテキストが含まれています。実験には、幅広い現代ノンフィクションのアメリカ英語散文が関わっている。これらの実験は、現代の執筆を伴う同等かつ再現可能な著作者帰属研究の基礎を提供する。', 'zh': '近者研明,常被引用者归论文难复制。 无法访问之代码及数据常议阻复制之因。 虽有材可用,犹存问,使治人无以较异术之有效性。 为余 - 无常试、用非其宜同质语料库 - 吾论为五闭集者识实验材也。 此五实验者,106异人之本也。 实验涉当世非虚构者美国英语散文。 此实验所以及当世之可比性,而复作者之所归也。', 'hi': 'हाल के शोध ने प्रलेखित किया है कि अक्सर उद्धृत लेखकत्व एट्रिब्यूशन पेपर में रिपोर्ट किए गए परिणामों को पुन: पेश करना मुश्किल है। दुर्गम कोड और डेटा को अक्सर उन कारकों के रूप में प्रस्तावित किया जाता है जो सफल पुनरुत्पादन को अवरुद्ध करते हैं। यहां तक कि जब मूल सामग्री उपलब्ध होती है, तो समस्याएं बनी रहती हैं जो शोधकर्ताओं को विभिन्न तरीकों की प्रभावशीलता की तुलना करने से रोकती हैं। शेष समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए- निश्चित परीक्षण सेट की कमी और अनुचित रूप से सजातीय कॉर्पोरेट का उपयोग- हमारा पेपर पांच बंद-सेट लेखकत्व पहचान प्रयोगों के लिए सामग्री का योगदान देता है। पांच प्रयोगों में 106 अलग-अलग लेखकों के ग्रंथों की विशेषता है। प्रयोगों में समकालीन गैर-कथा अमेरिकी अंग्रेजी गद्य की एक श्रृंखला शामिल है। ये प्रयोग समकालीन लेखन से जुड़े तुलनीय और पुनरुत्पादक लेखकत्व एट्रिब्यूशन अनुसंधान के लिए आधार प्रदान करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Недавние исследования задокументировали, что результаты, сообщенные в часто цитируемых авторских атрибуционных документах, трудно воспроизвести. Недоступные коды и данные часто предлагаются в качестве факторов, блокирующих успешное воспроизведение. Даже при наличии оригинальных материалов остаются проблемы, которые мешают исследователям сравнивать эффективность различных методов. Для решения оставшихся проблем - отсутствие фиксированных тестовых наборов и использование ненадлежащим образом однородных тел - наша бумага предоставляет материалы для пяти экспериментов по идентификации авторства в закрытых наборах. В пяти экспериментах представлены тексты 106 разных авторов. Эксперименты включают в себя широкий спектр современной художественной американской английской прозы. Эти эксперименты обеспечивают основу для сопоставимых и воспроизводимых исследований авторской атрибуции с участием современной письменности.', 'ga': 'Tá doiciméadaithe ag taighde a rinneadh le déanaí go bhfuil sé deacair na torthaí a thuairiscítear i bpáipéir leithdháilte údair a luaitear go minic a atáirgeadh. Is minic a mholtar cód agus sonraí dorochtana mar fhachtóirí a chuireann bac ar atáirgeadh rathúla. Fiú nuair a bhíonn bunábhair ar fáil, tá fadhbanna fós ann a chuireann cosc ar thaighdeoirí comparáid a dhéanamh idir éifeachtacht modhanna éagsúla. Chun na fadhbanna atá fágtha a réiteach—easpa tacair thástálacha seasta agus úsáid corpora aonchineálach míchuí—cuireann ár bpáipéar ábhair le haghaidh cúig thurgnamh sainaitheanta údair tacair iata. Tá téacsanna ó 106 údar ar leith sna cúig thurgnaimh. Baineann turgnaimh le raon de phrós Béarla Meiriceánach neamhfhicsean comhaimseartha. Soláthraíonn na turgnaimh seo an bonn le haghaidh taighde inchomparáide agus in-atáirgthe ar shannadh údair a bhaineann leis an scríbhneoireacht chomhaimseartha.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες έρευνες έχουν τεκμηριώσει ότι τα αποτελέσματα που αναφέρονται σε συχνά αναφερόμενες εργασίες συγγραφής είναι δύσκολο να αναπαραχθούν. Ο μη προσβάσιμος κώδικας και τα δεδομένα συχνά προτείνονται ως παράγοντες που εμποδίζουν την επιτυχή αναπαραγωγή. Ακόμη και όταν είναι διαθέσιμα πρωτότυπα υλικά, παραμένουν προβλήματα που εμποδίζουν τους ερευνητές να συγκρίνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα διαφορετικών μεθόδων. Για να επιλύσουμε τα εναπομείναντα προβλήματα – την έλλειψη σταθερών σετ δοκιμών και τη χρήση ακατάλληλα ομοιογενών σωμάτων – η εργασία μας συνεισφέρει υλικά για πέντε πειράματα αναγνώρισης συγγραφέα κλειστού συνόλου. Τα πέντε πειράματα περιλαμβάνουν κείμενα από 106 ξεχωριστούς συγγραφείς. Τα πειράματα περιλαμβάνουν μια σειρά σύγχρονων μη μυθιστορημάτων αμερικανικής αγγλικής πρόζας. Τα πειράματα αυτά παρέχουν τη βάση για συγκρίσιμη και αναπαραγώγιμη έρευνα αποδόσεων συγγραφής που περιλαμβάνει τη σύγχρονη γραφή.', 'hu': 'A legutóbbi kutatások azt dokumentálták, hogy a gyakran idézett szerzői tulajdonítások eredményeit nehéz reprodukálni. A hozzáférhetetlen kódokat és adatokat gyakran javasolják, mint olyan tényezőket, amelyek megakadályozzák a sikeres reprodukciókat. Még ha eredeti anyagok is rendelkezésre állnak, továbbra is problémák vannak, amelyek megakadályozzák a kutatókat abban, hogy összehasonlítsák a különböző módszerek hatékonyságát. A fennmaradó problémák – a rögzített tesztkészletek hiánya és a nem megfelelően homogén corporák használata – megoldására dolgozatunk öt zárt készletű szerzői azonosítási kísérlethez hozzájárul. Az öt kísérlet 106 különböző szerzőtől származik. A kísérletek számos kortárs amerikai angol prózát foglalnak magukban. Ezek a kísérletek megalapozzák a kortárs írással kapcsolatos összehasonlítható és reprodukálható szerzői attribúciós kutatások alapját.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы зерттеу құжатты, көпшілікті аутентификациялық қағаздарында туралы хабарлаған нәтижелер қайталау қиын. Қол жеткізбейтін код мен деректер көбінде сәтті редакциялауды блокиретін факторлар ретінде ұсынылады. Бастапқы материалдар қол жеткізгенде де, зерттеушілердің әртүрлі әдістерді салыстыру мүмкіндігін салыстыруға болады. Қалған мәселелерді шешу үшін - тұрақты сынақтар жиындарының жоқ және қорпора қолдануға тиіс емес - қағаз бес жабылған авториториялық идентификациялық тәжірибелерінің материаларын өзгертеді. Бес тәжірибелер 106 әртүрлі авторлардан мәтін жазылады. Тәжірибелер бірнеше ағылшын тілінің ағылшын проссасының аралығын қолданады. Бұл тәжірибелер қазіргі жазбалармен салыстырылатын және қазіргі аутентификациялық зерттеулердің негізін қолданады.', 'ka': 'ახლა შემდეგ სწავლის განსხვავება დოკუმენტირებულია, რომ წარმატები, რომელიც უფრო მეტად განსხვავებული ატრიბუტირებული დოკუმენტებში, უფრო შესაძლებელი კოდი და მონაცემები უფრო მეტად იყენება როგორც ფაქტრები, რომლებიც წარმატებულია გამოწვება. კიდევ როცა ორიგინალური მატერიალები აქვს, პრობლემები იქნება, რომლებიც მსწავლობელი განსხვავებული მეტოვების ეფექტურობას გადასრულებათ მარცხოვრებული პრობლემების გარეშე - კონფიქრებული ტესტის კონპერიმენტის არსებობა და არასწორად ჰომოგენური კოპორაის გამოყენება - ჩვენი კაპონტი დამატებული 5 დახურებული ავტორისტი ხუთი ექსპერიმენტები 106 განსხვავებული ავტორების ტექსტი. ექსპერიმენტები აღმოჩენებული ამერიკელი ინგლისური პროსესის განსხვავება. ეს ექსპერიმენტები დამუშავებენ შემდგომარებელი და გამოცდილობელი ავტორიების შესახებ, რომლებიც შემდგომარებელი წერილება.', 'lt': 'Neseniai atlikti tyrimai parodė, kad dažnai minėtuose autorių teisių priskyrimo dokumentuose pateikti rezultatai yra sunku atkurti. Nepasiekiamas kodas ir duomenys dažnai siūlomi kaip veiksniai, blokuojantys sėkmingą atkūrimą. Net jei yra originalių medžiagų, lieka problemų, trukdančių mokslininkams palyginti skirtingų metodų veiksmingumą. Siekiant išspręsti likusias problemas – fiksuotų bandymų rinkinių trūkumą ir netinkamai homogeniškų korprų naudojimą – mūsų popierius padeda atlikti penkis uždarytus autorių identifikavimo eksperimentus. Penkiuose eksperimentuose pateikiami 106 skirtingų autorių tekstai. Eksperimentai apima įvairias šiuolaikines ne fikcines amerikiečių anglų prozes. Šie eksperimentai sudaro pagrindą palyginamiems ir reprodukciniams autorystės priskyrimo moksliniams tyrimams, apimantiems šiuolaikinį rašymą.', 'it': "Ricerche recenti hanno documentato che i risultati riportati in articoli di attribuzione di paternità frequentemente citati sono difficili da riprodurre. Codice e dati inaccessibili sono spesso proposti come fattori che bloccano le riproduzioni di successo. Anche quando sono disponibili materiali originali, permangono problemi che impediscono ai ricercatori di confrontare l'efficacia dei diversi metodi. Per risolvere i problemi rimanenti - la mancanza di set di test fissi e l'uso di corpora non adeguatamente omogenea - il nostro articolo contribuisce con materiali per cinque esperimenti di identificazione dell'autore a set chiuso. I cinque esperimenti presentano testi di 106 autori distinti. Gli esperimenti coinvolgono una serie di saggistica contemporanea prosa americana inglese. Questi esperimenti forniscono le basi per una ricerca comparabile e riproducibile sull'attribuzione dell'autore che coinvolge la scrittura contemporanea.", 'mk': 'Неодамнешното истражување документира дека резултатите известени во често цитираните документи за авторско атрибутирање се тешки да се репродуктираат. Непристапен код и податоци честопати се предложуваат како фактори кои блокираат успешна репродукција. Дури и кога се достапни оригинални материјали, остануваат проблеми кои спречуваат истражувачите да ја споредат ефикасноста на различните методи. За решавање на преостанатите проблеми - недостатокот на фиксни тестови и употребата на несоодветно хомогени корпора - нашата хартија придонесува материјали за пет затворени експерименти за идентификација на авторството. The five experiments feature texts from 106 distinct authors.  Експериментите вклучуваат голем број современи американски англиски проза. Овие експерименти обезбедуваат основа за споредливи и репродуктибилни истражувања во врска со припишувањето на авторството кои вклучуваат современо пишување.', 'ms': 'kajian baru-baru ini telah didokumentasikan bahawa keputusan yang dilaporkan dalam kertas atribut penulis yang sering disebut adalah sukar untuk dikembalikan. Kod dan data yang tidak boleh dicapai sering diusulkan sebagai faktor yang menghalang reproduksi yang berjaya. Walaupun bahan asal tersedia, masih ada masalah yang menghalang penyelidik daripada membandingkan kegunaan kaedah yang berbeza. Untuk menyelesaikan masalah yang tersisa -- kekurangan set ujian tetap dan penggunaan korpra yang tidak sesuai -- kertas kami menyumbangkan bahan untuk lima eksperimen pengenalan penulis yang ditutup. Lima eksperimen mengandungi teks dari 106 penulis yang berbeza. Eksperimen melibatkan julat prose bahasa Inggeris Amerika yang bukan fiksi kontempor. Eksperimen ini menyediakan dasar untuk kajian atribut otoritas yang boleh dibandingkan dan dikembalikan yang melibatkan penulisan kontempor.', 'mt': 'Riċerka reċenti ddokumentat li r-riżultati rrappurtati f’dokumenti ta’ attribuzzjoni ta’ awtur ikkwotati ta’ spiss huma diffiċli biex jiġu riprodotti. Kodiċi u dejta mhux aċċessibbli ħafna drabi jiġu proposti bħala fatturi li jimblokkaw ir-riproduzzjonijiet b’suċċess. Anki meta l-materjali oriġinali jkunu disponibbli, jibqgħu problemi li jipprevjenu lir-riċerkaturi milli jqabblu l-effettività ta’ metodi differenti. To solve the remaining problems—the lack of fixed test sets and the use of inappropriately homogeneous corpora—our paper contributes materials for five closed-set authorship identification experiments.  Il-ħames esperimenti għandhom testi minn 106 awtur distint. L-esperimenti jinvolvu firxa ta’ prosa Ingliża Amerikana kontemporanja li mhijiex fiction. Dawn l-esperimenti jipprovdu l-bażi għal riċerka komparabbli u riproduċibbli dwar l-attribuzzjoni tal-awtur li tinvolvi l-kitba kontemporanja.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുള്ള പരിശോധന പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കപ്പെട്ട അധികാരികത്തിന്റെ പേപ്പറുകളില്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്തിട്ടുള്ള ഫലങ അസാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത കോഡും വിവരങ്ങളും വിജയിച്ച പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കുന്ന ഫാക്ടറുകളായി പ്രായശ്ചിത ആദ്യമായ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുമ്പോഴും പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്, വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികളുടെ പ്രഭാവം തുല ബാക്കിയുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d- സ്ഥിരമായ ടെസ്റ്റ് സെറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള അസാധാരണമില്ലാത്ത കോര്\u200dപ്പോറിയുടെ ഉപയോഗം- ഞങ്ങളുടെ പേ 106 വ്യത്യസ്തമായ എഴുത്തുകാരില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള അഞ്ച് പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പദാവലികള്\u200d. പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ നിലവിലുള്ള അമേരിക്കന്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പ്രോജക്റ്റില്\u200d ഉള്ളതാണ്. ഈ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ എഴുതുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന അധികാരിക പദ്ധതിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന് തു', 'no': 'Nyleg har forskning dokumentert at resultater som er rapportert i ofte sitert autoriseringspapir er vanskeleg å gjenoppretta. Ikkje tilgjengeleg kode og data vert ofte foreslått som faktorer som blokkar vellukka reproduksjon. Selv når originale materialer er tilgjengelege, blir problemer som hindrar forskere å sammenligne effektiviteten på ulike metodar. For å løse dei reste problemene – manglende testsett og bruken av inappropørt homogenesk korpora – papiret vårt bidrar til materiale for fem lukka autorisasjonssøkt. Dei fem eksperimentene har tekstar frå 106 ulike utviklarane. Eksperiment involverer eit rekkje av samtidige ikkje-fiction-amerikanske engelsk prose. Desse eksperimentene gjev grunnlegginga for sammenlignbare og reproduktiv autoriseringsforskning med samtidige skriving.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie badania udowodniły, że wyniki zgłaszane w często cytowanych artykułach o atrybucji autorskiej są trudne do odtworzenia. Niedostępny kod i dane są często proponowane jako czynniki blokujące udane reprodukcje. Nawet jeśli dostępne są oryginalne materiały, pozostają problemy, które uniemożliwiają naukowcom porównywanie skuteczności różnych metod. Aby rozwiązać pozostałe problemy – brak stałych zestawów testowych i zastosowanie niewłaściwie jednorodnych korpusów – nasz artykuł przygotowuje materiały do pięciu eksperymentów identyfikacji autorstwa zamkniętego zbioru. Pięć eksperymentów obejmuje teksty różnych autorów. Eksperymenty obejmują szereg współczesnej non-fiction amerykańskiej angielskiej prozy. Eksperymenty te stanowią podstawę do porównywalnych i powtarzalnych badań nad atrybucją autorstwa z udziałem współczesnego pisania.', 'mn': 'Саяхан судалгааны үр дүнг ихэвчлэн нэрлэж буй авторын хувьд өгсөн баримтууд үржүүлэхэд хэцүү. Хэрэглэгдэхгүй код болон өгөгдлийн санал ихэвчлэн амжилттай үржүүлэлтийг зогсоох хүчин зүйлүүд болдог. Эхлээд эхний материалуудыг ашиглах боломжтой ч, судлаачид өөр арга замын үр дүнг харьцуулахаас зогсохгүй асуудал үлддэг. Үлдсэн асуудлуудыг шийдэхийн тулд бидний цаас нь таван хадгалагдсан авторын удирдах туршилтын материалуудыг зориулдаг. Таван туршилтууд 106 өөр зохиолчдын текст байдаг. Үүний туршилт нь орчин үеийн биш зохиол Америкийн Англи просуудын нэг хэсэг юм. Эдгээр туршилтууд орчин үеийн бичилгээний тухай харьцуулах болон үржигдэх авторын судалгааны үндсэн байгууллага гаргадаг.', 'ro': 'Cercetări recente au documentat că rezultatele raportate în lucrările de atribuire a autorului frecvent citate sunt dificil de reprodus. Codul și datele inaccesibile sunt adesea propuse ca factori care blochează reproducerile de succes. Chiar și atunci când sunt disponibile materiale originale, rămân probleme care împiedică cercetătorii să compare eficacitatea diferitelor metode. Pentru a rezolva problemele rămase – lipsa seturilor fixe de testare și utilizarea corpurilor inadecvat omogene – lucrarea noastră contribuie cu materiale pentru cinci experimente de identificare a autorității închise. Cele cinci experimente conțin texte de la 106 autori distincți. Experimentele implică o serie de proză contemporană non-ficțiune americană engleză. Aceste experimente oferă fundația unei cercetări comparabile și reproductibile de atribuire a autorului care implică scrierea contemporană.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada soo dhowaaday waxey ka muuqatay in arimaha lagu soo qoray warqadaha warqadaha rasmiga ah ee lagu soo qoray ay ay adag tahay in la soo celiyo. Qoidada aan suurtagal karin iyo macluumaadka waxaa inta badan loo soo jeediyaa sida suurtagal ah, kuwaas oo diidi kara dib u soo celinta. Xataa marka laga helo alaabta asalka ah, dhibaatooyin ayaa hadhay oo ka hortaga baaritaanka inay is-barbartaan alaabta kala duduwan. Si aan u xalliyo dhibaatooyinka hadhay - baahida kooxda saxda ah iyo isticmaalka shirkadda si aan saxda ahayn- warqaddayadu wuxuu u bixinayaa alaabyo loo sameeyo shan baaritaanka aqoonsiga furan. Shankii imtixaanka waxaa ku qoran qoraal ka mid ah 106 qoraal oo kala duduwan. Imtixaanka waxaa ku jira jardiino badan oo aan ku jirin afka Ingiriiska. Imtixaanka waxaa laga sameeyaa aasaaska, kaas oo ku saabsan qoraalka waqtiga ah ee la barbaro oo la mid dhigan karo ama la soo celin karo.', 'sr': 'Nedavno istraživanje je dokumentovalo kako su rezultati prijavljeni u često navedenim dokumentima o privlačenju autoriteta teško je reproducirati. Nedostupni kod i podaci se često predlažu kao faktori koji blokiraju uspešne reprodukcije. Čak i kad su originalni materijali dostupni, ostaju problemi koji sprječavaju istraživače da usporede učinkovitost različitih metoda. Da bi rešili ostale probleme - nedostatak fiksnih testova i upotrebe neprimjereno homogenelnog korpora - naš papir doprinosi materijalima za pet zatvorenih eksperimenata identifikacije autoriteta. Pet eksperimenata imaju tekst od 106 različitih autora. Eksperimenti uključuju gomilu trenutnih neofikcionih američkih engleskih prosa. Ovi eksperimenti pružaju temelj za usporedbenu i reproduktivnu istraživanje privlačnosti autoriteta uključujući savremeno pisanje.', 'si': 'අලුත් පරීක්ෂණය ලිපින්තු වුනා විසින් ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති නොපිළිගන්න පුළුවන් කෝඩ් සහ දත්ත සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් සැලසුම් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සැලස ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතිය ලැබුනොත්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂකයන්ට වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් විදියට ප ඉතිරින්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න - සිද්ධ පරීක්ෂණ සෙට් අවස්ථාවක් නැති විසඳන්න සහ සමාන්\u200dය කොර්පෝරාව භාවිතා කරන්න - අපේ පත්ත පරීක්ෂණ පහක් විශේෂ කරන්නේ 106 විශේෂ ලේඛකයෙන්. පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය නොපුද්ධිය ඇමරිකානු ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ප්\u200dරෝසියාව. මේ පරීක්ෂණාවල් සම්පූර්ණ සහ ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරන්න පුළුවන් සහ ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය සමග ස', 'sv': 'Ny forskning har dokumenterat att resultat som rapporterats i ofta citerade fĂ¶rfattarskapsattributioner Ă¤r svĂĄra att reproducera. OtillgĂ¤nglig kod och data fĂ¶reslĂĄs ofta som faktorer som blockerar framgĂĄngsrika reproduktioner. Ă„ven nĂ¤r originalmaterial finns tillgĂ¤ngliga kvarstĂĄr problem som hindrar forskare frĂĄn att jĂ¤mfĂ¶ra effektiviteten hos olika metoder. FĂ¶r att lĂ¶sa de ĂĄterstĂĄende problemen â€“ avsaknaden av fasta testuppsĂ¤ttningar och anvĂ¤ndningen av olĂ¤mpligt homogena korpora â€“ bidrar vĂĄr uppsats med material fĂ¶r fem slutna uppsĂ¤ttningar fĂ¶rfattarskapsidentifiering experiment. De fem experimenten innehĂĄller texter frĂĄn 106 skilda fĂ¶rfattare. Experiment involverar en rad samtida icke-fiktion amerikansk engelsk prosa. Dessa experiment utgĂ¶r grunden fĂ¶r jĂ¤mfĂ¶rbar och reproducerbar fĂ¶rfattarskapsattributionsforskning som involverar samtida skrifter.', 'ur': 'اگلوں کی تحقیق دکھائی گئی ہے کہ اگلوں کے بارے میں ذکر کی نتیجے اگلوں کے ذریعے لکھنے کے لئے بہت مشکل ہیں. غیر قابل دسترسی کی کوڈ اور ڈیٹا اکثر فاکتوروں کے طور پر پیشنهاد کیے جاتے ہیں جو موفق بازگشت کو بلوک کرتے ہیں. Even when original materials are available, problems remain which prevent researchers from comparing the effectiveness of different methods. بقیہ مشکلات کو حل کرنے کے لئے، مضبوط تست سٹوں کی ناکامی اور ناپسندیدہ یوسف کورپورا کا استعمال، ہمارے کاغذ پانچ بند سٹ کی اجازت کی تصدیق کی تجربے کے لئے مواد کا مدد کرتا ہے. پانچ آزمائش کی تفصیل 106 مختلف لکھنے والوں سے لکھی ہوئی تفصیل۔ آزمائش میں ایک مختلف غیر فکرت آمریکایی انگلیسی پرسس کا شامل ہے۔ یہ آزمائش موجود لکھنے کے ساتھ مقایسہ اور دوبارہ پیدا ہونے والی اجازت کی تحقیقات کے لئے بنیاد دیتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் ஆராய்ச்சி முடிவுகள் அறிவிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது அதிகாரமாக குறிப்பிட்ட ஆசிரியர் கூற்று காகிதத்தில் மீ அணுகக்கூடிய குறியீடு மற்றும் தரவுகள் பெரும்பாலும் வெற்றிகரமான முன்னோக்குதலை தடுக்கும் காரண மூல பொருள் கிடைக்கும் போதும், பிரச்சனைகள் இருக்கும் போது மீதி இருக்கும் பிரச்சனைகளை தீர்வு செய்ய - நிலையான சோதனை அமைப்புகளின் குறைவு மற்றும் தீர்ப்பில்லாத நிறுவனத்தின் பயன்பாடு 106 வித்தியாசமான ஆசிரியர்களில் இருந்து ஐந்து பரிசோதனைகளுக்கு குணங்கள். தற்போதைய சோதனையில் தற்போதைய அமெரிக்க ஆங்கிலம் இல்லாத ஒரு வீச்சில் உள்ளது. இந்த பரிசோதனைகள் தற்போதைய எழுத்துக்களைப் பற்றி ஒப்பிடும் மற்றும் பெருமைப்படுத்தக்கூடிய ஆசிரிக்கை பங்கீட', 'vi': 'Các nghiên cứu gần đây đã chứng minh rằng kết quả được liệt kê trong các bài luận tác quyền thường được liệt kê rất khó nảy sinh. Không có mã và dữ liệu có khả năng thành công thường được đề xuất như là yếu tố ngăn chặn tái tạo thành công. Ngay cả khi có nguyên liệu gốc vẫn có vấn đề ngăn cản các nhà nghiên cứu so sánh hiệu quả của các phương pháp khác nhau. Để giải quyết vấn đề còn lại lượng kiểm tra cuộc, sự thiết phải địa kiểm tra và sự dùng của các vị sinh khác kháng bảo sinh. Năm thí nghiệm chứa các văn bản riêng của 106. Thí nghiệm gồm một loạt các diễn biến không tiểu tưởng của Mỹ ngữ. Những thí nghiệm này tạo ra nền tảng cho một tác phẩm giống nhau và có khả năng sinh tồn tác.', 'uz': "Yaqinda taʼminlovchi narsalar yordamida ko'p qoʻllangan mualliflarning rivojlanishi qiyin edi. @ info Agar asl materiallar mavjud boʻlsa, muammolar esa o'qituvchilarni boshqa usullarning effektini kamaytirishdan oldin. Keyingi muammolarni o'zgartirish uchun, ma'lum sinov tizim yoʻq va hech qanday homogen kompaniya ishlatish uchun qoʻllanmiz 5 yopilgan muammolar identifikatsiya imtiyozlari uchun materiallarni qaytadi. 5 eksport boshqa mualliflardan 106 mualliflarning matnlarini moslash. Tajribalar bu paytda hech qanday bog'lanmagan Amerikalik ingliz prose tartibi bor. Ushbu imtiyozlar bu vaqt yozuvga o'xshash va qo'llaniladigan mualliflar taʼminlovchisi asosini yaratadi.", 'da': 'Nylig forskning har dokumenteret, at resultater rapporteret i hyppigt citerede forfatterskab attribution papirer er vanskelige at reproducere. Utilgængelig kode og data foreslås ofte som faktorer, der blokerer vellykkede reproduktioner. Selv når originale materialer er tilgængelige, er der stadig problemer, der forhindrer forskerne i at sammenligne effektiviteten af forskellige metoder. For at løse de resterende problemer – manglen på faste testsæt og brugen af uhensigtsmæssigt homogene corpora – bidrager vores papir med materialer til fem lukkede sæt forfatteridentifikation eksperimenter. De fem eksperimenter indeholder tekster fra 106 forskellige forfattere. Eksperimenter involverer en række nutidige non-fiction amerikansk engelsk prosa. Disse eksperimenter danner grundlag for sammenlignelig og reproducerbar forfatterskabsforskning, der involverer samtidsskrift.', 'bg': 'Последни изследвания документират, че резултатите, докладвани в често цитираните статии за авторско приписване, са трудни за възпроизвеждане. Недостъпен код и данни често се предлагат като фактори, които блокират успешното възпроизвеждане. Дори когато са налични оригинални материали, остават проблеми, които пречат на изследователите да сравняват ефективността на различните методи. За да се решат останалите проблеми – липсата на фиксирани тестови комплекти и използването на неподходящо хомогенни корпуси – нашата статия допринася с материали за пет експеримента за идентификация на авторството в затворен комплект. Петте експеримента включват текстове от 106 различни автори. Експериментите включват редица съвременни нефантастични американски английски прози. Тези експерименти осигуряват основата за сравними и възпроизводими изследвания на авторското приписване, включващи съвременното писане.', 'nl': 'Recent onderzoek heeft aangetoond dat resultaten gerapporteerd in veelgeciteerde auteurship attribution papers moeilijk te reproduceren zijn. Ontoegankelijke code en gegevens worden vaak voorgesteld als factoren die succesvolle reproducties blokkeren. Zelfs als originele materialen beschikbaar zijn, blijven er problemen bestaan die onderzoekers verhinderen de effectiviteit van verschillende methoden te vergelijken. Om de resterende problemen op te lossen – het ontbreken van vaste testsets en het gebruik van ongepast homogene corpora – levert ons artikel materiaal voor vijf experimenten met auteurschap-identificatie in gesloten reeks. De vijf experimenten bevatten teksten van 106 verschillende auteurs. Experimenten omvatten een reeks hedendaagse non-fictie Amerikaanse Engelse proza. Deze experimenten vormen de basis voor vergelijkbaar en reproduceerbaar auteurschapsattributieonderzoek met betrekking tot hedendaags schrijven.', 'hr': 'Nedavno istraživanje dokumentiralo je kako su rezultati prijavljeni u često navedenim papirima o privlačenju autoriteta teško se reproducirati. Nedostupni kod i podaci često se predlažu kao faktori koji blokiraju uspješne reprodukcije. Čak i kad su originalni materijali dostupni, ostaju problemi koje sprječavaju istraživačima usporedbu učinkovitosti različitih metoda. Za rješavanje ostalih problema, nedostatak fiksnih testova i primjena neprimjereno homogenelnog tijela-našeg papira doprinosi materijalima za pet zatvorenih eksperimenata identifikacije autoriteta. Pet eksperimenata imaju tekst od 106 različitih autora. Eksperimenti uključuju razinu trenutnih neprimjerenih američkih engleskih prosa. Ovi eksperimenti pružaju temelj za usporedbenu i reproduktivnu istraživanje privlačnosti autoriteta uključujući savremeno pisanje.', 'de': 'Neuere Forschungen belegen, dass Ergebnisse, die in häufig zitierten Autorenschaftsprächen berichtet werden, schwer reproduzierbar sind. Unzugänglicher Code und Daten werden oft als Faktoren vorgeschlagen, die erfolgreiche Reproduktionen blockieren. Selbst wenn Originalmaterialien verfügbar sind, bleiben Probleme bestehen, die Forscher daran hindern, die Wirksamkeit verschiedener Methoden zu vergleichen. Um die verbleibenden Probleme zu lösen – das Fehlen fester Testsätze und die Verwendung unangemessen homogener Korpora – liefert unser Beitrag Materialien für fünf geschlossene Autoren-Identifikationsexperimente. Die fünf Experimente enthalten Texte von 106 verschiedenen Autoren. Experimente umfassen eine Reihe zeitgenössischer Sachbücher amerikanisch-englischer Prosa. Diese Experimente bilden die Grundlage für vergleichbare und reproduzierbare Autorenschafts-Attributionsforschung mit zeitgenössischem Schreiben.', 'id': 'Penelitian baru-baru ini telah mendokumentasikan bahwa hasil dilaporkan dalam kertas atribut pengarang yang sering disebut sulit untuk diproduksi. Kode dan data yang tidak dapat diakses sering diusulkan sebagai faktor yang menghalangi reproduksi yang berhasil. Bahkan ketika bahan asli tersedia, masih ada masalah yang mencegah para peneliti dari membandingkan efektif dari metode yang berbeda. Untuk memecahkan masalah yang tersisa - kekurangan set tes tetap dan penggunaan dari corpora homogen tidak sesuai - kertas kami berkontribusi bahan untuk lima eksperimen identifikasi penulis-set tertutup. Lima eksperimen memiliki teks dari 106 penulis yang berbeda. Eksperimen melibatkan sejumlah prose Inggris yang tidak fiksi saat ini. Eksperimen ini menyediakan dasar untuk penelitian atribut otoritas yang dapat dibandingkan dan diproduksi yang melibatkan penulisan kontempor.', 'ko': '최근 연구에 따르면 자주 인용되는 저자의 귀속 논문에서 보고된 결과는 재현되기 어렵다.접근할 수 없는 코드와 데이터는 일반적으로 복제의 성공을 방해하는 요소로 여겨진다.설령 원시 재료가 쓸 수 있다 하더라도 문제가 여전히 존재하기 때문에 연구원들은 서로 다른 방법의 유효성을 비교할 수 없다.남은 문제, 즉 고정된 테스트 집합과 부적절한 동질 어료 라이브러리 사용의 부족을 해결하기 위해 우리의 논문은 다섯 개의 폐쇄 집합 저자의 신분 식별 실험 자료를 제공했다.이 다섯 실험의 특징은 106명의 서로 다른 작가의 텍스트에서 나온 것이다.실험은 일련의 당대 비허구의 미국 영어 산문과 관련된다.이러한 실험은 당대 창작의 비교가능성과 중복성 작가의 귀인 연구에 기초를 제공했다.', 'fa': 'تحقیقات اخیرا ثبت کرده است که نتایج گزارش در کاغذهای ویژه\u200cهای اختیار\u200cهای اغلبه\u200cها برای تولید کردن سخت است. کد و داده\u200cهای غیرقابل دسترسی اغلب به عنوان faktورها پیشنهاد می\u200cشوند که بازگشت موفقیت را bloک می\u200cکنند. حتی هنگامی که مواد اصلی موجود باشند، مشکلات باقی مانده است که محققان را از مقایسه موثیت روش های مختلف جلوگیری کنند. برای حل مشکلات باقی مانده - lack of fixed test sets و use of inappropriately homogeneous corpora-our paper contributes materials for five closed-set authoritative identification experiments. پنج آزمایش\u200cها متن\u200cهای مختلف از ۱۶۰ نویسنده\u200cهای مختلف را مشخص می\u200cکنند. تجربه\u200cها شامل تعدادی از پرسس انگلیسی آمریکایی غیر تصاویر مدرنی است. این آزمایشها بنیادی برای تحقیقات قابل مقایسه و تولید قابل تولید تحقیقات قابل تولید با نوشتن مدرنی را پیشنهاد می کنند.', 'sq': 'Kërkimet e fundit kanë dokumentuar se rezultatet e raportuara në dokumentet e përshkrimit të autorisë të përmendura shpesh janë të vështira për të riprodhuar. Kodi dhe të dhënat e papërshtatshme shpesh propozohen si faktorë që bllokojnë riprodhimet e suksesshme. Edhe kur materialet origjinale janë në dispozicion, mbeten probleme që pengojnë kërkuesit që të krahasojnë efektshmërinë e metodave të ndryshme. Për të zgjidhur problemet e mbetura - mungesa e grupeve të testuara të fiksuara dhe përdorimi i korprave jo të përshtatshme homogjene-letra jonë kontribuon materiale për pesë eksperimente të identifikimit të autorisë së mbyllur. Pesë eksperimente paraqesin tekste nga 106 autorë të veçantë. Eksperimentet përfshijnë një gamë të prozës së bashkëkohshme të jo-fiksionit angleze amerikane. Këto eksperimente ofrojnë themelet për kërkime të ngjashme dhe të riprodhueshme të atribucionit të autorisë që përfshijnë shkrimin bashkëkohor.', 'af': "Onlangse ondersoek het dokumenteer dat resultate in dikwels aangetelde autoriseerpapiers is moeilik om te herhaal. Ontoeganklike kode en data word dikwels voorgestel as faktore wat suksesvolle reproduksie blok. Selfs wanneer oorspronklike materiale beskikbaar is, bly probleme wat verhinder resekers om die effektiviteit van verskillende metodes te vergelyk. Om die oorblywende probleem te los - die ontbreek van vaste toets stelle en die gebruik van onpasmaak homogeen korpora-ons papier bydra materiale vir vyf gesluit autoriseerde identifikasie eksperimente. Die vyf eksperimente funksie teks van 106 verskillende outeurs. Eksperimente verplig 'n reek van contemporary non-fiction American English prose. Hierdie eksperimente verskaf die fondasie vir vergelykbaar en reproduseerbare autorisasie-ondersoek wat die tydelike skrif invoer.", 'tr': 'Ýakynda araştyrmalar ýagdaýda alyp görkezilýän awtomatik taýýarlama kagytlarynda täzelenmek kyn däldir. Elýeterli köd we maglumatlar köplenç başarılı täzelenmesini bloklan faktörler hökmünde teklip edilýär. Öňki materialler bar bolsa hem, araştyranlaryň farklı yönleriň etkinliýetini karşılaştyrmakdan çykaryp barýan meseleler bolýar. Diňe meseleleri çözmek üçin sabit testiň düzümlerini ýok we ýagdaýynda eşit adamlarymyz üçin işlemek üçin 5 ýapylan rugsat teşkermeleri üçin materiallere kömekleýär. Beş deneyler 106 täze awtoryndan metin edip bilýärler. Denminatlar wagtyň halkara Amerikan dilinde birnäçe faýly ýok adamlary bar. Bu deneyler modern ýazma bilen hoñlaşykly we täzeden edibiljek awtomatik barlamasynyň temelini saýlaýar.', 'am': 'Recent research has documented that results reported in frequently-cited authorship attribution papers are difficult to reproduce.  የኩነቶች ኮድ እና ዳታ ብዙ ጊዜም የክፍለጋውን መቀናቀል እንደሚከለክሉ ነው፡፡ መጀመሪያ ሀብት ቢገኙ እንኳን መከራዎች የልዩ ልዩ ሥርዓቶችን ከማስተካከል የሚከለክሉ ናቸው፡፡ የቀረውን ችግር-የጽኑ ፈተና ማድረግ ግንኙነት እና የኮርፖራ-የፕሬዝዳንታችንን ለመጠቀም ለአምስት ተዘጋጅቶ የሥልጣናት ማረጋገጫ ፈተና ማድረግ ማድረጊያዎችን ለመጠቀም ነው፡፡ አምስቱ ፈተናዎች ከ106 የተለየ ጸሐፊዎች ጽሑፎችን ያስቀምጣሉ፡፡ ፈተናዎች የአሜሪካ አፍሪካዊ ፕሮጀክት ሳይታይ ተቃውሞ የሚያስፈልጉ ናቸው፡፡ እነዚህ ፈተናዎች በአሁኑ ጊዜ በጽሑፍ ላይ የሚያስተያየው እና በሚያጋራው ባለሥልጣናት መሠረት መሠረትን የሚያደርጉ ናቸው፡፡', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa hivi karibuni umeweka taarifa kwamba matokeo yaliyoripotiwa katika nyaraka za kuchapisha mamlaka zilizotajwa mara kwa mara ni vigumu kujenga tena. Kodi na taarifa zisizopatikana mara nyingi zinapendekezwa kama sababu ambazo zinazuia uzazi wa mafanikio. Even when original materials are available, problems remain which prevent researchers from comparing the effectiveness of different methods.  To solve the remaining problems-the lack of fixed test sets and the use of inappropriately homogeneous corpora-our paper contributes materials for five closed-set authorship identification experiments.  Majaribio matano yanahusisha maandishi kutoka kwa waandishi 106 tofauti. Majaribio yanahusisha mwenendo wa mashitaka ya Kiingereza isiyo na imani ya sasa. Majaribio haya yanatoa msingi wa kuandika kwa kipekee kinachofanana na uwajibikaji wa utafiti unaohusisha kuandika kwa sasa.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা তথ্য প্রকাশ করেছে যে প্রায়শই উল্লেখ করা লেখকের প্রতিবেদনের ফলাফল পুনরায় প্রকাশ করা কঠিন। প্রায়শই প্রাপ্ত কোড এবং তথ্য হিসেবে প্রস্তাব করা হয় যা সফল প্রজন্ম বন্ধ করে। এমনকি যখন মূল উপাদান পাওয়া যায়, তখন সমস্যা থাকে যা গবেষকদের বিভিন্ন পদ্ধতির কার্যকর থেকে তুলনা করা থেকে বাধা দেয়। To solve the remaining problems-the lack of fixed test sets and the use of inappropriately homogeneous corpora-our paper contributes materials for five closed-set authorship identification experiments.  ১০৬ টি বিভিন্ন লেখকের পাঁচটি পরীক্ষার বিশেষ টেক্সট। পরীক্ষার মধ্যে বর্তমানে আমেরিকান বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ইংরেজি প্রসেসের বিভিন্ন পরীক্ষা আছে। এই পরীক্ষাগুলো সাম্প্রতিক লেখার সাথে তুলনামূলক এবং প্রতিযোগিতার প্রতিনিধিত্বের গবেষণার জন্য ভিত্তি দেয়।', 'az': 'Son araştırmaların müəyyən edilənlərdən çox müəyyən edilmiş yazıcılıq təhsil kağıtlarının təhsil edilməsi çətindir. Əvəz olunmayan kodu və məlumatlar çox vaxt müvəffəqiyyətli yenilənmələri bloklayan faktörlər olaraq təklif edilir. Əvvəlki materiallar faydalandığı vaxt də, araştırmacıların fərqli metodların etkinliğini karşılaşdırmasına mane olan problemlər hətta qalar. Geri qalan problemləri çəkmək üçün - sabit sınama qurğuları yox etmək və istifadə etmək münasibətli bir korpora-bizim kağızımız beş qapılmış təsdiqlənmə təsdiqlənməsi təcrübələrinə materyalları kömək edir. Beş təcrübələr 106 müxtəlif yazıcılardan yazılmış mətnlər. Həqiqətən, təcrübələr müəyyən edilən Amerikan İngilizə prozesi ilə müxtəlif fikirləşmədikləri bir səviyyədə idi. Bu təcrübələr müəyyən yazmaqla birlikdə müəyyən edilən və yenidən ürəkləndirilən yazıcı təcrübəsi təcrübəsinin temsilini təmin edirlər.', 'hy': "Վերջերս ուսումնասիրությունները փաստագրել են, որ հաճախ մեջբերված ավտորիայի պատվիրելու փաստաթղթերում հայտարարված արդյունքները դժվար են վերարտադրվել: Հաճախ անհասանելի կոդ և տվյալներ առաջարկում են որպես գործոններ, որոնք փակում են հաջողակ վերարտադրումը: Նույնիսկ երբ սկզբնական նյութերը հասանելի են, դեռևս կան խնդիրներ, որոնք թույլ են տալիս հետազոտողներին համեմատել տարբեր մեթոդների արդյունավետությունը: Որպեսզի լուծենք մնացած խնդիրները' կայուն փորձարկումների բացակայությունը և անհամապատասխանաբար հավասար մարմնի օգտագործումը, մեր թղթին ներդրում է նյութեր հինգ փակված հեղինակային ինքնության փորձարկումների համար: Հինգ փորձարկումները ներկայացնում են 106 տարբեր հեղինակի տեքստներ: Փորձերը ներառում են մի շարք ժամանակակից ոչ ֆանտաստիկ ամերիկյան անգլերեն պրոզա: Այս փորձարկումները հիմք են տալիս համեմատական և վերարտադրելի հեղինակության հատկագրության հետազոտությունների համար, որոնք ներառում են ժամանակակից գրություն:", 'et': 'Hiljutised uuringud on näidanud, et sageli tsiteeritud autoriõiguse omistamise artiklites esitatud tulemusi on raske reprodutseerida. Õnnestunud reproduktsiooni takistavate teguritena pakutakse sageli välja ligipääsmatuid koode ja andmeid. Isegi kui originaalmaterjalid on kättesaadavad, jäävad probleemid, mis takistavad teadlastel võrrelda erinevate meetodite tõhusust. Ülejäänud probleemide lahendamiseks – fikseeritud testikomplektide puudumine ja sobimatult homogeensete korpuste kasutamine – annab meie töö materjale viieks suletud autorite identifitseerimise eksperimendiks. Viies eksperimendis on tekste 106 erinevast autorist. Eksperimentid hõlmavad mitmeid kaasaegseid mitteulmelisi Ameerika inglise proosa. Need eksperimendid annavad aluse võrreldavale ja reprodutseeritavale autorsuse omistamise uurimisele kaasaegse kirjutamisega.', 'cs': 'Nedávné výzkumy dokládají, že výsledky uvedené v často citovaných autorských příspěvcích jsou obtížné reprodukovat. Nepřístupný kód a data jsou často navrženy jako faktory, které blokují úspěšné reprodukce. I když jsou k dispozici originální materiály, přetrvávají problémy, které výzkumníkům brání srovnávat účinnost různých metod. K řešení zbývajících problémů – nedostatku pevných testovacích sad a použití nevhodně homogenních korpusů – náš článek přináší materiály pro pět experimentů identifikace autorství uzavřených sad. Pět experimentů obsahuje texty od 106 různých autorů. Experimenty zahrnují řadu současných non-fiction amerických anglických próz. Tyto experimenty poskytují základ pro srovnatelný a reprodukovatelný výzkum atribuce autorství zahrnující současné psaní.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet, että usein siteeratuissa tekijän attribution papereissa raportoituja tuloksia on vaikea toistaa. Virheelliset koodit ja tiedot esitetään usein tekijöiksi, jotka estävät onnistuneen jäljentämisen. Vaikka alkuperäisiä materiaaleja on saatavilla, on edelleen ongelmia, jotka estävät tutkijoita vertailemasta eri menetelmien tehokkuutta. Jäljelle jääneiden ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi – kiinteiden testisarjojen puuttuminen ja sopimattoman homogeenisten korpusten käyttö – artikkelimme sisältää materiaaleja viiteen suljetun sarjan tekijäntunnistuskokeeseen. Viidessä kokeessa on tekstejä 106 eri tekijältä. Kokeet sisältävät erilaisia nykyajan tietokirjoja amerikkalaisesta englantilaisesta proosta. Nämä kokeet luovat perustan vertailukelpoiselle ja toistettavissa olevalle tekijän attribution tutkimukselle, johon liittyy nykyaikainen kirjoittaminen.', 'ca': "Recents investigacions han documentat que els resultats denunciats en publicacions d'atribució d'autorització sovint són difícils de reproducir. El codi i les dades inaccessibles sovint es proponen com factors que bloquejen les reproduccions exitoses. Fins i tot quan hi ha materials originals, encara hi ha problemes que impedeixen que els investigadors comparin l'eficacia de diferents mètodes. Per resoldre els problemes restants, la falta de conjunts de proves fixes i l'ús de corpora inadequadament homogène, el nostre paper contribueix a materials per cinc experiments d'identificació de la autoria. Els cinc experiments contenen textos de 106 autors distints. Els experiments impliquen una gama de prosa anglesa contemporania no ficció. Aquests experiments proporcionen la base d'una investigació comparable i reproducible sobre l'atribució d'autoresa que implica l'escriptura contemporania.", 'bs': 'Nedavno istraživanje je dokumentovalo kako su rezultati prijavljeni u često navedenim papirima o privlačenju autoriteta teško je reproducirati. Nedostupni kod i podaci se često predlažu kao faktori koji blokiraju uspješne reprodukcije. Čak i kad su originalni materijali dostupni, ostaju problemi koji sprječavaju istraživače da usporede učinkovitost različitih metoda. Da bi riješili ostale probleme, nedostatak fiksnih testova i upotreba neprimjereno homogenelnih korporacija-naših papira doprinosi materijalima za pet zatvorenih eksperimenata identifikacije autoriteta. Pet eksperimenata imaju tekst od 106 različitih autora. Eksperimenti uključuju gomilu savremenog neofikcionog američkog engleskog prosa. Ovi eksperimenti pružaju temelj za usporedbenu i reproduktivnu istraživanje privlačenja autoriteta u vezi sa savremenim pisanjem.', 'jv': 'Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntukno autorsor neng akeh akeh akeh ng챕w챕, dadi ka챕 autorsor barang nggawe barang nggawe barang maning. Awak dh챕w챕 kab챔h kode lan data sing dikarepak챕 karo pernak-pernik sing ngupakan karo pernik sing gawe barang nggawe barang. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Mbok iso nglanggar perkoro sing paling pengguna-ngenggo perkoro sing ora bisa nguasai perusahaan karo hal-perusahaan sing paling maneh dumadho perusahaan Laptop" and "Desktop Getama karo perbudhakan langgambar akeh gambar kanggo basa Perusahaan Inggris nang sabanjur챕. Name', 'sk': 'Nedavne raziskave so dokumentirale, da je rezultate, poročane v pogosto citiranih avtorskih prispevkih, težko reproducirati. Nepdostopna koda in podatki se pogosto predlagajo kot dejavniki, ki blokirajo uspešno reprodukcijo. Tudi če so na voljo originalni materiali, ostajajo težave, ki raziskovalcem preprečujejo primerjavo učinkovitosti različnih metod. Za reševanje preostalih težav – pomanjkanje fiksnih testnih sklopov in uporaba neustrezno homogenih korpusov – naš prispevek prispeva gradivo za pet poskusov identifikacije avtorstva zaprtih sklopov. Pet eksperimentov vsebuje besedila 106 različnih avtorjev. Eksperimenti vključujejo vrsto sodobne nefikcijske ameriške angleške proze. Ti eksperimenti zagotavljajo podlago za primerljive in ponovljive raziskave pripisovanja avtorstva, ki vključujejo sodobno pisanje.', 'ha': "A yanzu research na nuna cewa matsalar da aka sanar da shi a cikin karatun masu karatun mutane da aka rubũta shi mara buƙata ana yi nauyi. Ana ƙayyade kodi da data wanda bã za'a iya iya amfani da shi ba kamar factori wanda za'a kange duba mai cin nasara. Haƙĩƙa, kõ dã an iya sami abubuwa masu asali, masu jiran mataimako da za'a kange mutane daga sami'ar metode dabam. Ko yin kure wa masu baka-ƙaranci da ma'abũcin jarrabo masu daidaita da amfani da nau'in korpo-na-rubutunmu yana ƙarfafa masu amfani da matsayin shaidar mutafan da aka rufe. Fi jarrabai ke da misalin littãfi daga 106 masu buƙata. Experiments include some kind of current non-fiction-English pro. Wannan jarrabãwa na samar da foundi ga littãfin da ke sami da lissafa da ba a zartar da shi ba.", 'he': 'מחקר לאחרונה תוקן כי תוצאות דווחות במסמכי ההזדמנות המצויינים לעתים קרובות קשות להחזיר. קוד ונתונים בלתי נגישים מציעים לעתים קרובות כגורמים שמחסומים את התחזויות המצליחות. אפילו כשחומרים מקוריים זמינים, נותרו בעיות שממנעות מחקרים להשוות את היעילות של שיטות שונות. כדי לפתור את הבעיות שנשארו, חוסר מסדרי מבחן קבועים ושימוש של גופה הומוגנית לא הולמת, הנייר שלנו תורם חומרים לחמש ניסויים לזהות הסופרים סגורים. חמש הניסויים מכילים טקסטים מ-106 סופרים בודדים. ניסויים מעורבים מגוון של פרוזה אמריקאית לא בדיונית contemporary. הניסויים האלה מספקים את הבסיס למחקר שיתוף אוטוריות שווה ומחזירה שמעניין כתיבה contemporary.', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཡོད་པའི་དབུགས་རྩིས་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ཕན་ཐོགས་བཀོད་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ནུས་མེད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱིས་འགྲོ་སྤྱོད་མི་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན་པས། སྔོན་སྒྲིག་མའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དེ་ཐོབ་པ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས། དཔོན་རིགས་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད་པ འཛམ་གླིང་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ལེན་མི་ཡོད་པ་ལས་བརྟན་དཔྱད་ཞིབ The five experiments feature texts from 106 distinct authors. སྒེར་ཞུ་བ་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་རྐྱེན་མེད་པའི་གནད་དོན་རིག་གི་ལས་འགུལ་ཁབ་ཅིག་འགོད་ཡོད། སྐྱེས་ཚོགས་འདི་དག་གིས་དུས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དང་བསྐྱར་རྩོལ་བའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་བའི་ལྟ་སྟངས་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Varieties of Plain Language', 'pt': 'Variedades de linguagem simples', 'ar': 'أصناف من لغة مبسطة', 'ja': '平易な言語の多様性', 'fr': 'Variétés de langage clair', 'es': 'Variedades de lenguaje sencillo', 'zh': '诸微言', 'ru': 'Разновидности простого языка', 'hi': 'सादा भाषा की किस्में', 'ga': 'Cineálacha Teanga Shimplí', 'el': 'Ποικιλίες απλής γλώσσας', 'hu': 'Az egyszerű nyelv fajtái', 'ka': 'მხოლოდ ენის განსხვავებები', 'it': 'Varietà di lingua semplice', 'kk': 'Кәдімгі тіл айнымалылығы', 'mk': 'Разни на обичен јазик', 'lt': 'Paprastos kalbos įvairovės', 'ms': 'Variasi Bahasa Biasa', 'mt': 'Varjetajiet ta’ lingwa sempliċi', 'ml': 'Varieties of Plain Language', 'mn': 'Төв хэл', 'no': 'Vanleg språk', 'pl': 'Odmiany języka zwykłego', 'sr': 'Raznolikosti prostog jezika', 'ro': 'Soiuri de limbaj simplu', 'so': 'Luqada caadiga ah', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂයේ විවිධානය', 'ta': 'மொழியின் மாறிகள்', 'sv': 'Varieteter av vanligt språk', 'ur': 'ساده زبان کی مختلف', 'uz': 'Oddiy tilning turlari', 'vi': 'Số lẻ của Ngôn ngữ Thường', 'hr': 'Raznolikosti običnog jezika', 'da': 'Sorter af almindeligt sprog', 'nl': 'Variëten van gewone taal', 'bg': 'Разнообразия на обикновен език', 'fa': 'مختلف زبان ساده', 'de': 'Sorten der einfachen Sprache', 'ko': '소박한 언어의 다양성', 'tr': 'adat diliniň üýtgewleri', 'id': 'Variasi Bahasa Biasa', 'af': 'Veranderinge van Eenvoudige Taal', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'sq': 'Varietat e gjuhës së thjeshtë', 'sw': 'Varieties of Plain Language', 'hy': 'Varieties of Plain Language', 'bn': 'প্লাইন ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষা', 'ca': 'Varieties of Plain Language', 'cs': 'Odrůdy prostého jazyka', 'et': 'Lihtkeele sortid', 'fi': 'Selkeän kielen lajitelmat', 'az': 'T톛k Dilin m칲xt톛lifl톛ri', 'bs': 'Raznolikosti običnog jezika', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Raznolikosti preprostega jezika', 'he': 'שונים של שפה פשוטה', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས'}
{'en': 'Many organizations seek or need to produce documents that are written plainly. In the United States, the Plain Writing Act of 2010 requires that many federal agencies’ documents for the public are written in plain English. In particular, the government’s Plain Language Action and Information Network (PLAIN) recommends that writers use short sentences and everyday words, as does the Securities and Exchange Commission’s Plain English Rule. Since the 1970s, American plain language advocates have moved away from readability measures and favored usability testing and document design considerations. But in this paper we use quantitative measures of sentence length and word difficulty that (1) reveal stylistic variation among PLAIN’s exemplars of plain writing, and (2) help us position PLAIN’s exemplars relative to documents written in other kinds of accessible English (e.g., The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, and Wikipedia) and one academic document likely to be perceived as difficult. Uncombined measures for sentences and vocabularyleft separate, unlike in traditional readability formulascan complement usability testing and document design considerations, and advance knowledge about different types of plainer English.', 'ar': 'تسعى العديد من المنظمات أو تحتاج إلى إنتاج مستندات مكتوبة بشكل واضح. في الولايات المتحدة ، يتطلب "قانون الكتابة البسيطة لعام 2010" كتابة العديد من مستندات الوكالات الفيدرالية للجمهور بلغة إنجليزية بسيطة. على وجه الخصوص ، توصي شبكة العمل والمعلومات الحكومية بلغة مبسطة ("PLAIN") الكتاب باستخدام جمل قصيرة وكلمات يومية ، كما تفعل "قاعدة اللغة الإنجليزية البسيطة" الصادرة عن لجنة الأوراق المالية والبورصات. منذ سبعينيات القرن الماضي ، ابتعد دعاة اللغة الأمريكية الواضحة عن مقاييس سهولة القراءة وفضلوا اختبار قابلية الاستخدام واعتبارات تصميم المستندات. لكن في هذه الورقة ، نستخدم مقاييس كمية لطول الجملة وصعوبة الكلمات التي (1) تكشف عن تباين أسلوبي بين نماذج PLAIN للكتابة البسيطة ، و (2) تساعدنا في وضع نماذج PLAIN بالنسبة إلى المستندات المكتوبة بأنواع أخرى من اللغة الإنجليزية التي يمكن الوصول إليها (على سبيل المثال ، نيويورك تايمز ، صوت أمريكا الإنجليزية الخاصة ، وويكيبيديا) ووثيقة أكاديمية واحدة من المحتمل أن يُنظر إليها على أنها صعبة. يمكن للقياسات غير المجمعة للجمل والمفردات - تركت منفصلة ، على عكس معادلات سهولة القراءة التقليدية - أن تكمل اختبار قابلية الاستخدام واعتبارات تصميم المستندات ، وتقدم المعرفة حول أنواع مختلفة من اللغة الإنجليزية البسيطة.', 'es': 'Muchas organizaciones buscan o necesitan presentar documentos que estén escritos con claridad. En los Estados Unidos, la «Ley de Escritura Plana de 2010» exige que los documentos de muchas agencias federales para el público estén escritos en inglés sencillo. En particular, la Red de Información y Acción en Lenguaje Claro («PLAIN») del gobierno recomienda que los escritores usen oraciones cortas y palabras cotidianas, al igual que la «Regla del inglés simple» de la Comisión de Bolsa y Valores. Desde la década de 1970, los defensores del lenguaje simple estadounidenses se han alejado de las medidas de legibilidad y han favorecido las pruebas de usabilidad y las consideraciones de diseño de documentos. Pero en este artículo utilizamos medidas cuantitativas de la longitud de las oraciones y la dificultad de las palabras que (1) revelan variaciones estilísticas entre los ejemplos de escritura simple de PLAIN, y (2) nos ayudan a posicionar los ejemplos de PLAIN en relación con documentos escritos en otros tipos de inglés accesible (por ejemplo, The New York Times, Voice of America Special English y Wikipedia) y un documento académico que probablemente se perciba como difícil. Las medidas no combinadas para las oraciones y el vocabulario (dejadas por separado, a diferencia de las fórmulas de legibilidad tradicionales) pueden complementar las pruebas de usabilidad y las consideraciones de diseño de documentos, y fomentar el conocimiento sobre los diferentes tipos de inglés más claro.', 'fr': "De nombreuses organisations cherchent ou ont besoin de produire des documents rédigés clairement. Aux États-Unis, le «\xa0Plain Writing Act of 2010\xa0» exige que les documents de nombreux organismes fédéraux destinés au public soient rédigés en anglais clair. En particulier, le Plain Language Action and Information Network («\xa0PLAIN\xa0») du gouvernement recommande aux rédacteurs d'utiliser des phrases courtes et des mots courants, tout comme la «\xa0Règle d'anglais simple\xa0» de la Securities and Exchange Commission. Depuis les années 1970, les défenseurs américains du langage clair se sont éloignés des mesures de lisibilité et ont privilégié les tests d'utilisabilité et les considérations de conception de documents. Mais dans cet article, nous utilisons des mesures quantitatives de la longueur des phrases et de la difficulté des mots qui (1) révèlent les variations stylistiques parmi les modèles d'écriture simple de PLAIN, et (2) nous aident à positionner les exemples de PLAIN par rapport aux documents écrits dans d'autres types d'anglais accessibles (par exemple, The New York Times, Voice of America Special English et Wikipedia) et un document académique susceptible d'être perçu comme difficile. Les mesures non combinées pour les phrases et le vocabulaire — laissées séparément, contrairement aux formules de lisibilité traditionnelles — peuvent compléter les tests d'utilisabilité et les considérations de conception de documents, et faire progresser les connaissances sur différents types d'anglais plus simple.", 'pt': 'Muitas organizações procuram ou precisam produzir documentos escritos de forma simples. Nos Estados Unidos, o “Plain Writing Act de 2010” exige que muitos documentos de agências federais para o público sejam escritos em inglês simples. Em particular, a Plain Language Action and Information Network (“PLAIN”) do governo recomenda que os escritores usem frases curtas e palavras cotidianas, assim como a “Plain English Rule” da Comissão de Valores Mobiliários. Desde a década de 1970, os defensores da linguagem simples americana se afastaram das medidas de legibilidade e favoreceram testes de usabilidade e considerações de design de documentos. Mas neste artigo usamos medidas quantitativas de comprimento de sentença e dificuldade de palavras que (1) revelam variação estilística entre os exemplares de escrita simples do PLAIN e (2) nos ajudam a posicionar os exemplares do PLAIN em relação a documentos escritos em outros tipos de inglês acessível (por exemplo, The New York Times, Voice of America Special English e Wikipedia) e um documento acadêmico que provavelmente será percebido como difícil. Medidas não combinadas para frases e vocabulário – deixadas separadas, ao contrário das fórmulas de legibilidade tradicionais – podem complementar os testes de usabilidade e as considerações de design de documentos e avançar o conhecimento sobre diferentes tipos de inglês mais simples.', 'ru': 'Многие организации стремятся или должны представлять документы, которые написаны в ясной форме. В Соединенных Штатах «Закон о простой письменной форме 2010 года» требует, чтобы документы многих федеральных агентств для общественности были написаны на простом английском языке. В частности, правительственная Сеть действий и информации на простом языке («PLAIN») рекомендует писателям использовать короткие предложения и повседневные слова, как это делает «Правило простого английского языка» Комиссии по ценным бумагам и биржам.Начиная с 1970-х годов американские сторонники простого языка отошли от мер по обеспечению удобочитаемости и отдали предпочтение тестированию удобства использования и разработке документов. Но в этой статье мы используем количественные показатели длины предложения и сложности слов, которые (1) выявляют стилистические различия между ПРОСТЫМИ образцами простого письма и (2) помогают нам позиционировать ПРОСТЫЕ образцы по отношению к документам, написанным на других доступных языках (например, The New York Times, Voice of America Special English и Wikipedia) и одному академическому документу, который, вероятно, будет воспринят как сложный. Некомбинированные меры для предложений и лексики - в отличие от традиционных формул удобочитаемости - могут дополнить тестирование удобства использования и соображения по оформлению документов, а также расширить знания о различных типах простого английского языка.', 'zh': '众求成文档。 在美国,"2010年普通作法案"诸联邦,皆简英语所撰。 特政府"普通语言动信息网络"("PLAIN")议作家用短句、日用语,美国证券交易委员会"常英语则"亦如之。 自 20 世纪 70 以来,美国通俗易懂言倡导者已远可读性,转支可用性试文档设计虑素。 然于本文之中,用句长短单词难度之量,(1)揭PLAIN之文示例间文体差异,及(2)助我定位PLAIN之样本相对以他类无障碍英语(,纽约时报,美国之音殊英语维基百科)之文档,或以为难文档。 句词汇之不轨(与旧可读性公式不同,分)可以补可用性试文档计虑,推其英语知。', 'hi': 'कई संगठन उन दस्तावेजों की तलाश करते हैं या उन्हें प्रस्तुत करने की आवश्यकता होती है जो स्पष्ट रूप से लिखे जाते हैं। संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका में, "2010 का सादा लेखन अधिनियम" के लिए आवश्यक है कि जनता के लिए कई संघीय एजेंसियों के दस्तावेज सादे अंग्रेजी में लिखे गए हैं। विशेष रूप से, सरकार के सादे भाषा एक्शन एंड इन्फॉर्मेशन नेटवर्क ("PLAIN") की सिफारिश है कि लेखक छोटे वाक्यों और रोजमर्रा के शब्दों का उपयोग करें, जैसा कि प्रतिभूति और विनिमय आयोग का "सादा अंग्रेजी नियम" है। 1 9 70 के दशक के बाद से, अमेरिकी सादे भाषा के अधिवक्ताओं ने पठनीयता उपायों से दूर चले गए हैं और प्रयोज्य परीक्षण और दस्तावेज़ डिजाइन विचारों का पक्ष लिया है। लेकिन इस पेपर में हम वाक्य की लंबाई और शब्द कठिनाई के मात्रात्मक उपायों का उपयोग करते हैं जो (1) सादे लेखन के सादे लेखन के सादे उदाहरणों के बीच शैलीगत भिन्नता को प्रकट करते हैं, और (2) हमें अन्य प्रकार के सुलभ अंग्रेजी (जैसे, द न्यूयॉर्क टाइम्स, वॉयस ऑफ अमेरिका स्पेशल इंग्लिश और विकिपीडिया) में लिखे गए दस्तावेजों के सापेक्ष सादे के उदाहरणों को स्थिति में रखने में मदद करते हैं और एक अकादमिक दस्तावेज को मुश्किल माना जाता है। वाक्यों और शब्दावली के लिए असंबद्ध उपाय- पारंपरिक पठनीयता सूत्रों के विपरीत अलग-अलग छोड़ दिया गया है- प्रयोज्य परीक्षण और दस्तावेज़ डिजाइन विचारों के पूरक हो सकते हैं, और विभिन्न प्रकार के सादे अंग्रेजी के बारे में ज्ञान को आगे बढ़ा सकते हैं।', 'ja': '多くの組織は、わかりやすく書かれた文書を作成する必要があります。 米国では、「2010年プレーンライティング法」により、多くの連邦政府機関の一般向け文書がプレーンな英語で書かれていることが義務付けられています。 特に、政府のプレーン・ランゲージ・アクション・アンド・インフォメーション・ネットワーク（「プレーン」）は、証券取引委員会の「プレーン・イングリッシュ・ルール」と同様に、作家が短い文章と日常の単語を使用することを推奨しています。「1970年代以降、アメリカのプレーン言語の擁護者は、読みやすさの尺度から離れ、ユーザビリティテストとドキュメントデザインの考慮事項を好んでいます。 しかし、この論文では、文の長さと単語の難易度の定量的測定を使用しています。これは、(1)プレーンライティングの例の中でスタイルのばらつきを明らかにし、(2)プレーンライティングの例を他の種類のアクセス可能な英語で書かれた文書（例えば、ニューヨーク・タイムズ、ボイス・オブ・アメリカ、スペシャル・イングリッシュ、ウィキペディア）と、難しいと認識される可能性の高い1つの学術文書と比較して位置付けるのに役立ちます。 従来の読みやすい数式とは異なり、文章と語彙を左右分離するための組み合わせのないメジャーは、ユーザビリティテストとドキュメントデザインの考慮事項を補完し、さまざまなタイプの平易な英語に関する知識を進歩させることができます。', 'ga': 'Bíonn go leor eagraíochtaí ag iarraidh nó ag teastáil uathu doiciméid a chur ar fáil atá scríofa go soiléir. Sna Stáit Aontaithe, éilíonn an “Gníomh Scríbhneoireacht Ghnáth 2010” go scríobhtar go leor doiciméad gníomhaireachtaí feidearálach don phobal i mBéarla simplí. Go háirithe, molann Líonra Ghníomhaíochta agus Faisnéise Gnáththeanga an rialtais (“PLAIN”) go n-úsáidfeadh scríbhneoirí abairtí gearra agus focail laethúla, mar a dhéanann “Riail Ghnáth-Bhéarla” an Choimisiúin um Urrúis agus Malartú. Ó na 1970idí, tá abhcóidí teanga shimplí Mheiriceá tar éis bogadh ar shiúl ó bhearta inléiteachta agus bhí siad i bhfabhar tástáil inúsáidteachta agus breithnithe maidir le dearadh doiciméad. Ach sa pháipéar seo bainimid úsáid as tomhais chainníochtúla maidir le fad na habairte agus deacracht na bhfocal a (1) a thaispeánann éagsúlacht stíle i measc eiseamláirí PLAIN den scríbhneoireacht shimplí, agus (2) a chabhraíonn linn eiseamláirí PLAIN a shuíomh i gcoibhneas le doiciméid atá scríofa i gcineálacha eile Béarla inrochtana (m.sh., The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, agus Vicipéid) agus doiciméad acadúil amháin is dócha a mheasfar a bheith deacair. Is féidir le bearta neamh-chomhcheangailte abairtí agus stór focal — fágtha ar leithligh, murab ionann agus sna foirmlí traidisiúnta inléiteachta — comhlánú a dhéanamh ar thástáil inúsáidteachta agus breithnithe deartha doiciméad, agus eolas ar chineálacha éagsúla Béarla níos simplí a chur chun cinn.', 'ka': 'ბევრი ორგანიზაციები საძებლობა ან უნდა გამოვიყენოთ დოკუმენტები, რომლებიც წერილია. ამერიკეთებული შტატებში „2010-ის კომპონტური წერილების აკეტი” უნდა უფრო ფედერალური ადგინტურების დოკუმენტები სახელსაწყისთვის წერილი ანგლი განსაკუთრებულია, სამყაროს მხოლოდ ენახის მოქმედება და ინფორმაციის ქსელი („PLAIN”) მოწყვებს, რომ ოთატორები გამოყენება კრეტული სიტყვები და ყოველდღე სიტყვები, როგორც მუშაობა და გადაცვლა 1970-იან წლის განმავლობაში ამერიკანეთის მხოლოდ ენის მხარდაჭერები გადასვლა კითხვადასხვა მეტრიდან და მოსახულებული გამოყენება და დოკუმენტის განსახულება. მაგრამ ამ წიგნაში ჩვენ გამოყენებთ წიგნალის სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების განცვლები, რომელიც (1) აღწერს სტილისტიული განცვლები PLAIN და (2) დაგვეხმარება PLAIN-ის მაგალითების პოზაცია, რომელიც სხვა ხელმისაწყვებელი ანგლისური დოკუმენტებით წერილი დოკუმენტებით (მაგალითად, New York Times, ამერიკაში სპეციალური ანგლისური და Wikipedia) და ერთი აკადემი შეუძლიათ გამოყენებელი ტესტისტესტის და დოკუმენტის განსაზღვრებისთვის გადასრულებული მოწყობინებების შესაძლებლობა და განსაზღვრებისთვის განსხვავებული ინგლისური ტიპების მეცნიერება.', 'el': 'Πολλοί οργανισμοί αναζητούν ή χρειάζονται να παράγουν έγγραφα που είναι γραμμένα καθαρά. Στις Ηνωμένες Πολιτείες, η "Πράξη Απλής Γραψίας 2010" απαιτεί ότι τα έγγραφα πολλών ομοσπονδιακών υπηρεσιών για το κοινό είναι γραμμένα σε απλά αγγλικά. Ειδικότερα, το κυβερνητικό Δίκτυο Δράσης και Πληροφόρησης Απλής Γλώσσας ("PLAIN") συνιστά στους συγγραφείς να χρησιμοποιούν σύντομες προτάσεις και καθημερινές λέξεις, όπως και ο "Απλός Αγγλικός Κανόνας της Επιτροπής Αξιών και Χρηματιστηρίων". Από τα 1970er χρόνια, οι Αμερικανοί υποστηρικτές της απλής γλώσσας έχουν απομακρυνθεί από τα μέτρα αναγνωσιμότητας και ευνοούν τις δοκιμές χρηστικότητας και τις σκέψεις σχεδιασμού εγγράφων. Αλλά σε αυτή την εργασία χρησιμοποιούμε ποσοτικά μέτρα μήκους προτάσεων και δυσκολίας λέξεων που (1) αποκαλύπτουν στυλιστική διακύμανση μεταξύ των υποδειγμάτων της απλής γραφής του PLAIN, και (2) να μας βοηθήσουν να τοποθετήσουμε τα παραδείγματα του PLAIN σε σχέση με έγγραφα γραμμένα σε άλλα είδη προσβάσιμων Αγγλικών (π.χ. The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, και Wikipedia) και ένα ακαδημαϊκό έγγραφο πιθανόν να θεωρηθεί δύσκολο. Τα μη συνδυασμένα μέτρα για τις προτάσεις και το λεξιλόγιο – που παραμένουν χωριστά, σε αντίθεση με τους παραδοσιακούς τύπους αναγνωσιμότητας – μπορούν να συμπληρώσουν τη δοκιμή χρηστικότητας και τις σκέψεις σχεδιασμού εγγράφων και να προωθήσουν τις γνώσεις σχετικά με διαφορετικούς τύπους απλούστερων αγγλικών.', 'hu': 'Sok szervezet egyértelműen írt dokumentumokat keres vagy kell előállítania. Az Egyesült Államokban a 2010. évi egyszerű írásról szóló törvény megköveteli, hogy számos szövetségi ügynökség nyilvánosság számára dokumentumot egyszerűen angolul írjanak. Különösen a kormány egyszerű nyelvű akciós és információs hálózata ("PLAIN") javasolja, hogy az írók rövid mondatokat és mindennapi szavakat használjanak, csakúgy, mint az Értékpapír- és Tőzsdebizottság "egyszerű angol szabálya". Az 1970-es évek óta az amerikai egyszerű nyelvű támogatók eltávolodtak az olvashatósági intézkedésektől, és előnyben részesítették a használhatóság tesztelését és a dokumentumtervezési megfontolásokat. De ebben a tanulmányban a mondathossz és a szónehézség mennyiségi méréseit használjuk, amelyek (1) a PLAIN egyszerű írási példái között stilisztikai eltéréseket mutatnak, és (2) segítsen elhelyezni a PLAIN példáit más, hozzáférhető angol nyelvű dokumentumokhoz (pl. The New York Times, Voice of America Special English és Wikipédia) és egy olyan tudományos dokumentumhoz viszonyítva, amelyet valószínűleg nehéznek tartanak. A hagyományos olvashatósági képletekkel ellentétben a mondatok és a szókincsek kombinálatlan mérései kiegészíthetik a használhatóság tesztelését és a dokumentumtervezési megfontolásokat, és fejleszthetik a különböző típusú világosabb angol nyelvtudást.', 'it': 'Molte organizzazioni cercano o hanno bisogno di produrre documenti scritti in modo chiaro. Negli Stati Uniti, il "Plain Writing Act of 2010" richiede che i documenti di molte agenzie federali per il pubblico siano scritti in inglese chiaro. In particolare, la Plain Language Action and Information Network ("PLAIN") del governo raccomanda agli scrittori di usare frasi brevi e parole quotidiane, così come la "Plain English Rule" della Securities and Exchange Commission. Dagli anni \'70, i sostenitori del linguaggio comune americano si sono allontanati dalle misure di leggibilità e hanno favorito i test di usabilità e le considerazioni sulla progettazione dei documenti. Ma in questo articolo usiamo misure quantitative di lunghezza della frase e difficoltà della parola che (1) rivelano variazioni stilistiche tra gli esempi di PLAIN di scrittura semplice, e (2) aiutarci a posizionare gli esempi di PLAIN in relazione a documenti scritti in altri tipi di inglese accessibile (ad esempio, The New York Times, Voice of America Special English e Wikipedia) e a un documento accademico che può essere percepito come difficile. Le misure non combinate per frasi e vocabolario – lasciate separate, a differenza delle formule di leggibilità tradizionali – possono integrare i test di usabilità e le considerazioni sulla progettazione dei documenti e migliorare la conoscenza dei diversi tipi di inglese più chiaro.', 'kk': 'Көпшілік құжаттар жазылған құжаттарды қалау не құру керек. Америка Штаттарда "2010 жылдың кәдімгі жазу" деген көптеген федералдық агенциялардың құжаттары кәдімгі ағылшынша жазылады. Әсіресе, үкіметтің кәдімгі тіл әрекеттері мен мәлімет желі (“PLAIN”) жазушылары қысқа сөздерді және күнделік сөздерді қолдануға ұсынады, мәліметтің қауіпсіздігі және комисияның "Кәдімгі 1970жылдан бастап, американдық кәдімгі тілдердің адамдары оқу мүмкіндіктерінен және қолданатын мүмкіндіктерді тексеру мен құжаттың құрылымының сәйкестіктер Бірақ бұл қағазда біз сөздердің ұзындығын және сөздердің кәдімгі мәселелерін қолданамыз (1) PLAIN деген кәдімгі жазу үлгілерінің стилистикалық түрлендірілігін және (2) PLAIN үлгілерін басқа түрлерде ағылшын тілінде жазылған құжаттардың (мысалы, Нью Йорк Таймс, Американың тыс ағылшын тілінде және Википедияда) сияқты мәселелеріне қатынасыз көмектеседі. Сөздер мен сөздер үшін біріктірілмеген мерзімдер - сол жақтан бөлек, әдімгі оқу мүмкіндіктерінің формулаларының сияқты - пайдаланушылығын тексеру және құжат құрылғысының сәйкестіктерін қосып', 'ms': 'Banyak organisasi mencari atau perlu menghasilkan dokumen yang ditulis dengan jelas. Di Amerika Syarikat, "Akta Penulisan Biasa 2010" memerlukan banyak dokumen agensi persekutuan untuk masyarakat ditulis dalam bahasa Inggeris biasa. Secara khususnya, Rangkaian Tindakan Bahasa Biasa dan Maklumat (PLAIN) kerajaan menyarankan penulis menggunakan kalimat pendek dan perkataan sehari-hari, seperti "Peraturan Inggeris Biasa" komisi Securities and Exchange. Since the 1970s, American plain language advocates have moved away from readability measures and favored usability testing and document design considerations.  But in this paper we use quantitative measures of sentence length and word difficulty that (1) reveal stylistic variation among PLAIN\'s exemplars of plain writing, Dan (2) membantu kami menempatkan contoh PLAIN berkaitan dengan dokumen yang ditulis dalam bahasa Inggeris yang boleh didapati lain (contohnya, The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, dan Wikipedia) dan satu dokumen akademik yang mungkin dianggap sukar. Ukuran tidak digabung untuk kalimat dan vokbulari - kiri terpisah, tidak seperti dalam formula pembacaan tradisional - boleh tambah ujian usability dan pertimbangan desain dokumen, dan kemajuan pengetahuan mengenai jenis berbeza bahasa Inggeris yang lebih jelas.', 'mk': "Many organizations seek or need to produce documents that are written plainly.  Во САД, „Актот за едноставно пишување од 2010 година“ бара документите на многу федерални агенции за јавноста да бидат напишани на едноставен англиски јазик. Посебно, владината мрежа за обичен јазик акција и информации („ПЛАИН“) препорачува писателите да користат кратки реченици и секојдневни зборови, како и „обично англиско правило“ на Комисијата за вредности и размена. Од 1970-тите, американските застапници на едноставен јазик се оддалечија од мерките за читливост и ги поддржаа тестовите за употребливост и разгледувањата за дизајн на документите. Но во овој документ користиме квантитивни мерки на должина на реченицата и тешкотија на зборот кои (1) откриваат стилистичка варијација меѓу примерите на ПЛАИН на едноставно пишување,  and (2) help us position PLAIN's exemplars relative to documents written in other kinds of accessible English (e.g., The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, and Wikipedia) and one academic document likely to be perceived as difficult.  Некомбинираните мерки за речениците и речникот – оставени одделни, за разлика од традиционалните формули за читливост – можат да ги комплиментираат тестовите за употребливост и размислувањата за дизајнот на документите, како и да го напредуваат знаењето за различните типови на поја", 'ml': 'ഒരുപാട് സംഘടനകള്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി എഴുതിയ രേഖകള്\u200d നോക്കുകയോ ചെയ്യുന്നുണ്ട്. അമേരിക്കയില്\u200d "പ്ലൈന്\u200d എഴുതുന്ന പ്രമാണം 2010" ആവശ്യപ്പെടുന്നു പൊതുക്കാനുള്ള പല ഫെഡറല്\u200d സംഘടനകളുടെ രേഖകള്\u200d സാധാരണ ഇംഗ് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, സര്\u200dക്കാരുടെ സാധാരണ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും വിവരങ്ങളുടെ നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കും ("പ്ലാനിന്\u200d") എഴുതുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് ചെറിയ വാക്കുകളും ദിവസവാക് 1970കളുടെ തലമുറകളില്\u200d നിന്നും അമേരിക്കന്\u200d സാധാരണ ഭാഷയിലെ സക്കീര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d വായിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d നി പക്ഷെ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ നീളവും വാക്കിന്റെ കഠിനവും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. (1) പ്ലാനിന്റെ സ്റ്റൈലിസ്റ്റിക് വേര്\u200d (2) മറ്റു തരം തരത്തിലുള്ള രേഖകളില്\u200d എഴുതിയിരിക്കുന്ന രേഖകളുമായി പ്ലാനിന്റെ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d നമുക്ക് സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. ന്യൂയോര്\u200dക്ക് ടൈസ്, അമേരിക്കന്\u200d  വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും ഇടത്തേക്കും വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട സാധ്യതയില്\u200d വായിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്', 'lt': "Daugelis organizacijų siekia arba turi pateikti aiškiai rašytus dokumentus. In the United States, the “Plain Writing Act of 2010” requires that many federal agencies' documents for the public are written in plain English.  Visų pirma vyriausybės paprastųjų kalbų veiksmų ir informacijos tinklas (PLAIN) rekomenduoja rašytojams naudoti trumpus sakinius ir kasdienius žodžius, taip pat vertybinių popierių ir valiutų keitimo komisijos paprastąją anglų kalbos taisyklę. Nuo septintajame dešimtmečio Amerikos paprastosios kalbos advokatai atsisakė skaitomumo priemonių ir pritarė naudojimo bandymams bei dokumentų projektavimui. But in this paper we use quantitative measures of sentence length and word difficulty that (1) reveal stylistic variation among PLAIN's exemplars of plain writing, ir (2) padėti mums pateikti PLAIN pavyzdžius, palyginti su kitais prieinamais anglų kalbomis (pvz., The New York Times, Voice of America Special English ir Wikipedia) ir vienu akademiniu dokumentu, kuris gali būti laikomas sunkiu. Nederintos priemonės, taikomos sakiniams ir žodynui, paliktiems atskirai, priešingai nei tradicinėse skaitomumo formulėse, gali papildyti naudojimo bandymus ir dokumentų projektavimo svarstymus bei išplėsti žinias apie įvairias paprastesnės anglų kalbos rūšis.", 'no': 'Mange organisasjonar søk eller må laga dokument som er skriven klart. I USA krev «Plain Skriving Act of 2010» at mange federale byråde til offentlege dokument er skriven i enkelt engelsk. Sjølvsagt anbefaler regjeringens vanleg språk- handling og informasjonsnettverk (« PLAIN ») at brennarar brukar korte setningar og kvardag ord, slik at kommisjonen « Vanleg engelsk regl » for Securities and Exchange. Siden 1970-årene har amerikanske vanleg språksadvokater flytta vekk frå lesabilitetsmålingar og favoritterte testing av brukabilitet og dokumentdesign. Men i denne papiret bruker vi kvantitative målar med setningsslengde og ordvanskeligheten som (1) viser stylistiske variasjonar mellom eksemplaren av PLAIN for enkelt skriving, Og (2) hjelper oss å plassere eksemplaren av PLAIN til dokument skriven i andre typar tilgjengelege engelsk (f.eks. The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, and Wikipedia) og e in akademisk dokument som sannsynlegvis vert oppfatta som vanskeleg. Ukombinerte mål for setningar og ordbokstavar – venstre separe, i motsetning til tradisjonelle lesabilitetsformlar – kan leggja til utforsking av brukabilitet og dokumentdesign, og avansert kunnskap om ulike typar enklare engelsk.', 'mt': "Ħafna organizzazzjonijiet ifittxu jew jeħtieġu jipproduċu dokumenti li huma miktuba b’mod ċar. Fl-Istati Uniti, l-“Att dwar l-Iskrift sempliċi tal-2010” jeħtieġ li d-dokumenti ta’ ħafna aġenziji federali għall-pubbliku jkunu miktuba bl-Ingliż sempliċi. B’mod partikolari, in-Netwerk ta’ Azzjoni u Informazzjoni Lingwistika Unika tal-gvern (“PLAIN”) jirrakkomanda li l-kittieba jużaw sentenzi qosra u kliem ta’ kuljum, kif ukoll ir-“Regola Ingliża Unika” tal-Kummissjoni tat-Titoli u l-Iskambju. Sa mis-snin sebgħin, il-promoturi Amerikani tal-lingwa sempliċi marru ’l bogħod minn miżuri ta’ leġibbiltà u ffavorixxew l-ittestjar tal-użu u l-kunsiderazzjonijiet tad-disinn tad-dokumenti. Iżda f'dan id-dokument aħna nużaw miżuri kwantitattivi tat-tul tas-sentenza u d-diffikultà tal-kelma li (1) juru varjazzjoni stilistika fost l-eżemplari tal-PLAIN ta' kitba sempliċi,  and (2) help us position PLAIN's exemplars relative to documents written in other kinds of accessible English (e.g., The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, and Wikipedia) and one academic document likely to be perceived as difficult.  Miżuri mhux ikkombinati għas-sentenzi u l-vokabulari – imħalla separati, għall-kuntrarju tal-formuli tradizzjonali tal-leġibbiltà – jistgħu jikkumplimentaw l-ittestjar tal-użu u l-kunsiderazzjonijiet tad-disinn tad-dokumenti, u javvanzaw l-għarfien dwar tipi differenti ta’ Ingliż aktar ċar.", 'mn': 'Олон байгууллагууд тодорхой бичигдсэн баримт бий болгох эсвэл бүтээх хэрэгтэй. АНУ-д "2010 оны энгийн бичил хууль" нь олон федералын агентлагуудын баримтууд энгийн Англи хэлбэрээр бичих хэрэгтэй. Ялангуяа, засгийн газрын Төв Холбоо болон Мэдээллийн Холбоо (PLAIN) зохиолчдын хувьд богино өгүүлбэр, өдөр тутмын үгийг ашиглах боломжтой болно. 1970-аад оны хойш Америкийн энгийн хэл дэмжигчид уншиж чадах үйл ажиллагаанаас, ашиглах боломжтой тест болон баримт бүтээгдэхүүний санаанаас холдсон. Гэхдээ энэ цаасанд бид хэмжээний урт болон хэцүү хэмжээний хэмжээсүүдийг ашигладаг. Энэ хэмжээсүүд нь ПЛАИН-ийн энгийн бичих жишээний стилист өөрчлөлтийг харуулдаг. Мөн (2) бидэнд PLAIN-ын жишээлүүдийг өөр хэлбэртэй Англи хэлний бичсэн баримтуудтай харьцуулахад тусалдаг. Ууламжлалтай унших чадварын томьёонуудыг харьцуулахгүй хэмжээсүүд нь ашиглах боломжтой шалгалт, баримт бүтээгдэхүүний санааг нэмэгдүүлж чадна. Мөн өөр төрлийн энгли хэлний талаар мэдлэг дэвшүүлж чадна.', 'pl': 'Wiele organizacji stara się lub musi sporządzić dokumenty, które są napisane jasno. W Stanach Zjednoczonych "Plain Writing Act of 2010" wymaga, aby dokumenty wielu agencji federalnych dla publiczności były napisane w prostym języku angielskim. W szczególności rządowa sieć działań i informacji zwykłego języka ("PLAIN") zaleca pisarzom używanie krótkich zdań i codziennych słów, podobnie jak "zwykła reguła angielska Komisji Papierów Wartościowych i Giełd". Od lat siedemdziesiątych amerykańscy zwolennicy zwykłego języka oddalili się od środków czytelności i preferowali testy użyteczności i rozważania projektowania dokumentów. Ale w niniejszym artykule używamy ilościowych miarów długości zdania i trudności słowa, które (1) ujawniają różnice stylistyczne wśród przykładów zwykłego pisania PLAIN, i (2) pomagają nam umieścić przykłady PLAIN w stosunku do dokumentów napisanych w innym rodzaju dostępnym języku angielskim (np. The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, Wikipedia) oraz jednego dokumentu akademickiego, który może być postrzegany jako trudny. Nieskojarzone miary zdań i słownictwa – pozostawione oddzielnie, w przeciwieństwie do tradycyjnych formuł czytelności – mogą uzupełnić testy użyteczności i rozważania projektowania dokumentów, a także poszerzyć wiedzę na temat różnych typów języka angielskiego.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් සංයෝගය සැලසුම් කරනවා නැත්නම් ලියපු ලිපිණිය ලියනවා. ඇමරිකානු ජාතිකාවේ, 2010 ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය ලියපු නියෝජිතයෙන් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා සාමාන්\u200dය ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය ව විශේෂයෙන්, රජයේ සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂා ක්\u200dරියාව සහ තොරතුරු ජාලය (“PlAIN“) ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ලේඛකයන්ට කොටි වචනය සහ හැමදාම වචනය භාවිත කරන්න, ආරක් 1970දි පස්සේ, ඇමරිකානු සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරධානකයෝ කියලා කියවන්න පුළුවන් මාර්ගයෙන් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කර නමුත් මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජන වාර්තාව සහ වචන අමාරුවක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා කියලා (1) ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ සාමාන්\u200dය ලියනයේ සාමාන සහ (2) අපිට ප්\u200dලේයින්ගේ ස්ථානය සම්බන්ධ විදිහට උදව් කරන්න පුළුවන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලට ලියපු විදිහට (උදාහරණයෙන්, නිව්යෝක් ටාම්ස්, ඇමරිකාවේ විශ වාක්ය සහ භාෂාවිකාර සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් නැති වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන්, පාරමාන්\u200dය කියවන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය සහ වාක්ෂාවික විශ්වා', 'ro': 'Multe organizații caută sau trebuie să producă documente care sunt scrise clar. În Statele Unite, "Plain Writing Act of 2010" impune ca documentele multor agenții federale pentru public să fie scrise în limba engleză simplă. În special, Rețeaua de Acțiuni și Informații pentru Limbaj Simplu a guvernului ("PLAIN") recomandă scriitorilor să folosească propoziții scurte și cuvinte de zi cu zi, la fel ca și "Regula engleză simplă" a Comisiei pentru Valori Mobiliare și Schimb. Începând cu anii 1970, susținătorii limbajului simplu american s-au îndepărtat de măsurile de citire și au favorizat testarea utilizării și considerațiile de proiectare a documentelor. Dar în această lucrare folosim măsuri cantitative ale lungimii propozițiilor și dificultății cuvântului care (1) dezvăluie variația stilistică dintre exemplarele PLAIN de scriere simplă, și (2) ajută-ne să poziționăm exemplarele PLAIN în raport cu documentele scrise în alte tipuri de engleză accesibilă (de exemplu, The New York Times, Voice of America Special English și Wikipedia) și un document academic care poate fi perceput ca dificil. Măsurile necombinate pentru propoziții și vocabular - lăsate separate, spre deosebire de formulele tradiționale de lizibilitate - pot completa testarea utilizării și considerațiile de proiectare a documentelor și pot avansa cunoștințele despre diferite tipuri de limbă engleză mai simplă.', 'sr': 'Mnoge organizacije traže ili treba da proizvode dokumente koji su jasno napisani. U Sjedinjenim Državama „Zakon o običnom pisanju 2010“, zahteva da su dokumenti mnogih federalnih agencija za javnost napisani na jasnom engleskom jeziku. Posebno, vladini mreža za akciju i informaciju o jeziku i informacijama („PLAIN“) preporučuje pisace da koriste kratke rečenice i svakodnevne reči, kao i „Pravilo engleskog pravila Komisije za sigurnosti i razmjenu“. Od 1970-ih, američki obični advokati jezika su se odselili od mjera čitljivosti i favoritiranih testova korisnosti i razmatranja dokumenta o dizajnu. Međutim, u ovom papiru koristimo kvantitativne mjere dužine rečenice i teškoće rečenica koje (1) pokazuju stilističke varijacije među primjerima PLAIN-a jasnog pisanja, i (2) nam pomažu da postavimo primjere PLAIN-a u odnosu na dokumente napisane na drugim vrstama dostupnih engleskih jezika (npr. New York Times, Glas Amerike specijalnog engleskog i Wikipedia) i jedan akademijski dokument koji će vjerojatno biti smatran teškom. Nekombinirane mjere za rečenice i rečenice - ostavljene odvojene, u razliku od tradicionalnih formula čitljivosti - mogu doprinijeti testiranje korisnosti i razmišljanje o dizajnu dokumenta, i napredovati znanje o različitim vrstama jasnijeg engleskog jezika.', 'ta': 'பல நிறுவனங்கள் தேடுகின்றனர் அல்லது வெளிப்படையாக எழுதப்பட்ட ஆவணங்களை உருவாக்க வேண்டும். அமெரிக்காவில் "இயல்பான எழுதுதல் விதிமுறை" பொது நிறைய பொதுவான நிறுவனங்களின் ஆவணங்கள் வெளிப்படையான ஆங்கிலத்தில் எழு குறிப்பிட்டு, அரசாங்கத்தின் சாதாரண மொழி செயல் மற்றும் தகவல் வலைப்பின்னல் ("PLAIN") எழுதுபவர்கள் சிறிய வாக்குகள் மற்றும் நாள் வார்த்தைகளை பயன்படுத 1970களில் இருந்து, அமெரிக்க சாதாரண மொழி வழங்குபவர்கள் படிக்கக்கூடிய அளவுகளிலிருந்து நீக்கப்பட்டுள்ளன மற்றும் விருப் ஆனால் இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் வாக்கியத்தின் நீளம் மற்றும் வாக்கு கடினமான மாறுபாடு மற்றும் (2) மற்ற வகையான அணுகக்கூடிய ஆங்கிலத்தில் எழுதப்பட்ட ஆவணங்களுக்கு சம்பந்தமான பிலானின் உதாரணங்களை உதவுகிறது (உதாரணமாக நியூய்க்கார்ட் டைஸ், குரல் ஆங்கிலம்  வாக்கியங்களுக்கும் சொற்கோவையும் இடப்புறத்திற்கும் இணைக்கப்படாத அளவுகள், பாதிப்பான படிக்க இயலும் வடிவமைப்புகளுக்கும் போதுமானது - பயன்படுத்', 'so': 'Shirko badan ayaa raadinaya ama u baahan yahay in ay sameeyaan dukumentiyada si bayaan ah loogu qoro. Mareykanka waxaa loola baahan yahay sharciga qoritaanka ee guud ee 2010 in dokumentaha ururada shaqaalaha ee dadweynaha lagu qoro af Ingiriis oo fudud. Si gaar ah, shabakadda macluumaadka iyo macluumaadka ee guud ee dowladu (PLAIN) wuxuu maamulaa in qoraalku ay isticmaalaan erayo gaaban iyo erayo maalin walba, sidoo kale waxaa lagu talo galaa kommiska ammaanka iyo bedela “Rukumada Ingiriiska ee caadiga ah”. Since the 1970s, American plain language advocates have moved away from readability measures and favored usability testing and document design considerations.  Laakiin warqaddan waxaynu ku isticmaalnaa qiyaastii qiyaas ah oo dhererka xukunka iyo dhibaatada hadalka (1) oo ku muuqata isbedelka muuqashada qoraalka fudud ee PLAIN, iyo (2) nagu caawiya meesha uu dhigayo tusaalaha PLAIN e e ku saabsan dukumentiyada oo ku qoran ingiriisi kale oo la isticmaalo (tusaale ahaan The New York Times, Voice of America Special Ingiriis, iyo Wikipedia) iyo warqad akademi ah oo laga ogaan karo mid adag. Xiriirihii aan la xiriirin oo uu u qoro qoraalka iyo hadalka bidixda, si u duwan noocyada aqriska ee caadiga ah, waxay ku dhammaysan karaan imtixaanka isticmaalka iyo fiirsashada qoraalka, waxaana horumarinaya aqoonta ku saabsan noocyo kala duduwan Ingiriis.', 'sv': 'Många organisationer söker eller behöver producera dokument som är skrivna tydligt. I USA kräver "Plain Writing Act of 2010" att många federala myndigheters handlingar för allmänheten skrivs på klarspråk. Särskilt rekommenderar regeringens Plain Language Action and Information Network ("PLAIN") att författare använder korta meningar och vardagliga ord, liksom Securities and Exchange Commission\'s "Plain English Rule". Sedan 1970-talet har amerikanska språkförespråkare flyttat sig bort från läsbarhetsåtgärder och gynnat användbarhetstest och dokumentdesign överväganden. Men i denna uppsats använder vi kvantitativa mått på meningslängd och ordsvårighet som (1) avslöjar stilistisk variation bland PLAINs exempel på klartext, och (2) hjälpa oss att positionera PLAIN:s exemplar i förhållande till dokument skrivna på andra typer av tillgänglig engelska (t.ex. The New York Times, Voice of America Special English och Wikipedia) och ett akademiskt dokument som sannolikt uppfattas som svårt. Obombinativa åtgärder för meningar och ordförråd – som lämnas åtskilda, till skillnad från traditionella läsbarhetsformler – kan komplettera användbarhetstest och dokumentdesign överväganden, och öka kunskapen om olika typer av klarare engelska.', 'ur': 'بہت سی سازمانیاں واضح طور پر لکھی ہوئی سند پیدا کرنے کی یا ضرورت کریں۔ ایالات متحدہ میں „۲۰۰۱ کی صریح لکھنے کا قانون“ کی ضرورت ہے کہ بہت سی فدرال ایجنسیٹوں کے لاسوندے جماعت کے لئے صریح انگلیسی میں لکھے جائیں۔ مخصوصاً حکومت کی سطح زبان اور اطلاعات نیٹورک (PLAIN) کی توصیف کرتی ہے کہ لکھنے والوں کو چھوٹے کلمات اور روزانی کلمات استعمال کریں، جیسے Securities اور Exchange کمیسین کی "سطح انگلیسی قانون" کی۔ 1970 سے پہلے آمریکایی صریح زبان پڑھنے والے پڑھنے کے اندازے سے دور ہوئے ہیں اور مہربانی کا امتحان اور ڈاکومئن ڈیزائن کے اندازے سے دور ہوا ہے۔ لیکن اس کاغذ میں ہم کلمز کی مدت اور کلمز کی تنگی کے اندازے استعمال کرتے ہیں جو PLAIN کی مثالیں کھول رہے ہیں اور (2) ہمیں PLAIN کی مثالیں دوسری دسترسی انگلیسی میں لکھی ہوئی دکھانوں کے مقابلہ میں مدد کریں (جیسے نیویورک تایمز، امریکا آواز مخصوص انگلیسی اور ویکپیڈیا) اور ایک علمی دکھانے کی مثال مشکل سمجھ سکتی ہے۔ کلمات اور کلمات کے لئے مختلف اندازے ہیں، بائیں مختلف، غیر قانونی پڑھنے کے قابل فرمول کی مختلف، استعمال کی آزمائش اور ڈیسمن ڈیسمن کی نظریں اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں، اور مختلف طریقوں کے متعلق مختلف انگلیسی کی علم اضافہ کر', 'uz': 'Many organizations seek or need to produce documents that are written plainly.  AQSHda "Oddiy ёзиш ҳукумат 2010" ҳукумат жамият учун кўп Федерса 机构лари ҳужжатлари оддий ingliz тилида ёзилган. Hullas, ҳукумат tilning oddiy tili amallar va maʼlumot tarmoq ("PLAIN") yozuvchilar qisqa so\'zlar va har kuni so\'zlarni ishlatishga shaxsiy imkoniyat beradi. Xavfsizlik va Komisiyoning "Oddiy ingliz qoidasi" kabi so\'zlarini o\'zgartirish imkoniyatini boshlayd 1970 yillardan oddiy tillar davomiyotlari o\'qishni o\'qishga qaror qilishga yordam beradi va foydalanish imkoniyatini va hujjat dizayning tasavvurini o\'zgartirdi. Lekin bu qogʻozda biz maxfiy soʻzning uzunligi va so\'zning qiyin tilini foydalanamiz (1) PLAINning oddiy yozuvdagi misollarida uslub oʻzgarishni ko\'rsatadi, va bizga boshqa bir xil tilda qo\'llangan hujjatlarga (m.g. New York Times, Amerika maxsus ingliz Ingliz tilidagi Voice, va Wikipedia) va bir akademik hujjatni qiyin deb tushunish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Nhiều tổ chức đang tìm kiếm hay cần thiết để đưa ra những tài liệu được viết đơn giản. Hợp chủng quốc Hoa Kỳ, 82;Plain Writing Act of 20092; yêu cầu nhiều cơ quan liên bang gửi tài liệu cho công chúng được viết bằng tiếng Anh đơn giản. Cụ thể là mạng lưới ngôn ngữ và thông tin của chính phủ (82;PLININ\\ 892;) đề nghị các nhà văn s ử dụng những câu ngắn và những từ thường ngày, cũng như những câu nói của Ủy ban chứng khoán và trao đổi. « 2;nguyên tắc tiếng Anh bình thường.}2; Từ khi bắt đầu nghiên cứu về ngôn ngữ đơn giản của Mỹ đã tránh khỏi sự dễ đọc và ủng hộ kiểm tra khả năng sử dụng và thiết kế tài liệu. Nhưng trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi s ử dụng các biện pháp quy định về độ dài và khó khăn từ mà (1) tiết lộ các biến số kiểu trong những mẫu của PLINS với những chữ viết đơn giản, và (2) giúp chúng tôi xác định những đặc điểm của PLANIN so với những tài liệu được viết bằng tiếng Anh khác nơi công cộng (như tờ New York Times, Tiếng Nói Hoa Kỳ Special English, và Wikipedia) và một tài liệu về khoa học có thể s ẽ bị cảm thấy khó khăn. Những biện pháp chưa xác định cho câu và từ điển.  812; để riêng biệt, không giống trong công thức đọc truyền thống đề cao cao;có thể bổ sung cho kiểm tra khả năng sử dụng và thiết kế tài liệu, và kiến thức tiến bộ về các loại thư giản Anh.', 'bg': 'Много организации търсят или трябва да представят документи, които са написани ясно. В Съединените щати Законът за обикновен текст от 2010 г. изисква документите на много федерални агенции за обществеността да бъдат написани на обикновен английски език. По-специално, правителствената мрежа за действия и информация с обикновен език ("PLAIN") препоръчва писателите да използват кратки изречения и ежедневни думи, както и "обикновеното английски правило" на Комисията за ценни книжа и обмен. От 70-те години насам американските адвокати на обикновения език се отдалечават от мерките за четливост и предпочитат тестването за използваемост и съображенията за дизайн на документи. Но в тази статия използваме количествени измервания на дължината на изречението и трудността на думата, които (1) разкриват стилистични вариации между примерите на ПЛАЙН за обикновен писане, и (2) ни помагат да позиционираме примерите на ПЛАЙН спрямо документи, написани на други видове достъпен английски език (например Ню Йорк Таймс, Гласът на Америка Специален английски и Уикипедия) и един академичен документ, който вероятно ще бъде възприет като труден. Некомбинираните мерки за изречения и речника - оставени отделно, за разлика от традиционните формули за четливост - могат да допълват тестовете за използваемост и съображенията за проектиране на документи и да подобрят познанията за различните видове по-ясен английски език.', 'hr': "Mnoge organizacije traže ili trebaju proizvoditi dokumente koji su jasno napisani. U Sjedinjenim Državama 'Zakon o običnom pisanju 2010' zahtijeva da se mnogi savezne agencije' dokumenti za javnost napišu na jasnom engleskom jeziku. Posebno, vladine mreža za akciju i informacije o jeziku i informacijama ('PLAIN') preporučuje pisace da koriste kratke rečenice i svakodnevne riječi, kao i 'Pravo engleskog pravila Komisije za sigurnosti i razmjenu'. Od 1970-ih, američki prosti jezički advokati su se odselili od mjera čitljivosti i favoritiranih testova korisnosti i razmišljanja o dizajnu dokumenta. Međutim, u ovom papiru koristimo kvantitativne mjere dužine kazne i teškoće riječi koje (1) pokazuju stilističke varijacije između primjera PLAIN-a jasnog pisanja, i (2) nam pomaže da postavimo primjere PLAIN-a u odnosu na dokumente napisane na drugim vrstama dostupnog engleskog jezika (npr. The New York Times, Glas of America Special English, i Wikipedia) i jedan akademski dokument koji će vjerojatno biti smatran teškom. Nekombinirane mjere za rečenice i riječnice lijevo odvojene, u razliku od tradicionalnih formula čitljivosti, mogu doprinijeti testiranje korisnosti i razmišljanje o dizajnu dokumenta i napredovati znanje o različitim vrstama jasnijeg engleskog jezika.", 'nl': "Veel organisaties zoeken of moeten documenten produceren die duidelijk zijn geschreven. In de Verenigde Staten vereist de 'Plain Writing Act of 2010' dat de documenten van veel federale agentschappen voor het publiek in gewoon Engels zijn geschreven. Met name adviseert het Plain Language Action and Information Network ('PLAIN') schrijvers korte zinnen en alledaagse woorden te gebruiken, net als de 'Plain English Rule' van de Securities and Exchange Commission. Sinds de jaren zeventig hebben de Amerikaanse voorstanders van duidelijke taal afstand genomen van leesbaarheidsmaatregelen en de voorkeur gegeven aan bruikbaarheidstests en overwegingen voor documentontwerp. Maar in dit artikel gebruiken we kwantitatieve maten van zinslengte en woordmoeilijkheid die (1) stilistische variatie onthullen tussen PLAIN's voorbeelden van gewoon schrijven, en (2) ons helpen de exemplaren van PLAIN te positioneren ten opzichte van documenten die zijn geschreven in andere soorten toegankelijk Engels (bijvoorbeeld The New York Times, Voice of America Special English en Wikipedia) en één academisch document dat waarschijnlijk als moeilijk wordt ervaren. Ongecombineerde maatstaven voor zinnen en woordenschat – gescheiden gelaten, in tegenstelling tot traditionele leesbaarheidsformules – kunnen bruikbaarheidstests en overwegingen bij documentontwerp aanvullen en de kennis over verschillende soorten duidelijker Engels vergroten.", 'da': 'Mange organisationer søger eller har brug for at fremstille dokumenter, der er skrevet tydeligt. I USA kræver \'Plain Writing Act of 2010\' at mange føderale agenturers dokumenter til offentligheden er skrevet på almindeligt engelsk. Regeringens Plain Language Action and Information Network ("PLAIN") anbefaler især, at forfattere bruger korte sætninger og daglige ord, ligesom Securities and Exchange Commission\'s "Plain English Rule". Siden 1970\'erne har amerikanske talere for almindeligt sprog bevæget sig væk fra læsbarhedsforanstaltninger og foretrukket brugervenlighedstest og dokumentdesign overvejelser. Men i denne artikel bruger vi kvantitative målinger af sætningslængde og ordsværhed, der (1) afslører stilistisk variation blandt PLAIN\'s eksempler på almindelig skrift, og (2) hjælpe os med at placere PLAIN\'s eksempler i forhold til dokumenter skrevet på andre former for tilgængelig engelsk (f.eks. The New York Times, Voice of America Special English og Wikipedia) og et akademisk dokument, der sandsynligvis vil blive opfattet som vanskeligt. Ikke kombinerede målinger for sætninger og ordforråd - efterladt adskilt, i modsætning til traditionelle læsbarhedsformler - kan supplere brugervenlighedstest og dokumentdesign overvejelser og forbedre kendskabet til forskellige typer almindeligt engelsk.', 'de': 'Viele Organisationen suchen oder müssen Dokumente erstellen, die klar geschrieben sind. In den Vereinigten Staaten verlangt der "Plain Writing Act of 2010", dass die Dokumente vieler Bundesbehörden für die Öffentlichkeit in klarem Englisch verfasst werden. Insbesondere empfiehlt das Plain Language Action and Information Network ("PLAIN") der Regierung, kurze Sätze und alltägliche Wörter zu verwenden, ebenso wie die "Plain English Rule" der Securities and Exchange Commission. Seit den 1970er Jahren haben sich amerikanische Verfechter von Lesbarkeitsmaßnahmen entfernt und Usability-Tests und Dokumentendesign-Überlegungen bevorzugt. Aber in diesem Beitrag verwenden wir quantitative Maße von Satzlänge und Wortschwierigkeit, die (1) stilistische Variationen zwischen PLAIN\'s Beispielen der einfachen Schrift aufzeigen, und (2) uns dabei helfen, PLAIN\'s Beispiele in Bezug auf Dokumente zu positionieren, die in anderen Arten von barrierefreiem Englisch geschrieben wurden (z.B. The New York Times, Voice of America Special English und Wikipedia) und ein akademisches Dokument, das wahrscheinlich als schwierig empfunden wird. Ungekürzte Maße für Sätze und Vokabeln – im Gegensatz zu herkömmlichen Lesbarkeitsformeln getrennt voneinander gelassen – können Usability Tests und Überlegungen zum Dokumentendesign ergänzen und das Wissen über verschiedene Arten von einfacherem Englisch erweitern.', 'ko': "많은 조직들이 명확한 문서를 찾거나 작성해야 한다.미국에서, 은 많은 연방 기구가 대중을 대상으로 하는 문서를 일반 영어로 쓰도록 요구한다.특히 정부의 간단명료한 언어행동과 정보망(Plain)은 증권거래위원회의'간단명료한 영어규칙'처럼 저자에게 단문과 일상용어를 사용하라고 권고했다.1970년대 이후 미국의 간단명료한 언어 창도자들은 읽을 수 있는 도량을 사용하지 않고 사용 테스트와 문서 디자인에 더 치중했다.그러나 본고에서 우리는 문장의 길이와 단어의 난이도를 측정하는 방법을 사용했다. (1) 평원의 평원 창작 범례의 문체 차이를 제시했다.(2) PLAIN의 범례와 다른 유형의 방문 가능한 영어(예를 들어,, 위키백과) 및 어려운 학술 문서를 포지셔닝하는 데 도움을 줍니다.전통적인 가독성 공식과 달리 문장과 어휘를 분리한 비조합 도량은 가용성 테스트와 문서 디자인에 대한 고려를 보충하고 유형별 간단명료한 영어에 대한 이해를 높일 수 있다.", 'id': "Banyak organisasi mencari atau perlu menghasilkan dokumen yang ditulis dengan jelas. Di Amerika Serikat, Akte Penulisan Biasa 2010 memerlukan banyak dokumen agensi federal untuk masyarakat ditulis dalam bahasa Inggris biasa. Terutama, Jaringan Aksi dan Informasi Bahasa Biasa pemerintah ('PLAIN') merekomendasikan penulis menggunakan kalimat pendek dan kata-kata sehari-hari, seperti 'Peraturan Inggris Biasa' dari Komisi Securities and Exchange. Sejak tahun 1970-an, pendukung bahasa biasa Amerika telah bergerak jauh dari tindakan pembacaan dan mendukung tes penggunaan dan pertimbangan desain dokumen. Tapi di kertas ini kami menggunakan ukuran kuantitatif panjang kalimat dan kesulitan kata yang (1) mengungkapkan variasi stilistik antara contoh PLAIN menulis sederhana, Dan (2) membantu kami menempatkan contoh PLAIN berkaitan dengan dokumen yang ditulis dalam bahasa Inggris yang akses lainnya (contohnya, The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, dan Wikipedia) dan satu dokumen akademik yang mungkin dianggap sulit. Ukuran tidak kombinasi untuk kalimat dan kalimat-kalimat terpisah, tidak seperti dalam formula-formula-readability tradisional-dapat menambah pengujian usability dan pertimbangan desain dokumen, dan pengetahuan maju tentang jenis berbeda bahasa Inggris yang lebih jelas.", 'fa': 'بسیاری از سازمان\u200cها می\u200cخواهند یا نیاز دارند مدارک\u200cهای روشن نوشته می\u200cشوند. در ایالات متحده، قانون نوشتن ساده سال ۲۰۰۱ نیاز دارد که مدارک بسیاری از سازمان فدرال برای عمومی به انگلیسی ساده نوشته شود. مخصوصاً شبکه اطلاعات و حرکت زبان معمولی دولت (PLAIN) توصیف می\u200cکند که نویسندگان از جمله\u200cهای کوتاه و کلمات روزمینی استفاده کنند، همچنین قانون معمولی انگلیسی کمیسیون امنیت و تبدیل کردن را استفاده کنند. از دهه ۱۹۷۰، پشتیبانی زبان معمولی آمریکایی از اندازه\u200cهای خواندنی و آزمایش قابلیت استفاده و توجه\u200cهای طراحی سند را ترجیح داده\u200cاند. اما در این کاغذ ما از اندازه\u200cهای مقداری طول جمله و سختی کلمه استفاده می\u200cکنیم که (۱) تغییرات استیلیستیک بین نمونه\u200cهای نوشتن روشن PLAIN را نشان می\u200cدهد، و (۲) به ما کمک می\u200cکند مثالهای PLAIN مربوط به مدارک نوشته شده در نوشته\u200cهای دیگر از انگلیسی دسترسی (مثلاً نیویورک تایمز، صدای انگلیسی ویژه آمریکا و ویکیپدیا) و یک مدارک دانش آموزی که احتمالاً به عنوان سخت مشاهده می\u200cشود. اندازه\u200cهای بی\u200cترکیب برای جمله\u200cها و واژه\u200cهای چپ جدا شده، غیر از فرمول\u200cهای قابل خواندن سنتی، می\u200cتوانند آزمایش قابل استفاده و توجه\u200cهای طراحی سند را اضافه کنند، و دانش\u200cهای مختلف نوع انگلیسی آشکار کنند.', 'sw': "Mashirika mengi yanatafuta au yanahitaji kutengeneza nyaraka zilizoandikwa wazi. Nchini Marekani, Sheria ya 'Maandiko Makuu ya 2010' inahitaji kuwa nyaraka nyingi za Shirika la Mataifa kwa umma zimeandikwa kwa Kiingereza cha wazi. Kwa hakika, Kampeni ya Lugha Makuu na Mtandao wa Habari wa Serikali ('PLAIN') inapendekeza kuandika watumie hukumu fupi na maneno ya kila siku, kama ilivyo kwa Tume ya Usalama na Mabadili ya Kiingereza. Tangu miaka ya 1970, watetezi wa lugha za Kimarekani wa kawaida wameondoka na hatua za kusoma na kupenda matumizi ya vifaa vinavyojaribu na taswira za ubunifu. Lakini katika gazeti hili tunatumia hatua za kiasi cha ukubwa wa hukumu na ngumu za maneno ambayo (1) inaonyesha mabadiliko ya msingi miongoni mwa mifano ya kuandika wazi ya PLAIN, na (2) kutusaidia kuweka nafasi ya mifano ya PLAIN inayohusiana na nyaraka zilizoandikwa kwa lugha nyingine za Kiingereza (kwa mfano, The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, and Wikipedia) na nyaraka moja ya kitaaluma inaonekana kuwa ngumu. Hatua zisizohojiana kwa ajili ya hukumu na maneno yaliyoachwa kushoto tofauti, tofauti na miundo mbinu ya kusoma ya kitamaduni yanaweza kuumiza mtihani wa matumizi na mipango ya ubunifu wa nyaraka, na kuongeza maarifa kuhusu aina mbalimbali za Kiingereza.", 'tr': "Birnäçe kurumlar açyk ýazylýan senedi bejerip ýazmak gerek. ABŞ'de '2010-nji ýylyň ýerli ýazma kanuny' halk üçin bir köp federal ajaýyp sanatlary düz Iňlisçe ýazylýar. Hökümetin ýerli diller we Maglumatlar Network ('PLAIN') ýazjaşlaryň gysga s özleri we gündeli sözleri ulanmagy maslahat berýär. 1970-nji ýyllardan bäri Amerikanyň köp dil muhatçylaryň okaylyşlyk döwletlerinden çykyp, ullanlyk barlamasyndan we sened düzenlemelerinden has gowy göçdi. Emma bu kagyzda biz s özleriň uzunlygyny we sözleriň kynlaşyklygyny ulanýarys(1) PLAINyň düz ýazmanyň eserlerinde stilistik üýtgeşiklerini görkez, (2) PLAINyň eserlerini başga bir nusgada ýazylýan iňlisçe (meselâ, The New York Times, The Voice of America speciāl English, we Wikipedia) we bir akademiki senediň kyndyr bolup g örünebilir. Sözler we sözleriň sözleri üçin aýratyn düzümleri, däpli okanlyk faýllaryň üstünde ullanyşlyk barlamasyny we sened düzümlerini gowylaşdyryp biler we düzümleri düzümleri bilen öňündür.", 'af': "Baie organisasies soek of nodig om dokumente te produseer wat eenvoudig geskryf is. In die Vereenigde State, die 'Eenvoudige Skriuwwet van 2010' benodig dat baie federale agencies' dokumente vir die publiek in eenvoudige Engels geskryf word. Die regering se Eenvoudige Taal Aksie en Informasie Netwerk ('PLAIN') aanbeveel dat skrywers kort setinge en elke dag woorde gebruik, soos doen die Sekuriteite en Exchange komisie se 'Eenvoudige Engelsreël'. Van die 1970de af het Amerikaanse eenvoudige taal advokaten weggewyk van leesbaardige maatjies en favorite gebruikbaardige toets en dokument ontwerp aandagings. Maar in hierdie papier gebruik ons kvantitatiewe maatjies van sin lengte en woord moeilikheid wat (1) stylistiese veranderinge onder PLAIN se voorbeelde van eenvoudige skryfing openbaar, en (2) hulp ons posisie PLAIN s e voorbeelde relatief tot dokumente geskryf in ander soorte toeganklike Engels (bv. die New York Times, stem van Amerika Spesiaal Engels en Wikipedia) en een akademiese dokument waarskynlik as moeilik aangeneem word. Ongekombineerde maatjies vir setnings en woordeboek-linkerkant aparte, ongelukkig in tradisionele leesbaardige formele-kan gebruikbaardige toets en dokument ontwerp aandagings komplementeer en kennis oor verskillende tipes plaaslike Engels.", 'am': "ብዙ ድርጅቶች ገልጹ የተጻፉትን ሰነዶች ይፈልጋሉ ወይም ያስፈልጋሉ፡፡ In the United States, the 'Plain Writing Act of 2010' requires that many federal agencies' documents for the public are written in plain English.  በተለይም፣ የመንግሥት የደረጃ ቋንቋ ተግባር እና የመረጃ መረብ መረብ መረብ ('PLAIN') ጽሑፎች የደህንነት እና የመለወጥ የኮሚሽን 'የዘላለም እንግሊዘኛ ሥርዓት' የሚል ቃላት እና የዕለት ዕለት ቃላትን እንዲጠይቁ ይጠይቃሉ፡፡ ከ1970ዎቹ ጀምሮ የአሜሪካ ነፃ ቋንቋ ተሟጋቾች ከመቃውሚያ ተቃውሞ እና የተወደደ የሥልጣን ፈተና እና የሰነድ ጥያቄ ጥያቄ ተሳትተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን በዚህ ገጽ የፍርድ ርዝመት እና ቃላት ጭንቀት እና በፕላይን የጥሩ ጽሑፍ ምሳሌዎች መካከል የስልታዊ ለውጥ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እና (2) በተጨማሪው ቋንቋ እንግሊዘኛ ላይ የተጻፈውን ፕላIN የመስመር ምሳሌዎች (ለምሳሌ የኒዮርክ ታሪክ፣ የድምፅ የአሜሪካ የግልፅ እንግሊዘኛ እና Wikipedia) እና አንዲት አካዳሚክ ሰነድ እንደ አስቸጋሪ ሆኖ ይታወቃል፡፡ በተለየ ባሕላዊ አካባቢ ፎላሎቹ የሥርዓት እና የቋንቋ እና የግራ ቃላት የተለየ መጠቀሚያ መጠቀሚያ እና የሰነድ ጥናት ጥያቄ ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡", 'sq': "Many organizations seek or need to produce documents that are written plainly.  In the United States, the 'Plain Writing Act of 2010' requires that many federal agencies' documents for the public are written in plain English.  In particular, the government's Plain Language Action and Information Network ('PLAIN') recommends that writers use short sentences and everyday words, as does the Securities and Exchange Commission's 'Plain English Rule.'  Që nga vitet 1970, mbrojtësit e gjuhës së thjeshtë amerikane kanë lëvizur larg masave të lexueshmërisë dhe kanë favorizuar testimet e përdorueshmërisë dhe konsideratat e dizajnit të dokumenteve. Por në këtë letër ne përdorim masa kuantitative të gjatësisë s ë fjalës dhe vështirësisë së fjalës që (1) zbulojnë ndryshimin stilistik midis shembujve të PLAIN-it të shkrimit të thjeshtë,  and (2) help us position PLAIN's exemplars relative to documents written in other kinds of accessible English (e.g., The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, and Wikipedia) and one academic document likely to be perceived as difficult.  Uncombined measures for sentences and vocabulary-left separate, unlike in traditional readability formulas-can complement usability testing and document design considerations, and advance knowledge about different types of plainer English.", 'hy': 'Շատ կազմակերպություններ փնտրում են կամ անհրաժեշտ են պարզ գրված փաստաթղթեր ստեղծել: Միացյալ Նահանգներում 2010 թվականի պարզ գրողական ակտիվը պահանջում է, որ շատ ֆերդաալ գործակալությունների փաստաթղթերը հասարակության համար գրված են պարզ անգլերենով: Մասնավորապես կառավարության պարզ լեզվաբանական գործողությունների և տեղեկատվական ցանցը (PLAIN) խորհուրդ է տալիս գրողներին օգտագործել կարճ նախադասություններ և առօրյա բառեր, ինչպես նաև Արժեքավորությունների և Արժանային Համասարակության պարզ անգլերեն կանոնները: 1970-ականներից սկսած, ամերիկյան պարզ լեզվի պաշտպանները հեռացել են կարդալիության մեթոդներից և օգտագործելիության փորձարկումներից և փաստաթղթերի դիզայնի հաշվի առնելուց: Բայց այս թղթի մեջ մենք օգտագործում ենք նախադասության երկարության և բառի դժվարության քանակական չափումներ, որոնք (1) բացահայտում են PLAIN-ի պարզ գրելու օրինակների ոճի տարբերությունը, և (2) օգնել մեզ դիտարկել PLAIN-ի օրինակները համեմատած այլ տեսակի հասանելի անգլերենով գրված փաստաթղթերին (օրինակ, Նյու Յորք Թայմսը, Ամերիկայի հատուկ անգլերենով ձայնը և Վիքիփեդիան) և մի գիտական փաստաթղթերին, որը հավանաբար դժվար է ընկա Առասությունների և բառարանի ձախ առանձին առանձին առանձին անհամադրված չափումները, ի տարբերություն ավանդական կարդալիության բանաձևերին, կարող են համալրացնել օգտագործելիության փորձարկումները և փաստաթղթերի դիզայնի հաշվի առնելը, և զարգացնել', 'bn': "অনেক সংগঠন পরিষ্কারভাবে লেখা নথি তৈরি করতে চায় অথবা প্রয়োজন। মার্কিন যুক্তরাষ্ট্রে ২০১০ সালের 'প্লেইন লিখন আইন' প্রয়োজন যে জনগণের জন্য অনেক ফেডারেল সংস্থার নথি সাধারণ ইংরেজি ভাষায় বিশেষ করে, সরকারের প্লাইন ভাষা কার্যক্রম এবং তথ্য নেটওয়ার্ক ('প্লাইন') পরামর্শ দেয় যে লেখকদের সংক্ষিপ্ত শাস্তি ও প্রতিদিন শব্দ ব্যবহার করে, যেমন নিরাপত্ Since the 1970s, American plain language advocates have moved away from readability measures and favored usability testing and document design considerations.  কিন্তু এই পত্রিকায় আমরা ব্যবহার করি শাস্তির দীর্ঘদিন এবং শব্দের কঠিন পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করি (১) প্লাইনের সাধারণ লেখার উদাহরণের মধ্যে স্ট এবং (২) আমাদের প্লাইনের অবস্থান সাহায্য করুন অন্য ধরনের প্রবেশিত নথিগুলোতে লেখা হয়েছে (যেমন নিউ ইয়র্ক টাইমস, কণ্ঠস্বর অফ আমেরিকার বিশেষ ইংরেজি এবং উইকিপিডিয়া বাক্য এবং শব্দভাণ্ডার বামে বিচ্ছিন্ন প্রতিষ্ঠানের জন্য অসম্পূর্ণ পদক্ষেপ, ঐতিহ্যবাহী পাঠকের ফর্মুলা প্রতিষ্ঠানের পরীক্ষা এবং নথি ড", 'az': "Birçox kurumlar açıq-aydın yazılmış belələri təhsil etmək istəyirlər. Birləşik Devletlərdə '2010-ci Təsr Yazım Yazılımı' ehtiyacı var ki, insanların çoxlu federal aģentələri açıq İngilizce dilində yazılması lazımdır. Özellikle, hökumətin Plain Language Action and Information Network ('PLAIN') yazıcıların qısa s özləri və günlük sözləri istifadə etməsini təsdiqləyir. 1970-ci illərdən sonra Amerikan açıq dil adətçiləri oxuya biləcək ölçülərdən uzaqlaşdılar və istifadə edə biləcək sınaqlardan və dökümət dizaynı düşüncələrdən uzaqlaşdılar. Lakin bu kağızda, s özlərin uzunluğunu və sözlərin çətinlikləri istifadə edirik ki, PLAIN'nin düzgün yazmaq məsələlərinin istifadə edir. və ( 2 ) PLAIN məs ələlərini digər məsəllərdə yazılmış məsəllərə qovuşdurmağa kömək edir ( New York Times , Amerika Özel İngilizə və Vikipediya səsləri ) və bir akademik məsəllərə bənzəyir ki, çətin g örünəcəkdir. Cümlələr və sözlər sol tərəfindən ayrı-ayrı müxtəlif tərzlər üçün birləşdirilmiş ölçülər, əvvəlki oxuyabiləcək formüllərə bənzər, istifadə edəbiləcək sınaqları və döküm dizaynı düşüncələrini, və müxtəlif tərzlər tərəfindən müxtəlif İngilizə haqqında bilgi", 'cs': 'Mnoho organizací hledá nebo potřebuje vytvořit dokumenty, které jsou napsány jasně. Ve Spojených státech "Plain Writing Act of 2010" vyžaduje, aby dokumenty mnoha federálních agentur pro veřejnost byly napsány v prosté angličtině. Zejména vládní akční a informační síť (dále jen "PLAIN") doporučuje spisovatelům používat krátké věty a každodenní slova, stejně jako pravidlo Komise pro cenné papíry a burzy (dále jen "prosté anglické pravidlo"). Od sedmdesátých let se američtí zastánci prostého jazyka odklonili od opatření čitelnosti a upřednostňovali testování použitelnosti a návrh dokumentů. V tomto článku však používáme kvantitativní měřítka délky věty a slovní obtížnosti, které (1) odhalují stylistické variace mezi PLAINovými příklady prostého psaní, a (2) nám pomůže umístit příklady PLAIN ve vztahu k dokumentům napsaným v jiných druzích přístupné angličtiny (např. New York Times, Voice of America Special English, Wikipedie) a jednom akademickému dokumentu, který bude pravděpodobně vnímán jako obtížný. Nekombinovaná měřítka pro věty a slovní zásobu – na rozdíl od tradičních vzorců čitelnosti – mohou doplnit testování použitelnosti a návrh dokumentů a zvýšit znalosti o různých typech prostější angličtiny.', 'et': "Paljud organisatsioonid otsivad või peavad esitama dokumente, mis on kirjutatud selgelt. Ameerika Ühendriikides nõuab 2010. aasta lihtsa kirjutamise seadus, et paljude föderaalsete asutuste dokumendid avalikkusele on kirjutatud lihtsalt inglise keeles. Eelkõige soovitab valitsuse tavakeelne tegevus- ja teabevõrgustik (PLAIN) kirjanikel kasutada lühikesi lauseid ja igapäevaseid sõnu, nagu ka väärtpaberi- ja börsikomisjoni tavaline inglise reegel. Alates 1970. aastatest on Ameerika tavakeele advokaadid loobunud loetavuse mõõtmetest ja soodustanud kasutatavuse testimist ja dokumentide kujundamist. Kuid selles töös kasutame lause pikkuse ja sõna raskuse kvantitatiivseid mõõtmeid, mis (1) paljastavad stiililise variatsiooni PLAIN näidised lihtsa kirjutamise, ja (2) aitavad meil positsioneerida PLAIN'i näidiseid võrreldes dokumentidega, mis on kirjutatud teist liiki kättesaadavas inglise keeles (nt New York Times, Voice of America Special English ja Wikipedia) ja ühe akadeemilise dokumendi suhtes, mida tõenäoliselt peetakse raskeks. Erinevalt traditsioonilistest loetavuse valemitest eraldi jäetud lausete ja sõnavara kombineerimata mõõtmed võivad täiendada kasutatavuse testimist ja dokumendikujunduse kaalutlusi ning edendada teadmisi eri tüüpi lihtsama inglise keele kohta.", 'ca': "Many organizations seek or need to produce documents that are written plainly.  In the United States, the 'Plain Writing Act of 2010' requires that many federal agencies' documents for the public are written in plain English.  En particular, la xarxa d'acció i informació de llenguatge senzill ('PLAIN') del govern recomanda que els escriptors utilitzen frases curtes i paraules cotidianes, així com la 'Regla senzilla d'anglès' de la Comisió de valors i intercanvis. Since the 1970s, American plain language advocates have moved away from readability measures and favored usability testing and document design considerations.  But in this paper we use quantitative measures of sentence length and word difficulty that (1) reveal stylistic variation among PLAIN's exemplars of plain writing, i (2) ens ajuden a posicionar exemplars del PLAIN en relació amb document s escrits en altres tipus d'anglès accesible (per exemple, The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, i Wikipedia) i un document acadèmic que probablement es consideri difícil. Les mesures no combinades per les frases i per l'esquerra del vocabulari separades, a diferència de les fórmules tradicionals de llegibilitat, poden complementar els tests d'utilitat i consideracions de disseny de documents, i avançar el coneixement sobre diferents tipus d'anglès més clar.", 'fi': 'Monet organisaatiot pyrkivät tai tarvitsevat asiakirjoja, jotka on kirjoitettu selkeästi. Yhdysvalloissa "Plain Writing Act of 2010" edellyttää, että monien liittovaltion virastojen asiakirjat yleisölle kirjoitetaan yksinkertaisella englannilla. Erityisesti hallituksen Plain Language Action and Information Network (PLAIN) suosittelee kirjoittajien käyttävän lyhyitä lauseita ja jokapäiväisiä sanoja, kuten myös Securities and Exchange Commissionin "Plain English Rule". 1970-luvulta lähtien amerikkalaiset yksinkertaisen kielen kannattajat ovat siirtyneet pois luettavuuden mittareista ja suosineet käytettävyystestausta ja dokumenttien suunnittelua. Tässä artikkelissa käytetään kuitenkin lauseen pituuden ja sanan vaikeuden määrällisiä mittareita, jotka (1) paljastavat tyylivaihtelun PLAIN:n yksinkertaisen kirjoittamisen esimerkeissä, ja (2) auttavat meitä asettamaan PLAINin esimerkit suhteessa asiakirjoihin, jotka on kirjoitettu muunlaisella helposti saatavilla olevalla englannilla (esim. The New York Times, Voice of America Special English ja Wikipedia) ja yhteen akateemiseen asiakirjaan, jota todennäköisesti pidetään vaikeana. Lausekkeiden ja sanaston yhdistelemättömät mittasuhteet – toisin kuin perinteiset luettavuuskaavat – voivat täydentää käytettävyystestausta ja dokumenttien suunnittelua koskevia näkökohtia sekä lisätä tietämystä erityyppisestä yksinkertaisemmasta englanninkielestä.', 'bs': "Mnoge organizacije traže ili trebaju proizvoditi dokumente koji su jasno napisani. U Sjedinjenim Državama 'Zakon o običnom pisanju 2010' zahtijeva da se mnogi federalne agencije' dokumenti za javnost napišu na jasnom engleskom jeziku. Posebno, vladini akcijski i informacioni mreža ('PLAIN') preporučuje da pisci koriste kratke rečenice i svakodnevne riječi, kao i 'Pravilo engleskog pravila Komisije za sigurnosti i razmjenu'. Od 1970-ih, američki prosti jezički advokati su se odselili od mjera čitljivosti i favoritiranih testiranja korisnosti i razmatranja projekta dokumenta. Međutim, u ovom papiru koristimo kvantitativne mjere dužine kazne i teškoće riječi koje (1) pokazuju stilističke varijacije između primjera PLAIN-a jasnog pisanja, i (2) nam pomaže da postavimo primjere PLAIN-a u odnosu na dokumente napisane na drugim vrstama dostupnog engleskog jezika (npr. The New York Times, Glas of America Special English, i Wikipedia) i jedan akademski dokument koji će vjerojatno biti smatran teškom. Nekombinirane mjere za rečenice i lijevo rečenice odvojene, za razliku od tradicionalnih formula čitljivosti, mogu dodati testiranje korisnosti i razmišljanje o dizajnu dokumenta i napredovati znanje o različitim vrstama jasnijeg engleskog jezika.", 'ha': "Da wasu shiri masu yawa sunã nẽman ko kuma suna buƙata takardar da aka rubuta bayan. A cikin Marekar, Shararanin 'Narnin rubũtãwa na 2010' yana yarda da wasu littafan shirin FAMI masu rubutu zuwa ga umma da harshen Ingiriya bayyananne. Yana shauri, game da haske, Shirin Ayuka na Lugha na Gammani na Gammani ('PLEIN') na shawarar da ma'anar rubutu su yi amfani da magana masu nau'in da kuma a yinin kwance, kamar da Rukunan na Tsariya da Cikakta na Sakamata na Shirin Ingiriya. Tana shekara 1970s, masu tsari ga harshen mai bayyani na amerikansa sun tafi daga karãtun karatun da kuma aka yarda da masu amfani da yin jarrabi da takardar design. But in this paper we use quantitative measures of sentence length and word difficulty that (1) reveal stylistic variation among PLAIN's exemplars of plain writing, @ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis", 'sk': 'Mnoge organizacije iščejo ali morajo pripraviti dokumente, ki so napisani jasno. V Združenih državah Amerike "Plain Writing Act of 2010" zahteva, da so dokumenti številnih zveznih agencij za javnost napisani v preprostem angleškem jeziku. Vladna mreža za ukrepanje in informacije v preprostem jeziku (PLAIN) zlasti priporoča, da pisatelji uporabljajo kratke stavke in vsakodnevne besede, prav tako kot "navadno angleško pravilo" Komisije za vrednostne papirje in borzo. Od sedemdesetih let prejšnjega stoletja so se ameriški zagovorniki preprostega jezika oddaljili od meril berljivosti in dajali prednost testiranju uporabnosti in načrtovanju dokumentov. V tem prispevku pa uporabljamo kvantitativne meritve dolžine stavka in težavnosti besed, ki (1) razkrivajo slogovno variacijo med PLAIN-ovimi primeri preprostega pisanja, in (2) nam pomagajo postaviti vzorce PLAIN glede na dokumente, napisane v drugih vrstah dostopne angleščine (npr. The New York Times, Voice of America Special English in Wikipedia) in enega akademskega dokumenta, ki bo verjetno zaznan kot težak. Nekombinirani ukrepi za stavke in besedišče – levo ločeno, za razliko od tradicionalnih formul berljivosti – lahko dopolnjujejo preskušanje uporabnosti in vidike oblikovanja dokumentov ter napredujejo znanje o različnih vrstah preprostejšega angleščine.', 'jv': 'Kelangan akeh sampeyan panggunaké awak dhéwé nggawe dokumen sing bisa isuk. Nang ono Stat Uniter, Aku \'Plain Writing Aku\' nggawe akeh dokumen bakal ning awak dhéwé bakal ning awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe Inggris apa. Juara-Juara, nggambar Bukak Plain Language Action lan InformaNetwork (\'PLAIN\') nggambar Kemerdekaan kanggo oleh banter kuwi kesempatan kanggo nggambar kelas barang kanggo awak dhéwé, kaya segondi kemerdekaan sing \'Regular Plain englis\' sing gagal dhéwé. Sumangkat nang pitik \'75, sampeyan nganggo hukum gawe layang-layang lan ijol-ijol sing paling apik tur angel nggawe hasil maneh lan ingkang disimpen dokumen. Nang pepul iki, kita gambar kuwi nggambar kapan kanggo urip dadi kapan kanggo ngucapan gambar nggambar 1 " lan (2) bantuan kéné s in g dibempaké PLAIN karo babagan dokumen sing oleh karo ngangge cara-tolerané Inggris liyane (sing dibampungan Njuyuk Time, Voice s of Generalé Anyar Inggris sing bebas, lan wipediya) lan dokumen akadémik sing meh sawetara sak susahé. Mbok', 'he': 'ארגונים רבים מחפשים או צריכים לייצר מסמכים שנכתבים בבירור. בארצות הברית, חוק כתיבה פשוט של 2010 דורש מסמכים רבים של סוכנויות פדרליות לציבור נכתבים באנגלית פשוטה. במיוחד, רשת הפעולה והמידע בשפה הפשוטה של הממשלה (PLAIN) ממליצה שכותבים ישתמשו במשפטים קצרים ומילים יומיים, כמו גם חוק אנגלי הפשוט של הוועדת הביטוח והמחליף. מאז שנות ה-70, תובעי שפה פשוטה אמריקאים התרחקו ממצעי קריאות והעדיפו בדיקות שימושיות ותחשבות עיצוב מסמכים. אבל בעיתון הזה אנו משתמשים במדידות כמוניות של אורך המשפט וקשה מילה (1) שמגלים שונות סטיליסטית בין דוגמאות של PLAIN של כתיבה פשוטה, (2) עוזרים לנו לעצב דוגמאות של PLAIN בנוגע למסמכים שנכתבים בסוגים אחרים של אנגלית גישה (למשל, The New York Times, Voice of America Special English, ויקיפדיה) ומסמכים אקדמיים אחד סביר להיראות קשים. Uncombined measures for sentences and vocabulary-left separate, unlike in traditional readability formulas-can complement usability testing and document design considerations, and advance knowledge about different types of plainer English.', 'bo': "ཚོགས་སྡེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་བྲིས་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་དགོས་དང་དགོས་དགོས་པ ཨ་རིའི་ནང་དུ་ 'བསམ་བྲིས་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ཆས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དགོས་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ཁྱད་པར་ནི་གཞུང་གི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དྲ་བ་ (PLAIN)་གིས་རྩོམ་པ་པོའི་ནང་དུ་འབྲི་མིག་པ་ཚོགས་ཆུང་ཉུང་བའི་ཚིག་རྐང་ཐུང་དང་བརྗ དེ་བསྒང་སའི་1970་ཡིན་ལས། ཨ་རིའི་གཞུང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་ཀློག འོན་ཀྱང་། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་གི་རིང་ཚད་དང་ཐ་ན་དཀའ་ངལ་པོ་ཡིན་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་གསལ་པོ་PLAIN་གི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་དེ་  དང་ (2) འདིས་ང་ཚོར་PLAIN་གི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་ཆེན་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་བྲིས་པའི་དཔེར་ན། Uncombined measures for sentences and vocabulary-left separate, unlike in traditional readability formulas-can complement usability testing and document design considerations, and advance knowledge about different types of plainer English."}
{'en': 'Word Discriminations for Vocabulary Inventory Prediction', 'ar': 'تمييز الكلمات للتنبؤ بجرد المفردات', 'es': 'Discriminación de palabras para la predicción del inventario de vocabulario', 'pt': 'Discriminações de palavras para previsão de inventário de vocabulário', 'fr': "Discriminations de mots pour la prédiction de l'inventaire", 'ja': '語彙インベントリ予測の単語区別', 'zh': '词汇量库占单词判', 'hi': 'शब्दावली इन्वेंट्री भविष्यवाणी के लिए शब्द भेदभाव', 'ru': 'Дискриминация слов для предсказания перечня лексики', 'ga': 'Idirdhealuithe Focal do Thuar Fardail Focal', 'ka': 'სიტყვების დისკრიმინაცია სიტყვებულია ინტერნეტიური განსაზღვრებისთვის', 'hu': 'Szóhátrányos megkülönböztetések a szókincsleltár előrejelzéséhez', 'el': 'Διακρίσεις λέξεων για την πρόβλεψη καταλόγου λεξιλογίου', 'it': "Discriminazioni di parole per la previsione dell'inventario del vocabolario", 'lt': 'žodžių aprašo prognozės žodžių diskriminacija', 'kk': 'Сөздік инвентариялық сөздердің дискриминациясы', 'mk': 'Дискриминации на зборови за предвидување на речникот на зборови', 'ms': 'Discrimination Word for Vocabulary Inventory Prediction', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Diskriminazzjonijiet tal-kliem għat-Tbassir tal-Inventarju Vokabulari', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үгийн санхүүгийн талаар ярианы ялгаа', 'no': 'Orddiskriminasjonar for ordinnstillingar', 'pl': 'Dyskryminacje słów dla prognozowania inwentaryzacji słowników', 'ro': 'Discriminări de cuvinte pentru predicția inventarului vocabularului', 'sr': 'Дискриминација речи за предвид речних инвентарија', 'si': 'වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නය', 'so': 'Takoorista hadalka', 'sv': 'Orddiskriminering för förutsägelse av ordlista', 'ta': 'சொல்வள சொற்கோவை உள்ளிடும் விருப்பங்களுக்கான வார்த்தை பிரிவுகள்', 'ur': 'کلمات کی مخالفت بات کے لئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Từ phân biệt từ chuẩn ghi chú', 'nl': 'Woorddiscriminaties voor voorspelling van woordenlijst', 'da': 'Orddiskriminationer for forudsigelse af ordforråd', 'hr': 'Riječna diskriminacija za predviđanje riječnih proizvoda', 'bg': 'Думични дискриминации за прогнозиране на инвентара на речника', 'id': 'Diskriminasi kata untuk Prediksi Inventar Kata', 'ko': '어휘량 예측 중의 단어 식별', 'de': 'Wortdiskriminierungen für die Vorhersage des Vokabelbestands', 'fa': 'اختلاف کلمات برای پیشنهاد سرمایه گذاری کلمات', 'sw': 'Ubaguzi wa neno kwa ajili ya Udhibiti wa Kireno', 'af': 'Woorddiskriminasies vir Voorwoordeboekvoordeel', 'tr': 'Sözler Mazmunlar Wagdaýy üçin Gerçekleşmeler', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'S칬zl칲k Inventory Prediction 칲칞칲n S칬zl칲k D톛st톛liyi', 'bn': 'শব্দভাণ্ডারের অভিভাবকের জন্য বৈষম্য', 'sq': 'Diskriminimet e fjalëve për parashikimin e inventarisë fjalore', 'bs': 'Riječna diskriminacija za predviđanje proizvodnje riječi', 'ca': "Discriminacions de paraules per a la predicció de l'inventari vocabulari", 'hy': 'Բառերի խտրականությունները բառերի արձանագրության կանխատեսման համար', 'et': 'Sõnavara inventuuri prognoosimise sõnade diskrimineerimine', 'cs': 'Diskriminace slov pro predikci inventáře slovní zásoby', 'fi': 'Sanan syrjintä sanaston inventaarion ennusteessa', 'sk': 'Besedne diskriminacije za napoved popisa besedišča', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'translation', 'he': 'דיסקרמינציות במילים', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཐོག་འབྲས་མེད་པའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་གྱི་སྔོན་ལྟའི་ཐ་སྙད་སྤེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'The aim of vocabulary inventory prediction is to predict a learner’s whole vocabulary based on a limited sample of query words. This paper approaches the problem starting from the 2-parameter Item Response Theory (IRT) model, giving each word in the vocabulary a difficulty and discrimination parameter. The discrimination parameter is evaluated on the sub-problem of question item selection, familiar from the fields of Computerised Adaptive Testing (CAT) and active learning. Next, the effect of the discrimination parameter on prediction performance is examined, both in a binary classification setting, and in an information retrieval setting. Performance is compared with baselines based on word frequency. A number of different generalisation scenarios are examined, including generalising word difficulty and discrimination using word embeddings with a predictor network and testing on out-of-dataset data.', 'ar': 'الهدف من توقع جرد المفردات هو التنبؤ بالمفردات الكاملة للمتعلم بناءً على عينة محدودة من كلمات الاستعلام. تتناول هذه الورقة المشكلة بدءًا من نموذج نظرية الاستجابة للعنصر ثنائي المعامل (IRT) ، مع إعطاء كل كلمة في المفردات معامل صعوبة وتمييز. يتم تقييم معلمة التمييز على أساس المشكلة الفرعية لاختيار عنصر السؤال ، وهي مألوفة في مجالات اختبار التكيف المحوسب (CAT) والتعلم النشط. بعد ذلك ، يتم فحص تأثير معلمة التمييز على أداء التنبؤ ، سواء في إعداد التصنيف الثنائي أو في إعداد استرجاع المعلومات. تتم مقارنة الأداء مع خطوط الأساس على أساس تكرار الكلمات. يتم فحص عدد من سيناريوهات التعميم المختلفة ، بما في ذلك تعميم صعوبة الكلمات والتمييز باستخدام تضمين الكلمات مع شبكة تنبؤ واختبار البيانات خارج مجموعة البيانات.', 'es': 'El objetivo de la predicción del inventario de vocabulario es predecir el vocabulario completo de un alumno basándose en una muestra limitada de palabras de consulta. Este artículo aborda el problema a partir del modelo de teoría de respuesta a ítems (IRT) de 2 parámetros, dando a cada palabra del vocabulario un parámetro de dificultad y discriminación. El parámetro de discriminación se evalúa en función del subproblema de la selección de preguntas, familiar en los campos de las pruebas adaptativas computarizadas (TAC) y el aprendizaje activo. A continuación, se examina el efecto del parámetro de discriminación en el rendimiento de la predicción, tanto en una configuración de clasificación binaria como en una configuración de recuperación de información. El rendimiento se compara con las líneas base en función de la frecuencia de las palabras. Se examinan varios escenarios de generalización diferentes, incluida la generalización de la dificultad de las palabras y la discriminación mediante incrustaciones de palabras con una red de predictores y pruebas en datos fuera del conjunto de datos.', 'pt': 'O objetivo da previsão de inventário de vocabulário é prever todo o vocabulário de um aluno com base em uma amostra limitada de palavras de consulta. Este artigo aborda o problema a partir do modelo de 2 parâmetros da Teoria de Resposta ao Item (TRI), dando a cada palavra do vocabulário um parâmetro de dificuldade e discriminação. O parâmetro de discriminação é avaliado no subproblema de seleção do item da questão, familiar das áreas de Teste Adaptativo Computadorizado (TAC) e aprendizagem ativa. Em seguida, o efeito do parâmetro de discriminação no desempenho da previsão é examinado, tanto em uma configuração de classificação binária quanto em uma configuração de recuperação de informações. O desempenho é comparado com as linhas de base com base na frequência das palavras. Vários cenários de generalização diferentes são examinados, incluindo a generalização da dificuldade e discriminação de palavras usando incorporações de palavras com uma rede de previsão e testes em dados fora do conjunto de dados.', 'fr': "L'objectif de la prédiction d'inventaire de vocabulaire est de prédire le vocabulaire complet d'un apprenant sur la base d'un échantillon limité de mots interrogés. Cet article aborde le problème à partir du modèle IRT (Item Response Theory) à 2 paramètres, en donnant à chaque mot du vocabulaire un paramètre de difficulté et de discrimination. Le paramètre de discrimination est évalué sur le sous-problème de la sélection des questions, connu dans les domaines des tests adaptatifs informatisés (TAO) et de l'apprentissage actif. Ensuite, l'effet du paramètre de discrimination sur les performances de prédiction est examiné, à la fois dans un réglage de classification binaire et dans un paramètre de récupération d'informations. Les performances sont comparées aux valeurs de référence en fonction de la fréquence des mots. Un certain nombre de scénarios de généralisation différents sont examinés, y compris la généralisation de la difficulté des mots et de la discrimination à l'aide d'intégrations de mots avec un réseau de prédicteurs et des tests sur des données hors jeu de données.", 'ja': '語彙目録予測の目的は、限定されたクエリ単語のサンプルに基づいて学習者の語彙全体を予測することです。本稿では、2パラメータ項目応答理論（ IRT ）モデルから始まる問題にアプローチし、語彙の各単語に難易度と識別パラメータを付与する。判別パラメータは、コンピュータ化適応テスト（ CAT ）とアクティブラーニングの分野でよく知られている質問項目選択のサブ問題で評価されます。次に、バイナリ分類設定及び情報検索設定の両方において、予測性能に対する判別パラメータの効果を検討する。パフォーマンスは、ワード頻度に基づいてベースラインと比較されます。予測器ネットワークとの単語埋め込みを使用して単語の難易度と識別を一般化し、データセット外のデータをテストするなど、いくつかの異なる一般化シナリオを検討した。', 'zh': '词汇量清单者,以有限之问词样本知学者之全词汇量。 本文自2参数项目应理(IRT)模形始决之,为词汇表中单词给难度判参数。 鉴参数质子,该子自计算机化自试(CAT)与学域。 续之,于二元类置信息检索置中检校判别参数于占候性能之化。 性与词频基线校。 多所研泛化,兼用词嵌预测器网络泛化单词难辨,及集外数之试。', 'hi': 'शब्दावली इन्वेंट्री भविष्यवाणी का उद्देश्य क्वेरी शब्दों के सीमित नमूने के आधार पर एक शिक्षार्थी की पूरी शब्दावली की भविष्यवाणी करना है। यह पेपर 2-पैरामीटर आइटम रिस्पांस थ्योरी (आईआरटी) मॉडल से शुरू होने वाली समस्या तक पहुंचता है, जिससे शब्दावली में प्रत्येक शब्द को कठिनाई और भेदभाव पैरामीटर मिलता है। भेदभाव पैरामीटर का मूल्यांकन प्रश्न आइटम चयन की उप-समस्या पर किया जाता है, जो कंप्यूटरीकृत अनुकूली परीक्षण (कैट) और सक्रिय सीखने के क्षेत्रों से परिचित है। अगला, पूर्वानुमान प्रदर्शन पर भेदभाव पैरामीटर के प्रभाव की जांच की जाती है, दोनों बाइनरी वर्गीकरण सेटिंग में, और एक जानकारी पुनर्प्राप्ति सेटिंग में। प्रदर्शन की तुलना शब्द आवृत्ति के आधार पर आधार रेखाओं के साथ की जाती है। कई अलग-अलग सामान्यीकरण परिदृश्यों की जांच की जाती है, जिसमें भविष्यवक्ता नेटवर्क के साथ शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके शब्द कठिनाई और भेदभाव को सामान्य ीकृत करना और आउट-ऑफ-डेटासेट डेटा पर परीक्षण शामिल है।', 'ru': 'Целью прогнозирования запаса лексики является прогнозирование всего словарного запаса учащегося на основе ограниченной выборки слов запроса. Эта статья подходит к проблеме, начиная с 2-параметрической модели теории отклика элемента (IRT), давая каждому слову в словаре параметр сложности и дискриминации. Параметр дискриминации оценивается по подзадаче выбора элемента вопроса, знакомого из областей компьютеризированного адаптивного тестирования (CAT) и активного обучения. Далее изучают влияние параметра дискриминации на производительность прогнозирования как в настройках двоичной классификации, так и в настройках извлечения информации. Производительность сравнивается с базовыми линиями на основе частоты слов. Рассматривается ряд различных сценариев обобщения, включая обобщение сложности слова и различения с использованием вложений слов с сетью предикторов и тестирование на данных из набора данных.', 'ga': 'Is é an aidhm atá le fardail stór focal stór focal iomlán an fhoghlaimeora a thuar bunaithe ar shampla teoranta d’fhocail cheistiúcháin. Téann an páipéar seo i ngleic leis an bhfadhb ag tosú ón tsamhail dhá pharaiméadar Teoiric Freagra Míre (IRT), ag tabhairt paraiméadair deacrachta agus idirdhealaithe do gach focal sa stór focal. Déantar an paraiméadar idirdhealaithe a mheas ar an bhfo-fhadhb a bhaineann le roghnú míreanna ceiste, ar eolas é ó réimsí na Tástála Oiriúnaitheach Ríomhairithe (CAT) agus na foghlama gníomhaí. Ansin, scrúdaítear éifeacht an pharaiméadar idirdhealaithe ar fheidhmíocht tuar, i suíomh aicmithe dhénártha agus i suíomh aisghabhála faisnéise. Cuirtear feidhmíocht i gcomparáid le bonnlínte bunaithe ar mhinicíocht focal. Scrúdaítear roinnt cásanna ginearálaithe éagsúla, lena n-áirítear deacracht focal agus leithcheal a ghinearálú trí úsáid a bhaint as leabaithe focal le líonra réamhaisnéiseoirí agus tástáil ar shonraí as an tacar sonraí.', 'hu': 'A szókincsleltár előrejelzésének célja a tanuló teljes szókincsének előrejelzése a lekérdezési szavak korlátozott mintája alapján. A tanulmány a 2 paraméteres Item Response Theory (IRT) modellből közelíti meg a problémát, és minden szót nehézségi és diszkriminációs paraméterrel rendelkezik a szókincsben. A diszkriminációs paramétert a számítógépes adaptív tesztelés (CAT) és az aktív tanulás területén ismert kérdéselem kiválasztásának alproblémáján értékeljük. Ezután megvizsgáljuk a diszkriminációs paraméter predikciós teljesítményre gyakorolt hatását, mind bináris osztályozási beállításban, mind információlekérdezési beállításban. A teljesítményt a szó gyakorisága alapján hasonlítják össze az alapvető vonalakkal. Számos különböző általánosítási forgatókönyvet vizsgálnak, beleértve a szónehézségek általánosítását és a diszkriminációt egy prediktív hálózattal történő szóbeágyazással, valamint az adatkészleten kívüli adatok tesztelését.', 'el': 'Ο στόχος της πρόβλεψης καταλόγου λεξιλογίου είναι η πρόβλεψη ολόκληρου του λεξιλογίου ενός μαθητή με βάση ένα περιορισμένο δείγμα λέξεων ερωτήματος. Η παρούσα εργασία προσεγγίζει το πρόβλημα ξεκινώντας από το μοντέλο 2παραμέτρων Θεωρίας Ανταποκρίσεων Στοιχείων (ΔΤ), δίνοντας σε κάθε λέξη στο λεξιλόγιο μια παράμετρο δυσκολίας και διάκρισης. Η παράμετρος διάκρισης αξιολογείται με βάση το υπο-πρόβλημα της επιλογής ερωτημάτων, εξοικειωμένο από τους τομείς της μηχανοποιημένης προσαρμοστικής δοκιμής (CAT) και της ενεργού μάθησης. Στη συνέχεια, εξετάζεται η επίδραση της παραμέτρου διάκρισης στην απόδοση πρόβλεψης, τόσο σε μια ρύθμιση δυαδικής ταξινόμησης, όσο και σε μια ρύθμιση ανάκτησης πληροφοριών. Η απόδοση συγκρίνεται με τις γραμμές βάσης με βάση τη συχνότητα λέξεων. Εξετάζονται διάφορα σενάρια γενικοποίησης, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της γενικοποίησης της δυσκολίας λέξεων και των διακρίσεων με τη χρήση ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων με δίκτυο προγνωστών και της δοκιμής σε δεδομένα εκτός συνόλου δεδομένων.', 'ka': 'სიტყვალური ინტექტორიის მიზეზი არის სწავლის ყველა სიტყვალური წარმოიდგინოთ, რომელიც კითხვის სიტყვალთან დაბაზეულია. ეს გვერდის პრობლემას გადავიწყება 2- პარამეტრის ელემენტის რეაქციის ტეორია (IRT) მოდელიდან, რომელიც ყველა სიტყვის სიტყვის სიტყვის შესაძლებელობა და დისკრიმინაციის პარამეტრის დისკრიმინაციის პარამეტრები კითხვის ელემენტების არჩევის საკუთარი პრობლემაზე გაუმუშავება, რომელიც კომპიუტერიზებული ადაპტიგური ტესტის (CAT) და აქტიგური სწავლების შემდეგ, დისკრიმინაციის პარამეტრის ეფექტი წარმოდგენისთვის გამოყენება, ორივე ბიბინერი კლასიფიკაციის დასაწყებაში და ინფორმაციის მიღებაში. პერფორმაცია სიტყვების სიტყვების ფერკვინციის დაბათებულია. განსხვავებული გენერალიზაციის სენერიოების რაოდენობა გამოყენება, რომლებიც გენერალიზაცია სიტყვების რთული და დისკრიმინაცია, გამოყენებული სიტყვების ინტებიზაცია, პროგრამეტრის ქსელის', 'it': "Lo scopo della previsione dell'inventario del vocabolario è quello di prevedere l'intero vocabolario di uno studente sulla base di un campione limitato di parole di query. Questo articolo affronta il problema partendo dal modello IRT (Item Response Theory), dando ad ogni parola nel vocabolario un parametro di difficoltà e discriminazione. Il parametro di discriminazione è valutato sul sotto-problema della selezione degli elementi interrogativi, familiare dai campi del Computerised Adaptive Testing (CAT) e dell'apprendimento attivo. Successivamente, viene esaminato l'effetto del parametro di discriminazione sulle prestazioni predittive, sia in un'impostazione di classificazione binaria, sia in un'impostazione di recupero delle informazioni. Le prestazioni sono confrontate con le linee di base basate sulla frequenza delle parole. Vengono esaminati diversi scenari di generalizzazione, tra cui generalizzare la difficoltà delle parole e la discriminazione utilizzando incorporazioni di parole con una rete predittiva e test su dati fuori dal set di dati.", 'lt': 'Sąvokų aprašo prognozės tikslas – prognozuoti visą mokytojo žodyną, pagrįstą ribotu klausimų žodžių pavyzdžiu. Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama problem a, pradedama taikyti 2 parametrų objekto atsako teorijos (IRT) model į, suteikiant kiekvienam žodyno žodyne sunkumo ir diskriminacijos parametrą. Diskriminacijos parametras vertinamas atsižvelgiant į klausimo objektų atrankos problem ą, žinomą kompiuterizuotų pritaikymo bandymų (CAT) ir aktyvaus mokymosi srityse. Toliau nagrinėjamas diskriminacijos parametro poveikis prognozės veiksmingumui dviejose klasifikacijose ir informacijos gavimo sąlygose. Veiksmingumas lyginamas su bazinėmis linijomis pagal žodžių dažnį. Nagrinėjami keli skirtingi generalizacijos scenarijai, įskaitant žodžių sudėtingumo ir diskriminacijos generalizavimą naudojant žodžių įtraukimą į prognozatorių tinklą ir išbandymą ne duomenų rinkinio duomenimis.', 'mk': "The aim of vocabulary inventory prediction is to predict a learner's whole vocabulary based on a limited sample of query words.  Оваа хартија се приближува до проблемот почнувајќи од моделот на теоријата на одговорот на 2 параметри (IRT), давајќи му на секој збор во речникот тешкотија и дискриминација параметри. Параметарот за дискриминација е проценет на подпроблемот со изборот на предмети за прашање, познат од полето на компјутеризирано адаптивно тестирање (CAT) и активно учење. Next, the effect of the discrimination parameter on prediction performance is examined, both in a binary classification setting, and in an information retrieval setting.  Извршувањето се споредува со основните линии врз основа на фреквенцијата на зборовите. Се испитуваат неколку различни сценарија за генерализација, вклучително и генерализација на словните тешкотии и дискриминација користејќи ги зборовите внатре со мрежа на предвидувачи и тестирање на податоци надвор од датотеките.", 'kk': 'Сұраныс сөздерінің шектелген үлгісіне негізделген оқытушының толық сөздерін таңдау мақсаты. Бұл қағаз 2 параметрлердің жауап теориясы (IRT) үлгісінен бастап, сөздердің әрбір сөздеріне мәселесі мен дискриминациялық параметрін береді. Бұл дискриминациялық параметрі компьютерлік адаптикалық сынақтар (CAT) және белсенді оқыту өрістерінен білетін сұрақ элементтерді таңдау ішкі мәселесінде бағалады. Келесі, таңдау жұмысының дискриминациялық параметрінің эффекті, екі бинарлық классификациялық параметрінде да, мәліметті алу параметрінде де тексеріледі. Жұмыс істеу сөздің жиілігіне негізделген негізгі жолдармен салыстырылады. Бірнеше жалпы жалпы сценарий тексеріледі, сондай-ақ сөздердің қажеттілігін жалпы түрлендіру мен дискриминациялығын сөздердің ендіру желімен және деректер жинақтарының шығыс деректерін тексеру.', 'ms': 'Tujuan ramalan inventori vokbulari adalah meramalkan seluruh vokbulari pelajar berdasarkan sampel terbatas perkataan pertanyaan. Kertas ini mendekati masalah bermula dari model Teori Balasan Item 2-parameter (IRT), memberikan setiap perkataan dalam vokbulari parameter kesulitan dan diskriminasi. Parameter diskriminasi diteliti pada sub-masalah pemilihan item soalan, biasa dari medan Ujian Adaptif Komputer (CAT) dan pembelajaran aktif. Kemudian, kesan parameter diskriminasi pada prestasi prediksi diperiksa, kedua-dua dalam tetapan klasifikasi binari, dan dalam tetapan pemulihan maklumat. Performance dibandingkan dengan garis dasar berdasarkan frekuensi perkataan. Beberapa skenario pembesaran yang berbeza diperiksa, termasuk pembesaran kesulitan perkataan dan diskriminasi menggunakan pembesaran perkataan dengan rangkaian prediktor dan ujian pada data luar set data.', 'ml': 'പഠിക്കുന്നവന്റെ മുഴുവന്\u200d വാക്ക് പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യം ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്റെ പരിധിയിലുള്ള ഒരു ടാമ്പിള്\u200d അട ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d 2- പരാമീറ്ററില്\u200d നിന്ന് തുടങ്ങുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രശ്നം എത്തുന്നു. പദാവലിയില്\u200d ഓരോ വാക്കും പ്രയാസവും വ്യത്യാസവുമായി തുടങ്ങ The discrimination parameter is evaluated on the sub-problem of question item selection, familiar from the fields of Computerised Adaptive Testing (CAT) and active learning.  അടുത്ത്, പ്രത്യേക പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസപ്രഭാവം ബൈനരി ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d സജ്ജീകരണത്തിലും വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വി വാക്കിന്റെ ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസ് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില വ്യത്യസ്ത ജനറലേഷന്\u200d സിനേറ്ററികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു, വാക്കിന്റെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടും വിവേചകങ്ങളും സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രവച', 'no': 'Målet for oppdaging av ordbokstavar er å forhåndsvisa heile ordboka til ein læraren basert på eit begrenset prøve av spørjingsverdi. Denne papiret nærmer problemet som startar frå modellen 2- parameter element svarteorie (IRT), og gir kvar ord i ordboka ein vanskeleg og diskriminasjon. Diskriminasjons- parameteren er evaluert på underproblemet med utvalet av spørsmål, kjent frå felta i datamaskinerte tilpassande testar (CAT) og aktive læring. Neste vert det forsøkte effekten av diskriminasjons parameter på forhåndsvising, både i ein binærklassifikasjonsinnstilling og i ein informasjonshenting. Funksjonen er samanlikna med baselinjer basert på ordfrekvensen. Dette er undersøkt mange ulike generelliseringsscenarioar, inkludert generellisering av ordvanskeleghet og diskriminasjon ved bruk av ordinnbygging med eit forhåndsvisningsnettverk og testar på utdatasettdata.', 'mt': "The aim of vocabulary inventory prediction is to predict a learner's whole vocabulary based on a limited sample of query words.  Dan id-dokument joqrob lejn il-problem a li tibda mill-mudell tat-Teorija tar-Rispons tal-Partiti (IRT) b’żewġ parametri, u jagħti lil kull kelma fil-vokabulari parametru ta’ diffikultà u diskriminazzjoni. Il-parametru tad-diskriminazzjoni huwa evalwat fuq is-sottoproblema tal-għażla tal-oġġett tal-mistoqsija, familjari mill-oqsma tat-Test Adattattiv Kompjuterizzat (CAT) u t-tagħlim attiv. Wara, l-effett tal-parametru ta’ diskriminazzjoni fuq il-prestazzjoni tat-tbassir jiġi eżaminat, kemm f’ambjent binarju ta’ klassifikazzjoni, kif ukoll f’ambjent ta’ ġbir ta’ informazzjoni. Il-prestazzjoni titqabbel mal-linji bażi bbażati fuq il-frekwenza tal-kliem. Numru ta’ xenarji differenti ta’ ġeneralizzazzjoni huma eżaminati, inklużi l-ġeneralizzazzjoni tad-diffikultà tal-kliem u d-diskriminazzjoni bl-użu ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem b’netwerk ta’ tbassir u l-ittestjar fuq dejta barra s-sett tad-dejta.", 'mn': 'Боловсролын зохиолын төлөвлөгөөний зорилго бол сурагчийн бүх үг үгийг хязгаарлагдсан хэлний жишээ дээр таамаглах юм. Энэ цаас 2-параметрын хариу теориас (IRT) загвараас эхлэх асуудлыг ойртож, үг бүрийг хэцүү болон ялгаварлах параметр өгсөн. Тодорхойлолтын параметр компьютерийн адаптийн шалгалт (CAT) болон актив суралцах талбараас танилцдаг асуулт асуудлын суурь асуудлын суурь асуудлын суурь асуудлын суурь асуудлын суурь асууд Дараа нь, таамаглах үйл ажиллагаанд тархалтын параметрын нөлөө нь хоёр давхар хуваалцах хэмжээнд, мөн мэдээлэл авах хэмжээнд шалгана. Үүний давхар давхар хэмжээсүүдтэй харьцуулдаг. Өөр олон ерөнхийлөгчийн хувилбарыг шалгаж үздэг. Үүний хэцүү хэцүү байдал, хуваалцааны тусламжтайгаар тодорхойлж, өгөгдлийн сангийн бусад өгөгдлийг шалгаж байдаг.', 'pl': 'Celem przewidywania inwentaryzacji słownictwa jest przewidywanie całego słownictwa uczącego się na podstawie ograniczonej próby słów zapytania. W artykule podejście do problemu zaczynając od modelu 2-parametrowej Teorii Odpowiedzi Item (IRT), nadając każdemu słownikowi parametr trudności i dyskryminacji. Parametr dyskryminacji ocenia się na podproblemie wyboru pozycji pytania, znanym z dziedzin komputeryzowanego testowania adaptacyjnego (CAT) i aktywnego uczenia się. Następnie badano wpływ parametru dyskryminacji na wydajność predykcji, zarówno w ustawieniu klasyfikacji binarnej, jak i w ustawieniu pobierania informacji. Wydajność porównywana jest z liniami bazowymi na podstawie częstotliwości słów. Badano szereg różnych scenariuszy uogólnienia, w tym uogólnienie trudności i dyskryminacji słów za pomocą osadzeń słów z siecią predykcyjną oraz testowanie danych poza zbiorem danych.', 'ro': 'Scopul previziunii inventarului vocabularului este de a prezice întregul vocabular al unui elev pe baza unui eșantion limitat de cuvinte de interogare. Lucrarea abordează problema pornind de la modelul IRT (Item Response Theory), oferind fiecărui cuvânt din vocabular un parametru de dificultate și discriminare. Parametrul discriminării este evaluat pe subproblema selectării elementelor de întrebare, familiar din domeniile Testării Adaptive Computerizate (CAT) și învățării active. Apoi, efectul parametrului de discriminare asupra performanței de predicție este examinat, atât într-un cadru de clasificare binară, cât și într-un cadru de recuperare a informațiilor. Performanța este comparată cu liniile de referință bazate pe frecvența cuvintelor. Sunt examinate o serie de scenarii de generalizare diferite, inclusiv generalizarea dificultății cuvintelor și discriminării utilizând încorporarea cuvintelor cu o rețea de predictori și testarea datelor din setul de date.', 'si': 'භාෂාවික සංවිධානය සංවිධානයේ අරමුණ තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වචන සීමාවිත වචන සංවිධානයෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න. Name ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තෝරණය සබ- ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තෝරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා පරීක්ෂණය කරල ඊළඟ, විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, බායිනාරි විශේෂ සැකසුම් වලට, සහ තොරතුරු  කාර්යාලය විශේෂතාවට අධාරිත වචනය සඳහා විශේෂතාවය තියෙන්නේ. වෙනස් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා, සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට වචන අමාරුය සහ විශේෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා වචන සංවිධානය සඳහ', 'sr': 'Cilj predviđanja rečnika je predviđati čitav rečnik učenika na osnovu ograničenog uzoraka reči zahteva. Ovaj papir se približava problemu koji počinje od model a teorije odgovora na 2-parametru elementa (IRT), dajući svaku reč u rečniku probleme i diskriminaciju. Diskriminacijski parameter se procjenjuje na podproblemu selekcije pitanja, poznatom iz polja kompjuterskog adaptivnog testa (CAT) i aktivnog učenja. Sledeće je ispitivanje učinka diskriminacijskog parametra na predviđanje, kako u binarnoj klasifikaciji, kao i u području prikupljanja informacija. Performacija se uspoređuje sa osnovnim linijama na temelju frekvencije riječi. Proučavaju se broj različitih scenarija generalizacije, uključujući generalizaciju teškosti riječi i diskriminacije koristeći integraciju riječi sa predviđateljskom mrežom i testiranje podataka o izvan seta podataka.', 'sv': 'Syftet med förutsägelse av ordförråd är att förutsäga en elevs hela ordförråd baserat på ett begränsat urval av frågeord. Denna uppsats behandlar problemet med utgångspunkt i 2-parametermodellen Item Response Theory (IRT), vilket ger varje ord i ordförrådet en svårighets- och diskrimineringsparameter. Diskrimineringsparametern utvärderas utifrån delproblemet för val av frågeobjekt, bekant från områdena Datorised Adaptive Testing (CAT) och aktivt lärande. Därefter undersöks effekten av diskrimineringsparametern på förutsägelseprestanda, både i en binär klassificering och i en informationssökning inställning. Prestanda jämförs med baslinjer baserat på ordfrekvens. Ett antal olika generaliseringsscenarier undersöks, bland annat generalisering av ordsvårighet och diskriminering med hjälp av ordinbäddningar med ett prediktornätverk och testning av data utanför datauppsättningen.', 'ur': 'لکھنے والی پیدائش کا موقع یہ ہے کہ ایک پڑھنے والی کلمات کی ایک محدود نمونہ پر آگاہ کریں۔ This paper approaches the problem starting from the 2-parameter Item Response Theory (IRT) model, giving each word in the vocabulary a difficulty and discrimination parameter. تقسیم پارامیٹ کو سؤال آیٹ انتخاب کے زیر مسئلہ پر مطالبہ کیا جاتا ہے، کمپیوٹریز اڈپٹیٹ تست (CAT) اور فعال سیکھنے کے کھیتوں سے پہچان لیا جاتا ہے. آگے، تقسیم پارامیٹ کی پارامیٹ کی تغییر کی تغییر پڑھی جاتی ہے، دونوں بائیناری کلاسیفوں کے تنظیم میں، اور ایک معلومات پھیرنے کے تنظیم میں. فعالیت بات فرکانس پر بنسس لین کے ساتھ مقایسہ کی جاتی ہے. بہت سی مختلف عمومی سناریوں کی آزمائش کی جاتی ہے، کلمات کی مشکلات اور تقسیم کے ساتھ کلمات کے مطابق ایک پیش بینی نیٹ ورک کے ساتھ ڈیٹ سٹ ڈیٹ پر آزمائش کی جاتی ہے۔', 'so': "The aim of vocabulary inventory prediction is to predict a learner's whole vocabulary based on a limited sample of query words.  Qoraalkan wuxuu u soo dhowaadaa dhibaatada laga bilaabo qoraalka arimaha jawaabta ee 2-parameter (IRT), isagoo ku siinaya hadal kasta oo afka ku qoran waa dhibaato iyo isku takoorid. Takoorista waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa dhibaatada hoose ee la doortay arrimaha la xiriira, taas oo lagu aqoonsan yahay beeraha imtixaanka kaalmada (CAT) iyo waxbarashada waxqabadka ah. Marka dambe waxaa lagu baarayaa saameynta takoorida ee bandhigga laguu soo bandhigi karo bandhigyada la soo bandhigi karo xiliga fasaxa labaad iyo korsashada macluumaadka. Heerarka waxaa la barbaranayaa aasaasiga ah oo ku saleysan hadal frequency. Waxaa la imtixaamaa xaaladaha kala duduwan oo la soo bandhigayo, kuwaas oo ku jira mid ka mid ah dhibaatada hadalka iyo takoorista ku qora shabakadda wax sii sheegi karta iyo imtixaanka macluumaadka aan ka baxsaneyn.", 'ta': 'சொற்கோவைக் கண்டுபிடிப்பு எதிர்பார்ப்பது ஒரு வரிசைப்படையான கேள்வி வார்த்தைகளை அடிப்படையில் முழு சொற்கோவையும் முழு  இந்த தாள் 2- அளபுரு உருப்படி பதில் தலைப்பு மாதிரியிலிருந்து தொடங்கும் பிரச்சனையை அணுகும், சொல்வளத்தில் ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தையும் சி The discrimination parameter is evaluated on the sub-problem of question item selection, familiar from the fields of Computerised Adaptive Testing (CAT) and active learning.  அடுத்து, வார்த்தை அதிர்வெண்ட் அடிப்படையில் அடிப்படையான அடிப்படைகளுடன் செயல்பாடு ஒப்பிடும். வேறு வித்தியாசமான பொதுவான காட்சிகள் சோதிக்கப்படுகின்றன, வார்த்தை கடினம் மற்றும் வித்தியாசம் பொருட்களை முன்வாக்கிய பிணையத்துடன்', 'uz': "Shaxsiy muvaffaqiyatlarni taqdim qilish uchun o'qituvchi soʻzlarning hamma so'zlarini tahrirlash mumkin. Bu qogʻoz 2- parametr javob mavzusini (IRT) modeldan boshlanadigan muammolaga keladi, bu soʻzdagi har bir soʻzni qiyin va ajratish parametrlariga ega boʻlishi mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Comment Name Koʻp necha xil generalizlashtirish scenariyatlarini aniqlanadi. Bu so'zlarni oldindan tarmoq bilan bir so'zlar qiymati va taʼminlovchi maʼlumot bajarilmagan soʻzni yaratish va taʼminlovchilar bilan birlashtirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Mục đích của dự đoán danh s ách từ vựng là dự đoán to àn bộ Từ vựng của học giả dựa trên một mẫu giới hạn của các từ truy vấn. Tờ này đề cập đến vấn đề bắt đầu từ mẫu Từ trường hợp ứng dụng thứ hai, cho mỗi từ trong từ một từ một tham số khó khăn và phân biệt. Thuật toán phân biệt được đánh giá về vấn đề phụ trong việc chọn mục hỏi, được biết đến từ lĩnh vực thử ứng biến theo tính toán (CAT) và học hành tích cực. Tiếp theo, các hiệu ứng của tham số phân biệt về khả năng dự đoán sẽ được kiểm tra, cả trong một thiết lập phân hạng nhị, và trong một thiết lập thu thập thông tin. Hiệu suất được so sánh với các đường cơ bản dựa trên tần số từ. Một số trường hợp phổ biến khác nhau được xem xét, bao gồm việc phổ biến các từ khó khăn và phân biệt, sử dụng sự ghép từ với mạng dự đoán và thử nghiệm các dữ liệu ngoài dữ liệu.', 'bg': 'Целта на прогнозирането на инвентара на речника е да прогнозира целия речник на учащия въз основа на ограничена извадка от думи за запитване. Настоящата статия разглежда проблема като се започне от модела Теория на реакцията на елементите с 2 параметъра, давайки на всяка дума в речника параметър трудност и дискриминация. Параметърът за дискриминация се оценява по подпроблема за подбор на въпросни елементи, познат от областите Компютърно адаптивно тестване (КАТ) и активно обучение. След това се изследва ефектът на параметъра дискриминация върху ефективността на прогнозирането, както в настройка за двоична класификация, така и в настройка за извличане на информация. Ефективността се сравнява с базовите линии въз основа на честотата на думите. Разгледани са редица различни сценарии за обобщаване, включително обобщаване на трудността на думата и дискриминация чрез вграждане на думи с мрежа за предсказване и тестване на данни извън набора от данни.', 'da': 'Formålet med forudsigelse af ordforråd er at forudsige en elevs hele ordforråd baseret på et begrænset eksempel af forespørgselsord. Denne artikel behandler problemet med udgangspunkt i 2-parametermodellen Item Response Theory (IRT), hvilket giver hvert ord i ordforrådet en vanskeligheds- og diskriminationsparameter. Diskriminationsparameteren vurderes ud fra delproblemet med valg af spørgsmålstegn, kendt fra felterne Computerised Adaptive Testing (CAT) og aktiv læring. Dernæst undersøges effekten af diskriminationsparameteren på forudsigelsens ydeevne, både i en binær klassifikationsindstilling og i en informationssøgningsindstilling. Performance sammenlignes med basislinjer baseret på ordfrekvens. En række forskellige generaliseringsscenarier undersøges, herunder generalisering af ordvanskeligheder og diskrimination ved hjælp af ordindlejringer med et forudsigelsesnetværk og test på data uden for datasættet.', 'hr': 'Cilj predviđanja riječnika je predviđati cijeli riječnik učitelja na osnovu ograničenog uzoraka riječi zahtjeva. Ovaj papir se približava problemu počevši od model a teorije odgovora na 2-parametre elementa (IRT), dajući svaku riječ u rečniku teškoću i diskriminacijskom parametru. Diskriminacijski parametr procjenjuje se podproblem izbora pitanja, poznat iz polja kompjuterskog adaptivnog testa (CAT) i aktivnog učenja. Sljedeće se ispitiva učinak diskriminacijskog parametra na učinkovitost predviđanja, kako u binarnom stanju klasifikacije, kao i u nastavu prikupljanja informacija. Učinnost se uspoređuje s početnim linijama na temelju frekvencije riječi. Provjeravaju se broj različitih scenarija generalizacije, uključujući generalizaciju teškoća riječi i diskriminacije s primjenom priključenja riječima s predvidjetnim mrežom i testiranjem podataka o izvan podataka.', 'nl': "Het doel van vocabulaire inventarisvoorspelling is om de volledige vocabulaire van een leerling te voorspellen op basis van een beperkt aantal vraagwoorden. Deze paper benadert het probleem vanuit het 2-parameter Item Response Theory (IRT) model, waarbij elk woord in de woordenschat een moeilijkheids- en discriminatieparameter krijgt. De discriminatieparameter wordt geëvalueerd op het subprobleem van de selectie van vraagtekens, bekend uit de gebieden Computerized Adaptive Testing (CAT) en actief leren. Vervolgens wordt het effect van de discriminatieparameter op voorspellende prestaties onderzocht, zowel in een binaire classificatie setting als in een informatie retrieval setting. Prestaties worden vergeleken met basislijnen op basis van woordfrequentie. Een aantal verschillende generalisatiescenario's worden onderzocht, waaronder het generaliseren van woordmoeilijkheid en discriminatie met behulp van woord embeddings met een voorspellend netwerk en het testen van out-of-dataset data.", 'de': 'Das Ziel der Vokabelinventarisvorhersage ist es, den gesamten Wortschatz eines Lernenden anhand einer begrenzten Stichprobe von Abfragewörtern vorherzusagen. Diese Arbeit nähert sich dem Problem ausgehend vom 2-Parameter Item Response Theory (IRT) Modell an und gibt jedem Wort im Vokabular einen Schwierigkeits- und Diskriminierungsparameter. Der Diskriminierungsparameter wird anhand des Teilproblems der Fragestellenauswahl bewertet, das aus den Bereichen Computerized Adaptive Testing (CAT) und aktives Lernen bekannt ist. Als nächstes wird der Effekt des Diskriminierungsparameters auf die Vorhersageleistung untersucht, sowohl in einer binären Klassifikation als auch in einer Information Retrieval-Einstellung. Die Leistung wird anhand der Wortfrequenz mit Baselines verglichen. Es werden verschiedene Verallgemeinerungsszenarien untersucht, darunter die Verallgemeinerung von Wortschwierigkeiten und -diskriminierungen mittels Worteinbettungen mit einem Prädiktornetzwerk und das Testen von Daten außerhalb des Datensatzes.', 'id': 'Tujuan dari prediksi inventori vokbulari adalah untuk memprediksi seluruh vokbulari seorang pelajar berdasarkan sampel terbatas kata-kata pertanyaan. Kertas ini mendekati masalah yang dimulai dari 2-parameter Item Response Theory (IRT) model, memberikan setiap kata dalam vokabular parameter kesulitan dan diskriminasi. Parameter diskriminasi diteliti pada sub-masalah seleksi item pertanyaan, familiar dari bidang Pengujian Adaptif Komputer (CAT) dan pembelajaran aktif. Selanjutnya, efek parameter diskriminasi pada prestasi prediksi diperiksa, baik dalam pengaturan klasifikasi binari, dan dalam pengaturan penulisan informasi. Performance is compared with baselines based on word frequency.  Beberapa skenario generalisasi yang berbeda diperiksa, termasuk generalisasi kesulitan kata dan diskriminasi menggunakan embedding kata dengan jaringan prediktor dan tes pada data luar dataset.', 'ko': '어휘량표 예측의 목적은 유한한 조회어 견본을 바탕으로 학습자의 모든 어휘를 예측하는 것이다.본고는 두 가지 파라미터 프로젝트 반응 이론(IRT) 모델에서 착안하여 어휘표의 모든 단어에 난이도와 변별 파라미터를 제시한다.판별 매개 변수는 문제 항목에서 선택한 하위 문제에 따라 평가하는데 이것은 컴퓨터 자체 적응 테스트(CAT)와 능동 학습 분야에서 흔히 볼 수 있다.이어서 이원 분류 설정과 정보 검색 설정에서 판별 파라미터가 예측 성능에 미치는 영향을 연구했다.성능을 주파수 기반의 기선과 비교하다.예측 네트워크를 가진 단어를 삽입하여 단어의 난이도와 식별을 일반화하고 데이터 집합 밖의 데이터를 테스트하는 등 다양한 범주화 장면을 연구했다.', 'fa': 'هدف پیش بینی اختراع کلمه\u200cای است که کلمه کلمه\u200cای از یک دانش آموزش را بر اساس نمونه\u200cای محدود از کلمه\u200cهای سوال پیش بینی کنید. این کاغذ به مشکل نزدیک می\u200cشود که از مدل تئوری پاسخ\u200cگیری (IRT) دو پارامتر شروع می\u200cشود، به هر کلمه در کلمات یک پارامتر مشکل و جدایی می\u200cدهد. پارامتر جدا کردن بر اساس مشکل زیر انتخاب عنصر سوال ارزیابی می\u200cشود، که از زمینه\u200cهای آزمایش قابل توجه کامپیوتری (CAT) و یادگیری فعال آشنا است. بعدش، تاثیر پارامتر جدایی بر عملکرد پیش\u200cبینی، هر دو در یک تنظیمات جدایی دوگانه و در یک تنظیمات بازیابی اطلاعات تحقیق می\u200cشود. عملکرد با خطوط پایین بر اساس فرکانس کلمه مقایسه می\u200cشود. تعدادی از سناریوهای ژنرالیزی متفاوت تحقیق می\u200cشوند، شامل مشکلات کلمات و جدایی با استفاده از ابزار کلمات با شبکه پیش\u200cبینی و آزمایش داده\u200cهای خارج از داده\u200cهای داده\u200cها.', 'sw': 'Lengo la kutabiri utabiri wa lugha za maneno ni kutabiri lugha nzima ya mwanafunzi kwa kutumia mtindo mdogo wa maneno ya utafiti. Gazeti hili linakaribia tatizo kuanzia Mradi wa Jibu la Jibu la 2 (IRT), kwa kutoa kila neno katika lugha ni ngumu na ubaguzi. Kipambano cha ubaguzi kinatathmini kwenye tatizo la tatizo la utafiti wa bidhaa, linalofahamika kutoka kwenye maeneo ya jaribio la Adaptive (CAT) na kujifunza kwa haraka. Baadae, madhara ya ubaguzi wa ubaguzi kuhusu utendaji wa utabiri unachunguzwa, katika mazingira ya usambazaji binafsi, na katika mazingira ya upatikanaji wa taarifa. Uwezaji unalinganishwa na misingi ya msingi inayohusiana na kiwango cha maneno. Matokeo kadhaa ya uzalendo yanachunguzwa, ikiwa ni pamoja na kutengeneza ugumu wa maneno na ubaguzi kwa kutumia maneno yanayotumia mitandao ya kutabiri na kujaribu taarifa isiyo na takwimu.', 'tr': 'Sözbaşy keşfetleyici çaklamanyň maksady, öwrenişiň bütin s özlerini soraglama sözleriniň mugallyk nüňünde daýrylýar. Bu kagyz 2-Parametriýanyň Response Teoriýasyndan başlanýan meselä golaýar, sözleriň her sözüne kynçylyk we diskriminasiýa döredişi. diskriminasiň parametri soragy saýlawyň sub-meselä deňlenýär. Kompýuterlerden tanyş Adaptive Testing (CAT) we aktif öwrenmelerden tanyş. Indiki, öňlenmek üçin diskrimin pararamynyň täsiri barlanýar, hem ikili klasifikasynda hem bir maglumat gaýd etmek üçin barlanýar. Durumlar sözleriň frekwensiýana dayalýar. Birnäçe dürli döredijilik senaryýaly barlanýar, sözleriň kynçylygy we diskriminasiýany sözleriň girişigini ön namaýyşçysy a ňla ullanýar we daňa düzümlenme maglumatynda synanyşýar.', 'hy': 'Բառագրային արտահայտության կանխատեսման նպատակն է ուսանողի ամբողջ բառագրի կանխատեսումը, հիմնված հարցման բառերի սահմանափակ նմուշի վրա: Այս հոդվածը մոտենում է խնդիրին, սկսած 2 պարամետրով պարագարից Արձագանքի տեսության (ԻՌԹ) մոդելի վրա, բառարանում յուրաքանչյուր բառ դժվարության և խտրականության պարամետրով տալով: Դիտարկման պարամետրը գնահատվում է հարցի տարրերի ընտրության ենթախնդիրը, որը ծանոթ է համակարգչային հարմարեցման փորձարկումների (ԿՏ) և ակտիվ ուսումնասիրության ոլորտներից: Հաջորդ, խտրականության պարամետրի ազդեցությունը կանխատեսման արդյունքի վրա ուսումնասիրում է երկարագույն դասակարգման համակարգում և տեղեկատվության վերադարձման համակարգում: Արդյունքը համեմատում է բառերի հաճախականության վրա հիմնված հիմնական գծերի հետ: A number of different generalisation scenarios are examined, including generalising word difficulty and discrimination using word embeddings with a predictor network and testing on out-of-dataset data.', 'am': 'የመግለጫ ቃላት በሚጠይቅ ምሳሌ ላይ የተደረገ የአስተማሪው ቃላት ሙሉ እንዲያሳየቅ ነው፡፡ ይህ ገጽ ከ2-parameter መልስ አካሄድ (IRT) ሞዴል ጀምሮ የሚጀምር ጉዳይ ይደርሳል፤ በአፎልጋሉ ውስጥ ሁሉንም ቃላት ጭንቀት እና ማስቸካከል ማስተካከል ይደረጋል፡፡ የጥያቄ ምርጫ አካባቢ ምርጫው፣ ከኮምፒዩተር ተፈተና (CAT) መሬት እና ትምህርት የሚታወቅ የጥያቄ ምርጫው አካባቢ ጉዳይ ይታያል፡፡ የሚቀጥለው፣ የውርደት አካባቢ አካባቢ እና በማስተያየት ማሳየት ማቀናጃ ውስጥ፣ የውይይት ማስታወቂያው ማሳየት ነው፡፡ ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s በተለየ ልዩ አቀማመጥ ማዕከላዊ ድምፅ እና የቃላት ጭንቀት እና ውቀት በመጠቀም በተቃላት የሚታወቀው ተጠቃሚ መረብ እና ከዳታ-ሰዓት ውጪ ዳታዎችን በመፈተና ይሞክራሉ፡፡', 'sq': 'Qëllimi i parashikimit të inventarit të fjalëkalimit është të parashikojë të gjithë fjalëkalimin e një nxënësi bazuar në një mostër të kufizuar të fjalëve pyetjeje. Ky dokument afrohet problemit duke filluar nga modeli i Teorisë së përgjigjes së objekteve 2-parametrash (IRT), duke i dhënë çdo fjalë në fjalorë një parametrë vështirësie dhe diskriminimi. Parametri i diskriminimit vlerësohet në nënproblemin e zgjedhjes së objektit të pyetjes, i njohur nga fushat e Testimit Adaptiv Kompjuterizuar (CAT) dhe mësimit aktiv. Më pas, efekti i parametrit të diskriminimit mbi performancën e parashikimit shqyrtohet, si në një përcaktimin e klasifikimit binar, ashtu edhe në një përcaktimin e marrjes së informacionit. Performanca krahasohet me linjat bazë bazuar në frekuencën e fjalëve. Një numër skenarësh të ndryshëm gjeneralizimi janë shqyrtuar, duke përfshirë gjeneralizimin e vështirësisë së fjalëve dhe diskriminimin duke përdorur përfshirjen e fjalëve me një rrjet parashikues dhe testimin e të dhënave jashtë të dhënave.', 'af': "Die doel van woordeboekinventorie voorskou is om 'n leerder se hele woordeboek te voorskou, gebaseer op 'n beperkte voorbeeld van navraag woorde. Hierdie papier naby die probleem wat begin van die 2- parameter Item Antwoord Teorie (IRT) model, gegee elke woord in die woordeboek 'n moeilikheid en diskriminasie parameter. Die diskriminasie parameter is evalueer op die subprobleem van vraag item keuse, bekend van die velde van rekenaar aanpasbare toets (CAT) en aktief leer. Volgende, die effek van die diskriminasie parameter op voorskou prestasie is ondersoek, beide in 'n binêre klassifikasie instelling, en in 'n inligting herhaal instelling. Performasie is vergelyk met basisline gebaseer op woord frekwensie. 'n Nommer van verskillende generalisering scenarios is ondersoek, insluitend die generellisering van woord moeilikheid en diskriminasie met gebruik van woord inbêring met 'n voorskouer netwerk en toets op buitekant-datastel data.", 'bn': 'শব্দভাণ্ডারের গবেষণার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে একটি সীমিত প্রশ্নের শব্দের উপর ভিত্তিতে শিক্ষকের পুরো শব্দভাণ্ডারের ভবিষ্যৎবা এই পত্রিকা দুই-প্যারামিটার থিওরি থিওর (আইআরটি) থেকে শুরু হওয়া সমস্যার কাছে পৌঁছেছে, শব্দভাণ্ডারে প্রত্যেকটি শব্দের একটি কঠিন এবং বৈষম্যের প্রশ্নের নির্বাচনের সাবপুরো সমস্যার উপর বৈষম্যের প্যারামিটার মূল্য করা হচ্ছে, কম্পিউটারেশন অ্যাডাপেটিভ টেস্টিং (CAT) এবং সক্রিয় শিক্ Next, the effect of the discrimination parameter on prediction performance is examined, both in a binary classification setting, and in an information retrieval setting.  শব্দের ফ্রাইভেন্সের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক বেসেলাইনের সাথে তুলনা করা হয়। বেশ কয়েকটি বিভিন্ন জেনারেলিয়ালেশনের দৃশ্য পরীক্ষা করা হচ্ছে, যার মধ্যে শব্দ কষ্ট এবং বৈষম্যের সৃষ্টি করা হচ্ছে একটি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী নেটওয়ার্', 'bs': 'Cilj predviđanja riječnika je predviđati cijeli rečnik učitelja na osnovu ograničenog uzoraka riječi pitanja. Ovaj papir se približava problemu koji počinje od model a teorije odgovora na 2-parametre elementa (IRT), dajući svaku riječ u rečniku teškoću i diskriminacijskom parametru. Diskriminacijski parameter se procjenjuje na podproblemu izbora pitanja, poznat iz polja kompjuterskog adaptivnog testa (CAT) i aktivnog učenja. Sljedeće se ispitiva učinak diskriminacijskog parametra na predviđenje učinka, kako u binarnoj klasifikaciji, kao i u području prikupljanja informacija. Performacija se uspoređuje sa osnovnim linijama na temelju frekvencije riječi. Provjeravaju se broj različitih scenarija generalizacije, uključujući generalizaciju teškoća riječi i diskriminacije s koristeći integraciju riječi sa predvidjetnim mrežom i testiranje podataka o izvan dataset.', 'ca': "L'objectiu de la predicció del inventari de vocabulari és predir el vocabulari sencer d'un aprenent basat en una mostra limitada de paraules de consulta. Aquest article aborda el problem a començant del model de la Teoria de Responsa d'Elements (IRT) de 2 paràmetres, donant a cada paraula del vocabulari un paràmetre de dificultat i discriminació. El paràmetre de discriminació es valora en el subproblema de la selecció d'objectes de pregunta, familiar dels camps de l'Enseny Adaptiu Computat (CAT) i l'aprenentatge actiu. Després, s'examina l'efecte del paràmetre de discriminació en el rendiment de la predicció, tant en un entorn binari de classificació com en un entorn de recuperació d'informació. El rendiment es compara amb les línies de base basades en la freqüència de paraules. Es examinen diversos escenaris de generalització, com la generalització de la dificultat de paraules i la discriminació fent servir l'incorporació de paraules amb una xarxa de preditors i la prova de dades fora del conjunt de dades.", 'az': 'Sözlük keşfetməsi tədbirlərinin məqsədi, öyrənənənin bütün s özlərini tədbir etməkdir. Bu kağıt 2-parametr Item Response Theory (IRT) modelindən başlayan problem ə yaxınlaşır, sözlərdə hər sözü çətin və ayrı-ayrı parametrdən verir. Müxtəlif parametr, bilgisayarlanmış Adaptive Testing (CAT) və aktif öyrənmə sahələrindən tanınan sual elementlərin seçilməsi altı problemində değerlənir. Sonra, tədbir göstəricisi üzərində diskriminasiya parametrlərinin etkisi, ikili klasifikasiya ayarlarında və məlumat alma ayarlarında incidiləcəkdir. Söz frekansiyasına dayanan sətirlər ilə istifadə edilir. Bir neçə fərqli generalizasyon senaryosu çətinlikləri və fərqli sözləri təşkil edən sözləri təşkil edən təşkil şəkli ilə və veri qurma məlumatları təşkil edən kimi təşkil edilir.', 'cs': 'Cílem predikce inventáře slovní zásoby je předpovědět celou slovní zásobu žáka na základě omezeného vzorku dotazových slov. Tento článek přistupuje k problému počínaje z 2-parametrového modelu Item Response Theory (IRT), dávajícího každému slovu parametr obtížnosti a diskriminace. Diskriminační parametr je hodnocen na dílčím problému výběru položky otázky, známém z oblastí počítačového adaptivního testování (CAT) a aktivního učení. Dále je zkoumán vliv diskriminačního parametru na predikční výkonnost, a to jak v nastavení binární klasifikace, tak v nastavení vyhledávání informací. Výkon je porovnáván se základními liniemi na základě frekvence slov. Je zkoumána řada různých zobecněných scénářů, včetně zobecnění slovní obtížnosti a diskriminace pomocí vložení slov s prediktorovou sítí a testování dat mimo datové sady.', 'et': 'Sõnavara inventuuri prognoosimise eesmärk on ennustada õppija kogu sõnavara piiratud valimi põhjal. Käesolev töö läheneb probleemile alates 2-parameetrilisest Item Response Theory (IRT) mudelist, andes igale sõnavara sõnale raskuse ja diskrimineerimise parameetri. Diskrimineerimisparameetrit hinnatakse arvutipõhise adaptiivse testimise (CAT) ja aktiivse õppe valdkondadest tuttav küsimusüksuse valiku alamprobleem. Seejärel uuritakse diskrimineerimisparameetri mõju prognoosimise jõudlusele nii binaarse klassifikatsiooni seadetes kui ka teabe hankimise seadetes. Jõudlust võrreldakse lähtejoontega, mis põhinevad sõnasagedusel. Uuritakse mitmeid erinevaid üldistamisstsenaariume, sealhulgas sõna raskuse üldistamist ja diskrimineerimist, kasutades sõna manustamist koos prognoosivõrguga ning katsetades andmekogumi väljaspool olevaid andmeid.', 'fi': 'Sanastoinventaarion ennusteen tavoitteena on ennustaa oppijan koko sanasto rajoitetun kyselysanojen otoksen perusteella. Tämä artikkeli lähestyy ongelmaa kahden parametrin Item Response Theory (IRT) -mallista, joka antaa jokaiselle sanaston sanalle vaikeus- ja syrjintäparametrin. Syrjintäparametria arvioidaan tietokonepohjaisen adaptiivisen testauksen (CAT) ja aktiivisen oppimisen alalta tutussa kysymyskohdevalinnassa. Seuraavaksi tarkastellaan diskriminaatioparametrin vaikutusta ennustuksen suorituskykyyn sekä binääriluokituksessa että tiedonhakuasetuksessa. Suorituskykyä verrataan peruslinjoihin sanataajuuden perusteella. Tutkitaan useita erilaisia yleistysskenaarioita, kuten yleistämistä sanan vaikeudesta ja syrjinnästä käyttämällä sanaupotuksia ennustusverkostolla ja testaamalla aineiston ulkopuolisia tietoja.', 'jv': 'Raylan This paper accesses the question beginning from the 2-parameter Item response theory Disc Image Next, the effect of the P Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': "Gana kunyar jerin maganar maganar, shine ya yi bayani ga wani mai sanar da shi gaba ɗaya a kan wani misali da aka ƙayyade maganar tambaya. Wannan takardan na kusantar da matsalar ta fara daga misalin abun-parameter 2 (IRT), da kuma ya bãyar da duk magana cikin linzamon, wata nau'i da parameter da yin ɓarna. Ana ƙayyade parameter a kan mai ƙara-matsalar wa abun-abun, wanda aka san daga field na jarrabi na Adoptive (CAT) da shirin karantawa na farat ɗaya. Dama, an jarraba kafin da aka canza tsarin da aka nuna wa zaman shawarar da ba'a sau biyu, da kuma a cikin tsarin mai amfani da shi. Tsarin da aka samu da bazalin layuka a kan sauri. Ana jarraba wasu surori masu motsi na dabam-daban na ɗayan jama'a, tare da mai ƙididdige nau'i ga magana da za'a fito da zanen wani mai basĩri da kuma an jarraba kan data na-tsari ba-da-data.", 'sk': 'Cilj napovedi inventarja besedišča je napovedati celotno besedišče učenca na osnovi omejenega vzorca poizvedbenih besed. Ta prispevek obravnava problem na podlagi modela 2-parametrske teorije odziva na elemente (IRT), ki vsaki besedi v besedišču daje parameter težavnosti in diskriminacije. Parameter diskriminacije je ocenjen na podproblemu izbire vprašanj postavk, ki je znan s področja računalniško prilagodljivega testiranja (CAT) in aktivnega učenja. Nato je preučen učinek parametra diskriminacije na napovedno zmogljivost, tako v nastavitvi binarne klasifikacije kot v nastavitvi pridobivanja informacij. Uspešnost se primerja z osnovnimi črtami na podlagi frekvence besed. Preučeni so številni različni scenariji posploševanja, vključno s posploševanjem težavnosti besed in diskriminacijo z uporabo vključevanja besed z mrežo napovedovalcev in preskušanjem na podatkih zunaj nabora podatkov.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་གསར་གཏོད་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་སྔོན་ལྟའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཤེས་པའི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་བ This paper approaches the problem starting from the 2-parameter Item Response Theory (IRT) model, giving each word in the vocabulary a difficulty and discrimination parameter. The discrimination parameter is evaluated on the sub-problem of question item selection, familiar from the fields of Computerised Adaptive Testing (CAT) and active learning. Next, the effect of the discrimination parameter on prediction performance is examined, both in a binary classification setting, and in an information retrieval setting. དྲུང་སྐྱོབ་བྱེད་འདི་གསང་གྲངས་དཀྱིལ་གཞི་རྩིས་ཅན་དང་མཉམ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཡོད། སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་གོ་བ་མ་འདྲ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཡོད།', 'he': 'המטרה של חיזוי מלאי מילים היא לחזות את כל מלון מילים של לומד מבוסס על דגימה מוגבלת של מילים בקשה. הנייר הזה מתקרב לבעיה מתחילה מהדוגמא של תיאוריית התגובה של 2 פרמטרים (IRT), נותנת לכל מילה בפרטור המילים פרמטר קשה ומדיסקרציה. הפרמטר ההבדל מוערך על הת-בעיה של בחירת פריט שאלות, מוכר בשדות הבדיקות המתאימות המחשובות (CAT) והלימוד פעיל. לאחר מכן, ההשפעה של הפרמטר ההבדל על ביצועי צפייה נבדקת, בין בסיס מסווג בינרי, ובסביבת השיג מידע. ההופעה משוואה עם קווי הבסיס בהתבסס על תדר המילים. מספר תרחישים של הגנרליזציה שונים נבדקים, כולל הקשה במילים הגנרליזציה והדיסקריזציה באמצעות קישור מילים עם רשת צפייה ובדיקות על נתונים מחוץ לקבוצת נתונים.'}
{'en': 'FrenLyS : A Tool for the Automatic Simplification of French General Language Texts', 'ar': 'FrenLyS: أداة للتبسيط التلقائي لنصوص اللغة الفرنسية العامة', 'fr': 'FrenLys\xa0: un outil de simplification automatique des textes en français en langue générale', 'pt': 'FrenLyS: uma ferramenta para a simplificação automática de textos de língua geral francesa', 'es': 'FrenLys: una herramienta para la simplificación automática de textos en lengua general francesa', 'ja': 'FrenLyS ：フランス語の一般言語テキストを自動的に簡素化するためのツール', 'zh': 'FrenLyS:自简法语语言文本', 'ru': 'FrenLyS: инструмент для автоматического упрощения текстов на французском языке', 'hi': 'FrenLyS: फ्रेंच सामान्य भाषा ग्रंथों के स्वचालित सरलीकरण के लिए एक उपकरण', 'ga': 'FrenLyS: Uirlis chun Téacsanna Fraincise Ginearálta a Shimpliú go hUathoibríoch', 'hu': 'FrenLyS: A francia általános nyelvi szövegek automatikus egyszerűsítésére szolgáló eszköz', 'ka': 'FrenLyS: ფრანუსის საერთო ენის ტექსტის ავტომატიკური გამოყენებელის ხელსაწყო', 'el': 'Ένα εργαλείο για την αυτόματη απλοποίηση των γαλλικών κειμένων γενικής γλώσσας', 'kk': 'FrenLyS: Француз жалпы тіл мәтіндерін автоматты түрде қарапайым құралы', 'it': 'FrenLyS: Uno strumento per la semplificazione automatica dei testi di lingua generale francese', 'lt': 'FrenLyS: Prancūzijos bendrųjų kalbų tekstų automatinio supaprastinimo įrankis', 'mk': 'FrenLyS: Алатка за автоматско поедноставување на француските генерални јазички тексти', 'ml': 'ഫ്രെന്\u200dലിസ്: ഫ്രെഞ്ച് ജനറല്\u200d ഭാഷ പദാവലികളുടെ സ്വയം എളുപ്പമുള്ള ഉപകരണം', 'ms': 'FrenLyS: Alat untuk Permudahan Automatik Teks Bahasa Umum Perancis', 'mt': 'FrenLyS: Għodda għas-Simplifikazzjoni Awtomatika tat-Testi Ġenerali tal-Lingwa Franċiża', 'no': 'FrenLyS: Eit verktøy for automatisk forenkling av fransk generaltekst', 'mn': 'FrenLyS: Французын ерөнхий хэл текстүүдийн автоматтын хялбарчлалын хэрэгсэл', 'pl': 'FrenLyS: Narzędzie do automatycznego uproszczenia tekstów językowych francuskich ogólnych', 'ro': 'FrenLyS: Un instrument pentru simplificarea automată a textelor lingvistice generale franceze', 'si': 'FrenLyS: ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස් සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව පාළුවන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය සාමාන්\u200dය සංවේදනයට උපකරණය', 'sr': 'FrenLyS: Alat za automatsko jednostavljenje francuskih generalnih jezičkih tekstova', 'so': 'FrenLyS: A Tool for the Automatic Simplification of French language Texts', 'sv': 'FrenLyS: Ett verktyg för automatisk förenkling av franska allmänna språktexter', 'ur': 'FrenLyS: فرانسوی ژنرال زبان ٹیکسٹ کی آٹوٹی سادھونی کے لئے ایک ابزار', 'ta': 'FrenLyS: ஒரு கருவி', 'uz': 'FrenLyS: Avtomatik Soddalashtirish uchun vosita', 'vi': '♪ French LyS: A Tool for the Automatic simplicition of French General language Texts ♪', 'bg': 'Инструмент за автоматично опростяване на общоезиковите текстове на френски език', 'da': 'FrenLyS: Et redskab til automatisk forenkling af franske generelle sprogtekster', 'hr': 'FrenLyS: Alat za automatsko jednostavljanje francuskih općih jezičkih tekstova', 'nl': 'FrenLyS: Een hulpmiddel voor de automatische vereenvoudiging van Franse algemene taalteksten', 'fa': 'FrenLyS: یک ابزار برای ساده\u200cسازی خودکار متن زبان ژنرال فرانسوی', 'de': 'FrenLyS: Ein Werkzeug zur automatischen Vereinfachung französischer allgemeiner Sprachtexte', 'id': 'FrenLyS: Alat untuk Simplifikasi Otomatis Teks Bahasa Umum Perancis', 'ko': '프랑스어: 프랑스어 통용 언어 텍스트 자동 간소화 도구', 'af': "FrenLys: ' n ProgramName", 'sw': 'FrenLyS: Kifaa cha Uwezeshaji Ufaransa', 'sq': 'FrenLyS: Një mjet për thjeshtimin automatik të teksteve të përgjithshme të gjuhës franceze', 'tr': 'FrenLyS: Fransuz dili Umumy Metinlerin Awtomatik Besitlendirmek üçin bir Alet', 'am': 'A tool for the Automatic Simplification of French General language Texts', 'hy': 'FreNlyS: A Tool for the Automatic Upstrapping of FrenglyS General TextsComment', 'az': '䙲敮䱹区⁆牡湳쒱稠䑩汩⁍즙瑮泉饲楮楮⁁癴潭慴楫⁙慰쒱얟浡珄넠쎼쎧쎼渠䅶瑯浡瑩欠욏污燉養', 'bn': 'ফ্রেনলাইস: ফরাসী সাধারণ ভাষার টেক্সটের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সাধারণ করার একটি টুল', 'ca': 'FrenLyS: Una eina per la simplificació automàtica dels textos de llenguatge general francès', 'bs': 'FrenLyS: Alat za automatsko jednostavljenje francuskih generalnih jezičkih tekstova', 'cs': 'FrenLyS: Nástroj pro automatické zjednodušení francouzských textů obecného jazyka', 'et': 'FrenLyS: vahend prantsuse keeltekstide automaatseks lihtsustamiseks', 'fi': 'FrenLyS: työkalu ranskankielisten yleisten tekstien automaattiseen yksinkertaistamiseen', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'French General Language Text', 'he': 'FrenLyS: A Tool for the Automatic Simplification of French General Language Texts', 'sk': 'FrenLyS: Orodje za samodejno poenostavitev francoskih splošnih jezikovnih besedil', 'bo': 'FrenLyS:སྐད་རིགས་ཡིག་གི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡི་གེ་ཡིག་ཆའི་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་ལག་ཆ།'}
{'en': 'Lexical simplification (LS) aims at replacing words considered complex in a sentence by simpler equivalents. In this paper, we present the first automatic LS service for French, FrenLys, which offers different techniques to generate, select and rank substitutes. The paper describes the different methods proposed by our tool, which includes both classical approaches (e.g. generation of candidates from lexical resources, frequency filter, etc.) and more innovative approaches such as the exploitation of CamemBERT, a model for French based on the RoBERTa architecture. To evaluate the different methods, a new evaluation dataset for French is introduced.', 'ar': 'يهدف التبسيط المعجمي (LS) إلى استبدال الكلمات التي تعتبر معقدة في الجملة بمعادلات أبسط. في هذا البحث ، نقدم أول خدمة LS أوتوماتيكية للفرنسية ، FrenLys ، والتي تقدم تقنيات مختلفة لتوليد البدائل واختيارها وترتيبها. تصف الورقة الطرق المختلفة التي تقترحها أداتنا ، والتي تتضمن كلاً من الأساليب الكلاسيكية (مثل توليد المرشحين من المصادر المعجمية ، ومرشح التردد ، وما إلى ذلك) والأساليب الأكثر ابتكارًا مثل استغلال CamemBERT ، وهو نموذج للفرنسية يعتمد على RoBERTa هندسة معمارية. لتقييم الطرق المختلفة ، تم تقديم مجموعة بيانات تقييم جديدة للغة الفرنسية.', 'fr': "La simplification lexicale (LS) vise à remplacer les mots considérés comme complexes dans une phrase par des équivalents plus simples. Dans cet article, nous présentons le premier service LS automatique pour le français, FrenLys, qui propose différentes techniques pour générer, sélectionner et classer des substituts. L'article décrit les différentes méthodes proposées par notre outil, qui inclut à la fois des approches classiques (par exemple génération de candidats à partir de ressources lexicales, filtre de fréquence, etc.) et des approches plus innovantes telles que l'exploitation de Camembert, un modèle pour le français basé sur l'architecture Roberta. Pour évaluer les différentes méthodes, un nouveau jeu de données d'évaluation pour le français est introduit.", 'es': 'La simplificación léxica (LS) tiene como objetivo reemplazar las palabras consideradas complejas en una oración por equivalentes más simples. En este artículo, presentamos el primer servicio automático de LS para francés, FrenLYS, que ofrece diferentes técnicas para generar, seleccionar y clasificar sustitutos. El artículo describe los diferentes métodos propuestos por nuestra herramienta, que incluye tanto enfoques clásicos (por ejemplo, generación de candidatos a partir de recursos léxicos, filtro de frecuencia, etc.) como enfoques más innovadores, como la explotación de CamEMbert, un modelo para el francés basado en la arquitectura RoBerta. Para evaluar los diferentes métodos, se introduce un nuevo conjunto de datos de evaluación para el francés.', 'pt': 'A simplificação lexical (LS) visa substituir palavras consideradas complexas em uma frase por equivalentes mais simples. Neste artigo, apresentamos o primeiro serviço LS automático para francês, FrenLys, que oferece diferentes técnicas para gerar, selecionar e classificar substitutos. O artigo descreve os diferentes métodos propostos por nossa ferramenta, que inclui tanto abordagens clássicas (por exemplo, geração de candidatos a partir de recursos lexicais, filtro de frequência, etc.) arquitetura. Para avaliar os diferentes métodos, é introduzido um novo conjunto de dados de avaliação para o francês.', 'ja': '単語の単純化（ LS ）は、文の中で複雑と考えられる単語をより単純な同値語に置き換えることを目的としている。本稿では、代替品を生成、選択、ランク付けするためのさまざまなテクニックを提供する、フランスのFrenLys向けの最初の自動LSサービスを紹介します。本論文では、古典的なアプローチ（例えば、語彙リソース、周波数フィルタなどからの候補の生成）と、RoBERTaアーキテクチャに基づくフランス語のためのモデルであるCamemBERTの活用などのより革新的なアプローチの両方を含む、当社のツールによって提案された異なる方法について説明します。さまざまな方法を評価するために、フランス語の新しい評価データセットを導入しました。', 'zh': '词法简化(LS)旨以更简等价物易句以为杂单词。 本文引法语首自LSFrenLys,资异术以成之,择列名替代品。 本文述臣等异术,包括经术(如词汇资源,频率滤波器等生成候选之法)与更具创新性之法,如CamemBERT之开,CamemBERT基于RoBERTa架构之法语。 为评估不同之法,引入一新法语评数集。', 'ru': 'Лексическое упрощение (LS) направлено на замену слов, считающихся сложными в предложении, более простыми эквивалентами. В этой статье мы представляем первый автоматический сервис LS для французского языка, FrenLys, который предлагает различные методы для генерации, выбора и ранжирования заменителей. В работе описываются различные методы, предложенные нашим инструментом, который включает как классические подходы (например, генерация кандидатов из лексических ресурсов, фильтр частоты и т.д.), так и более инновационные подходы, такие как использование CamemBERT, модели для французского языка, основанной на архитектуре RoBERTa. Для оценки различных методов вводится новый набор оценочных данных для французского языка.', 'hi': 'लेक्सिकल सरलीकरण (एलएस) का उद्देश्य एक वाक्य में जटिल माने जाने वाले शब्दों को सरल समकक्षों द्वारा प्रतिस्थापित करना है। इस पेपर में, हम फ्रेंच, FrenLys के लिए पहली स्वचालित LS सेवा प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो विकल्प उत्पन्न करने, चयन करने और रैंक करने के लिए विभिन्न तकनीकें प्रदान करता है। पेपर हमारे उपकरण द्वारा प्रस्तावित विभिन्न तरीकों का वर्णन करता है, जिसमें शास्त्रीय दृष्टिकोण (जैसे लेक्सिकल संसाधनों, आवृत्ति फिल्टर, आदि से उम्मीदवारों की पीढ़ी) और अधिक अभिनव दृष्टिकोण जैसे कि कैमबर्ट का शोषण, रोबर्टा आर्किटेक्चर के आधार पर फ्रांसीसी के लिए एक मॉडल शामिल है। विभिन्न तरीकों का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए, फ्रेंच के लिए एक नया मूल्यांकन डेटासेट पेश किया गया है।', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag simpliú foclóireachta (LS) focail choibhéiseacha níos simplí a chur in ionad focail a mheastar a bheith casta in abairt. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair an chéad seirbhís uathoibríoch LS don Fhraincis, FrenLys, a thairgeann teicnící éagsúla chun ionadaigh a ghiniúint, a roghnú agus a rangú. Déanann an páipéar cur síos ar na modhanna éagsúla atá molta ag ár n-uirlis, lena n-áirítear cur chuige clasaiceach (m.sh. iarrthóirí a ghiniúint as acmhainní foclóireachta, scagaire minicíochta, etc.) agus cineálacha cur chuige níos nuálaí ar nós saothrú CamemBERT, samhail don Fhraincis atá bunaithe ar an RoBERTa. ailtireacht. Chun na modhanna éagsúla a mheas, tugtar isteach tacar sonraí meastóireachta nua don Fhraincis.', 'el': 'Η Λεξική απλοποίηση (LS) αποσκοπεί στην αντικατάσταση λέξεων που θεωρούνται σύνθετες σε μια πρόταση από απλούστερα ισοδύναμα. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε την πρώτη αυτόματη υπηρεσία για τα γαλλικά, η οποία προσφέρει διαφορετικές τεχνικές για την παραγωγή, επιλογή και ταξινόμηση υποκατάστατων. Η εργασία περιγράφει τις διαφορετικές μεθόδους που προτείνονται από το εργαλείο μας, το οποίο περιλαμβάνει τόσο κλασικές προσεγγίσεις (π.χ. δημιουργία υποψηφίων από λεξικούς πόρους, φίλτρο συχνότητας κ.λπ.) όσο και πιο καινοτόμες προσεγγίσεις όπως η αξιοποίηση του μοντέλου για τα γαλλικά βασισμένου στην αρχιτεκτονική του Ρόμπερτα. Για την αξιολόγηση των διαφόρων μεθόδων, εισάγεται ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων αξιολόγησης για τα γαλλικά.', 'hu': 'A lexikai egyszerűsítés (LS) célja, hogy egy mondatban összetettnek tartott szavakat egyszerűbb megfelelőkkel helyettesítse. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az első francia automatikus LS szolgáltatást, a FrenLys-t, amely különböző technikákat kínál a helyettesítők létrehozására, kiválasztására és rangsorolására. A tanulmány bemutatja az eszközünk által javasolt különböző módszereket, amelyek magukban foglalják mind a klasszikus megközelítéseket (például a jelöltek lexikai erőforrásokból történő generálása, frekvenciaszűrő stb.), mind az innovatív megközelítéseket, mint például a CamemBERT kiaknázása, amely a francia modell RoBERTa architektúrán alapul. A különböző módszerek értékelésére új értékelési adatkészlet kerül bevezetésre francia nyelvre.', 'it': "La semplificazione lessicale (LS) mira a sostituire parole considerate complesse in una frase con equivalenti più semplici. In questo articolo presentiamo il primo servizio automatico LS per francese, FrenLys, che offre diverse tecniche per generare, selezionare e classificare sostituti. L'articolo descrive i diversi metodi proposti dal nostro strumento, che include sia approcci classici (es. generazione di candidati da risorse lessicali, filtro di frequenza, ecc.) che approcci più innovativi come lo sfruttamento di CamemBERT, un modello per il francese basato sull'architettura RoBERTa. Per valutare i diversi metodi, viene introdotto un nuovo set di dati di valutazione per il francese.", 'ka': 'Lexical simplification (LS) მინიშნავს შეცვლა სიტყვები, რომელიც კომპლექტურია სიტყვებით უფრო განსაკუთრებული განსაკუთრებით. ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ პირველი ავტომატური LS სერვისი ფრანუსის, FrenLys-ს, რომელიც განსხვავებული ტექნექციების შექმნა, მონიშნეთ და დამცემულების შესაძლებელება. ჩვენი ხელსაწყოთან განსხვავებული მეტოვები აღწერს, რომელიც ჩვენი ხელსაწყოთან გამოყენებულია, რომელიც ორივე კლასიკალური დახმარებას (მაგალითად, ლექსიკალური რესურსისგან კანდიდენტების წარმოდგენა, ფერიკური ფილტრისგან, და. შ განსხვავებული მეტოვებისთვის განსაზღვრებისთვის ახალი განსაზღვრებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია ფრანგულისთვის იყენება.', 'kk': 'Лексикалық қарапайым (LS) сөздерді қарапайым еквиваленттермен ауыстыруға мақсат береді. Бұл қағазда бірінші француз, FrenLys- ге автоматты LS қызметін келтіреміз. Бұл басқа техникаларды құру, таңдау және алмастыру үшін әртүрлі жолдарды ұсынады. Қағаз біздің құралымыздың түрлі әдістерін таңдайды. Бұл классикалық әдістері екеуі де (мысалы, лексикалық ресурстар, жиілік сүзгілерден кандидаттарды құру, және т. б.) және CamemBERT қолдану үшін, RoBERTa архитектурасына негізделген фран Басқа әдістерді оқу үшін, французша жаңа оқу деректер жиыны келтіріледі.', 'lt': 'Leksinio supaprastinimo (LS) tikslas – žodžius, kurie laikomi sudėtingais sakinyje, pakeisti paprastesniais ekvivalentais. Šiame dokumente pristatome pirmąją automatinę LS paslaugą Prancūzijai FrenLys, kuri siūlo skirtingus būdus kurti, pasirinkti ir rankuoti pakaitalus. The paper describes the different methods proposed by our tool, which includes both classical approaches (e.g. generation of candidates from lexical resources, frequency filter, etc.) and more innovative approaches such as the exploitation of CamemBERT, a model for French based on the RoBERTa architecture.  Siekiant įvertinti skirtingus metodus, įdiegiamas naujas prancūzų vertinimo duomenų rinkinys.', 'mk': 'Лексикалното поедноставување (LS) има за цел да ги замени зборовите кои се сметаат за комплексни во реченица со поедноставни еквиваленти. Во овој весник, ја претставуваме првата автоматска LS сервис за францускиот, FrenLys, која нуди различни техники за генерирање, избор и рангирање на заменици. The paper describes the different methods proposed by our tool, which includes both classical approaches (e.g. generation of candidates from lexical resources, frequency filter, etc.) and more innovative approaches such as the exploitation of CamemBERT, a model for French based on the RoBERTa architecture.  За да се проценат различните методи, се воведува нов набор податоци за проценка за француски.', 'ms': 'Permudahan leksikal (LS) bermaksud menggantikan perkataan yang dianggap kompleks dalam kalimat dengan ekvivalen yang lebih mudah. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan perkhidmatan LS automatik pertama untuk Perancis, FrenLys, yang menawarkan teknik berbeza untuk menghasilkan, memilih dan menambah pengganti. Kertas ini menggambarkan kaedah berbeza yang diusulkan oleh alat kami, yang termasuk kedua-dua pendekatan klasik (cth. generasi calon dari sumber leksikal, penapis frekuensi, dll.) dan pendekatan yang lebih inovatif seperti pengeksploitasi CamemBERT, model untuk Perancis berdasarkan arkitektur RoBERTa. Untuk menilai kaedah yang berbeza, set data penilaian baru untuk Perancis diperkenalkan.', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d എളുപ്പമുള്ള (LS) വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാറ്റുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നത് എളുപ്പമുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d വാക്കി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഫ്രെഞ്ച് ലിസ്സിന്റെ ആദ്യത്തെ സേവനം നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് വ്യത്യസ്ത സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നത്,  ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഉപകരണത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d രണ്ടും ക്ലാസിക്കല്\u200d മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന്നു (ഉദാഹരണമായ ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നി വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികളെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d, ഫ്രെഞ്ചിനുള്ള ഒരു പുതിയ വിലാസപ്രകാരം ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് പരി', 'mt': 'Is-simplifikazzjoni lexika (LS) għandha l-għan li tissostitwixxi l-kliem ikkunsidrat kumpless f’sentenza b’ekwivalenti aktar sempliċi. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw l-ewwel servizz awtomatiku ta’ LS għall-Franċiż, FrenLys, li joffri tekniki differenti biex jiġġeneraw, jagħżlu u jikklassifikaw sostituti. Id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-metodi differenti proposti mill-g ħodda tagħna, li jinkludu kemm approċċi klassiċi (pereżempju ġenerazzjoni ta’ kandidati minn riżorsi lexiċi, filtru ta’ frekwenza, e ċċ.) kif ukoll approċċi aktar innovattivi bħall-isfruttament ta’ CamemBERT, mudell għall-Franċiż ibbażat fuq l-arkitettura RoBERTa. Biex jiġu evalwati l-metodi differenti, jiġi introdott sett ġdid ta’ dejta ta’ evalwazzjoni għall-Franċiż.', 'no': 'Leksiske forenklingar (LS) mål å byta ut ord som er synleg i eit setning med enklare ekvivalent. I denne papiret presenterer vi den første automatiske LS- tenesta for fransk, FrenLys, som tilbyr ulike teknikk for å laga, velja og ranka byttenar. Papiret beskriver dei ulike metodane som er foreslått av verktøyet vårt, som inneheld både klassiske tilnærmingar (f.eks. generasjon av kandidatar frå leksiske ressursar, frekvensfilter osv.) og meir inovative tilnærmingar som ekspluatasjonen av CamemBERT, eit model for fransk basert på RoBERTa-arkitekturen. For å evaluera dei ulike metodane, introduserer ein ny evalueringsdataset for fransk.', 'pl': 'Leksykalne uproszczenie (LS) ma na celu zastąpienie słów uznanych za złożone w zdaniu prostszymi odpowiednikami. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy pierwszą automatyczną usługę LS dla francuskiego, FrenLys, która oferuje różne techniki generowania, selekcji i rankingu substytutów. W artykule opisano różne metody proponowane przez nasze narzędzie, które obejmuje zarówno klasyczne podejścia (np. generowanie kandydatów z zasobów leksykalnych, filtr częstotliwości itp.) jak i bardziej innowacyjne podejścia, takie jak wykorzystanie CamemBERT, modelu dla francuskiego opartego na architekturze RoBERTa. Aby ocenić różne metody, wprowadzono nowy zestaw danych oceniających dla języka francuskiego.', 'mn': 'Лексик хялбарчлал (LS) нь илүү хялбар тэнцүү гэсэн үгийг илүү комплекс гэж үздэг үгийг орлуулах зорилго юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Француз, Француз болон Француз-ын анхны автоматикийн LS үйлчилгээ үзүүлнэ. Энэ нь өөр техникуудыг бүтээх, сонгох, оролцох шаардлагатай. Энэ цаасан нь бидний хэрэгсэл дээр санал дэвшүүлсэн өөр арга загварыг тайлбарладаг. Энэ нь хоёуланг сонгодог арга загвар (жишээлбэл, хэмжээст сүзэгч, т.д.) болон Роберта барилгуудын үндсэн Французын загвар, CamemBERT ашиглах шинэ шинэ арга загвар юм. Өөр төрлийн аргыг үнэлэхэд Французын шинэ үнэлэх өгөгдлийн санг танилцуулна.', 'ro': 'Simplificarea lexicală (LS) vizează înlocuirea cuvintelor considerate complexe într-o propoziție cu echivalente mai simple. În această lucrare, prezentăm primul serviciu automat LS pentru franceză, FrenLys, care oferă diferite tehnici de generare, selectare și rangare a substituților. Lucrarea descrie diferitele metode propuse de instrumentul nostru, care include atât abordări clasice (de exemplu generarea de candidați din resurse lexicale, filtru de frecvență, etc.) cât și abordări mai inovatoare, cum ar fi exploatarea CamemBERT, un model pentru franceză bazat pe arhitectura RoBERTa. Pentru a evalua diferitele metode, este introdus un nou set de date de evaluare pentru limba franceză.', 'sr': 'Leksička pojednostavljanja (LS) je cilj zamjene reči koje se smatraju složenim u rečenici jednostavnijim ekvivalentima. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prvu automatsku LS uslugu za francuski, FrenLys, koja nudi različite tehnike za stvaranje, izabrati i činiti zamjene. U novinama opisuju različite metode koje je predložio naš alat, uključujući i klasične pristupe (npr. generacija kandidata iz leksičkih resursa, filtra frekvencije itd.) i inovativnije pristupe poput ekspluatacije CamemBERT-a, model francuskog na osnovu arhitekture RoBERTa. Da bi procenili različite metode, predstavlja se novi set podataka za procjenu za francuski.', 'si': 'ලෙක්සිකිසිකල් සම්පූර්ණය (LS) අදහස් කරනවා වාක්ෂයෙන් සංවිධාන වචනයක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරන්න. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරථම ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය LS සේවාව ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස්, FrenLys වෙනුවෙන් වෙනස් තාක්ෂණික විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dතිකාර The papers are chararified the Diffuse Metodoles that are advised by our toolbox, that comprises both classifial approach (e.g. the genealogy of candy-readers from lexicals source, frefrefrequence search, etc.) and more new approach, as the exploitation of CamemBERT, a Model for French based on the RoBERTa art. වෙනස් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස් වලට අළුත් පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත සූද්ධානයක් තියෙනව', 'so': 'Isfududeynta Leksikal (LS) wuxuu ku jeedaa beddelinta hadalka lagu tirinayo mid adag oo kaliya. Warqadan, waxaynu keenaynaa adeegga ugu horeeyay ee maamulka LS ee Faraansiis, FrenLys, kaasoo bixiya qalabka kala duduwan in la sameeyo, doorto oo la doorto isbedelyo. The paper describes the different methods proposed by our tool, which includes both classical approaches (e.g. generation of candidates from lexical resources, frequency filter, etc.) and more innovative approaches such as the exploitation of CamemBERT, a model for French based on the RoBERTa architecture.  Si loo qiimeeyo qaababka kala duduwan, waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa macluumaad cusub oo ku qoran barashada Finnishka.', 'sv': 'Lexisk förenkling (LS) syftar till att ersätta ord som anses komplexa i en mening med enklare motsvarigheter. I denna uppsats presenterar vi den första automatiska LS-tjänsten för franska, FrenLys, som erbjuder olika tekniker för att generera, välja och rangordna substitut. Uppsatsen beskriver de olika metoder som föreslås av vårt verktyg, som inkluderar både klassiska tillvägagångssätt (t.ex. generering av kandidater från lexikala resurser, frekvensfilter, etc.) och mer innovativa tillvägagångssätt som utnyttjandet av CamemBERT, en modell för franska baserad på RoBERTa-arkitekturen. För att utvärdera de olika metoderna införs en ny utvärderingsdata för franska.', 'ta': 'லெக்சிகிய எளிதாக்கல் (LS) சுலபமான வாக்கியத்தில் சிக்கலாக கருதப்படும் வார்த்தைகளை மாற்ற வேண்டும். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பிரெஞ்சு, பிரென்னிஸ் மற்றும் நிலை மாற்றங்களை உருவாக்க, தேர்வு செய்ய மற்றும் நிலை மாற்றங்களை உர எங்கள் கருவியால் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட வேறு முறைகளை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, அது இரு வகுப்பான முறைகளையும் (உ. ம். லெக்சிக்சியல் வளங்களிலிருந்து விருப்பங்களின் தலைமுறைகள், frequency filter etc.) மற்றும் ம வேறு முறைகளை மதிப்பிட வேண்டுமானால், பிரெஞ்சுக்கான புதிய மதிப்பின் தகவல் அமைப்பு introduced.', 'ur': 'لکسیکل سادگی (LS) کا ارادہ ہے کہ کلمات کو ایک کلمات میں پیچیدہ سمجھنے کے ذریعہ آسانی برابر سے بدل دیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلے فرانسوی، فرانسوی، فرنیلس کے لئے آٹوٹ اسے سفارش کریں گے، جو مختلف ٹیکنیک پیش کرتا ہے کہ پیدا کریں، انتخاب کریں اور رقم بدل سکیں۔ یہ کاغذ مختلف طریقوں کو ہماری تولید کے ذریعے پیشنهاد کیا گیا ہے، جو دونوں کلاسیک طریقوں میں شامل ہوتے ہیں (جیسے لکسیکل سراسر، فرکانسی فیلٹر، اگلے) اور زیادہ نوآوری طریقوں میں بھی، جیسے CamemBERT کا استعمال کیا گیا ہے، روBERTa معماری پر بنیاد فرنسی کے لئے ایک مدل ہے۔ مختلف طریقے کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے، فرنسیس کے لئے ایک نئی ارزش ڈیٹ سٹ معلوم کیا جاتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda Fransuz FrenLys uchun birinchi avtomatik LS xizmatlarini koʻrsatimiz. Bu qogʻozda boshqa tugmalar yaratish, tanlash va darajada o'zgarishlarni yaratish uchun boshqa teknologiya beradi. Qogʻoz bizning asboblamizdagi boshqa usullarni anglatadi, bu ikkita klassik usullar (m. g. leksik Resources, frekven filteridan foydalanuvchilar yaratiladi) va ko'proq innovative usullar, KamemBERT tashkilotni ishlatish mumkin, RoBERTA architektasi asosida Fransuzcha modeli. Har xil usullarni qiymatlash uchun Fransuz uchun yangi qiymatni tanlang.", 'vi': 'Sự đơn giản ngôn ngữ (LS) nhằm thay thế từ được xem là phức tạp trong một câu bằng ngôn ngữ đơn giản hơn. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu dịch vụ LS tự động cho Pháp, French Lys, cung cấp các kỹ thuật khác nhau để tạo, chọn và xếp hạng thay thế. Tờ giấy mô tả các phương pháp khác nhau đề xuất bởi công cụ của chúng ta, g ồm cả các phương pháp cổ điển (v.d. tạo ra ứng viên từ các nguồn tài nguyên văn học, bộ lọc tần số, v. và các phương pháp khác nhau hơn, như là khai thác Camami, một mô hình của Pháp dựa trên kiến trúc RoBERTa. Để đánh giá các phương pháp khác nhau, sẽ có một tập tin đánh giá mới cho Pháp.', 'bg': 'Лексикалното опростяване има за цел да замени думите, считани за сложни в изречение, с по-прости еквиваленти. В тази статия представяме първата автоматична услуга за френски език, която предлага различни техники за генериране, избор и класиране на заместители. Статията описва различните методи, предложени от нашия инструмент, който включва както класически подходи (например генериране на кандидати от лексикални ресурси, честотен филтър и др.), така и по-иновативни подходи като експлоатацията на модел за френски език, базиран на архитектурата РоBERTa. За оценка на различните методи се въвежда нов набор от данни за оценка на френски език.', 'nl': 'Lexical simplification (LS) is bedoeld om woorden die als complex worden beschouwd in een zin te vervangen door eenvoudigere equivalenten. In dit artikel presenteren we de eerste automatische LS service voor Frans, FrenLys, die verschillende technieken biedt om substituten te genereren, selecteren en rangschikken. Het artikel beschrijft de verschillende methoden die door onze tool worden voorgesteld, die zowel klassieke benaderingen omvatten (bijv. generatie van kandidaten uit lexicale bronnen, frequentiefilter, enz.) als meer innovatieve benaderingen zoals de exploitatie van CamemBERT, een model voor Frans gebaseerd op de RoBERTa architectuur. Om de verschillende methoden te evalueren, wordt een nieuwe evaluatiedataset voor Frans geïntroduceerd.', 'hr': 'Leksička pojednostavljanja (LS) je cilj zamjene riječi koje se smatraju složenim u rečenici jednostavnijim ekvivalentima. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prvu automatsku LS uslugu za francuski, FrenLys, koja nudi različite tehnike za stvaranje, izabrati i činiti zamjene. U novinama opisuju različite metode predložene našim alatom, uključujući i klasične pristupe (npr. generacija kandidata iz leksičkih resursa, filtra frekvencije itd.) i inovativnije pristupe poput ekspluatacije CamemBERT-a, model francuske na temelju arhitekture RoBERTa. Za procjenu različitih metoda, uvede se novi set podataka za procjenu za francuski.', 'da': 'Lexical forenkling (LS) har til formål at erstatte ord, der anses for komplekse i en sætning, med enklere ækvivalenter. I denne artikel præsenterer vi den første automatiske LS service til fransk, FrenLys, som tilbyder forskellige teknikker til at generere, udvælge og rangere erstatninger. Artiklen beskriver de forskellige metoder, der foreslås af vores værktøj, som omfatter både klassiske tilgange (f.eks. generering af kandidater fra leksikalske ressourcer, frekvensfilter osv.) og mere innovative tilgange såsom udnyttelse af CamemBERT, en model for fransk baseret på RoBERTa arkitektur. For at evaluere de forskellige metoder indføres et nyt evalueringsdatasæt for fransk.', 'ko': '어휘 간화(LS)는 문장에서 복잡하다고 여겨지는 단어를 더 간단한 대등어로 바꾸기 위한 것이다.본고에서 우리는 프랑스 최초의 자동 LS 서비스인 FrenLys를 소개했는데 이것은 서로 다른 기술을 제공하여 대체품을 생성하고 선택하며 배열한다.본고는 우리의 도구가 제시한 다양한 방법을 묘사하는데 고전적인 방법(예를 들어 어휘자원에서 후보어, 주파수 필터 등)과 더욱 혁신적인 방법을 포함한다. 예를 들어 CamemBERT를 이용하여 RoBERTA 구조를 바탕으로 하는 프랑스어 모델이다.다른 방법을 평가하기 위해 새로운 프랑스어 평가 데이터 집합을 도입했다.', 'fa': 'ساده\u200cسازی درمانی (LS) هدف دارد جایگزینش کلمات پیچیده در یک جمله با برابر ساده\u200cترین جمله\u200cها را به جایگزینش دهد. در این کاغذ، اولین خدمت LS اتوماتیک برای فرانسوی، FrenLys را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که تکنیک\u200cهای مختلف برای تولید، انتخاب و جایگزینی\u200cها را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد. این کاغذ روش\u200cهای مختلف را توسط ابزار ما توصیف می\u200cکند که هر دو دسترسی کلاسیک را شامل می\u200cکند (مثلا نسل کاندیده\u200cها از منابع زبانی، فرکانس و غیر از آن) و روش\u200cهای نوآوری بیشتری مثل استفاده از CamemBERT، مدل فرانسوی بر اساس معماری RoBERTa است. برای ارزیابی روش\u200cهای مختلف، یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای ارزیابی جدید برای فرانسوی معرفی می\u200cشود.', 'de': 'Lexische Vereinfachung (LS) zielt darauf ab, Wörter, die in einem Satz als komplex angesehen werden, durch einfachere Äquivalente zu ersetzen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir den ersten automatischen LS-Service für Französisch vor, FrenLys, der verschiedene Techniken zur Generierung, Auswahl und Rangierung von Ersatzstoffen anbietet. Der Beitrag beschreibt die verschiedenen von unserem Tool vorgeschlagenen Methoden, die sowohl klassische Ansätze (z.B. Generierung von Kandidaten aus lexikalischen Ressourcen, Frequenzfilter usw.) als auch innovativere Ansätze wie die Nutzung von CamemBERT, einem Modell für Französisch basierend auf der RoBERTa-Architektur, umfassen. Zur Evaluierung der verschiedenen Methoden wird ein neuer Evaluationsdatensatz für Französisch eingeführt.', 'sw': 'Ufumbuzi wa Lexico (LS) unakusudia kubadilisha maneno yanayochukuliwa kuwa tatizo katika hukumu hiyo na usawa rahisi. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka huduma ya kwanza ya LS kwa ajili ya Ufaransa, FrenLys, ambayo inatoa mbinu tofauti za kutengeneza, kuchagua na kubadilisha vyeo vya rangi. Gazeti hilo linaelezea njia tofauti zilizopendekezwa na vifaa vyetu, ambavyo ni pamoja na mbinu mbili za klassika (kwa mfano, kizazi cha wagombea kutoka rasilimali za lexico, filteri za frekveni, etc.) na mbinu za ubunifu zaidi kama vile matumizi ya CamemBERT, mfano wa Ufaransa unaofanywa na majengo ya RoBERTa. Ili kutathmini njia tofauti, taarifa mpya ya uchunguzi kwa Kifaransa imeanzishwa.', 'id': 'Simplifikasi Lexik (LS) bermaksud menggantikan kata yang dianggap kompleks dalam kalimat dengan ekvivalen sederhana. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan layanan LS otomatis pertama untuk Perancis, FrenLys, yang menawarkan teknik yang berbeda untuk menghasilkan, memilih dan rank pengganti. Kertas menggambarkan metode yang berbeda yang diusulkan oleh alat kami, yang termasuk kedua pendekatan klasik (misalnya generasi kandidat dari sumber daya leksik, filter frekuensi, dll.) dan pendekatan yang lebih inovatif seperti eksploitasi CamemBERT, model untuk Perancis berdasarkan arsitektur RoBERTa. Untuk mengevaluasi metode yang berbeda, sebuah set data evaluasi baru untuk Perancis diperkenalkan.', 'af': "Leksiese eenvoudiging (LS) doel om woorde as kompleks in 'n seting te vervang deur eenvoudiger gelykvalente. In hierdie papier, laat ons die eerste automatiese LS diens voorsien vir Frans, FrenLys, wat verskillende teknike aanbied om te genereer, kies en rank vervangers te genereer. Die papier beskryf die verskillende metodes wat deur ons hulpmiddel voorgestel is, wat beide klassieke toegange inkluit (bv. generasie van kandidate van leksiese hulpbronne, frekwensiefilter, ensfh.) en meer inovatiewe toegange soos die ekspluatasie van CamemBERT, 'n model vir Frans gebaseer op die RoBERTa-arkitektuur. Om die verskillende metodes te evalueer, word 'n nuwe evalueringsdatastel vir Frans ingestel.", 'tr': 'Leksik basitleştirmek (LS) sözleriň ýene bir sözleriň ýene-de yslel edilen sözleriň üýtgetmegini amaçlarýar. Bu kagyzda biz fransuz, FrenLys üçin ilkinji awtomatik LS häsiýetini görkeýäris. Bu faýllar üçin beýleki teknikleri döretmek, saýlamak we ýerleşdirmek üçin saýlayar. Kagyzyň biziň esbaplarymyzyň üýtgedilen dürli metodlaryny tassyýar edýär, hem bu ýerde hem klasik golaýlary bar (meselâ, leksik çe şmelerden, frekanslar filterinden soňra) we RoBERTa arhitektaryna daýanýan fransuzça nusgasy ýaly. Farklı yönlerden çykmak üçin Fransuz üçin täze çykyş veri setirini girdirýär.', 'am': 'ሌክሲካዊ ቀላልነት (LS) ቃላትን በመለወጥ አቅራቢያ በተስማማማው ውጤት የተደረገው ትክክለኛ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የፊርንሳይኛ፣ ፍሪንሊስ፣ ለፍሪንሳይ፣ ለፍሪንሳይ የተለየ የLS አገልግሎት አቀረብን፡፡ የፕሬዝዳንት ልዩ ልዩ ልማድ በዕቃችን የተዘጋጀውን እና በሮብERTA መሠረት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የክላሲካዊ ደረጃዎች (ምሳሌ ከሌክሲካዊ ሀብት፣ የfrequency filter፣ እና የካምምቢERT አካባቢ እና የበለጠ አፍሪካዊ ምሳሌ፣ የፖርስቲካ መሠረት የተመሳሳይ የፍሪስታን ምሳሌ እና ለፍሪስጥና ልዩ ልዩ ዓይነት ለማስተዋል፣ ለፈረንሳይኛ አዲስ ማስታወቂያ ዳታ ተግዷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Լեքսիկական պարզաբանությունը (LS) նպատակն է փոխարինել բառերը, որոնք համարվում են բարդ նախադասության մեջ, պարզ հավասարումներով: In this paper, we present the first automatic LS service for French, FrenLys, which offers different techniques to generate, select and rank substitutes.  Այս թղթի մեթոդները ներկայացնում են մեր գործիքի կողմից առաջարկված տարբեր մեթոդները, որոնք ներառում են երկու դասական մոտեցումներ (օրինակ լեքսիկական ռեսուրսներից ստացված թեկնածուների սերունդը, հաճախականության ֆիլտրը, և այլն) և ավելի նորարար մոտեցումներ, ինչպիսիք են, օրինակ, CA Տարբեր մեթոդներ գնահատելու համար ներկայացվում է ֆրանսերենի նոր գնահատման տվյալների համակարգ:', 'sq': 'Simplifikimi lexik (LS) synon të zëvendësojë fjalët e konsideruara komplekse në një fjalim me ekvivalente më të thjeshta. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim shërbimin e parë automatik LS për francezët FrenLys, i cili ofron teknika të ndryshme për të gjeneruar, zgjedhur dhe renditur zëvendësues. Gazeta përshkruan metodat e ndryshme të propozuara nga mjeti ynë, që përfshin si qasjet klasike (për shembull gjeneratën e kandidatëve nga burimet lexike, filtrin e frekuencave, etj.) dhe qasjet më inovative të tilla si shfrytëzimi i CamemBERT, një model për francezët bazuar në arkitekturën RoBERTa. Për të vlerësuar metodat e ndryshme, futet një grup i ri i të dhënash për vlerësimin francez.', 'bs': 'Leksička pojednostavljanja (LS) je cilj zamjene riječi koje se smatraju složenim u rečenici jednostavnijim ekvivalentima. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prvu automatsku LS uslugu za francuski, FrenLys, koja nudi različite tehnike za stvaranje, izabrati i činiti zamjene. U novinama opisuju različite metode koje je predložio naš alat, uključujući i klasične pristupe (npr. generacija kandidata iz leksičkih resursa, filtra frekvencije itd.) i inovativnije pristupe poput ekspluatacije CamemBERT-a, model francuske na temelju arhitekture RoBERTa. Za procjenu različitih metoda, predstavlja se novi set podataka za procjenu za francuski.', 'ca': "La simplificació lèxica (LS) mira a substituir les paraules considerades complexes en una frase per equivalents més simples. En aquest article, presentem el primer servei automàtic LS per al francès, FrenLys, que ofereix diferents tècniques per generar, seleccionar i classificar substituïts. The paper describes the different methods proposed by our tool, which includes both classical approaches (e.g. generation of candidates from lexical resources, frequency filter, etc.) and more innovative approaches such as the exploitation of CamemBERT, a model for French based on the RoBERTa architecture.  Per avaluar els diferents mètodes, es introdueix un nou conjunt de dades d'avaluació del francès.", 'bn': 'লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল সুস্পষ্ট (এলএস) এর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে শব্দ প্রতিস্থাপনের জন্য সহজেই একটি বাক্যে জটিল বিবেচনা করা হয়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ফ্রেঞ্চ, ফ্রেনলাইসের জন্য প্রথম স্বয়ংক্রিয় এলএস সেবা উপস্থাপন করি, যা বিভিন্ন প্রযুক্তি তৈরি, নির্বাচন এব এই পত্রিকা আমাদের টুলের প্রস্তাবিত বিভিন্ন পদ্ধতিগুলোকে বর্ণনা করে, যার মধ্যে ক্লাসিক্যাল উপায় আছে (যেমন লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল সম্পদ, ফ্রেঞ্চ ফিল্টার থেকে প্রার্থীদের প্রজন্ম) এবং আরো  বিভিন্ন পদ্ধতি মূল্যায়নের জন্য ফরাসীদের জন্য একটি নতুন মূল্যায়নের ডাটাসেট পরিচালিত করা হয়েছে।', 'cs': 'Lexické zjednodušení (LS) má za cíl nahradit slova považovaná za složitá ve větě jednoduššími ekvivalenty. V tomto článku představujeme první automatickou LS službu pro francouzštinu, FrenLys, která nabízí různé techniky generování, výběru a hodnocení náhražek. Příspěvek popisuje různé metody navržené naším nástrojem, které zahrnují jak klasické přístupy (např. generování kandidátů z lexikálních zdrojů, frekvenční filtr apod.) tak inovativnější přístupy, jako je využití modelu CamemBERT pro francouzštinu založeného na architektuře RoBERTa. Pro vyhodnocení různých metod je představen nový hodnotící datový soubor pro francouzštinu.', 'et': 'Lexikaalse lihtsustamise eesmärk on asendada lauses keeruliseks peetavad sõnad lihtsamate samaväärsustega. Käesolevas töös tutvustame esimest automaatset LS teenust prantsuse keele FrenLys, mis pakub erinevaid tehnikaid asendajate genereerimiseks, valimiseks ja järjestamiseks. Töös kirjeldatakse erinevaid meetodeid, mida pakub meie tööriist, mis hõlmab nii klassikalisi lähenemisviise (nt kandidaatide genereerimine leksikaalsetest ressurssidest, sagedusfilter jne) kui ka uuenduslikumaid lähenemisviise, nagu CamemBERT, prantsuse keele mudel, mis põhineb RoBERTa arhitektuuril. Erinevate meetodite hindamiseks võetakse kasutusele uus prantsuse keele hindamisandmekogum.', 'az': 'Leksik basitləşdirmə (LS) məqsədilə, cümlədə daha basit ekvivalentlər ilə kompleks hesab edilən sözləri əvəz etmək istəyir. Bu kağızda Fransız, FrenLys üçün ilk avtomatik LS hizmətini göstəririk. Bu, fərqli teknikləri yaratmaq, seçim və dərəcə yerinə gətirmək üçün təklif edir. Kağıt bizim aracımızın təklif edilmiş müxtəlif metodlarını təsbiq edir, bu ikisini də klasik təklif metodlarını təsbiq edir (məsələn, leksik kaynaqların, frekvenci filtrlərin, etc.) və RoBERTa arhitektarına dayanan Fransız üçün modeli olan CamemBERT istifadəsi kimi daha yenilik metodlarını təsbiq edir. Farklı metodları değerləşdirmək üçün Fransızca üçün yeni değerləşdirmə verilən qurğu təyin edilir.', 'fi': 'Lexical Simplification (LS) pyrkii korvaamaan lauseessa monimutkaisina pidetyt sanat yksinkertaisemmilla vastaavilla sanoilla. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme ensimmäisen automaattisen LS-palvelun ranskalle, FrenLys, joka tarjoaa erilaisia tekniikoita luoda, valita ja sijoittaa korvaajia. Työssä kuvataan työkalumme ehdottamia erilaisia menetelmiä, jotka sisältävät sekä klassisia lähestymistapoja (esim. ehdokkaiden generointi leksikaalisista resursseista, taajuussuodatin jne.) että innovatiivisempia lähestymistapoja, kuten CamemBERT-mallin hyödyntäminen ranskaksi RoBERTa-arkkitehtuuriin pohjautuvassa mallissa. Eri menetelmien arvioimiseksi otetaan käyttöön uusi ranskankielinen arviointiaineisto.', 'jv': '1.2 Nang peurén iki, kita sembarang kelas nang auto-SL kanggo Perancis, FranLis, sing nyimpen teknik sing ngewehi nang nggawe, milih lan basa rangkane Perintah sing rambarang nggawe sistem sing dibutungan ning alat awak dhéwé, sing nyebutaké kabèh dolanan sing sampeyan karo perusahaan kelas (isih. Kemerdekaan karo perusahaan kelas, tapi karo perangkat sing nggalakno, dadi kapan karo perangkat sing apik lan karo akeh nyong lanjut karo ngono akeh nyong nggawe kaya cameBERT, model kanggo Kemerdekaan ng Language', 'he': 'הפשטות הלקסית (LS) מכוונת להחליף מילים שנחשבו מורכבות במשפט על ידי שווים פשוטים יותר. In this paper, we present the first automatic LS service for French, FrenLys, which offers different techniques to generate, select and rank substitutes.  העיתון מתאר את השיטות השוניות שהצעו על ידי הכל שלנו, אשר כולל שני גישות קלאסיות (לדוגמה של מועמדים משאבים לקסיים, מסנן תדירות, וכו.) וגישות חדשות יותר כמו ניצול של CamemBERT, מודל לצרפתית מבוסס על ארכיטקטורה RoBERTa. כדי להעריך את השיטות השוניות, תוכנן קבוצת מידע הערכה חדשה לצרפתית.', 'sk': 'Namen leksične poenostavitve (LS) je nadomestiti besede, ki veljajo za kompleksne v stavku, s preprostejšimi enakovrednimi besedami. V tem prispevku predstavljamo prvo avtomatsko storitev LS za francoščino, FrenLys, ki ponuja različne tehnike za generiranje, izbiro in uvrstitev nadomestkov. V prispevku so opisane različne metode, ki jih predlaga naše orodje, ki vključuje tako klasične pristope (npr. generacija kandidatov iz leksikalnih virov, frekvenčni filter itd.) kot tudi bolj inovativne pristope, kot je izkoriščanje CamemBERT, modela za francoščino, ki temelji na RoBERTa arhitekturi. Za vrednotenje različnih metod je uveden nov nabor podatkov o vrednotenju za francoščino.', 'ha': '@ item license (short name) Ga wannan takardan, Munã nuna aikin LS na farkon farat ɗaya wa Faransa, Frenlys, wanda ke gajiya masu motsi masu buƙata, zaɓi kuma da daraja. Kanarin na bayyana wasu hanyõyi masu buƙata da aikin mu, wanda ke amfani da shi, yana da shiryoyin misãlai masu classical (misali, zaɓen kando daga resource na leksisi, filteri da maras, etc.) da wasu masu inno da misãlai da amfani da CamemBERT, wani misali na faransa a kan rubutun RoBERta. To, don ka ƙayyade wasu hanyõyin daban, an introduce wani zance-bayani na ƙidãya wa Faransa.', 'bo': 'གཟུགས་ཐག་ཆུང་སྤྲོད་དག་པ(LS)ནི་ཚིག་ཚིག་ཚབ་བཅུག་ནི་ཚིག་ཚིག་འདི་ཚིག་གྲངས་སུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་ཡིན་པ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་སྒེར་གྱི་ཞབས་ཞུ་ཆས་དང་པོ་སྟོན་པ་རེད། FrenLys(FrenLys)ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འཛུགས The paper describes the different methods proposed by our tool, which includes both classical approaches (e.g. generation of candidates from lexical resources, frequency filter, etc.) and more innovative approaches such as the exploitation of CamemBERT, a model for French based on the RoBERTa architecture. འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ལམ་ལུགས་མ་འདྲ་བ་རྩིས་བརྟན་པར་ཕྱིར་ཡིག་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) for Evaluating Sentiment Transfer by Machine Translation Systems', 'ar': 'مقياس إدراك المشاعر (SAM) لتقييم نقل المشاعر بواسطة أنظمة الترجمة الآلية', 'pt': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) para avaliar a transferência de sentimentos por sistemas de tradução automática', 'fr': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) pour évaluer le transfert de sentiment par les systèmes de traduction automatique', 'es': 'Medida sensible a la opinión (SAM) para evaluar la transferencia de sentimientos mediante sistemas de traducción automática', 'ja': '機械翻訳システムによるセンチメント転送を評価するためのセンチメント意識測定（ SAM ）', 'zh': '以评估机器翻译统情感知度量 (SAM)', 'ru': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) для оценки переноса настроений системами машинного перевода', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद प्रणालियों द्वारा भावना हस्तांतरण का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए भावना-जागरूक उपाय (एसएएम)', 'ga': 'Beart Feasach ar Mheinteachán (SAM) chun Meastóireacht a dhéanamh ar Aistriú Meonchain trí Chórais Aistriúcháin Meaisín', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μέτρο για την αξιολόγηση της μεταφοράς συναισθημάτων από συστήματα μηχανικής μετάφρασης', 'hu': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) a gépi fordító rendszerekkel történő értékeléséhez', 'it': 'Misura sensibile (SAM) per la valutazione del trasferimento di sentimenti tramite sistemi di traduzione automatica', 'lt': 'Sentimento informavimo priemonė (SAM), skirta vertinti jutimo perdavimą mašinų vertimo sistemomis', 'kk': 'Машин аудару жүйелерінің Sentiment Transfer бағалау үшін Sentiment- Aware Measure (SAM)', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് മാറ്റം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് അറിയുന്', 'mn': 'Машин хөгжүүлэх системийн Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM)', 'mk': 'Мерка на свесност за чувства (SAM) за евалуирање на пренесување на чувства од машински транслативни системи', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) do oceny transferu sentymentów przez systemy tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ms': 'Ukuran Sentiment-Aware (SAM) untuk menilai Pemindahan Sentiment oleh Sistem Terjemahan Mesin', 'ro': 'Măsură sensibilă (SAM) pentru evaluarea transferului sentimentelor prin sisteme de traducere automată', 'mt': 'Miżura ta’ Sentiment Aware (SAM) għall-Evalwazzjoni tat-Trasferiment tas-Sentiment minn Sistemi ta’ Traduzzjoni tal-Magni', 'so': 'Miisaanka Sentiment-aware (SAM)', 'sv': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) f철r utv채rdering av Sentiment Transfer med maskin철vers채ttningssystem', 'ta': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) for Evaluating Sentiment Transfer by Machine Translation Systems', 'ur': 'Name', 'sr': 'Мера за оценање преноса чудовића за превод машина превода (SAM)', 'si': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Công cụ đánh giá cảm xúc truyền qua máy in', 'bg': 'Мярка за осъзнаване на чувствата (САМ) за оценка на трансфера на чувства чрез системи за машинен превод', 'nl': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) voor het evalueren van sentimentoverdracht door machinevertaalsystemen', 'hr': 'Mjera za procjenu prijenosa osjetljivog razmatranja (SAM) za procjenu prijenosa osjetljivog razmatranja sustava za prevod mašine', 'da': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) til evaluering af følelsesoverførsel via maskinoversættelsessystemer', 'de': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) zur Bewertung von Sentiment Transfer durch maschinelle Übersetzungssysteme', 'fa': 'اندازه\u200cهای آگاهی مجموعه\u200cکننده (SAM) برای ارزیابی انتقال مجموعه\u200cکننده توسط سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه ماشین', 'tr': 'Maşynyň terjime sistemleri tarapyndan Sentiment Transferini Taýýarlamak üçin Sentiment-Wagtlaýyn Hatlary (SAM)', 'ko': '감정 감지 측정(SAM)은 기계 번역 시스템의 감정 전달을 평가하는 데 쓰인다.', 'sq': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) for Evaluating Sentiment Transfer by Machine Translation Systems', 'id': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) for Evaluating Sentiment Transfer by Machine Translation Systems', 'am': 'የመስኮት ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Makinat T톛rc칲m톛 Sisteml톛ri il톛 Sentiment Transferini Qeyd etm톛k 칲칞칲n Sentiment-Aware 칐l칞칲si (SAM)', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেম মুক্ত করার জন্য সেন্টাইমেন্ট- উজ্জ্ঞ মাপ (SAM)', 'bs': 'Mjera za procjenu prijenosa sentimenta sistemima za prevod mašine', 'sw': 'Measua ya Sentiment-aware (SAM) kwa ajili ya Kuthibitisha Usafiri wa Seneti na Mfumo wa Tafsiri wa Mashine', 'ca': 'Misura de consciència del sentiment (SAM) per a evaluar la transferència del sentiment per sistemes de traducció màquina', 'et': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) hindamiseks Sentiment Transfer Machine Translation Systems', 'cs': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) pro hodnocení přenosu sentimentů strojovými překladatelskými systémy', 'fi': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) for Evaluation Sentiment Transfer by Machine Translation Systems', 'af': 'Comment', 'hy': 'Comment', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Merilo za ocenjevanje prenosa čustev s pomočjo sistemov strojnega prevajanja', 'jv': 'Sentiment', 'bo': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) for Evaluating Sentiment Transfer by Machine Translation Systems', 'he': 'Sentiment-Aware Measure (SAM) for Evaluating Sentiment Transfer by Machine Translation Systems'}
{'en': 'In translating text where sentiment is the main message, human translators give particular attention to sentiment-carrying words. The reason is that an incorrect translation of such words would miss the fundamental aspect of the source text, i.e. the author’s sentiment. In the online world, MT systems are extensively used to translate User-Generated Content (UGC) such as reviews, tweets, and social media posts, where the main message is often the author’s positive or negative attitude towards the topic of the text. It is important in such scenarios to accurately measure how far an MT system can be a reliable real-life utility in transferring the correct affect message. This paper tackles an under-recognized problem in the field of machine translation evaluation which is judging to what extent automatic metrics concur with the gold standard of human evaluation for a correct translation of sentiment. We evaluate the efficacy of conventional quality metrics in spotting a mistranslation of sentiment, especially when it is the sole error in the MT output. We propose a numerical sentiment-closeness measure appropriate for assessing the accuracy of a translated affect message in UGC text by an MT system. We will show that incorporating this sentiment-aware measure can significantly enhance the correlation of some available quality metrics with the human judgement of an accurate translation of sentiment.', 'ar': 'عند ترجمة النص حيث تكون المشاعر هي الرسالة الرئيسية ، يولي المترجمون البشريون اهتمامًا خاصًا للكلمات التي تحمل المشاعر. والسبب هو أن الترجمة غير الصحيحة لمثل هذه الكلمات قد تفقد الجانب الأساسي من النص المصدر ، أي شعور المؤلف. في عالم الإنترنت ، تُستخدم أنظمة الترجمة الآلية على نطاق واسع لترجمة المحتوى الذي ينشئه المستخدم (UGC) مثل المراجعات والتغريدات ومنشورات الوسائط الاجتماعية ، حيث تكون الرسالة الرئيسية غالبًا موقف المؤلف الإيجابي أو السلبي تجاه موضوع النص. من المهم في مثل هذه السيناريوهات أن تقيس بدقة إلى أي مدى يمكن أن يكون نظام الترجمة الآلية أداة مساعدة موثوقة في الحياة الواقعية في نقل رسالة التأثير الصحيحة. تتناول هذه الورقة مشكلة غير معترف بها في مجال تقييم الترجمة الآلية والتي تحدد مدى توافق المقاييس التلقائية مع المعيار الذهبي للتقييم البشري من أجل الترجمة الصحيحة للمشاعر. نقوم بتقييم فعالية مقاييس الجودة التقليدية في اكتشاف خطأ ترجمة المشاعر ، خاصةً عندما يكون الخطأ الوحيد في إخراج الترجمة الآلية. نقترح مقياس "تقارب المشاعر" العددي المناسب لتقييم دقة الرسالة المؤثرة المترجمة في نص المحتوى الذي ينشئه المستخدمون بواسطة نظام الترجمة الآلية. سنبين أن دمج هذا الإجراء المدرك للمشاعر يمكن أن يعزز بشكل كبير الارتباط بين بعض مقاييس الجودة المتاحة والحكم البشري على ترجمة دقيقة للمشاعر.', 'es': 'Al traducir textos en los que el sentimiento es el mensaje principal, los traductores humanos prestan especial atención a las palabras que llevan el sentimiento. La razón es que una traducción incorrecta de tales palabras pasaría por alto el aspecto fundamental del texto original, es decir, el sentimiento del autor. En el mundo en línea, los sistemas de MT se utilizan ampliamente para traducir contenido generado por el usuario (UGC), como reseñas, tuits y publicaciones en redes sociales, donde el mensaje principal suele ser la actitud positiva o negativa del autor hacia el tema del texto. En tales escenarios, es importante medir con precisión hasta qué punto un sistema de MT puede ser una utilidad confiable en la vida real para transferir el mensaje de afecto correcto. Este artículo aborda un problema poco reconocido en el campo de la evaluación de la traducción automática, que es juzgar hasta qué punto las métricas automáticas coinciden con el estándar de oro de la evaluación humana para una traducción correcta del sentimiento. Evaluamos la eficacia de las métricas de calidad convencionales para detectar una mala traducción del sentimiento, especialmente cuando es el único error en la salida de MT. Proponemos una medida numérica de «cercanía sentimental» adecuada para evaluar la precisión de un mensaje afectivo traducido en un texto UGC por un sistema de MT. Demostraremos que la incorporación de esta medida sensible al sentimiento puede mejorar significativamente la correlación de algunas métricas de calidad disponibles con el juicio humano de una traducción precisa del sentimiento.', 'fr': "Lors de la traduction de textes où le sentiment est le message principal, les traducteurs humains accordent une attention particulière aux mots porteurs de sentiments. La raison en est qu'une traduction incorrecte de tels mots manquerait l'aspect fondamental du texte source, à savoir le sentiment de l'auteur. Dans le monde en ligne, les systèmes de traduction automatique sont largement utilisés pour traduire le contenu généré par l'utilisateur (CGU) tel que les avis, les tweets et les publications sur les réseaux sociaux, où le message principal est souvent l'attitude positive ou négative de l'auteur envers le sujet du texte. Dans de tels scénarios, il est important de mesurer avec précision dans quelle mesure un système de magnétoscopie peut être un outil fiable dans la vie réelle pour transférer le bon message d'effet. Cet article aborde un problème méconnu dans le domaine de l'évaluation de la traduction automatique, qui consiste à évaluer dans quelle mesure les métriques automatiques sont conformes à la norme d'excellence de l'évaluation humaine pour une traduction correcte des sentiments. Nous évaluons l'efficacité des mesures de qualité conventionnelles pour détecter une erreur de traduction du sentiment, en particulier lorsqu'il s'agit de la seule erreur dans la sortie MT. Nous proposons une mesure numérique de «\xa0proximité sentimentale\xa0» appropriée pour évaluer l'exactitude d'un message d'affect traduit dans un texte UGC par un système de TA. Nous montrerons que l'intégration de cette mesure sensible aux sentiments peut améliorer de manière significative la corrélation entre certaines mesures de qualité disponibles et le jugement humain d'une traduction précise du sentiment.", 'zh': '重译以情为主,人工翻译人员特以情为单词。 盖其误译失本,即作者之论也。 网络世界中,机器翻译统博用于译用户生成义(UGC),如论推文社交媒体帖,其大信常为文本消极态度。 若此者,准量机器翻译统于传输正消息可以为实用程序之重也。 本文解机器翻译估领一未充分认识,即决自指标于多大程度上与人物料金准同,以正译情。 评评旧法质量指标见情误译之有效性,特当机器翻译输唯一误时。 立情近度,机器翻译统评估UGC文本中译准确性。 吾将验之,合此情以见度量,可以见强质量指标与人伦准译之相关性。', 'hi': 'पाठ का अनुवाद करने में जहां भावना मुख्य संदेश है, मानव अनुवादक भावना-ले जाने वाले शब्दों पर विशेष ध्यान देते हैं। कारण यह है कि इस तरह के शब्दों का एक गलत अनुवाद स्रोत पाठ के मौलिक पहलू को याद करेगा, यानी लेखक की भावना। ऑनलाइन दुनिया में, एमटी सिस्टम का उपयोग बड़े पैमाने पर उपयोगकर्ता-जनित सामग्री (यूजीसी) जैसे समीक्षा, ट्वीट्स और सोशल मीडिया पोस्ट का अनुवाद करने के लिए किया जाता है, जहां मुख्य संदेश अक्सर पाठ के विषय के प्रति लेखक का सकारात्मक या नकारात्मक दृष्टिकोण होता है। ऐसे परिदृश्यों में यह सही ढंग से मापना महत्वपूर्ण है कि एमटी सिस्टम सही प्रभाव संदेश को स्थानांतरित करने में एक विश्वसनीय वास्तविक जीवन उपयोगिता कितनी दूर हो सकती है। यह पेपर मशीन अनुवाद मूल्यांकन के क्षेत्र में एक अंडर-मान्यता प्राप्त समस्या से निपटता है जो यह तय कर रहा है कि भावना के सही अनुवाद के लिए मानव मूल्यांकन के सोने के मानक के साथ स्वचालित मीट्रिक किस हद तक सहमत हैं। हम भावनाओं के गलत अनुवाद को खोजने में पारंपरिक गुणवत्ता मैट्रिक्स की प्रभावकारिता का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, खासकर जब यह एमटी आउटपुट में एकमात्र त्रुटि है। हम एक संख्यात्मक "भावना-निकटता" उपाय का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक एमटी सिस्टम द्वारा यूजीसी पाठ में एक अनुवादित प्रभाव संदेश की सटीकता का आकलन करने के लिए उपयुक्त है। हम दिखाएंगे कि इस भावना-जागरूक उपाय को शामिल करने से भावना के सटीक अनुवाद के मानव निर्णय के साथ कुछ उपलब्ध गुणवत्ता मैट्रिक्स के सहसंबंध को काफी बढ़ाया जा सकता है।', 'pt': 'Ao traduzir um texto em que o sentimento é a mensagem principal, os tradutores humanos dão atenção especial às palavras que carregam sentimentos. A razão é que uma tradução incorreta de tais palavras perderia o aspecto fundamental do texto de origem, ou seja, o sentimento do autor. No mundo online, os sistemas de TA são amplamente usados para traduzir conteúdo gerado pelo usuário (UGC), como resenhas, tweets e postagens de mídia social, onde a mensagem principal geralmente é a atitude positiva ou negativa do autor em relação ao tópico do texto. É importante em tais cenários medir com precisão até que ponto um sistema de MT pode ser um utilitário confiável na vida real na transferência da mensagem de efeito correta. Este artigo aborda um problema sub-reconhecido no campo da avaliação da tradução automática que é julgar até que ponto as métricas automáticas concordam com o padrão-ouro da avaliação humana para uma tradução correta do sentimento. Avaliamos a eficácia das métricas de qualidade convencionais em detectar um erro de tradução do sentimento, especialmente quando é o único erro na saída da MT. Propomos uma medida numérica de “proximidade de sentimento” apropriada para avaliar a precisão de uma mensagem de afeto traduzida em texto UGC por um sistema de TA. Mostraremos que incorporar essa medida sensível ao sentimento pode melhorar significativamente a correlação de algumas métricas de qualidade disponíveis com o julgamento humano de uma tradução precisa do sentimento.', 'ru': 'При переводе текста, где основным посланием является сентиментальность, человеческие переводчики уделяют особое внимание словам, несущим сентиментальность. Причина в том, что неправильный перевод таких слов пропустил бы фундаментальный аспект исходного текста, т.е. авторские настроения. В мире онлайн системы MT широко используются для перевода пользовательского контента (UGC), такого как обзоры, твиты и посты в социальных сетях, где главным посланием часто является положительное или отрицательное отношение автора к теме текста. В таких сценариях важно точно измерять, насколько система MT может быть надежной полезной программой в реальной жизни при передаче правильного сообщения о влиянии. В этой статье рассматривается недооцененная проблема в области оценки машинного перевода, которая заключается в оценке того, в какой степени автоматические метрики согласуются с золотым стандартом оценки человека для правильного перевода настроений. Мы оцениваем эффективность традиционных показателей качества при обнаружении неправильного перевода настроений, особенно когда это единственная ошибка в выходе MT. Мы предлагаем численную меру «закрытости настроений», подходящую для оценки точности переведенного сообщения о влиянии в тексте UGC системой MT. Мы покажем, что включение этой меры осознания сентиментальности может значительно повысить корреляцию некоторых доступных показателей качества с человеческим суждением о точном переводе сентиментальности.', 'ja': '感情が主なメッセージであるテキストの翻訳では、人間の翻訳者は感情を運ぶ言葉に特に注意を払います。 その理由は、このような単語の誤った翻訳は、ソーステキストの根本的な側面、すなわち著者の感情を見逃すことになるからである。 オンラインの世界では、MTシステムは、レビュー、ツイート、ソーシャルメディアの投稿などのユーザー生成コンテンツ（ UGC ）を翻訳するために広く使用されています。ここでの主なメッセージは、テキストのトピックに対する著者の肯定的または否定的な態度であることが多いです。 このようなシナリオでは、正しい影響メッセージを転送する際に、MTシステムが信頼できる実際のユーティリティである可能性を正確に測定することが重要です。 本稿では、感情の正しい翻訳のための人間評価の金本位制に自動指標がどの程度同調するかを判断する機械翻訳評価の分野における認識不足の問題に取り組む。 私たちは、特にそれがMT出力の唯一の誤りである場合に、感情の誤訳を検出する従来の品質測定基準の有効性を評価します。 MTシステムによるUGCテキストでの翻訳された影響メッセージの正確性を評価するために適切な数値的な「感情密度」測定を提案します。 このセンチメント認識尺度を取り入れることで、利用可能ないくつかの品質指標とセンチメントの正確な翻訳の人間の判断との相関性を大幅に高めることができることを示します。', 'ga': 'Agus téacs á aistriú nuair is é an meon an phríomhtheachtaireacht, tugann aistritheoirí daonna aird ar leith ar fhocail a iompraíonn meon. Is é an chúis atá leis ná go gcaillfeadh aistriúchán mícheart ar fhocail dá leithéid an ghné bhunúsach den bhuntéacs, i.e. meon an údair. Sa domhan ar líne, baintear úsáid fhorleathan as córais MT chun Ábhar a Ghintear le hÚsáideoirí (UGC) a aistriú, mar léirmheasanna, tweets, agus postálacha ar na meáin shóisialta, áit ar minic gurb é dearcadh dearfach nó diúltach an údair i leith ábhar an téacs an phríomhtheachtaireacht. Tá sé tábhachtach ina leithéid de chásanna a thomhas go beacht cé chomh fada agus is féidir le córas MT a bheith ina áirgiúlacht fhíorshaoil iontaofa chun an teachtaireacht cheart tionchair a aistriú. Téann an páipéar seo i ngleic le fadhb tearc-aitheanta i réimse na meastóireachta ar mheaisín-aistriúchán, rud a thugann breithiúnas ar a mhéid a thagann méadracht uathoibríoch le caighdeán óir na meastóireachta daonna le haghaidh aistriúchán ceart ar an meon. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar éifeachtúlacht na gnáthmhéadrachta cáilíochta chun mí-aistriúchán meon a fheiceáil, go háirithe nuair is í an t-aon earráid amháin san aschur MT. Molaimid beart uimhriúil “garacht meon” atá oiriúnach chun measúnú a dhéanamh ar chruinneas teachtaireacht tionchair aistrithe i dtéacs UGC ag córas MT. Taispeánfaimid gur féidir feabhas suntasach a chur ar an gcomhghaol idir roinnt méadracht cháilíochta atá ar fáil agus breithiúnas an duine ar aistriúchán cruinn ar mheon an duine trí bhíthin an beart seo atá feasach ar mheon.', 'hu': 'Az emberi fordítók különös figyelmet fordítanak az érzelmeket hordozó szavakra. Ennek oka az, hogy az ilyen szavak helytelen fordítása hiányzik a forrásszöveg alapvető aspektusa, azaz a szerző érzése. Az online világban az MT rendszereket széles körben használják a felhasználók által generált tartalmak (UGC) lefordítására, mint például értékelések, tweetek és közösségi média bejegyzések, ahol a fő üzenet gyakran a szerző pozitív vagy negatív hozzáállása a szöveg témájához. Az ilyen forgatókönyvekben fontos pontosan mérni, hogy egy MT rendszer milyen mértékben lehet megbízható valós segédprogram a megfelelő hatásüzenet továbbításában. Ez a tanulmány a gépi fordítás értékelésének területén egy alul felismert problémát foglalkozik, amely azt ítéli meg, hogy az automatikus mérőszámok milyen mértékben egyeznek meg az emberi értékelés aranyszínvonalával az érzelmek helyes fordítása érdekében. A hagyományos minőségi mutatók hatékonyságát értékeljük a hangulat hibás fordításának észlelésében, különösen akkor, ha ez az egyetlen hiba az MT kimenetben. Javasolunk egy olyan numerikus "érzelem-közelség" mérést, amely megfelelő egy fordított hatásüzenet pontosságának értékelésére MT rendszerrel. Megmutatjuk, hogy ennek az érzelemtudatos mérésnek a beépítése jelentősen javíthatja néhány rendelkezésre álló minőségi mutató korrelációját az érzelem pontos fordításának emberi megítélésével.', 'el': 'Στη μετάφραση κειμένου όπου το συναίσθημα είναι το κύριο μήνυμα, οι ανθρώπινοι μεταφραστές δίνουν ιδιαίτερη προσοχή στις λέξεις που μεταφέρουν συναισθήματα. Ο λόγος είναι ότι μια εσφαλμένη μετάφραση τέτοιων λέξεων θα χάσει τη θεμελιώδη πτυχή του αρχικού κειμένου, δηλαδή το συναίσθημα του συγγραφέα. Στον διαδικτυακό κόσμο, τα συστήματα ΜΤ χρησιμοποιούνται εκτενώς για τη μετάφραση περιεχομένου που δημιουργείται από χρήστες, όπως κριτικές, και δημοσιεύσεις στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, όπου το κύριο μήνυμα είναι συχνά η θετική ή αρνητική στάση του συγγραφέα απέναντι στο θέμα του κειμένου. Είναι σημαντικό σε τέτοια σενάρια να μετρηθεί με ακρίβεια πόσο μακριά ένα σύστημα ΜΤ μπορεί να είναι μια αξιόπιστη πραγματική χρησιμότητα στη μεταφορά του σωστού μηνύματος επίδρασης. Η παρούσα εργασία αντιμετωπίζει ένα υποαναγνωρισμένο πρόβλημα στον τομέα της αξιολόγησης της μηχανικής μετάφρασης, το οποίο κρίνει σε ποιο βαθμό οι αυτόματες μετρήσεις συμφωνούν με το χρυσό πρότυπο της ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης για μια σωστή μετάφραση του συναισθήματος. Αξιολογούμε την αποτελεσματικότητα των συμβατικών ποιοτικών μετρήσεων στον εντοπισμό μιας λανθασμένης μετάφρασης συναισθημάτων, ειδικά όταν πρόκειται για το μοναδικό σφάλμα στην παραγωγή ΜΤ. Προτείνουμε ένα αριθμητικό μέτρο "στενότητας συναισθημάτων" κατάλληλο για την αξιολόγηση της ακρίβειας ενός μεταφρασμένου μηνύματος επηρεασμού σε κείμενο από ένα σύστημα ΜΤ. Θα δείξουμε ότι η ενσωμάτωση αυτού του μέτρου ευαισθητοποίησης των συναισθημάτων μπορεί να ενισχύσει σημαντικά τη συσχέτιση ορισμένων διαθέσιμων ποιοτικών μετρήσεων με την ανθρώπινη κρίση μιας ακριβούς μετάφρασης του συναισθήματος.', 'ka': "ტექსტის შეტყობინებაში, სადაც სენტიმენტი არის მნიშვნელოვანი შეტყობინებაში, ადამიანის ტრანსტრალიტორები განსაკუთრებულია გონიშნობა სიტყვებზე. მიზეზია, რომ ასეთი სიტყვების შეცდომა შეცდომა შეცდომა იქნება ფუნდამეტური ტექსტის ფუნდამეტური ადექტი, მაგალითად ავტორის სენტიმენტი. მომხმარებელი მსოფლიოში, MT სისტემები ძალიან გამოყენებულია მომხმარებელი შესახებ (UGC), როგორც განახლება, tweets და სოციალური მედიაში, სადაც მნიშვნელოვანი შესახებ ძალიან იყო ავტორის პოტიფიკაციური ან nega ეს მნიშვნელოვანია ამ სინარიოში, რომლებიც MT სისტემა შეუძლია იყოს დარწმუნებელი რეალური ცხოვრება სუტილიტი, რომლებიც მარტივი შეტყობინებული შეტყობინება. ეს დოკუმენტი აკეთებს მანქანის გაგრძელების განსაზღვრების პრობლემა, რომელიც აკეთებს თუ რამდენი ავტომატიკური მეტრიკის განსაზღვრებით ადამიანის გავამუშავებული სტანდარტანეტის გადაწ ჩვენ კონტრაციონალური კალიტური მეტრიკის ეფექტიურობას გავამუშავებთ, სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ ჩვენ მრიცხველი 'sentiment-closeness' მოწყობინება, რომელიც საჭირო MT სისტემის გადაწყვეტილი შეტყობინებების წარმოდგენისთვის. ჩვენ დავიჩვენოთ, რომ ეს სენტიმენტის შესაძლებელია გავაკეთოთ რაღაც შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ, რაღაც შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ, რაღაც შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ, რაღაც შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ, კა", 'it': "Nella traduzione di testi in cui il sentimento è il messaggio principale, i traduttori umani prestano particolare attenzione alle parole portatrici di sentimento. Il motivo è che una traduzione errata di tali parole perderebbe l'aspetto fondamentale del testo sorgente, cioè il sentimento dell'autore. Nel mondo online, i sistemi MT sono ampiamente utilizzati per tradurre contenuti generati dagli utenti (UGC) come recensioni, tweet e post sui social media, dove il messaggio principale è spesso l'atteggiamento positivo o negativo dell'autore nei confronti dell'argomento del testo. In tali scenari è importante misurare con precisione fino a che punto un sistema MT può essere un'utilità reale affidabile nel trasferire il messaggio di impatto corretto. Questo articolo affronta un problema poco riconosciuto nel campo della valutazione della traduzione automatica che sta valutando in che misura le metriche automatiche coincidono con il gold standard della valutazione umana per una corretta traduzione del sentiment. Valutiamo l'efficacia delle metriche di qualità convenzionali nel rilevare una traduzione errata del sentiment, specialmente quando si tratta dell'unico errore nell'output MT. Proponiamo una misura numerica di 'sentiment-closeness' appropriata per valutare l'accuratezza di un messaggio di effetto tradotto nel testo UGC da un sistema MT. Mostreremo che incorporando questa misura sensitiva al sentiment può migliorare significativamente la correlazione di alcune metriche di qualità disponibili con il giudizio umano di una traduzione accurata del sentiment.", 'kk': "Мәтінді негізгі хатты аудару үшін адамдар аударушылары сезімді сөздерге тәжірибе береді. Бұл сөздердің негізгі мәтіннің негізгі бөлігін, мысалы, автордың сезімі дұрыс аудару. Интернеттегі әлемдегі MT жүйелері, мәтіннің мазмұнына аудару үшін Пайдаланушының жасалған мазмұнын (UGC) аудару үшін қолданылады. Мынау сценарияларда MT жүйесі дұрыс мәліметті аудару үшін қанша уақытта сенімді шын өмір утилитасы болуы мүмкін. Бұл қағаз компьютердің аудармасының оқу өрісінде қанша автоматты метрикалық мәселелерді адамның оқу стандартты дұрыс аудармасының алтын стандартасына сәйкес келеді. Біз кәдімгі сапаттың метрикалық эффектілігін оқу үшін сезімдерді қате аудару үшін, осымен қатар MT шығысында жалғыз қате болғанда. Біз MT жүйесі арқылы UGC мәтіндегі аударылған хабарламаның дұрыстығын оқу үшін қолданылатын сандардық 'сезімдік-жақын' өлшемін ұсынамыз. Біз осы сезімді түсінікті өлшемін қосу мүмкіндігін көбірек сапатты метрикалық көмегімен адамдардың дұрыс түсінікті аударуға болады дегенді көрсетейміз.", 'mk': "Во преведувањето на текстот каде што чувството е главната порака, човечките преведувачи даваат посебно внимание на зборовите кои носат чувства. The reason is that an incorrect translation of such words would miss the fundamental aspect of the source text, i.e. the author's sentiment.  Во онлајн светот, MT системите се широко користат за преведување на корисникот генерирана содржина (UGC) како рецензии, твитови и социјални медиумски постови, каде што главната порака честопати е позитивниот или негативен став на авторот кон темата на текстот. Во ваквите сценарија е важно прецизно да се процени колку далеку МТ систем може да биде доверлива реална корисност за пренесување на вистинската порака. Овој документ се справува со недостаточно признаен проблем во областа на проценката на машинскиот превод кој суди во каков степен автоматската метрика се совпаѓа со златниот стандард на човечката проценка за правилен превод на чувствата. Ја проценуваме ефикасноста на конвенционалните квалитетни метрики во забележувањето на погрешен превед на чувството, особено кога е единствената грешка во излезот на МТ. Предложуваме бројна мерка на „близина на чувствата“ соодветна за проценка на точноста на преведена порака влијае на текстот на UGC од страна на MT систем. Ќе покажеме дека вклучувањето на оваа мерка на свесност за чувствата може значително да ја зголеми корелацијата на некои достапни квалитетни метрики со човечката пресуда за преведување на чувствата.", 'lt': 'Vertant tekstą, kuriame jausmas yra pagrindinė žinia, žmogaus vertėjai ypatingą dėmesį skiria jausmus nešantiems žodžiams. Dėl šios priežasties klaidingas tokių žodži ų vertimas praleistų esminį pradinio teksto aspektą, t. y. autoriaus nuomonę. Online pasaulyje MT sistemos plačiai naudojamos vertimui naudotojų sukauptam turiniui (UGC), pavyzdžiui, peržiūroms, tweetams ir socialinės žiniasklaidos postams, kai pagrindinė žinia dažnai yra teigiamas arba neigiamas autoriaus požiūris į teksto temą. Tokiais scenarijais svarbu tiksliai įvertinti, kiek MT sistema gali būti patikima realiojo gyvenimo paslauga perduodant teisingą poveikio pranešimą. Šis dokumentas sprendžia nepakankamai pripažintą problem ą mašin ų vertimo vertinimo srityje, kurioje nustatoma, kiek automatinės metrijos atitinka žmogaus vertinimo aukso standartą, kad būtų galima teisingai išversti jausmą. Vertiname įprastų kokybės metrijų veiksmingumą nustatant klaidingą jausmų vertimą, ypač kai tai yra vienintelė MT išėjimo klaida. Siūlome skaitmeninę "jausmų artimumo" priemonę, tinkamą vertimo poveikio pranešimo UGC tekste tikslumui įvertinti MT sistemoje. Mes parodysime, kad įtraukiant šią jausmą suprantančią priemonę gali gerokai pagerinti kai kurių turimų kokybės metrijų koreliaciją su žmogaus nuomone, kad jausmas yra tikslus vertimas.', 'ms': "Dalam menerjemahkan teks di mana perasaan adalah mesej utama, penerjemah manusia memberikan perhatian tertentu kepada perkataan yang membawa perasaan. Alasan adalah bahawa terjemahan salah kata-kata seperti itu akan melewatkan aspek asas teks sumber, iaitu perasaan penulis. In the online world, MT systems are extensively used to translate User-Generated Content (UGC) such as reviews, tweets, and social media posts, where the main message is often the author's positive or negative attitude towards the topic of the text.  Ia penting dalam skenario seperti ini untuk mengukur dengan tepat seberapa jauh sistem MT boleh menjadi utiliti nyata yang boleh dipercayai dalam memindahkan mesej pengaruh yang betul. Kertas ini mengatasi masalah yang tidak dikenali dalam medan penilaian terjemahan mesin yang menilai seberapa besar metrik automatik sepadan dengan piawai emas penilaian manusia untuk terjemahan sentimen yang betul. Kami menilai kegunaan metrik kualiti konvensional dalam melihat salah terjemahan perasaan, terutama apabila ia adalah satu-satunya ralat dalam output MT. Kami cadangkan ukuran 'sentiment-closeness' nombor yang sesuai untuk menilai ketepatan mesej pengaruh terjemahan dalam teks UGC oleh sistem MT. Kita akan tunjukkan bahawa memasukkan ukuran sentimen-sedar ini boleh meningkatkan dengan signifikan korelasi beberapa metrik kualiti yang tersedia dengan penilaian manusia terjemahan yang tepat sentimen.", 'mt': "Fit-traduzzjoni tat-test fejn is-sentiment huwa l-messaġġ ewlieni, it-tradutturi umani jagħtu attenzjoni partikolari lill-kliem li jġorru s-sentimenti. The reason is that an incorrect translation of such words would miss the fundamental aspect of the source text, i.e. the author's sentiment.  Fid-dinja onlajn, is-sistemi MT jintużaw b’mod estensiv għat-traduzzjoni tal-Kontenut Ġenerat mill-Utenti (UGC) bħal reviżjonijiet, tweets, u postijiet tal-midja soċjali, fejn il-messaġġ ewlieni spiss huwa l-attitudni pożittiva jew negattiva tal-awtur lejn is-suġġett tat-test. F’xenarji bħal dawn huwa importanti li titkejjel b’mod preċiż kemm sistema MT tista’ tkun utilità affidabbli fil-ħajja reali fit-trasferiment tal-messaġġ korrett tal-effett. This paper tackles an under-recognized problem in the field of machine translation evaluation which is judging to what extent automatic metrics concur with the gold standard of human evaluation for a correct translation of sentiment.  Aħna jevalwaw l-effikaċja ta’ metriċi konvenzjonali ta’ kwalità fl-osservazzjoni ta’ traduzzjoni ħa żin a tas-sentiment, speċjalment meta jkun l-uniku żball fil-produzzjoni MT. Aħna nipproponu miżura numerika ta' 'qrib is-sensazzjonijiet' xierqa għall-valutazzjoni tal-preċiżjoni ta' messaġġ ta' effett tradott fit-test tal-UGC minn sistema MT. Se nuru li l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ din il-miżura ta’ sensazzjoni konxja tista’ ttejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-korrelazzjoni ta’ xi metriċi ta’ kwalità disponibbli mal-ġudizzju uman ta’ traduzzjoni preċiża tas-sensazzjoni.", 'ml': "In translating text where sentiment is the main message, human translators give particular attention to sentiment-carrying words.  ഇത്തരം വാക്കുകളുടെ ഒരു തെറ്റായ പരിഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d സോര്\u200dസ് ടെക്സ്റ്റിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d മിസ്സ് ചെയ്യുമെന്ന് കാരണ ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ലോകത്തില്\u200d, എംടി സിസ്റ്റം ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സൃഷ്ടികള്\u200dക്ക് വിശാലമായി പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്ന ഉള്ളടക്കം (യുജിസി) പോലെയാണ് ഉപയോക് ഒരു എംടി സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d എത്ര വിശ്വസ്തനായ ജീവിതത്തിലെ ഉപയോഗമായിരിക്കും എന്നു് കൃത്യമായി അളന്നുകൊടുക്കുക എന്നതു് ഇത്തരം സ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ പ്രദേശത്തില്\u200d ഒരു തിരിച്ചറിയപ്പെട്ട പ്രശ്നമുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. വിചാരത്തിന്റെ ശരിയായ പരിഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ സ ഒരു തെറ്റായ പരിഭാഷണം കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതില്\u200d സാധാരണ മെട്രിക്കുകളുടെ പ്രഭാവം നമ്മള്\u200d വിലയിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് എംടി പുട് എംടി സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയ സന്ദേശത്തിന്റെ വിശദീകരണം പരിഗണിക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മുടെ അക്കണക്കില്\u200d 'sentiment-  നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് ഈ വികാരത്തിന്റെ അളവില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് മനുഷ്യന്റെ നിര്\u200dണ്ണയത്തിന്റെ വിധിയുമായി കൂടുതല", 'mn': "Хүн төрөлхтний хөгжүүлэгчид мэдрэмж хамгийн чухал санааг орлуулахад мэдрэмжтэй үгсийг тодорхой анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Яагаад гэвэл ийм үгийг буруу орчуулах нь эх үүсвэрийн текстийн үндсэн асуудлыг алдахгүй байх, яг зохиолчдын мэдрэмж. Интернет ертөнцөд, MT системүүд хэрэглэгчийн нэмэгдсэн Content (UGC) шинжилгээ, tweets, нийгмийн мэдээллийн захиралтуудыг орлуулахын тулд их ашиглагддаг. МТ-ийн систем ямар урт байх вэ гэдгийг тодорхой хэмжээгээр хэмжих нь маш чухал юм. Энэ цаас машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын шалгалтын хэмжээний автоматически метрик хүний үнэлгээний алтын стандарт зөв сэтгэл хөрөнгө оруулахын тулд ямар хэмжээтэй холбоотой вэ? Бид уламжлалтай чанарын метрикийн үр дүнг мэдрэмжийн буруу орчуулалтыг ойлгохын тулд, ялангуяа MT гаргалтын ганц алдаа байхад үнэлдэг. Бид UGC-н текст дээр MT системээр орчуулсан санааны зөв байдлыг тодорхойлдохын тулд тооны 'мэдрэмжтэй-ойрхон' хэмжээг санал болгож байна. Бид энэ мэдрэмжтэй хэмжээг нэгтгэх нь хүн төрөлхтний мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй хэмжээний харилцааны холбоотой байдлыг хүн төрөлхтний хувьд зөв мэдрэмжтэй хэлбэрээр нэмэгдүүлж чадна.", 'pl': 'W tłumaczeniu tekstu, w którym głównym przesłaniem jest sentyment, ludzie tłumacze zwracają szczególną uwagę na słowa noszące sentyment. Powodem jest to, że nieprawidłowe tłumaczenie takich słów pominęłoby fundamentalny aspekt tekstu źródłowego, czyli sentyment autora. W świecie online systemy MT są szeroko wykorzystywane do tłumaczenia treści generowanych przez użytkownika (User Generated Content, UGC), takich jak recenzje, tweety i posty w mediach społecznościowych, gdzie głównym przekazem jest często pozytywne lub negatywne nastawienie autora do tematu tekstu. W takich scenariuszach ważne jest, aby dokładnie zmierzyć, w jakim stopniu system MT może być niezawodnym rzeczywistym narzędziem w przesyłaniu prawidłowego komunikatu dotyczącego efektu. Niniejszy artykuł porusza niedoceniany problem w dziedzinie oceny tłumaczeń maszynowych, który ocenia, w jakim stopniu automatyczne wskaźniki zgadzają się ze złotym standardem oceny ludzkiej dla poprawnego tłumaczenia sentymentów. Oceniamy skuteczność konwencjonalnych wskaźników jakości w wykrywaniu błędnego tłumaczenia sentymentu, zwłaszcza gdy jest to jedyny błąd w wyniku MT. Proponujemy liczbową miarę bliskości sentymentów odpowiednią do oceny dokładności przetłumaczonego komunikatu efektowego w tekście UGC przez system MT. Pokażemy, że włączenie tej miary świadomej sentymentu może znacząco zwiększyć korelację niektórych dostępnych wskaźników jakości z ludzką oceną dokładnego tłumaczenia sentymentu.', 'no': 'I omsetjing av tekst der sentiment er hovudmeldinga, gjer menneske omsetjarar spesielt oppmerksomhet til følelsesamning. Grunnen er at ein feil oversettelse av slike ord manglar den grunnleggjande aspekten av kjeldeteksten, dvs. forfattarens sentiment. I nettverden vert MT-systemet utvida for å oversette innhaldet (UGC) som gjennomsikt, twett og sosiale mediepost, der hovudmeldinga ofte er positivt eller negativt motstanden til utviklaren mot emnet på teksten. Det er viktig i slike scenarioar å måle nøyaktig kor langt ein MT-system kan vera eit tiltrukkeleg verktøy for verkeleg liv i å overføra den rette påvirkingsmeldinga. Denne papiret løyser eit undergjenkjent problem i feltet for evaluering av maskineomsetjingar som sprøyter kor mykje automatisk metrikn samsvarar med gullstartet for menneskelig evaluering for korrekt omsetjing av sentiment. Vi evaluerer effektiviteten av konvensjonelle kvalitetsmetrikk i å oppdaga ein feil oversettelse av sentiment, spesielt når det er den eneste feilen i MT-utdata. Vi foreslår eit numerisk « sentiment-closeness » mål som er tilgjengeleg for å vurdere nøyaktighet for ei omsetjingsmelding av eit omsetjingsmelding i UGC-tekst av ein MT-system. Vi vil vise at inkludering av denne følelsesmålet kan betydelig forbedra korrelasjonen av nokre tilgjengelege kvalitetmetrikar med menneskelige vurdering av eit nøyaktig omsetjing av sentiment.', 'ro': 'În traducerea textelor în care sentimentul este mesajul principal, traducătorii umani acordă o atenție deosebită cuvintelor purtătoare de sentimente. Motivul este că o traducere incorectă a unor astfel de cuvinte ar pierde aspectul fundamental al textului sursă, adică sentimentul autorului. În lumea online, sistemele MT sunt utilizate pe scară largă pentru traducerea conținutului generat de utilizatori (UGC), cum ar fi recenzii, tweet-uri și postări pe rețelele de socializare, unde mesajul principal este adesea atitudinea pozitivă sau negativă a autorului față de subiectul textului. Este important în astfel de scenarii să se măsoare cu precizie cât de mult un sistem MT poate fi un utilitar fiabil în viața reală în transferul mesajului de afectare corect. Această lucrare abordează o problemă subrecunoscută în domeniul evaluării traducerii automate, care judecă în ce măsură măsurătorile automate corespund standardului de aur al evaluării umane pentru o traducere corectă a sentimentului. Evaluăm eficacitatea măsurătorilor convenționale de calitate în detectarea unei traduceri greșite a sentimentului, mai ales atunci când este singura eroare în ieșirea MT. Propunem o măsură numerică de "apropiere sentimentală" adecvată pentru evaluarea acurateții unui mesaj de afectare tradus în textul UGC printr-un sistem MT. Vom arăta că încorporarea acestei măsurători conștiente de sentiment poate spori semnificativ corelația unor măsurători de calitate disponibile cu judecata umană a unei traduceri exacte a sentimentului.', 'si': "මිනිස්සු පණිවිඩකයන්ට විශේෂ පණිවිඩයක් තියෙන්නේ පැත්තක් පණිවිඩයක් තියෙන්නේ. හේතුව තමයි මේ වචනේ වැරදි වාර්තාවක් ප්\u200dරධාන පාළුවේ මූලික ප්\u200dරධාන අවස්ථාවක් නැති වෙයි, ඉතින් ලේඛකයේ හැත ඇන්ලයින් ලෝකයේ, MT පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවේශකය ප්\u200dරවේශකය සමාව (UGC) භාවිත කරන්න භාවිත කරනවා වගේම පරීක්ෂණය, ට්වීට්, සමාජික මාධ්\u200dයම පොස්ට් වලින්, මු MT පද්ධතිය කොච්චර දුරටත් විශ්වාසිත ජීවිත යුද්ධියක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා සිද්ධ විශ්වාසිත විදියට අව මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරික්ෂා කරනවා පණිවිධාන පරික්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, විශේෂයෙන්ම ඒක MT ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරත අපි සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක 'විශේෂ-ලඟින්' මාර්ගයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා MT පද්ධතියෙන් විශේෂ කරපු පණිවිඩයක් තියෙන්න අන අපි පෙන්වන්නම් මේ දැනගන්න පුළුවන් අවස්ථාවක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් ම", 'sr': 'U prevodu teksta gde je sentiment glavna poruka, ljudski prevoditelji privlače posebnu pažnju na reči koje nose sentimente. Razlog je zato što bi pogrešni prevod takvih reči propustio osnovni aspekt izvornog teksta, tj. osjećaj autora. U internetskom svijetu, MT sistemi se široko koriste za prevod sadržaja Generiranog korisnika (UGC), kao što su pregledi, tweets i posti društvenih medija, gde je glavna poruka često pozitivna ili negativna stav autora prema temi teksta. Važno je u takvim scenarijama precizno mjeriti koliko daleko MT sistem može biti pouzdan korisnik stvarnog života u prenošenju pravog uticaja poruke. Ovaj papir rješava nepoznat problem u oblasti procjene prevoda mašine, koji osuđuje na koliku mjeru automatske metrike se slažu sa zlatnim standardom ljudske procjene za ispravan prevod sentiment a. Procjenjujemo efikasnost konvencionalnih kvalitetnih metrika u pogrešnom prevodu sentiment a, posebno kada je to jedina greška u izlazu MT-a. Predlažemo brojnu mjeru "osjećajnost-bliskosti" odgovarajuću za procjenu tačnosti prevedene poruke uticaja na tekst UGC-a MT-om. Pokazaćemo da uključivanje ove mjere svjesne sentimenta značajno može povećati korelaciju neke dostupne kvalitetne metrike sa ljudskim osuđivanjem tačnog prevoda sentimenta.', 'sv': 'Vid översättning av text där sentiment är huvudbudskapet ägnar mänskliga översättare särskild uppmärksamhet åt sentimentbärande ord. Anledningen är att en felaktig översättning av sådana ord skulle sakna den grundläggande aspekten av källtexten, dvs författarens känsla. I onlinevärlden används MT-system i stor utsträckning för att översätta användargenererat innehåll (UGC) såsom recensioner, tweets och inlägg på sociala medier, där huvudbudskapet ofta är författarens positiva eller negativa inställning till ämnet i texten. I sådana scenarier är det viktigt att noggrant mäta hur långt ett MT-system kan vara ett pålitligt verktyg i verkligheten för att överföra rätt påverkansmeddelande. Denna uppsats behandlar ett undererkänt problem inom området maskinöversättning utvärdering som bedömer i vilken utsträckning automatiska mätvärden överensstämmer med guldstandarden för mänsklig utvärdering för en korrekt översättning av sentiment. Vi utvärderar effekten av konventionella kvalitetsmått när det gäller att upptäcka en felöversättning av sentiment, särskilt när det är det enda felet i MT-utmatningen. Vi föreslår ett numeriskt mått för "sentiment-closeness" som är lämpligt för att bedöma riktigheten hos ett översatt påverkansmeddelande i UGC-text med hjälp av ett MT-system. Vi kommer att visa att införlivandet av denna sentimentmedvetna måttstock avsevärt kan förbättra korrelationen mellan vissa tillgängliga kvalitetsmått och den mänskliga bedömningen av en korrekt översättning av sentiment.', 'so': "Turjumista qoraalka ku yaala farshaxanka ugu horeeya, turjumayaasha dadku waxay si gaar ah u dhegaystaan hadalka ku saabsan fekerka. The reason is that an incorrect translation of such words would miss the fundamental aspect of the source text, i.e. the author's sentiment.  Dunida internetka waxaa si badan looga isticmaalaa isticmaalka User-Generated Content (UGC) sida baaritaanka, tweetiyada, iyo bandhigyada shabakadda bulshada, meesha warqada ugu horeeyay ay ay marar badan tahay macluumaadka saxda ama aragti negative xagga mada text. Waxaa muhiim ah in aad si saxda ah u qiyaasto nidaamka MT ay tahay isticmaal nololeed oo aamin ah marka loo wareejiyo macluumaadka saxda ah ee saameyn ku leh. Qoraalkan wuxuu dhibaato a an la aqoonsan ka baaraandegay beerta turjumidda machine, kaas oo ku xukunaya sida ay ugu dhaqdhaqaaqi karto kaararka dahabka ah ee qiimeynta dadku si saxda ah u tarjuma fikirka. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa saamaynta metricada caadiga ah marka lagu arko turjumaan miskiin ah, khusuusan marka ay tahay khaladda kaliya ee soo baxa MT. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa qiyaas tiro ah oo ku habboon si a an u qiimeyno saxda farriinta lagu turjumay qoraalka UGC ee MT. Waxan tusnaynaa in la koobi karo qiyaastii dareemadan aqoonta leh aad buu u kordhin karaa xiriirka noocyada qiimaha ah ee la xiriira xukunka biniaadamka tarjumaadka saxda ah.", 'ta': "உணர்வு முக்கிய செய்தியாக இருக்கும் உரையை மொழிபெயர்ப்பில், மனித மொழிபெயர்ப்பாளர்கள் உணர்வு சொல்லும் வ இந்த வார்த்தைகளின் தவறான மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மூலம் உரையின் அடிப்படையான பகுதியை காணவில்லை, அதாவது ஆசிரியரின் உணர்வு. இணைய உலகத்தில், MT அமைப்புகள் உரையின் தலைப்புக்கு முன்னிருப்பு செய்தியின் நேர்ந்த அல்லது எதிர்மறையான தன்மையை மாற்ற பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. It is important in such scenarios to accurately measure how far an MT system can be a reliable real-life utility in transferring the correct affect message.  இந்த தாள் கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு புலத்தில் ஒரு பிரச்சனையை தீர்மானிக்கிறது. இது தானாகவே மெட்ரிக்கள் எவ்வளவு தானாகவே மனித மதிப்பு சரியான மொழிபெயர்ப்ப MT வெளியீட்டில் ஒரு தவறான மொழிபெயர்ப்பை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பொழுது வழக்கமான தரம் மெட்ரிக்குகளின் விளைவை நாம் மதிப்பிடுக ஒரு மொழிபெயர்ப்பிடப்பட்ட செய்தியை UGC உரையில் பாதிக்க ஒரு எண்ணிக்கை 'உணர்வு- நெருக்கம்' அளவை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். நாம் இந்த உணர்வு தெரியும் அளவை ஒன்றாக சேர்த்து காட்டுவோம் என்பதை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் ஒரு சரியான உணர்வு மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் சில கிட", 'ur': "پیغام کی ترجمہ میں جہاں احساس اصلی پیغام ہے، انسان کی ترجمہ کرنے والوں نے احساس حمل کرنے والی کلمات کو خاص توجه دی ہے. دلیل یہ ہے کہ ایسے کلمات کی غلط ترجمہ سورست کی بنیادی حصہ کو چھوڑ دیتی ہے، یعنی لکھنے کی احساس. آنلاین دنیا میں، MT سیستموں کو اضافہ طور پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے کہ یوسٹر جینٹ منظم (UGC) کی ترجمہ کریں، ٹیوٹ، اور سوسیل میڈیا پوسٹ، جہاں اصلی پیغام اضافہ یا منفی پیغام لکھنے والے کے متعلق موضوع کے بارے میں ہے. اس طرح کی سناریوں میں ضرورت ہے کہ مضبوط اندازے سے مضبوط طور پر MT سیسٹم کتنی دور ایک قابل حقیقی زندگی استعمال ہوسکے۔ یہ کاغذ ماشین ترجمہ ارزیابی کے کھیلے میں ایک کم پہچان ہوا مسئلہ کا جواب دیتا ہے جس کا فیصلہ کرتا ہے کہ کیسا اندازہ اتوماتیک متریک انسان کی ارزیابی سونے کی استاندارڈ سے سیدھی ترجمہ کے لئے ہے۔ ہم عام کیفیت متریک کے مطابق مطابق محسوس کرتے ہیں احساسات کی غلط ترجمہ کو دیکھنے کے لئے، مخصوصا جب یہ MT آوٹ میں صرف خطا ہے۔ ہم ایک مٹی سیسٹم کے ذریعہ UGC پیغام میں ایک ترجمہ پیغام کے مطابق مطابق کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے مطابق ایک شماری 'حسن-نزدیک' اندازہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. ہم دکھائیں گے کہ اس احساسات کا اندازہ شامل کرنا بہت اچھا ہے کہ کسی موجود کیفیت متریک کا تعلق انسان کے فیصلہ کے ساتھ ایک سیدھی احساسات کا مطابق ترجمہ کرنا ہے", 'vi': 'Khi dịch đoạn mà cảm xúc là thông điệp chính, người dịch chuyển đặc biệt chú ý đến những từ mang tính cảm xúc. Lý do là một bản dịch sai của những từ đó s ẽ bỏ lỡ khía cạnh cơ bản của văn bản gốc, tức là ý của tác giả. Trong thế giới trên mạng, các hệ thống MTV được s ử dụng rộng rãi để dịch chuyển nội dung của người dùng (G.U.C) như các bài bình luận, tweet và các bài báo xã hội, nơi thông điệp chính thường là thái tích cực hay tiêu cực của tác giả đối với chủ đề văn bản. Trong các kịch bản như vậy, việc đo chính xác đến mức nào một hệ thống MTV có thể là một tiện ích thực sự đáng tin cậy trong việc chuyển đi thông điệp tác động đúng đắn. Tờ giấy này đề cập đến một vấn đề chưa được công nhận trong lĩnh vực đánh giá dịch cỗ máy. Phân định xem âm lượng tử tự động hợp với tiêu chuẩn vàng của đánh giá con người cho một bản dịch chính xác cảm xúc. Chúng tôi đánh giá hiệu quả của âm lượng chất lượng thông thường để tìm ra sai lệch của cảm xúc, đặc biệt khi nó là lỗi duy nhất trong kết xuất MTV. Chúng tôi đề nghị một biện pháp đa cảm gần gũi số thích hợp để đánh giá độ chính xác của một tin nhắn ảnh hưởng dịch trong văn bản Georgia bằng một hệ thống MTV. Chúng ta sẽ cho thấy rằng chấp nhận biện pháp đa cảm này có thể tăng mối tương quan của một số lượng đo chất lượng sẵn sàng với phán đoán con người về một cách dịch chuyển chính xác cảm xúc.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Bu so'zlarning notoʻgʻri tarjimasi manba matnning asosiy qismini yoʻqoladi, balki mualliflar hisobotini yoʻqoladi. Tarmoq dunyoda, MT tizimlari matnning mavzuga ega bo'lgan foydalanuvchi- Generated Content (UGC) kabi taʼminlovchi, Twitter, va jamiyat medya postlaridan foydalaniladi. @ info: whatsthis Bu qogʻoz, mashina tarjima tarjima qiymatida aniqlangan muammolarni qabul qiladi. Bu o'zgarishni sahifa tarjima qilish uchun oddiy tarjima qilish uchun avtomatik metriklar qanday darajada qo'llaniladi. Biz ma'lumotdan foydalanuvchi notoʻgʻri tarjimalarni ko'rganish uchun oddiy holatning effektini qiymatimiz, ammo bu MT natijadagi bitta xato. @ info: whatsthis Biz bu hissiyotni o'rganish o'lchamini o'rganishni ko'rsatamiz, ma'lumotlar mavjud qiymati metrikalarning bog'liqlarini qo'shish imkoniyatini juda muhimiy oshirish mumkin.", 'nl': "Bij het vertalen van tekst waarbij sentiment de belangrijkste boodschap is, besteden menselijke vertalers bijzondere aandacht aan sentimentdragende woorden. De reden is dat een onjuiste vertaling van dergelijke woorden het fundamentele aspect van de brontekst zou missen, namelijk het sentiment van de auteur. In de online wereld worden MT-systemen veel gebruikt om User Generated Content (UGC) te vertalen, zoals reviews, tweets en social media posts, waarbij de belangrijkste boodschap vaak de positieve of negatieve houding van de auteur ten opzichte van het onderwerp van de tekst is. In dergelijke scenario's is het belangrijk om nauwkeurig te meten in hoeverre een MT-systeem een betrouwbaar real-life nut kan zijn bij het overbrengen van het juiste affectbericht. Dit artikel behandelt een ondererkend probleem op het gebied van machinevertaling evaluatie, waarbij wordt beoordeeld in hoeverre automatische metrics overeenkomen met de gouden standaard van menselijke evaluatie voor een correcte vertaling van sentiment. We evalueren de effectiviteit van conventionele kwaliteitsmetrics bij het opsporen van een verkeerde vertaling van sentiment, vooral wanneer dit de enige fout is in de MT-output. We stellen een numerieke 'sentiment-closness' maatregel voor om de nauwkeurigheid van een vertaalde affectboodschap in UGC-tekst door een MT-systeem te beoordelen. We zullen aantonen dat het opnemen van deze sentimentbewuste maatregel de correlatie van sommige beschikbare kwaliteitsmetrics met het menselijk oordeel van een nauwkeurige vertaling van sentiment aanzienlijk kan verbeteren.", 'bg': 'При превода на текст, в който сантименталността е основното послание, човешките преводачи обръщат специално внимание на сантименталните думи. Причината е, че неправилният превод на такива думи би пропуснал фундаменталния аспект на изходния текст, т.е. мнението на автора. В онлайн света МТ системите се използват широко за превод на генерирано от потребителите съдържание (като рецензии, туитове и публикации в социалните медии, където основното послание често е положителното или отрицателното отношение на автора към темата на текста. Важно е при такива сценарии точно да се измери доколко една МТ система може да бъде надеждна помощна помощ в реалния живот при прехвърлянето на правилното съобщение за въздействие. Настоящата статия разглежда недостатъчно признат проблем в областта на оценката на машинния превод, който преценява до каква степен автоматичните показатели съответстват на златния стандарт на човешката оценка за коректен превод на сентимента. Ние оценяваме ефективността на конвенционалните показатели за качество при откриването на грешен превод на сентимента, особено когато това е единствената грешка в изхода на МТ. Предлагаме цифрова мярка за "сантиментална близост", подходяща за оценка на точността на преведено ефектно съобщение в текста на ОГС чрез система от МТ. Ще покажем, че включването на тази мярка за осъзнаване на чувствата може значително да подобри корелацията на някои налични показатели за качество с човешката преценка за точен превод на чувствата.', 'hr': "U prevodu teksta gdje je osjećaj glavna poruka, ljudski prevoditelji privlače posebnu pažnju na riječi koje nose osjećaje. Razlog je zato što bi pogrešni prevod takvih riječi propustio osnovni aspekt izvornog teksta, tj. osjećaj autora. U internetskom svijetu, MT sustavi se široko koriste za prevod sadržaja Generiranog korisnika (UGC), poput pregleda, tweeta i postova društvenih medija, gdje je glavna poruka često pozitivna ili negativna stav autora prema temi teksta. Važno je u takvim scenarijama precizno mjeriti koliko daleko MT sustav može biti pouzdan korisnik stvarnog života u prenošenju pravog utjecaja poruke. Ovaj papir rješava nepoznat problem u području procjene prevoda strojeva koji osuđuje na koliku mjeru automatske metrike sukladne s zlatnim standardom procjene ljudske procjene za ispravan prevod osjećaja. Procjenjujemo djelotvornost konvencionalnih kvalitetnih metrika u pogrešnom prevodu osjećaja, posebno kada je to jedina greška u izlazu MT-a. Predlažemo brojnu mjeru 'osjećajnost-bliskosti' odgovarajuću za procjenu preciznosti prevedene poruke utjecaja na tekst UGC-a MT-om. Pokazat ćemo da uključivanje ove mjere svjesne osjećanja značajno može povećati korelaciju neke dostupne kvalitetne metrike sa ljudskim procjenom točnog prevoda osjećaja.", 'de': 'Bei der Übersetzung von Texten, bei denen Sentiment die Hauptbotschaft ist, achten menschliche Übersetzer besonders auf sentimenttragende Worte. Der Grund dafür ist, dass eine falsche Übersetzung solcher Wörter den grundlegenden Aspekt des Ausgangstextes vermissen würde, d.h. die Stimmung des Autors. In der Online-Welt werden MT-Systeme häufig verwendet, um User-Generated Content (UGC) wie Rezensionen, Tweets und Social Media Posts zu übersetzen, wobei die Hauptbotschaft oft die positive oder negative Einstellung des Autors zum Thema des Textes ist. In solchen Szenarien ist es wichtig, genau zu messen, inwieweit ein MT-System ein zuverlässiges Hilfsmittel in der Praxis sein kann, um die korrekte Affektnachricht zu übertragen. Dieser Beitrag befasst sich mit einem nicht anerkannten Problem im Bereich der maschinellen Übersetzung, welches beurteilt, inwieweit automatische Metriken mit dem Goldstandard menschlicher Bewertung für eine korrekte Übersetzung von Gefühlen übereinstimmen. Wir bewerten die Wirksamkeit herkömmlicher Qualitätsmetriken bei der Erkennung einer fehlerhaften Übersetzung von Stimmungen, insbesondere wenn dies der einzige Fehler in der MT-Ausgabe ist. Wir schlagen eine numerische Sentiment-Nähe-Messung vor, die geeignet ist, die Genauigkeit einer übersetzten Affektbotschaft in UGC-Text durch ein MT-System zu bewerten. Wir werden zeigen, dass die Einbeziehung dieses sentiment-bewussten Maßes die Korrelation einiger verfügbarer Qualitätskennzahlen mit dem menschlichen Urteil einer genauen Sentiment-Übersetzung signifikant verbessern kann.', 'da': 'Ved oversættelse af tekst, hvor følelse er det vigtigste budskab, lægger menneskelige oversættere særlig vægt på følelsesbærende ord. Årsagen er, at en forkert oversættelse af sådanne ord ville savne det grundlæggende aspekt af kildeteksten, dvs. forfatterens følelse. I online verden bruges MT-systemer i vid udstrækning til at oversætte brugergenereret indhold (UGC) såsom anmeldelser, tweets og sociale medier indlæg, hvor hovedbudskabet ofte er forfatterens positive eller negative holdning til emnet i teksten. Det er vigtigt i sådanne scenarier at måle nøjagtigt, hvor langt et MT-system kan være et pålideligt virkeligt værktøj til at overføre den korrekte påvirkningsmeddelelse. Denne artikel behandler et underanerkendt problem inden for maskinoversættelsesvurdering, som vurderer i hvilket omfang automatiske målinger stemmer overens med guldstandarden for menneskelig evaluering for en korrekt oversættelse af sentiment. Vi evaluerer effektiviteten af konventionelle kvalitetsmålinger til at spotte en fejloversættelse af sentiment, især når det er den eneste fejl i MT output. Vi foreslår en numerisk "sentiment-closeness"-måling, der er egnet til at vurdere nøjagtigheden af en oversat påvirkningsmeddelelse i UGC-tekst ved hjælp af et MT-system. Vi vil vise, at indarbejdelse af denne følelsesbevidste måling kan betydeligt forbedre korrelationen mellem nogle tilgængelige kvalitetsmålinger og den menneskelige vurdering af en nøjagtig oversættelse af følelser.', 'fa': 'در ترجمه کردن متن که احساسات پیغام اصلی است، ترجمه\u200cکنندگان انسان به کلمات تحمل احساسات مشخص می\u200cکنند. دلیل این است که یک ترجمه اشتباهی از این کلمات نسبت بنیادی متن منبع را از دست می دهد، یعنی احساس نویسنده. در دنیای آنلاین، سیستم\u200cهای MT برای ترجمه محتوای تولید از کاربر (UGC) مثل تحقیقات، توئیت و پوست رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی، که پیغام اصلی اغلب رفتار مثبت یا منفی نویسنده به عنوان موضوع متن است استفاده می\u200cشود. در این سناریو مهم است که دقیقا اندازه\u200cگیری کنید که یک سیستم MT چقدر می\u200cتواند یک استفاده از زندگی واقعی قابل اطمینان باشد در انتقال پیام درست تأثیر دهد. این کاغذ یک مشکل زیر شناخته شده در میدان ترجمه ماشین است که به چه اندازه متریک اتوماتیک با استاندارد طلا ارزیابی انسان برای ترجمه درست احساسات قائل می شود. ما فعالیت متریک کیفیت معمولی را ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم در مشاهده کردن یک ترجمه اشتباهی از احساسات، مخصوصا وقتی تنها اشتباهی در نتیجه MT است. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک اندازه حس-نزدیکت عدد مناسب برای ارزیابی دقیق یک پیام تاثیر توسط یک سیستم MT در متن UGC. ما نشان خواهیم داد که شامل این اندازه\u200cهای آگاهی از احساسات می\u200cتواند معمولاً ارتباط برخی از متریک\u200cهای کیفیت موجود را با تصمیم انسان از ترجمه\u200cهای درست احساسات بیشتر کند.', 'sw': "Katika kutafsiri maandishi ambapo hisia ni ujumbe mkuu, watafsiri wa binadamu wanausikiliza maneno yanayobeba hisia. Sababu ni kuwa tafsiri isiyo sahihi ya maneno haya yatakosa mtazamo wa msingi wa maandishi ya chanzo, yaani hisia za mwandishi. Katika ulimwengu wa mtandaoni, mfumo wa MT unatumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kutafsiri maudhui ya mtumiaji-Generated (UGC) kama vile maoni, twiti, na makala za mitandao ya kijamii, ambapo ujumbe mkuu mara nyingi ni mtazamo chanya au hasi wa mwandishi wa habari kwenye mada hiyo. Ni muhimu katika kipindi hicho cha kuhakikisha kwa kiasi gani mfumo wa MT unaweza kuwa matumizi ya uhakika wa maisha katika kuhamisha ujumbe sahihi unaoathiri. Kanisa hili linakabiliwa na tatizo lisilo na kutambuliwa katika eneo la tafsiri za mashine ambalo linahukumu kwa kiasi gani mbinu za kujitegemea zinaunganisha na kiwango cha dhahabu cha uchunguzi wa binadamu kwa tafsiri sahihi ya hisia. Tunatathmini ufanisi wa njia za usawa wa kawaida katika kuona tafsiri mbaya za hisia, hususani wakati huo ni kosa pekee katika matokeo ya MT. Tunazipendekeza hatua ya 'hisia-karibu' yenye sahihi kwa kutathmini ukweli wa ujumbe utafsiri unaathiri katika ujumbe wa UGC na mfumo wa MT. Tutaonyesha kuwa kuunganisha hatua hii yenye ufahamu unaweza kuongeza uhusiano wa baadhi ya mitindo ya kiwango kinachopatikana kwa uamuzi wa binadamu wa tafsiri sahihi ya hisia.", 'af': "In vertaling van teks waar sentiment die hoofboodskap is, vertalings van mense gee bepaalde aandag aan sentiment-draagbare woorde. Die rede i s dat 'n verkeerde vertaling van sodanige woorde die fundamental e aspekt van die brontekste, t.d. die outeur se sentiment, mis sou word. In die aanlyn wêreld word MT-stelsels uitbreidig gebruik om gebruiker-genereerde Inhoud (UGC) te vertaal soos hersiening, tweets en sosiale media-pos, waar die hoofboodskap dikwels die outeur se positiewe of negatiewe aanhouding tot die onderwerp van die teks is. Dit is belangrik in sodanige scenarios om geregtig te maak hoe ver 'n MT stelsel kan 'n betroubare reël lewe nutsprogram wees in die oordra van die korrekte effekte boodskap. Hierdie papier bepaal 'n onder-herkende probleem in die veld van masjien vertaling evaluering wat oordeel tot watter uitbreiding automatiese metries saam met die goue standaard van menslike evaluering vir 'n korrekte vertaling van sentiment. Ons evalueer die effektigheid van konvensionale kwaliteit metriek in die spoor van 'n verkeerde vertaling van sentiment, veral wanneer dit die enigste fout in die MT uitvoer is. Ons voorstel 'n numeriese 'sentiment-closeness' maat wat regverdig is om die presisie van 'n vertaalde effekte boodskap in UGC teks deur 'n MT stelsel te asseer. Ons sal wys dat die inkorporering van hierdie sentiment-bewyse maat betekenlik die korrelasie van sommige beskikbare kwaliteit-metries kan verhoog met die menslike oordeel van 'n presies vertaling van sentiment.", 'ko': "감정을 주요 정보로 하는 텍스트를 번역할 때 인류 번역자는 감정이 있는 단어를 특히 주의한다.왜냐하면 이 단어들에 대한 잘못된 번역은 원문의 기본적인 측면, 즉 작가의 감정을 소홀히 하기 때문이다.인터넷 세계에서 기계 번역 시스템은 사용자가 생성한 내용(UGC), 예를 들어 평론, 트윗, 소셜 미디어 게시물을 번역하는 데 광범위하게 사용되는데 그 중의 주요 정보는 보통 작가가 텍스트 주제에 대한 적극적이거나 소극적인 태도이다.이런 상황에서 기계 번역 시스템이 어느 정도에 정확한 영향을 미칠 수 있는지를 정확하게 측정하는 믿을 만한 현실 실용 도구가 되는 것은 매우 중요하다.본고는 기계 번역 평가 분야에서 충분히 인식되지 않은 문제, 즉 자동 도량이 어느 정도에 인류 평가의 황금 기준에 부합되는지 판단하여 감정의 정확한 번역을 실현하는 것을 해결했다.우리는 전통적인 품질 지표가 감정 오역 방면의 유효성을 발견했는데 특히 감정 오역이 기계 번역 출력의 유일한 오류일 때 평가했다.우리는 디지털'감정 접근도'도량 방법을 제시했는데 기계 번역 시스템을 통해 UGC 텍스트에서 번역된 감정 정보의 정확성을 평가하는 데 적용된다.우리는 이러한 감정 감지 도량을 결합하면 일부 사용 가능한 품질 지표와 인류가 감정에 대한 정확한 번역에 대한 판단 간의 관련성을 현저하게 강화할 수 있음을 나타낼 것이다.", 'id': "Dalam menerjemahkan teks di mana sentimen adalah pesan utama, penerjemah manusia memberikan perhatian khusus kepada kata-kata yang membawa sentimen. Alasannya adalah bahwa terjemahan yang salah dari kata-kata seperti itu akan melewatkan aspek dasar dari teks sumber, yaitu sentimen penulis. Di dunia online, sistem MT secara ekstensif digunakan untuk menerjemahkan Konten Yang Digenerasikan oleh Pengguna (UGC) seperti ulasan, tweet, dan pos media sosial, di mana pesan utama sering adalah sikap positif atau negatif penulis terhadap topik teks. Ini penting dalam skenario seperti ini untuk mengukur dengan akurat seberapa jauh sistem MT dapat menjadi utilitas nyata yang dapat dipercaya dalam memindahkan pesan pengaruh yang benar. Kertas ini mengatasi masalah yang tidak dikenal dalam bidang evaluasi terjemahan mesin yang menilai seberapa besar metrik otomatis cocok dengan standar emas evaluasi manusia untuk terjemahan yang benar sentimen. Kami mengevaluasi efektivitas metrik kualitas konvensional dalam melihat salah penerjemah sentimen, terutama ketika itu adalah kesalahan tunggal dalam output MT. Kami mengusulkan ukuran 'sentimen-dekat' numerik yang sesuai untuk menilai akurasi pesan terjemahan pengaruh dalam teks UGC oleh sistem MT. We will show that incorporating this sentiment-aware measure can significantly enhance the correlation of some available quality metrics with the human judgement of an accurate translation of sentiment.", 'am': 'አስተያየት መጀመሪያ መልዕክት በማድረግ ጽሑፉን በመተርጓም፣ የሰው ተርጓሚዎች የስሜት ቃላትን ለመሸከም በተለየ ተጠቃሚ ትኩረት ያደርጋሉ፡፡ ምክንያቱም የዚህ ቃላት መተርጓሜ የተሰራ የጽሑፉን መሠረት ያሳርፋል፤ የጸሐፊው እውቀት ነው፡፡ በመስመር ዓለም የMT ስርዓቶች የጸሐፊው መልዕክት ብዙዎች የጽሑፉ ጉዳይ ላይ አካባቢ ወይም የnegative አካባቢ ሆኗል፡፡ It is important in such scenarios to accurately measure how far an MT system can be a reliable real-life utility in transferring the correct affect message.  ይህ ፕሮግራም በመሳዊ ትርጉም እርሻ ውስጥ የሚያሳውቀው መከራ ነው፡፡ የአስተባቢው ብልሃት ሚትሪኮችን በመመለከት እናስተዋልታለን፤ በተለይም የMT ውጤት ብቻውን ስህተት ሲሆን ነው፡፡ በUGC ጽሑፍ ውስጥ የተዘጋጀውን መልዕክት በUGC ጽሑፍ በሚያስተካክሉ የቁጥጥር-ቁጥጥር-ቅርብ ማሰናከል እናዘጋጀዋለን፡፡ ይህንን አስተዋይ መስኮት ማሳየት የሰው ትክክለኛ ትርጉም በሚያሳየው የሰው ትክክለኛ ትርጓሜ በሚያሳየው እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'tr': "Duýgynyň esasy mesaj bolan metini terjime edende, adamlaryň terjime edenler duýgym taýýarlan sözlere üns berýärler. Sebäbi bolsa şol s özlerin ýalňyş terjime bolmagy çe şme metiniň esasy aspektini ýitirdi, menä awtoryň duýgyny. Çaltylyk dünýäde, MT sistemalary Ullançylar Umumy (UGC) maslahatlary, tweets we sosialy medýä powtlary ýaly terjime etmek üçin ullanýarlar. Meýdany mesajyň köplenç awtoryň pozitiv ýa-da negativ ýerini metin meselesine terjime etmek üçin ullanýarlar. Bu sahypalarda MT sisteminiň dogry täsiri göçürmek üçin nähili ýüze ynamly bir hakyky ýa şaýyş hili bolup biljekdigini düzgün ölçüsi möhüm. Bu kagyz maşynyň terjime edilmesiniň sahypasynda tanyş problemasyny çözýär. Bu maşynyň terjime edilmesini nähili awtomatik metrikleriň adamlaryň duýgulamanyň dogry terjime edilmesi üçin gol düzümlenmesi bilen takyklaýar. Biz düzenli kalitede metriklerin etkinliğini duýgulamanyň yanlış terjime edilmesinde değerlendiriyoruz, özellikle MT çizgisinde ýeke bir hata bolanda. Biz UGC metinde bir MT sistemi tarapyndan terjime edilen hasaplanjak üçin uygun bir sany 'duýgym-ýakynlyk' ölçüsini teklip edip görýäris. Biz bu duýgulary bilýän ölçüsini daşary edip biljek käbir hili meýdança metriklerin adalat duýgularyň dogry terjime edilmegi bilen üýtgedip bileris.", 'az': "İnsan təkrarlayıcıları hissləri daşıyan sözlərə gözəl dikkat verirlər. Bütün s özlərin yanlış tercüməs i mənbənin mətnlərin əsas hissəsini, məsələn yazarının hissəsini itirməkdir. İnternet dünyasında, MT sistemləri, məktubun məs əlinə görə yazıcının pozitif və ya negatif davranışı kimi istifadə etmək üçün çox uzaqlaşdırılır. Bu scenariolarda, MT sisteminin doğru təsiri mesajı göndərmək üçün güvenilir həyat istifadəsi olaraq nöqtəsini tam ölçürmək mövcuddur. Bu kağıt maşın çevirilməsi müəyyən edilməsi sahəsində təşkil edilməyən bir problem ə çəkir. Bu, özünüzə avtomatik metrik, insan değerlendirməsinin altın standartlarına düzgün bir cümləməsi üçün istifadə edir. Biz, sadəcə olaraq, MT çıxartdığı tək xəta olduğu zaman, hisslərin yanlış tercüməsini görmək üçün conventional keyfiyyət metriklərin etkinliğini değerlendiririk. Biz UGC mətnlərində MT sistemi ilə çevirilən məsələnin doğruluğunu müəyyən etmək üçün uyğun sayısal 'sentiment-closeness' ölçüsini təklif edirik. Biz göstərəcəyik ki, bu duyguları tanıyıb ölçülərin birləşdirilməsi, hisslərin doğru çevirilməsi ilə insanların hökmünün bəzi kaliteli metriklərin bağlantısını artırabilir.", 'bs': "U prevodu teksta gdje je osjećaj glavna poruka, ljudski prevoditelji privlače posebnu pažnju na riječi koje nose osjećaje. Razlog je zato što bi pogrešni prevod takvih riječi propustio osnovni aspekt izvornog teksta, tj. osjećaj autora. U internetskom svijetu, MT sistemi se široko koriste za prevod sadržaja Generiranog korisnika (UGC), poput pregleda, tweeta i postova socijalnih medija, gdje je glavna poruka često pozitivna ili negativna stav autora prema temi teksta. Važno je u takvim scenarijama precizno mjeriti koliko daleko MT sistem može biti pouzdan korisnik stvarnog života u prenošenju pravog utjecaja poruke. Ovaj papir rješava nepoznat problem u oblasti procjene prevoda mašine, koji osuđuje na koliku mjeru automatske metrike slažu sa zlatnim standardom procjene ljudske procjene za ispravan prevod osjećaja. Procjenjujemo djelotvornost konvencionalnih kvalitetnih metrika u pogrešnom prevodu osjećaja, posebno kada je to jedina greška u izlazu MT-a. Predlažemo brojnu mjeru 'osjećajnost-bliskosti' odgovarajuću za procjenu preciznosti prevedene poruke utjecaja na tekst UGC-a MT-om. Pokazaćemo da uključujući ovu mjeru svjestan osjećanja može značajno povećati korelaciju neke dostupne kvalitetne metrike sa ljudskom procjenom tačnog prevoda osjećanja.", 'ca': "In translating text where sentiment is the main message, human translators give particular attention to sentiment-carrying words.  La raó és que una traducció incorrecta d'aquestes paraules perdria l'aspect e fonamental del text original, és a dir, el sentiment de l'autor. In the online world, MT systems are extensively used to translate User-Generated Content (UGC) such as reviews, tweets, and social media posts, where the main message is often the author's positive or negative attitude towards the topic of the text.  En aquests escenaris és important mesurar exactament fins a quin punt un sistema MT pot ser una utilitat de vida real fiable per transferir el missatge d'efecte correcte. Aquest paper aborda un problem a poc reconegut en el camp de l'evaluació de la traducció màquina que està jugant en quin punt les mètriques automàtiques concorden amb l'estràndard d'or de l'evaluació humana per una traducció correcta del sentiment. Evaluam l'eficacia de les mètriques de qualitat convencionals en veure una mala traducció del sentiment, especialment quan és l'únic error en la producció MT. Proposem una mesura numbèrica d'aproximació del sentiment apropiada per avaluar la precisió d'un missatge d'efecte traduit al text UGC per un sistema MT. Mostrarem que incorporar aquesta mesura conscient del sentiment pot millorar significativament la correlació d'algunes mètriques de qualitat disponibles amb el judici humà d'una traducció exacta del sentiment.", 'sq': "Në përkthimin e tekstit ku ndjenja është mesazhi kryesor, përkthyesit njerëzor i japin vëmendje të veçantë fjalëve që mbajnë ndjenja. The reason is that an incorrect translation of such words would miss the fundamental aspect of the source text, i.e. the author's sentiment.  In the online world, MT systems are extensively used to translate User-Generated Content (UGC) such as reviews, tweets, and social media posts, where the main message is often the author's positive or negative attitude towards the topic of the text.  It is important in such scenarios to accurately measure how far an MT system can be a reliable real-life utility in transferring the correct affect message.  Ky dokument trajton një problem të pakënjohur në fushën e vlerësimit të përkthimit të makinave që po gjykon në çfarë mase metrika automatike përputhet me standartin e artë të vlerësimit njerëzor për një përkthimin korrekt të ndjenjave. Ne vlerësojmë efektshmërinë e metrikave të cilësisë konvencionale në vëzhgimin e një keqpërkthimi të ndjenjave, veçanërisht kur është gabimi i vetëm në rezultatin MT. We propose a numerical 'sentiment-closeness' measure appropriate for assessing the accuracy of a translated affect message in UGC text by an MT system.  Do të tregojmë se përfshirja e kësaj mase të ndërgjegjshme për ndjenjat mund të rritë ndjeshëm korrelacionin e disa metrikëve të cilësisë në dispozicion me gjykimin njerëzor të një përkthimi të saktë të ndjenjave.", 'et': 'Teksti tõlkimisel, kus tunded on peamine sõnum, pööravad inimtõlkijad erilist tähelepanu tundeid kandvatele sõnadele. Põhjuseks on see, et selliste sõnade ebaõige tõlkimine jätaks ilma lähteteksti põhiaspektist, st autori arvamusest. Veebimaailmas kasutatakse MT süsteeme laialdaselt kasutajate loodud sisu (UGC) tõlkimiseks, näiteks arvustuste, säutsude ja sotsiaalmeedia postituste tõlkimiseks, kus peamine sõnum on sageli autori positiivne või negatiivne suhtumine teksti teemasse. Selliste stsenaariumide puhul on oluline täpselt mõõta, kui palju MT-süsteem võib olla usaldusväärne reaalne kasutaja õige mõju sõnumi edastamisel. Käesolev töö käsitleb alatunnustatud probleemi masintõlke hindamise valdkonnas, mis hindab, mil määral automaatsed mõõdikud on kooskõlas inimliku hindamise kuldstandardiga sentimentaalse tõlke õigeks tõlkimiseks. Hindame tavapäraste kvaliteedimõõdikute efektiivsust sentimentaalse tõlkimise tuvastamisel, eriti kui see on ainus viga MT väljundis. Pakume välja arvulise "sentimentaalse läheduse" mõõtme, mis on sobiv tõlgitud mõjutussõnumi täpsuse hindamiseks UGC tekstis MT süsteemi abil. Näitame, et selle sentimentaalse mõõtme kaasamine võib oluliselt suurendada mõnede kättesaadavate kvaliteedinäitajate korrelatsiooni inimliku hinnanguga sentimentaalse tõlke kohta.', 'fi': 'Kääntäessään tekstiä, jossa tunne on tärkein viesti, ihmiskääntäjät kiinnittävät erityistä huomiota tunteita kantaviin sanoihin. Syynä on se, että tällaisten sanojen virheellinen käännös jättäisi huomiotta lähdetekstin perusosan eli tekijän mielipiteen. Verkkomaailmassa MT-järjestelmiä käytetään laajasti käyttäjien luoman sisällön (UGC) kääntämiseen, kuten arvosteluja, twiittejä ja sosiaalisen median viestejä, joissa tärkein viesti on usein kirjoittajan positiivinen tai negatiivinen asenne tekstin aiheeseen. Tällaisissa skenaarioissa on tärkeää mitata tarkasti, kuinka pitkälle MT-järjestelmä voi olla luotettava tosielämän apuväline oikean vaikutusviestin siirtämisessä. Tässä artikkelissa käsitellään konekäännösten arvioinnin alalla aliarvioitua ongelmaa, jossa arvioidaan, missä määrin automaattiset mittarit ovat samaa mieltä inhimillisen arvioinnin kultaisen standardin kanssa tunteiden oikeasta kääntämisestä. Arvioimme perinteisten laatumittarien tehokkuutta sentimentaalin käännösvirheen havaitsemisessa erityisesti silloin, kun se on ainoa virhe MT-tuotoksessa. Ehdotamme numeerista "tunne-läheisyys" -toimenpidettä, joka soveltuu arvioimaan käännetyn affect-viestin tarkkuutta UGC-tekstissä MT-järjestelmän avulla. Osoitamme, että tämän tunteellisen mittarin käyttöönotto voi merkittävästi parantaa joidenkin saatavilla olevien laatumittarien korrelaatiota inhimillisen arvion kanssa tunteen tarkasta käännöksestä.', 'hy': "In translating text where sentiment is the main message, human translators give particular attention to sentiment-carrying words.  Պատճառն այն է, որ այդպիսի բառերի սխալ թարգմանությունը կորցնի աղբյուր տեքստի հիմնարար ասպեկտը, այսինքն հեղինակի զգացմունքը: In the online world, MT systems are extensively used to translate User-Generated Content (UGC) such as reviews, tweets, and social media posts, where the main message is often the author's positive or negative attitude towards the topic of the text.  It is important in such scenarios to accurately measure how far an MT system can be a reliable real-life utility in transferring the correct affect message.  Այս թղթին լուծում է թերճանաչված խնդիրը մեքենայի թարգմանման գնահատման ոլորտում, որը որոշում է, թե ինչքանով են ավտոմատիկ մետրիկները համապատասխանում մարդկային գնահատման ոսկու ստանդարտին զգացմունքների ճիշտ թարգմանման համար: Մենք գնահատում ենք ավանդական որակի մետրիկայի արդյունավետությունը զգացմունքների սխալ թարգմանման հայտնաբերման մեջ, հատկապես երբ դա միակ սխալն է MT-ի արդյունքում: We propose a numerical 'sentiment-closeness' measure appropriate for assessing the accuracy of a translated affect message in UGC text by an MT system.  We will show that incorporating this sentiment-aware measure can significantly enhance the correlation of some available quality metrics with the human judgement of an accurate translation of sentiment.", 'bn': "অনুবাদের টেক্সটে যেখানে আবেগ প্রধান বার্তা, মানুষ অনুবাদক বিশেষ করে মনোভাব বহন করা শব্দের দিকে মনোযোগ দেয় কারণ হচ্ছে এই শব্দগুলোর ভুল অনুবাদ সূত্রের লেখার মৌলিক প্রতিক্রিয়া হারিয়ে যাবে, যেমন লেখকের অনুভূতি। In the online world, MT systems are extensively used to translate User-Generated Content (UGC) such as reviews, tweets, and social media posts, where the main message is often the author's positive or negative attitude towards the topic of the text.  সঠিকভাবে প্রভাবিত বার্তা পরিবর্তন করার জন্য এমটি সিস্টেম কতদূর পর্যন্ত বিশ্বস্ত জীবনের ব্যবহার হতে পারে। এই পত্রিকাটি মেশিন অনুবাদের মূল্যের ক্ষেত্রে একটি অচিরেই স্বীকৃতির সমস্যার মুখোমুখি হয়েছে যা মেশিন অনুবাদের সঠিক অনুবাদের জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয় মেট We evaluate the efficacy of conventional quality metrics in spotting a mistranslation of sentiment, especially when it is the sole error in the MT output.  এমটি সিস্টেমের দ্বারা অনুবাদ করা একটি অনুবাদের বার্তার সঠিকভাবে মূল্যায়নের জন্য আমরা একটি সংখ্যানিক 'আবেগ- কাছাকাছি' মাপ প আমরা দেখাবো যে এই আবেগ-সচেতনতার পরিমাপ অন্তর্ভুক্ত করা মানুষের সঠিক অনুবাদের মাধ্যমে মানুষের বিচারের মাধ্যমে কিছু মানের মানের সম্পর", 'cs': 'Při překladu textu, kde je hlavním poselstvím sentiment, lidští překladatelé věnují zvláštní pozornost slovům nesoucím sentimenty. Důvodem je, že nesprávný překlad takových slov by chyběl základní aspekt zdrojového textu, tedy autorův sentiment. V online světě jsou MT systémy široce používány k překladu uživatelsky generovaného obsahu (UGC), jako jsou recenze, tweety a příspěvky na sociálních médiích, kde hlavním poselstvím je často pozitivní nebo negativní postoj autora k tématu textu. V takových scénářích je důležité přesně měřit, do jaké míry může být MT systém spolehlivým nástrojem v reálném životě při přenosu správné zprávy o vlivu. Tento článek se zabývá nedostatečně uznávaným problémem v oblasti hodnocení strojového překladu, který posuzuje, do jaké míry automatické metriky souhlasí se zlatým standardem lidského hodnocení pro správný překlad sentimentu. Hodnotíme efektivitu konvenčních metrik kvality při odhalování chybného překladu sentimentu, zejména pokud jde o jedinou chybu v MT výstupu. Navrhujeme numerické měřítko "sentiment-blízkosti" vhodné pro posouzení přesnosti přeložené affektové zprávy v UGC textu pomocí MT systému. Ukážeme, že začlenění tohoto citového měřítka může výrazně zlepšit korelaci některých dostupných metrik kvality s lidským úsudkem přesného překladu sentimentu.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Sabo da shi ne cewa wani fassarar inganci wa wannan magana zai sava kimar matsayin source, misali, ma'anar marubuci. Daga dũniya masu shawara, MT's system is widely used to translate user-Created Content (UGC) such as auditions, Twitter, and maiposters of society, where the main message is oft as the author's position or negative attitus to the topic of text. It is important in such scenarios to accurately measure how far an MT system can be a reliable real-life utility in transferring the correct affect message.  Wannan karatun na gane wata fitina da ba'a gane shi ba a cikin birnin fassarar maɓalli, wanda yana yin hukunci a yanda metric farat-farat ɗaya ya haɗa da kimar dahari na ƙidãya wa mutum ga fassarar aikin gaskiya. Ana ƙaddara aikin metric masu daidaita a cikin ka gane wata mistranslate na hisãbi, da hususanci idan ta zama ɓata guda cikin fitarwa na MT. Tuna goyyar da wani gwargwadon 'hisãbi-makusanci' wanda ke daidai dõmin ka ƙayyade tsarin da aka fassara wajen yin zartar da shi a cikin matsayin UGC na da wani na'urar MT. Za nũna cewa, a cikin shirin wannan ma'auni mai fahimta, yana iya ƙara muhimmada a tsakanin wasu metrici da ke iya amfani da hukuncin mutãne da fassarar fassarar da ke daidaita.", 'jv': "Ngubah itjamahan Rasané awak dhéwé sing nyuluk akeh sing dirampakan kanggo perangkat kuwi, sing dirampen langkung sampek punika kawit seneng penjelajah, ta witané, penangkapan penjelajah. Nang dunya online, MT sistem sing ditambah bantuan kanggo terjamah User-Genered Content Ere wajane kanggo segondirno neng sistem MT kang isih perusahaan anyari kapan nguasai ora bisa dianggap kanggo ngubah berkas dianggap bener Perintah iki bakal nambah sing perbudhakan sing nggawe geranggap karo perusahaan kanggo tarjamahan karo perusahaan sing nggawe geranggap kuwi, nggawe nyimpen karo perusahaan sistem sing automatically sampek karo awak dhéwé, sing uwis kuwi nggawe tarjamahan karo perusahaan langkung sampek. Awak dhéwé nggunakake effekasi nggawe kalitas sistem kuwi nggawe gerakan luwih nyong langgar, supoyo kuwi jenis-jenis kanggo ndelok MT. Awak dhéwé ngerbah éntuk 'Sensitif-kapan' nggawe barang nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasakno dadi iki dadi seneng bersêng terjamahan kanggo teks UGS seneng sistem MT. Awak dhéwé bakal menehi wong-wong kuwi iki bakal kelas nggawe gerakan kelas karo nggawe barang kelas kuwi tindakan karo nggawe nguasai perbudhakan kanggo ngerasai winih dhéwé, winih sing apik dhéwé.", 'sk': 'Pri prevajanju besedila, kjer je čustvo glavno sporočilo, človeški prevajalci posebno pozornost namenjajo besedam, ki nosijo čustva. Razlog je, da bi napačen prevod takih besed zamudil temeljni vidik izvornega besedila, tj. avtorjevo mnenje. V spletnem svetu se sistemi MT obsežno uporabljajo za prevajanje uporabniških vsebin (UGC), kot so recenzije, tweeti in objave v družabnih omrežjih, kjer je glavno sporočilo pogosto avtorjev pozitiven ali negativen odnos do teme besedila. V takih scenarijih je pomembno natančno izmeriti, koliko je lahko sistem MT zanesljiv realni pripomoček pri prenosu pravilnega vpliva sporočila. Prispevek obravnava premalo prepoznan problem na področju vrednotenja strojnega prevoda, ki presoja, v kolikšni meri avtomatične meritve sodijo z zlatim standardom človeške vrednotenje za pravilen prevod sentimenta. Ocenjujemo učinkovitost običajnih meritev kakovosti pri ugotavljanju napačnega prevajanja sentimenta, še posebej kadar gre za edino napako v MT izhodu. Predlagamo numerično merilo "sentimentalne bližine", primerno za oceno točnosti prevedenega efektnega sporočila v besedilu UGC s pomočjo sistema MT. Pokazali bomo, da lahko z vključitvijo tega merila, ki se zaveda občutkov, bistveno izboljša korelacijo nekaterih razpoložljivih meritev kakovosti s človeško presojo natančnega prevoda občutkov.', 'he': "בתרגום טקסט שבו הרגשה היא ההודעה הראשית, תורגמים אנושיים נותנים תשומת לב מיוחדת למילים נושאות רגשות. הסיבה היא שהתרגום לא נכון של מילים כאלה יפספס את היבט הבסיסי של הטקסט המקורי, כלומר הרגשה של הסופר. בעולם האינטרנט, מערכות MT משתמשות באופן רחב לתרגם תוכן יוצר משתמשים (UGC) כמו ביקורות, טוויטים ופרסומות תקשורת חברתית, שבו ההודעה הראשית היא לעתים קרובות הגישה החיובית או שלילית של הסופר כלפי נושא הטקסט. במקרים כאלה חשוב למדוד בדיוק עד כמה מערכת MT יכולה להיות שימוש אמין בחיים אמיתיים בהעברת ההשפעה הנכונה. הנייר הזה מתמודד עם בעיה לא מוכרת בשטח הערכה של התרגום המכונית אשר שופטת עד כמה מטריקה אוטומטית מתאימה לסטנדרט זהב של הערכה האנושית לתרגום נכון של רגשות. We evaluate the efficacy of conventional quality metrics in spotting a mistranslation of sentiment, especially when it is the sole error in the MT output.  We propose a numerical 'sentiment-closeness' measure appropriate for assessing the accuracy of a translated affect message in UGC text by an MT system.  נראה שהשילוב של המידה הזו מודעת לרגשות יכול לשפר באופן משמעותי את התיאור של כמה מטריות איכות זמינות עם השיפוט האנושי של תרגום מדויק של רגשות.", 'bo': "སེམས་ཚོར་འདི་རྩ་བའི་འཕྲིན་དོན་ཡིག རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་འདི་ཚིག་འདི་དག་གི་ཡིག དྲ་དམངས་གྱི་འཇིག་རྟེན་འདིའི་(UGC)རིགས་མ་ལག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཆེ་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེ་འདྲ་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ནང་དུ་རྐྱེན་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་MT མ་ལག་གིས་གནས་ཚུལ་རྟོགས་རུང་བའི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་རེད། This paper tackles an under-recognized problem in the field of machine translation evaluation which is judging to what extent automatic metrics concur with the gold standard of human evaluation for a correct translation of sentiment. It is the case of paper tackles with the gold standard of human evaluation for a correct translation. We evaluate the efficacy of conventional quality metrics in spotting a mistranslation of sentiment, especially when it is the sole error in the MT output. ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་'sentiment-closeness'རིམ་པ་ཞིག་གི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཕན་ཚུན་གྱིས་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སེམས་ཚོར་རྟགས་ལ་འོང་བའི་ཚད་ལྟར་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་ཕན་ཚུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་ཉེན་མཁན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ"}
{'en': 'Multilingual Epidemic Event Extraction : From Simple Classification Methods to Open Information Extraction (OIE) and Ontology', 'ar': 'استخلاص الحدث الوبائي متعدد اللغات: من طرق التصنيف البسيطة إلى استخراج المعلومات المفتوحة (OIE) وعلم الوجود', 'fr': "Extraction multilingue d'événements épidémiques\xa0: des méthodes de classification simples à l'extraction ouverte d'informations (OIE) et à l'ontologie", 'es': 'Extracción multilingüe de eventos epidémicos: de métodos de clasificación simples a extracción abierta de información (OIE) y ontología', 'pt': 'Extração de eventos epidêmicos multilíngues: de métodos simples de classificação à extração de informações abertas (OIE) e ontologia', 'zh': '多言流行病事提取:从简类至开信提取(OIE)本体论', 'ja': '多言語流行事象抽出：単純な分類方法からオープン情報抽出（ OIE ）およびオントロジーへ', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी महामारी घटना निष्कर्षण: सरल वर्गीकरण विधियों से सूचना निष्कर्षण (OIE) और Ontology खोलने के लिए', 'ru': 'Многоязычное извлечение эпидемических событий: от простых методов классификации к извлечению открытой информации (OIE) и онтологии', 'ga': 'Eastóscadh Imeachta Eipidéime Ilteangach : Ó Mhodhanna Aicmithe Simplí go hEastóscadh Faisnéise (OIE) agus Ontology', 'el': 'Πολυγλωσσική εξαγωγή επιδημιακών συμβάντων: Από απλές μεθόδους ταξινόμησης έως ανοικτή εξαγωγή πληροφοριών (ΟΕΕ) και οντολογία', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű járványos események kivonása: az egyszerű osztályozási módszerektől a nyílt információs kivonásig (OIE) és az ontológiáig', 'ka': 'Multilingual Epidemic Event Extraction : Simple Classification Methods to Open Information Extraction (OIE) and Ontology', 'it': "Estrazione multilingue di eventi epidemici: dai semplici metodi di classificazione all'estrazione di informazioni aperte (OIE) e all'ontologia", 'mk': 'Мултијазична екстракција на епидемички настан : Од едноставни методи на класификација до отворена екстракција на информации (OIE) и онтологија', 'kk': 'Көп тілді эпидемиялық оқиғаларды тарқату: Кәдімгі классификациялау әдістерінен ақпарат тарқату (OIE) мен онтологиясы', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Peristiwa Epidemik Berbahasa: Dari Kaedah Klasifikasi Mudah hingga Ekstraksi Maklumat Buka (OIE) dan Ontologi', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbis epideminių reiškinių ekstrakcija: nuo paprastų klasifikavimo metodų iki atviros informacijos ekstrakcijos (OIE) ir Ontologijos', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni ta’ Avvenimenti Epidemiċi Multilingwi : Minn Metodi Simpli ta’ Klassifikazzjoni sa Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Miftuħa (OIE) u Ontoloġija', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэлний эмгэгтэй үйл явдал гаргах: Энгийн хэлбэрээс мэдээлэл татах (OIE) болон Ontology', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷ എപിഡിമിക്ക് സംഭവം പുറത്താക്കുക: എളുപ്പമായ ക്ലാസിഷനില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്താക്കുന്നതിലേക്കുള്ള വഴികളില', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczna ekstrakcja zdarzeń epidemicznych: od prostych metod klasyfikacji do otwartej ekstrakcji informacji (OIE) i ontologii', 'ro': 'Extragerea evenimentelor epidemice multilingve: de la metode simple de clasificare la extragerea informațiilor deschise (OIE) și ontologie', 'no': 'Multispråk epidemiske hendingar- ekstraksjon : Fra enkle klassifikasjonsmetodar til opna informasjonsekstraksjon (OIE) og Ontologi', 'so': 'Multilingual Epidemic Event Extraction : From Simple Classification Methods to Open Information Extraction (OIE) and Ontology', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija višejezičkih epidemijskih događaja : od jednostavnih klasifikacijskih metoda do otvorene ekstrakcije informacija (OIE) i Ontologije', 'sv': 'Extraktion av flerspråkiga epidemiska händelser: från enkla klassificeringsmetoder till extraktion av öppen information (OIE) och ontologi', 'ta': 'பல மொழிகள் புதிய நிகழ்வு வெளியேறுதல்: எளிய வகுப்பாட்டிலிருந்து தகவல் வெளியீடு (OIE) மற்றும் ஒற்றுநோலோஜியை திற', 'ur': 'Multilingual Epidemic Event Extraction : Simple Classification Methods to Open Information Extraction (OIE) and Ontology', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සිද්ධ විද්\u200dයාවය නිර්මාණය: සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවයෙන් තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය (OIE)', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Sơ suất đa ngôn ngữ biểu tượng xuất phát từ các phương pháp đơn giản để mở khai xạ thông tin (còn nguyên) và khoa học', 'bg': 'Извличане на многоезични епидемични събития: от прости методи за класификация до извличане на открита информация (OIE) и онтология', 'nl': 'Meertalige epidemische gebeurtenisextractie: Van eenvoudige classificatiemethoden tot open informatieextractie (OIE) en ontologie', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija višejezičkih epidemijskih događaja : od jednostavnih klasifikacijskih metoda do otvorene ekstrakcije informacija (OIE) i Ontologije', 'da': 'Udtrækning af flersprogede epidemiske hændelser: Fra enkle klassificeringsmetoder til udtrækning af åben information (OIE) og ontologi', 'id': 'Ekstraksi Epidemik Berbahasa: Dari Metode Klasifikasi Sederhana hingga Ekstraksi Informasi Buka (OIE) dan Ontologi', 'fa': 'اخراج اتفاق بیماری\u200cهای زیادی زبان : از روش\u200cهای ساده\u200cی کلاس\u200cسازی تا اخراج اطلاعات (OIE) و انتولوژی باز شود', 'sw': 'Kutokana na njia nyepesi za kujitenga kwa habari za lugha nyingine na Ontology', 'tr': 'Çoklu dilli Epidemik Wesiri Açmak : Besitlendirmek Metinden Maglumat Açmak (OIE) we Ontologiýa', 'ko': '다중 언어 전염병 이벤트 추출: 간단한 분류 방법부터 개방된 정보 추출(OIE) 및 본체까지', 'af': 'Veelvuldige epidemiese gebeurtenis uitpak : Van eenvoudige klassifikasie metodes na Open Informasie uitpak (OIE) en Ontologie', 'sq': 'Ekstraktim Epidemik Multilingual Event : Nga Metodat e thjeshta të klasifikimit deri tek Ekstraktimi i Informacionit të Hapur (OIE) dhe Ontologjia', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች የEpidemic Event Extraction: From Simple Classification Methods to Open Information Extraction (OIE) and Ontology', 'de': 'Mehrsprachige epidemische Ereignisextraktion: Von einfachen Klassifizierungsmethoden zur offenen Informationsextraktion (OIE) und Ontologie', 'az': 'Çoxlu dil Epidemik Vaqiyyət Extraction: Simple Classification Methods to Open Information Extraction (OIE) and Ontology', 'bn': 'বহুভাষায় ইপিডেমিক ইভেন্ট এক্সট্র্যাক্ট্র্যাক্ট্র্যাকশন: সাধারণ ক্লাসিফিকেশন পদ্ধতি থেকে তথ্য উৎপাদনের (OIE) এব', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija višejezičkih epidemijskih događaja : od jednostavnih metoda klasifikacije do otvorene ekstrakcije informacija (OIE) i Ontologije', 'et': 'Mitmekeelne epideemianähtude ekstraheerimine: lihtsatest klassifitseerimismeetoditest avatud teabe ekstraheerimiseni (OIE) ja ontoloogiani', 'ca': 'Multilingual Epidemic Event Extraction : From Simple Classification Methods to Open Information Extraction (OIE) and Ontology', 'fi': 'Monikielinen epideemiatapahtumien talteenotto: yksinkertaisista luokitusmenetelmistä avoimen tiedon talteenottoon (OIE) ja ontologiaan', 'hy': 'Բազլեզու էպիդեմիկ իրադարձությունների արտահանումը. պարզ դասակարգման մեթոդներից մինչև բաց տեղեկատվության արտահանումը (ՕԵ) և օնտելոգիան', 'cs': 'Vícejazyčná extrakce epidemických událostí: od jednoduchých klasifikačních metod k otevřené extrakci informací (OIE) a ontologie', 'jv': 'Multi-languang Epidémik events extract: Mulai Simple CLASCING Methods to Open information extract (OSE) and Ontologgi', 'sk': 'Večjezično ekstrakcijo epidemijskih dogodkov: od enostavnih metod klasifikacije do odprtega pridobivanja informacij (OIE) in ontologije', 'ha': 'Extracti event', 'he': 'מחלקת אירועים אפידמיים רבות שפות: משיטות קליфікаציה פשוטות לחלקת מידע פתוח (OIE) ואונטולוגיה', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་གནད་དོན་བྱ་འགུལ་གཙང་བཅོས་འདུག : ལས་སླ་པོ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཁ་ཕྱེ་བ་དང་Ontology'}
{'en': 'There is an incredible amount of information available in the form of textual documents due to the growth of information sources. In order to get the information into an actionable way, it is common to use information extraction and more specifically the event extraction, it became crucial in various domains even in public health. In this paper, we address the problem of the epidemic event extraction in potentially any language, so that we tested different corpuses on an existed multilingual system for tele-epidemiology : the Data Analysis for Information Extraction in any Language(DANIEL) system. We focused on the influence of the number of documents on the performance of the system, on average results show that it is able to achieve a precision and recall around 82 %, but when we resorted to the evaluation by event by checking whether it has been really detected or not, the results are not satisfactory according to this paper’s evaluation. Our idea is to propose a system that uses an ontology which includes information in different languages and covers specific epidemiological concepts, it is also based on the multilingual open information extraction for the relation extraction step to reduce the expert intervention and to restrict the content for each text. We describe a methodology of five main stages : Pre-processing, relation extraction, named entity recognition (NER), event recognition and the matching between the information extracted and the ontology.', 'ar': 'هناك قدر لا يصدق من المعلومات المتاحة في شكل وثائق نصية بسبب نمو مصادر المعلومات. من أجل الحصول على المعلومات بطريقة قابلة للتنفيذ ، من الشائع استخدام استخراج المعلومات وبشكل أكثر تحديدًا استخراج الحدث ، فقد أصبح أمرًا بالغ الأهمية في مختلف المجالات حتى في الصحة العامة. في هذه الورقة ، نتناول مشكلة استخراج الحدث الوبائي بأي لغة محتملة ، بحيث اختبرنا مجموعات مختلفة على نظام متعدد اللغات موجود لعلم الأوبئة عن بُعد: تحليل البيانات لاستخراج المعلومات في أي نظام (DANIEL). ركزنا على تأثير عدد الوثائق على أداء النظام ، في المتوسط تظهر النتائج أنه قادر على تحقيق دقة واسترجاع حوالي 82٪ ، ولكن عندما لجأنا إلى التقييم بالحدث عن طريق التحقق مما إذا كان قد تم تم اكتشافه بالفعل أم لا ، النتائج غير مرضية وفقًا لتقييم هذه الورقة. تتمثل فكرتنا في اقتراح نظام يستخدم علم الوجود يتضمن معلومات بلغات مختلفة ويغطي مفاهيم وبائية محددة ، كما أنه يعتمد على استخراج المعلومات المفتوحة متعدد اللغات لخطوة استخراج العلاقة لتقليل تدخل الخبراء وتقييد المحتوى لكل منها نص. نصف منهجية من خمس مراحل رئيسية: المعالجة المسبقة ، واستخراج العلاقة ، والتعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER) ، والتعرف على الأحداث والمطابقة بين المعلومات المستخرجة والأنطولوجيا.', 'fr': "Il existe une quantité incroyable d'informations disponibles sous forme de documents textuels en raison de la croissance des sources d'information. Afin de rendre les informations exploitables, il est courant d'utiliser l'extraction d'informations et plus particulièrement l'extraction d'événements, elle est devenue cruciale dans divers domaines, même en santé publique. Dans cet article, nous abordons le problème de l'extraction des événements épidémiques dans n'importe quelle langue, de sorte que nous avons testé différents corpus sur un système multilingue existant de téléépidémiologie\xa0: le système d'analyse de données pour l'extraction d'informations dans n'importe quelle langue (DANIEL). Nous nous sommes concentrés sur l'influence du nombre de documents sur les performances du système, en moyenne les résultats montrent qu'il est capable d'atteindre une précision et un rappel d'environ 82%, mais lorsque nous avons eu recours à l'évaluation par événement en vérifiant s'il a été réellement détecté ou non, les résultats ne sont pas satisfaisants selon l'évaluation de ce document. Notre idée est de proposer un système qui utilise une ontologie qui inclut des informations dans différentes langues et couvre des concepts épidémiologiques spécifiques. Il est également basé sur l'extraction d'informations ouvertes multilingues pour l'étape d'extraction de relation afin de réduire l'intervention d'experts et de restreindre le contenu pour chaque texte. Nous décrivons une méthodologie en cinq étapes principales\xa0: le prétraitement, l'extraction de relations, la reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER), la reconnaissance d'événements et la mise en correspondance entre les informations extraites et l'ontologie.", 'es': 'Hay una cantidad increíble de información disponible en forma de documentos textuales debido al crecimiento de las fuentes de información. Para que la información sea procesable, es común utilizar la extracción de información y, más específicamente, la extracción de eventos, se convirtió en crucial en varios dominios, incluso en la salud pública. En este artículo, abordamos el problema de la extracción de eventos epidémicos en cualquier idioma, de modo que probamos diferentes cuerpos en un sistema multilingüe existente para la tele-epidemiología: el sistema de análisis de datos para la extracción de información en cualquier idioma (DANIEL). Nos centramos en la influencia del número de documentos en el rendimiento del sistema, en promedio los resultados muestran que es capaz de lograr una precisión y recordar alrededor del 82%, pero cuando recurrimos a la evaluación por evento comprobando si realmente se ha detectado o no, los resultados no son satisfactorios de acuerdo con la evaluación de este artículo. Nuestra idea es proponer un sistema que utilice una ontología que incluya información en diferentes idiomas y cubra conceptos epidemiológicos específicos, también se base en la extracción de información abierta multilingüe para la etapa de extracción de relaciones para reducir la intervención de expertos y restringir el contenido de cada texto. Describimos una metodología de cinco etapas principales: preprocesamiento, extracción de relaciones, reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER), reconocimiento de eventos y correspondencia entre la información extraída y la ontología.', 'pt': 'Há uma quantidade incrível de informações disponíveis na forma de documentos textuais devido ao crescimento das fontes de informação. Para obter a informação de forma acionável, é comum o uso de extração de informações e mais especificamente a extração de eventos, tornou-se crucial em vários domínios até mesmo na saúde pública. Neste artigo, abordamos o problema da extração de eventos epidêmicos em potencialmente qualquer idioma, de modo que testamos diferentes corpus em um sistema multilíngue existente para tele-epidemiologia: o sistema Data Analysis for Information Extraction in any Language (DANIEL). Focamos na influência do número de documentos no desempenho do sistema, em média os resultados mostram que ele é capaz de atingir uma precisão e recall em torno de 82%, mas quando recorremos à avaliação por evento verificando se foi realmente detectados ou não, os resultados não são satisfatórios de acordo com a avaliação deste trabalho. Nossa ideia é propor um sistema que utilize uma ontologia que inclua informações em diferentes idiomas e abranja conceitos epidemiológicos específicos, também se baseie na extração de informação aberta multilíngue para a etapa de extração de relações para reduzir a intervenção do especialista e restringir o conteúdo para cada texto. Descrevemos uma metodologia de cinco etapas principais: pré-processamento, extração de relação, reconhecimento de entidade nomeada (NER), reconhecimento de evento e o casamento entre a informação extraída e a ontologia.', 'ja': '情報源の増加により、テキスト文書の形で利用可能な情報は驚くほど多い。 情報を実行可能な方法で取得するためには、情報抽出を使用することが一般的であり、より具体的にはイベント抽出は、公衆衛生においてさまざまなドメインで重要になりました。 この論文では、潜在的にどの言語でも流行事象抽出の問題に取り組んでいるため、既存のテレエピデミオロジー用の多言語システム：任意の言語での情報抽出のためのデータ分析（ DANIEL ）システムで異なるコーパスをテストしました。 システムの性能に及ぼす文書数の影響に着目し、平均的な結果では82%前後の精度とリコールが可能であることを示したが、実際に検出されたか否かを確認して事象別の評価を行ったところ、本稿の評価によれば満足できる結果ではなかった。 私たちのアイデアは、異なる言語の情報を含み、特定の疫学的概念をカバーするオントロジーを使用するシステムを提案することです。また、専門家の介入を減らし、各テキストのコンテンツを制限するために、関係抽出ステップのための多言語オープン情報抽出に基づいています。 ここでは、事前処理、関係抽出、名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）、イベント認識、および抽出された情報とオントロジーとのマッチングの5つの主要な段階からなる方法論について説明します。', 'zh': '信息源长,文档供难以置信信息量。 所以然者,常以息取之,更具体地说事取之,虽在公共卫生域,亦在各个领域为重。 于本文中,以一切语言提流行病事,故于见远程流行病学多言系统上试语料库:一切语言(DANIEL)系统取数据分析。 臣等详考文档数对系统性能之化,平均结果表明,能致82%左右之精度召率,然当检校其真否,据本评估而不顾也。 臣等意为一统,当统用本体,兼异言之息而涵盖特定流行病学其概,盖取步骤之多言开其息取,以省干预而限文本也。 述五要:预处理者,取也,命曰实知(NER),事曰信息,体曰匹配。', 'hi': 'सूचना स्रोतों के विकास के कारण पाठ्य दस्तावेजों के रूप में उपलब्ध जानकारी की एक अविश्वसनीय राशि है। जानकारी को कार्रवाई योग्य तरीके से प्राप्त करने के लिए, जानकारी निष्कर्षण और अधिक विशेष रूप से घटना निष्कर्षण का उपयोग करना आम है, यह सार्वजनिक स्वास्थ्य में भी विभिन्न डोमेन में महत्वपूर्ण हो गया। इस पेपर में, हम संभावित रूप से किसी भी भाषा में महामारी घटना निष्कर्षण की समस्या को संबोधित करते हैं, ताकि हमने टेली-एपिडेमियोलॉजी के लिए एक मौजूद बहुभाषी प्रणाली पर विभिन्न कॉर्पस का परीक्षण किया: किसी भी भाषा (डैनियल) प्रणाली में सूचना निष्कर्षण के लिए डेटा विश्लेषण। हमने सिस्टम के प्रदर्शन पर दस्तावेजों की संख्या के प्रभाव पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया, औसत परिणाम बताते हैं कि यह एक परिशुद्धता प्राप्त करने और लगभग 82% को याद करने में सक्षम है, लेकिन जब हमने घटना द्वारा मूल्यांकन का सहारा लिया कि क्या यह वास्तव में पता चला है या नहीं, तो परिणाम इस पेपर के मूल्यांकन के अनुसार संतोषजनक नहीं हैं। हमारा विचार एक ऐसी प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करना है जो एक आंटोलॉजी का उपयोग करता है जिसमें विभिन्न भाषाओं में जानकारी शामिल है और विशिष्ट महामारी विज्ञान अवधारणाओं को शामिल किया गया है, यह विशेषज्ञ हस्तक्षेप को कम करने और प्रत्येक पाठ के लिए सामग्री को प्रतिबंधित करने के लिए संबंध निष्कर्षण चरण के लिए बहुभाषी खुली जानकारी निष्कर्षण पर भी आधारित है। हम पांच मुख्य चरणों की एक पद्धति का वर्णन करते हैं: पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण, संबंध निष्कर्षण, नामित इकाई मान्यता (एनईआर), घटना मान्यता और निकाली गई जानकारी और आंटोलॉजी के बीच मिलान।', 'ru': 'Имеется невероятный объем информации в виде текстовых документов в связи с ростом источников информации. Для того, чтобы получить информацию в действенный способ, это часто использовать извлечение информации и, более конкретно, извлечение события, он стал решающим в различных областях даже в общественном здравоохранении. В этой статье мы рассматриваем проблему извлечения эпидемических событий на потенциально любом языке, так что мы протестировали различные корпуса на существующей многоязычной системе для телеэпидемиологии: системе анализа данных для извлечения информации на любом языке(DANIEL). Мы сосредоточились на влиянии количества документов на производительность системы, в среднем результаты показывают, что она способна достичь точности и вспомнить около 82%, но когда мы прибегали к оценке по событию, проверяя, действительно ли она была обнаружена или нет, результаты не являются удовлетворительными согласно оценке этой статьи. Наша идея заключается в том, чтобы предложить систему, которая использует онтологию, включающую информацию на разных языках и охватывающую конкретные эпидемиологические концепции, а также основанную на многоязычном извлечении открытой информации для этапа извлечения отношений, чтобы уменьшить экспертное вмешательство и ограничить содержание для каждого текста. Мы описываем методологию пяти основных этапов: предварительная обработка, извлечение отношений, распознавание именованных сущностей (NER), распознавание событий и сопоставление извлеченной информации с онтологией.', 'ga': 'Tá méid dochreidte faisnéise ar fáil i bhfoirm doiciméad téacsúil mar gheall ar fhás na bhfoinsí faisnéise. Chun an fhaisnéis a chur ar bhealach inghníomhaithe, is coitianta úsáid a bhaint as eastóscadh faisnéise agus go sonrach as eastóscadh imeachtaí, bhí sé ríthábhachtach i réimsí éagsúla fiú i sláinte an phobail. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar fhadhb an eastóscadh teagmhais eipidéime i dteanga ar bith a d’fhéadfadh a bheith ann, ionas go ndearnamar tástáil ar chorpais éagsúla ar chóras ilteangach do theile-eipidéimeolaíocht a bhí ann cheana: an córas Anailíse Sonraí le haghaidh Eastóscadh Faisnéise i dTeanga ar bith (DANIEL). Dhíríomar ar an tionchar atá ag líon na ndoiciméad ar fheidhmíocht an chórais, ar an meán léiríonn torthaí go bhfuil sé in ann beachtas agus cuimhne a bhaint amach thart ar 82%, ach nuair a chuaigh muid i muinín na meastóireachta de réir imeacht trí sheiceáil cibé an ndearnadh é. i ndáiríre faoi deara nó nach bhfuil, níl na torthaí sásúil de réir mheastóireacht an pháipéir seo. Is é an smaoineamh atá againn córas a mholadh a úsáideann ontology lena n-áirítear faisnéis i dteangacha éagsúla agus a chlúdaíonn coincheapa eipidéimeolaíocha sonracha, tá sé bunaithe freisin ar an eastóscadh faisnéise oscailte ilteangach don chéim eastósctha gaol chun idirghabháil na saineolaithe a laghdú agus an t-ábhar a shrianadh do gach ceann acu. téacs. Déanaimid cur síos ar mhodheolaíocht de chúig phríomhchéim: Réamhphróiseáil, eastóscadh caidrimh, aithint aonáin ainmnithe (NER), aithint imeachtaí agus an mheaitseáil idir an fhaisnéis a bhaintear agus an ontology.', 'el': 'Υπάρχει ένα απίστευτο ποσό πληροφοριών διαθέσιμο με τη μορφή κειμένων λόγω της αύξησης των πηγών πληροφοριών. Για να φέρουμε τις πληροφορίες σε ένα πρακτικό τρόπο, είναι συνηθισμένο να χρησιμοποιούμε την εξαγωγή πληροφοριών και πιο συγκεκριμένα την εξαγωγή γεγονότων, έγινε κρίσιμη σε διάφορους τομείς ακόμη και στη δημόσια υγεία. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα της εξαγωγής επιδημιακών συμβάντων σε δυνητικά οποιαδήποτε γλώσσα, έτσι ώστε να δοκιμάσουμε διαφορετικά σώματα σε ένα υπάρχον πολύγλωσσο σύστημα τηλεεπιδημιολογίας: την ανάλυση δεδομένων για εξαγωγή πληροφοριών σε οποιαδήποτε γλώσσα. Εστιάσαμε στην επιρροή του αριθμού των εγγράφων στην απόδοση του συστήματος, κατά μέσο όρο τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι είναι σε θέση να επιτύχει ακρίβεια και ανάκληση περίπου 82%, αλλά όταν καταφύγαμε στην αξιολόγηση ανά συμβάν ελέγχοντας αν έχει όντως ανιχνευθεί ή όχι, τα αποτελέσματα δεν είναι ικανοποιητικά σύμφωνα με την αξιολόγηση της παρούσας εργασίας. Η ιδέα μας είναι να προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα που χρησιμοποιεί μια οντολογία που περιλαμβάνει πληροφορίες σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες και καλύπτει συγκεκριμένες επιδημιολογικές έννοιες, βασίζεται επίσης στην πολύγλωσση ανοικτή εξαγωγή πληροφοριών για το βήμα εξαγωγής σχέσεων για τη μείωση της παρέμβασης εμπειρογνωμόνων και τον περιορισμό του περιεχομένου για κάθε κείμενο. Περιγράφουμε μια μεθοδολογία πέντε βασικών σταδίων: Προεπεξεργασία, εξαγωγή σχέσεων, αναγνώριση ονομαστικής οντότητας (αναγνώριση γεγονότων και αντιστοίχιση μεταξύ των πληροφοριών που εξάγονται και της οντολογίας.', 'ka': 'ტექსტუალური დოკუმენტების ფორმაში შესაძლებელი ინფორმაცია არსებობს, რომელიც ინფორმაციის ფორმენტების გაზრუქმებად. ინფორმაციას აკეთექციურად გავაკეთოთ, ინფორმაციის გამოყენება და განსაკუთრებით ინფორმაციის გამოყენება და განსაკუთრებით ინფორმაციის გამოყენება იყო მნიშვნელოვანი საზოგადოებო ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ პრობლემას ეპედემიკური მოვლენების ექსტრექციის პრობლემას პრობლემაზე პოტენციალურად ყველა ენაში, რადგან ჩვენ განსხვავებული კოპუზები ტელეფედემილოგიის მრავალენგური სისტემის შესახებ ჩვენ გავაკეთებეთ სისტემის წარმოდგენისთვის დოკუმენტების რაოდენობას, საშუალოდ წარმოდგენისთვის, რომ ის შეუძლებელია წარმოდგენა 82%, მაგრამ როდესაც ჩვენ გავაკეთებეთ მოვლენისთვის მოვლენისთვის მოვლენისთვის შევცვალოთ თუ არა მართლაც გან ჩვენი იდეა არის ჩვენი სისტემა, რომელიც განსხვავებული ენაში ინფორმაციას გამოყენებს, რომელიც განსხვავებული ეპედემიოლოგიური კონცექტების განსაზღვრება, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული ეპედემიოლოგიური ინფორმაციის გამოყენება, რომელიც განსაზ ჩვენ აღწერეთ ხუთ მნიშვნელოვანი ტაზების მეტოლოგია: წინაპროცესი, პირდაპროცესი ექსტრაქცია, სახელი ინტერტიკის განაცნობა (NER), მოვლენების განაცნობა და ინტეროლოგიის განმავლობა', 'hu': 'Hihetetlen mennyiségű információ áll rendelkezésre szöveges dokumentumok formájában az információforrások növekedésének köszönhetően. Annak érdekében, hogy az információ cselekvésre kerüljön, gyakran használják az információkinyerést, konkrétabban az eseménykinyerést, ami különböző területeken is kulcsfontosságúvá vált még a közegészségügyben is. Ebben a tanulmányban potenciálisan bármilyen nyelven foglalkozunk a járványos események kivonásának problémájával, így különböző vállalatokat teszteltünk egy létező többnyelvű teleepidemiológiai rendszeren: az adatelemzés az információkivonáshoz bármilyen nyelven (DANIEL) rendszeren. A dokumentumok számának a rendszer teljesítményére gyakorolt hatására összpontosítottunk, átlagos eredmények azt mutatják, hogy képes elérni a pontosságot és mintegy 82%-os visszahívást, de amikor eseményenkénti értékeléshez folyamodtunk azzal, hogy ellenőrizzük, hogy valóban észlelték-e vagy sem, az eredmények nem kielégítőek a tanulmány értékelése szerint. Elképzelésünk az, hogy olyan ontológiát használjunk, amely különböző nyelvű információkat tartalmaz és konkrét járványügyi fogalmakat lefed, emellett a kapcsolatkivonás lépéséhez szükséges többnyelvű nyílt információkinyerésen alapul, hogy csökkentsük a szakértői beavatkozást és korlátozzuk az egyes szövegek tartalmát. Öt fő szakaszból álló módszertant írunk le: előfeldolgozás, kapcsolat extrakció, nevezett entitás felismerés (NER), eseményfelismerés, valamint a kinyert információ és az ontológia összehangolása.', 'lt': 'Dėl informacijos šaltinių augimo turima nepaprastai daug informacijos tekstinių dokumentų pavidalu. Siekiant, kad informacija būtų įmanoma įgyvendinti, dažnai naudojama informacijos gavyba ir konkrečiau renginių gavyba, ji tapo labai svarbi įvairiose srityse net visuomenės sveikatos srityje. Šiame dokumente sprendžiame epideminių įvykių išgavimo problem ą potencialiai bet kuria kalba, kad išbandėme skirtingus kūnus pagal egzistuojančią daugiakalbę teleepidemiologijos sistemą: informacijos išgavimo bet kuria kalba duomenų analizę (DANIEL). Mes sutelkėme dėmesį į dokumentų skaičiaus įtaką sistemos veikimui, vidutiniai rezultatai rodo, kad ji gali pasiekti tikslumą ir prisiminti apie 82 proc., tačiau kai pasinaudojome vertinimu kiekvienu atveju patikrindami, ar jis buvo iš tikrųjų aptiktas, ar ne, rezultatai, remiantis šio dokumento vertinimu, nėra patenkinami. Mūsų idėja yra pasiūlyti sistemą, kurioje būtų naudojama ontologija, kuri apimtų informaciją skirtingomis kalbomis ir konkrečias epidemiologines sąvokas, ji taip pat grindžiama daugiakalbe atviros informacijos gavimu santykių gavimo etapui siekiant sumažinti ekspertų intervenciją ir apriboti kiekvieno teksto turinį. Apibrėžiama penkių pagrindinių etapų metodika: išankstinis apdorojimas, santykių išgavimas, vardinis subjekto pripažinimas (NER), įvykių pripažinimas ir gautos informacijos ir ontologijos suderinimas.', 'it': "C'è un'incredibile quantità di informazioni disponibili sotto forma di documenti testuali a causa della crescita delle fonti di informazione. Al fine di ottenere le informazioni in modo attuabile, è comune utilizzare l'estrazione di informazioni e più precisamente l'estrazione di eventi, è diventato cruciale in vari settori anche nella sanità pubblica. In questo articolo, affrontiamo il problema dell'estrazione di eventi epidemici in potenzialmente qualsiasi lingua, in modo che abbiamo testato diversi corpi su un sistema multilingue esistente per la teleepidemiologia: il sistema di analisi dei dati per l'estrazione di informazioni in qualsiasi lingua (DANIEL). Ci siamo concentrati sull'influenza del numero di documenti sulle prestazioni del sistema, in media i risultati mostrano che è in grado di raggiungere una precisione e richiamare circa l'82%, ma quando abbiamo fatto ricorso alla valutazione per evento verificando se è stato effettivamente rilevato o meno, i risultati non sono soddisfacenti secondo la valutazione di questo documento. La nostra idea è quella di proporre un sistema che utilizzi un'ontologia che includa informazioni in diverse lingue e copra specifici concetti epidemiologici, che si basi anche sull'estrazione multilingue di informazioni aperte per la fase di estrazione delle relazioni per ridurre l'intervento degli esperti e limitare il contenuto di ogni testo. Descriviamo una metodologia di cinque fasi principali: Pre-elaborazione, estrazione delle relazioni, riconoscimento delle entità denominate (NER), riconoscimento degli eventi e corrispondenza tra le informazioni estratte e l'ontologia.", 'kk': 'Мәтін құжаттар түрінде мәтін құжаттарының көзі өсіруінің себебі келмейтін мәлімет саны бар. Бұл мәліметті әрекетті көмектесу үшін, мәліметті тарқату және оқиғаларды тарқату үшін көпшілік болып, көпшілікті саулықтардың әртүрлі домендерде де маңызды болды. Бұл қағазда, біз епидемиялық оқиғаларды кез келген тілде тарқату мәселесін шешіп, телеэпидемиология үшін бірнеше тілді корпустарды тексердік: мәліметті тарқату үшін деректерді анализ (DANIEL) жүйесінде болатын. Біз жүйеңіздің жылдамдығына құжаттар санының нәтижесіне көмектесіп, орташа нәтижелері 82% деген дұрыстығын жеткізуге болады, бірақ оқиға дейін оқиғаны тексеріп тұрғанда нәтижелер осы қағаздың бағалауына сәйкес келмейді. Біздің идеямыз - басқа тілдерде мәліметті қолданатын онтологиясын қолдану жүйесіне жұмыс істеу және оның бірнеше епидемиологиялық концепцияларын қолдану жүйесіне, сондай-ақ оны бірнеше тілдерді ашық мәліметті тарқату қадамына нег Біз бес негізгі этаптардың методологиясын таңдаймыз: алдын- процесс, қатынас тарту, аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER), оқиғаларды анықтау және онтологияны тарту мәліметінің арасындағы сәйкестігі.', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഉറവിട വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d രേഖകളുടെ രൂപത്തില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനരഹിതമായ രീതിയിലേക്ക് കിട്ടാന്\u200d സാധാരണമാണ്, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എടുക്കുന്നതും പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് സംഭവിക്കുന്നതും പ്രത്യേ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എപ്പിഡിമിക്ക് സംഭവിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നത്തെപ്പറ്റിയുള്ള പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് നാം നിലവിലുള്ള പല ഭാ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ എണ്ണം രേഖകളുടെ പ്രഭാവം നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു അതിന്റെ വിശദീകരണത്തിന് സാധിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നത്.  വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുകയും പ്രത്യേക വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് നമ്മുടെ ആശയം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാകുന്നു. വിശേഷികളുടെ ഇടപെടുത് അഞ്ച് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സ്റ്റേജുകളുടെ ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നാം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു: മുമ്പ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്, ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്, ശരാര', 'ms': 'There is an incredible amount of information available in the form of textual documents due to the growth of information sources.  Untuk mendapatkan maklumat dalam cara yang boleh dilakukan, ia adalah biasa untuk menggunakan pengekstrakan maklumat dan lebih khusus pengekstrakan peristiwa, ia menjadi penting dalam berbagai bidang walaupun dalam kesehatan awam. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi masalah ekstraksi peristiwa epidemi dalam mana-mana bahasa yang berpotensi, sehingga kita menguji mayat yang berbeza pada sistem berbilang bahasa yang wujud untuk epidemiologi-tele: Analisi Data untuk ekstraksi Maklumat dalam mana-mana sistem bahasa (DANIEL). Kami fokus pada pengaruh bilangan dokumen pada prestasi sistem, pada keputusan rata-rata menunjukkan bahawa ia mampu mencapai ketepatan dan mengingat sekitar 82%, tetapi apabila kami menggunakan penilaian dengan peristiwa dengan memeriksa sama ada ia telah benar-benar dikesan atau tidak, keputusan tidak memuaskan menurut penilaian kertas ini. Idea kita ialah untuk melamar sistem yang menggunakan ontologi yang termasuk maklumat dalam bahasa yang berbeza dan meliputi konsep epidemiologi spesifik, ia juga berdasarkan ekstraksi maklumat terbuka berbilang bahasa untuk langkah ekstraksi hubungan untuk mengurangi intervensi ahli dan untuk membatasi kandungan bagi setiap teks. Kami menggambarkan metodologi lima tahap utama: Pre-proses, ekstraksi hubungan, pengenalan entiti bernama (NER), pengenalan peristiwa dan persamaan antara maklumat ekstrak dan ontologi.', 'mt': 'Hemm ammont eċċellenti ta’ informazzjoni disponibbli fil-forma ta’ dokumenti testwali minħabba t-tkabbir tas-sorsi ta’ informazzjoni. Sabiex l-informazzjoni tinħoloq b’mod li jista’ jsir azzjoni, huwa komuni li tintuża l-estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni u b’mod aktar speċifiku l-estrazzjoni tal-avvenimenti, saret kruċjali f’diversi oqsma anke fis-saħħa pubblika. F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw il-problema tal-estrazzjoni tal-avvenimenti epidemiċi f’potenzjalment kwalunkwe lingwa, sabiex ittestjawna korpi differenti fuq sistema multilingwi eżistenti għat-teleepidemjoloġija: l-Analiżi tad-Dejta għall-estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni fi kwalunkwe sistema lingwistika (DANIEL). Aħna ffukajna fuq l-influwenza tan-numru ta’ dokumenti fuq il-prestazzjoni tas-sistema, fuq medja tar-riżultati juru li hija kapaċi tikseb preċiżjoni u tfakkar madwar 82%, iżda meta rrikorrejna għall-evalwazzjoni b’każ billi niċċekkjaw jekk ġietx realment skoperta jew le, ir-riżultati mhumiex sodisfaċenti skont l-evalwazzjoni ta’ dan id-dokument. L-idea tagħna hija li nipproponu sistema li tuża ontoloġija li tinkludi informazzjoni f’lingwi differenti u tkopri kunċetti epidemjoloġiċi speċifiċi, hija bbażata wkoll fuq l-estrazzjoni multilingwi ta’ informazzjoni miftuħa għall-pass ta’ estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni biex jitnaqqas l-intervent espert u jiġi ristrett il-kontenut għal kull test. Aħna niddeskrivu metodoloġija ta’ ħames stadji ewlenin: Pre-ipproċessar, estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni, rikonoxximent imsejjaħ tal-entità (NER), rikonoxximent tal-avvenimenti u tqabbil bejn l-informazzjoni estratta u l-ontoloġija.', 'mn': 'Мэдээллийн эх үүсвэрүүдийн өсөлтэй учраас textual баримт хэлбэрээр маш олон мэдээллийн хэмжээтэй байдаг. Энэ мэдээллийг үйл ажиллагааны арга болгохын тулд, мэдээллийг авах нь ихэвчлэн хэрэглэх боломжтой. Яг тодорхой үйл явдлыг авах нь олон нийгмийн эрүүл мэндэд ч маш чухал болсон. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ямар ч хэл дээр эмгэгтэй үйл явдал гаргахын асуудлыг судалж байлаа. Тиймээс бид tele-эпидемиологийн олон хэлний системд өөр корпус шалгаж байлаа: хэл(DANIEL) системд мэдээлэл гаргах өгөгдлийн шинжилгээ. Бид системийн үйл ажиллагаанд баримтуудын тоо нөлөөнд анхаарлаа хандуулж, дундаж үр дүн нь 82%-ын тоо баримтууд хүрэх боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ бид үйл ажиллагаанд үнэхээр мэдэгдсэн эсэхийг шалгаж үзэхээр үйл ажиллагаанд хүрэх үед үр дүн нь энэ цаасан дүгнэлттэй харагдаж хан Бидний санаа бол олон хэлний нээлттэй мэдээллийг ашиглаж, мэргэжилтнүүдийн оролцоог багасгаж, мөн текст бүрт бүтээгдэхүүнийг хязгаарлахын тулд олон хэлний нээлттэй мэдээллийг авах алхам дээр ашиглах системийг санал болгох юм. Бид таван үндсэн хэмжээний методологийг тайлбарлаж байна: өмнө үйлдвэрлэл, хамааралтай хамааралтай, нэрлэгдсэн бүтэц таних (NER), үйл явдал таних болон онтологийн хоорондох мэдээллийн хоорондох холбоотой холбоотой.', 'mk': 'Постои неверојатна количина информации достапни во форма на текстуални документи поради растот на изворите на информации. За да се добие информацијата на акционален начин, често е да се користи извлекувањето информации и посебно извлекувањето на настаните, стана клучна во различни области дури и во јавното здравје. In this paper, we address the problem of the epidemic event extraction in potentially any language, so that we tested different corpuses on an existed multilingual system for tele-epidemiology: the Data Analysis for Information Extraction in any Language(DANIEL) system.  Ние се фокусиравме на влијанието на бројот на документи на перформансата на системот, на просечните резултати покажуваат дека е во можност да постигне прецизност и да се потсети околу 82 отсто, но кога се пријавивме на проценката по настан со проверка дали е навистина детектиран или не, резултатите не се задоволни според проценката на овој документ. Нашата идеја е да предложиме систем кој користи онтологија која вклучува информации на различни јазици и покрива специфични епидемиолошки концепти, исто така се базира на мултијазичното отворено извлекување информации за чекорот на извлекување на односите за намалување на експертската интервенција и ог We describe a methodology of five main stages: Pre-processing, relation extraction, named entity recognition (NER), event recognition and the matching between the information extracted and the ontology.', 'no': 'Det finst eit utrolig mengde informasjon tilgjengeleg i form av tekstdokument på grunn av veksten av informasjonskjelder. For å få informasjonen til ein handling måte, er det vanleg å bruka utpakking av informasjon og meir spesifikke utpakking av hendingane, og det var viktig i ulike domene sjølv i offentlige helse. I denne papiret vert vi oppretta problemet med epidemiske hendingar i potensielt nokon språk, slik at vi testa ulike korpusar på eit eksisterande multispråksystem for teleepidemiologi: Data Analysis for Information Extraction i alle språk (DANIEL). Vi fokuserte på antallet dokument på utviklinga av systemet, på gjennomsnittlige resultat viser at det kan oppnå eit nøyaktig og rekna rundt 82%, men når vi rekorde til evalueringa ved hendinga ved å kontrollere om det er verkeleg oppdagt eller ikkje, er resultatet ikkje tilfredsstillende etter evalueringa av papiret. Ideen vårt er å foreslå eit systemet som brukar ein ontologi som inneheld informasjon i ulike språk og dekkar spesifikke epidemiologiske konseptar, og det er også basert på den fleirspråk opna informasjon-ekstraksjonen for den tilhøyrande ekstraksjonsstaden for å redusera ekspertintervensjonen og begrensa innhaldet for kvar tekst. Vi beskriver ein metodologi på fem hovudstader: førehandsaming, forbindelse utpakking, namnet entitetskjenning (NER), hendingsskjenning og samsvar mellom informasjonen utpakka og ontologien.', 'sr': 'Postoji neverovatna količina informacija dostupna u obliku tekstualnih dokumenta zbog rasta izvora informacija. Da bi se informacije uključile na akcionalni način, uobičajeno je iskoristiti izvlačenje informacija i posebnije izvlačenje događaja, postalo je ključno u raznim domenama čak i u javnom zdravlju. U ovom papiru rješavamo problem ekstrakcije epidemijskih događaja u potencijalnom jeziku, tako da smo testirali različite korpuse na postojećem multijezičkom sistemu teleepidemiologije: analiza podataka za ekstrakciju informacija u bilo kom jeziku (DANIEL). Fokusirali smo se na uticaj broja dokumenta na provedbu sistema, na prosječnim rezultatima pokazuju da je u mogućnosti ostvariti preciznost i sjetiti se oko 82%, ali kada smo došli do procjene događajem provjeravajući da li je stvarno otkriven ili ne, rezultati nisu zadovoljavajući prema procjeni ovog papira. Naša ideja je da predložimo sistem koji koristi ontologiju koja uključuje informacije na različitim jezicima i pokriva specifične epidemiološke koncepte, takođe se temelji na izvlačenju multijezičkih otvorenih informacija za korak izvlačenja odnosa da smanji stručnu intervenciju i ograniči sadržaj za svaki tekst. Mi opisujemo metodologiju pet glavnih faza: predobrazovanje, izvlačenje odnosa, priznanje entiteta (NER), priznanje događaja i odgovaranje između izvlačenih informacija i ontologije.', 'pl': 'Istnieje niesamowita ilość informacji dostępnych w postaci dokumentów tekstowych ze względu na rozwój źródeł informacji. Aby uzyskać informacje w sposób możliwy do działania, powszechne jest stosowanie ekstrakcji informacji, a dokładniej ekstrakcji zdarzeń, stało się to kluczowe w różnych dziedzinach nawet w zdrowiu publicznym. W niniejszym artykule poruszamy problem ekstrakcji zdarzeń epidemicznych w potencjalnie dowolnym języku, dzięki czemu testowaliśmy różne korpusy na istniejącym wielojęzycznym systemie teleepidemiologii: Analizę Danych dla Ekstrakcji Informacji w dowolnym języku (DANIEL). Skupiliśmy się na wpływie liczby dokumentów na wydajność systemu, średnio wyniki pokazują, że jest on w stanie osiągnąć precyzję i odzyskać około 82%, jednak kiedy uciekamy się do oceny według zdarzenia sprawdzając, czy został on rzeczywiście wykryty, wyniki nie są zadowalające według oceny niniejszego artykułu. Naszą ideą jest zaproponowanie systemu wykorzystującego ontologię zawierającą informacje w różnych językach i obejmującego konkretne koncepcje epidemiologiczne, opartego również na wielojęzycznej otwartej ekstrakcji informacji dla etapu ekstrakcji relacji w celu ograniczenia interwencji ekspertów i ograniczenia treści każdego tekstu. Opisujemy metodologię pięciu głównych etapów: przetwarzanie wstępne, ekstrakcja relacji, rozpoznawanie nazwanych jednostek (NER), rozpoznawanie zdarzeń oraz dopasowanie wyekstraktowanych informacji do ontologii.', 'so': 'Wixii macluumaad la yaab leh waxaa laga helaa foomka dukumentiyada qoraalka ah sababtoo ah koritaanka sourceoyinka macluumaadka. In order to get the information into an actionable way, it is common to use information extraction and more specifically the event extraction, it became crucial in various domains even in public health.  Warqadan waxaynu ku sheekaynaa dhibaatada dhacda cudurka ku dhaca luuqad kasta, si aan ugu tijaabinay koonfur kala duduwan oo ku qoran nidaamka afka tele-epidemiologiga: Analyska macluumaadka soo bixinta ee luuqad kasta (DANIEL). Waxaan ku kalsoonaynay saamaynta dukumentiyada oo ku saabsan sameynta nidaamka, dhamaadka waxyaabaha ku saabsan waxay tusi kartaa inay gaadhi karto saxda iyo xusuusan karto qiyaastii 82 boqolkiiba, laakiin markaynu qiimeynta dhacdooyinka ku galnay baaritaanka si dhab ah loo ogaaday iyo in kale, resultiyadu ma raalli karo sida qiimeynta warqaddan ah. Fikiradayadu waa in la soo jeedo nidaam isticmaalaya wargelin ku qoran luuqado kala duduwan oo ku daboola fikrada cudurada cudurada, waxaa sidoo kale lagu saleeyaa soo bixinta macluumaadka furan ee luuqadaha kala duduwan si uu u hoosaysiiyo qaabilaada aqoonta iyo uu ku xadiriyo waxyaabaha ay qoraal walba u leeyihiin. Waxaynu sawirannaa qaab ka mid ah shan marxaladood oo muhiim ah: ka hor baaraandegista, ka soo bixinta xiriirka, magaca aqoonsashada entity (NER), aqoonsashada dhacdooyinka iyo u eg macluumaadka la soo saaray iyo ontology.', 'ro': 'Există o cantitate incredibilă de informații disponibile sub formă de documente textuale datorită creșterii surselor de informații. Pentru a obține informațiile într-un mod activ, este obișnuit să se utilizeze extragerea informației și mai precis extragerea evenimentului, a devenit crucială în diverse domenii chiar și în domeniul sănătății publice. În această lucrare, abordăm problema extragerii evenimentelor epidemice în potențial orice limbă, astfel încât am testat diferite corporații pe un sistem multilingv existent pentru teleepidemiologie: Analiza datelor pentru extragerea informațiilor în orice limbă (DANIEL). Ne-am concentrat asupra influenței numărului de documente asupra performanței sistemului, rezultatele medii arată că acesta este capabil să atingă o precizie și să reamintească aproximativ 82%, dar atunci când am recurs la evaluarea pe eveniment prin verificarea dacă a fost cu adevărat detectat sau nu, rezultatele nu sunt satisfăcătoare conform evaluării acestei lucrări. Ideea noastră este de a propune un sistem care să utilizeze o ontologie care să includă informații în limbi diferite și să acopere concepte epidemiologice specifice, acesta se bazează, de asemenea, pe extragerea informației deschise multilingve pentru etapa de extragere a relațiilor pentru a reduce intervenția expertului și pentru a restricționa conținutul fiecărui text. Descriem o metodologie cuprinsă în cinci etape principale: Pre-procesare, extragerea relațiilor, recunoașterea entității denumite (NER), recunoașterea evenimentelor și potrivirea dintre informațiile extrase și ontologie.', 'si': 'Name සම්බන්ධ විදියට තොරතුරු ගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට, ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට තොරතුරු ගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විද මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධයෙන් හැම භාෂාවක් වල, ඉතින් අපි විවිධ භාෂාවක්  අපි පද්ධතියේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ඒක 82% විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ඒත් අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  අපේ අදහසය තමයි පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් භාෂාවයේ තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වගේම විශේෂ භාෂාවික සැකසුම් සඳහා විශේෂ භාෂාවික තොර අපි ප්\u200dරධාන පහක් ස්ථානයක් විස්තර කරනවා: ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරවේශනය, සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය, නම් අයිතික අඳුරණය (NER), සිද්ධානය අඳ', 'ur': 'اطلاعات سروروں کے بڑھنے کے سبب متکسل دفتروں کی شکل میں بہت بڑی معلومات موجود ہے. ان معلومات کو فعال کے طریقے سے پہنچانے کے لئے، معلومات اخراج کا استعمال کرنا اور اس سے زیادہ مختلف طریقے میں اخراج کا استعمال کرنا مشکل ہے، یہ مختلف دامنوں میں اہلِ سلامتی میں بھی اہلِ ضرورت ہوگیا۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ہر زبان میں اپنا اپیڈیمیٹ ایڈیمیٹ اکٹرک کے مسئلہ میں مشکل کریں گے، اس لئے ہم نے ٹیلی-اپیڈیمیٹ کے لئے ایک موجود ملتی زبان سیستم پر مختلف کورپوس کی آزمائش کی تھی: ہر زبان (DANIEL) سیسٹم میں اطلاعات کے اضافہ کے لئے ہم نے سیسٹم کی عملکرد پر سند کی تعداد پر تمرکز کیا ہے، متوسط نتائج پر دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ ایک دقیق پہنچ سکتا ہے اور حدود 82 فیصد تک یاد کرسکتا ہے، لیکن جب ہم ایسے مطابق کے ذریعہ تحقیق کے ذریعہ موجود ہوتے ہیں کہ یہ واقعی معلوم کیا گیا ہے یا نہیں، نتائج اس کاغذ کی ارزیابی کے مطابق satisfactory نہیں ہیں. ہماری نظر یہ ہے کہ ایک سیستم کی پیشنهاد کرنا ہے جو ایک آنٹولوژی کا استعمال کرتا ہے جو مختلف زبانوں میں معلومات شامل کرتا ہے اور مختلف اپیڈیمیولوژیک نظریں پر پورے کرتا ہے، یہ بھی مختلف زبانوں کے کھلے معلومات کے اضافہ پر بنیاد ہے کہ اسے معلومات کے اضافہ کے لئے کم کرنا اور ہر متن ہم پانچ اصلی مرحلہ کے مطابق طریقہ کا مفصل بیان کرتے ہیں: پیش پردازی، ارتباط اخراج، نام داری شناسایی (NER), حادثہ شناسایی اور اخراج ہوئی معلومات اور آنٹولوژی کے درمیان مطابق.', 'ta': 'தகவல் மூலத்தின் வளர்ச்சியினால் உரை ஆவணங்களின் வடிவத்தில் கிடைக்கும் மிகவும் நம்பிக்கையான அளவு தகவல் உள்ளது. செயல்படும் வழியில் தகவலை பெறுவதற்கு, தகவல் பிரித்தல் மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட நிகழ்வு பெறுதலை பயன்படுத்துவது பொதுவாக இருக்கும், பொது சுக இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் சாத்தியமாக எந்த மொழியிலும் பிரச்சனையின் பிரச்சனையை விளக்குகிறோம், எனவே நாம் வேறு மொழியில் இருந்த பல மொழிகள் அமைப்பில் சோதிக்கிறோம்  நாம் கணினியின் செயல்பாட்டின் எண்ணிக்கையின் பாக்கியங்களை கவனம் செலுத்தினோம், சராசரி முடிவு நம்முடைய ய யோசனை என்னவென்றால் வேறு மொழிகளில் தகவலை பயன்படுத்தும் மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட நோயியல் கருத்துக்களை மறைக்கும் முறைமையில் திறந்த தகவல் வெளியீட்டின் தொடர்பு இடைவ நாம் ஐந்து முக்கிய நிலைகளின் முறைமையை விவரிக்கிறோம்: முன் செயல்படுத்தல், தொடர்பு பெறுதல், பொருள் அடையாளம் (NER), நிகழ்வு அடையாளம் மற்றும்', 'sv': 'Det finns en otrolig mängd information tillgänglig i form av textdokument på grund av ökningen av informationskällor. För att få informationen på ett handlingsbart sätt är det vanligt att använda informationsutvinning och mer specifikt händelseutvinning, det blev avgörande inom olika områden även inom folkhälsan. I denna uppsats behandlar vi problemet med epidemisk händelseutvinning på potentiellt vilket språk som helst, så att vi testade olika kroppar på ett existerande flerspråkigt system för teleepidemiologi: Data Analysis for Information Extraction in any Language (DANIEL)-system. Vi fokuserade på hur många dokument påverkar systemets prestanda, i genomsnitt visar resultaten att det kan uppnå en precision och återkalla runt 82%, men när vi tilltog oss utvärderingen per händelse genom att kontrollera om det verkligen har upptäckts eller inte, är resultaten inte tillfredsställande enligt denna uppsats utvärdering. Vår idé är att föreslå ett system som använder sig av en ontologi som innehåller information på olika språk och täcker specifika epidemiologiska begrepp, det är också baserat på flerspråkig öppen informationsutvinning för relationsextraktionssteget för att minska expertinterventionen och begränsa innehållet för varje text. Vi beskriver en metod av fem huvudsteg: Förbehandling, relationsextraktion, namngiven entitetsigenkänning (NER), händelseigenkänning och matchning mellan den extraherade informationen och ontologin.', 'uz': "@ info Maʼlumotni amalga oshirish uchun, ma'lumotni ajratish uchun oddiy narsa va hodisa ajratish uchun foydalanish mumkin. Bu har xil domeyalarda huddi shaxsiy soʻzda ham muhim edi. Bu qogʻozda, biz hech qachon tilda epidemik uchrashuvning muammolarini boshqaramiz, shunday qilib tele- epidemiologiya uchun har xil xil tizimni sinab ko'plab ko'plab ko'plab ko'plab ko'rinishimiz mumkin. Maʼlumot Taʼlumot tarjimasi boshqa tillar tizimda (DANIEL) tizimda. Biz tizimning amalni bajarishga qarab hujjatlar sonini foydalanamiz, o'rtacha natijalarida o'sha natijalarni koʻrsatish mumkin, u davomida 82 foizni bajarishi mumkin, lekin biz hodisa o'ylaganimiz haqida, bu qogʻozning qiymatlari haqida o'ylaganimiz mumkin. Bizning fikrimiz, oddiy o'ylab, boshqa tillarda ma'lumot qo'llangan, va xusus epidemiologik g'oyalarni qaraydi, bu ekspert intervention kamaytirish va har bir matnning tarkibini kamaytirish uchun muloqali ochiq maʼlumotni ajratish uchun muloqat tarkibiga qaraydi. Biz besh asosiy darajadagi metodini tahlil qilamiz: boshqarish oldin, murojaat ajratishdan oldin, tashkilotni tasdiqlash (NER), hodisa tasdiqlash va tuzilgan maʼlumot va ontologiya orasidagi bir qiymati.", 'vi': 'Có một lượng thông tin đáng kinh ngạc có thể cung cấp dưới dạng các tài liệu kết cấu do sự phát triển của các nguồn thông tin. Để có thông tin có thể hành động, người ta thường dùng việc trích xuất thông tin và đặc biệt là các sự kiện, nó trở nên quan trọng trong nhiều lĩnh vực khác nhau, thậm chí trong sức khỏe cộng đồng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giải quyết vấn đề về các sự kiện dịch bệnh ở bất kỳ ngôn ngữ nào có thể, để chúng tôi thử nghiệm các tập thể khác nhau trên một hệ thống đa dạng của dịch truyền hình tồn tại: phân tích dữ liệu để đào tạo thông tin trong bất kỳ hệ thống ngôn ngữ nào. Chúng tôi tập trung vào ảnh hưởng của s ố tài liệu về hiệu quả của hệ thống, trên mức trung bình kết quả cho thấy nó có khả năng đạt được sự chính xác và ghi nhớ khoảng 82. Nhưng khi chúng tôi sử dụng đánh giá từng sự kiện bằng cách kiểm tra xem nó đã được phát hiện hay chưa, kết quả không thỏa đáng theo đánh giá của tờ giấy này. Ý tưởng của chúng tôi là đề xuất một hệ thống... sử dụng một hệ thống khảo cổ... chuyên gồm thông tin ở các ngôn ngữ khác nhau... và bao gồm các khái niệm lây lan đặc biệt, nó cũng dựa trên việc khai thác thông tin đa dạng... cho giai đoạn phân chia các mối quan hệ... để giảm sự can thiệp chuyên gia và hạn chế nội dung cho mỗi văn bản. Chúng tôi mô tả một phương pháp có năm giai đoạn chính: tiền xử lý, giải cứu mối quan hệ, nhận dạng thực thể tên (NER), nhận diện sự kiện và kết hợp giữa thông tin chiết xuất và khảo cổ học.', 'bg': 'Има невероятно количество информация под формата на текстови документи поради нарастването на информационните източници. За да се получи информацията по осъществим начин, често се използва извличане на информация и по-конкретно извличането на събития, тя стана от решаващо значение в различни области дори в общественото здраве. В настоящата статия разглеждаме проблема с извличането на епидемични събития на потенциално всеки език, така че тествахме различни корпуси на съществуваща многоезична система за телеепидемиология: Анализ на данните за извличане на информация във всеки език (ДАНИЕЛ). Фокусирахме се върху влиянието на броя на документите върху работата на системата, като средно резултатите показват, че тя е в състояние да постигне прецизност и да си припомни около 82%, но когато прибегнахме до оценка по събитие чрез проверка дали тя наистина е открита или не, резултатите не са задоволителни според оценката на тази статия. Идеята ни е да предложим система, която използва онтология, която включва информация на различни езици и обхваща специфични епидемиологични концепции, тя също така се основава на многоезична открита информация за етапа извличане на връзката, за да се намали експертната намеса и да се ограничи съдържанието на всеки текст. Описваме методология от пет основни етапа: Предварителна обработка, извличане на релации, разпознаване на наименовани субекти (НЕР), разпознаване на събития и съвпадение между извлечената информация и онтологията.', 'da': 'Der er en utrolig mængde oplysninger til rådighed i form af tekstdokumenter på grund af væksten i informationskilder. For at få oplysningerne til handling er det almindeligt at bruge informationsudvinding og mere specifikt begivenhedsudvindingen, det blev afgørende på forskellige områder, selv inden for folkesundheden. I denne artikel behandler vi problemet med udvinding af epidemiske hændelser på potentielt et hvilket som helst sprog, således at vi testede forskellige korpuser på et eksisterende flersproget system til teleepidemiologi: Data Analysis for Information Extraction in any Language (DANIEL)-system. Vi fokuserede på indflydelsen af antallet af dokumenter på systemets ydeevne, gennemsnitlige resultater viser, at det er i stand til at opnå en præcision og tilbagekalde omkring 82%, men når vi tog til evalueringen efter begivenhed ved at kontrollere, om det virkelig er blevet opdaget eller ej, er resultaterne ikke tilfredsstillende ifølge denne papirs evaluering. Vores idé er at foreslå et system, der anvender en ontologi, der indeholder information på forskellige sprog og dækker specifikke epidemiologiske begreber, det er også baseret på den flersprogede åbne informationsudtrækning til relationsudtrækningstrinet for at reducere ekspertingrebet og begrænse indholdet for hver tekst. Vi beskriver en metode i fem hovedfaser: Pre-processing, relation ekstraktion, navngivet entitetsgenkendelse (NER), begivenhedsgenkendelse og matching mellem de udvundne oplysninger og ontologien.', 'id': 'There is an incredible amount of information available in the form of textual documents due to the growth of information sources.  Untuk mendapatkan informasi dalam cara yang dapat dilakukan, umum menggunakan ekstraksi informasi dan lebih spesifik ekstraksi peristiwa, itu menjadi penting dalam berbagai bidang bahkan dalam kesehatan publik. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengatasi masalah ekstraksi peristiwa epidemi dalam bahasa apapun yang berpotensi, sehingga kami menguji mayat yang berbeda pada sistem multibahasa yang ada untuk epidemiologi telepon: Analisi Data untuk ekstraksi Informasi dalam sistem bahasa apapun (DANIEL). Kami fokus pada pengaruh dari jumlah dokumen pada prestasi sistem, pada rata-rata hasil menunjukkan bahwa ia mampu mencapai presisi dan mengingat sekitar 82%, tetapi ketika kami menggunakan evaluasi dengan peristiwa dengan memeriksa apakah itu benar-benar terdeteksi atau tidak, hasil tidak memuaskan menurut evaluasi kertas ini. Ide kita adalah untuk mengusulkan sebuah sistem yang menggunakan ontologi yang termasuk informasi dalam bahasa yang berbeda dan meliputi konsep epidemiologi spesifik, juga berdasarkan ekstraksi informasi terbuka multibahasa untuk langkah ekstraksi hubungan untuk mengurangi intervensi ahli dan untuk membatasi isi untuk setiap teks. Kami menggambarkan metodologi dari lima tahap utama: Pre-proses, ekstraksi hubungan, pengenalan entitas bernama (NER), pengenalan peristiwa dan persamaan antara informasi ekstraksi dan ontologi.', 'hr': 'Postoji nevjerojatna količina informacija dostupna u obliku tekstualnih dokumenta zbog rasta izvora informacija. Kako bi se informacije uključile na djelatni način, uobičajeno je iskoristiti ekstrakciju informacija i posebnije izvlačenje događaja, postalo je ključno u raznim domenama čak i u javnom zdravlju. U ovom papiru rješavamo problem izvlačenja epidemijskih događaja u potencijalnom jeziku, tako da smo testirali različite tijela na postojećem multijezičkom sustavu teleepidemiologije: analiza podataka za izvlačenje informacija u bilo kojem jeziku (DANIEL). Fokusirali smo se na utjecaj broja dokumenta na provedbu sustava, na prosječni rezultati pokazuju da je u mogućnosti ostvariti preciznost i sjetiti se oko 82%, ali kada smo došli do procjene događajem provjeravajući da li je stvarno otkriven ili ne, rezultati nisu zadovoljni prema procjeni ove papire. Naša ideja je da predložimo sustav koji koristi ontologiju koja uključuje informacije na različitim jezicima i pokriva specifične epidemiološke koncepte, također se temelji na izvlačenju multijezičkih otvorenih informacija za korak izvlačenja odnosa kako bi smanjila stručnu intervenciju i ograničila sadržaj za svaki tekst. Mi opisujemo metodologiju pet glavnih faza: predobrazovanje, izvlačenje odnosa, priznanje imena entiteta (NER), priznanje događaja i odgovaranje između izvlačenih informacija i ontologije.', 'ko': '정보원의 증가로 인해 텍스트 문서 형식으로 제공되는 정보의 수가 놀랍다.정보를 조작 가능한 방식으로 바꾸기 위해 일반적으로 정보 추출을 사용하는데 더욱 구체적으로 말하면 사건 추출은 각 분야, 심지어 공공 위생 분야에서 매우 중요하다.본고에서 우리는 잠재적인 모든 언어의 유행병 사건 추출 문제를 해결했기 때문에 기존의 원격 유행병학 다중 언어 시스템에서 서로 다른 소체인 모든 언어 정보 추출의 데이터 분석(DANIEL) 시스템을 테스트했다.우리는 문서 수량이 시스템 성능에 미치는 영향을 중점적으로 연구했는데 평균 결과에 의하면 이 시스템은 82% 정도의 정확도와 리콜율에 도달할 수 있으나 우리가 문서를 실제로 검출했는지 검사할 때 이벤트 평가를 실시한 결과 만족스럽지 못했다.우리의 생각은 본체를 사용하는 시스템을 제시하는 것이다. 이 본체는 서로 다른 언어의 정보를 포함하고 특정한 유행병학 개념을 포함한다. 또한 다중 언어를 바탕으로 정보 추출을 개방하여 관계 추출 절차에 활용하여 전문가의 간섭을 줄이고 모든 텍스트의 내용을 제한한다.우리는 예처리, 관계 추출, 명명 실체 식별(NER), 이벤트 식별과 추출된 정보가 본체와 일치하는 다섯 가지 주요 단계의 방법을 묘사했다.', 'sw': 'Kuna kiasi kikubwa cha taarifa zinazopatikana katika mfumo wa nyaraka za maandishi kutokana na ongezeko la vyanzo vya habari. Ili kupata taarifa katika njia inayofanya kazi, ni jambo la kawaida kutumia utoaji wa habari na hasa utekelezaji wa tukio hilo, lilikuwa muhimu katika maeneo mbalimbali hata katika afya ya umma. In this paper, we address the problem of the epidemic event extraction in potentially any language, so that we tested different corpuses on an existed multilingual system for tele-epidemiology: the Data Analysis for Information Extraction in any Language(DANIEL) system.  Tulijikita kwenye madhara ya idadi ya nyaraka juu ya utendaji wa mfumo, kwa matokeo ya wastani yanaonyesha kuwa inaweza kufikia maelezo na kukumbuka takribani asilimia 82, lakini tulipotumia uchunguzi wa tukio kwa kuangalia kama imegunduliwa kweli au la, matokeo hayakuwa na furaha kwa mujibu wa tathmini ya gazeti hili. Wazo letu ni kupendekeza mfumo unaotumia utaalam ambao unajumuisha taarifa katika lugha tofauti na kuhusiana na dhana maalum za ugonjwa wa ugonjwa wa kigonjwa, pia inatokana na maeneo ya wazi ya habari katika lugha mbalimbali ili kupunguza hatua ya utekelezaji wa wataalam na kuzuia maudhui kwa kila maandishi. Tunaelezea mbinu za hatua muhimu tano: Utafiti wa mbele, utambulisho wa mahusiano, jina la kutambuliwa kwa entity (NER), kutambuliwa kwa tukio na kufananishwa kwa taarifa zilizotolewa na utambulisho huo.', 'nl': 'Er is een ongelooflijke hoeveelheid informatie beschikbaar in de vorm van tekstdocumenten als gevolg van de groei van informatiebronnen. Om de informatie op een bruikbare manier te krijgen, is het gebruikelijk om informatie extractie en meer specifiek de event extractie te gebruiken, het werd cruciaal in verschillende domeinen, zelfs in de volksgezondheid. In dit artikel behandelen we het probleem van de epidemische gebeurtenis extractie in potentieel elke taal, zodat we verschillende corpus testen op een bestaand meertalig systeem voor tele-epidemiologie: het Data Analysis for Information Extraction in any Language (DANIEL) systeem. We concentreerden ons op de invloed van het aantal documenten op de prestaties van het systeem, gemiddeld laten de resultaten zien dat het in staat is om een nauwkeurigheid te bereiken en terug te roepen rond 82%, maar wanneer we toevlucht namen tot de evaluatie per gebeurtenis door te controleren of het daadwerkelijk is gedetecteerd of niet, zijn de resultaten volgens de evaluatie van dit document niet bevredigend. Ons idee is om een systeem voor te stellen dat gebruikmaakt van een ontologie die informatie in verschillende talen bevat en specifieke epidemiologische concepten omvat, het is ook gebaseerd op de meertalige open informatie extractie voor de relatieontwikkeling stap om de deskundige interventie te verminderen en de inhoud van elke tekst te beperken. We beschrijven een methodologie van vijf hoofdfasen: Voorverwerking, relatieontwikkeling, naamloze entiteitsherkenning (NER), gebeurtenisherkenning en het matchen tussen de geëxtraheerde informatie en de ontologie.', 'fa': 'یک مقدار باورنکردنی از اطلاعات در شکل سند متن وجود دارد به دلیل رشد منابع اطلاعات. برای اینکه اطلاعات را به یک طریق فعال کننده بگیریم، معمولاً استفاده از اخراج اطلاعات و دقیقاً اخراج از رویداد استفاده می\u200cکند، حتی در سلامت عمومی به عنوان کلی مهم شد. در این کاغذ، ما مشکل اخراج رویداد epidemic را در احتمالاً هر زبانی حل می کنیم، بنابراین ما جسد مختلف را در یک سیستم multilingual وجود دارد برای تل-epidemiology: تحلیل داده برای اخراج اطلاعات در هر سیستم زبان(DANIEL) آزمایش کردیم. ما روی تأثیر تعداد مدارک روی فعالیت سیستم تمرکز کردیم، در نتیجه متوسط نشان می دهیم که می تواند یک دقیق و تقریباً 82 درصد را به یاد آوریم، ولی وقتی ما به ارزیابی از رویداد با بررسی که آیا واقعاً شناسایی شده یا نه، نتیجه\u200cها بر اساس ارزیابی این کاغذ satisfactory نیستند. ایده\u200cی ما این است که سیستم\u200cای را پیشنهاد کنیم که از آنتونولوژی استفاده می\u200cکند که اطلاعات را در زبان\u200cهای مختلف شامل می\u200cکند و مفهوم\u200cهای اپیدمولوژیک خاص را پوشانده می\u200cکند، همچنین بر استخراج اطلاعات بسیاری از زبان\u200cهای باز برای مرحله\u200cی استخراج ارتباط برای کاهش interv ما روش\u200cشناسی پنج مرحله اصلی را توصیف می\u200cکنیم: پیش\u200cپرداخت، ارتباط اخراج، شناسایی عنوان (NER)، شناسایی حادثه و هماهنگی بین اطلاعات اخراج شده و آنتولوژی.', 'tr': 'Maglumat täze bolmagy sebäbi metin senediň şeklinde elýeterli maglumat bar. Malümaty etkinleşen bir ýolä üýtgetmek üçin, informasiýa açmak üçin dürli bolup, we olaryň açylygynyň has hem halk saglygynda örän möhüm boldy. Bu kagyzda, epidemiýa çykyş ähli dilde nähili çykyş kynçylygynyň meselesini çözerip bardyk, şonuň üçin tele-epidemiologiýasy üçin bar bir multi dil sisteminde farklı korpuslary bardyk: Maglumat Çikmegi üçin Maglumat analizi(DANIEL) sisteminde. Biz sistemiň başarylygynda ýagdaýyň sanynyň täsirine üns berdik, ýöne ortalama netijesinde bu ýagdaýyň deňleşligi başarap bilmedigini we 82%-den mysal etmäge mümkin edýändigini görkezilýäris, ýöne biz bu ýagdaýyň deňleşligini barlap netijesi çykyp bilmedigini barlap netijesi bu ýagdaýyň deňleşligine gör Biziň pikirimiz, farklı dillerde maglumat dahil eden ontologiýany ulanan sistemany teklip etmekdir we munuň munuň esasy epidemiolojik düşünceleri ýok bolmagy üçin multi dilli a çyk maglumat tapmaklygyna daýan ýar. Biz beş esal taýýarlaryň bir methodologisini tassyýarys: öňki işleýän, gaýd etmek,entik tanaýmasy', 'de': 'Es gibt eine unglaubliche Menge an Informationen in Form von Textdokumenten aufgrund des Wachstums von Informationsquellen zur Verfügung. Um die Informationen in eine umsetzbare Weise zu bringen, ist es üblich, Informationsextraktion und genauer gesagt die Ereignisextraktion zu verwenden, wurde es in verschiedenen Bereichen sogar in der öffentlichen Gesundheit entscheidend. In diesem Beitrag behandeln wir das Problem der Epidemieereignisextraktion in potenziell jeder Sprache, so dass wir verschiedene Korpuse auf einem bestehenden mehrsprachigen System für Teleepidemiologie getestet haben: dem Data Analysis for Information Extraction in any Language (DANIEL)-System. Wir konzentrierten uns auf den Einfluss der Anzahl der Dokumente auf die Leistung des Systems, im Durchschnitt zeigen die Ergebnisse, dass es in der Lage ist, eine Genauigkeit und Rückruf um 82% zu erreichen, aber wenn wir auf die Bewertung nach Ereignis zurückgreifen, indem wir überprüfen, ob es wirklich erkannt wurde oder nicht, sind die Ergebnisse nach der Bewertung dieses Papiers nicht zufriedenstellend. Unsere Idee ist es, ein System vorzuschlagen, das eine Ontologie verwendet, die Informationen in verschiedenen Sprachen enthält und spezifische epidemiologische Konzepte abdeckt, es basiert auch auf der mehrsprachigen offenen Informationsextraktion für den Beziehungsextraktionsschritt, um den Experteneingriff zu reduzieren und den Inhalt für jeden Text einzuschränken. Wir beschreiben eine Methodik aus fünf Hauptstufen: Vorverarbeitung, Beziehungsextraktion, Named Entity Recognition (NER), Ereigniserkennung und das Matching zwischen der extrahierten Information und der Ontologie.', 'sq': 'Ka një sasi të pabesueshme informacioni në dispozicion në form ën e dokumenteve tekstuale për shkak të rritjes së burimeve të informacionit. Për të marrë informacionin në një mënyrë të veprueshme, është e zakonshme të përdorësh nxjerrjen e informacionit dhe më specifikisht nxjerrjen e ngjarjes, ajo u bë vendimtare në fusha të ndryshme edhe në shëndetin publik. Në këtë letër, ne trajtojmë problem in e nxjerrjes së ngjarjeve epidemike në çdo gjuhë, në mënyrë që ne testuam trupa të ndryshme në një sistem shumëgjuhës ekzistues për teleepidemiologjinë: Analizën e të dhënave për nxjerrjen e informacionit në çdo sistem gjuhësh (DANIEL). Ne u përqëndruam në ndikimin e numrit të dokumenteve mbi performancën e sistemit, në rezultatet mesatare tregojnë se është në gjendje të arrijë një saktësi dhe të kujtojë rreth 82%, por kur u kthyem në vlerësimin me ngjarje duke kontrolluar nëse është vërtet zbuluar apo jo, rezultatet nuk janë të kënaqshme sipas vlerësimit të kësaj letre. Ideja jonë është të propozojmë një sistem që përdor një ontologji që përfshin informacion në gjuhë të ndryshme dhe mbulon koncepte epidemiologjike të posaçme, ajo bazohet gjithashtu në nxjerrjen shumëgjuhëse të informacionit të hapur për hapin e nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve për të reduktuar ndërhyrjen e ekspertëve dhe për të kufizuar përmbajtjen për çdo tekst. Ne përshkruajmë një metodologji të pesë fazave kryesore: paraprocesimi, nxjerrja e marrëdhënieve, njohja e emëruar e njësisë (NER), njohja e ngjarjeve dhe përputhja midis informacionit të nxjerrë dhe ontologjisë.', 'af': "Daar is 'n ongelukkige hoeveelheid inligting beskikbaar in die vorm van teks dokumente vanweë die groei van inligting bronne. Om die inligting in 'n aksioneerbare manier te kry, is dit gemeenskap om inligting uitpakking te gebruik en meer spesifieke die gebeurtenis uitpakking te gebruik, het dit gekruisig geword in verskeie domeine selfs in openbare gesondheid. In hierdie papier, ons adres die probleem van die epidemiese gebeurtenis uitvoer in potensieal enige taal, sodat ons verskillende korpus op 'n bestaande multitaalske stelsel vir tele- epidemiologie toeprobeer: die Data Analisie vir Informasie uitvoer in enige taal (DANIEL) stelsel. Ons het gefokus op die aantal dokumente op die presisie van die stelsel, op gemiddelde resultate vertoon dat dit 'n presisie kan bereik en omtrent 82% herhaal, maar wanneer on s die evaluasie deur die gebeurtenis gekry het deur te kontroleer of dit regtig gevind is of nie, die resultate is nie versadig volgens hierdie papier se evaluasie. Ons idee is om 'n stelsel te voorstel wat 'n ontologie gebruik wat inligting in verskillende tale insluit en spesifieke epidemiologiese konsepte oordek, dit is ook gebaseer op die multitaalse oop inligting uitpakking vir die verwanting uitpakking stap om die ekspertiese intervensie te verklein en die inhoud vir elke teks te beperk. Ons beskrywe 'n metodologie van vyf hoofstadige: voorafverwerking, verwanting uitpakking, genoem entiteit herken (NER), gebeurtenis herken en die ooreenstemming tussen die inligting uitpak en die ontologie.", 'az': 'Malümat kaynaqlarının yetişməsi üzündən textual belgeler formasında mövcuddur. Malümatı hərəkətli bir yola gətirmək üçün, malümatı çıxartmaq və olaraq çıxartmaq daha müxtəlif olaraq, halkı sağlamlıq içində hətta müxtəlif sahələrdə çox vacib oldu. Bu kağızda epidemik olaraq hər cür dildə problem çəkirik. Beləliklə tele-epidemioloji üçün müxtəlif bir dil sistemində fərqli korpusları imtahana çəkdik: hər dil(DANIEL) sistemində məlumat çəkilməsi üçün Data Analysis for Information Extraction. Biz sistemin təcrübələrinin sayıs ına təsiri göstərdik, ortalama sonuçlarında təcrübəsinin 82%-i təcrübəsini qəbul edə biləcəyini və yada salmağa qadir olduğunu göstərdik, amma olaraq təcrübə ilə təcrübəsini təşkil etdiyimiz zaman, sonuçlar bu kağıt təcrübəsinin uyğunlaşdırılmasına görə təşkil edilmişdir. Bizim fikrimiz, fərqli dillərdə məlumatları daxil edən ontoloji istifadə edən və müəyyən epidemiolojik fikirləri daxil edən bir sistemə təklif etməkdir, bu da müxtəlif intervenciyi azaltmaq və hər metin içərisində məlumatları müəyyən etmək üçün çoxlu dil a çıq məlumatlar ekstraksiyasına dayanılır. Biz beş ana fəzillərin metodiklərini təsdiqləyirik: əvvəlcə işləmə, əlaqəsi çıxartma, adı ilə təsdiqlənmiş entitə tanıması (NER), olaraq tanıması və çıxarılmış məlumat və ontoloji arasındakı eşitmə.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ሰነዱን በማድረግ መልክ የሚችል የጽሑፍ ሰነዱን ማድረግ የሚችል መረጃ አለ፡፡ መረጃውን ለመሥራት በተደረገ መንገድ ለማግኘት፣ መረጃ ማውጣት እና በተለየ ሁኔታ እየተለየ ጥቅምት በመጠቀም የተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የደዌብ ግጭት ቋንቋ ማንኛውንም ልዩ ቋንቋ እናስቸግረዋለን፣ ስለዚህም ለቴሌቪዩኖጂ በተገኘው ብዙዎችን የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ድምፅ ላይ ተፈትተናል፡፡ የሰነዶች ቁጥር በጥያቄ ውጤቶች ላይ ማስታወቂያውን እና በ82 በመቶ ማሳሰቢያ እንዲችል እና ማስታወስ እንዲችል እናደርጋለን፡፡ አሳባችን በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ መረጃዎችን የሚጠቀም እና የተለየ የepidemiological አካሄኖችን የሚሸፍን የግንኙነት መረጃዎችን ለመውጣት በተለየ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች የክፈት መረጃዎችን ለመውሰድ እና ለሁሉም ጽሑፎችን ማቀናቀል ለመጠበቅ የተደረገ ነው፡፡ የአምስት መጀመሪያ ደረጃዎች፣ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት፣ አካል ማስታወሻ (NER)፣ የግንኙነት ማስታወቂያ እና በተለወጠው መረጃ እና በኦንቶሎጂ መካከል ተቃውሞ እና የሚተያያየውን ድርጊት እና እና ትክክል እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'তথ্য উৎস বৃদ্ধির কারণে টেক্সচুয়াল ডকুমেন্টের ফর্মে অদ্ভুত তথ্য পাওয়া যাচ্ছে। তথ্য কার্যকর উপায়ে প্রবেশ করার জন্য, তথ্য বের করার জন্য সাধারণ এবং বিশেষ করে অনুষ্ঠান বিভিন্ন ডোমেনে এমনকি পাবলিক স্বাস্থ্যে বিভিন এই কাগজটিতে আমরা যে কোন ভাষায় এই অস্থায়ী ঘটনার বিরুদ্ধে বিভিন্ন কোর্পাসের বিষয়টি নিয়ে কথা বলি, যাতে আমরা টেলিভিডিওমিওলিয়ার জন্য বিভিন্ন ভাষায় পরীক্ষা করেছি: যে কোন ভাষ আমরা সিস্টেমের প্রভাবের উপর নথিপত্রের সংখ্যার প্রভাব নিয়ে মনোযোগ দিয়েছি, গড়ের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে এটি সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করতে পারে এবং স্মরণ করতে পারে ৮২ শতাংশ, কিন্তু যখন আমরা এই অনুষ্ঠানের মূল্যের মাধ্যম আমাদের চিন্তা হচ্ছে একটি সিস্টেম প্রস্তাব করা যা বিভিন্ন ভাষায় তথ্য ব্যবহার করে এবং বিশেষ ভাষায় বিশেষ ভাষায় তথ্য প্রকাশ করে এবং বিশেষজ্ঞদের মধ্যে বিষয়বস্তুকে কমিয়ে দেয়ার জন আমরা পাঁচটি প্রধান পর্যায়ের একটি পদ্ধতি বর্ণনা করেছি: প্রক্রিয়ার পূর্বে, সম্পর্ক বের করার, নামের বস্তু স্বীকৃতি নামে (NER), অনুষ্ঠান স্বীকৃতি', 'bs': 'Postoji nevjerojatna količina informacija dostupna u obliku tekstualnih dokumenta zbog rasta izvora informacija. Da bi se informacije uključile na djelatni način, uobičajeno je iskoristiti ekstrakciju informacija i posebnije izvlačenje događaja, postalo je ključno u raznim domenama čak i u javnom zdravlju. U ovom papiru rješavamo problem izvlačenja epidemijskih događaja u potencijalnom jeziku, tako da smo testirali različite korpuse na postojećem multijezičkom sistemu teleepidemiologije: analiza podataka za izvlačenje informacija u bilo kom jeziku (DANIEL). Fokusirali smo se na utjecaj broja dokumenta na provedbu sustava, na prosječni rezultati pokazuju da je u stanju ostvariti preciznost i sjetiti se oko 82%, ali kada smo došli do procjene događajem provjeravajući da li je stvarno otkriven ili ne, rezultati nisu zadovoljavajući prema procjeni ovog papira. Naša ideja je da predložimo sistem koji koristi ontologiju koja uključuje informacije na različitim jezicima i pokriva specifične epidemiološke koncepte, također se temelji na izvlačenju multijezičkih otvorenih informacija za korak izvlačenja odnosa da smanji stručnu intervenciju i ograniči sadržaj za svaki tekst. Mi opisujemo metodologiju pet glavnih faza: preobradu, izvlačenje odnosa, priznanje entiteta (NER), priznanje događaja i odgovaranje između izvlačenih informacija i ontologije.', 'hy': "Գոյություն ունի անհավատալի քանակությամբ տեղեկատվություն, որը հասանելի է տեքստային փաստաթղթերի տեսքով տեղեկատվական աղբյուրների աճի պատճառով: Որպեսզի տեղեկատվությունը գործողական ձևով փոխանցվի, տարածված է օգտագործել տեղեկատվության վերացումը, և առավել հատկապես իրադարձությունների վերացումը, այն դարձավ կարևոր տարբեր ոլորտներում նույնիսկ հանրային առողջության ոլորտում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք համաճարակի իրադարձությունների վերացման խնդիրը պոտենցիալ ցանկացած լեզվով, որպեսզի փորձենք տարբեր մարմիններ հեռահամաճարակի գոյություն ունեցող բազլեզու համակարգի վրա' տեղեկատվության վերացման տվյալների վերլուծությունը ցանկացած լեզվով (DAN Մենք կենտրոնացանք համակարգի արդյունքի վրա փաստաթղթերի թվի ազդեցության վրա, միջին արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ այն կարողանում է հասնել ճշգրտության և հիշել 82 տոկոսը, բայց երբ մենք վերադարձանք գնահատման միջոցով, ստուգելով, արդյոք այն իսկապես հայտնաբերվել է, թե ոչ, արդյունքները բավարար չեն, ըստ այս Մեր գաղափարն այն է, որ առաջարկենք մի համակարգ, որը օգտագործում է օնտոլոգիա, որը ներառում է տեղեկատվություն տարբեր լեզուներում և ներառում է հատուկ համաճարաբանական գաղափարներ, այն նաև հիմնված է բաց բաց բազմալեզու տեղեկատվության վերացման քայլի վրա հարաբերությունների վերացման համար փոքրացնելու մասնա Մենք նկարագրում ենք հինգ հիմնական աստիճանի մեթոդոլոգիան' նախավերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ, անվանել", 'et': 'Infoallikate kasvu tõttu on tekstidokumentide kujul kättesaadav uskumatu hulk teavet. Selleks et saada teavet tegevuslikul viisil, on tavaline kasutada teabe väljavõtmist ja täpsemalt sündmuste väljavõtmist, see muutus oluliseks erinevates valdkondades isegi rahvatervise valdkonnas. Käesolevas artiklis käsitleme epideemiasündmuste ekstraheerimise probleemi potentsiaalselt mis tahes keeles, nii et testisime erinevaid korpuseid olemasolevas mitmekeelses teleepidemioloogia süsteemis: andmeanalüüs informatsiooni ekstraheerimiseks mis tahes keeles (DANIEL) süsteemis. Me keskendusime dokumentide arvu mõjule süsteemi toimimisele, keskmiselt näitavad tulemused, et see suudab saavutada täpsuse ja tagasi kutsuda umbes 82%, kuid kui me kasutasime sündmuste kaupa hindamist, kontrollides, kas see on tõesti avastatud või mitte, ei ole tulemused vastavalt käesoleva dokumendi hinnangule rahuldavad. Meie idee on pakkuda välja süsteem, mis kasutab ontoloogiat, mis sisaldab teavet erinevates keeltes ja hõlmab konkreetseid epidemioloogilisi kontseptsioone, samuti põhineb see mitmekeelsel avatud teabe väljavõtmisel seose väljavõtmise etapil, et vähendada ekspertsekkumist ja piirata iga teksti sisu. Kirjeldame viiest peamisest etapist koosnevat metoodikat: eeltöötlus, seoste ekstraheerimine, nimetatud üksuste tunnustamine (NER), sündmuste tuvastamine ning kaevandatud teabe ja ontoloogia sobitamine.', 'fi': 'Tekstialueiden muodossa on saatavilla uskomattoman paljon tietoa tietolähteiden kasvun vuoksi. Jotta tieto saataisiin käyttökelpoiseksi, on yleistä käyttää tiedonhankintaa ja erityisesti tapahtumapoimintaa, siitä tuli ratkaiseva monilla aloilla jopa kansanterveyden alalla. Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme epidemiologisen ilmiön uuttamista mahdollisesti millä tahansa kielellä, joten testasimme erilaisia korpusia olemassa olevassa monikielisessä teleepidemiologisessa järjestelmässä: Data Analysis for Information Extraction in any Language (DANIEL) -järjestelmässä. Keskityimme asiakirjojen lukumäärän vaikutukseen järjestelmän suorituskykyyn, keskimäärin tulokset osoittavat, että se pystyy saavuttamaan tarkkuuden ja palauttamaan noin 82 prosenttia, mutta kun turvauduimme tapahtumakohtaiseen arviointiin tarkistamalla, onko se todella havaittu vai ei, tulokset eivät ole tämän asiakirjan arvioinnin mukaan tyydyttäviä. Ajatuksenamme on ehdottaa järjestelmää, joka käyttää ontologiaa, joka sisältää tietoa eri kielillä ja kattaa erityisiä epidemiologisia käsitteitä, ja se perustuu myös monikieliseen avoimeen tiedonpointiin suhteessa poimimiseen, jotta vähennetään asiantuntijainterventiota ja rajoitetaan kunkin tekstin sisältöä. Kuvaamme viisi päävaihetta käsittävän menetelmän: esikäsittely, relaatioiden uuttaminen, nimetty entiteettitunnistus (NER), tapahtumatunnistus sekä saadun tiedon ja ontologian vastaavuus.', 'ca': "Hi ha una quantitat increïble de informació disponible en forma de documents textuals degut al creixement de fonts d'informació. Per aconseguir que la informació sigui actionable, és comú utilitzar l'extracció d'informació i, més específicament, l'extracció d'eventos, es va convertir en crucial en diversos domínios fins i tot en salut pública. En aquest article, abordem el problema de l'extracció d'eventos epidèmics en potencialment qualsevol llenguatge, de manera que vam provar diferents cossos en un sistema multillenguatge existent de tele-epidèmiologia: l'an àlisi de dades per extracció d'informació en qualsevol sistema de llenguatge (DANIEL). Vam centrar-nos en l'influència del nombre de documents sobre el rendiment del sistema, en els resultats mitjans demostren que és capaç d'aconseguir una precisió i recordar al voltant del 82%, però quan vam recurrir a l'evaluació per evento comprobant si ha estat realment detectat o no, els resultats no s ón satisfactoris segons l'evaluació d'aquest paper. La nostra idea és proponer un sistema que utilitza una ontologia que inclou informació en diferents llengües i que inclou conceptes epidemiològics específics, també està basat en l'extracció multilingüe d'informació oberta per a la etapa d'extracció de relacions per reduir l'intervenció d'experts i limitar el contingut de cada text. Descrivem una metodologia de cinc etapes principals: Pre-processament, extracció de relacions, reconeixement de l'entitat anomenada (NER), reconeixement d'eventos i la comparació entre la informació extraïda i l'ontologia.", 'cs': 'Díky růstu informačních zdrojů je k dispozici neuvěřitelné množství informací ve formě textových dokumentů. Aby se informace dostaly do akčního způsobu, je běžné používat extrakci informací a konkrétně extrakci událostí, stala se klíčová v různých oblastech i ve veřejném zdraví. V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou extrakce epidemických událostí v potenciálně libovolném jazyce, takže jsme testovali různé korpusy na existujícím vícejazyčném systému pro teleepidemiologii: Data Analysis for Information Extraction in any Language (DANIEL). Zaměřili jsme se na vliv počtu dokumentů na výkonnost systému, v průměru výsledky ukazují, že je schopen dosáhnout přesnosti a odvolání kolem 82%, ale když jsme se uchýlili k hodnocení podle událostí kontrolou, zda byl skutečně zjištěn nebo ne, výsledky nejsou podle hodnocení tohoto článku uspokojivé. Naší myšlenkou je navrhnout systém, který využívá ontologii, která zahrnuje informace v různých jazycích a pokrývá specifické epidemiologické koncepty, je založen také na vícejazyčné otevřené extrakci informací pro krok extrakce vztahů, aby snížil odborný zásah a omezil obsah každého textu. Popisujeme metodiku pěti hlavních fází: Předzpracování, extrakce vztahů, rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (NER), rozpoznávání událostí a srovnávání extrahovaných informací s ontologií.', 'he': 'יש כמות מדהימה של מידע זמין בצורה של מסמכים טקסטיים בגלל הצמיחה של מקורות מידע. כדי להכניס את המידע לדרך אפשרית לפעול, זה נפוץ להשתמש בהוציאת מידע, ובמיוחד יותר בהוציאת האירועים, זה הפך קריטי בשטחים שונים אפילו בבריאות הציבורית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתייחסים לבעיה של חיפוש אירוע מגיפה בכל שפה פוטנציאלית, כך שבדיקנו גופות שונות על מערכת רבות שפות קיימת לטל-אפדימולוגיה: ניתוח נתונים להוציא מידע בכל מערכת שפה (DANIEL). התמקדנו בהשפעה של מספר המסמכים על ההופעה של המערכת, בתוצאות הממוצעות מראות שהיא מסוגלת להשיג מדויקה ולזכור בסביבות 82%, אך כאשר הגענו לערכה על ידי אירוע על ידי לבדוק אם היא באמת נגלה או לא, התוצאות לא מרוצות לפי הערכה של הנייר הזה. הרעיון שלנו הוא להציע מערכת שמשתמשת באונטולוגיה שכוללת מידע בשפות שונות וכוללת מושגים אפדימולוגיים ספציפיים, היא גם מבוססת על חיפוש מידע פתוח רב-שפתי לצעד חיפוש היחסים כדי להפחית את התערבות המומחית ולהגביל את התוכן לכל טקסט. אנחנו מתארים מטדולוגיה של חמישה שלבים ראשיים: התעסקות מראשית, חוטפת יחסים, זיהוי ישות בשם (NER), זיהוי אירועים וההתאמה בין המידע החוטף לאונטולוגיה.', 'sk': 'Zaradi rasti informacijskih virov je na voljo neverjetna količina informacij v obliki besedilnih dokumentov. Da bi informacije dobili na ukrepen način, je običajno uporabiti pridobivanje informacij in natančneje pridobivanje dogodkov, ki je postalo ključnega pomena na različnih področjih celo na področju javnega zdravja. V prispevku obravnavamo problem ekstrakcije epidemije v potencialno katerem koli jeziku, tako da smo testirali različne korpuse na obstoječem večjezičnem sistemu za teleepidemiologijo: Analiza podatkov za ekstrakcijo informacij v katerem koli jeziku (DANIEL). Osredotočili smo se na vpliv števila dokumentov na delovanje sistema, rezultati v povprečju kažejo, da je sposoben doseči natančnost in odpoklicati okoli 82%, vendar ko smo se zatekli k oceni po dogodkih s preverjanjem, ali je bil dejansko odkrit ali ne, rezultati po oceni tega prispevka niso zadovoljivi. Naša ideja je predlagati sistem, ki uporablja ontologijo, ki vključuje informacije v različnih jezikih in zajema specifične epidemiološke koncepte, temelji tudi na večjezičnem odprtem pridobivanju informacij za korak pridobivanja relacij, da bi zmanjšali strokovno intervencijo in omejili vsebino vsakega besedila. Opisujemo metodologijo petih glavnih stopenj: Predobdelava, ekstrakcija relacij, prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet (NER), prepoznavanje dogodkov in ujemanje med pridobljenimi informacijami in ontologijo.', 'ha': "Ana da ƙayyade maɓalli mai girma cikin tsarin takardun littafin na rubutu don a yi ƙaranci da sourcen information. Yana da amfani da shirin zartar da maɓallin aiki, kuma yana da amfani da cire-cire, kuma yana da muhimu a cikin dukkan wurãren daban, ko da sunan zartar da shi. Daga wannan takardan, Munã tambaya masu zartar da matsayin zartar da ke cikin wani harshe ko wani littafi, don haka kuma muka jarraba nau'i-nau'i daban'a kan wata na'ura da ke gaba a cikin na'ura wa tele-agolojiya: Analũrin Data wa Extracti da Agaji cikin wani harshe (DANIEL). Mun kiyãye muhimman takardar takardar kwamfyutan a cikakken tsarin, a kan fassarar ƙarami, yana iya isa ga cikakken ƙayyade kuma a tuna karin 82%, amma idan mun yi amfani da rabo ga shirin ayuka, ko kuma a yi dũbi ko an gane shi, matsala ba ta yarda da hakarin wannan takardar. Kayiyinmu yana bukãtar da wani na'urar da ke amfani da ɗabi'a cikin harshen daban-daban, da kuma yana rufe zato masu ƙayyadadde na'urar agogonomilojiki, yana da bakan kwamfyuta masu buɗe wa matsayin mulki-nau'i dõmin ya ƙaranci intake na masu fitarwa da kuma ya ƙunsa maɓallin kowace matsayin. Tuna bayyana wata hanyoyi na zaman aikin aiki taki: Pre-aikin aiki, Cikakken aiki da aka ambaci sunan ganin shaidar abun (NER), ganin halin da kuma mai daidaita tsakanin maɓallin da aka samu da ontogi.", 'jv': 'Ana sing dibenalke sampeyan informasi sing sampeyan nèng pada dokumen textual kaya kedaulahing informasi Anggal kang nggawe informasi ning maneh sing dikarepaké, dadi nggawe informasi tambah nggambar gambar kelas informasi tambah nggawe layang-tanggal kanggo ngerasakno, dadi wis dianggawe ing sakjane sakjane sakjane ning salang popolar. Nang pepulan iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno akeh panjenengan langgar wigatining cara-wigatining langgar sapa kesempatan, dadi awak dhéwé ujian cara-wigatining sistem sing isih saben kanggo tele-Epidaelogi: the data Test for information extract in all Language(DENIET) sistem sing berarti. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan tapi nggawe dokumen kanggo nggawe sistem sing, dadi supaya dipoleh sing beraksi kanggo awak dhéwé butawak dhéwé or a ono wektu nggawe pula kanggo awak dhéwé, maca, soalé awak dhéwé iso nggawe cara nggawe gerakan karo iCalé, dadi mbukaké ora iso nggawe nek akeh mlaku nggawe kartu iki. Awak dhéwé punika nggunakake sistem sing nggawe ontlogi sing nyebutaké informasi ning langgar sampeyan lan nggawe barang kelas diwisepe, iki dadi sak basa ning kelas informasi yang bukas luwih kanggo kelas tanggal nggawe gerakan tanggal nggawe gerakan dhéwé, mengko iso nggawe gerakan tarjamahan sing paling nggawe gerakan ingkang nggawe seneng pisan. Awak dhéwé Perintah Panjenengan langgar sampek siji wis kelompok:', 'bo': 'ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་ནང་དུ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འགྲེལ་བཤད་དང་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་དུ་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད། བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གི་ཐོག་ལས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐུག་ལས། In this paper, we address the problem of the epidemic event extraction in potentially any language, so that we tested different corpuses on an existed multilingual system for tele-epidemiology: the Data Analysis for Information Extraction in any Language(DANIEL) system. ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་ཐོག་ལས་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་ནུས་པ་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་ཡོད། Our idea is to propose a system that uses an ontology which includes information in different languages and covers specific epidemiological concepts, it is also based on the multilingual open information extraction for the relation extraction step to reduce the expert intervention and to restrict the content for each text. ང་ཚོས་རྩ་བའི་གོ་ལྔའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྲིས་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Exploiting Domain-Specific Knowledge for Judgment Prediction Is No Panacea', 'pt': 'Explorar o conhecimento específico do domínio para a previsão de julgamento não é uma panacéia', 'es': 'Explotar el conocimiento específico del dominio para la predicción de juicios no es una panacea', 'ar': 'استغلال المعرفة الخاصة بالمجال للتنبؤ بالأحكام ليس الدواء الشافي', 'fr': "L'exploitation des connaissances spécifiques à un domaine pour la prédiction du jugement n'est pas une panacée", 'zh': '以特定域之知断之,非灵丹妙药也', 'ru': 'Использование знаний о конкретных предметах для предсказания суда не является панацеей', 'ja': '判断予測のためにドメイン固有の知識を利用することは万能薬ではありません', 'hi': 'निर्णय की भविष्यवाणी के लिए डोमेन-विशिष्ट ज्ञान का शोषण कोई रामबाण नहीं है', 'ga': 'É a Bhaint Le hEolas a Bhaineann go Sonrach le Fearainn le hAghaidh Tuar Breithiúnais Ní Uile-íoc', 'ka': 'პროგრამის სპეციფიკალური მეცნიერება', 'hu': 'A tartományspecifikus ismeretek kihasználása az ítélet előrejelzésére nincs Panacea', 'el': 'Η αξιοποίηση ειδικών γνώσεων για την πρόβλεψη κρίσεων δεν είναι Πανακία', 'it': 'Sfruttare la conoscenza specifica del dominio per la previsione del giudizio non è Panacea', 'kk': 'Думиналық таңдау үшін доменге ерекше білім - панациясы жоқ', 'lt': 'Exploiting Domain-Specific Knowledge for Judgment Prediction Is No Panacea', 'mk': 'Искористувањето на знаење специфично за домен за предвидување на пресудата не е панака', 'ms': 'Penggunaan Pengetahuan Khusus Domain untuk Prediksi Penghakiman Tiada Panacea', 'ml': 'വിധിത്തീര്\u200dപ്പിനുള്ള വിധിയ്ക്കുള്ള ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ അറിവ് പുറത്തിറങ്ങുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-isfruttar ta’ l-Għarfien Speċifiku għad-Dominju għat-Tbassir tas-Sentenza mhuwiex Panaċea', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie wiedzy specyficznej dla prognozowania osądów nie jest Panacea', 'ro': 'Exploatarea cunoștințelor specifice domeniului pentru predicția judecății nu este Panacea', 'no': 'Eksplosjon av domenespesifikk kjenning for avtale er ingen Panacea', 'mn': 'Шүүмжлээ дэвшүүлэх төлөвлөгөөний төлөвлөгөөтэй мэдлэг нь Панацеа биш.', 'so': 'Ogaanshaha gaarka ah ee ku saabsan baaritaanka xukunka', 'sv': 'Att utnyttja domänspecifik kunskap för att förutsäga domar är ingen Panacea', 'sr': 'Eksplozicija domena specijalnog znanja za predviđanje suda nije Panacea', 'ta': 'தீர்ப்பு விருப்பத்திற்கான களம்- குறிப்பிட்ட அறிவிப்பு வெளியிடுகிறது பலகையில் இல்லை', 'ur': 'فیصلہ کی پیشنهاد کے لئے دامین خاص علم کا تحقیق نہیں ہے', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ඩොමේන් විශේෂ දැනගන්න', 'uz': 'Hujjatning xossalari uchun maxsus maÊ¼lumot yoÊ»q', 'vi': 'Nổ tung kiến thức đặc biệt miền cho phán quyết Không có Panacea', 'bg': 'Използването на специфични за домейна знания за прогнозиране на съдебни решения не е панацея', 'nl': 'Het benutten van domeinspecifieke kennis voor oordeelvoorspellingen is geen Panacea', 'hr': 'Istraživanje domena specifične znanja za predviđenje suda nije Panacea', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af domænespecifik viden til dommerforudsigelse er ingen Panacea', 'ko': '특정 분야의 지식을 이용하여 판단 예측하는 것은 만병통치약이 아니다', 'de': 'Die Nutzung von domänenspezifischem Wissen für Urteilsvorsagen ist kein Panacea', 'fa': 'استفاده از دانش مخصوص دامنه برای پیشنهاد قضاوت پاناسیا نیست', 'tr': 'Adalat Öňlemesi üçin Aýratyn Aýratyn Bilgi Is Panacea', 'sw': 'Toleo la ufahamu maalumu kwa Udhibiti wa Hukumu Hakuna Panacea', 'sq': 'Shfrytëzimi i njohurive specifike për domenin për parashikimin e gjykimit nuk është panikë', 'af': 'Verspreiding Domein-Spesifieke kennis vir oordeel voordeel is geen Panacea', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Hökm təhdidi üçün Domain-Specific Knowledge Exploitation Is No Panacea', 'id': 'Penggunaan Pengetahuan Spesifik Domain untuk Pengadilan Tidak Panacea', 'bn': 'বিচার প্রেরণের জন্য ডোমেইন- নির্দিষ্ট জ্ঞান প্রস্তুত করা হচ্ছে কোন প্যানেসা নেই', 'bs': 'Eksplozicija specijalnog znanja domena za predviđenje suda nije Panacea', 'ca': 'Utilitzar coneixements específics per a dominis per a prediccionar judicis no és panàcea', 'cs': 'Využití doménově specifických znalostí pro predikci soudu není žádná Panacea', 'fi': 'Verkkoaluekohtaisen tiedon hyödyntäminen tuomioiden ennustamiseen ei ole Panacea', 'hy': 'Պատասխանների կանխատեսման ոլորտում հատուկ գիտելիքների օգտագործումը պանասեա չէ,', 'et': 'Domeenispetsiifiliste teadmiste kasutamine kohtuotsuse prognoosimiseks ei ole Panacea', 'jv': 'Ngubah Panacea', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje znanja, specifičnega za domeno, za napovedovanje sodbe ni panacea', 'ha': 'Babu Panacea', 'bo': 'གསལ་འཆར་བྱེད་པའི་དྲ་ཁོངས་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཤེས་རིག་དང་མི་འདྲ་བྱེད་པ', 'he': 'Exploiting Domain-Specific Knowledge for Judgment Prediction Is No Panacea'}
{'en': 'Legal judgment prediction (LJP) usually consists in a text classification task aimed at predicting the verdict on the basis of the fact description. The literature shows that the use of articles as input features helps improve the classification performance. In this work, we designed a verdict prediction task based on landlord-tenant disputes and we applied BERT-based models to which we fed different article-based features. Although the results obtained are consistent with the literature, the improvements with the articles are mostly obtained with the most frequent labels, suggesting that pre-trained and fine-tuned transformer-based models are not scalable as is for legal reasoning in real life scenarios as they would only excel in accurately predicting the most recurrent verdicts to the detriment of other legal outcomes.', 'es': 'La predicción de sentencia legal (LJP) generalmente consiste en una tarea de clasificación de texto destinada a predecir el veredicto sobre la base de la descripción de los hechos. La literatura muestra que el uso de artículos como elementos de entrada ayuda a mejorar el rendimiento de la clasificación. En este trabajo, diseñamos una tarea de predicción de veredictos basada en disputas entre propietarios e inquilinos y aplicamos modelos basados en Bert a los que incorporamos diferentes características basadas en artículos. Aunque los resultados obtenidos son consistentes con la literatura, las mejoras con los artículos se obtienen en su mayoría con las etiquetas más frecuentes, lo que sugiere que los modelos basados en transformadores preentrenados y ajustados no son escalables, como lo es para el razonamiento legal en escenarios de la vida real, ya que solo destacarían en prediciendo con precisión los veredictos más recurrentes en detrimento de otros resultados legales.', 'ar': 'يتكون التنبؤ بالحكم القانوني (LJP) عادةً من مهمة تصنيف نص تهدف إلى التنبؤ بالحكم على أساس وصف الحقيقة. توضح الأدبيات أن استخدام المقالات كميزات إدخال يساعد على تحسين أداء التصنيف. في هذا العمل ، قمنا بتصميم مهمة التنبؤ بالحكم بناءً على نزاعات المالك والمستأجر وقمنا بتطبيق النماذج المستندة إلى BERT والتي قمنا بتزويدها بميزات مختلفة قائمة على المقالات. على الرغم من أن النتائج التي تم الحصول عليها متوافقة مع الأدبيات ، إلا أن التحسينات مع المقالات يتم الحصول عليها في الغالب من خلال التسميات الأكثر شيوعًا ، مما يشير إلى أن النماذج القائمة على المحولات المدربة مسبقًا والمضبوطة بدقة ليست قابلة للتطوير كما هو الحال بالنسبة للتفكير القانوني في سيناريوهات الحياة الواقعية مثل لن يتفوقوا إلا في التنبؤ الدقيق بالأحكام الأكثر تكرارًا على حساب النتائج القانونية الأخرى.', 'fr': "La prédiction de jugement juridique (LJP) consiste généralement en une tâche de classification de texte visant à prédire le verdict sur la base de la description des faits. La littérature montre que l'utilisation d'articles en tant que fonctions d'entrée contribue à améliorer les performances de classification. Dans ce travail, nous avons conçu une tâche de prédiction de verdict basée sur les litiges entre propriétaires et locataires et nous avons appliqué des modèles basés sur BERT auxquels nous avons intégré différentes fonctionnalités basées sur des articles. Bien que les résultats obtenus soient cohérents avec la littérature, les améliorations apportées aux articles sont principalement obtenues avec les étiquettes les plus fréquentes, ce qui suggère que les modèles basés sur des transformateurs pré-entraînés et affinés ne sont pas évolutifs comme c'est le cas pour le raisonnement juridique dans des scénarios de la vie réelle, car ils ne feraient qu'exceller dans prédire avec précision les verdicts les plus récurrents au détriment d'autres issues juridiques.", 'pt': 'A previsão de julgamento legal (LJP) geralmente consiste em uma tarefa de classificação de texto destinada a prever o veredicto com base na descrição do fato. A literatura mostra que o uso de artigos como recursos de entrada ajuda a melhorar o desempenho da classificação. Neste trabalho, projetamos uma tarefa de previsão de veredicto com base em disputas entre proprietários e inquilinos e aplicamos modelos baseados em BERT aos quais alimentamos diferentes recursos baseados em artigos. Embora os resultados obtidos sejam consistentes com a literatura, as melhorias com os artigos são em sua maioria obtidas com os rótulos mais frequentes, sugerindo que os modelos baseados em transformadores pré-treinados e ajustados não são escaláveis como é para o raciocínio jurídico em cenários da vida real como eles apenas se destacariam em prever com precisão os veredictos mais recorrentes em detrimento de outros resultados legais.', 'ja': '法的判断予測（ LJP ）は、通常、事実の説明に基づいて判決を予測することを目的としたテキスト分類タスクで構成されています。文献は、記事を入力機能として使用することが、分類パフォーマンスを向上させるのに役立つことを示しています。この研究では、大家とテナントの紛争に基づいて評決予測タスクを設計し、異なる記事ベースの機能をフィードバックしたBERTベースのモデルを適用しました。得られた結果は文献と一致しているが、記事の改良点はほとんどが最も頻繁なラベルで得られており、事前に訓練され微調整された変圧器ベースのモデルは、他の法的結果を損なう最も頻繁な判決を正確に予測することに優れているだけであるため、現実のシナリオにおける法的推論のために拡張可能ではないことを示唆している。', 'zh': '律断占(LJP)常以文本分类,指随事描占。 文献明,以文章为输特徵有助于增类。 于是设房东、租户之讼,而施于BERT,为之文章之功。 虽得与文献同,而文之改进多用至常之标,明先训微之基于变压器,而不可如现实生活之法可广,盖其确占至数之决表现出色,而损他法也。', 'hi': 'कानूनी निर्णय भविष्यवाणी (एलजेपी) में आमतौर पर एक पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्य होता है जिसका उद्देश्य तथ्य विवरण के आधार पर फैसले की भविष्यवाणी करना होता है। साहित्य से पता चलता है कि इनपुट सुविधाओं के रूप में लेखों का उपयोग वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन को बेहतर बनाने में मदद करता है। इस काम में, हमने मकान मालिक-किरायेदार विवादों के आधार पर एक निर्णय भविष्यवाणी कार्य तैयार किया और हमने BERT-आधारित मॉडल लागू किए, जिसमें हमने विभिन्न लेख-आधारित सुविधाओं को खिलाया। यद्यपि प्राप्त परिणाम साहित्य के अनुरूप हैं, लेखों के साथ सुधार ज्यादातर सबसे लगातार लेबल के साथ प्राप्त किए जाते हैं, यह सुझाव देते हुए कि पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित और ठीक-ठाक ट्रांसफार्मर-आधारित मॉडल स्केलेबल नहीं हैं क्योंकि वास्तविक जीवन के परिदृश्यों में कानूनी तर्क के लिए है क्योंकि वे केवल अन्य कानूनी परिणामों की हानि के लिए सबसे आवर्तक निर्णयों की सटीक भविष्यवाणी करने में उत्कृष्टता प्राप्त करेंगे।', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование судебного решения (LJP) обычно состоит из задачи классификации текста, направленной на прогнозирование вердикта на основе описания факта. В литературе показано, что использование статей в качестве входных признаков помогает улучшить эффективность классификации. В этой работе мы разработали задачу прогнозирования вердикта на основе споров между арендодателем и арендатором и применили модели на основе BERT, к которым мы применили различные функции на основе статей. Хотя полученные результаты согласуются с литературой, улучшения со статьями в основном получены с помощью наиболее частых меток, что позволяет предположить, что предварительно обученные и доработанные модели на основе трансформаторов не масштабируются, как это делается для правовой аргументации в сценариях реальной жизни, поскольку они только преуспеют в точном прогнозировании наиболее повторяющихся вердиктов в ущерб другим юридическим результатам.', 'ga': 'Is gnách go mbíonn réamhaithris breithiúnas dlíthiúil (LJP) comhdhéanta de thasc aicmithe téacs a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige an fíorasc a thuar ar bhonn na tuairisce fíricí. Léiríonn an litríocht go gcuidíonn úsáid ailt mar ghnéithe ionchuir le feidhmíocht aicmithe a fheabhsú. San obair seo, dhearamar tasc réamh-mheastacháin fíoraisc bunaithe ar dhíospóidí idir tiarnaí talún agus tionóntaí agus chuireamar samhlacha bunaithe ar BERT i bhfeidhm ar a ndearnamar gnéithe éagsúla bunaithe ar alt a chothú. Cé go bhfuil na torthaí a fhaightear i gcomhréir leis an litríocht, faightear na feabhsuithe leis na hailt leis na lipéid is minice den chuid is mó, rud a thugann le tuiscint nach bhfuil samhlacha bunaithe ar chlaochladán réamh-oilte agus mionchoigeartaithe inscálaithe mar atá le réasúnaíocht dhlíthiúil i gcásanna fíor-saoil mar. ní sháródh siad ach na breithiúnais is athfhillteacha a thuar go beacht chun aimhleasa torthaí dlíthiúla eile.', 'el': 'Η πρόβλεψη νομικής κρίσης (LJP) συνήθως συνίσταται σε μια εργασία ταξινόμησης κειμένου που αποσκοπεί στην πρόβλεψη της ετυμηγορίας με βάση την περιγραφή του γεγονότος. Η βιβλιογραφία δείχνει ότι η χρήση των άρθρων ως χαρακτηριστικών εισόδου συμβάλλει στη βελτίωση της απόδοσης ταξινόμησης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, σχεδιάσαμε μια εργασία πρόβλεψης ετυμηγορίας βασισμένη σε διαφορές ιδιοκτήτη-ενοικιαστή και εφαρμόσαμε μοντέλα βασισμένα στο BERT στα οποία τροφοδοτήσαμε διαφορετικά χαρακτηριστικά βασισμένα σε άρθρα. Αν και τα αποτελέσματα που λαμβάνονται είναι συνεπή με τη βιβλιογραφία, οι βελτιώσεις με τα άρθρα επιτυγχάνονται κυρίως με τις πιο συχνές ετικέτες, υποδηλώνοντας ότι τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα και συντονισμένα μοντέλα με βάση τους μετασχηματιστές δεν είναι κλιμακώσιμα όπως είναι για τη νομική λογική σε σενάρια πραγματικής ζωής, καθώς θα υπερέχουν μόνο στην ακριβή πρόβλεψη των πιο επαναλαμβανόμενων ετυμηγοριών εις βάρος άλλων νομικών αποτελεσμάτων.', 'hu': 'A jogi ítélet-előrejelzés (LJP) általában olyan szövegosztályozási feladatból áll, amelynek célja az ítélet előrejelzése a tényleírás alapján. A szakirodalom azt mutatja, hogy a cikkek bemeneti funkcióként történő használata segít javítani a besorolási teljesítményt. Ebben a munkában kialakítottunk egy bérbeadó-bérlő vitákon alapuló ítélet-előrejelzési feladatot, és BERT-alapú modelleket alkalmaztunk, amelyekhez különböző cikkalapú funkciókat tápláltunk. Bár az elért eredmények összhangban vannak a szakirodalommal, a cikkekkel kapcsolatos javulásokat leginkább a leggyakoribb címkékkel érjük el, azt sugallja, hogy az előzetesen képzett és finomhangolt transzformátorok alapú modellek nem skálázhatók, mint a valós élet esetében a jogi érvelés szempontjából, mivel csak a legvisszatérőbb ítéletek pontos előrejelzésében lennének kitűnőek más jogi eredmények kárára.', 'ka': 'Legal judgment prediction (LJP) usually consists in a text classification task aimed at predicting the verdict on the basis of the fact description. ლიტურატია ჩვენებს, რომ არქეტების გამოყენება როგორც შეტყობინებული ფუნქციების გამოყენება დახმარებს კლასიფიკაციის გამოყენება. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ დავყენეთ პროცექტის წინასწარმოდგენის რაოდენობა, რომელიც ჩვენ განსხვავებული პროცექტის ფუნქციების გარეშე დავყენეთ სამუშაო სამუშაო კ მაგრამ მიიღებული წარმოდგენების შემდეგ ლიტურატიას შეუძლებელია, მაგრამ მართლათან უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენება უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენებული მართლათან, შეგიძლიათ, რომ პრეტრანსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსი მოდელ', 'it': "La previsione del giudizio legale (LJP) consiste solitamente in un compito di classificazione testuale volto a predire il verdetto sulla base della descrizione dei fatti. La letteratura mostra che l'uso degli articoli come elementi di input contribuisce a migliorare le prestazioni di classificazione. In questo lavoro, abbiamo progettato un compito di previsione del verdetto basato sulle controversie tra locatore e inquilino e abbiamo applicato modelli basati su BERT a cui abbiamo alimentato diverse funzionalità basate sugli articoli. Sebbene i risultati ottenuti siano coerenti con la letteratura, i miglioramenti con gli articoli sono ottenuti principalmente con le etichette più frequenti, suggerendo che i modelli pre-addestrati e perfezionati basati su trasformatori non sono scalabili come lo è per il ragionamento legale negli scenari di vita reale, in quanto eccellerebbero solo nel prevedere con precisione i verdetti più ricorrenti a scapito di altri risultati legali.", 'kk': 'Ақиқат дұрыстығын бақылау (LJP) әдетте тексті сипаттамасының негізінде дұрыстығын бақылау үшін мәтін салыстыру тапсырмасында тұрады. Әдебиеттік мақалаларды келтіру мүмкіндіктері ретінде қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз жергілікті жергілікті арнайы қайшылықтар негізінде дұрыстық тапсырманы жасадық. Біз BERT негізінде басқа мақалалардың негізінде қайшылық үлгілерін қолданды Келтірілген нәтижелер әдебиетке сәйкес болса да, мақалалардың жақсартулары көбінесе ең көбінесе жарлық жарлықтарымен алынады. Алдын- ала оқылған және тұрақты түрлендіруші үлгілерін масштабтау мүмкін емес деп ойлайды, себебі олар тек жалғыз өмір сценариясындағы заң түрлендіруші үлгілерінде тұрақты түрлендіру мүмкін емес деп ойлайды, себебі', 'ml': 'നിയമവിധിയുടെ പ്രവചനം (LJP) സാധാരണ വിവരണവിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d വിധിയെ പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ ഈ സാഹിത്രം കാണിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടിന്റെ ഗുണപ്രമാണങ്ങളായി ലേഖനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ക്ലാസ് ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വിധി പ്രവചിക്കാനുള്ള ജോലി നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിച്ചു. ലാന്\u200dഡ്\u200cലണ്ടറിന്\u200dറെ വിഷയത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ് ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭിച്ചാലും സാഹിത്യത്തോടൊപ്പം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാണെങ്കിലും, മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നതും നല്ല മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിയമപരമായ ജീവിതത്തിന്റെ കാരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിയമപരമായ കാരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മാത്രമാണ് അവര്\u200d പ', 'lt': 'Legal judgment prediction (LJP) usually consists in a text classification task aimed at predicting the verdict on the basis of the fact description.  The literature shows that the use of articles as input features helps improve the classification performance.  Šiame darbe sukūrėme sprendimų prognozavimo užduotį, grindžiamą ginčais dėl savininko ir nuomininko, ir taikėme BERT grindžiamus modelius, kuriems naudojome skirtingas gaminių savybes. Although the results obtained are consistent with the literature, the improvements with the articles are mostly obtained with the most frequent labels, - siūlyti, kad iš anksto parengti ir patobulinti transformatoriais pagrįsti modeliai nėra skaliuojami, kaip ir teisiniu pagrindu realiojo gyvenimo scenarijuose, nes jie tik geriau prognozuotų pasikartojančius sprendimus, kenkiančius kitiems teisiniams rezultatams.', 'mt': 'It-tbassir tas-sentenza legali (LJP) normalment jikkonsisti f’kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test immirat lejn it-tbassir tal-verdict abbażi tad-deskrizzjoni tal-fatti. Il-letteratura turi li l-użu ta’ oġġetti bħala karatteristiċi ta’ input jgħin itejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni. F’dan ix-xogħol, iddisinjna kompitu ta’ tbassir tal-verdict ibbażat fuq tilwim bejn sid il-proprjetà tal-kera u applikajna mudelli bbażati fuq BERT li lilhom a ħna ngħatajna karatteristiċi differenti bbażati fuq oġġetti. Although the results obtained are consistent with the literature, the improvements with the articles are mostly obtained with the most frequent labels, - jissuġġerixxu li mudelli bbażati fuq trasformaturi mħarrġa minn qabel u aġġustati bir-reqqa mhumiex skalabbli kif inhu r-raġunament legali fix-xenarji tal-ħajja reali peress li dawn ikunu eċċellenti biss fit-tbassir pre ċiż tal-verdicts l-aktar rikorrenti għad-detriment ta’ riżultati legali oħra.', 'ms': 'Ramalan penilaian undang-undang (LJP) biasanya terdiri dalam tugas klasifikasi teks yang bertujuan untuk meramalkan keputusan berdasarkan keterangan fakta. The literature shows that the use of articles as input features helps improve the classification performance.  Dalam kerja ini, kami merancang tugas ramalan keputusan berdasarkan perdebatan pemilik tanah-penyewa dan kami melaksanakan model berdasarkan BERT yang kami makan ciri-ciri berdasarkan artikel yang berbeza. Walaupun hasil yang diperoleh adalah konsisten dengan literatur, peningkatan dengan artikel kebanyakan diperoleh dengan label yang paling sering, Menunjukkan bahawa model berasaskan transformer yang dilatih-dilatih dan ditetapkan-ditetapkan tidak boleh ditetapkan seperti untuk alasan undang-undang dalam skenario kehidupan sebenar kerana mereka hanya akan melebihi dalam meramalkan dengan tepat keputusan yang paling berkurang untuk merugikan hasil undang-undang lain.', 'mk': 'Предвидувањето на правната пресуда (ЛЈП) обично се состои од задача за класификација на текст со цел предвидување на пресудата врз основа на фактот опис. Литературата покажува дека употребата на статии како влезни карактеристики помага да се подобри резултатот на класификацијата. In this work, we designed a verdict prediction task based on landlord-tenant disputes and we applied BERT-based models to which we fed different article-based features.  Иако постигнатите резултати се во согласност со литературата, подобрувањата со статиите се претежно постигнати со најчестите етикети, Претходно обучени и финетизирани модели базирани на трансформатори не можат да бидат скалирани, како и за правното размислување во реалните сценарија бидејќи тие само би биле извонредни во претпоставувањето на најповторните пресуди во штета на другите законски резултати.', 'mn': 'Хуудын шүүмжлэх таамаглал (LJP) нь ихэвчлэн жинхэнэ тодорхойлолт дээр шүүмжлэгийг таамаглах зорилготой текст хуваалцах үйл ажиллагаанд байдаг. Энэ уран зохиол нь өгөгдлийн шинж тэмдэгтийн хэрэглээ нь хуваалцааны үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид газрын холбоотой өрсөлдөөнд суурилсан шийдвэр гаргах даалгаварыг зохион байгуулсан. Бид BERT-ын суурилсан загваруудыг ашигласан. Бид өөр хэвлэлийн суурилсан чадваруудыг ашигласан. Шинэ үр дүн нь уран зохиолын тухай хамааралтай ч, баримтуудын сайжруулалт ихэвчлэн ихэвчлэн ихэвчлэн тэмдэглэгддэг. Өмнө сургалтын болон сайхан шинжилгээчийн загварууд нь үнэндээ амьдралын хууль ойлголтын тулд зөвхөн хууль шалтгааныг зөвхөн тодорхойлж чадахгүй гэдгийг сануулж байна.', 'no': 'Leggsforegåve av sprøytebruk (LJP) er vanlegvis i eit tekstklassifikasjonsverkt som mål å foregå sprøytebruken på grunn av faktiske beskrivelsen. Litteratur viser at bruken av artiklar som inndata-funksjonar hjelper til å forbetra klassifikasjonen. I denne arbeiden designerte vi ein sprøytebruk-forhåndsvising basert på landlord-tenant-strømmer og vi brukte BERT-baserte modeller som vi fede ulike artikkelbaserte funksjonar. Selv om resultatene som er oppteken er konsistent med literaturen, er forbetringane med artikkelene mest oppteken med dei mest ofte merkelappene, Forelærte og fyrste transformeringsbaserte modeller kan ikkje skalerast, slik at det er for rettleg rasjon i verkeleg livssscenario, fordi dei vil berre overvære i nøyaktig forhåndsvising av dei mest rekursantene verdiane til verden av andre juridiske utgåver.', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie orzeczenia prawnego (LJP) zazwyczaj polega na zadaniu klasyfikacji tekstowej mającym na celu przewidywanie werdyktu na podstawie opisu faktu. Z literatury wynika, że wykorzystanie artykułów jako funkcji wejściowych pomaga poprawić wydajność klasyfikacji. W niniejszej pracy zaprojektowaliśmy zadanie prognozowania werdyktu oparte na sporach właściciel-najemca oraz zastosowaliśmy modele oparte na BERT, do których zasilaliśmy różne funkcje artykułowe. Chociaż uzyskane wyniki są zgodne z literaturą, ulepszenia artykułów uzyskiwane są najczęściej przy użyciu najczęstszych etykiet, sugerując, że wstępnie przeszkolone i dostrojone modele oparte na transformatorach nie są skalowalne, tak jak w przypadku rozumowania prawnego w rzeczywistych scenariuszach, ponieważ doskonale przewidują one jedynie w dokładnym przewidywaniu najczęściej powtarzających się werdyktów ze szkodą innych wyników prawnych.', 'ro': 'Predicția judecății juridice (LJP) constă, de obicei, într-o sarcină de clasificare a textului menită să prevină verdictul pe baza descrierii faptelor. Literatura de specialitate arată că utilizarea articolelor ca caracteristici de intrare contribuie la îmbunătățirea performanței de clasificare. În această lucrare, am conceput o sarcină de predicție a verdictului bazată pe disputele proprietar-chiriaș și am aplicat modele bazate pe BERT la care am alimentat diferite caracteristici bazate pe articole. Deși rezultatele obținute sunt în concordanță cu literatura de specialitate, îmbunătățirile cu articolele sunt obținute în cea mai mare parte cu etichetele cele mai frecvente, sugerează că modelele pre-instruite și reglate pe bază de transformatoare nu sunt scalabile, așa cum este pentru raționamentul juridic în scenariile de viață reală, deoarece acestea ar excela doar în prezicerea cu exactitate a verdictelor cele mai recurente în detrimentul altor rezultate juridice.', 'sr': 'Predviđanje pravnog osuđenja (LJP) obično se sastoji u zadatku klasifikacije teksta koji je cilj predviđanja presude na osnovu opisa činjenica. literatura pokazuje da upotreba članaka kao ulazne karakteristike pomaže da poboljša klasifikaciju. U ovom poslu smo dizajnirali predviđanje presude na osnovu sporova o stanarinu stanara i primjenjivali smo model na osnovu BERT-a na koji smo hranili različite karakteristike na osnovu članova. Iako su dobiveni rezultati u skladu sa literaturom, poboljšanje članaka se uglavnom dobija sa najčešćim etiketama, Predlažeći da predobučeni i ispravni transformatorski modeli nisu mjerljivi, kao i za pravni razum u scenarijima stvarnog života, jer bi samo predviđali najponovnije presude o šteti drugih pravnih ishoda.', 'si': 'නීතිය විශ්වාසය (LJP) සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් පාළික විශ්වාසය වැඩයක් තියෙනවා ඇත්ත විශ්වාසයේ අධික විශ ලේඛ්\u200dයාත්මක පෙන්වන්නේ පිළිපත් භාවිතාව ඇතුළත් අවශ්\u200dය වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශ්වාස කරන්න මේ වැඩේ අපි විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ නිර්දේශ විශ්වාස කරපු වැඩක් සිද්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ නිර්දේශ කරුණාකරණය සඳහා බ පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ හ හොඳින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් නැහැ, ඒ වගේම ඇත්ත ජීවිත සිද්ධානයේ නීතිමත් සිද්ධානයක් විතරයි ඔවු', 'so': "Aqoonta xukunka sharciga ah (LJP) wuxuu inta badan ku qoran yahay shaqada fasaxa qoraalka, taasoo loogu talogaley in lagu sii sheego go’aanka oo ku saleysan tilmaamaha runta ah. Fasihigu wuxuu muujiyaa in isticmaalka alaabta lagu qorayo uu caawinayo inuu horumariyo tababarka fasaxa. Markaas waxan, waxan ku qornay shaqo la sii sheego oo ku saleysan muran-muran kiro-kireeyayaal, waxaana ku codsannay modello BERT-based oo aan ku quudinnay waxyaabo kala duduwan oo qoraal ah. In kastoo resultiyada la soo qaaday ay la mid yihiin qoraalka, horumarinta qoraallada waxaa ugu badan lagu helaa alaabta ugu badan, Markaas waxaa laga jeedaa in qaababka isbedelka ee hore iyo si fiican looma baahan karo sababta sharciga ah ee xaaladaha nolosha ee dhabta ah, sababtoo ah waxay ka sarrayn lahaayeen inay si saxda ah u sii sheegaan go'aanka ugu soo socda ee kharribka arimaha kale ee sharciga ah.", 'ta': 'சட்ட தீர்ப்பு எதிர்பார்ப்பு (LJP) வழக்கமாக ஒரு உரை வகைப்படுத்தல் செயலில் இருக்கிறது உண்மையின் விவரம் அடிப்படையில் இந்த விதி The literature shows that the use of articles as input features as help improve the classification performance. இந்த வேலையில், நாங்கள் விருப்பங்களை அடிப்படையில் ஒரு விட்டு முன்வாக்கும் பணியை வடிவமைத்தோம் மற்றும் நாங்கள் BERT-அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பெற்ற முடிவுகள் எழுத்து பொருத்தமாக இருந்தாலும், கட்டுரைகளின் முன்னேற்றங்கள் அதிகமாக அதிகமாக அட்டவணைகளில் கிடைக்கும் முன்பயிற்சி மற்றும் நன்றாக மாற்றும் மாற்றும் மாதிரிகள் சட்டமாக இல்லை ஏனெனில் உண்மையான வாழ்க்கை காரணத்தில் சட்டமான காரணங்களுக்காக இருக்கிறது ஏனெனில் அவர்கள் சரி', 'ur': 'قانونی فیصلہ کی پیش بینی (LJP) معمولاً ایک ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفون کی تابع میں ہے جو فیصلہ کی پیش بینی کے ذریعہ حقیقت کی توصیف پر ہے. لکھائی دکھاتی ہے کہ لکھائی کا استعمال اس طرح کہ اینپیٹ فوتبال کے طور پر قابل استعمال کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے اس کام میں ایک فیصلہ پیش بینی کا کام طراحی کیا ہے جو ملک لرد-ٹینٹ کے اختلاف پر بنیاد ہے اور ہم نے BERT-بنیاد مدل کے مطابق استعمال کیا ہے جس پر ہم مختلف مقالہ بنیاد رکھتے ہیں۔ اگرچہ جو نتائج حاصل کئے گئے ہیں اسے ادبیات کے ساتھ قائم رہتے ہیں، لیکلوں کے ساتھ بہت زیادہ اثر لیبلوں سے حاصل کئے جاتے ہیں، اس کی پیش آموزش کی اور نیک تغییر دینے کی موڈلیاں برابر نہیں ہیں جیسے حقیقی زندگی سناریوں میں قانونی دلیل کے لئے ہے جیسے یہ صرف ایک دقیق تغییر دینے کے لئے بہتر ہوتے ہیں', 'sv': 'Rättslig bedömning förutsägelse (LJP) består vanligtvis av en textklassificeringsuppgift som syftar till att förutsäga domen på grundval av faktableskrivningen. Litteraturen visar att användningen av artiklar som inmatningsfunktioner bidrar till att förbättra klassificeringsprestandan. I det här arbetet utformade vi en uppgift för att förutsäga domar baserat på tvister mellan hyresvärden och hyresgäster och vi tillämpade BERT-baserade modeller som vi matade med olika artikelbaserade funktioner. Även om resultaten överensstämmer med litteraturen erhålls förbättringarna med artiklarna mestadels med de vanligaste etiketterna, tyder på att förutbildade och finjusterade transformatorbaserade modeller inte är skalbara, liksom för juridiskt resonemang i verkliga scenarier, eftersom de bara skulle framstå i att exakt förutsäga de mest återkommande domarna till nackdel för andra rättsliga resultat.', 'uz': "Ikkinchi hujjatni tahrirlash (LJP) asosiy taʼrifi asosida gapirishni koʻrsatish uchun matn classification vazifasida mavjud. Tahriyor yordamida, kiritish xossalari sifatida maqolalarni ishlatish imkoniyatini bajarishiga yordam beradi. Bu ishda, biz landlord-kiritning murakkablari asosida gapiruvchi vazifani yaratdik va biz BERT asosida asosiy modellarni qo'llab berdik va biz boshqa maqola asosida xususiyatlarni ishlatdik. Agar natijalar litteratori bilan bir xil bo'lgan bo'lsa, maqolalar bilan yaxshi o'zgarishlar ko'p ko'p ko'p ko'proq lab yordamida olingan, Shunday qilib, birinchi taʼminlovchi va yaxshi o'zgarishlar modellari haqiqatgina hayot scenarida emas, chunki ular faqat boshqa sharciga natijaga harakat qiladigan eng davom etishga qaramaydi.", 'vi': 'Dự đoán phán quyết pháp lý (LJP) thường là một nhiệm vụ phân loại văn bản nhằm dự đoán phán quyết dựa trên mô tả thực tế. Văn bản cho thấy việc sử dụng các bài báo như các tính năng nhập giúp tăng hiệu suất phân loại. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi thiết kế một nhiệm vụ dự đoán phán quyết dựa trên tranh chấp chủ nhà, và chúng tôi áp dụng các mô hình nền BERT mà chúng tôi sử dụng các tính chất bài báo khác nhau. Mặc dù kết quả phù hợp với văn học, nhưng phần lớn những cải tiến với các bài báo được thu thập bằng các nhãn thường xuyên nhất, cho rằng những mô hình cơ chế biến đổi được huấn luyện và chỉnh sửa cẩn thận không khả thi, cũng như cho các lý lẽ pháp lý trong các viễn cảnh đời thực, vì chúng chỉ xuất sắc trong việc dự đoán chính xác các phán quyết thường xuyên nhất làm tổn hại đến các kết quả pháp lý khác.', 'bg': 'Прогнозирането на съдебните решения обикновено се състои в задача за класификация на текста, насочена към предсказване на присъдата въз основа на описанието на фактите. Литературата показва, че използването на статии като входни функции спомага за подобряване на ефективността на класификацията. В тази работа разработихме задача за прогнозиране на присъдата въз основа на спорове хазяин-наемател и приложихме базирани модели, към които подхранвахме различни функции, базирани на статии. Въпреки че получените резултати са в съответствие с литературата, подобренията с статиите се получават предимно с най-честите етикети, предполагат, че предварително обучените и фино настроени модели, базирани на трансформатори, не са мащабируеми, както е за правното разсъждаване в реални сценарии, тъй като те биха се отличили само в точното предсказване на най-повтарящите се присъди в ущърб на други правни резултати.', 'da': 'Juridisk dom forudsigelse (LJP) består normalt i en tekstklassifikationsopgave, der har til formål at forudsige dommen på grundlag af faktisk beskrivelse. Litteraturen viser, at brugen af artikler som input-funktioner hjælper med at forbedre klassificeringen. I dette arbejde udviklede vi en dommerforudsigelsesopgave baseret på tvister mellem udlejer og lejer, og vi anvendte BERT-baserede modeller, som vi leverede forskellige artikelbaserede funktioner til. Selv om de opnåede resultater er i overensstemmelse med litteraturen, opnås forbedringerne med artiklerne for det meste med de hyppigste etiketter, hvilket tyder på, at forududdannede og finjusterede transformatorbaserede modeller ikke er skalerbare, som det er til juridisk ræsonnement i virkeligheden scenarier, da de kun ville udmærke sig til præcist at forudsige de mest tilbagevendende domme på bekostning af andre juridiske resultater.', 'nl': "Juridische oordeelvoorspelling (LJP) bestaat meestal uit een tekstclassificatietaak gericht op het voorspellen van het vonnis op basis van de feitenbeschrijving. Uit de literatuur blijkt dat het gebruik van artikelen als invoerfuncties helpt de classificatieprestaties te verbeteren. In dit werk ontwierpen we een vondsvoorspellingstak op basis van geschillen tussen verhuurder en huurder en pasten we BERT-gebaseerde modellen toe waaraan we verschillende artikelgebaseerde functies hebben toegevoegd. Hoewel de verkregen resultaten consistent zijn met de literatuur, worden de verbeteringen met de artikelen meestal verkregen met de meest voorkomende etiketten, suggereert dat voorgetrainde en verfijnde modellen op basis van transformatoren niet schaalbaar zijn zoals voor juridische redenering in reële scenario's, omdat ze alleen zouden uitblinken in het nauwkeurig voorspellen van de meest terugkerende vonnissen ten nadele van andere juridische uitkomsten.", 'ko': '법률 판결 예측(LJP)에는 일반적으로 판결 예측을 사실에 근거하여 묘사하기 위한 텍스트 분류 임무가 포함되어 있다.문헌에 의하면 관사를 입력 특징으로 사용하면 분류 성능을 향상시키는 데 도움이 된다고 한다.이 작업에서 우리는 집주인-세입자 분쟁을 바탕으로 하는 판결 예측 임무를 설계했고 버트 기반의 모델을 응용하여 이런 모델에 서로 다른 문장 기반의 특징을 제공했다.얻은 결과는 문헌과 일치하지만 문장의 개선은 대부분 가장 빈번한 라벨을 통해 이루어진다.이는 미리 훈련하고 미세하게 조정하는 변압기 기반 모델이 현실 생활 장면에서의 법률 추리에서 확장성이 없다는 것을 보여준다. 왜냐하면 그들은 가장 빈번한 판결을 정확하게 예측하는 데 뛰어나고 다른 법률 결과에 불리하기 때문이다.', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی قضاوت قانونی (LJP) معمولاً در یک وظیفه\u200cی جدایی متن با هدف پیش\u200cبینی فیصله بر اساس توضیح حقیقت است. ادبیات نشان می\u200cدهد که استفاده از مقاله\u200cها به عنوان ویژه\u200cهای ورودی کمک می\u200cکند عملکرد گروه\u200cبندی را بهتر کند. در این کار، ما یک کار پیش\u200cبینی فیصله را طراحی کردیم که بر اساس اختلاف\u200cهای صاحب اقامت دارد و مدل\u200cهای بنیاد BERT را به آن تهیه کردیم که ویژگی\u200cهای بنیاد مقاله\u200cهای مختلف را تهیه می\u200cکردیم. اگرچه نتیجه\u200cهایی که به دست آورده\u200cاند با ادبیات هماهنگی دارند، توسعه\u200cهایی که با مقاله\u200cها بیشتر با برچسب\u200cهای اغلب دریافت می\u200cشوند، پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که مدلهای پیش آموزش داده شده و درست تغییر دهنده\u200cای قابل اندازه\u200cگیری نیستند، همانطور که برای دلیل قانونی در سناریو زندگی واقعی است، همانطور که آنها فقط در پیش\u200cبینی دقیق ترین فیصله\u200cهای بازگشت به خسارت نتیجه\u200cهای قانونی بیشتر می\u200cکنند.', 'hr': 'Predviđanje pravnog suda (LJP) obično se sastoji u zadatku klasifikacije teksta ciljanom predviđanja presude na temelju opisa činjenica. Literatura pokazuje da upotreba članaka kao ulazne funkcije pomaže poboljšati učinkovitost klasifikacije. U ovom poslu smo dizajnirali zadatak predviđanja presude na temelju spora o stanovniku stanara i primjenjivali smo modele na temelju BERT-a na kojima smo hranili različite karakteristike na temelju članaka. Iako su dobiveni rezultati u skladu s literaturom, poboljšanje s člancima uglavnom dobijane s najčešćim etiketama, Predlažeći da predobučeni i ispravni transformacijski modeli nisu mjerljivi kao i za pravni razum u scenarijima stvarnog života, jer bi se samo precizno predviđali najponovnije presude o šteti drugih pravnih ishoda.', 'id': 'Prediksi penilaian hukum (LJP) biasanya terdiri dari tugas klasifikasi teks yang bertujuan untuk prediksi keputusan berdasarkan deskripsi fakta. Literatur menunjukkan bahwa penggunaan artikel sebagai fitur input membantu meningkatkan prestasi klasifikasi. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami merancang tugas prediksi keputusan berdasarkan perdebatan pemilik tanah-penyewa dan kami menerapkan model berdasarkan BERT yang kami makan fitur berbasis artikel. Although the results obtained are consistent with the literature, the improvements with the articles are mostly obtained with the most frequent labels, Menunjukkan bahwa model yang berdasarkan transformer yang dilatih dan diperbaiki tidak dapat diperbaiki seperti untuk alasan hukum dalam skenario kehidupan nyata karena mereka hanya akan melebihi dalam memprediksi dengan akurat keputusan yang paling berkurang untuk merugikan hasil hukum lainnya.', 'de': 'Legal Judice Prediction (LJP) besteht in der Regel aus einer Textklassifikationsaufgabe, die darauf abzielt, das Urteil anhand der Faktenbeschreibung vorherzusagen. Die Literatur zeigt, dass die Verwendung von Artikeln als Eingabefeatures zur Verbesserung der Klassifikationsleistung beiträgt. In dieser Arbeit konzipierten wir eine Verdiktvorhersage-Aufgabe basierend auf Vermieter-Mieter-Streitigkeiten und wandten BERT-basierte Modelle an, denen wir verschiedene Artikel-basierte Features zuführten. Obwohl die erzielten Ergebnisse mit der Literatur übereinstimmen, werden die Verbesserungen mit den Artikeln meist mit den häufigsten Etiketten erzielt. Dies deutet darauf hin, dass vortrainierte und fein abgestimmte Transformatormodelle nicht skalierbar sind, wie dies für rechtliche Argumente in realen Szenarien der Fall ist, da sie nur bei der genauen Vorhersage der wiederkehrenden Urteile zum Nachteil anderer rechtlicher Ergebnisse hervorragend wären.', 'tr': 'Hakyr çykyş önlemi (LJP) adatça metin klasifikasyýa zadynda hatyň waspyna görä guruldy. Edebiýat hatlaryň gaýd edilen özellikler ýaly ullanyşynyň klasifikasyň eserini geliştirmegine kömek edip bilýändigini görkezýär. Bu işde biz jaý-jaý arzançylyklaryna daýanýan hakyky öngörüm uzmanyny tasarladyk we BERT-a daýanýan nusgalary we beýleki maksadyň daýanýan özelliklerine üýtgetdik. Ýüze berilen netijeler edebiýatlyga dogry bolsa, kanunlar bilen has köplenç etiketlerle gelişmeler alýar, Öň bilim öňündeki we gowy düzümlenmiş transformatör modelleri çykaryp bilmeýändiklerini maslahat berýärler. Gerçek durmuş senaryýalarda yasal sebäplere meýilleşdirýändikleri üçin diňe täsirli terjime edip başga kanun netijeleriniň hasaplamasynda gaty täsirli hökmünü çaklamak üçin däldir.', 'af': "Wettige oordeel voorskou (LJP) bestaan gewoonlik in 'n teks klassifikasie taak wat die oordeel op die basis van die feit beskrywing voorskou is. Die literasie wys dat die gebruik van aktikels as invoer funksies hulp die klassifikasie prestasie verbeter. In hierdie werk het ons 'n oordeel voorskou opdrag ontwerp gebaseer op landlord-tenant stryde en ons het BERT-gebaseerde modele aangepas waarop ons verskillende artikel-gebaseerde funksies gevoer het. Alhoewel die ontvangde resultate ooreenkomstig is met die literateit, word die verbeteringe met die artikels mees verkry met die mees dikwels etikette, voorgestel dat voor-onderwerp en fyn-tuniseerde transformeerder-gebaseerde modele nie skalbaar is nie soos is vir wetlike redening in regte lewe scenarios, omdat hulle slegs sou oorwerp in presies voorskou die mees herhaalde oordele tot die verdrukking van ander wetlike outekoms.", 'sq': 'Parashikimi i gjykimit ligjor (LJP) zakonisht përbëhet në një detyrë klasifikimi teksti që synon parashikimin e verdiktit në bazë të përshkrimit të fakteve. Literatura tregon se përdorimi i artikujve si elemente të hyrjes ndihmon përmirësimin e performancës së klasifikimit. Në këtë punë, kemi projektuar një detyrë parashikimi të verdiktit bazuar në mosmarrëveshje pronarë-qirantë dhe kemi aplikuar modele bazuar në BERT në të cilat i ushqejmë karakteristika të ndryshme bazuar në artikuj. Megjithëse rezultatet e fituara janë konsistente me letërsinë, përmirësimet me artikujt arrihen kryesisht me etiketat më të shpeshta,  suggesting that pre-trained and fine-tuned transformer-based models are not scalable as is for legal reasoning in real life scenarios as they would only excel in accurately predicting the most recurrent verdicts to the detriment of other legal outcomes.', 'sw': 'Utabiri wa hukumu za sheria (LJP) mara nyingi hujumuisha katika kazi ya usambazaji wa maandishi yenye lengo la kutabiri hukumu hiyo kwa msingi wa maelezo ya ukweli. Fasihi hiyo inaonyesha kuwa matumizi ya makala kama utambulisho wa maandishi yanasaidia kuboresha performance of classification. Katika kazi hii, tuliunda jukumu la kutabiri kwa msingi wa migogoro ya msingi wa tena na tulitumia miundo ya msingi wa BERT ambayo tulikula vipengele tofauti vya makala. Ingawa matokeo yaliyopatikana yanalinganisha na fasihi, maboresho ya makala yanapatikana zaidi na maabara ya mara nyingi, “Inapendekeza kwamba mifano ya mabadiliko yenye mafunzo ya zamani na yenye mikono mazuri hayaonekani vibaya kama ni kwa sababu ya kisheria katika hali halisi ya maisha kwa sababu tu wanaweza kuwa bora zaidi katika kutabiri hukumu zinazoendelea zaidi kwa uharibifu wa matokeo mengine ya kisheria.', 'bn': 'বৈধ বিচারের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী (এলজেপি) সাধারণত একটি টেক্সট গ্রাফিকেশন কাজে রয়েছে যার লক্ষ্যে এই রায়ের বিবরণের ভিত্তিতে পূর সাহিত্য দেখাচ্ছে যে ইনপুটের বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে প্রবন্ধগুলোর ব্যবহার সাহায্য করে ক্লাসাফিকেশনের প্রদর্ এই কাজে আমরা একটি রায়ের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী কাজের গঠন করেছিলাম ভূমিকম্প-ভিত্তিক বিতর্কের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক বিবেরেট-ভিত্তিক মডেলের উপরে এবং  যদিও ফলাফল পাওয়া গেছে সাহিত্যের সাথে একত্রিত, তবে প্রবন্ধের উন্নতি বেশীরভাগ প্রায়শ লেবেল দিয়ে পাওয়া গেছে, পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত এবং ভিত্তিক পরিবর্তনের মডেলের ক্ষেত্রে বৈধ কারণ নেই কারণ তারা শুধুমাত্র সঠিকভাবে প্রত্যাবর্তন করে অন্যান্য আইনিক ফলাফলের ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হওয়ার জন্য প্রতি', 'bs': 'Predviđanje pravnog suda (LJP) obično se sastoji u zadatku klasifikacije teksta koji se cilja predvidjeti presudu na temelju opisa činjenica. Literatura pokazuje da korištenje članaka kao ulazne funkcije pomaže poboljšati klasifikaciju. U ovom poslu smo dizajnirali predviđanje presude na temelju spora o stanovniku stanara i primjenili smo modele na osnovu BERT-a na koje smo hranili različite karakteristike na osnovu članova. Iako su dobiveni rezultati u skladu sa literaturom, poboljšanje članaka se uglavnom dobija sa najčešćim etiketama, Predlažeći da predobučeni i ispravni transformacijski modeli nisu mjerljivi, kao i za pravni razum u scenarijima stvarnog života, jer bi samo predviđali najponovnije presude u šteti drugih pravnih ishoda.', 'am': 'የሕግ ፍርድ ውይይት (LJP) በተለመደ ጊዜ ውይይቱን በመቀበል በሚያሳየው የጽሑፍ ክፍል አድራሻ ውስጥ ነው፡፡ የጽሑፉ ትምህርት የጽሑፎችን ጥያቄ እንደሚያሳየው የግንኙነት ክፍተት ማድረግ ይረዳል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ የውይይት የመሬት ባለቤት-አካላዊ ክርክር በሚያሳየው የፍርድ ጉዳይ መፍጠርን አቀረብን እናም BERT-based ምሳሌዎችን ለመጠቀም እና የተለያዩ የጽሑፎችን አካላት ለመጠቀም ጠቅመን ነበር፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ፍሬቶቹ በጸሐፊው ቢተካከሉ፣ የጽሑፎቹ አካባቢዎች አብዛኛውን በጥያቄ ምልክቶች ያገኛሉ፡፡ ለቀድሞ ተማሪዎች እና መልካሙን ለውጦች መተላለፊያዎች የሕግ ምክንያት ሳይነካ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Օրինակական դատողության կանխատեսումը (LJP) սովորաբար կազմում է տեքստի դասակարգման խնդիր, որի նպատակով է կանխատեսել դատողությունը փաստերի նկարագրման հիմքում: Գրագրությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ հոդվածների օգտագործումը որպես մուտքագրական հատկություններ օգնում է բարելավել դասակարգման արդյունքը: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք նախագծեցինք դատաստանի կանխատեսման խնդիր, որը հիմնված է տնտես-վարձակալներ վիճերի վրա և կիրառեցինք BER-ի հիմնված մոդելներ, որոնց վրա մենք կերակրեցինք տարբեր հոդվածների հիմնված հատկություններ: Չնայած, որ ստացված արդյունքները համապատասխանում են գրականության հետ, հոդվածների բարելավումները հիմնականում ստացվում են ամենահաճախ պիտակներով, Դա առաջարկում է, որ նախապատրաստված և բարձրացված վերափոխողների հիմնված մոդելները չեն կարելի ընդլայնել, ինչպես իրավական մտածելակերպման դեպքում իրական կյանքի սցենարներում, քանի որ դրանք միայն կզարգանան ճշգրիտ կանխատեսելով ամենակրկնվող դատաստանները, ինչը վնաս է մնացած իրավական', 'az': 'Yaxşı hökm tədbirləri (LJP) əslində həqiqət təsbirləri üzərində hökmünü təsbit etmək məqsədilə yazılmış bir mətn klasifikasiya görevi içindədir. Yazılıq məktubların istifadəsi giriş xüsusiyyətlərinə kömək edir. Bu işdə, sahib sahibi mübahisələrə dayanan hökm tədbir işləri təyin etdik və BERT-ə dayanan modelləri təyin etdik ki, farklı maddələrə dayanan fəaliyyətlər təyin etdik. Yaxınlıqların sonuçları səhifələrə uyğun olsa da, məsələlər ilə yaxşılıqlar çox sık etiketlərlə alınır. Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş və düzgün təhsil edilmiş transformatçı modellərin çəkinməsi mümkün deyildir, çünki onlar həqiqi həyat scenariyalarında yasal fikirləşmək üçün ancaq başqa qayda üzrə gələnlərin ən təhsil verəcəyi hökmlərin zərərini təsdiqləməsi üçün daha çox təhsil edərdilər.', 'cs': 'Právní predikce rozsudku (LJP) se obvykle skládá z textové klasifikace zaměřené na předpověď rozsudku na základě popisu skutečnosti. Literatura ukazuje, že použití článků jako vstupních funkcí pomáhá zlepšit klasifikační výkon. V této práci jsme navrhli úlohu predikce verdiktu založený na sporech pronajímatele-nájemce a aplikovali modely založené na BERT, na které jsme přidávali různé funkce založené na článku. Ačkoli získané výsledky jsou v souladu s literaturou, zlepšení s články jsou většinou dosaženo s nejčastějšími etiketami, naznačuje, že předškolené a jemně vyladěné modely založené na transformátorech nejsou škálovatelné, jako je tomu u právního uvažování v reálných scénářích, protože by vynikaly pouze v přesném předpovídání nejopakovanějších verdiktů na úkor jiných právních výsledků.', 'fi': 'Oikeudellisen tuomion ennustaminen (LJP) koostuu yleensä tekstin luokittelutehtävästä, jonka tarkoituksena on ennustaa tuomio faktakavauksen perusteella. Kirjallisuus osoittaa, että artikkelien käyttö syöttöominaisuuksina auttaa parantamaan luokitusta. Tässä työssä suunnittelimme vuokranantaja-vuokralaisriitoihin perustuvan tuomioennustetehtävän ja sovelsimme BERT-pohjaisia malleja, joihin syötimme erilaisia artikkelipohjaisia ominaisuuksia. Vaikka saadut tulokset ovat kirjallisuuden mukaisia, artikkeleissa tehdyt parannukset saavutetaan useimmiten yleisimmillä etiketeillä. Esikoulutetut ja hienoviritetyt muuntajapohjaiset mallit eivät ole skaalautuvia, kuten on oikeudellista päättelyä tosielämän skenaarioissa, koska ne vain ennustaisivat tarkasti toistuvia tuomioita muiden oikeudellisten tulosten kustannuksella.', 'et': 'Õigusliku kohtuotsuse prognoos (LJP) koosneb tavaliselt teksti klassifitseerimise ülesandest, mille eesmärk on prognoosida otsust faktikirjelduse alusel. Kirjandus näitab, et artiklite kasutamine sisendfunktsioonidena aitab parandada klassifikatsiooni tulemuslikkust. Selles töös töötasime välja otsuste prognoosimise ülesande, mis põhineb üürileandja-üürniku vaidlustel ning rakendasime BERT-põhiseid mudeleid, millele lisasime erinevaid artiklipõhiseid funktsioone. Kuigi saadud tulemused on kooskõlas kirjandusega, saavutatakse parandusi artiklitega enamasti kõige sagedasemate etikettidega, väidetakse, et eelnevalt koolitatud ja täpselt häälestatud transformaatoril põhinevad mudelid ei ole skaleeritavad nagu on õigusliku arutluse puhul reaalsete stsenaariumide puhul, kuna need oleksid suurepärased ainult kõige korduvamate otsuste täpsema prognoosimise osas, mis kahjustaks muid õiguslikke tulemusi.', 'ca': "La predicció del judici legal (LJP) normalment consisteix en una tasca de classificació de textos destinada a predir el veredicte sobre la base de la descripció de fets. La literatura mostra que l'ús d'articles com a característiques d'entrada ajuda a millorar el rendiment de la classificació. En aquesta feina vam dissenyar una tasca de predicció de verdictes basada en controversies entre propietaris i inquilins i vam aplicar models basats en BERT a les quals vam alimentar diferents característiques basades en articles. Tot i que els resultats obtenits són compatibles amb la literatura, les millores amb els articles es obtenen principalment amb les etiquetes més freqüents, suggereix que models pré-entrenats i perfeccionats basats en transformadors no són escalables com per al raonament legal en escenaris de vida real, perquè només excellen en predir exactament els verdictes més recurrents a detriment d'altres resultats legals.", 'jv': 'Where am I Genjer Nang iki trabah, kita disenyongi un barêng nggawe geraksi dadi aturan sing paling nggawe geraksi winih-tenan lan aplikasi BERT-basa model sing bisa nyimpen kuwi nggawe nyimpen manut sing bisa basa sing paling dumadhi. Mangkin nganggo akeh njaluk ditambah lan didasakno, luwih njaluk ngono matsalang sing luwih apik lan etiket sing apik dhéwé, Sugeng-suggersul kuwi model sing beraksi lan akeh-perusahaan transformer sing bisa pasar iki dadi apik dhéwé kuwi tindakan aturan sing luwih dumadhi iki, nik awak dhéwé kuwi mau sing luwih apik dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé kuwi mau ngerasai perusahaan winih sing apik dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Predvidevanje pravne sodbe (LJP) je običajno sestavljeno iz naloge klasifikacije besedila, katere namen je napovedati sodbo na podlagi opisa dejstev. Literatura kaže, da uporaba člankov kot vhodnih funkcij pomaga izboljšati učinkovitost klasifikacije. V tem delu smo oblikovali nalogo napovedovanja sodb na podlagi sporov med najemodajalcem in najemnikom ter uporabili modele na podlagi BERT, v katere smo dodali različne funkcije na podlagi člankov. Čeprav so doseženi rezultati skladni z literaturo, so izboljšave s članki večinoma dosežene z najpogostejšimi oznakami, kaže, da vnaprej usposobljeni in natančno nastavljeni modeli na podlagi transformatorjev niso razširljivi, kot je za pravno utemeljitev v realnih scenarijih, saj bi bili odlični le pri natančnem napovedovanju najbolj ponavljajočih se sodb v škodo drugih pravnih rezultatov.', 'ha': "Yinin hukuncin sharia (LJP) ɗammãnin a cikin wani aikin mai fassarawa na rubutu don ya yi kuskure ga birnin a kan bayani na fassarar da gaskiyar. Abutar littafi na nuna cewa isticmen abun makala kamar misalin ayuka da aka shigar shi yana taimakon ya kyautata performance na fasasar. Daga wannan aikin, muka designa wani aikin kunyar basĩri a kan baka muramman mai kirãyi kuma muka sami misãlai na BERT wanda muka ciyar da shi masu hushi na daban. Haƙĩƙa da aka sami matsalar da littãfin, sai an sami improven makala da mafi yawansa da alama masu sauri, Ana gaya cewa misãlai da aka danne shi a gaba-tun da mai kyau ba za'a zartar da shi ba kamar sababin sharci ne a cikin fassarar rãyuwa da gaskiya, kwani za su fĩfĩta kawai da gaskiya dõmin ka yi bayani ga sauri masu kamid da takwarar da za'a zartar da fassaran wasu sharci.", 'bo': 'Legal judgment prediction (LJP)usually consists of a text classification task that aims to predict the verdict on the basis of the fact description. འཕྲིན་ཡིག་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ནི་གསལ་རིམ་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ འུ་ཅག་གིས་ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་འཇིག གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ཡི་གེ་ཚོ་རྩོམ་འབྲས་ཡོད་ནའང་ཞིག་དར་འབྲི་བ་དང་མཉམ་ཡོད་ནའང་། བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་།', 'he': 'Legal judgment prediction (LJP) usually consists in a text classification task aimed at predicting the verdict on the basis of the fact description.  The literature shows that the use of articles as input features helps improve the classification performance.  בעבודה הזאת, עיצבנו משימה חזיון פסק דין מבוססת על ויכוחים בית-שכירים והשתמשנו בדוגמנים מבוססים על BERT Although the results obtained are consistent with the literature, the improvements with the articles are mostly obtained with the most frequent labels,  suggesting that pre-trained and fine-tuned transformer-based models are not scalable as is for legal reasoning in real life scenarios as they would only excel in accurately predicting the most recurrent verdicts to the detriment of other legal outcomes.'}
{'en': 'A Semi-Supervised Approach to Detect Toxic Comments', 'ar': 'طريقة شبه خاضعة للإشراف لاكتشاف التعليقات السامة', 'pt': 'Uma abordagem semi-supervisionada para detectar comentários tóxicos', 'es': 'Un enfoque semisupervisado para detectar comentarios tóxicos', 'fr': 'Une approche semi-supervisée pour détecter les commentaires toxiques', 'ja': '有害なコメントを検出するための半監督アプローチ', 'zh': '检测有毒论者半监之', 'ru': 'Полуконтролируемый подход к обнаружению токсичных комментариев', 'hi': 'विषाक्त टिप्पणियों का पता लगाने के लिए एक अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Leath-Maoirsithe chun Tuairimí Tocsaineacha a Bhrath', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια ημι-εποπτευόμενη προσέγγιση για την ανίχνευση τοξικών σχολίων', 'hu': 'A toxikus megjegyzések kimutatásának félig felügyelt megközelítése', 'kk': 'Токсикалық түсініктемелерді анықтау үшін жарты бақылау жағдайыName', 'mk': 'Половина надгледуван пристап за откривање токсични коментари', 'it': 'Un approccio semi-supervisionato per rilevare commenti tossici', 'lt': 'Puspriežiūros metodas toksiškoms pastaboms nustatyti', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ടോക്സിക്ക് അഭിപ്രായങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു സെമി- സൂപ്പര്\u200dവ്വപ്പെട്ട സമീപത്ത്', 'mn': 'Тохиромжтой комментарүүдийг олохын тулд', 'mt': 'Approċċ Semissorveljat għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Kummenti Tossiċi', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Podejście pół-nadzorowane do wykrywania komentarzy toksycznych', 'ro': 'O abordare semi-supravegheată pentru detectarea comentariilor toxice', 'sr': 'Polovicni pristup detektivnom toksičkom komentaru', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Semi-Supered Approach to Find Comments Toxic', 'sv': 'En halvövervakad metod för att upptäcka toxiska kommentarer', 'ta': 'தொகுதி குறிப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு அரைப்பு சேர்க்கப்பட்டது', 'ur': 'ٹوکسیکسی کمانٹروں کو پہچان کرنے کے لئے نصف-Supervised Approach', 'vi': 'Một phương pháp giám sát hóa học', 'uz': 'Name', 'hr': 'Polovično nadzirani pristup otkrivanju toksičkih komentara', 'nl': 'Een semi-supervised aanpak om giftige reacties op te sporen', 'da': 'En halvovervåget metode til påvisning af toksiske bemærkninger', 'bg': 'Полунадзорен подход за откриване на токсични коментари', 'ko': '유독 평론을 검출하는 반감독 방법', 'de': 'Ein halbüberwachter Ansatz zur Erkennung giftiger Kommentare', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Kugundua Maoni ya Kitoxico', 'tr': 'Loktik wajyplary tapmak üçin Azamdan Gözlemýän Approach', 'fa': 'یک نزدیک نیمه مراقبت برای شناسایی توضیح\u200cهای تاکسیکی', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'Toxic Comments', 'sq': 'A Semi-Supervised Approach to Detect Toxic Comments', 'hy': 'Տոքսիկ մեկնաբանությունների հայտնաբերման կես-վերահսկված մոտեցումը', 'az': 'Toksik Komutanlarını Tapmaq üçün yarı-gözləyirli Yaxınlıq', 'bn': 'A Semi-Supervised Approach to Detect Toxic Comments', 'bs': 'Polovicni pristup otkrivanju toksičkih komentara', 'id': 'Sebuah pendekatan Semi-Supervised untuk Deteksi Komentar Toksik', 'cs': 'Polovičně kontrolovaný přístup k detekci toxických komentářů', 'ca': 'Un enfocament semisupervisat per detectar comentaris tòxics', 'et': 'Pooljärelevalvega meetod toksiliste märkuste tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Puolivalvottu lähestymistapa myrkyllisten huomautusten havaitsemiseen', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Polnadzorovan pristop k odkrivanju strupenih pripomb', 'he': 'גישה חצי מושגת לגלות הערות רעילות', 'jv': 'Subtitles', 'bo': 'Toxic Comments་བཙལ་སྐབས་ལྡན་རྗེས་མཁན་གྱི་Approach།'}
{'en': 'Toxic comments contain forms of non-acceptable language targeted towards groups or individuals. These types of comments become a serious concern for government organizations, online communities, and social media platforms. Although there are some approaches to handle non-acceptable language, most of them focus on supervised learning and the English language. In this paper, we deal with toxic comment detection as a semi-supervised strategy over a heterogeneous graph. We evaluate the approach on a toxic dataset of the Portuguese language, outperforming several graph-based methods and achieving competitive results compared to transformer architectures.', 'ar': 'تحتوي التعليقات السامة على أشكال لغة غير مقبولة تستهدف مجموعات أو أفراد. أصبحت هذه الأنواع من التعليقات مصدر قلق كبير للمنظمات الحكومية والمجتمعات عبر الإنترنت ومنصات التواصل الاجتماعي. على الرغم من وجود بعض الأساليب للتعامل مع اللغة غير المقبولة ، إلا أن معظمها يركز على التعلم تحت الإشراف واللغة الإنجليزية. في هذه الورقة ، نتعامل مع اكتشاف التعليقات السامة كإستراتيجية شبه خاضعة للإشراف على رسم بياني غير متجانس. نقوم بتقييم النهج على مجموعة بيانات سامة للغة البرتغالية ، متفوقًا على العديد من الأساليب القائمة على الرسم البياني وتحقيق نتائج تنافسية مقارنة بهياكل المحولات.', 'pt': 'Comentários tóxicos contêm formas de linguagem inaceitáveis direcionadas a grupos ou indivíduos. Esses tipos de comentários se tornam uma séria preocupação para organizações governamentais, comunidades online e plataformas de mídia social. Embora existam algumas abordagens para lidar com linguagem não aceitável, a maioria delas se concentra no aprendizado supervisionado e na língua inglesa. Neste artigo, tratamos da detecção de comentários tóxicos como uma estratégia semi-supervisionada sobre um grafo heterogêneo. Avaliamos a abordagem em um conjunto de dados tóxico da língua portuguesa, superando vários métodos baseados em grafos e alcançando resultados competitivos em comparação com arquiteturas de transformadores.', 'fr': "Les commentaires toxiques contiennent des formes de langage inacceptables destinées à des groupes ou à des individus. Ce type de commentaires devient une grave préoccupation pour les organisations gouvernementales, les communautés en ligne et les plateformes de médias sociaux. Bien qu'il existe certaines approches pour gérer une langue non acceptable, la plupart d'entre elles se concentrent sur l'apprentissage supervisé et la langue anglaise. Dans cet article, nous traitons de la détection des commentaires toxiques en tant que stratégie semi-supervisée sur un graphique hétérogène. Nous évaluons l'approche sur un ensemble de données toxique de la langue portugaise, surpassant plusieurs méthodes basées sur des graphes et obtenant des résultats compétitifs par rapport aux architectures de transformateurs.", 'es': 'Los comentarios tóxicos contienen formas de lenguaje no aceptable dirigidas a grupos o individuos. Este tipo de comentarios se convierten en una seria preocupación para las organizaciones gubernamentales, las comunidades en línea y las plataformas de redes sociales. Aunque existen algunos enfoques para manejar el idioma no aceptable, la mayoría de ellos se centran en el aprendizaje supervisado y el idioma inglés. En este artículo, tratamos la detección de comentarios tóxicos como una estrategia semi-supervisada sobre un gráfico heterogéneo. Evaluamos el enfoque en un conjunto de datos tóxicos del idioma portugués, superando a varios métodos basados en gráficos y logrando resultados competitivos en comparación con las arquitecturas de transformadores.', 'ja': '有毒なコメントには、グループや個人を対象とした許容できない言葉が含まれています。これらの種類のコメントは、政府組織、オンラインコミュニティ、ソーシャルメディアプラットフォームにとって深刻な懸念事項となっています。受け入れられない言語を扱うためのいくつかのアプローチはありますが、そのほとんどは監督下での学習と英語に焦点を当てています。本稿では，異種グラフ上での半監督戦略として毒性コメント検出を扱う．私たちは、ポルトガル語の有毒なデータセット上のアプローチを評価し、いくつかのグラフベースの方法を上回り、変圧器アーキテクチャと比較して競争力のある結果を達成します。', 'zh': '有毒论包针群体及私人不可受之言。 论为政府,在线社区社交媒体平台。 虽有不可受之言,而多集于督英语。 本文,我们将有毒评论检测为异构图上的半监督方略处理。 吾葡萄牙语有毒数集上评之,优于图形,比于变压器架构而有竞争力也。', 'ru': 'Токсичные комментарии содержат формы неприемлемых формулировок, ориентированных на группы или отдельных лиц. Такие комментарии становятся серьезной проблемой для правительственных организаций, онлайн-сообществ и платформ социальных сетей. Хотя существуют некоторые подходы к решению проблемы неприемлемого языка, большинство из них сосредоточены на изучении под наблюдением и изучении английского языка. В этой статье мы рассматриваем обнаружение токсических комментариев как полунадзорную стратегию в отношении гетерогенного графа. Мы оцениваем подход на токсичном наборе данных португальского языка, превосходящий несколько графических методов и достигая конкурентных результатов по сравнению с трансформаторными архитектурами.', 'hi': 'विषाक्त टिप्पणियों में समूहों या व्यक्तियों के प्रति लक्षित गैर-स्वीकार्य भाषा के रूप होते हैं। इस प्रकार की टिप्पणियां सरकारी संगठनों, ऑनलाइन समुदायों और सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफार्मों के लिए एक गंभीर चिंता का विषय बन जाती हैं। हालांकि गैर-स्वीकार्य भाषा को संभालने के लिए कुछ दृष्टिकोण हैं, उनमें से अधिकांश पर्यवेक्षित सीखने और अंग्रेजी भाषा पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक विषम ग्राफ पर अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित रणनीति के रूप में विषाक्त टिप्पणी का पता लगाने से निपटते हैं। हम पुर्तगाली भाषा के एक विषाक्त डेटासेट पर दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, कई ग्राफ-आधारित तरीकों को पछाड़ते हैं और ट्रांसफॉर्मर आर्किटेक्चर की तुलना में प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Cuimsíonn tráchtanna tocsaineacha cineálacha teanga neamh-inghlactha atá dírithe ar ghrúpaí nó ar dhaoine aonair. Is ábhar mór imní d’eagraíochtaí rialtais, do phobail ar líne agus d’ardáin na meán sóisialta na cineálacha tuairimí seo. Cé go bhfuil roinnt cur chuige ann chun teanga neamh-inghlactha a láimhseáil, díríonn an chuid is mó acu ar fhoghlaim faoi mhaoirseacht agus ar an mBéarla. Sa pháipéar seo, pléimid le braite tuairimí tocsaineacha mar straitéis leath-mhaoirsithe thar ghraf ilchineálach. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar an gcur chuige maidir le tacar sonraí tocsaineach na Portaingéile, rud a sháraíonn roinnt modhanna graf-bhunaithe agus ag baint amach torthaí iomaíocha i gcomparáid le hailtireachtaí claochladáin.', 'el': 'Τα τοξικά σχόλια περιέχουν μορφές μη αποδεκτής γλώσσας που απευθύνονται σε ομάδες ή άτομα. Αυτά τα σχόλια γίνονται σοβαρή ανησυχία για κυβερνητικές οργανώσεις, διαδικτυακές κοινότητες και πλατφόρμες κοινωνικών μέσων. Αν και υπάρχουν κάποιες προσεγγίσεις για τη διαχείριση μη αποδεκτής γλώσσας, οι περισσότερες από αυτές επικεντρώνονται στην εποπτευόμενη μάθηση και στην αγγλική γλώσσα. Στην παρούσα εργασία, ασχολούμαστε με την ανίχνευση τοξικών σχολίων ως μια ημιεπιτηρημένη στρατηγική πάνω από ένα ετερογενή γράφημα. Αξιολογούμε την προσέγγιση σε ένα τοξικό σύνολο δεδομένων της πορτογαλικής γλώσσας, ξεπερνώντας αρκετές μεθόδους βασισμένες σε γραφήματα και επιτυγχάνοντας ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα σε σύγκριση με τις αρχιτεκτονικές μετασχηματιστών.', 'ka': 'ტექსიკური კომენტრებები აქვს არ მივიღებელი ენის ფორმები, რომელიც ჯგუფები ან ადამიანებისთვის მიყენებული. ეს კომენტრებების ტიპები გახდება სერიო დარწმუნება სამყარო ორგანიზაციების, ინტერნეტის საზოგადოებების და სოციალური მედია პლატატ მაგრამ არსებობს რამდენიმე წარმოდგენები, რომლებიც არ მიიღებელი ენაზე, უფრო მეტი მათგანი განაკეთებული სწავლებაზე და ინგლისური ენაზე. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ვამუშავებთ ტოქსიკური კომენტრების განახსნა, როგორც ნახევარჯივებული სტრატიგია ჰეტეროგენური გრაფიკზე. ჩვენ პორტეგური ენის ტოქსიკური მონაცემების შესახებ გავუმუშავებთ, რამდენიმე გრაფიკური მეტოვების გარეშე და კონტეგური შესახებ გავაკეთებთ, რომლებიც ტრანფორმე', 'hu': 'A mérgező megjegyzések a csoportokra vagy egyénekre irányuló, elfogadhatatlan nyelv formáit tartalmazzák. Az ilyen típusú megjegyzések komoly aggodalommá válnak a kormányzati szervezetek, az online közösségek és a közösségi média platformok számára. Bár van néhány megközelítés a nem elfogadható nyelv kezelésére, a legtöbbjük a felügyelt tanulásra és az angol nyelvre összpontosít. Ebben a tanulmányban a toxikus megjegyzések detektálásával foglalkozunk, mint félig felügyelt stratégiával heterogén grafikon felett. A portugál nyelvű toxikus adatkészleten alapuló megközelítést értékeljük, több grafikon alapú módszert felülmúlva és versenyképes eredményeket érünk el a transzformátor architektúrákhoz képest.', 'it': "I commenti tossici contengono forme di linguaggio non accettabile rivolte a gruppi o individui. Questi tipi di commenti diventano una seria preoccupazione per le organizzazioni governative, le comunità online e le piattaforme di social media. Sebbene ci siano alcuni approcci per gestire la lingua non accettabile, la maggior parte di essi si concentra sull'apprendimento supervisionato e la lingua inglese. In questo articolo, ci occupiamo del rilevamento dei commenti tossici come strategia semi-supervisionata su un grafico eterogeneo. Valutiamo l'approccio su un set di dati tossici della lingua portoghese, superando diversi metodi basati su grafici e ottenendo risultati competitivi rispetto alle architetture dei trasformatori.", 'kk': 'Токсикалық түсініктемелерде топтар не жеке тілдерге қатынауға болмайтын тіл түрлері бар. Бұл түрлі түсініктемелер үкімет құрылымдары, онлайн компаттары және социалдық медиа платформалары үшін маңызды қатынас болады. Кейбір тілді қабылдауға мүмкіндік емес болса да, олардың көпшілігі бақылау оқытуға және ағылшын тіліне көмектеседі. Бұл қағазда біз гетероген график арқылы жарты бақылау стратегиясы ретінде тоғыс түсініктерді анықтап тұрмыз. Португалия тілінің токсичті деректер жиынының арқылы, графика негізінде бірнеше әдістерді жұмыс істеу және қарым-қатынастық нәтижелерді түрлендіру архитектураларымен салыстырып жетк', 'lt': 'Toksiškose pastabose pateikiamos nepriimtinos kalbos formos, skirtos grupėms ar asmenims. Šių rūšių pastabos tampa rimtu susirūpinimu vyriausybinėmis organizacijomis, internetinėmis bendruomenėmis ir socialinės žiniasklaidos platformomis. Nors yra tam tikrų metodų, kaip tvarkyti nepriimtiną kalbą, dauguma jų daugiausia dėmesio skiria prižiūrimui mokymuisi ir anglų kalbai. Šiame dokumente, kaip pusiau prižiūrima strategija dėl heterogeninio grafiko, sprendžiame toksinių komentarų aptikimo klausimus. Vertiname požiūrį į toksinį portugalų kalbos duomenų rinkinį, viršijame kelis grafiniais metodus ir siekiame konkurencinių rezultatų, palyginti su transformatorių architektūromis.', 'ms': 'Ulasan toksik mengandungi bentuk bahasa yang tidak diterima yang ditujukan kepada kumpulan atau individu. Ulangan jenis ini menjadi masalah serius bagi organisasi kerajaan, komuniti online, dan platform media sosial. Walaupun terdapat beberapa pendekatan untuk mengendalikan bahasa yang tidak diterima, kebanyakan mereka fokus pada belajar yang diawasi dan bahasa Inggeris. In this paper, we deal with toxic comment detection as a semi-supervised strategy over a heterogeneous graph.  Kami menilai pendekatan pada set data toksik bahasa Portugis, melampaui beberapa kaedah berdasarkan graf dan mencapai keputusan kompetitif dibandingkan dengan arkitektur pengubah.', 'ml': 'ടോക്സിക്ക് കുറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്കോ വ്യക്തികള്\u200dക്കോ ലക്ഷ്യം ലഭിക്കാത്ത ഭാഷ ഉണ്ട്. ഈ തരം കണക്കുകള്\u200d സര്\u200dക്കാര്\u200d സംഘടനകള്\u200d, ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സമൂഹങ്ങള്\u200d, സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകള്\u200dക്കും ഗുരുതരമായി പ സ്വീകരിക്കാത്ത ഭാഷ കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ചില വഴികളുണ്ടെങ്കിലും അവരില്\u200d അധികപേരും പഠിക്കുന്നതിനെയും ഇംഗ്ലീഷി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d വിഷമമുള്ള കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നോക്കിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഹ We evaluate the approach on a toxic dataset of the Portuguese language, outperforming several graph-based methods and achieving competitive results compared to transformer architectures.', 'mk': 'Токсичните коментари содржат форми на неприфатлив јазик насочен кон групи или поединци. Овие видови коментари стануваат сериозна загриженост за владините организации, онлајн заедници и платформи на социјалните медиуми. Иако постојат некои пристапи за справување со неприфатлив јазик, повеќето од нив се фокусираат на надгледуваното учење и англискиот јазик. Во овој весник, ние се справуваме со детекција на токсични коментари како полунадгледувана стратегија над хетероген граф. Го проценуваме пристапот на токсичен податок на португалскиот јазик, надминувајќи неколку методи базирани на график и постигнувајќи конкурентни резултати во споредба со трансформирачките архитектури.', 'mt': 'Kummenti tossiċi fihom forom ta’ lingwa mhux aċċettabbli mmirata lejn gruppi jew individwi. Dawn it-tipi ta’ kummenti jsiru tħassib serju għall-organizzazzjonijiet tal-gvern, il-komunitajiet onlajn, u l-pjattaformi tal-midja soċjali. Għalkemm hemm xi approċċi għall-ġestjoni tal-lingwa mhux aċċettabbli, il-biċċa l-kbira minnhom jiffokaw fuq it-tagħlim sorveljat u l-lingwa Ingliża. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nindirizzaw l-iskoperta ta’ kummenti tossiċi bħala strateġija semisuperviża fuq graff eteroġenu. Aħna jevalwaw l-approċċ fuq sett ta’ dejta tossiku tal-lingwa Portugiża, li jwettaq diversi metodi bbażati fuq il-grafika u li jikseb riżultati kompetittivi meta mqabbel ma’ arkitetturi trasformaturi.', 'mn': 'Токсикийн сэтгэл зүйлсийн хэлбэрүүд бүлэг, хүн төрөлхтний төлөө хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдөггүй хэлний хэлбэрүүд байдаг. Эдгээр төрлийн засгийн газрын байгууллагууд, онлайн нийгмийн, нийгмийн медиа платформуудын тухай үнэхээр сэтгэл хөдлөл болсон. Хэдийгээр хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдөхгүй хэлний тулд зарим арга зам байдаг ч ихэнх нь хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн суралцах, Англи хэл дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид гетерогены график дээр хагас дамжуулагдсан шинж тэмдэглэгдэх стратеги гэж боддог. Бид Португалийн хэл дээрх хохиромжтой өгөгдлийн сангийн аргыг үнэлж, график дээрх олон арга замыг илүү хийж, өрсөлдөөний үр дүнг өөрчлөх архитектуруудын харьцуулахад илүү өрсөлдөг.', 'no': 'Toksiske kommentarar inneheld formar av ikkje akseptabel språk målt mot grupper eller individuer. Desse typane kommentarar blir ein alvorleg bekymring for regjeringsorganisasjonar, internetkommunikasjonar og sosiale mediaplattformar. Selv om det finst nokre tilnærmingar å handtera ikkje-akseptabel språk, vil dei meste fokusera på oversikt læring og engelsk språk. I denne papiret betrakter vi med å oppdaga toksiske kommentarar som ein semioversikt strategi over eit heterogenesk graf. Vi evaluerer tilnærminga på eit toksisk datasett av portugisisk språk, utfører fleire grafikkbaserte metodar og oppnår konkurentære resultat sammenlignet med transformeringsarkitektur.', 'ro': 'Observațiile toxice conțin forme de limbaj inacceptabil destinate grupurilor sau indivizilor. Aceste tipuri de comentarii devin o preocupare serioasa pentru organizatiile guvernamentale, comunitatile online si platformele de social media. Deși există unele abordări pentru a gestiona limba neacceptabilă, cele mai multe dintre ele se concentrează pe învățarea supravegheată și limba engleză. În această lucrare, ne ocupăm de detectarea comentariilor toxice ca o strategie semi-supravegheată pe un grafic eterogen. Evaluăm abordarea pe un set de date toxice din limba portugheză, depășind mai multe metode bazate pe grafice și obținând rezultate competitive în comparație cu arhitecturile transformatoare.', 'pl': 'Toksyczne komentarze zawierają formy niedopuszczalnego języka skierowane do grup lub osób indywidualnych. Tego typu komentarze stają się poważnym problemem dla organizacji rządowych, społeczności online i platform mediów społecznościowych. Chociaż istnieją pewne podejścia do obsługi języka nieakceptowanego, większość z nich skupia się na nauce nadzorowanej i języku angielskim. W artykule zajmujemy się wykrywaniem komentarzy toksycznych jako strategią pół-nadzorowaną na heterogenicznym wykresie. Oceniamy podejście na podstawie toksycznego zbioru danych języka portugalskiego, przewyższając kilka metod opartych na wykresie i osiągając konkurencyjne wyniki w porównaniu z architekturą transformatorów.', 'sr': 'Toksički komentari sadrže oblike neprihvatljivog jezika ciljanih prema grupama ili pojedincima. Ove vrste komentara postaju ozbiljna zabrinutost za vladine organizacije, internetske zajednice i platforme društvenih medija. Iako postoje neki pristupi za rješavanje neprihvatljivog jezika, većina njih se fokusira na nadzorno učenje i engleski jezik. U ovom papiru se bavimo otkrivanjem toksičnih komentara kao polu-nadzornu strategiju zbog heterogeneznog grafika. Procjenjujemo pristup toksičnom setu podataka portugalskog jezika, iznosi nekoliko metoda na grafiku i ostvarimo konkurentne rezultate u usporedbi sa transformacijom arhitekture.', 'so': 'kommentaha toksiska waxaa ku jira noocyo luqad aan la aqbali karin oo loogu talagalay kooxo ama qof gaar ah. Turjumaadyadan waxay noqdeen kuwa aad u welwelsan ururada dowladda, bulshada internetka iyo majalada shabakadda bulshada. Inta kastoo ay leeyihiin qaabab aan la aqbali karin luqada, intooda badan waxay ku kalsoonaadaan waxbarashada la ilaaliyo iyo afka ingiriisiga. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka macaamiloonnaa aragtida maandooriyaha sida qoraal la ilaaliyo hal ka mid ah xarunta jinsiyada. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa habka macluumaadka caqliga ah ee luuqada Burtuqiis, oo sameynaya qaabab badan oo xaraf ku saleysan iyo heli karto resultooyin tartanka ah oo la barbarbarto isbedelka dhismaha.', 'si': 'ටොක්සික් සලකුණු සම්බන්ධයෙන් පිළිබඳ නොපිළිබඳ භාෂාව සඳහා අරමුණු කණ්ඩායම් නැ මේ ප්\u200dරමාණ වර්ගයක් රජාත්මක සංවිධානය, අන්ලයාන් සමාජ සමාජය, සමාජ මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරව ප්\u200dරතිකාර නොපුළුවන් භාෂාව පාලනය කරන්න සමහර විදිහක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, ඔවුන්ගේ ගොඩක් අධිකාරිත විදිහ මේ පත්තරේ අපි විෂ්\u200dය කිරීමක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට හොයාගන්න හැකියාවක් හොයාගන්න හැකියා අපි පොර්තුගුලි භාෂාවේ විෂ්\u200dය දත්ත සූදානයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, ග්\u200dරාෆ් අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාවක් විසින් විසින් විද්\u200d', 'sv': 'Giftiga kommentarer innehåller former av oacceptabelt språk riktade mot grupper eller individer. Dessa typer av kommentarer blir ett allvarligt problem för statliga organisationer, onlinegrupper och sociala medieplattformar. Även om det finns vissa tillvägagångssätt för att hantera icke-acceptabelt språk fokuserar de flesta på övervakat lärande och engelska språket. I denna uppsats behandlar vi toxiska kommentarsdetektioner som en halvövervakad strategi över en heterogen graf. Vi utvärderar tillvägagångssättet på ett giftigt dataset på portugisiska språket, överträffar flera grafbaserade metoder och uppnår konkurrenskraftiga resultat jämfört med transformatorarkitekturer.', 'ta': 'தொகுதி குறிப்புகளில் ஏற்றுக் கொள்ளாத மொழி வடிவங்கள் உள்ளது குழுக்கள் அல்லது தனிப்பட்ட மொழிகளுக்கு எதி இந்த வகையான குறிப்புகள் அரசு நிறுவனங்கள், online சமூகங்கள், மற்றும் சமூக ஊடக முறைமைகள் பற்றி கடுமையான கவலைப்படுகிறத ஏற்றுக் கொள்ளாத மொழியை கையாள சில வழிகள் இருந்தாலும் அவர்களில் பெரும்பாலானவர்கள் கற்றல் மற்றும் ஆங்கிலத்தின் மொ இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் புதிய குறிப்பு கண்டுபிடிப்பதை ஒரு பெமி கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட திட்டமாக நிறைவேற்றுகிறோம். போர்த்துகீசிஷ் மொழியின் பாதுகாப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பின் முறையை நாம் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், பல வரைபடமான முறைகளை செய்து மற்றும் போர்த்துக்க', 'ur': 'ٹوکسیکسی ٹوکیٹ کے ذریعے گروپ یا شخصوں کے مقابلہ میں مقرر کئے ہوئے غیر قبول کرنے والی زبان کی فرموں میں موجود ہیں. یہ مثالیں دولت کی سازمانوں، آنلاین کی کمونٹیوں اور سوسیال میڈیا پلٹروٹیوں کے لئے ایک سخت نگرانی ہوتے ہیں۔ اگرچہ ان میں سے اکثر نظارت کی تعلیم اور انگلیسی زبان کے ذریعہ منتخب کرنے کے لئے کچھ طریقے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم سم کی کمانٹر کی شناسایی کے ساتھ ایک دوسری نظارت کی استراتژی کے طور پر مشغول کرتے ہیں۔ ہم پورٹوگل زبان کی ایک سمی ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق طریقہ کا ارزش کرتے ہیں، بہت سی گراف بنیاد کی طریقہ سے زیادہ کامل کرتے ہیں اور مقابلہ نتیجہ پہنچاتے ہیں جو تغییر دینے والے معماری کے مقابلہ میں ہے', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Bu kabi izohlar, davlat organislari, online jamiyatlar, jamiyat medya platformlari uchun juda katta haqida foydalanadi. Ko'pchilik tilni qo'llash uchun bir necha usul bor. Ko'pchilik o'rganish va ingliz tilini foydalanish uchun foydalanadi. Bu qogʻozda, biz gizga izohni aniqlashni o'ylaymiz, yani o'zgarishni tasavvur qiladigan strategiya deb o'ylaymiz. Biz Portugalcha tilining toksiz maʼlumotlar tarkibini qiymatimiz, grafik asosida ko'plab usullarni bajaramiz va maktablarni o'zgartirishga kamaytirishga rivojlanish natijalarini bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Ảnh thảo có chứa các dạng ngôn ngữ không thể chấp nhận nhằm vào nhóm hay cá nhân. Những kiểu bình luận này trở thành mối quan tâm nghiêm túc đối với các tổ chức chính phủ, cộng đồng trực tuyến và các nền truyền thông xã hội. Mặc dù có một số phương pháp sử dụng ngôn ngữ không thể chấp nhận, nhưng hầu hết họ tập trung vào việc học giám sát và tiếng Anh. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đối mặt với việc phát hiện bình luận độc hại như một chiến lược được giám sát gần hơn biểu đồ khác giới. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp về một bộ dữ liệu độc hại của ngôn ngữ Bồ Đào Nha, sử dụng nhiều phương pháp dựa vào đồ thị và đạt được kết quả cạnh tranh so với kiến trúc biến đổi.', 'bg': 'Токсичните коментари съдържат форми на неприемлив език, насочени към групи или индивиди. Тези видове коментари се превръщат в сериозен проблем за правителствените организации, онлайн общностите и социалните медии платформи. Въпреки че има някои подходи за справяне с неприемливия език, повечето от тях се фокусират върху обучението под надзор и английския език. В тази статия разглеждаме откриването на токсични коментари като полунадзорна стратегия върху хетерогенна графика. Оценяваме подхода върху токсичен набор от данни на португалския език, надминаваме няколко графични метода и постигаме конкурентни резултати в сравнение с трансформаторните архитектури.', 'nl': 'Giftige opmerkingen bevatten vormen van niet-aanvaardbare taal gericht op groepen of individuen. Dit soort reacties worden een ernstige zorg voor overheidsorganisaties, online gemeenschappen en sociale media platforms. Hoewel er een aantal benaderingen zijn om niet-acceptabele taal te behandelen, richten de meeste van hen zich op begeleid leren en de Engelse taal. In dit artikel behandelen we toxische reacties detectie als een semi-supervised strategie over een heterogene grafiek. We evalueren de aanpak op basis van een toxische dataset van de Portugese taal, die verschillende grafiekgebaseerde methoden overtreft en concurrerende resultaten behaalt in vergelijking met transformatorarchitecturen.', 'da': 'Giftige bemærkninger indeholder former for ikke-acceptabelt sprog rettet mod grupper eller enkeltpersoner. Disse typer kommentarer bliver en alvorlig bekymring for offentlige organisationer, online samfund og sociale medieplatforme. Selvom der er nogle tilgange til at håndtere ikke-acceptabelt sprog, fokuserer de fleste af dem på overvåget læring og det engelske sprog. I denne artikel beskæftiger vi os med toksiske kommentarer detektion som en semi-overvåget strategi over en heterogen graf. Vi evaluerer fremgangsmåden på et giftigt datasæt på portugisisk sprog, der overgår flere grafbaserede metoder og opnår konkurrencedygtige resultater sammenlignet med transformatorarkitekturer.', 'de': 'Giftige Kommentare enthalten Formen von nicht akzeptabler Sprache, die sich an Gruppen oder Einzelpersonen richtet. Diese Art von Kommentaren wird für Regierungsorganisationen, Online-Communities und Social-Media-Plattformen zu einem ernsthaften Problem. Obwohl es einige Ansätze gibt, um mit nicht akzeptabler Sprache umzugehen, konzentrieren sich die meisten von ihnen auf überwachtes Lernen und die englische Sprache. In diesem Beitrag beschäftigen wir uns mit der Detektion toxischer Kommentare als semi-überwachte Strategie über ein heterogenes Diagramm. Wir evaluieren den Ansatz anhand eines toxischen Datensatzes der portugiesischen Sprache, der mehrere graphenbasierte Methoden übertrifft und wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse im Vergleich zu Transformatorarchitekturen erzielt.', 'hr': 'Toksički komentari sadrže oblike neprihvatljivih jezika ciljanih prema grupama ili pojedincima. Te vrste komentara postaju ozbiljna zabrinutost za vladine organizacije, internetske zajednice i platforme društvenih medija. Iako postoje neki pristupi za rješavanje neprihvatljivog jezika, većina njih se fokusira na nadzorno učenje i engleski jezik. U ovom papiru se bavimo otkrivanjem toksičnih komentara kao polu-nadzornu strategiju nad heterogeneznim grafikom. Procjenjujemo pristup toksičnom setu podataka portugalskog jezika, iznosi nekoliko metoda na grafiku i ostvariti konkurentne rezultate u usporedbi s transformacijskim arhitekturom.', 'ko': '유독 논평은 단체나 개인을 겨냥한 받아들일 수 없는 언어 형식을 포함한다.이런 논평은 이미 정부 기관, 온라인 커뮤니티, 소셜 미디어 플랫폼의 심각한 우려가 되었다.받아들일 수 없는 언어를 처리할 수 있는 방법도 있지만 대부분 학습과 영어를 감독하는 데 치중하고 있다.본고에서 우리는 유독 평론 검측을 이구도상의 반감독 전략으로 처리할 것이다.우리는 포르투갈어의 유독 데이터 집합에서 이 방법에 대해 평가를 실시했는데 그 성능은 몇 가지 도형을 바탕으로 하는 방법보다 우수하고transformer 체계 구조에 비해 경쟁력이 있는 결과를 얻었다.', 'id': 'Toxic comments contain forms of non-acceptable language targeted towards groups or individuals.  Komentar semacam ini menjadi masalah serius bagi organisasi pemerintah, komunitas online, dan platform media sosial. Meskipun ada beberapa pendekatan untuk menangani bahasa yang tidak diterima, kebanyakan dari mereka fokus pada pengawasan belajar dan bahasa Inggris. Dalam kertas ini, kita berurusan dengan deteksi komentar racun sebagai strategi semi-mengawasi atas grafik heterogene. Kami mengevaluasi pendekatan pada set data toksik bahasa Portugis, melampaui beberapa metode berdasarkan grafik dan mencapai hasil kompetitif dibandingkan dengan arsitektur transformer.', 'sw': 'Toxic comments contain forms of non-acceptable language targeted towards groups or individuals.  Maoni haya yamekuwa makini kwa mashirika ya serikali, jamii za mtandaoni na majukwaa ya mitandao ya kijamii. Ingawa kuna baadhi ya mbinu za kukabiliana na lugha isiyo kubalika, wengi wao wanajikita kwenye ufundi unaofanywa na lugha ya Kiingereza. Katika gazeti hili, tunakabiliana na uchunguzi wa maoni yenye sumu kama mkakati ulioangaliwa na sekunde juu ya picha za kijinsia. Tunatathmini mbinu za taarifa za kisasa za lugha ya Kireno, kutengeneza mbinu kadhaa za picha na kupata matokeo ya ushindani ukilinganisha na mabadiliko ya majengo.', 'fa': 'توضیح\u200cهای تکسیکی شامل فرم\u200cهای زبان غیرقابل پذیرفتن به سمت گروه\u200cها یا فرد\u200cها هدف شده است. این نوع توضیح\u200cها برای سازمان\u200cهای دولت، جامعه\u200cهای آنلاین، و platformهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی یک نگرانی جدی می\u200cشوند. اگرچه برخی از روش\u200cهایی برای استفاده از زبان غیرقابل قبول وجود دارد، بیشتر از آنها روی یادگیری تحت نظر و زبان انگلیسی تمرکز می\u200cکنند. در این کاغذ، ما با کشف توضیح سمی به عنوان استراتژی نیمه تحت نظر بر روی یک گراف غیرقابل تحت نظر قرار می گیریم. ما روش روی یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای سمی از زبان پورتوژیک ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، بیشتر از روش\u200cهای بسیاری از گراف\u200cها و به رسیدن نتایج رقابت در مقایسه با معماری تغییر دهنده\u200cها.', 'tr': 'Toksik töwzihleri gruplar ýa-da adamlar tarapyna gollanmaýan diller şeklinde meýilleşdirýär. Bu ýagdaýlar hökümet organizasy, online jemgyýetler we sosial media platformlary üçin örän gyzyklanýar. Kabul edilmez dili başarmak üçin birnäçe golaýlar bar hem olaryň köpüsi kontrol edilen öwrenme we iňlisçe diline üns berýär. Bu kagyzda, heterogenen bir grafik üstünde zehirli terjimeler a çylygy bilen gözleýäris. Portugalça dilinden toksik veri setirini çykarýarys, grafik daýanýan yöntemlerden çykyp, we ýakynlaşyk netijelerini üýtgeden arhitekturlaryň üstüne görä çykarýarys.', 'af': "Toksiese kommentaar bevat vorms van nie-aanvaarbare taal wat teenoor groepe of individuele doel is. Hierdie tipe kommentaar word 'n ernstige bekommerding vir regeringorganizasies, online gemeenskappe en sosiale media platforme. Alhoewel daar is sommige toegang om nie-aanvaarbare taal te hanteer, die meeste van hulle fokus op ondersoekte leer en die Engelstaal. In hierdie papier, ons behandel met toksiske kommentaar opdekking as 'n semi-ondersoekte strategie oor 'n heterogeneese graf. Ons evalueer die toegang op 'n toksiske datastel van die Portugese taal, uitvoer verskeie grafgebaseerde metodes en aanvaar gemeenskap resultate vergelyk met transformeerde arkitektuure.", 'am': 'የቴክሲ ትርጓሜዎች በቡድን ወይም ብዙዎች ላይ የተመሳሳይ የቋንቋ ፎርማዎች ናቸው፡፡ እነዚህ ዓይነቶች የመንግሥት ድርጅቶች፣ የመረብ ማኅበራዊ አውታር ሚዲያዎች እና ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ፕላፖርቶች የሚያስጨነቅ ጥያቄ ሆነዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የሚቀበሉ ቋንቋን ለመቀበል አንዳንዶች ልማድ አሉ፣ አብዛኞቻቸው ተማሪ እና የንግግሊዝኛ ቋንቋ ላይ ተማርተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጥቁር ትምህርት ማግኘት በ ፀረ-አካባቢ ክፍል ላይ የተጠበቀ strategy እናቆማለን፡፡ የፖርቱጋሊስ ቋንቋ የዳታ ደረጃዎችን እናስተዋልታለን፣ የመዝገብ መሠረቶች ከመለወጥ እና የተዋጋውን ፍሬዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'ট্যাক্সিক মন্তব্যের মধ্যে রয়েছে গ্রহণযোগ্য ভাষা বা ব্যক্তিদের প্রতি লক্ষ্য করা হয়েছে। এই ধরনের মন্তব্য সরকারী সংস্থা, অনলাইন সম্প্রদায় এবং সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্ল্যাটফর্মের জন্য গুরুত্বপূ যদিও কিছু কিছু কিছু উপায় আছে যাতে গ্রহণযোগ্য ভাষা ব্যবহার করা যায়, তাদের অধিকাংশই শিক্ষা ও ইংরেজি ভাষার উপর মনোযোগ দ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ব্যস্ত মন্তব্যের সনাক্তির সাথে চুক্তি করি যেটা একটি প্রজাতিগত গ্রাফের উপর সেমি পর্যবেক্ষন করা কৌশলটি। আমরা পর্তুগীজ ভাষার বিক্ষিপ্ত তথ্য সেটের প্রতিযোগিতা মূল্যায়ন করি, গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করে এবং প্রতিযোগিতার ফলাফল পরিবর্তনের তুলনায়', 'az': 'Toksik Ňü…ôkill…ôri qruplara ya da kiŇüil…ôr…ô niŇüan edilm…ôy…ôn q…ôbul edilm…ôz dill…ôrin formlarńĪ bar…ôsind…ô. Bu m…ôlumatlar h√∂kum…ôt organizasiyalarńĪ, online toplumlarńĪ v…ô sosial media platformlarńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn ciddi bir endiŇüe oldular. Kabul edilm…ôy…ôn dild…ôn istifad…ô etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn b…ôzi t…ôrzl…ôrin var, onlarńĪn …ôks…ôriyy…ôti t…ôŇükil edilmiŇü √∂yr…ônm…ôk v…ô ńįngiliz…ô dilind…ô odaqlanńĪr. Bu kańüńĪzda, bir heterogenen grafńĪndan yarńĪ-g√∂zl…ôyirli strateji olaraq zehirli Ňü…ôkill…ôr keŇüfini √ß…ôkirik. Biz Portugalca dilinin zehirli veri quruluńüuna t…ôr…ôf √ß…ôkirik, grafik-tabanlńĪ metodlarńĪndan daha √ľst√ľn v…ô m√ľ…ôllif sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪ transformer arhitektarlarńĪyla m√ľv…ôff…ôq ed…ôrik.', 'bs': 'Toksički komentari sadrže oblike neprihvatljivog jezika ciljanih prema grupama ili pojedincima. Ove vrste komentara postaju ozbiljna zabrinutost za vladine organizacije, internetske zajednice i platforme društvenih medija. Iako postoje neki pristupi za rješavanje neprihvatljivog jezika, većina njih se fokusira na nadzorno učenje i engleski jezik. U ovom papiru se bavimo otkrivanjem toksičnih komentara kao polu-nadzornu strategiju zbog heterogeneznog grafika. Procjenjujemo pristup toksičnom setu podataka portugalskog jezika, iznosi nekoliko metoda na grafiku i ostvarimo konkurentne rezultate u usporedbi s transformacijom arhitekture.', 'ca': "Els comentaris tòxics contenen formes de llenguatge inacceptable dirigida a grups o individus. Aquests tipus de comentaris es converteixen en una preocupació seriosa per les organitzacions governamentals, les comunitats en línia i les plataformes dels mitjans socials. Encara que hi ha alguns enfocaments per manejar un llenguatge inacceptable, la majoria es centren en l'aprenentatge supervisat i en l'anglès. En aquest article, ens ocupem de la detecció de comentaris tòxics com una estratègia semisupervisada sobre un gràfic heterogène. Evaluam l'enfocament d'un conjunt de dades tòxiques de la llengua portuguesa, superant diversos mètodes basats en gràfics i aconseguint resultats competitius comparats amb arquitectures transformadores.", 'cs': 'Toxické komentáře obsahují formy nepřijatelného jazyka zaměřené na skupiny nebo jednotlivce. Tyto typy komentářů se stávají vážným problémem pro vládní organizace, online komunity a platformy sociálních médií. Ačkoli existují některé přístupy k manipulaci s nepřijatelným jazykem, většina z nich se zaměřuje na dohled nad učením a anglický jazyk. V tomto článku se zabýváme detekcí toxických komentářů jako semi-supervisovanou strategií na heterogenním grafu. Tento přístup hodnotíme na toxickém datovém souboru portugalského jazyka, překonává několik grafových metod a dosahuje konkurenčních výsledků ve srovnání s transformátorovými architekturami.', 'sq': 'Toxic comments contain forms of non-acceptable language targeted towards groups or individuals.  Këto lloje komentesh bëhen një shqetësim serioz për organizatat qeveritare, komunitetet online dhe platformet e medias sociale. Megjithëse ka disa metoda për të trajtuar gjuhën e papranueshme, shumica prej tyre përqëndrohen në mësimin e mbikqyrur dhe gjuhën angleze. Në këtë letër, ne merremi me zbulimin e komenteve toksike si një strategji gjysmë-mbikqyrure mbi një grafik heterogjene. We evaluate the approach on a toxic dataset of the Portuguese language, outperforming several graph-based methods and achieving competitive results compared to transformer architectures.', 'et': 'Mürgised kommentaarid sisaldavad rühmadele või üksikisikutele suunatud vastuvõetamatut keelt. Seda tüüpi kommentaarid muutuvad valitsusorganisatsioonidele, veebikogukondadele ja sotsiaalmeedia platvormidele tõsiseks mureks. Kuigi vastuvõetamatu keele käsitlemiseks on mõningaid lähenemisviise, keskendub enamik neist järelevalveõppele ja inglise keelele. Käesolevas töös käsitleme toksiliste kommentaaride tuvastamist pooljärelevalvega strateegiana heterogeense graafiku üle. Hindame portugalikeelse toksilise andmekogumi lähenemist, ületades mitmeid graafikapõhiseid meetodeid ja saavutades konkurentsivõimelisi tulemusi võrreldes trafoarhitektuuridega.', 'fi': 'Myrkylliset kommentit sisältävät ryhmille tai yksilöille suunnatun kieltä, jota ei voida hyväksyä. Tällaiset kommentit ovat vakava huolenaihe valtion organisaatioille, verkkoyhteisöille ja sosiaalisen median alustoille. Vaikka on olemassa joitakin lähestymistapoja käsitellä ei-hyväksyttävää kieltä, useimmat niistä keskittyvät ohjattuun oppimiseen ja englannin kieleen. Tässä työssä käsitellään myrkyllisten kommenttien havaitsemista puolivalvottuna strategiana heterogeenisen graafin yli. Arvioimme lähestymistapaa portugalinkieliseen myrkylliseen aineistoon, suoriudumme useista graafisiin menetelmiin verrattuna ja saavutamme kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia muuntaja-arkkitehtuuriin verrattuna.', 'hy': 'Toxic comments contain forms of non-acceptable language targeted towards groups or individuals.  Այս տեսակի մեկնաբանությունները դառնում են լուրջ անհանգստացում կառավարական կազմակերպությունների, առցանց համայնքների և սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների համար: Չնայած կան որոշ մոտեցումներ անընդունելի լեզուների վերաբերյալ, նրանցից շատերը կենտրոնանում են վերահսկված սովորելու և անգլերենի վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք գործ ունենք թունավոր մեկնաբանությունների հայտնաբերման հետ որպես կես-վերահսկվող ռազմավարություն հետերոգեն գծագրի վերաբերյալ: Մենք գնահատում ենք պորտուգալիացի լեզվի թունավոր տվյալների համակարգի մոտեցումը, գերազանցում ենք մի քանի գրաֆիկով հիմնված մեթոդներ և մրցակցության արդյունքներ, համեմատած վերափոխող ճարտարապետությունների հետ:', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Waɗannan wa'adin sha'awi sun kasance masu hushi a kan shirin government, jamii masu shagala da mitandai na jamii. Kuma kõ da dai akwai wasu matsayi da za'a yi amfani da harshen abin da bã ya yarda da shi, mafi yawansu sunã da muhimmi a kan karatun maganar da harshen Ingiriya. In a cikin wannan takardan, Munã yi matayya da bayani na sha'awiya kamar wani takwai wanda aka tsare shi na kafin. Tuna ƙaddara hanyarsa kan tsarin mutane mai tozaro na harshen Portugajiki, masu samun wasu hanyoyin grafi da kuma masu sami matsalar da fassarar da sami da mutane da aka canza filayeikin.", 'he': 'הערות רעילות מכילות צורות של שפה בלתי מקובלת שמתכוונות לקבוצות או לאנשים. These types of comments become a serious concern for government organizations, online communities, and social media platforms.  למרות שיש כמה גישות להתמודד עם שפה לא מקובלת, רובם מתמקדים על הלימודים המפוקחים והשפה האנגלית. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתמודדים עם גילוי תגובות רעילות כאסטרטגיה חצי-מפקחת מעל גרף היטרוגני. אנו מעריכים את הגישה על קבוצת נתונים רעילים של השפה הפורטוגזית, מעלים כמה שיטות מבוססות בגרף ולהשיג תוצאות תחרותיות בהשוואה לארכיטקטורות המעברת.', 'sk': 'Strupeni komentarji vsebujejo oblike nesprejemljivega jezika, namenjene skupinam ali posameznikom. Te vrste komentarjev postanejo resna skrb za vladne organizacije, spletne skupnosti in platforme socialnih medijev. Čeprav obstajajo nekateri pristopi za obravnavanje nesprejemljivega jezika, se večina osredotoča na nadzorovano učenje in angleški jezik. V prispevku obravnavamo odkrivanje toksičnih komentarjev kot polnadzorovano strategijo na heterogenem grafu. Pristop ocenjujemo na strupenem naboru podatkov portugalskega jezika, presegamo več grafičnih metod in dosegamo konkurenčne rezultate v primerjavi s transformatorskimi arhitekturami.', 'bo': 'Toxic comments contain forms of non-acceptable language targeted towards groups or individuals. དབྱེ་སྟངས་འདི་དག་གཞུང་གི་ཚོགས་སྡེར། དྲ་ཚོགས་སྡེར། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ལམ་གྱི་གླ དང་ལེན་འཐབ་མེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་དམིགས་གཏོང་ནི་གནད་དོན་ཡིན་ནའང་ཡིན་ནའང་མིན་ན། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེན་པའི་མཆན་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་མཐོང་ནུས་ཚོད་སྐྱོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱེ ང་ཚོས་Portugalཡི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་ཞིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཙང་བ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'komentar Kemerdekaan karo perkaran sing sumelang kanggo sampeyan gêrung kuwi, komunitas online lan sistem media komunitas. Sing bener sing pinter nggambar aturan sing ora nggambar luwih, akeh langgar nganggep bantuan ingkang. Nan pepul iki, kita nguasah nggambar waé karo pertualisan anyar tok(tok) Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé nggawe dataset tok kanggo ngilanggar portugis, iso nggawe barang penggunaké basa gambar lan ijol-ijol kuwi nggawe sistem sing berarti kanggo nggawe arquitur neng sampek.'}
{'en': 'A Domain-Independent Holistic Approach to Deception Detection', 'es': 'Un enfoque holístico independiente del dominio para la detección de engaños', 'fr': 'Une approche holistique indépendante du domaine pour la détection des tromperies', 'ar': 'نهج شامل مستقل عن المجال لاكتشاف الخداع', 'pt': 'Uma abordagem holística independente de domínio para detecção de engano', 'ja': 'ドメインに依存しない欺瞞検出のホリスティックなアプローチ', 'zh': '独立于域之欺检也', 'hi': 'धोखे का पता लगाने के लिए एक डोमेन-स्वतंत्र समग्र दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Независимый от домена целостный подход к обнаружению обмана', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Iomlánaíoch Fearainn-Neamhspleách maidir le Brath Meabhlaireachta', 'el': 'Μια ολιστική προσέγγιση για την ανίχνευση εξαπάτησης', 'ka': 'დომენი- დასარგებლო ჰოლისტიკური დაწყება განაკვირდებისთვის', 'it': 'Un approccio olistico indipendente dal dominio alla rilevazione degli inganni', 'hu': 'Domain-független holisztikus megközelítés a megtévesztés felismeréséhez', 'ms': 'A Domain-Independent Holistic Approach to Deception Detection', 'lt': 'Nuo domeno priklausomas holistinis metodas apgaulės nustatymui', 'kk': 'Доменге тәуелсіз холистикалық қатынау бағдарламасы', 'mt': 'A Domain-Independent Holistic Approach to Deception Detection', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Holistyczne podejście do wykrywania oszustw niezależne od domeny', 'mk': 'A Domain-Independent Holistic Approach to Deception Detection', 'ml': 'ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d- സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യം ഹോളിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ഡിസിപ്റ്റന്\u200d ഡിറ്ററിക്കിന്റെ അടുത്തേക്കു്', 'sr': 'Domene-nezavisni Holistički pristup otkrivanju odluke', 'si': 'Name', 'ro': 'O abordare holistică independentă de domeniu a detectării decepțiilor', 'ta': 'A Domain-Independent Holistic Approach to Deception Detection', 'sv': 'Ett domänoberoende holistiskt tillvägagångssätt att upptäcka bedrägerier', 'so': 'Baaritaanka go’aanka', 'mn': 'Тодорхойлолтын хүлээн зөвшөөрөх зорилго', 'ur': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một cách tiếp cận phá hoại hoại quy mô', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Независим от домейна холистичен подход към откриване на измами', 'da': 'En domæneafhængig holistisk tilgang til detektering af bedrag', 'nl': 'Een domein-onafhankelijke holistische benadering van misleidingsdetectie', 'hr': 'Domene-nezavisni holistički pristup otkrivanju odluke', 'de': 'Ein domänenunabhängiger ganzheitlicher Ansatz zur Täuschungserkennung', 'id': 'A Domain-Independent Holistic Approach to Deception Detection', 'ko': '영역에 독립된 전체적인 사기 검출 방법', 'fa': 'یک دسترسی هولیستیک به بازرسی تصمیم گیری', 'sw': 'Kutokea kwa Kiholisti cha Kutambuliwa', 'tr': 'Haýsy A ňlamak üçin Haýsy-Başga Holistik Jakym', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një metodë holistike e pavarur nga domini për zbulimin e mashtrimit', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሜን-ነፃ የHolistic አገናኝ', 'hy': 'Դոմենի անկախ հոլիստիկ մոտեցումը խաբեության հայտնաբերման համար', 'bn': 'ডোমেইন-স্বাধীন হোলিস্টিক ডিসেশন সনাক্ত করার জন্য যাওয়া', 'az': 'Domen-baƒüƒ±msƒ±z Holistik Yaxƒ±nlƒ±ƒüƒ± De√ßm…ôy…ô Yaxƒ±nlƒ±q', 'bs': 'Domena-nezavisni Holistički pristup otkrivanju odluke', 'ca': 'Un enfocament holístic independent del domini a la detecció de la decepció', 'et': 'Domeenist sõltumatu terviklik lähenemisviis pettuste tuvastamisele', 'cs': 'Holistický přístup k detekci klamů nezávislý na doméně', 'fi': 'Verkkoalueesta riippumaton holistinen lähestymistapa petosten havaitsemiseen', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'גישה הוליסטית עצמאית לתחום לגילוי הונאה', 'sk': 'Celostni pristop k odkrivanju prevar, neodvisen od domene', 'jv': 'Name', 'bo': 'Domain-Independent Holistic Approach to Deception Detection'}
{'en': 'The deception in the text can be of different forms in different domains, including fake news, rumor tweets, and spam emails. Irrespective of the domain, the main intent of the deceptive text is to deceit the reader. Although domain-specific deception detection exists, domain-independent deception detection can provide a holistic picture, which can be crucial to understand how deception occurs in the text. In this paper, we detect deception in a domain-independent setting using deep learning architectures. Our method outperforms the State-of-the-Art performance of most benchmark datasets with an overall accuracy of 93.42 % and F1-Score of 93.22 %. The domain-independent training allows us to capture subtler nuances of deceptive writing style. Furthermore, we analyze how much in-domain data may be helpful to accurately detect deception, especially for the cases where data may not be readily available to train. Our results and analysis indicate that there may be a universal pattern of deception lying in-between the text independent of the domain, which can create a novel area of research and open up new avenues in the field of deception detection.', 'ar': 'يمكن أن يكون الخداع في النص بأشكال مختلفة في مجالات مختلفة ، بما في ذلك الأخبار المزيفة وتغريدات الإشاعات ورسائل البريد الإلكتروني العشوائية. بغض النظر عن المجال ، فإن القصد الرئيسي للنص المخادع هو خداع القارئ. على الرغم من وجود الكشف عن الخداع الخاص بالمجال ، إلا أن اكتشاف الخداع المستقل عن المجال يمكن أن يوفر صورة شاملة ، والتي يمكن أن تكون حاسمة لفهم كيفية حدوث الخداع في النص. في هذه الورقة ، نكتشف الخداع في بيئة مستقلة عن المجال باستخدام بنيات التعلم العميق. تتفوق طريقتنا في الأداء على أحدث أداء لمعظم مجموعات البيانات المعيارية بدقة إجمالية تبلغ 93.42٪ و F1-Score 93.22٪. يتيح لنا التدريب المستقل عن المجال التقاط الفروق الدقيقة في أسلوب الكتابة المخادع. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بتحليل مقدار البيانات الموجودة في المجال التي قد تكون مفيدة لاكتشاف الخداع بدقة ، خاصة بالنسبة للحالات التي قد لا تكون فيها البيانات متاحة بسهولة للتدريب. تشير نتائجنا وتحليلاتنا إلى أنه قد يكون هناك نمط عالمي من الخداع بين النص المستقل عن المجال ، والذي يمكن أن يخلق مجالًا جديدًا للبحث ويفتح طرقًا جديدة في مجال اكتشاف الخداع.', 'es': 'El engaño en el texto puede ser de diferentes formas en diferentes dominios, incluidas las noticias falsas, los tuits de rumores y los correos electrónicos de spam. Independientemente del dominio, la intención principal del texto engañoso es engañar al lector. Si bien existe la detección de engaños específica de dominio, la detección de engaños independiente del dominio puede proporcionar una imagen holística, que puede ser crucial para comprender cómo se produce el engaño en el texto. En este artículo, detectamos el engaño en un entorno independiente del dominio mediante arquitecturas de aprendizaje profundo. Nuestro método supera el rendimiento de vanguardia de la mayoría de los conjuntos de datos de referencia con una precisión general del 93,42% y una puntuación F1 del 93,22%. La formación independiente del dominio nos permite captar matices más sutiles del estilo de escritura engañoso. Además, analizamos la cantidad de datos dentro del dominio que pueden ser útiles para detectar con precisión el engaño, especialmente en los casos en que es posible que los datos no estén disponibles para capacitarse. Nuestros resultados y análisis indican que puede haber un patrón universal de engaño entre el texto independiente del dominio, lo que puede crear un área de investigación novedosa y abrir nuevas vías en el campo de la detección de engaños.', 'pt': 'O engano no texto pode ser de diferentes formas em diferentes domínios, incluindo notícias falsas, tweets de rumores e e-mails de spam. Independentemente do domínio, a principal intenção do texto enganoso é enganar o leitor. Embora a detecção de enganos específica de domínio exista, a detecção de enganos independente de domínio pode fornecer uma imagem holística, que pode ser crucial para entender como o engano ocorre no texto. Neste artigo, detectamos enganos em um ambiente independente de domínio usando arquiteturas de aprendizado profundo. Nosso método supera o desempenho de última geração da maioria dos conjuntos de dados de referência com uma precisão geral de 93,42% e F1-Score de 93,22%. O treinamento independente de domínio nos permite capturar nuances mais sutis do estilo de escrita enganoso. Além disso, analisamos a quantidade de dados no domínio que podem ser úteis para detectar enganos com precisão, especialmente para os casos em que os dados podem não estar prontamente disponíveis para treinamento. Nossos resultados e análises indicam que pode haver um padrão universal de engano entre o texto independente do domínio, o que pode criar uma nova área de pesquisa e abrir novos caminhos no campo da detecção de engano.', 'fr': "La tromperie dans le texte peut prendre différentes formes dans différents domaines, y compris les fausses nouvelles, les tweets de rumeurs et les spams. Quel que soit le domaine, le but principal du texte trompeur est de tromper le lecteur. Bien qu'il existe une détection de tromperie spécifique au domaine, la détection de tromperie indépendante du domaine peut fournir une image globale, ce qui peut être crucial pour comprendre comment la tromperie se produit dans le texte. Dans cet article, nous détectons la tromperie dans un environnement indépendant du domaine à l'aide d'architectures d'apprentissage profond. Notre méthode surpasse les performances de pointe de la plupart des ensembles de données de référence avec une précision globale de 93,42\xa0% et un score F1 de 93,22\xa0%. La formation indépendante du domaine nous permet de saisir les nuances plus subtiles d'un style d'écriture trompeur. En outre, nous analysons la quantité de données dans le domaine qui peut être utile pour détecter avec précision la tromperie, en particulier dans les cas où les données peuvent ne pas être facilement disponibles pour la formation. Nos résultats et notre analyse indiquent qu'il peut exister un modèle universel de tromperie entre le texte indépendamment du domaine, ce qui peut créer un nouveau domaine de recherche et ouvrir de nouvelles pistes dans le domaine de la détection des tromperies.", 'ru': 'Обман в тексте может быть разной формы в разных доменах, включая фейковые новости, слухи, твиты и спам. Независимо от домена, основная цель обманчивого текста - обмануть читателя. Несмотря на то, что обнаружение обмана в конкретном домене существует, обнаружение обмана, не зависящее от домена, может обеспечить целостную картину, которая может иметь решающее значение для понимания того, как обман происходит в тексте. В этой статье мы обнаруживаем обман в независимой от домена обстановке, используя архитектуры глубокого обучения. Наш метод превосходит современные показатели большинства эталонных наборов данных с общей точностью 93,42% и показателем F1 93,22%. Независимое от домена обучение позволяет улавливать более тонкие нюансы обманчивого стиля письма. Кроме того, мы анализируем, насколько внутридоменные данные могут быть полезны для точного обнаружения обмана, особенно в случаях, когда данные могут быть недоступны для обучения. Наши результаты и анализ показывают, что между текстом, не зависящим от предметной области, может лежать универсальная модель обмана, которая может создать новую область исследований и открыть новые возможности в области обнаружения обмана.', 'zh': '文本异域,包假新闻讹言推文垃圾邮件。 在何之域,欺骗性文本之意,欺读者也。 虽有特定于域之欺检,而独立于域之欺检可以备体,其于知文之欺何如也。 于本文中,用深度学架构独立检欺。 吾法优于大众,基准数集之最新,总体准确率为93.42%,F1分为93.22%。 无关领域培训使得欺骗性风细微差别。 此外,论域内数据之数,或助准检欺罔,特于数或未易练也。 臣等考分析表明,独立于域文之间,或有一遍之欺式,此可以造一新之域,而开新之路于欺检之域。', 'ja': 'テキスト内の欺瞞は、フェイクニュース、噂のツイート、スパムメールなど、さまざまなドメインで異なる形式で行われる可能性があります。 ドメインに関係なく、欺瞞的なテキストの主な意図は、読者を欺くことです。 ドメイン固有の欺瞞検出は存在しますが、ドメインに依存しない欺瞞検出は、全体像を提供することができます。これは、テキスト内での欺瞞がどのように発生するかを理解するために重要です。 本稿では，深層学習アーキテクチャを用いたドメイン非依存的な環境での欺瞞を検出する． 当社の方法は、ほとんどのベンチマークデータセットの最先端のパフォーマンスを上回り、全体的な精度は93.42%、F 1スコアは93.22%です。 ドメインに依存しないトレーニングでは、欺瞞的な書き方の微妙なニュアンスを捉えることができます。 さらに、私たちは、データがすぐにトレーニングに利用できない可能性のある場合を中心に、詐欺を正確に検出するのに役立つ可能性のあるドメイン内データの量を分析します。 私たちの結果と分析は、ドメインに依存しないテキストの間に普遍的な欺瞞のパターンが存在する可能性があることを示しています。これは、新しい研究領域を作成し、欺瞞検出の分野で新しい手段を開く可能性があります。', 'hi': 'पाठ में धोखा विभिन्न डोमेन में विभिन्न रूपों का हो सकता है, जिसमें नकली समाचार, अफवाह ट्वीट्स और स्पैम ईमेल शामिल हैं। डोमेन के बावजूद, भ्रामक पाठ का मुख्य उद्देश्य पाठक को धोखा देना है। यद्यपि डोमेन-विशिष्ट धोखे का पता लगाना मौजूद है, डोमेन-स्वतंत्र धोखे का पता लगाना एक समग्र चित्र प्रदान कर सकता है, जो यह समझने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण हो सकता है कि पाठ में धोखा कैसे होता है। इस पेपर में, हम डीप लर्निंग आर्किटेक्चर का उपयोग करके डोमेन-स्वतंत्र सेटिंग में धोखे का पता लगाते हैं। हमारी विधि 93.42% की समग्र सटीकता और 93.22% के F1-स्कोर के साथ अधिकांश बेंचमार्क डेटासेट के स्टेट-ऑफ-द-आर्ट प्रदर्शन को मात देती है। डोमेन-स्वतंत्र प्रशिक्षण हमें भ्रामक लेखन शैली की सूक्ष्म बारीकियों को पकड़ने की अनुमति देता है। इसके अलावा, हम विश्लेषण करते हैं कि धोखे का सही पता लगाने के लिए इन-डोमेन डेटा कितना सहायक हो सकता है, खासकर उन मामलों के लिए जहां डेटा आसानी से प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए उपलब्ध नहीं हो सकता है। हमारे परिणामों और विश्लेषण से संकेत मिलता है कि डोमेन से स्वतंत्र पाठ के बीच झूठ बोलने वाले धोखे का एक सार्वभौमिक पैटर्न हो सकता है, जो अनुसंधान का एक उपन्यास क्षेत्र बना सकता है और धोखे का पता लगाने के क्षेत्र में नए रास्ते खोल सकता है।', 'ga': "Is féidir leis an mheabhlaireacht sa téacs a bheith de chineálacha éagsúla i bhfearainn éagsúla, lena n-áirítear nuacht falsa, tweets ráflaí, agus ríomhphoist turscair. Beag beann ar an bhfearann, is é príomh-intinn an téacs mealltach an léitheoir a mhealladh. Cé go bhfuil braite meabhlaireachta a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann ann, is féidir le braite dallamullóg atá neamhspleách ar an bhfearann pictiúr iomlánaíoch a sholáthar, rud a d’fhéadfadh a bheith ríthábhachtach chun tuiscint a fháil ar an gcaoi a dtarlaíonn dallamullóg sa téacs. Sa pháipéar seo, aimsímid dallamullóg i suíomh atá neamhspleách ar an bhfearann agus baintear úsáid as ailtireachtaí domhainfhoghlama. Sáraíonn ár modh an fheidhmíocht úrscothach i bhformhór na dtacar sonraí tagarmhairc le cruinneas foriomlán 93.42% agus Scór F1 de 93.22%. Ligeann an oiliúint atá neamhspleách ar an bhfearann dúinn nuances níos caolchúisí a fháil maidir le stíl scríbhneoireachta mheabhlach. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid anailís ar cé mhéad sonraí in-fearainn a d'fhéadfadh a bheith ina chuidiú chun an mheabhlaireacht a bhrath go beacht, go háirithe i gcásanna nach mbíonn sonraí ar fáil go héasca le hoiliúint. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí agus ár n-anailís go bhféadfadh patrún uilíoch dallamullóg a bheith ann idir an téacs atá neamhspleách ar an bhfearann, a d’fhéadfadh réimse nua taighde a chruthú agus bealaí nua a oscailt i réimse an mheabhlaireachta a bhrath.", 'ka': 'ტექსტის შესაძლებელია განსხვავებული ფორმების განსხვავებული დიომენში, რომელიც ტალქტური ნუზები, ხსნის ტვიტები და სპამის ელემენტები. დემომინის უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი, საუკეთესი ტექსტის უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი იქნება, რომ კითხველი შეუძლებელია. თუმცა დიომინის განსაკუთრებულ შეცდომის განსაკუთრება არსებობს, დიომინის განსაკუთრებულ შეცდომის განსაკუთრება შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ ჰოლისტიური გამოსახულება, რომელიც შე ამ დომენში ჩვენ განვიხოვრებთ ტალიქტა დემომინის განსაზღვრებული სწავლების გამოყენებით. ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო დიდი ბანქმერის მონაცემების პროცემენტის სტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატის გა დიომინის განსარგებული განაკლება გვეძლება ჩვენ დავწეროთ სტრუქტური წერის სტილის სტრუქტური ნუანციები. დამატებით, ვიანალიზებთ, რამდენიმე მონაცემები დიომინში შეიძლება მხოლოდ იყოს წარმოადგენებელი, განსაკუთრებით მონაცემებისთვის, სადაც მონაცემები შეიძლება არ წარ ჩვენი წარმოდგენები და ანალიზია, რომ შეიძლება იყოს უნივერსალური წარმოდგენების შორის წარმოდგენები, რომელიც შეიძლება შექმნა პროგრამეტური გასწავლება და ახლა ახალი საზოგადოებების განახლებ', 'el': 'Η εξαπάτηση στο κείμενο μπορεί να είναι διαφορετικών μορφών σε διαφορετικούς τομείς, συμπεριλαμβανομένων ψεύτικων ειδήσεων, φήμων και ανεπιθύμητων μηνυμάτων ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου. Ανεξάρτητα από τον τομέα, η κύρια πρόθεση του παραπλανητικού κειμένου είναι να εξαπατήσει τον αναγνώστη. Αν και υπάρχει ανίχνευση παραπλάνησης σε συγκεκριμένο τομέα, η ανεξάρτητη ανίχνευση εξαπάτησης μπορεί να παρέχει μια ολιστική εικόνα, η οποία μπορεί να είναι κρίσιμη για την κατανόηση του τρόπου με τον οποίο συμβαίνει η εξαπάτηση στο κείμενο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, ανιχνεύουμε εξαπάτηση σε ένα περιβάλλον ανεξάρτητο από τομέα χρησιμοποιώντας αρχιτεκτονικές βαθιάς μάθησης. Η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά τις επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας των περισσότερων συνόλων δεδομένων αναφοράς με συνολική ακρίβεια 93.42% και βαθμολογίας 93.22%. Η ανεξάρτητη εκπαίδευση μας επιτρέπει να συλλάβουμε λεπτότερες αποχρώσεις του παραπλανητικού στυλ γραφής. Επιπλέον, αναλύουμε πόσα δεδομένα εντός του τομέα μπορεί να είναι χρήσιμα για τον ακριβή εντοπισμό εξαπάτησης, ειδικά για τις περιπτώσεις όπου τα δεδομένα ενδέχεται να μην είναι άμεσα διαθέσιμα για εκπαίδευση. Τα αποτελέσματα και η ανάλυση μας δείχνουν ότι μπορεί να υπάρχει ένα καθολικό μοτίβο εξαπάτησης που βρίσκεται ανάμεσα στο κείμενο ανεξάρτητο από τον τομέα, το οποίο μπορεί να δημιουργήσει ένα νέο πεδίο έρευνας και να ανοίξει νέες οδούς στον τομέα της ανίχνευσης εξαπάτησης.', 'it': "L'inganno nel testo può essere di forme diverse in diversi domini, tra cui fake news, tweet di rumor e e-mail di spam. Indipendentemente dal dominio, l'intento principale del testo ingannevole è quello di ingannare il lettore. Sebbene esista un rilevamento dell'inganno specifico per un dominio, il rilevamento dell'inganno indipendente dal dominio può fornire un quadro olistico, che può essere cruciale per capire come si verifica l'inganno nel testo. In questo articolo, rileviamo l'inganno in un ambiente indipendente dal dominio utilizzando architetture di deep learning. Il nostro metodo supera le prestazioni all'avanguardia della maggior parte dei set di dati benchmark con una precisione complessiva del 93,42% e F1-Score del 93,22%. La formazione indipendente dal dominio ci permette di catturare sfumature più sottili di stile di scrittura ingannevole. Inoltre, analizziamo quanti dati in-domain possono essere utili per rilevare con precisione l'inganno, specialmente nei casi in cui i dati potrebbero non essere facilmente disponibili per l'addestramento. I nostri risultati e le nostre analisi indicano che potrebbe esserci un modello universale di inganno situato tra il testo indipendente dal dominio, che può creare una nuova area di ricerca e aprire nuove strade nel campo della rilevazione dell'inganno.", 'hu': 'A szövegben található megtévesztés különböző formákban lehet különböző területeken, beleértve a hamis híreket, a pletyka tweeteket és a spam e-maileket. A tartománytól függetlenül a megtévesztő szöveg fő szándéka az olvasó megtévesztése. Bár létezik a tartomány-specifikus megtévesztési érzékelés, a tartomány-független megtévesztési érzékelés holisztikus képet nyújthat, ami kulcsfontosságú lehet annak megértéséhez, hogy hogyan fordul elő a megtévesztés a szövegben. Ebben a tanulmányban domain-független környezetben észleljük a megtévesztést mélytanulási architektúrák segítségével. Módszerünk 93,42%-os átfogó pontossággal és 93,22%-os F1-pontszámmal felülmúlja a legtöbb referenciaadatkészlet legkorszerűbb teljesítményét. A domain-független képzés lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy megörökítsük a megtévesztő írástílus finomabb árnyalatait. Továbbá elemezzük, hogy a domain belüli adatok mennyi hasznos lehetnek a megtévesztés pontos felismerésében, különösen azokban az esetekben, amikor az adatok nem állnak rendelkezésre könnyen a képzéshez. Eredményeink és elemzéseink azt mutatják, hogy a szövegtől független szöveg között található egyetemes megtévesztési minta, amely új kutatási területet teremthet és új utakat nyithat meg a megtévesztés felismerésében.', 'lt': 'Tekste esanti apgaulė gali būti įvairių formų įvairiose srityse, įskaitant suklastotas naujienas, gandų tweetus ir spamo laiškus. Nepriklausomai nuo srities, pagrindinis apgaulingo teksto ketinimas yra apgaulėti skaitytoją. Nors yra konkrečios srities apgaulės aptikimas, nepriklausomas nuo srities apgaulės aptikimas gali suteikti holistinį vaizdą, kuris gali būti labai svarbus siekiant suprasti, kaip tekste atsiranda apgaulė. Šiame dokumente aptinkame apgaulą nepriklausomoje nuo srities aplinkoje naudojant gilaus mokymosi architektūras. Our method outperforms the State-of-the-Art performance of most benchmark datasets with an overall accuracy of 93.42% and F1-Score of 93.22%.  Nepriklausomas nuo srities mokymas leidžia mums surinkti subtilesnes apgaulingo rašymo stiliaus nuancijas. Be to, analizuojame, kiek domeninių duomenų gali būti naudinga tiksliai nustatyti apgaulą, ypač tais atvejais, kai duomenys gali būti lengvai prieinami mokymui. Mūsų rezultatai ir analizė rodo, kad tarp teksto, nepriklausomo nuo srities, gali būti universalus apgaulės modelis, kuris gali sukurti naują mokslinių tyrimų sritį ir atverti naujus kelius apgaulės aptikimo srityje.', 'mk': 'Лажбата во текстот може да има различни форми во различни домени, вклучувајќи лажни вести, твитови за гласини и спамски мејлови. Без оглед на доменот, главната намера на измамниот текст е да го измами читателот. И покрај тоа што постои детекција на измама специфична за домен, детекција на измама независна од домен може да обезбеди холистичка слика, која може да биде клучна за да се разбере како измама се случува во текстот. In this paper, we detect deception in a domain-independent setting using deep learning architectures.  Our method outperforms the State-of-the-Art performance of most benchmark datasets with an overall accuracy of 93.42% and F1-Score of 93.22%.  Независната обука на домените ни овозможува да фатиме суптилни нијанси на измамен стил на пишување. Покрај тоа, анализираме колку податоци во доменот може да бидат корисни за прецизно детектирање на измама, особено во случаите во кои податоците можеби не се лесно достапни за обука. Нашите резултати и анализи покажуваат дека можеби постои универзален шаблон на измама меѓу текстот независен од доменот, кој може да создаде нова област на истражување и да отвори нови патишта во полето на детекција на измама.', 'kk': 'Мәтіндегі ауыстыру әртүрлі домендерде, жалғыз жаңалықтар, шоу және спама эл. пошталардың түрлі пішімдері болуы мүмкін. Доменге қарсы емес, оқу оқушысын оқу мақсатына негізгі мақсат. Доменге арнаулы арнаулы арнаулы анықтау бар екенін бірақ доменге тәуелді арнаулы анықтау мүмкін болады. Бұл мәтінде қандай арнаулы болатынын түсінуге маңызды болады. Бұл қағазда доменге тәуелсіз архитектураларды қолдану архитектураларды қолдану үшін алдын алдын алдын аламыз. Біздің әдіміміздің көпшілігіміз көпшілік белгі деректер қорларының күйі 93,42% және F1- нүктесі 93,22% деген жалпы дұрыс болады. Доменге тәуелсіз оқыту көмектесетін жазу стилінің төменгі нюансын түсіруге мүмкіндік береді. Қосымша, доменде қанша мәліметті дұрыс табуға көмектеседі дегенді анализ, осымша, деректерді оқыту үшін оқылмайтын жағдайдар үшін. Біздің нәтижелеріміз мен анализиямыз доменге тәуелсіз мәтіннің арасында жалғастыру үлгісі болуы мүмкін. Бұл зерттеулердің жаңа аумағын құрып, жаңа жолдарды табу өрісінде ашуға болады.', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത രൂപത്തിലെ വ്യത്യസ്ത രൂപത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത രൂപത്തിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളായിരിക്കാം, കള ഡോമെയിന്\u200dറെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത് വായിക്കുന്നവനെ വഞ്ചിക്കാനാണ്. ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d - പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള വഞ്ചന കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് നിലവിലുണ്ടെങ്കിലും, ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ വഞ്ചിക്ക് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വഞ്ചന കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു. ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഡ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റിന്\u200dറെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ്-ആര്\u200dട്ട് പ്രകടനം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. 93. 42% ക ഡൊമെയിനിലെ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യം പരിശീലിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അനുവദിക്കുന്നു വഞ്ചിക്കുന്ന എഴുത്തുകളുടെ ര അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു, ഡൊമെയിനിലെ ഡേറ്റാ എത്ര സഹായം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന്, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീ നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങളും അന്വേഷണങ്ങളും കാണിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d ഡൊമെയിനിന്റെ സ്വാതന്ത്രതയുടെ ഇടയില്\u200d വെച്ച് വഞ്ചിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ്രധാന രീതിയുണ്ടാകും, അത് ന', 'mn': 'Текст дахь хуурамч нь өөр хэлбэрүүд байж болно. Муудлалтай мэдээ, шүлэг, сэтгэл хөдөлгөөн, спамын эл. шуудан бичиж болно. Холбооны хамааралтай байхдаа, хуурамч бичгийн гол зорилго нь уншигчийг хуурамжуулах юм. Хэдийгээр холбооны тодорхойлолтой худлааны нээлт байдаг ч, холбооны хамааралтай худлааны нээлт нь бүрэн зураг хангаж чадна. Энэ нь текст дээр хэрхэн худлааны явдал болохыг ойлгохын тулд чухал. Энэ цаасан дээр бид гүн гүнзгий суралцах архитектуруудыг ашиглан дотоод хамааралтай байрлал дээр хуурамжлага олж мэднэ. Бидний арга нь ихэнх банкмарк өгөгдлийн тогтолцооны улс төрийн үйл ажиллагааг 93.42% болон F1-тоо 93.22% байдаг. Холбооны хамааралтай сургалт нь бидэнд хуурамч бичих хэлбэрээс илүү доромжтой хэлбэрийг барьж чадна. Мөн бид холбоотой мэдээллийг тодорхойлох хэрэгтэй вэ гэдгийг шинжилгээ хийдэг. Ялангуяа өгөгдлийн сургалт хийхэд амархан хэмжээний хэрэгтэй байж болохгүй. Манай үр дүнг болон анализ нь хүрээнээс хамааралгүй текст хоорондоо шинэ судалгааны шинэ хэсгийг бүтээж, худлааны нээлттэй салбарт шинэ арга замыг нээж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Deskrivelsen i teksten kan vera av ulike formar i ulike domene, inkludert falske nyhetar, rumor tweets og søppelpost. Ikkje respektivt på domenet, hovudverktøyet til den deceptive teksten er å vilkja lesaren. Selv om domenespesifikke oppdaging av deception eksisterer, kan domene-uavhengig oppdaging gje ei holistisk bilete, som kan vera viktig for å forstå korleis deltak skjer i teksten. I denne papiret oppdager vi deltak i eit domeneuavhengig innstilling med dyp læringsarkitektur. Metoden vårt utfører kunstendigheten til de fleste benchmarkdatasetta med heile nøyaktighet 93,42% og F1- poeng 93,22%. Domene-uavhengige opplæring tillèt oss å henta subter nuanser av vilkårleg skriftsstil. I tillegg analyserer vi kor mykje data i domenet kan vera nyttig for å oppdaga nøyaktig falsifisering, spesielt for tilfellene der data kan ikkje vera lett tilgjengeleg for å trenja. Resultatet og analysen våre tyder på at det kan vera ein universell mønster for deltak som ligg i mellom teksten uavhengig av domenet, som kan laga eit nytt område av forskning og opna nye avener i området for deltak.', 'pl': 'Oszustwo w tekście może mieć różne formy w różnych domenach, w tym fałszywe wiadomości, plotki tweety i spam e-maile. Niezależnie od domeny głównym zamiarem zwodniczego tekstu jest oszukanie czytelnika. Chociaż istnieje wykrywanie oszustw specyficznych dla domeny, niezależne od domeny wykrywanie oszustw może zapewnić holistyczny obraz, co może mieć kluczowe znaczenie dla zrozumienia, w jaki sposób zachodzi oszustwo w tekście. W artykule wykrywamy oszustwo w środowisku niezależnym od domeny przy użyciu architektur głębokiego uczenia. Nasza metoda przewyższa najnowocześniejszą wydajność większości zbiorów danych referencyjnych o ogólnej dokładności 93,42% i F1-Score 93,22%. Szkolenie niezależne od domeny pozwala nam uchwycić subtelniejsze niuanse zwodniczego stylu pisania. Ponadto analizujemy ilość danych wewnątrz domeny może być pomocna w dokładnym wykryciu oszustwa, zwłaszcza w przypadkach, gdy dane mogą nie być łatwo dostępne do treningu. Nasze wyniki i analizy wskazują, że pomiędzy tekstem niezależnie od domeny może istnieć uniwersalny wzór oszustwa, który może stworzyć nowy obszar badań i otworzyć nowe drogi w dziedzinie wykrywania oszustw.', 'ro': 'Înșelăciunea din text poate fi de diferite forme în diferite domenii, inclusiv știri false, tweet-uri de zvonuri și e-mailuri spam. Indiferent de domeniu, intenția principală a textului înșelător este de a înșela cititorul. Deși există detectarea înșelăciunii specifice domeniului, detectarea înșelăciunii independente de domeniu poate oferi o imagine holistică, care poate fi crucială pentru a înțelege modul în care apare înșelăciunea în text. În această lucrare, detectăm înșelăciunea într-un cadru independent de domeniu folosind arhitecturi de învățare profundă. Metoda noastră depășește performanța de ultimă generație a majorității seturilor de date de referință cu o precizie generală de 93,42% și F1-Score de 93,22%. Instruirea independentă de domeniu ne permite să surprindem nuanțe mai subtile ale stilului de scriere înșelător. Mai mult decât atât, analizăm cât de multe date din domeniu pot fi utile pentru a detecta cu precizie înșelăciunea, în special în cazurile în care datele nu pot fi ușor disponibile pentru antrenament. Rezultatele și analiza noastră indică faptul că ar putea exista un model universal de înșelăciune situat între text independent de domeniu, care poate crea un nou domeniu de cercetare și poate deschide noi căi în domeniul detectării înșelăciunii.', 'sr': 'Prevara u tekstu može biti od različitih oblika u različitim domenama, uključujući lažne vesti, glasine tweets i spam e-mailove. Bez poštovanja domena, glavna namjera lažnog teksta je prevariti čitača. Iako postoji detekcija prevare na domenu, detekcija domena nezavisnog prevare može pružiti holističku sliku, koja može biti ključna da bi shvatila kako se prevara događa u tekstu. U ovom papiru otkrivamo prevaru u domenu nezavisnom postavljanju koristeći duboke arhitekture učenja. Naša metoda iznosi učinkovitost države umjetnosti većine baznih podataka sa ukupnom preciznošću od 93,42% i F1-Score od 93,22%. Nezavisna obuka domena omogućava nam da uhvatimo suptilne nuance lažnog stila pisanja. Nadalje, analiziramo koliko podataka u domenu može biti od koristi za precizno otkrivanje prevare, posebno za slučajeve u kojima podaci možda nisu lako dostupni za obuku. Naši rezultati i analiza ukazuju na to da postoji univerzalni obrazac prevare koji leži između teksta nezavisnog od domena, koji može stvoriti novu oblast istraživanja i otvoriti nove avente u oblasti otkrivanja prevare.', 'so': 'Dhaqdhaqaaqa waxaa laga heli karaa noocyo kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ka mid ah warar been ah, tweeti warqada ah, iyo emaylka isboortiga. Qofka guriga lagu heshiiyo waxaa ugu horraysa qasdiga qorniinka khiyaanada ah in la khiyaaneeyo qofka akhriya. In kastoo lagu ogaado khiyaano gaar ah oo domain ku yaala, aqoonsashada khiyaanada ee deegaanka oo xor ahna wuxuu heli karaa sawir quduus ah, taas oo muhiim ah in aad fahanto sida khiyaano ku soo dhaca qoraalka. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku ogaanaa khiyaano aan ku isticmaalno dhismaha waxbarashada aad u dheer. Metalkeena ayaa soo saara sameynta wadamada-The-Art inta badan oo ka mid ah taariikhda bangiga, wuxuuna ku qoraa sax rasmi 93.42% iyo F1-score 93.22%. The domain-independent training allows us to capture subtler nuances of deceptive writing style.  Furthermore, waxaynu baaraynaa in macluumaadka gudaha ku jira ay caawinayso si saxda ah oo ku ogaan karto khiyaanada, khusuusan xaaladaha aan lagu helin macluumaadka waxbarashada si fudud. Fashiqyadayada iyo baaritaankeenna waxay muuqan kartaa qaab caalami ah oo khiyaano ah oo ku dhex yaala qoraalka oo aan xor ka ahayn deegaanka, taasoo sameyn kara meel cilmi ah iyo furi karta macluumaad cusub ee ku yaal beerta khiyaanada.', 'ms': 'The deception in the text can be of different forms in different domains, including fake news, rumor tweets, and spam emails.  Irrespective of the domain, the main intent of the deceptive text is to deceit the reader.  Although domain-specific deception detection exists, domain-independent deception detection can provide a holistic picture, which can be crucial to understand how deception occurs in the text.  Dalam kertas ini, kita mengesan penipuan dalam tetapan bebas domain menggunakan arkitektur belajar dalam. Our method outperforms the State-of-the-Art performance of most benchmark datasets with an overall accuracy of 93.42% and F1-Score of 93.22%.  Latihan bebas-domain membolehkan kita menangkap nuansi lebih halus gaya tulisan penipu. Furthermore, we analyze how much in-domain data may be helpful to accurately detect deception, especially for the cases where data may not be readily available to train.  Hasil dan analisis kami menunjukkan bahawa mungkin terdapat corak penipuan universal yang terletak di antara teks bebas dari domain, yang boleh mencipta kawasan baru penyelidikan dan membuka jalan baru dalam medan pengesan penipuan.', 'mt': 'Il-qarrieqa fit-test tista’ tkun ta’ forom differenti f’oqsma differenti, inklużi aħbarijiet foloz, twittijiet ta’ rumori, u e-mails spam. Irrespective of the domain, the main intent of the deceptive text is to deceit the reader.  Although domain-specific deception detection exists, domain-independent deception detection can provide a holistic picture, which can be crucial to understand how deception occurs in the text.  In this paper, we detect deception in a domain-independent setting using deep learning architectures.  Il-metodu tagħna jaqbeż il-prestazzjoni ta’ l-Istat ta’ l-Art tal-biċċa l-kbira tas-settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza b’preċiżjoni globali ta’ 93.42% u Punteġġ F1 ta’ 93.22%. It-taħriġ indipendenti mid-dominju jippermettilna nqabdu nuanzi aktar sottili ta’ stil ta’ miktub qarrieqi. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu analiżi ta’ kemm id-dejta fid-dominju tista’ tkun utli biex tinstab b’mod preċiż id-deluzzjoni, speċjalment għall-każijiet fejn id-dejta tista’ ma tkunx disponibbli faċilment għat-taħriġ. Ir-riżultati u l-analiżi tagħna jindikaw li jista’ jkun hemm xejra universali ta’ ingannament li tinsab bejn it-test indipendenti mid-dominju, li tista’ toħloq qasam ġdid ta’ riċerka u tiftaħ toroq ġodda fil-qasam tad-detezzjoni ta’ ingannament.', 'ta': 'உரையில் உள்ள ஏமாற்றம் வேறு வடிவங்களில் இருக்க முடியும், பொய் செய்தி, குரல் தொடர்புகள், மற்றும் ஸ்பாம் மின்னஞ்சல் தளத்தின் முக்கிய தலைப்பு, ஏமாற்றும் உரையின் முக்கிய intent என்பது படிப்பவரை ஏமாற்றுவதற்காகும். களம்- குறிப்பிட்ட பிழை கண்டுபிடிப்பு இருந்தாலும், களம் சுதந்தி தேர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு ஒரு புதிய பிம்பத்தை கொடுக்க முடியும், இது உர In this paper, we detect deception in a domain-independent setting using deep learning architectures.  நம்முடைய முறைமையில் பெரும்பாலான பெங்க்மேக் குறிப்பு தகவல் செயல்பாட்டை வெளியேற்றுகிறது 93. 42% மற்றும் 93. 22% F1- மதிப்புக்கு களம் சுதந்திரமான பயிற்சி நமக்கு அனுமதிக்கிறது ஏமாற்றும் எழுத்தும் பாணியின் துணை பிடித்துக் கொள்ள மேலும், நாம் கண்டறியும் சரியாக ஏமாற்றத்தை கண்டுபிடிக்க உதவும் உள்ள தகவல் எவ்வளவு உதவியாக இருக்கும் என்பதை ஆராய்ந்து கொள்கிறோம், கு எங்கள் முடிவுகள் மற்றும் ஆய்வு குறிப்பிடுகிறது தெரியும் பொதுவான பாதையில் களஞ்சியில் உள்ள உரையின் சார்ந்த உரையில் இருக்கும், அது ஒரு புதிய ஆய', 'sv': 'Bedrägeriet i texten kan vara av olika former i olika domäner, inklusive falska nyheter, rykten tweets och skräppost. Oberoende av domänen är avsikten med den vilseledande texten att vilseleda läsaren. Även om domänspecifik bedrägeridetektering finns, kan domänoberoende bedrägeridetektering ge en helhetsbild, vilket kan vara avgörande för att förstå hur bedrägeri sker i texten. I denna uppsats upptäcker vi bedrägerier i en domänoberoende miljö med hjälp av djupinlärningsarkitekturer. Vår metod överträffar de flesta benchmarkdatauppsättningar med en total noggrannhet på 93,42% och F1-Score på 93,22%. Den domänoberoende utbildningen gör att vi kan fånga subtila nyanser av vilseledande skrivstil. Dessutom analyserar vi hur mycket in-domain data som kan vara till hjälp för att korrekt upptäcka bedrägerier, särskilt i de fall då data kanske inte är lätt tillgängliga att träna. Våra resultat och analyser tyder på att det kan finnas ett universellt mönster av bedrägeri mellan texten oberoende av domänen, vilket kan skapa ett nytt forskningsområde och öppna upp nya vägar inom bedrägeridetektering.', 'si': 'වෙනස් දේමේන් වලින් වෙනස් වර්ගයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් පාළුවන් වෙනස් වර්ගයක් වෙන්න, බොරු වාර්තාවක්, කිය ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නැතුව, ප්\u200dරධාන අදහසක් වෙන්නේ කියවන්නේ කියවන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන අදහසක්. ඩොමේන් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය තියෙනවා නමුත්, ඩොමේන් විශේෂ විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් හො මේ පත්තරේ අපි හොයාගන්නවා දේමින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සැකසුම් වලින් ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න සිද්ධාව අපේ විධානය සම්පූර්ණය 93.42% සහ F1-Score 93.22% සම්පූර්ණයි. ඩෝමින් ස්වයංත්\u200dර විධානය අපිට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ලියපු විධානයක් අල්ලගන්න ඉතින්, අපි විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා ඩොමේන් දත්ත කොච්චර උදව් කරන්න පුළුවන්ද කියලා, විශේෂයෙන්ම දත්ත පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ නැති ව අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශාල ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් නිදහස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200d', 'ur': 'پیغام میں فریب مختلف طریقوں میں ہے، جیسے فریب خبریں، شامل فریب ٹیوٹ، اور اسپام ایمیل. ڈومین کی بغیر احترام، دھوکہ کے متن کی اصلی مطلب یہ ہے کہ پڑھنے والے کو دھوکہ دیں۔ اگرچہ ڈومین کے مطابق فریب شناسایی موجود ہے، ڈومین-مستقل فریب شناسایی ایک ہلٹی تصویر کا سامان دے سکتی ہے، جو متن میں فریب کس طرح ہوتی ہے، سمجھنے کے لئے ضروری ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک ڈومین-سفارشی سیکھنے کی معماری کے مطابق دھوکہ کا اظہار کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارا طریقہ 93.42% اور F1-Score 93.22% کے سب سے زیادہ بنچمبرک ڈیٹ سٹ کی عملکرد سے زیادہ کامل ہوتا ہے. ڈومین-مستقل تطارین ہمیں دھوکے لکھنے کی طرح کے زیادہ نائنس پکڑنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ دھوکہ کا دھوکہ دکھانے کے لئے کس قدر مددگار ہو سکتا ہے، مخصوصاً ایسے مواقع کے لئے جہاں ڈیٹا ٹرین کے لئے آسان نہیں ہو سکتا۔ ہمارے نتیجے اور تحقیقات نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ڈومین کے درمیان ایک عمومی فریب کی بصورت ہے جو ڈومین کے بیچ میں لگائی جاتی ہے، جو تحقیقات کے نو منطقه بنا سکتا ہے اور فریب شناسی کے مطابق نو طریقے کھول سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Matnning izlanishi, har xil xabar, xabar tweeti, va spam elektron pochta kabi boshqa domanedagi turli shakllarda boʻlishi mumkin. Domen'ning murakkab bo'lsa, yolg'on matnning asosiy maqsadi o'qituvchi sahifani yolg'on qilish. @ info: whatsthis Bu qogʻozda, biz domen-o'rganish maktablarini yordamida qo'llanmiz. Bizning usuli, ko'pchilik benchmark maʼlumotlar bazasining holatini bajaradi va 93.42% va 93.22% - F1- darajasi. Domen xotira taʼminlovchi bizni tez yozuvchi uslubni olib tashlashga ruxsat beradi. Koʻrsatganda, domen maʼlumotlari haqida yordam berishi mumkin, hususan maʼlumot taʼminlovchi bo'lmaydigan holatlarga foydalanishi mumkin. Bizning natijalarimiz va taʼminlovchimiz, domen'ning orasidagi matnning bir umumiy shakli bo'lishi mumkin. Bu taʼminlovchi soni yaratish va cheksiz qidirish davridagi yangi qobiliyatlarni ochish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Sự lừa dối trong văn bản có thể là các dạng khác nhau trong mỗi miền, bao gồm cả tin giả, tin đồn tweet, và email tin nhắn rác. Không quan trọng miền, mục đích chính của văn bản dối trá là lừa dối người đọc. Mặc dù có khả năng phát hiện sự lừa dối đặc trưng miền, nhưng khả năng được phát hiện sự lừa dối độc lập có thể cung cấp một hình ảnh tổng thể, rất quan trọng để hiểu sự lừa dối diễn ra trong văn bản. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi phát hiện sự lừa dối trong một môi trường độc lập miền nhờ các kiến trúc ngầm. Phương pháp của chúng tôi vượt trội hoàn thành công việc của hầu hết các nhà dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn với độ chính xác tổng thể của 93.2=. Việc huấn luyện độc lập miền cho phép chúng ta thu thập những sắc thái tinh vi của kiểu viết lách. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi phân tích dữ liệu nội bộ có thể có ích gì để phát hiện sự lừa dối chính xác, đặc biệt cho những trường hợp mà dữ liệu có thể không dễ dàng có để đào tạo. Kết quả và phân tích của chúng tôi cho thấy có thể có một mô hình dối trá phổ biến nằm trong đoạn độc lập của miền, tạo ra một lĩnh vực mới của nghiên cứu và mở ra những hướng mới trong lĩnh vực phát hiện lừa dối.', 'bg': 'Измамата в текста може да бъде от различни форми в различни домейни, включително фалшиви новини, слухове в туитове и спам имейли. Независимо от домейна, основната цел на измамния текст е да измами читателя. Въпреки че съществува специфично за домейна откриване на измама, независимо от домейна откриване на измама може да осигури цялостна картина, която може да бъде от решаващо значение за разбирането как се случва измама в текста. В тази статия откриваме измама в обстановка, независима от домейн, като използваме архитектури за дълбоко обучение. Нашият метод превъзхожда най-съвременните резултати на повечето сравнителни набори от данни с обща точност от 93,42% и оценка от 93,22%. Обучението, независимо от домейна, ни позволява да уловим по-тънки нюанси на измамния стил на писане. Освен това анализираме колко данни в областта могат да бъдат полезни за точно откриване на измама, особено в случаите, когато данните може да не са лесно достъпни за обучение. Нашите резултати и анализи показват, че може да има универсален модел на измама, който лежи между текста независимо от областта, който може да създаде нова област на изследване и да отвори нови пътища в областта на откриването на измама.', 'da': 'Svig i teksten kan være af forskellige former i forskellige domæner, herunder fake news, rygte tweets og spam e-mails. Uanset domænet er hovedformålet med den vildledende tekst at vildlede læseren. Selvom der findes domænespecifikke bedrageri, kan domæneafhængig bedrageri-detektering give et helhedsbillede, hvilket kan være afgørende for at forstå, hvordan bedrageri forekommer i teksten. I denne artikel registrerer vi bedrag i et domæneafhængigt miljø ved hjælp af deep learning arkitekturer. Vores metode overgår den avancerede ydeevne for de fleste benchmark datasæt med en samlet nøjagtighed på 93,42% og F1-Score på 93,22%. Den domæneafhængige træning giver os mulighed for at fange subtile nuancer af vildledende skrivestil. Desuden analyserer vi, hvor meget in-domain data kan være nyttigt for nøjagtigt at opdage bedrag, især i de tilfælde, hvor data muligvis ikke er let tilgængelige til træning. Vores resultater og analyser indikerer, at der kan være et universelt svindelmønster mellem teksten uafhængigt af domænet, som kan skabe et nyt forskningsområde og åbne op for nye veje inden for svindeldetektion.', 'nl': 'De misleiding in de tekst kan van verschillende vormen zijn in verschillende domeinen, waaronder fake news, geruchttweets en spam e-mails. Ongeacht het domein, de belangrijkste bedoeling van de misleidende tekst is om de lezer te misleiden. Hoewel domeinspecifieke misleidingsdetectie bestaat, kan domeinonafhankelijke misleidingsdetectie een holistisch beeld geven, wat cruciaal kan zijn om te begrijpen hoe misleiding in de tekst plaatsvindt. In dit artikel detecteren we misleiding in een domein-onafhankelijke omgeving met behulp van deep learning architecturen. Onze methode overtreft de State-of-the-Art prestaties van de meeste benchmark datasets met een algehele nauwkeurigheid van 93,42% en F1-Score van 93,22%. De domeinonafhankelijke training stelt ons in staat subtielere nuances van misleidende schrijfstijl vast te leggen. Verder analyseren we hoeveel in-domain data nuttig kan zijn om bedrog nauwkeurig te detecteren, vooral in de gevallen waarin gegevens niet direct beschikbaar zijn om te trainen. Onze resultaten en analyses wijzen erop dat er een universeel patroon van misleiding tussen de tekst kan liggen, onafhankelijk van het domein, dat een nieuw onderzoeksgebied kan creëren en nieuwe wegen kan openen op het gebied van misleidingsdetectie.', 'hr': 'Prevara u tekstu može biti od različitih oblika u različitim domenama, uključujući lažne vijesti, glasine tweets i spam e-maile. Nepoštujući domenu, glavna namjera lažnog teksta je prevariti čitača. Iako postoji otkrivanje prevare na domenu, otkrivanje domena nezavisnog prevare može pružiti holističku sliku, koja može biti ključna da bi shvatila kako se prevara događa u tekstu. U ovom papiru otkrivamo prevaru u domenu nezavisnom postavljanju koristeći duboke arhitekture učenja. Naša metoda iznosi učinkovitost države umjetnosti većine standardnih podataka s ukupnom preciznošću 93,42% i F1-Score 93,22%. Odvjetnica neovisna na domenu omogućava nam da uhvatimo podzemne nuance lažnog pisaćeg stila. Nadalje, analiziramo koliko podataka u domenu može biti od koristi za precizno otkrivanje prevare, posebno za slučajeve u kojima podaci nisu lako dostupni za obuku. Naši rezultati i analiza ukazuju na to da postoji univerzalni obrazac prevare koji leži između teksta nezavisnog od domena, koji može stvoriti novo područje istraživanja i otvoriti nove avente u oblasti otkrivanja prevare.', 'de': 'Die Täuschung im Text kann in verschiedenen Domänen von verschiedenen Formen sein, einschließlich Fake News, Gerücht-Tweets und Spam-E-Mails. Unabhängig von der Domäne ist die Hauptintention des trügerischen Textes, den Leser zu täuschen. Obwohl es eine domänenspezifische Täuschungserkennung gibt, kann eine domänenunabhängige Täuschungserkennung ein ganzheitliches Bild liefern, das entscheidend sein kann, um zu verstehen, wie Täuschung im Text auftritt. In diesem Beitrag erkennen wir Täuschung in einem domänenunabhängigen Umfeld mithilfe von Deep Learning Architekturen. Unsere Methode übertrifft die State-of-the-Art Performance der meisten Benchmark-Datensätze mit einer Gesamtgenauigkeit von 93,42% und F1-Score von 93,22%. Das domänenunabhängige Training ermöglicht es uns, subtilere Nuancen des trügerischen Schreibstils einzufangen. Darüber hinaus analysieren wir, wie viele In-Domain-Daten hilfreich sein können, um Täuschungen genau zu erkennen, insbesondere in Fällen, in denen Daten möglicherweise nicht leicht zu trainieren sind. Unsere Ergebnisse und Analysen deuten darauf hin, dass zwischen dem Text unabhängig von der Domäne ein universelles Muster der Täuschung liegt, das ein neuartiges Forschungsgebiet schaffen und neue Wege im Bereich der Täuschungserkennung eröffnen kann.', 'id': 'Penipuan dalam teks dapat berbeda bentuk dalam domain yang berbeda, termasuk berita palsu, tweet rumor, dan email spam. Tidak peduli domain, tujuan utama dari teks penipu adalah untuk menipu pembaca. Meskipun deteksi penipuan spesifik domain ada, deteksi penipuan independen domain dapat menyediakan gambar holistik, yang dapat penting untuk memahami bagaimana penipuan terjadi dalam teks. Dalam kertas ini, kita mendeteksi penipuan dalam setting independen domain menggunakan arsitektur belajar dalam. Metode kami melebihi prestasi State-of-the-Art dari kebanyakan set data benchmark dengan akurasi umum 93,42% dan F1-Score 93,22%. Latihan independen domain memungkinkan kita untuk menangkap nuansi lebih halus dari gaya tulisan penipu. Selain itu, kami menganalisis berapa banyak data dalam domain mungkin berguna untuk mendeteksi dengan akurat penipuan, terutama untuk kasus di mana data mungkin tidak mudah tersedia untuk dilatih. Hasil dan analisis kami menunjukkan bahwa mungkin ada pola universal penipuan terletak di antara teks independen dari domain, yang dapat menciptakan area baru penelitian dan membuka jalan baru dalam bidang deteksi penipuan.', 'fa': 'دروغگویی در متن می تواند از فرم های مختلف در دامنهای مختلف باشد، شامل اخبار دروغگویی، توئیت شایعه و ایمیل اسپام. با تفاوت از دامنه، هدف اصلی متن فریب کننده این است که خواننده را فریب دهد. اگرچه شناسایی فریب ویژه\u200cای از دومین وجود دارد، شناسایی فریب\u200cهای مستقل به دومین می\u200cتواند یک تصویر holistic را پیشنهاد کند، که می\u200cتواند برای فهمیدن چگونه فریب در متن اتفاق می\u200cافتد بسیار مهم باشد. در این کاغذ، ما فریب را در یک تنظیم مستقل به دامنه با استفاده از معمارهای عمیق یادگیری شناسایی می کنیم. روش ما عملکرد ایالت هنر بیشترین مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نقاشی با دقیق عمومی 93.42 درصد و نقاشی F1 درصد 93.22 درصد بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد. آموزش مستقل به دومین به ما اجازه می دهد که از طریق نوشتن فریب\u200cگیری پایین\u200cتر را بگیریم. علاوه بر این، ما تحلیل می\u200cکنیم که چقدر داده\u200cهای دامنه\u200cی دامنه\u200cای ممکن است برای دقیقاً شناسایی فریب\u200cگیری کمک کنند، مخصوصا برای پرونده\u200cهایی که داده\u200cها ممکن است به راحتی برای آموزش فراهم نمی\u200cشوند. نتایج و تحلیل ما نشان می دهند که ممکن است یک الگو جهانی از فریب وجود داشته باشد که بین متن مستقل از دامنه است که می تواند یک منطقه نوی تحقیقات را ایجاد کند و راه های جدید را در زمینه شناسایی فریب باز کند.', 'ko': '텍스트의 사기는 가짜 뉴스, 유언비어, 스팸메일을 포함한 다양한 영역에서 발생할 수 있다.어느 분야든 사기성 텍스트의 주요 의도는 독자를 속이는 것이다.비록 특정한 영역에 대한 사기 검측이 존재하지만 영역에 독립된 사기 검측은 전체적인 화면을 제공할 수 있다. 이것은 사기가 어떻게 텍스트에서 발생하는지 이해하는 데 매우 중요하다.본고에서 우리는 깊이 있는 학습 구조를 이용하여 분야에 독립된 환경에서 사기를 검출한다.우리의 방법은 대부분의 기준 데이터 집합의 최신 성능보다 우수하며 전체 정확도는 93.42%이고 F1은 93.22% 이다.독립 분야의 훈련은 사기적인 창작 풍격의 미묘한 점을 포착할 수 있게 한다.그 밖에 우리는 몇 개의 역내 데이터가 사기 행위를 정확하게 측정하는 데 도움이 될 수 있는지, 특히 데이터가 수시로 훈련에 사용할 수 없는 상황에서도 분석했다.우리의 결과와 분석에 의하면 텍스트 사이에 보편적인 사기 모델이 존재할 수 있다. 이런 모델은 지역에 독립되어 새로운 연구 분야를 창조하고 사기 검측 분야에서 새로운 경로를 열 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Udanganyiko wa maandishi unaweza kuwa namna tofauti katika maeneo mbalimbali, ikiwa ni pamoja na habari bandia, twiti za uvumi, na barua pepe za ujumbe. Pamoja na maeneo hayo, lengo kuu la maandishi ya udanganyifu ni kudanganya msomaji. Ingawa kutambua udanganyifu mahususi wa ndani, utambulisho wa udanganyifu wa ndani unaweza kutoa picha bora, ambazo ni muhimu kuelewa jinsi ya udanganyifu unavyotokea kwenye maandishi. Katika karatasi hii, tunagundua udanganyifu katika mazingira huru ya ndani kwa kutumia majengo ya kujifunza vizuri. Utawala wetu unaonyesha utendaji wa Taifa la sanaa kwa takwimu nyingi za bendera yenye uhakika wa asilimia 93.42 na Score ya F1 kwa asilimia 93.22. mafunzo ya kujitegemea ya ndani yanaruhusu kutukamata maendeleo ya vifaa vya kuandika udanganyifu. Zaidi ya hayo, tunachambua ni kiasi gani takwimu za ndani zinaweza kusaidia kutambua udanganyifu, hususani kwa matukio ambapo taarifa zinaweza kuwa hazipatikani kwa urahisi wa mafunzo. Matokeo yetu na uchambuzi yanaonyesha kuwa kuna mtindo wa kimataifa wa udanganyifu uliopo kati ya maandishi ya maandishi huru ya ndani, ambao unaweza kutengeneza eneo la kitafiti na kufungua njia mpya katika eneo la kutambua udanganyifu.', 'tr': 'Metin aldatması farklı alanlarda, sahte haberler, eşitmeler ve spam e-maillerinde farklı şekiller olabilir. Sahypanyň üstüne görä, aldatmak metiniň esasy maksady okuwçysyny aldatmak. domain-specific aldatma deteksiyonu bar hem, domain-independent aldatma deteksiyonu holistik bir surat saýlamak için önemli bir şekilde hasaplayar. Bu kagyzda çykyş öwrenmek arhitekturasyny ulanarak domena boýunça çykyşlygyny keşfetýäris. Biziň ýüregimiz iň kop sanat setirleriniň durumyny 93.42% we F1-Skor 93.22% derejesi ýok edir. Domena bağımsız eğitim bize laýyk ýazma biçiminden aşağı nusgalary çekmek üçin mümkin edýär. Munuň üstine, biz domaýda näçe sany aldatma dogry ýaly tanyşdyrmak üçin kömek edip biler, iň-eýsem şu wagtlar üçin maglumatlar okaryk üçin ulanyp bilmeýän däldir. Biziň netijelerimiz we analyzymyz domenyň onçakly metin arasynda alyp barýan ynsanly aldatmyň bir nusgasy bardygyny görkeýär. Bu araştyrma täze bir ýerleri döredip, aldatma tanyşynyň sahypasynda täze ýoly a çyp biler.', 'af': "Die verleiding in die teks kan van verskillende vorms in verskillende domeine wees, insluitend falske nuus, rumor tweets en spam e-pos. Onrespektief van die domein, die hoofdoel van die verleiding teks is om die leser te verlei. Alhoewel domein-spesifieke verleiding beskrywing bestaan, domein-onafhanklike verleiding kan 'n holistiese prent verskaf, wat kan wees cruciaal om te verstaan hoe verleiding in die teks voorkom. In hierdie papier, ons vind verleiding in 'n domein-onafhanklike instelling deur diep leer arkitektuur te gebruik. Ons metode uitvoer die State-of-the-Art-performance van die mees benchmark datastel met 'n heeltemal presisie van 93.42% en F1-Tel van 93.22%. Die domein-onafhanklike onderwerp laat ons toe om onderwerpe nuans van bedriefstyl te vang. Ons analiseer ook hoeveel in-domein data dalk helplik kan wees om te besluit die verleiding, veral vir die gevalle waar data dalk nie leeg beskikbaar kan wees om te trein nie. Ons resultate en analisie wys dat daar dalk 'n universele patroon van verleiding is wat tussen die teks onafhanklik van die domein lê, wat kan skep 'n nuwe area van ondersoek en nuwe avenue oopmaak in die veld van verleiding.", 'am': 'የጽሑፉ ስሕተት በተለየ ክፍሎች፣ የሐሰት ዜና፣ የዝናብ ትዊተር እና የኢሜይል ኢሜይል ይኖራል፡፡ በጦማሪያውም ላይ ቢሆን የአስተባይ ጽሑፍ ማሰብ አንባቢውን ለማታለል ነው። ምንም እንኳን ዶሜን-የተለየ ሽንገላ ማግኘት ቢኖር፣ የdomain-ነፃ ሽንገላ ማግኘት በጽሑፉ ውስጥ ሽንገላ እንዴት እንደሚሆን ለማስተዋል የውድቅ ምስል ማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ውስጥ ጥልቅ ትምህርት መሠረት የተጠቃሚ መሠረት ሲሆን የዶሜን ነፃነት መፍታትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የኢንተርኔት ሀገር-የ-አርድ ዳርቻን በሙሉ ቁጥር 93.42 በመቶ እና የF1-ነጥብ በ93.22 በመቶ ነው፡፡ የዶሜን ነፃነት ትምህርት የሽንገላ ጽሑፎችን ዘይት ለመያዝ ይፈቅዳል፡፡ Furthermore, we analyze how much in-domain data may be helpful to accurately detect deception, especially for the cases where data may not be readily available to train.  ፍሬዎቻችን እና ማስረጃዎቻችን በዲሞናዊ ጽሑፎች መካከል የሚኖር የሽንገላ ምሳሌ መሆኑን ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'sq': 'Mashtrimi në tekst mund të jetë i forme të ndryshme në fusha të ndryshme, duke përfshirë lajme të rreme, twite të thashethemeve dhe email spam. Pavarësisht nga domenia, qëllimi kryesor i tekstit mashtrues është të mashtrojë lexuesin. Megjithëse zbulimi i mashtrimit specifik në domeni ekziston, zbulimi i mashtrimit i pavarur në domeni mund të ofrojë një fotografi holistike, e cila mund të jetë vendimtare për të kuptuar se si mashtrimi ndodh në tekst. Në këtë letër, ne zbulojmë mashtrimin në një ambient të pavarur nga domeni duke përdorur arkitektura mësuese të thella. Metoda jonë mbizotëron performancën e Shtetit të Artit të shumicës së bazave të dhënash me një saktësi të përgjithshme prej 93.42% dhe F1-Score prej 93.22%. Trenimi i pavarur në domeni na lejon të kapim nuanca më të holla të stilit të shkrimit mashtrues. Përveç kësaj, ne analizojmë se sa të dhëna në domeni mund të jenë të dobishme për të zbuluar saktësisht mashtrimin, veçanërisht për rastet ku të dhënat mund të mos jenë në dispozicion të lehtë për të trajnuar. Rezultatet dhe analizat tona tregojnë se mund të ketë një model universal mashtrimi midis tekstit të pavarur nga domenia, i cili mund të krijojë një fushë të re kërkimi dhe të hapë rrugë të reja në fushën e zbulimit të mashtrimit.', 'az': 'Metin aldatmasńĪ, sahte x…ôb…ôrl…ôr, s…ôsl…ôr tweets v…ô spam e-maill…ôri d…ô dahil olmaqla m√ľxt…ôlif Ňü…ôkild…ô f…ôrqli formlar olar. Domenin ehtiyacńĪ olmayan, yalan√ßńĪlńĪq m…ôtnl…ôrin …ôsl niyy…ôti oxuyucusu aldatmaq. domain-specific deception detection exists olsa da, domain-independent deception detection can provide a holistic picture, which can be crucial to understand how deception occurs in the text. Bu kańüńĪzda, d…ôrin √∂yr…ônm…ô arhitektarńĪnńĪ istifad…ô ed…ôr…ôk domeind…ôn bańüńĪmsńĪz bir qurńüuda aldatmanńĪ tanńĪyńĪrńĪq. Bizim metodumuz √ßox benchmark veril…ônl…ôrin stat√ľs√ľn√ľ 93.42% v…ô F1-Score 93.22% il…ô m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edir. Domena-bańüńĪmsńĪz t…ôhsil biz…ô iftiralńĪ yazma stilinin altńĪnńĪ almańüa imkan verir. Daha sonra, domena veril…ôn m…ôlumatlarńĪn haqq olaraq yalan tanńĪtmaq √ľ√ß√ľn n…ô q…ôd…ôr fayda ver…ô bil…ôc…ôyini analiz edirik, √∂zl…ôrin…ô d…ô m…ôlumatlarńĪn t…ôhsil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn asanlńĪqla fayda ver…ô bilm…ôy…ôc…ôyini t…ôhsil edirik. Sonu√ßlarńĪmńĪz v…ô analizimiz bel…ô g√∂st…ôrir ki, domandan bańüńĪmsńĪz m…ôtn arasńĪnda evrensel bir aldatma modeli olar. Bu, araŇütńĪrma m…ôlumatńĪ yaratmaq v…ô aldatma keŇüfinin sah…ôsind…ô yeni yollarńĪ a √ßmaq √ľ√ß√ľn yeni bir m…ôlumat olar.', 'hy': 'Տեքստի խաբեությունը կարող է տարբեր ձևերով լինել տարբեր ոլորտներում, ներառյալ կեղծ նորությունները, հույսերը և սպամ էլեկտրոնային նամակները: Չնայած տիեզերքին, խաբեցող տեքստի հիմնական նպատակն է խաբեցնել կարդացողին: Չնայած, որ գոյություն ունի տիեզերական խաբեության հայտնաբերումը, տիեզերական խաբեության հայտնաբերումը կարող է տալ ամբողջական պատկեր, որը կարևոր է հասկանալու համար, թե ինչպես է խաբեությունը տեղի ունենում տեքստում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք հայտնաբերում ենք խաբեություն անկախ բնագավառներում, օգտագործելով խորը ուսումնասիրության ճարտարապետություններ: Մեր մեթոդը գերազանցում է արվեստի տեխնոլոգիայի մեծ մասի համեմատական տվյալների կազմակերպությունները, որոնց ընդհանուր ճշգրտությունը 93.42 տոկոսով է, իսկ F1-գնահատականը 93.22 տոկոսով: Անկախ տիեզերքի ուսումնասիրությունը թույլ է տալիս մեզ վերցնել խաբեցնող գրելու ոճի նյուանսները: Ավելին, մենք վերլուծում ենք, թե որքա՞ն տվյալներ կարող են օգնել ճշգրիտ հայտնաբերելու խաբեությունը, հատկապես այն դեպքերում, երբ տվյալները հնարավոր չէ, որ հեշտությամբ հասանելի են մարզելու համար: Մեր արդյունքները և վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ կարող է գոյություն ունենալ խաբեության համաշխարհային կաղապար, որը կախված է բնագավառից անկախ տեքստի միջև, որը կարող է ստեղծել հետազոտության նոր ոլորտ և բացել նոր ուղիներ խաբեության հայտնաբերման ոլո', 'bn': 'টেক্সটের প্রতারণা বিভিন্ন ডোমেনের ভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরনের হতে পারে, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে মিথ্যা সংবাদ, গুজব টুইট এবং  ডোমেইনের প্রতি সম্মান না করে, প্রতারণা করা লেখার প্রধান উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে পাঠকের প্রতারণা করা। যদিও ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট বিভ্রান্ত সনাক্তি রয়েছে, তবুও ডোমেইন-স্বাধীন প্রতারণা সনাক্ত করতে পারে একটি পবিত্র ছবি প্রদান করতে পারে, যা লেখায় কিভা এই কাগজটিতে আমরা গভীর শিক্ষা প্রতিষ্ঠানগুলো ব্যবহার করে ডোমেইন-স্বাধীন স্থাপনে প্রতারণা আবিষ্কার করি। আমাদের পদ্ধতি বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের বেশীরভাগ বেনম্যার্কের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যার সাথে ৯৩. ডোমেইন-স্বাধীন প্রশিক্ষণ আমাদের প্রতারণা দেয় যে প্রতারণাকারী লেখার স্টাইলে প্রতারণা করা হয়। এছাড়াও, আমরা বিশ্লেষণ করি যে ডোমেইনের তথ্য সঠিকভাবে প্রতারণার জন্য সাহায্য করতে পারে, বিশেষ করে যেসব ক্ষেত্রে তথ্য প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য সহ আমাদের ফলাফল এবং বিশ্লেষণ নির্দেশ করছে যে ডোমেইনের স্বাধীন টেক্সটের মধ্যে প্রতারণার একটি সার্বভাব্য ধরনের প্রতারণা রয়েছে, যা গবেষণা এবং প্রতারণার ক্ষেত্রে', 'bs': 'Prevara u tekstu može biti od različitih oblika u različitim domenama, uključujući lažne vijesti, glasine tweets i spam e-maile. Bez poštovanja domena, glavna namjera lažnog teksta je prevariti čitača. Iako otkrivanje prevare na domenu posebno postoji, otkrivanje prevare na domenu nezavisno može pružiti holističku sliku, koja može biti ključna da bi shvatila kako se prevara događa u tekstu. U ovom papiru otkrivamo prevaru u domenu nezavisnom postavljanju koristeći duboke arhitekture učenja. Naša metoda nadmašuje učinkovitost države umjetnosti većine standardnih podataka sa ukupnom preciznošću 93,42% i F1-Score 93,22%. Odvjetka neovisna na domenu omogućava nam da uhvatimo suptilne nuance lažnog stila pisanja. Nadalje, analiziramo koliko podataka u domenu može biti od koristi za precizno otkrivanje prevare, posebno za slučajeve u kojima podaci možda nisu lako dostupni za trening. Naši rezultati i analiza ukazuju na to da postoji univerzalni obrazac prevare koji leži između teksta nezavisnog od domena, koji može stvoriti novu oblast istraživanja i otvoriti nove avente u oblasti otkrivanja prevare.', 'cs': 'Podvod v textu může být různých forem v různých doménách, včetně falešných zpráv, drbů tweetů a spamových e-mailů. Bez ohledu na doménu je hlavním záměrem klamavého textu klamat čtenáře. Ačkoli existuje detekce klamu specifické pro doménu, detekce klamu nezávislá na doméně může poskytnout holistický obraz, který může být klíčový pro pochopení, jak k klamu dochází v textu. V tomto článku detekujeme klam v doménově nezávislém prostředí pomocí architektur hlubokého učení. Naše metoda překonává nejmodernější výkon většiny referenčních datových sad s celkovou přesností 93,42% a F1 skóre 93,22%. Školení nezávislé na doméně nám umožňuje zachytit jemnější nuance klamavého stylu psaní. Dále analyzujeme, kolik dat v doméně může být užitečné pro přesné odhalení klamů, zejména v případech, kdy data nemusí být snadno dostupná k tréninku. Naše výsledky a analýza ukazují, že mezi textem může být nezávislý na doméně univerzální vzor klamu, který může vytvořit novou oblast výzkumu a otevřít nové cesty v oblasti detekce klamu.', 'et': 'Teksti pettus võib olla eri vormides erinevates domeenides, sealhulgas valeuudised, kuulujutud säutsud ja rämpsposti e-kirjad. Olenemata domeenist on petliku teksti peamine eesmärk lugejat petta. Kuigi domeenispetsiifiline pettuse tuvastamine on olemas, võib domeenist sõltumatu pettuse tuvastamine anda tervikliku pildi, mis võib olla oluline, et mõista, kuidas pettus tekstis toimub. Käesolevas töös tuvastame pettust domeenist sõltumatus seadmes, kasutades sügavõppe arhitektuure. Meie meetod ületab enamiku võrdlusandmekogumite tipptasemel jõudlust üldise täpsusega 93,42% ja F1-skooriga 93,22%. Domeenist sõltumatu koolitus võimaldab meil jäädvustada peenemaid nüansse petliku kirjutamisstiili. Lisaks analüüsime, kui palju valdkonnasiseseid andmeid võivad olla kasulikud pettuse täpseks tuvastamiseks, eriti juhtudel, kui andmed ei pruugi olla koolitamiseks kergesti kättesaadavad. Meie tulemused ja analüüsid näitavad, et teksti vahel võib olla universaalne pettusmuster, mis võib luua uudse uurimisvaldkonna ja avada uusi võimalusi pettuse avastamise valdkonnas.', 'fi': 'Tekstin petos voi olla eri muodoissa eri toimialueilla, mukaan lukien valeuutiset, huhutweetit ja roskapostiviestit. Riippumatta verkkotunnuksesta petollisen tekstin pääasiallinen tarkoitus on huijata lukijaa. Vaikka toimialueekohtainen petoksentunnistus on olemassa, toimialueesta riippumaton petoksentunnistus voi tarjota kokonaisvaltaisen kuvan, mikä voi olla ratkaisevan tärkeää ymmärtää, miten petos tapahtuu tekstissä. Tässä artikkelissa havaitsemme petoksen verkkotunnuksesta riippumattomassa ympäristössä käyttäen syväoppimisarkkitehtuuria. Menetelmämme ylittää useimpien vertailuaineistojen uusimman suorituskyvyn 93,42% ja F1-pisteen 93,22%. Verkkoalueesta riippumaton koulutus antaa meille mahdollisuuden vangita hienovaraisempia vivahteita petollisesta kirjoitustyylistä. Lisäksi analysoimme, kuinka paljon sisäistä tietoa voi olla hyödyllistä havaita petos tarkasti, erityisesti tapauksissa, joissa tietoja ei välttämättä ole helposti saatavilla koulutettavaksi. Tuloksemme ja analyysimme osoittavat, että tekstin välissä voi olla universaali petoksen malli, joka voi luoda uudenlaisen tutkimusalueen ja avata uusia väyliä petoksen havaitsemiseen.', 'ca': "L'engany en el text pot ser de diverses formes en dominis diferents, incloent notícies falses, tweets rumores i correus electrònics spam. Independentment del domini, la intenció principal del text enganyat és enganyar el lector. Encara que existeix una detecció de fraude específica per domini, la detecció de fraude independent per domini pot proporcionar una imatge holística, que pot ser crucial per entendre com ocorre l'engany en el text. En aquest article, detectem engany en un entorn independent de dominis fent servir arquitectures d'aprenentatge profund. Our method outperforms the State-of-the-Art performance of most benchmark datasets with an overall accuracy of 93.42% and F1-Score of 93.22%.  L'entrenament independent del domini ens permet capturar nuances subtils d'estil d'escriptura enganyada. A més, analitzem quantes dades en domini poden ser útils per detectar amb precisió l'engany, especialment en els casos en què les dades no estan fàcilment disponibles per entrenar. Els nostres resultats i anàlisis indican que pot haver un patró universal d'engany entre el text independent del domini, que pot crear una nova àrea de recerca i obrir noves víes en el camp de la detecció de enganys.", 'ha': "Ciɗẽwar a cikin matsayin, za'a iya cikin wasu former'umni dabam-dabam, kamar haka, zane-posten ƙarya, da zane-zane da ake yi. Aka girmama kammala, ma'aunin matsayin mai yaudara shi ne dõmin ya yaudari mai karatun. Kuma kõ da kutan ƙarya na ƙayyade wanda ke cikin ɗayan, zai iya gano zura wanda ke cikin ɗayan, zai iya bãyar da wani sura mai tsari, da kan muhimmin ka fahimta jinsi yaudara ke cikin matsayin. Ga wannan karatun, za'a gane ƙarya a cikin wani salon da ke da bakwai da ake amfani da bakin karatun masu ƙaranci. MataimakinMu na ƙara ga Taifa-of-the-art na cikakken data masu ƙaranci da gwargwadon tsari na 93.42% da F1-score na 93.22%. Tayyar da wanda bai zama ba na komai sai ya yarda mu kãma danne-dangane na salon rubũtun. Furan haka, Munã yi anayya, ko da yawa data masu cikin guda za ta yi amfani da wajen gane zura, kuma hususanci ga masu sakan da data ba za'a iya amfani da su yi tafiyar da shi mai sauƙi. MataimakinMu da analyyinMu sun nuna cewa there za'a sami wata irin yaudara ta zama mai haɗa a tsakanin matsayin, wanda bai zama mai amfani ba daga madaidaici, wanda zai iya ƙiƙiro wani bango na research kuma ya buɗe masu sauri cikin field da za'a gane ƙarya.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ning teks iso dianteksi karo pernik sampeyan liyane ing sak ain, gambar barang, tuwitan karo alam sing paling I If domain-special debation detection is available, domain In this paper, we detect debation in a domain-free settings used deep Learning architectures. Rasané digawe iso nggawe barang-akèh \'Stat of the Art\' dadi sing berarti dadi iki dadi sing gak bener, cah onh dumadhakan liyane operasi yang wong liyane domain-free politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Rejaleng karo hal-hal punika dipoleh sing gak bener tentang karo perusahaan kelas kotak karo perusahaan seneng kedhalan kelas kuwi, nggawe ngubah perusahaan anyar bukatu nggawe tarjamahan lan mbukakipun ajeng dumadhi winih dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Prevara v besedilu je lahko v različnih oblikah v različnih domenah, vključno z lažnimi novicami, govoricami tweeti in neželeno e-pošto. Ne glede na domeno je glavni namen zavajajočega besedila zavajati bralca. Čeprav obstaja zaznavanje prevar, specifično za domeno, lahko zaznavanje prevar, neodvisno od domene, zagotovi celovito sliko, kar je lahko ključnega pomena za razumevanje, kako se prevara pojavi v besedilu. V tem članku zaznamo prevaro v okolju, neodvisnem od domene, z uporabo arhitektur globokega učenja. Naša metoda presega najsodobnejšo zmogljivost večine referenčnih naborov podatkov s splošno natančnostjo 93,42% in oceno F1 93,22%. Usposabljanje, neodvisno od domene, nam omogoča, da ujamemo subtilnejše nianse zavajajočega sloga pisanja. Poleg tega analiziramo, koliko podatkov na področju so lahko koristni za natančno odkrivanje prevare, zlasti v primerih, ko podatki morda niso na voljo za usposabljanje. Naši rezultati in analiza kažejo, da lahko obstaja univerzalni vzorec prevare, ki leži med besedilom neodvisno od domene, kar lahko ustvari novo področje raziskav in odpre nove poti na področju odkrivanja prevar.', 'he': 'ההונאה בטקסט יכולה להיות בצורות שונות בתחומים שונים, כולל חדשות מזויפות, טוויטים שמועות, ודוארי ספאם. ללא קשר לתחום, הכוונה העיקרית של הטקסט ההונאה היא להונות את הקורא. Although domain-specific deception detection exists, domain-independent deception detection can provide a holistic picture, which can be crucial to understand how deception occurs in the text.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מגלים רמאות במסגרת עצמאית על שטח באמצעות ארכיטקטורות למידה עמוקה. השיטה שלנו מגבירה את ביצועי המדינה של רוב קבוצות נתונים של רמזים עם מדויקה כללית של 93.42% ו-F1-Score של 93.22%. האימון עצמאי לתחום מאפשר לנו לתפוס ניאונסים עדינים יותר של סגנון כתיבה רמאי. בנוסף, אנו מנתחים כמה נתונים בתחום יכולים לעזור לגלות בדיוק את ההונאה, במיוחד במקרים שבו נתונים עשויים לא להיות זמינים בקלות לאימון. התוצאות והניתוח שלנו מצביעים שאולי יש דפוס אוניברסלי של הונאה שקוע בין הטקסט עצמאי מהשטח, שיכול ליצור אזור חדש של מחקר ולפתוח דרכים חדשים בשטח זיהוי הונאה.', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེ་ཡིག་གི་deception་འདི་ཡིས་ཁྱད་པར་རྣམ་པ་འདྲ་མ་འདུག Irrespective of the domain, the main intent of the deceptive text is to deceive the reader. Although domain-specific deception detection exists, domain-independent deception detection can provide a holistic picture, which can be crucial to understand how deception occurs in the text. In this paper, we detect deception in a domain-independent setting using deep learning architectures. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟའི་གནས་སྟངས་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་བཀོད་ཚད་མང་ཤོས་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས The domain-independent training allows us to capture subtler nuances of deceptive writing style. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་ནང་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་གསལ་བཤད་རྟོགས་བྱེད་ན་ཕན་ཆེན་ཡོད་པའི་སྐབས ང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་འབྲས་དང་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་མཁན་གྱི་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Towards Domain-Generalizable Paraphrase Identification by Avoiding the Shortcut Learning', 'pt': 'Em direção à identificação de paráfrase generalizável por domínio, evitando o aprendizado de atalho', 'fr': "Vers une identification de paraphrase généralisable par domaine en évitant l'apprentissage par raccourci", 'ar': 'نحو تحديد إعادة صياغة قابل للتعميم من خلال تجنب التعلم المختصر', 'es': 'Hacia la identificación de paráfrasis generalizable en el dominio evitando el aprendizaje de atajos', 'ja': 'ショートカット学習を回避してドメインの一般化可能なパラフレーズ識別に向けて', 'zh': '避捷径之学,得广释义识', 'ru': 'На пути к обобщаемой парафразной идентификации с помощью избежания быстрого обучения', 'hi': 'शॉर्टकट लर्निंग से बचने के द्वारा डोमेन-सामान्यीकृत व्याख्या पहचान की ओर', 'ga': 'I dTreo Athinsint Fearainn-Ginearálta a Shainaithint tríd an bhFoghlaim Aicearra a Sheachaint', 'ka': 'დიომენის გენერალიზაციური პარაფრეზის ინდიდიტიფიკაციის მიხედვით მარტიკვა სწავლების გადარჩევით', 'el': 'Προς τον γενικευμένο προσδιορισμό παραφράσεων με την αποφυγή της εκμάθησης συντομεύσεων', 'it': "Verso l'identificazione di parafrasi generalizzabile del dominio evitando l'apprendimento delle scorciatoie", 'hu': 'A tartomány általánosítható parafráziazonosítás felé a rövidítő tanulás elkerülésével', 'kk': 'Домен жалпы парафраның идентификациясы тіркесімдерді оқыту арқылы', 'mk': 'За идентификација на парафразата со генерализирање на домен со избегнување на научувањето на кратенки', 'lt': 'Siekiant bendros srities parametrų nustatymo vengiant spartaus mokymosi', 'ml': 'കുറുക്കുവഴി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും വിട്ടുമാറുന്നതിനാല്\u200d മുകളില്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d സാധാരണ പാരാഫ്രസ്', 'mt': 'Towards Domain-Generalizable Paraphrase Identification by Avoiding the Shortcut Learning', 'no': 'Til domene- genereliserbar parafrase- identifikasjon ved å unngå snøggtast- læring', 'mn': 'Домен-Жагсаалтын параграфийн тодорхойлолт руу', 'pl': 'W kierunku identyfikacji parafraz uogólnionych w domenie poprzez unikanie uczenia się skrótów', 'sr': 'Prema domenu generalizovanom identifikacijom parafraze izbjegavajući učenje skraćica', 'ro': 'Către identificarea parafrazei generalizabile de domenii prin evitarea învățării rapide', 'ms': 'Ke arah Pengenalan Parafrasa Boleh-Jeneralisasi Domain dengan menghindari Belajar Pintasan', 'si': 'ඩෝමේන්- සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණ පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය', 'so': 'Towards Domain-General Paraphrase Identification by avoiding the Shortcut Learning', 'sv': 'Mot domängenererbar parafraseidentifiering genom att undvika genvägsinlärning', 'ta': 'Towards Domain-Generalizable Paraphrase Identification by Avoiding the Shortcut Learning', 'ur': 'ڈومین-جنرالیزابل پارافریز شناسایی کی طرف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Để tránh học cách học thiết bị', 'nl': 'Naar domein-generaliseerbare parafrase identificatie door het vermijden van shortcut learning', 'da': 'På vej mod domæneneraliserbar parafraseidentifikation ved at undgå genvejslæring', 'bg': 'Към идентифициране на парафрази, които могат да бъдат обобщени в домейна, чрез избягване на обучението по пряк път', 'hr': 'Prema identifikaciji parafraze za generalizaciju domena izbjegavajući učenje skraćica', 'id': 'Menuju Identifikasi Parafrasa Generalisasi Domain dengan menghindari Belajar Pintasan', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zur dom瓣nenvergeneralisierbaren Paraphrasen-Identifikation durch Vermeidung des Shortcut-Lernens', 'fa': 'به سمت شناسایی پارافریز ژنرال\u200cسازی دامنه با پرهیزگاری از یادگیری لنگریز', 'tr': 'Qısqa yol öwrenmesinden çykarak domena-Umumy Paraphrase Kimligi', 'sw': 'Utambulisho wa Paraphra wa Kupitia Kujifunza', 'af': 'Na Domein- Generaliseer Parafrase Identifikasie deur die Kortpad Leer te verwyder', 'hy': 'Գնալով դեպի բնագավառի ընդհանուր պարաֆրեզի հայտնաբերումը՝ խուսափելով կարճ կոճակների սովորելուց', 'sq': 'drejt identifikimit të parafrazës së gjeneralizueshme në domeni duke shmangur mësimin e shkurtër', 'am': 'አቋራጭ', 'bs': 'Prema identifikaciji parafraze za generalizaciju domena izbjegavajući učenje prečica', 'bn': 'ডোমেইন-সাধারণ প্যারাফ্রাজ পরিচয়পত্রের মাধ্যমে শিক্ষা প্রত্যাহার করে', 'az': 'Q캼sqa yol 칬yr톛nm톛sind톛n 칞톛kindir톛n Domena-Generalizable Parafraza Kimlik', 'ca': "cap a la identificació de parafrases generalitzables a dominis evitant l'aprenentatge d'accesos ràpids", 'cs': 'K doménově obecné identifikaci parafráze vyhnutím se zkratkovému učení', 'ko': '지름길 학습을 피하고 영역 개괄 해석 식별을 실현하다', 'fi': 'Kohti verkkotunnuksen yleistettävää parafraasitunnistusta välttämällä oikotien oppimista', 'et': 'Domeeni üldistatavate parafraaside identifitseerimise suunas otseõppe vältimise teel', 'sk': 'Proti prepoznavanju parametrov, ki jih je mogoče splošno uporabljati domena, z izogibanjem učenju bližnjic', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'ProgressBar', 'he': 'לכיוון זיהוי פראפרזיה אפשרי לגנרליזציה', 'bo': 'Towards Domain-Generalizable Paraphrase Identification by Avoiding the Shortcut Learning'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we investigate the Domain Generalization (DG) problem for supervised Paraphrase Identification (PI). We observe that the performance of existing PI models deteriorates dramatically when tested in an out-of-distribution (OOD) domain. We conjecture that it is caused by shortcut learning, i.e., these models tend to utilize the cue words that are unique for a particular dataset or domain. To alleviate this issue and enhance the DG ability, we propose a PI framework based on Optimal Transport (OT). Our method forces the network to learn the necessary features for all the words in the input, which alleviates the shortcut learning problem. Experimental results show that our method improves the DG ability for the PI models.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نحقق في مشكلة تعميم النطاق (DG) لتحديد إعادة الصياغة تحت الإشراف (PI). نلاحظ أن أداء نماذج PI الحالية يتدهور بشكل كبير عند اختبارها في مجال خارج التوزيع (OOD). نعتقد أنه ناتج عن التعلم المختصر ، أي تميل هذه النماذج إلى استخدام الكلمات الرئيسية الفريدة لمجموعة بيانات أو مجال معين. للتخفيف من هذه المشكلة وتعزيز قدرة DG ، نقترح إطار عمل PI يعتمد على النقل الأمثل (OT). تقوم طريقتنا بإجبار الشبكة على تعلم الميزات الضرورية لجميع الكلمات في الإدخال ، مما يخفف من مشكلة التعلم المختصرة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن طريقتنا تحسن قدرة DG لنماذج PI.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous étudions le problème de la généralisation de domaine (DG) pour l'identification de paraphrase supervisée (IP). Nous observons que les performances des modèles PI existants se détériorent considérablement lorsqu'ils sont testés dans un domaine hors distribution (OOD). Nous supposerons que cela est dû à l'apprentissage raccourci, c'est-à-dire que ces modèles ont tendance à utiliser les mots indicateurs qui sont uniques pour un ensemble de données ou un domaine particulier. Pour pallier ce problème et améliorer la capacité de la DG, nous proposons un cadre PI basé sur le transport optimal (OT). Notre méthode oblige le réseau à apprendre les fonctionnalités nécessaires pour tous les mots de la saisie, ce qui atténue le problème d'apprentissage par raccourci. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre méthode améliore la capacité de DG pour les modèles PI.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, investigamos o problema de Generalização de Domínio (GD) para Identificação de Paráfrase (PI) supervisionada. Observamos que o desempenho dos modelos PI existentes se deteriora drasticamente quando testados em um domínio fora de distribuição (OOD). Conjecturamos que isso seja causado por aprendizado de atalho, ou seja, esses modelos tendem a utilizar as palavras-chave que são únicas para um determinado conjunto de dados ou domínio. Para aliviar este problema e melhorar a capacidade do DG, propomos um framework PI baseado em Optimal Transport (OT). Nosso método força a rede a aprender os recursos necessários para todas as palavras na entrada, o que alivia o problema de aprendizado de atalhos. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso método melhora a capacidade de DG para os modelos PI.', 'es': 'En este artículo, investigamos el problema de la Generalización de Dominios (DG) para la Identificación de Paráfrasis (IP) supervisada. Observamos que el rendimiento de los modelos IP existentes se deteriora drásticamente cuando se prueban en un dominio fuera de distribución (OOD). Suponemos que es causado por el aprendizaje de atajos, es decir, estos modelos tienden a utilizar las palabras clave que son únicas para un conjunto de datos o dominio en particular. Para aliviar este problema y mejorar la capacidad de la DG, proponemos un marco de PI basado en el transporte óptimo (OT). Nuestro método obliga a la red a aprender las características necesarias para todas las palabras de la entrada, lo que alivia el problema de aprendizaje de atajos. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro método mejora la capacidad de DG para los modelos de IP.', 'ja': '本稿では、監視下パラフレーズ識別（ PI ）のドメイン一般化（ DG ）問題について検討する。既存のPIモデルのパフォーマンスは、アウト・オブ・ディストリビューション（ OOD ）ドメインでテストされると劇的に悪化することが観察されます。私たちは、それがショートカット学習によって引き起こされると推測しています。すなわち、これらのモデルは、特定のデータセットまたはドメインに固有のキューワードを利用する傾向があります。この問題を緩和し、DGの能力を高めるために、最適輸送（ OT ）に基づくPIフレームワークを提案します。私たちの方法は、入力されたすべての単語に必要な機能をネットワークに学習させることで、ショートカット学習の問題を緩和します。実験結果は、我々の方法がPIモデルのDG能力を向上させることを示している。', 'zh': '本文中,治监督释义识(PI)域泛化(DG)。 观其分外(OOD)域中试,今PI模性能会显降。 推其由快捷方式学,则向用特定数集或域唯一之提示词也。 缓之DG力,立一传输(OT)之PI框架。 吾法使网络学输单词者必特徵,以缓快捷方式学。 实验结果表明者,PI之DG也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम पर्यवेक्षित व्याख्या पहचान (पीआई) के लिए डोमेन सामान्यीकरण (डीजी) समस्या की जांच करते हैं। हम देखते हैं कि मौजूदा पीआई मॉडल का प्रदर्शन नाटकीय रूप से बिगड़ जाता है जब एक आउट-ऑफ-डिस्ट्रीब्यूशन (ओओडी) डोमेन में परीक्षण किया जाता है। हम अनुमान लगाते हैं कि यह शॉर्टकट सीखने के कारण होता है, यानी, ये मॉडल क्यू शब्दों का उपयोग करते हैं जो किसी विशेष डेटासेट या डोमेन के लिए अद्वितीय हैं। इस मुद्दे को कम करने और डीजी क्षमता को बढ़ाने के लिए, हम इष्टतम परिवहन (ओटी) के आधार पर एक पीआई फ्रेमवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारी विधि नेटवर्क को इनपुट में सभी शब्दों के लिए आवश्यक सुविधाओं को सीखने के लिए मजबूर करती है, जो शॉर्टकट सीखने की समस्या को कम करती है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारी विधि पीआई मॉडल के लिए डीजी क्षमता में सुधार करती है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы исследуем проблему обобщения домена (DG) для контролируемой идентификации парафраз (PI). Мы наблюдаем, что производительность существующих моделей PI резко ухудшается при тестировании в области вне распределения (OOD). Мы предполагаем, что это вызвано быстрым обучением, то есть эти модели, как правило, используют киевые слова, которые являются уникальными для конкретного набора данных или домена. Чтобы решить эту проблему и расширить возможности DG, мы предлагаем структуру PI, основанную на оптимальном транспорте (OT). Наш метод заставляет сеть изучать необходимые функции для всех слов во вводе, что облегчает задачу обучения с помощью ярлыков. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш метод улучшает способность DG для моделей PI.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar an bhfadhb Ginearálú Fearainn (DG) le haghaidh Aitheantas Athfhrása maoirsithe (PI). Tugaimid faoi deara go dtagann meath suntasach ar fheidhmíocht na samhlacha PI atá ann cheana nuair a dhéantar tástáil orthu i bhfearann eis-dáileacháin (OOD). Tuigimid gur foghlaim aicearra is cúis leis, i.e., is gnách go n-úsáideann na samhlacha seo na focail leid atá uathúil do thacar sonraí nó d’fhearann ar leith. Chun an cheist seo a mhaolú agus cumas an Ard-Stiúrthóireacht a fheabhsú, molaimid creat PI bunaithe ar an Iompar is Fearr (OT). Cuireann ár modh iallach ar an líonra na gnéithe riachtanacha a fhoghlaim do na focail go léir san ionchur, rud a mhaolaíonn fadhb foghlama an aicearra. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfeabhsaíonn ár modh an cumas DG do na samhlacha PI.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ დომინის გენერალაზაციის (DG) პრობლემა, რომელიც დანახვავებული პარაფრეზის იდენტიფიკაცია (PI). ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ მსგავსი PI მოდელების გამოსახულება დირამატიკურად სწორდება, როდესაც ტესტირებულია გარეშე (OOD) დიომენში. ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ ეს მარტივი მოდელების შესაბამისად იქნება, მაგრამ ეს მოდელები უნდა გამოყენება cue სიტყვები, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული მონაცემების ან დიომენისთვის უნიკა ამ პრობლემას გახსნა და გახსნა DG-ის შესაძლებლობა, ჩვენ პრობლემა პრობლემა პრობლემა, პრობლემა პრობლემა, პრობლემა პრობლემა ჩვენი პროგრამის შესაძლებლობა ქსელის გავისწავლა ყველა სიტყვებისთვის საჭირო ფუნქციების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც შესაძლებელია გასწავლების პრობ ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენება ჩვენი მეთოდი PI მოდელების DG-ის შესაძლებლობას გაუქმედება.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε το πρόβλημα Γενικοποίησης Τομέα (ΓΔ) για την εποπτευόμενη Αναγνώριση Παραφράσεων (PI). Παρατηρούμε ότι η απόδοση των υφιστάμενων μοντέλων επιδεινώνεται δραματικά όταν δοκιμάζεται σε έναν τομέα εκτός διανομής (OOD). Υποθέτουμε ότι προκαλείται από τη μάθηση συντομεύσεων, δηλαδή, αυτά τα μοντέλα τείνουν να χρησιμοποιούν τις λέξεις σύνθεσης που είναι μοναδικές για ένα συγκεκριμένο σύνολο δεδομένων ή τομέα. Για να αμβλυνθεί αυτό το ζήτημα και να ενισχυθεί η ικανότητα της ΓΔ, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο PI βασισμένο στις βέλτιστες μεταφορές (ΟΤ). Η μέθοδος μας αναγκάζει το δίκτυο να μάθει τα απαραίτητα χαρακτηριστικά για όλες τις λέξεις στην εισαγωγή, γεγονός που ανακουφίζει το πρόβλημα της εκμάθησης συντομεύσεων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας βελτιώνει την ικανότητα DG για τα μοντέλα PI.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban a felügyelt parafrázisazonosítás (PI) Domain Generalization (DG) problémáját vizsgáljuk. Megfigyeljük, hogy a meglévő PI modellek teljesítménye drámaian romlik, ha egy elosztáson kívüli (OOD) tartományban tesztelik. Feltételezzük, hogy ezt a rövid utak tanulása okozza, azaz ezek a modellek hajlamosak egy adott adatkészlethez vagy tartományhoz egyedülálló cue szavakat használni. A probléma enyhítése és a Főigazgatóság képességének javítása érdekében javaslatot teszünk az optimális közlekedésen (OT) alapuló PI keretrendszerről. Módszerünk arra kényszeríti a hálózatot, hogy megtanulják a bemenetben szereplő összes szó szükséges funkcióit, ami enyhíti a gyorsbillentyű tanulási problémát. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk javítja a PI modellek DG képességét.', 'it': "In questo articolo, esaminiamo il problema della Generalizzazione del Dominio (DG) per l'Identificazione Paraphrase supervisionata (PI). Osserviamo che le prestazioni dei modelli PI esistenti peggiorano drasticamente quando vengono testati in un dominio out-of-distribution (OOD). Supponiamo che sia causato dall'apprendimento di scorciatoie, cioè questi modelli tendono ad utilizzare le parole cue che sono uniche per un determinato set di dati o dominio. Per alleviare questo problema e migliorare la capacità della DG, proponiamo un quadro PI basato su trasporti ottimali (OT). Il nostro metodo costringe la rete a imparare le caratteristiche necessarie per tutte le parole in input, che alleviano il problema di apprendimento delle scorciatoie. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro metodo migliora la capacità DG per i modelli PI.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, домен жалпы түрлендіру (DG) мәселесін бақылау парафраның идентификациясы (PI) үшін зерттеудік. Біз PI үлгілерінің іске асырып тұрғанда (OOD) доменде тексерілген кезде драматикалық түрде қалады деп белгіледік. Біз оны тіркесімдер оқыту үшін себепті деп ойлаймыз, мысалы, бұл үлгілер өзгертілген деректер жинағы не доменге әдімгі деген белгілі мәліметтер сөздерін пайдалануға Бұл мәселеді күшейту және DG мүмкіндігін күшейту үшін, Оптималды транспорт (OT) негізінде PI бағдарламасын ұсынамыз. Біздің әдіміміз желімізді керек сөздерді үйрену үшін көмектеседі. Бұл тіркесімдерді үйрену мәселесін көмектеседі. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер PI үлгілерінің DG мүмкіндігін жақсартып береді.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, го истражуваме проблемот со генерализацијата на домените (ДГ) за надгледувана идентификација на парафразите (ПИ). Ние забележуваме дека резултатите на постоечките модели на ПИ драматично се влошуваат кога се тестираат во домен надвор од дистрибуција (ООД). Претпоставуваме дека тоа е предизвикано од научување на кратки патишта, т.е., овие модели имаат тенденција да ги користат сигналните зборови кои се уникатни за одреден датотек или домен. За да го олесниме ова прашање и да ја зголемиме способноста на ДГ, предложуваме рамка за ПИ базирана на оптимален транспорт (ОТ). Нашиот метод ја принуди мрежата да ги научи потребните карактеристики за сите зборови во внесувањето, што го олеснува проблемот со научувањето на кратки патишта. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот метод ја подобрува способноста на ДГ за моделите на ПИ.', 'lt': 'In this paper, we investigate the Domain Generalization (DG) problem for supervised Paraphrase Identification (PI).  Pastebėjome, kad esamų PI modelių veiksmingumas smarkiai pablogėja, kai bandoma ne platinimo srityje. Mes darome prielaidą, kad tai sukelia trumpalaikis mokymasis, t. y. ši e modeliai dažnai naudoja ženklinius žodžius, kurie yra unikalūs tam tikram duomenų rinkiniui ar domenui. To alleviate this issue and enhance the DG ability, we propose a PI framework based on Optimal Transport (OT).  Our method forces the network to learn the necessary features for all the words in the input, which alleviates the shortcut learning problem.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas pagerina PI modelių GD gebėjimus.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki masalah Generalizasi Domain (DG) untuk Pengenalan Parafrasa (PI) yang dijaga. Kami memperhatikan bahawa prestasi model PI yang ada berkurang secara dramatis apabila diuji dalam domain luar-distribusi (OOD). Kami menduga bahawa i a disebabkan oleh pelajaran pintas, iaitu, model ini cenderung menggunakan kata-kata isyarat yang unik untuk set data atau domain tertentu. Untuk mengurangi isu ini dan meningkatkan kemampuan DG, kami melamar kerangka PI berdasarkan Transportasi Optimal (OT). Kaedah kami memaksa rangkaian untuk belajar ciri-ciri yang diperlukan untuk semua perkataan dalam input, yang mengurangkan masalah pembelajaran pintasan. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami meningkatkan kemampuan DG untuk model PI.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ജനറലേഷന്\u200d (ഡിജി) പ്രശ്നത്തെ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. പാരാഫ്രാസ് തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d (പിഐ). നിലവിലുള്ള പിഐ മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം ഒരു വിതരണ്ടില്ലാത്ത ഡോമെയിനില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിച്ചപ്പോള്\u200d സ്വഭാ We conjecture that it is caused by shortcut learning, i.e., these models tend to utilize the cue words that are unique for a particular dataset or domain.  ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ ലളിപ്പിക്കാനും ഡിജിയുടെ കഴിവിനെ കൂടുതലാക്കാനും വേണ്ടി, ഓപ്റ്റോമാല്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dപോര്\u200dട്ട് അടിസ്ഥ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200dക്ക് ആവശ്യമുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. അത് കുറുക്കുവഴി പഠിക്ക പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പിഐ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഡിജി സാധ്യ', 'no': 'I denne papiret undersøker vi problemet for domenegenerering (DG) for oversikt parafrase- identifikasjon (PI). Vi observerer at utviklinga av eksisterande PI-modeller forstørrar dramatisk når testa er i eit utfordelingsdomene (OOD). Vi gjer at det er for årsaket av snarvegelæring, dvs. desse modelane har tendens til å bruka cue-ord som er unikt for ein bestemt dataset eller domene. For å redusera dette problemet og forbetra DG-kapasiteten, foreslår vi ein PI-rammeverk basert på Optimal Transport (OT). Metoden vårt påkraver nettverket å lære dei nødvendige funksjonane for alle ord i inndata, som alleviarer problem med læring av snøggtastar. Eksperimentale resultat viser at metoden vårt forbetrar DG-kapasiteten for PI-modellen.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Домены Генерализацийн (DG) асуудлыг удирдлагатай Парафразын идентификацийн (PI) асуудлыг судалж байна. Бид одоогийн PI загварын үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагаа гадаад хуваарилцаагүй (OOD) холбоонд шалгах үед үнэхээр буурч байна. Бид үүнийг томъёогоор суралцах боломжтой гэж боддог. Энэ загварууд тодорхой өгөгдлийн санд эсвэл домъёогоор ялгаатай тэмдэглэх үгсийг ашигладаг. Энэ асуудлыг багасгаж, ДГ-ын чадварыг нэмэгдүүлэхийн тулд бид "Optimal Transport (OT) дээр суурилсан PI-ийн системийг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Бидний арга нь сүлжээ суралцахын тулд хэрэгтэй боломжуудыг суралцах боломжтой болгодог. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний арга нь PI загварын DG чадварыг сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'In this paper, we investigate the Domain Generalization (DG) problem for supervised Paraphrase Identification (PI).  We observe that the performance of existing PI models deteriorates dramatically when tested in an out-of-distribution (OOD) domain.  We conjecture that it is caused by shortcut learning, i.e., these models tend to utilize the cue words that are unique for a particular dataset or domain.  Biex ittaffi din il-kwistjoni u ssaħħa ħ il-kapaċità tad-DĠ, qed nipproponu qafas PI bbażat fuq l-Optimal Transport (OT). Il-metodu tagħna jġiegħel lin-netwerk jitgħallem il-karatteristiċi meħtieġa għall-kliem kollu fil-kontribut, li jtaffi l-problema tat-tagħlim fil-qosor. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-metodu tagħna jtejjeb il-kapaċità tad-DĠ għall-mudelli PI.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, investigăm problema Generalizării Domeniului (DG) pentru identificarea parafrază supravegheată (PI). Observăm că performanța modelelor PI existente se deteriorează dramatic atunci când sunt testate într-un domeniu out-of-distribution (OOD). Presupunem că aceasta este cauzată de învățarea pe scurtături, adică aceste modele tind să utilizeze cuvintele cu cuie care sunt unice pentru un anumit set de date sau domeniu. Pentru a atenua această problemă și a îmbunătăți capacitatea DG, propunem un cadru PI bazat pe transportul optim (OT). Metoda noastră forțează rețeaua să învețe caracteristicile necesare pentru toate cuvintele din intrare, ceea ce ușurează problema de învățare a comenzilor rapide. Rezultatele experimentale arata ca metoda noastra imbunatateste capacitatea DG pentru modelele PI.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule badamy problem Domain Generalization (DG) dla nadzorowanej identyfikacji parafraz (PI). Obserwujemy, że wydajność istniejących modeli PI dramatycznie pogarsza się podczas testowania w domenie poza dystrybucją (OOD). Domyślamy się, że jest to spowodowane uczeniem się skrótów, tzn. modele te mają tendencję do wykorzystania słów cue, które są unikalne dla konkretnego zbioru danych lub domeny. Aby złagodzić ten problem i zwiększyć zdolność DG, proponujemy ramy PI oparte na optymalnym transporcie (OT). Nasza metoda zmusza sieć do nauki niezbędnych funkcji dla wszystkich słów w wejściu, co łagodzi problem uczenia się skrótów. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasza metoda poprawia zdolność DG dla modeli PI.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxan ka baaraynaa dhibaatada geneeraliska (DG) ee la ilaaliyo aqoonsiga baaraaraarka (PI). We observe that the performance of existing PI models deteriorates dramatically when tested in an out-of-distribution (OOD) domain.  We conjecture that it is caused by shortcut learning, i.e., these models tend to utilize the cue words that are unique for a particular dataset or domain.  Si aan u fududeeyo arintan iyo in aan u kordhino awoodda DG, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa framework PI oo ku saleysan Optimal Transport (OT). Midabkayaga ayaa ku qasba shabakadda si ay u barto waxyaabaha loo baahan yahay oo dhan erayada gudaha ku jira, taas oo u fududaysa dhibaatada barashada gaaban. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in qaabkeenkeennu uu kordhiyo awoodda DG ee samooyinka PI.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru istražujemo problem generalizacije domena (DG) za nadzornu identifikaciju parafraze (PI). Primećujemo da se provedba postojećih PI modela dramatično pogoršava kada se testira u domenu izvan distribucije (OOD). Pretpostavljamo da je uzrok učenja prečica, tj. ovi modeli koriste znakove koje su jedinstvene za određenu setu podataka ili domenu. Da bi olakšali ovaj problem i poboljšali sposobnost DG, predlažemo PI okvir na osnovu Optimalnog transporta (OT). Naša metoda natjera mrežu da nauči neophodne karakteristike za sve reči u ulazu, što olakšava problem učenja prečica. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda poboljšava sposobnost DG za PI modele.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats undersöker vi problemet med domängeneralisering (DG) för övervakad parafraseidentifiering (PI). Vi observerar att prestandan hos befintliga PI-modeller försämras dramatiskt när de testas i en out-of-distribution-domän (OOD). Vi antar att det orsakas av genvägar lärande, dvs dessa modeller tenderar att använda de cue ord som är unika för en viss datauppsättning eller domän. För att lindra denna fråga och förbättra GD:s förmåga föreslår vi ett ramverk som bygger på Optimal Transport (OT). Vår metod tvingar nätverket att lära sig de nödvändiga funktionerna för alla ord i inmatningen, vilket lindrar genvägsinlärningsproblemet. Experimentella resultat visar att vår metod förbättrar DG-förmågan för PI-modellerna.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாங்கள் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட பார்ப்ராஸ் அடையாளம் (PI) பிரச்சனையை தேடுகிறோம். நாம் பார்க்கிறோம் ஏற்கனவே இருக்கும் PI மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாடு ஒரு வெளியீட்டிலிருந்து பங்கிடும் தளத்தில் சோதிக் நாம் நினைக்கிறோம் அது குறுக்குவழி கற்றுக் கொண்டு காரணமாகும் என்று, அதாவது, இந்த மாதிரிகள் குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பு அல்லது களத்தி இந்த பிரச்சனையை நீக்க மற்றும் DG தேவையை அதிகரி எங்கள் முறைமை வலைப்பின்னலை தேவையான குணங்களை கற்றுக் கொள்ள முடியும், அது உள்ளீட்டில் உள்ள அனைத்து வார்த்தைகளுக் பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் பிஐ மாதிரிகளுக்கு எங்கள் முறைமையை மேம்படுத்தும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறது.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم ڈومین جینرالیزی (DG) مسئلہ کی تحقیق کررہے ہیں جو پارافریز شناسایی (PI) کے لئے ہے۔ ہم دیکھ رہے ہیں کہ موجود PI موڈل کے عملکرد ڈرامین میں آزمائش کی حالت اضافہ ہوتی ہے۔ ہم سمجھتے ہیں کہ یہ سائٹ سکونٹ کی وجہ سے ہے، یعنی، یہ موڈل کوئ لغات کا استعمال کرنا چاہتے ہیں جو ایک خاص ڈاٹ سٹ یا ڈومین کے لئے مختلف ہیں. اس مسئلہ کو ہلکا کرنے اور DG قابلیت کو بڑھنے کے لئے، ہم ایک PI فرم پیش کریں جو Optimal Transport (OT) پر بنیاد ہے. ہمارا طریقہ نیٹ ورک کو ضروری ویژگی سکھانے کے لئے مجبور کرتا ہے کہ اس میں تمام کلمات کے لئے ضروری ویژگی سکھائی جاتی ہے، جو سائٹ ورٹ سکھانے کے مشکل کو آسان کرتی ہے۔ آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ PI موڈل کے لئے DG قابلیت کو بہتر کر دیتا ہے.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න. අපි බලන්නේ තියෙන්නේ PI මොඩේල් එකේ ප්\u200dරභාව විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා, ප්\u200dරභාවිත විශ්වාස (OOD) ඩොමේන් එකේ පරීක් අපි හිතන්නේ ඒක ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ඉතින්, මේ මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක විශේෂ දත්ත සෙට් නැත්තම් ඩොමේන් එක්ක විශේෂ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය අඩුවෙන්න සහ DG ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩි කරන්න, අපි PI ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අනුවෙන් අන අපේ විධානය සම්බන්ධයෙන් ජාලයේ අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න බලයි, ඒකෙන් ඇතුළත් වචන සම්බන්ධයෙන පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් PI මොඩේල් වලට DG ක්\u200dරියාත', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi điều tra vấn đề nhà truyền thống miền (đời tư) Chúng tôi nhận thấy hiệu quả của các mô hình PI đã xấu đi rất nhiều khi được thử nghiệm trong một miền ngoài (OOOD). Chúng tôi phỏng đoán rằng nó được gây ra bởi việc học đường tắt, tức là, các mô hình này có xu hướng sử dụng các từ cơ bản độc nhất cho một bộ dữ liệu cụ thể. Để làm giảm vấn đề này và nâng cấp khả năng của bộ phận giao thông, chúng tôi đề xuất một bộ phận PI dựa trên giao thông Vĩ đại (OTI). Cách của chúng tôi khiến cái máy biết được những chi tiết cần thiết cho tất cả các từ trong nhà phần nhập, điều đó giúp giải quyết chuyện họp cấ Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi cải thiện khả năng của tập đoàn PI.', 'uz': "Bu takarda biz Paraphrase identifikatsiya (PI) uchun Domen Generalization (DG) muammosini qidirish. Biz mavjud PI modellarining bajarishini aniqlashni ko'rib turamiz. OOD domain (OOD) taʼminlovchi soʻzda o'zgarishni o'zgartiradi. Biz o'ylaymiz, bu tugmalar o'rganish uchun tugmalar birikmasi yoki domen uchun uning so'zlaridan foydalanadi. Bu muammani yoyish va DG qobiliyatini oshirish uchun, biz Optimal Transport (OT) asosida asosida yaratilgan PI freymini sozlashtiramiz. Bizning usuli tarmoqni kiritilgan hamma so'zlarning muhim imkoniyatlarini o'rganish uchun foydalanadi. Bu muammolar o'rganish uchun tugmalar birikmasini yoqish mumkin. Tajriba natijalari esa bizning usuli PI modellarining DG qobiliyatini oshirish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi.", 'bg': 'В тази статия изследваме проблема с генерализацията на домейни (ГД) за надзорно идентифициране на парафрази (PI). Наблюдаваме, че производителността на съществуващите ПИ модели се влошава драстично, когато се тества в домейн извън дистрибуция (ОД). Предполагаме, че това е причинено от бързото обучение, т.е. тези модели са склонни да използват думите, които са уникални за конкретен набор от данни или домейн. За да се облекчи този проблем и да се повиши способността на ГД, предлагаме рамка за ПО, основана на оптималния транспорт. Нашият метод принуждава мрежата да научи необходимите функции за всички думи във входа, което облекчава проблема с прекия път за учене. Експерименталните резултати показват, че методът ни подобрява способността на моделите.', 'da': "I denne artikel undersøger vi problemet Domain Generalization (DG) for supervised Paraphrase Identification (PI). Vi observerer, at ydeevnen af eksisterende PI modeller forringes dramatisk, når de testes i et out-of-distribution (OOD) domæne. Vi formoder, at det skyldes genvejslæring, dvs. disse modeller har tendens til at bruge de cue ord, der er unikke for et bestemt datasæt eller domæne. For at afhjælpe dette spørgsmål og forbedre GD's evne foreslår vi en PI-ramme baseret på Optimal Transport (OT). Vores metode tvinger netværket til at lære de nødvendige funktioner for alle ordene i input, hvilket lindrer genvejslæringsproblemet. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores metode forbedrer DG evnen til PI modellerne.", 'nl': 'In dit artikel onderzoeken we het Domain Generalization (DG) probleem voor supervised Paraphrase Identification (PI). We zien dat de prestaties van bestaande PI modellen drastisch verslechteren wanneer getest in een out-of-distribution (OOD) domein. We veronderstellen dat het wordt veroorzaakt door shortcut learning, dat wil zeggen dat deze modellen de neiging hebben om de cue woorden te gebruiken die uniek zijn voor een bepaalde dataset of domein. Om dit probleem op te lossen en de capaciteit van DG te vergroten, stellen we een PI-kader voor gebaseerd op Optimaal Transport (OT). Onze methode dwingt het netwerk om de nodige functies te leren voor alle woorden in de invoer, wat het snellere leerprobleem verlicht. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode de DG capaciteit voor de PI modellen verbetert.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru istražujemo problem generalizacije domena (DG) za nadzornu identifikaciju parafraze (PI). Provjeravamo da se učinkovitost postojećih PI modela dramatično pogoršava kada se testira u domenu izvan distribucije (OOD). Pretpostavljamo da je to uzrok učenja prečica, tj. ovi modeli koriste znakove koje su jedinstvene za određenu setu podataka ili domenu. Da bismo smanjili ovaj problem i poboljšali sposobnost DG-a, predlažemo okvir PI-a na osnovu Optimalnog Transport (OT). Naša metoda tjera mrežu da nauči neophodne karakteristike za sve riječi u ulazu, što smanjuje problem učenja prečica. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda poboljšava sposobnost DG za PI modele.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir das Domain Generalization (DG) Problem für überwachte Paraphrasen Identifikation (PI). Wir beobachten, dass sich die Performance bestehender PI-Modelle dramatisch verschlechtert, wenn sie in einer Out-of-Distribution (OOD) Domain getestet werden. Wir vermuten, dass es durch Shortcut Learning verursacht wird, d.h. diese Modelle neigen dazu, die Cue-Wörter zu verwenden, die für einen bestimmten Datensatz oder eine bestimmte Domäne einzigartig sind. Um dieses Problem zu lösen und die Fähigkeiten der GD zu verbessern, schlagen wir ein PI-Framework vor, das auf Optimal Transport (OT) basiert. Unsere Methode zwingt das Netzwerk, die notwendigen Funktionen für alle Wörter in der Eingabe zu erlernen, was das Lernproblem mit Shortcuts lindert. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode die DG-Fähigkeit für die PI-Modelle verbessert.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki masalah Generalisasi Domain (DG) untuk Identifikasi Parafrasa (PI) yang diawasi. Kami memperhatikan bahwa prestasi model PI yang ada bertambah buruk dramatis ketika diuji di domain luar distribusi (OOD). We conjecture that it is caused by shortcut learning, i.e., these models tend to utilize the cue words that are unique for a particular dataset or domain.  Untuk mengurangi masalah ini dan meningkatkan kemampuan DG, kami mengusulkan cadangan PI berdasarkan Transportasi Optimal (OT). Metode kami memaksa jaringan untuk belajar ciri-ciri yang diperlukan untuk semua kata-kata dalam input, yang mengurangi masalah belajar pintas. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode kita meningkatkan kemampuan DG untuk model PI.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, üstlenýän Parafraz Kimligi (PI) üçin sahypa bejerilmek üçin sahypa bejerilmesini inceleýäris Öň bar PI modelleriniň eserlerinin bir daşaryk daşarylması (OOD) domaýynda test edildiğinde önemli şekilde düşer. Biz bu nusgalar kısayol öwrenmesi üçin sebäpli bolandygyny tahmin edip otyrýarys. Bu nusgalar özel bir dataset e ya da domena üçin özel bir cue sözlerini ullanyrlar. Bu meseleyi azaltmak we DG ukyplaryny bejermek üçin, Optimal Transport (OT) tarapynda PI çerçevesini teklip edýäris. Biziň täbimiz aňry girdedeki ähli sözler üçin gerekli özellikleri öwrenmesini güýçleýär. Bu shortcut öwrenme meselesini azaltýar. Aramanyň netijeleri PI modelleriň DG ukyplaryny gowuraşdyrýandygyny görkezýär.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunachunguza tatizo la Umoja wa Domain (DG) kwa utambulisho wa Paraphra (PI). Tunaona kwamba utendaji wa mifano ya PI uliopo unabadilika kwa kiasi kikubwa pale unapojaribiwa katika eneo la kutoa usambazaji (OOD). Tunafikiri kuwa inasababishwa na mafunzo ya ufundi, yaani, mifano hii huwa hutumia maneno ya msingi ambayo ni ya kipekee kwa ajili ya seti maalum au ndani. Ili kupunguza suala hili na kuongeza uwezo wa DG, tunapendekeza mfumo wa PI kwa msingi wa usafiri wa Optimal (OT). Tamko letu linalazimisha mtandao kujifunza vipengele vinavyohitajika kwa maneno yote katika input, ambavyo inapunguza tatizo la ufundi wa kujifunza. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa njia yetu inaboresha uwezo wa DG kwa mifano ya PI.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما مشکل ژنرال دامنی (DG) را برای شناسایی پارافریز (PI) تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که عملکرد مدل PI موجود در حال آزمایش در یک دامنه خارج از تقسیم (OOD) به شدت خطرناک می\u200cشود. ما تصور می\u200cکنیم که آن به سبب یادگیری کوتاه\u200cها، یعنی این مدل\u200cها به استفاده از کلمات کوتاه\u200cها که برای یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای خاصی یا دامنه\u200cای متفاوت هستند، باعث می\u200cشود. برای آسان کردن این مسئله و افزایش توانایی DG، یک چهارچوب PI بر اساس انتقال optimal (OT) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. روش ما شبکه را مجبور می کند که ویژه های نیاز را برای تمام کلمات وارد یاد بگیرد، که مشکل یادگیری لنگریز را کم می کند. نتایج تجربه نشان می دهد که روش ما توانایی DG برای مدل PI را بهتر می کند.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne hetojmë problemin e Gjeneralizimit të Domenit (DG) për Identifikimin e Parafrazës të mbikqyrur (PI). Ne vëzhgojmë se paraqitja e modeleve ekzistuese të PI-së përkeqësohet dramatikisht kur testohet në një domeni jashtë shpërndarjes (OOD). Ne mendojmë se është shkaktuar nga mësimi i shkurtër, pra, këto modele kanë tendencë të përdorin fjalët e sinjalit që janë unike për një grup të dhënash ose domeni të veçantë. Për të lehtësuar këtë çështje dhe për të përmirësuar aftësinë e DG-së, ne propozojmë një kuadër PI bazuar në Transportin Optimal (OT). Metoda jonë detyron rrjetin të mësojë karakteristikat e nevojshme për të gjitha fjalët në hyrje, që lehtëson problem in e mësimit të shkurtër. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda jonë përmirëson aftësinë e DG për modelet PI.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ፣ የዶሜን አቀናቅሎት (DG) ጉዳይ የፓርላማ ማውቀት (PI) መፍጠርን እንመርምራለን፡፡ የአሁኑ የPI ዓይነቶች አካባቢ (OOD) ድምፅ በተፈተና ጊዜ በኃይል እንዲያሳፍር እናደርጋለን፡፡ አካባቢ ማስተማር የተደረገ እንደሆነ እናስመስለዋለን፤ እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች በተለየ ዳታተር ወይም ዶሜን የተለየውን ቃላትን ይጠቅማሉ፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለማሻሻል እና የDG ኃይልን ለማበርታት፣ በOptimal Transport (OT) በመሠረት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የPI framework እናሳልጋለን፡፡ የግንኙነት አቋራጭ ጉዳይ ማስተማርን የሚችሉትን ቃላት ሁሉ ለማስተማር ማድረጉን ይችላል፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የጂጂ አካሄዱን ለPI ሞዴላዎችን እንዲያበጅል ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek die Domein Generalisasie (DG) probleem vir ondersoekte Parafrase Identifikasie (PI). Ons bewaar dat die prestasie van bestaande PI modele dramatiese verduur wanneer toets in 'n buite-verspreiding (OOD) domein is. Ons verwerp dat dit veroorsaak word deur kortpad leer, i.e. hierdie modele tendeer om die cue woorde te gebruik wat unieke is vir 'n bepaalde datastel of domein. Om hierdie probleem te verminder en die DG-kapasiteit te verbeter, voorstel ons 'n PI-raamwerk gebaseer op Optimal Transport (OT). Ons metode verkrag die netwerk om die nodige funksies te leer vir al die woorde in die invoer, wat die kortpad leer probleem alleen maak. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons metode die DG-kapasiteit vir die PI-modelle verbeter.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տիեզերքի ընդհանրացման (ԴԳ) խնդիրը վերահսկված պարաֆրազիայի հայտնաբերման (ՊԻ) համար: Մենք նկատում ենք, որ գոյություն ունեցող ՓԻ մոդելների արտադրողությունը խիստ վատթանում է, երբ փորձարկվում է բաշխման դուրս գտնվող ոլորտում: Մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ այն պատճառով է կարճ ճանապարհորդության ուսումնասիրությունը, այսինքն, այս մոդելները հակված են օգտագործել նշանակային բառերը, որոնք յուրահատուկ են որոշակի տվյալների համակարգի կամ տիեզերքի համար: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու և ԴԳ-ի կարողությունները բարելավելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք IP-ի շրջանակ, որը հիմնված է Օպտիմալ տրանֆորմացիայի (ՕՏ) վրա: Our method forces the network to learn the necessary features for all the words in the input, which alleviates the shortcut learning problem.  Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը բարելավում է IP մոդելների ԴԳ-ի կարողությունը:', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, gözlənilmiş Parafraz Kimlik (PI) üçün Domain Generalization (DG) problemini incidirik. Biz həmin PI modellərin performansı, dağıtılmaz (OOD) domeində imtahana çəkildikdə dramatik olaraq dəhşətli düşər. Biz onu qısqa yol öyrənməsi təsəvvür etdiyini zənn edirik, yoxsa bu modellər təsəvvür verilən qovluğu ya da domain üçün təsəvvür olan cue sözlərini istifadə edirlər. Bu məsələni yüngülləşdirmək və DG yetkinliğini artırmaq üçün optimal Transport (OT) vasitəsilə təklif edirik. Bizim yolumuz şəbəkə girdikdə olan bütün sözlərin ehtiyacı olanları öyrənməsinə mane edir ki, qısqa yol öyrənməsi problemini azaldır. Experimental sonuçlarımız PI modellərin DG yetkinliğini yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ডোমেইন জেনারেলেশন (ডিজি) সমস্যার তদন্ত করছি প্যারাফ্রাসের পরিচয়পত্র (পিআই)। আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে বিদ্যমান পিআই মডেলের কার্যকলাপ নিজেদের প্রদর্শনের ক্ষেত্রে ন্যায়ারিকভাবে ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হয়ে যায় যখন এক আমরা ধারণা করছি যে এটি কার্ট শিক্ষা দ্বারা সংক্ষিপ্ত শব্দ ব্যবহার করে, যেমন এই মডেলগুলো বিশেষ ডাটাসেট বা ডোমেইনের জন্য ব্যবহার করে। এই বিষয়টি কমিয়ে দেওয়া এবং ডিজি ক্ষমতা বৃদ্ধি করার জন্য আমরা অটোটিমাল ট্রান্সপোর্টের উপর ভিত্তিক একটি পিআই ফ্রেমার্ক আমাদের পদ্ধতি এই নেটওয়ার্কের বাধ্য করে ইনপুটের সমস্ত শব্দের জন্য প্রয়োজনীয় বৈশিষ্ট্য শিখতে বাধ্য করে, যা শিক্ষার সমস্যা পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি পিআই মডেলের জন্য ডিজি ক্ষমতা উন্নত করে।', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru istražujemo problem generalizacije domena (DG) za nadzornu identifikaciju parafraze (PI). Primećujemo da se provedba postojećih PI modela dramatično pogoršava kada se testira u domenu izvan distribucije (OOD). Pretpostavljamo da je uzrok učenja prečica, tj. ovi modeli koriste znakove koje su jedinstvene za određenu setu podataka ili domenu. Da bismo ublažili ovaj problem i poboljšali sposobnost DG, predlažemo okvir PI na osnovu Optimalnog transporta (OT). Naša metoda tjera mrežu da nauči neophodne karakteristike za sve riječi u ulazu, što olakšava problem učenja prečica. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda poboljšava sposobnost DG za PI modele.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou generalizace domén (DG) pro identifikaci parafrází (PI). Pozorujeme, že výkon stávajících PI modelů se dramaticky zhoršuje při testování v doméně mimo distribuci (OOD). Domníváme se, že je to způsobeno zkratkovým učením, tj. tyto modely mají tendenci využívat nápovědná slova, která jsou unikátní pro konkrétní datovou sadu nebo doménu. Pro zmírnění tohoto problému a zlepšení schopnosti GŘ navrhujeme rámec PI založený na optimální dopravě (OT). Naše metoda nutí síť, aby se naučila potřebné funkce pro všechna slova ve vstupu, což zmírňuje problém zkratkového učení. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že naše metoda zlepšuje schopnost DG pro PI modely.', 'ca': "En aquest article investigam el problema de la Generalització de Dominis (DG) per la Identificació de Paràfrases supervisada (PI). Observem que el rendiment dels models PI existents es deteriora dramàticament quan es testen en un domini fora de distribució. Suposem que està causat per l'aprenentatge d'atallos, és a dir, aquests models tendeixen a utilitzar les paraules indicadores que són únices per un conjunt de dades o domini concret. To alleviate this issue and enhance the DG ability, we propose a PI framework based on Optimal Transport (OT).  El nostre mètode obliga la xarxa a aprendre les característiques necessàries per a totes les paraules de la entrada, que alivia el problema d'aprenentatge d'atallos. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre mètode millora l'habilitat de la DG dels models de PI.", 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 해석 해석(PI)을 감독하는 분야범화(DG) 문제를 연구했다.분포외(OOD) 도메인에서 테스트할 때 기존 PI 모델의 성능이 급격히 악화하는 것을 관찰했다.우리는 이것이 단축 학습으로 인해 일어난 것이라고 추측한다. 즉, 이러한 모델은 특정한 데이터 집합이나 영역에 대한 유일한 제시어를 사용하는 경향이 있다.이를 완화하고 분산발전 능력을 높이기 위해 최상의 운송(OT) 기반 PI 프레임워크를 제시했다.우리의 방법은 인터넷 학습 입력 중의 모든 단어의 필요 특징을 강요하여 빠른 학습 문제를 완화시켰다.실험 결과 이 방법이 PI 모델의 분산 발전 능력을 향상시켰다는 것이 밝혀졌다.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme Domain Generalization (DG) -ongelmaa valvotulle parafraasitunnistukselle (PI). Havaitsemme, että olemassa olevien PI-mallien suorituskyky heikkenee dramaattisesti testattaessa out-of-distribution (OOD) -alueella. Arvelemme, että se johtuu pikaoppimisesta, eli näissä malleissa käytetään yleensä vihjeiden sanoja, jotka ovat ainutlaatuisia tietylle aineistolle tai toimialueelle. Tämän ongelman lieventämiseksi ja pääosaston valmiuksien parantamiseksi ehdotamme optimaaliseen liikenteeseen perustuvaa PI-kehystä. Menetelmämme pakottaa verkon oppimaan tarvittavat ominaisuudet kaikille syötteen sanoille, mikä helpottaa oikotien oppimisongelmaa. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme parantaa PI-mallien DG-kykyä.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uurime domeeni generaliseerimise (DG) probleemi järelevalvestatud parafraasi identifitseerimise (PI) jaoks. Me täheldame, et olemasolevate PI mudelite jõudlus halveneb dramaatiliselt, kui testitakse väljaspool jaotust (OOD). Eeldame, et see on põhjustatud kiirõppest, st need mudelid kipuvad kasutama vihjesõnu, mis on konkreetse andmekogumi või domeeni jaoks unikaalsed. Selle probleemi leevendamiseks ja peadirektoraadi suutlikkuse suurendamiseks teeme ettepaneku optimaalsel transpordil põhineva PI raamistiku kohta. Meie meetod sunnib võrku õppima vajalikke funktsioone kõigi sisendis olevate sõnade jaoks, mis leevendab otseõppe probleemi. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod parandab PI mudelite DG võimet.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã tambayi mataimaki na Domen General (DG) wa Yaganiya na Parafrase (PI). Tuna ganin cewa cikakken misãlai da ke cikin shirin PI ya ci, yana fizge taƙaitacce idan an jarraba cikin wata rabo-daban (OOD). Tuna zaton, za'a shafe shi da zane-zane-zane-zane, misali, waɗannan misalin za su yi amfani da maganar kwamfyuta wanda ba su zama masu buƙata ba ga wani tsari ko kuma don a samun. Dõmin ka sauƙa ƙara wannan masu al'amarin, kuma Mu ƙara awon DG, za'a buƙata wani firam na PI a kan hanya na Optical Transort (OT). Kayan hanyoyinmu yana ƙara shirin ka sanar da tsarin da ake ƙayyade wa duk kalmõmi cikin inputan, da kuma yana kasancẽwa ga masu ƙaranci da za'a sani. Matarin jarrabai ke nũna cewa metodenmu yana ƙara awon DG wa misalin PI.", 'sk': 'V tem prispevku raziskujemo problem generalizacije domen (DG) za nadzorovano identifikacijo parafraz (PI). Ugotavljamo, da se zmogljivost obstoječih PI modelov dramatično poslabša pri testiranju v domeni zunaj distribucije (OOD). Domnevamo, da je to posledica bližnjičnega učenja, tj. ti modeli običajno uporabljajo besede, ki so edinstvene za določen nabor podatkov ali domeno. Za ublažitev tega vprašanja in povečanje zmogljivosti GD predlagamo okvir PI, ki temelji na optimalnem prometu. Naša metoda prisili mrežo, da se nauči potrebnih funkcij za vse besede v vnosu, kar olajša težavo z učenjem bližnjice. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naša metoda izboljša zmožnost DG za modele PI.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་དུས་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་ཆ་མེད་ཅིག་དང་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We observe that the performance of existing PI models deteriorates dramatically when tested in an out-of-distribution (OOD) domain. We conjecture that it is caused by shortcut learning, i.e., these models tend to utilize the cue words that are unique for a particular dataset or domain. To alleviate this issue and enhance the DG ability, we propose a PI framework based on Optimal Transport (OT). Our method forces the network to learn the necessary features for all the words in the input, which alleviates the shortcut learning problem. Experimental Results show that our method improves the DG ability for the PI models.', 'jv': 'Nan pemilit iki, kita sislah ngecat perusahaan domain Generalization (DG) nggawe ParaFraz ID (PI). We see that the success of current PI modeles detected Dramatically when testied in an out-of-Distribution (OOC) domain. We conject that it is likely that it is generated by shortcut Learning, i.e. modells this have to use the dial words that are unique for a special dataset or domain. Ngawe ngubah ngejarang iki sak lan bantuan kanggo bantuan kanggo ngilangno DG, kita gunakake PI barêng sing basa nang Optial Trangkat (OC). Awakdone Perintah sing paling nggambar uwong kelas kuwi nggawe Perintah kanggo ngerasai kapan DG kanggo model PI.', 'he': "בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים את בעיית הגנרליזציה של דומין (DG) לזהות פראפרזיה (PI). אנו רואים שהביצועים של דוגמני PI קיימים מתחמררים דרמטית כשנבחנים בתחום מחוץ לפיתוח (OOD). We conjecture that it is caused by shortcut learning, i.e., these models tend to utilize the cue words that are unique for a particular dataset or domain.  To alleviate this issue and enhance the DG ability, we propose a PI framework based on Optimal Transport (OT).  השיטה שלנו מכריחה את הרשת ללמוד את המאפיינים הכרחיים לכל המילים בתכנית, מה שמקל על בעיית הלימודים בקצרים. תוצאות ניסויים מראות ששיטתנו משפר את היכולת של הדיג'י לדוגמנים."}
{'en': 'How to Obtain Reliable Labels for MBTI Classification from Texts?', 'ar': 'كيفية الحصول على تسميات موثوقة لتصنيف MBTI من النصوص؟', 'fr': 'Comment obtenir des étiquettes fiables pour la classification MBTI à partir de textes\xa0?', 'es': '¿Cómo obtener etiquetas fiables para la clasificación MBTI a partir de textos?', 'pt': 'Como obter etiquetas confiáveis para classificação MBTI a partir de textos?', 'ja': 'テキストからMBTI分類の信頼できるラベルを取得するにはどうすればよいですか？', 'ru': 'Как получить надежные ярлыки для классификации MBTI из текстов?', 'zh': '何以得文本MBTI分类者可表?', 'hi': 'ग्रंथों से MBTI वर्गीकरण के लिए विश्वसनीय लेबल कैसे प्राप्त करें?', 'ga': 'Conas Lipéid Iontaofa a Fháil ó Théacsanna le haghaidh Aicmiú MBTI?', 'hu': 'Hogyan lehet megbízható címkéket szerezni az MBTI osztályozáshoz a szövegekből?', 'el': 'Πώς να αποκτήσετε αξιόπιστες ετικέτες για ταξινόμηση από κείμενα;', 'ka': 'როგორ შეიძლება შეიძლება შესაძლებელი ტექსტიდან MBTI კლასიფიკაციას?', 'kk': 'Мәтіндерден MBTI классификациясы үшін сенімді жарлықтарды қалай алу керек?', 'lt': 'Kaip iš tekstų gauti patikimus MBTI klasifikavimo ženklus?', 'it': 'Come ottenere etichette affidabili per la classificazione MBTI dai testi?', 'mk': 'Како да се добијат доверливи етикети за MBTI класификација од текстови?', 'ms': 'Bagaimana mendapatkan Label yang boleh dipercayai untuk Klasifikasi MBTI dari Teks?', 'mt': 'Kif tinkiseb Tikketti affidabbli għall-Klassifikazzjoni MBTI mit-Testi?', 'ml': 'എബ്ടിഎം ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിശ്വസിക്കാവുന്ന ലേബലുകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെ സംരക്ഷിക്കും?', 'mn': 'МБТИ-ийн текстүүдийн хуваалцааны тухай итгэлтэй маркилгуудыг хэрхэн алдах вэ?', 'no': 'Korleis du får tilhøyrande etikettar for MBTI- klassifikasjon frå tekstar?', 'pl': 'Jak uzyskać wiarygodne etykiety do klasyfikacji MBTI z tekstów?', 'sr': 'Kako da uzmemo poverljive etikete za klasifikaciju MBTI iz teksta?', 'ro': 'Cum să obțineți etichete fiabile pentru clasificarea MBTI din texte?', 'si': 'කොහොමද MBTI ක්ලාසිෆිකේෂන් වලින් විශ්වාසිත ලේබල් අල්ලගන්න?', 'so': 'Sidee looga soo qaadan karaa calaamadaha ku rajaynaya MBTI-fasalka Textyada?', 'sv': 'Hur får man tillförlitliga etiketter för MBTI klassificering från texter?', 'ta': 'MBTI வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு எப்படி உரைகளிலிருந்து சிட்டிகளை பொருத்த வேண்டும்?', 'ur': 'کیسے MBTI کلاسیفٹ کے لئے قابل اعتبار لیبل حاصل کرنا ہے؟', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Làm thế nào để lấy những nhãn chắc chắn cho hạng bằng MB ra khỏi Chữ?', 'bg': 'Как да получите надеждни етикети за класификация от текстове?', 'da': 'Hvordan får man pålidelige etiketter til MBTI klassificering fra tekster?', 'hr': 'Kako dobiti pouzdane etikete za klasifikaciju MBTI iz teksta?', 'nl': 'Hoe verkrijg je betrouwbare etiketten voor MBTI-classificatie van teksten?', 'de': 'Wie erhält man zuverlässige Etiketten für die MBTI-Klassifizierung aus Texten?', 'id': 'Bagaimana mendapatkan Label yang dapat dipercaya untuk Klasifikasi MBTI dari Teks?', 'ko': '텍스트에서 신뢰할 수 있는 MBTI 분류 레이블을 얻으려면 어떻게 해야 합니까?', 'fa': 'چطور برچسب\u200cهای قابل اعتماد برای کلاس\u200cشناسی MBTI از متن\u200cها را بگیرید؟', 'tr': 'MBTI Metinden Sözlemek üçin Jaýyk Etiketleri nädip almaly?', 'sw': 'Inawezaje kutumia mabango yenye kuaminika kwa Makala ya MBTI kutoka Makala?', 'af': 'Hoe om Reliable Labels vir MBTI Klassifikasie van Teks te ontvang?', 'sq': 'Si të marrësh etiketa të besueshme për klasifikimin MBTI nga tekstet?', 'az': 'Mətnlərdən MBTI Klasifikasiyası üçün bağlı etiketlər necə alınmaq?', 'bn': 'এমবিটি ক্লাসিকেশনের জন্য বিশ্বাসযোগ্য লেবেল কিভাবে টেক্সট থেকে?', 'am': 'የጽሑፉ ማቀናጃ እንዴት ይችላል?', 'hy': 'Ինչպե՞ս ստանալ MBTI-ի դասակարգման վստահելի պիտակներ տեքստներից:', 'bs': 'Kako dobiti poverljive etikete za klasifikaciju MBTI iz teksta?', 'ca': 'Com obtenir etiquetes fiables per a la classificació MBTI dels textos?', 'cs': 'Jak získat spolehlivé štítky pro klasifikaci MBTI z textů?', 'et': 'Kuidas saada tekstidest usaldusväärseid märgiseid MBTI klassifitseerimiseks?', 'fi': 'Miten saada luotettavat merkinnät MBTI luokitukseen teksteistä?', 'jv': 'Kiye iso ngebah Label Relianble kanggo kelas MBTI Kemerdekaan Teks ?', 'he': 'איך להשיג טביעות אמיתיות לסימון MBTI מתוך טקסטים?', 'ha': '@ label: listbox', 'sk': 'Kako pridobiti zanesljive oznake za razvrstitev MBTI iz besedil?', 'bo': 'MBTI་ཡི་གེའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་མཐུན་རུང་བའི་ཤོག་བྱང་ལ་ཇི་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས་སམ'}
{'en': 'Automatic detection of the Myers-Briggs Type Indicator (MBTI) from short posts attracted noticeable attention in the last few years. Recent studies showed that this is quite a difficult task, especially on commonly used Twitter data. Obtaining MBTI labels is also difficult, as human annotation requires trained psychologists, and automatic way of obtaining them is through long questionnaires of questionable usability for the task. In this paper, we present a method for collecting reliable MBTI labels via only four carefully selected questions that can be applied to any type of textual data.', 'es': 'La detección automática del indicador de tipo Myers-Briggs (MBTI) en postes cortos atrajo una atención notable en los últimos años. Estudios recientes han demostrado que esta es una tarea bastante difícil, especialmente en los datos de Twitter de uso común. Obtener etiquetas MBTI también es difícil, ya que la anotación humana requiere psicólogos capacitados, y la forma automática de obtenerlas es a través de cuestionarios largos de dudosa usabilidad para la tarea. En este artículo, presentamos un método para recopilar etiquetas MBTI confiables a través de solo cuatro preguntas cuidadosamente seleccionadas que se pueden aplicar a cualquier tipo de datos textuales.', 'pt': 'A detecção automática do Indicador de Tipo Myers-Briggs (MBTI) a partir de postagens curtas atraiu atenção notável nos últimos anos. Estudos recentes mostraram que esta é uma tarefa bastante difícil, especialmente em dados do Twitter comumente usados. A obtenção de rótulos MBTI também é difícil, pois a anotação humana requer psicólogos treinados, e a forma automática de obtê-los é por meio de longos questionários de usabilidade questionável para a tarefa. Neste artigo, apresentamos um método para coletar rótulos MBTI confiáveis por meio de apenas quatro perguntas cuidadosamente selecionadas que podem ser aplicadas a qualquer tipo de dados textuais.', 'ar': 'جذب الاكتشاف التلقائي لمؤشر نوع Myers-Briggs (MBTI) من المشاركات القصيرة اهتمامًا ملحوظًا في السنوات القليلة الماضية. أظهرت الدراسات الحديثة أن هذه مهمة صعبة للغاية ، خاصة فيما يتعلق ببيانات Twitter شائعة الاستخدام. يعد الحصول على تسميات MBTI أمرًا صعبًا أيضًا ، حيث تتطلب التعليقات التوضيحية البشرية وجود علماء نفس مدربين ، والطريقة التلقائية للحصول عليها هي من خلال الاستبيانات الطويلة المشكوك في قابليتها للاستخدام للمهمة. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم طريقة لتجميع ملصقات MBTI موثوقة عبر أربعة أسئلة مختارة بعناية فقط يمكن تطبيقها على أي نوع من البيانات النصية.', 'fr': "La détection automatique de l'indicateur de type Myers-Briggs (MBTI) à partir de poteaux courts a attiré l'attention ces dernières années. Des études récentes ont montré que c'est une tâche assez difficile, en particulier pour les données Twitter couramment utilisées. L'obtention d'étiquettes MBTI est également difficile, car l'annotation humaine nécessite des psychologues formés, et le moyen automatique de les obtenir consiste à utiliser de longs questionnaires dont la convivialité est douteuse pour la tâche. Dans cet article, nous présentons une méthode pour collecter des étiquettes MBTI fiables via seulement quatre questions soigneusement sélectionnées qui peuvent être appliquées à tout type de données textuelles.", 'zh': '往数年中,自动检测Myers-Briggs于短柱指示器(MBTI)人。 近者研明,此一事之剧务,特在常用Twitter数。 得MBTI标签亦难,以人伦注须训练之心理学家,而得其自效以久问卷调查,问其可用性。 凡此四者,MBTI标之法,可施于数。', 'ja': '短い投稿からのMyers - Briggsタイプインジケータ（ MBTI ）の自動検出は、過去数年間で注目を集めました。最近の研究では、特に一般的に使用されているTwitterデータでは、これはかなり難しい課題であることが示されました。人間の注釈には訓練された心理学者が必要であり、自動的にそれらを入手する方法は、タスクのための疑わしい有用性の長いアンケートを通じてであるため、MBTIラベルを入手することも困難である。本稿では、あらゆる種類のテキストデータに適用可能な4つの厳選された質問のみを介して信頼できるMBTIラベルを収集する方法を提示する。', 'ru': 'Автоматическое обнаружение индикатора типа Майерса-Бриггса (MBTI) с коротких постов привлекло заметное внимание в последние несколько лет. Недавние исследования показали, что это довольно сложная задача, особенно на часто используемых данных Twitter. Получение меток MBTI также затруднено, так как аннотация человека требует подготовленных психологов, а автоматический способ их получения - через длинные опросники сомнительной пригодности для выполнения задачи. В этой статье мы представляем метод сбора надежных меток MBTI с помощью только четырех тщательно отобранных вопросов, которые могут быть применены к любому типу текстовых данных.', 'hi': 'लघु पदों से मायर्स-ब्रिग्स टाइप इंडिकेटर (MBTI) का स्वचालित पता लगाने ने पिछले कुछ वर्षों में ध्यान देने योग्य ध्यान आकर्षित किया। हाल के अध्ययनों से पता चला है कि यह काफी मुश्किल काम है, खासकर आमतौर पर इस्तेमाल किए जाने वाले ट्विटर डेटा पर। MBTI लेबल प्राप्त करना भी मुश्किल है, क्योंकि मानव एनोटेशन के लिए प्रशिक्षित मनोवैज्ञानिकों की आवश्यकता होती है, और उन्हें प्राप्त करने का स्वचालित तरीका कार्य के लिए संदिग्ध प्रयोज्य की लंबी प्रश्नावली के माध्यम से होता है। इस पेपर में, हम केवल चार सावधानीपूर्वक चयनित प्रश्नों के माध्यम से विश्वसनीय एमबीटीआई लेबल एकत्र करने के लिए एक विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं जिन्हें किसी भी प्रकार के टेक्स्ट डेटा पर लागू किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas, tarraingíodh aird shuntasach ar bhrath uathoibríoch Tháscaire Cineál Myers-Briggs (MBTI) ó phoist ghearr. Léirigh staidéir le déanaí gur tasc deacair go leor é seo, go háirithe ar shonraí Twitter a úsáidtear go coitianta. Tá sé deacair freisin lipéid MBTI a fháil, toisc go dteastaíonn síceolaithe oilte le haghaidh nótaí daonna, agus is é an bealach uathoibríoch chun iad a fháil ná ceistneoirí fada inúsáidteachta amhrasacha don tasc. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair modh chun lipéid iontaofa MBTI a bhailiú trí cheithre cheist a roghnaítear go cúramach agus is féidir a chur i bhfeidhm ar aon chineál sonraí téacsúla.', 'hu': 'A Myers-Briggs típusjelző (MBTI) automatikus felismerése rövid oszlopokból érezhető figyelmet keltett az elmúlt években. A legutóbbi tanulmányok azt mutatták, hogy ez meglehetősen nehéz feladat, különösen a gyakran használt Twitter adatokon. Az MBTI címkék beszerzése is nehéz, mivel az emberi jegyzetek képzett pszichológusokra van szükség, és automatikus módja annak, hogy megszerezzük őket hosszú kérdőíveken keresztül, amelyek megkérdőjelezhetők a feladatra. Ebben a tanulmányban a megbízható MBTI címkék gyűjtésének módszerét mutatjuk be mindössze négy gondosan kiválasztott kérdéssel, amelyek bármilyen típusú szöveges adatra alkalmazhatók.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη ανίχνευση του δείκτη τύπου από σύντομες θέσεις προσέλκυσε αισθητή προσοχή τα τελευταία χρόνια. Πρόσφατες μελέτες έδειξαν ότι αυτό είναι αρκετά δύσκολο έργο, ειδικά σε κοινά χρησιμοποιούμενα δεδομένα του Twitter. Η απόκτηση ετικετών είναι επίσης δύσκολη, καθώς η ανθρώπινη σχολιασμός απαιτεί εκπαιδευμένους ψυχολόγους και ο αυτόματος τρόπος απόκτησης τους είναι μέσω μακρών ερωτηματολογίων αμφισβητήσιμης χρηστικότητας για το έργο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο συλλογής αξιόπιστων ετικετών μέσω τεσσάρων προσεκτικά επιλεγμένων ερωτημάτων που μπορούν να εφαρμοστούν σε οποιοδήποτε τύπο κειμένων.', 'ka': 'Myers-Briggs ტიპის ინდექტორის (MBTI) ავტომატიკური განახლება შემდეგ ბოლო წლის შემდეგ აღმოჩენებელი ინდექტორის შესახებ. შემდეგ კვლევები გაჩვენეთ, რომ ეს ძალიან რთულია რაოდენობა, განსაკუთრებით გამოყენებული Twitter მონაცემებზე. MBTI ლებილეტების მიღება ასევე რთულია, რადგან ადამიანის ანოტაციას უნდა მოსწავლობა ფსიკოლოგები, და ავტომატიური გზა, რომ მიღება მათ იქნება ძალიან კითხვა საკითხვა საკითხვა მოსა ამ წიგნიში ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ სხვა ტიპის ტექსტულ მონაცემებისთვის მხოლოდ ოთხი მხოლოდ მონიშნული კითხვების გამოყენება მეტი.', 'it': "Il rilevamento automatico dell'indicatore di tipo Myers-Briggs (MBTI) da postazioni corte ha attirato notevole attenzione negli ultimi anni. Studi recenti hanno dimostrato che questo è un compito piuttosto difficile, soprattutto sui dati Twitter comunemente utilizzati. Ottenere le etichette MBTI è anche difficile, in quanto l'annotazione umana richiede psicologi qualificati, e il modo automatico di ottenerle è attraverso lunghi questionari di discutibile usabilità per il compito. In questo articolo presentiamo un metodo per raccogliere etichette MBTI affidabili attraverso solo quattro domande accuratamente selezionate che possono essere applicate a qualsiasi tipo di dati testuali.", 'lt': 'Per pastaruosius kelerius metus pastebimas dėmesys buvo skiriamas automatiniam Myers-Briggs tipo rodiklio (MBTI) nustatymui iš trumpų pareigūnų. Neseniai atlikti tyrimai parodė, kad tai gana sudėtinga užduotis, ypač dažnai naudojamų Twitter duomenų atžvilgiu. Taip pat sunku gauti MBTI etiketes, nes žmogaus anotacija reikalauja apmokytų psichologų, o automatinis jų gavimo būdas – per ilgus klausimynus, kuriuose kyla abejonių dėl užduoties naudojimo. Šiame dokumente pristatome patikimų MBTI etikečių rinkimo metodą tik per keturis atidžiai atrinktus klausimus, kurie gali būti taikomi bet kokiam tekstinių duomenų tipui.', 'mk': 'Automatic detection of the Myers-Briggs Type Indicator (MBTI) from short posts attracted noticeable attention in the last few years.  Неодамнешните студии покажаа дека ова е доста тешка задача, особено на обично користени Твитер податоци. Добивањето на MBTI-етикети е, исто така, тешко, бидејќи човечката анотација бара обучени психолози, а автоматски начин да се добијат тие е преку долги прашалници со сомневачка употребливост за задачата. Во овој весник претставуваме метод за собирање на доверливи МБТИ етикети преку само четири внимателно избрани прашања кои може да се применат на било кој вид на текстуални податоци.', 'kk': 'Myers- Briggs түрі индикаторын (MBTI) қысқа жерлерден автоматты түрде анықтау соңғы бірнеше жыл бойынша көрінетін нақты көрсетіледі. Жуырдағы зерттеулердің бұл көпшілік тапсырма дегенді көрсетті, осылай-ақ көпшілікті Twitter деректерінде. MBTI жарлықтарын қабылдау қиын болды, өйткені адамдардың жарлықтары оқылған психологтарды талап етеді, және оларды автоматты түрде алу жолы тапсырма үшін сұрақ қолдануға мүмкін емес. Бұл қағазда сенімді MBTI жарлықтарын тексті мәтін деректеріне қолданатын төрт сұрақтар арқылы жинақтау әдісін таңдаймыз.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan automatik Penunjuk Jenis Myers-Briggs (MBTI) dari pos pendek menarik perhatian yang dapat dilihat dalam beberapa tahun terakhir. kajian baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahawa ini adalah tugas yang sukar, terutama pada data Twitter yang biasa digunakan. Mendapatkan label MBTI juga sukar, kerana annotasi manusia memerlukan ahli psikolog terlatih, dan cara automatik untuk mendapatkan mereka adalah melalui soalan panjang yang boleh digunakan untuk tugas. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan kaedah untuk mengumpulkan label MBTI yang boleh dipercayai melalui hanya empat soalan yang dipilih dengan hati-hati yang boleh dilaksanakan kepada mana-mana jenis data teks.', 'ml': 'കഴിഞ്ഞ കുറച്ചു വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്ന് മൈര്\u200dസ്- ബ്രിഗ്സ് ടൈപ്പ് ഇന്\u200dഡിക്ടറിന്റെ സ്വയം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന് ശ്രദ്ധ കാണ അടുത്ത വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം കാണിച്ചത് ഇത് വളരെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടാണെന്നാണ്, പ്രത്യേകിച്ചും ടൂട്ടറിലെ വിവ എബ്ടിഐ ലേബിളുകള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നത് വളരെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടാണ്. മനുഷ്യന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലനിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മൈക്കോളജിസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d ആവശ്യമ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, വിശ്വസ്തനായ എബ്ടിഐ ലേബലുകള്\u200d ശേഖരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നാം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ഏതു തരം ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ', 'mt': 'L-individwazzjoni awtomatika tal-Indikatur tat-Tip Myers-Briggs (MBTI) minn karigi qosra ġibdet attenzjoni notevoli fl-aħħar ftit snin. Studji reċenti wrew li dan huwa kompitu pjuttost diffiċli, speċjalment fuq dejta Twitter użata b’mod komuni. Huwa diffiċli wkoll li jinkisbu tikketti MBTI, peress li l-annotazzjoni umana teħtieġ psikologi mħarrġa, u l-mod awtomatiku kif jinkisbu huwa permezz ta’ kwestjonarji twal ta’ użu dubjuż għall-kompitu. F’dan id-dokument, nippreżentaw metodu għall-ġbir ta’ tikketti MBTI affidabbli permezz ta’ erba’ mistoqsijiet magħżula bir-reqqa biss li jistgħu jiġu applikati għal kwalunkwe tip ta’ dejta testwali.', 'mn': 'Майерс-Бригс төрлийн индикаторыг (MBTI) богино захиргаанаас автоматаар мэдэх нь сүүлийн хэдэн жилийн дотор анхаарал татаж байсан. Сүүлийн судалгаанд энэ нь маш хэцүү ажил гэдгийг харуулсан. Ялангуяа ихэвчлэн Twitter өгөгдлийн талаар ашигладаг. МБТЭ-ийн жагсаалтыг авч үзэх нь мөн хэцүү. Яагаад гэвэл хүн төрөлхтний жагсаалт сургалтын сэтгэл зүйчдийн шаардлагатай. Тэднийг автоматжуулах арга нь ажлын тулд асуулт асуух боломжтой байх асуулт асуу Энэ цаасан дээр бид итгэлтэй МБТИ etiketүүдийг бүрдүүлэх арга зам өгсөн бүх төрлийн мэдээллээр хэрэглэгдэж болох дөрвөн ухаантай сонгогдсон асуултуудын аргаар илэрхийлж байна.', 'ro': 'Detectarea automată a indicatorului de tip Myers-Briggs (MBTI) din posturi scurte a atras atenția vizibilă în ultimii ani. Studiile recente au arătat că aceasta este o sarcină destul de dificilă, în special pe datele Twitter utilizate în mod obișnuit. Obținerea etichetelor MBTI este, de asemenea, dificilă, deoarece adnotarea umană necesită psihologi instruiți, iar modalitatea automată de a le obține este prin chestionare lungi de utilizare discutabilă pentru sarcină. În această lucrare, prezentăm o metodă de colectare a etichetelor MBTI fiabile prin intermediul a patru întrebări atent selectate care pot fi aplicate oricărui tip de date textuale.', 'no': 'Automatisk oppdaging av Myers- Briggs- typindikatoren (MBTI) frå korte postar har attributt merkelig oppmerksomhet i dei siste få år. Nyleg brukte studiar viste at dette er ganske vanskeleg oppgåve, spesielt på vanleg brukte Twitter-data. Det er også vanskeleg å få MBTI-etikettar, sidan menneskelige annotasjon krev opplærte psykolog, og automatisk måte å få dei er gjennom lang spørsmål om spørsmålbare brukarverktøy for oppgåva. I denne papiret viser vi ein metode for å samla tilgjengelege MBTI-etikettar med berre fire forsiktig valde spørsmål som kan brukast på alle typar tekstdata.', 'sr': 'Automatski otkrivanje indikatora tipa Myers-Briggs (MBTI) iz kratkog položaja privlačilo je primjetnu pažnju u poslednjih nekoliko godina. Nedavno ispitivanje pokazalo je da je ovo prilično težak zadatak, posebno na podacima o često korištenim Twitter-om. Uzimanje etiketa MBTI je takođe teško, jer ljudska annotacija zahteva obučene psihologe, a automatski način da ih dobijete je kroz duge ispitivanja sumnjive korištenosti zadatka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo metodu za skupljanje pouzdanih etiketa MBTI putem samo četiri pažljivo izabrane pitanja koje se mogu primjenjivati na bilo kakve vrste tekstualnih podataka.', 'si': 'මයියර්ස්-බ්\u200dරිග්ස් වර්ගය සංකේතකය (MBTI) ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදිහට පසුගින් අවුරුදු කිහිපයක් වලින් ස්වයංක්\u200dර අලුත් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මේක ගොඩක් අමාරුයි වැඩක්, විශේෂයෙන්ම සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට ට්විට MBTI ලේබල් අවස්ථාවන් අමාරුයි, මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වගේම, ඒ වගේම ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක මේ පත්තරේ අපි විශ්වාසිත MBTI ලේබල් එක්කන්න විධානයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්න හතරක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළ', 'so': "Qoraayinka gaaban ee Myers-Briggs Type Indicator (MBTI) waxaa laga yaabaa inuu aad u taxadiijiyo dhawr sano ee ugu dambeeyey. Waxbarashada soo dhowaaday waxay muuqatay in arimahan aad u adag tahay, khusuusan inta badan isticmaalaya macluumaadka Twitterka. Obtaining MBTI labels is also difficult, as human annotation requires trained psychologists, and automatic way of obtaining them is through long questionnaires of questionable usability for the task.  Warqadan ayaannu ku soo bandhignaa qaab ku soo ururinta calaamadaha MBTI ee lagu aamin karo oo kaliya afar su'aalood oo si taxadar leh loo doortay oo lagu codsan karo macluumaad kasta oo qoraal ah.", 'sv': 'Automatisk detektering av Myers-Briggs typindikator (MBTI) från korta poster väckte märkbar uppmärksamhet under de senaste åren. Nyligen genomförda studier visade att detta är en ganska svår uppgift, särskilt på vanliga Twitter-data. Det är också svårt att få fram MBTI-etiketter, eftersom mänskliga anteckningar kräver utbildade psykologer, och automatiskt sätt att få dem är genom långa frågeformulär av tvivelaktig användbarhet för uppgiften. I denna uppsats presenterar vi en metod för att samla in tillförlitliga MBTI-etiketter via endast fyra noggrant utvalda frågor som kan tillämpas på alla typer av textdata.', 'ta': 'மையர்- பிரிக்ஸ் வகை காட்டியை தானாகவே கண்டறிதல் (MBTI) கடந்த சில வருடங்களில் இருந்து சுருக்கிய புத்தகங்களில் கவனிப்புடன் கவனம சமீபத்தில் படிப்புகள் இது மிகவும் கடினமான செயல் என்று காண்பித்தது, குறிப்பாக தொடர் தரவுகளை பயன்படுத்தி MBTI சிட்டைகளை பெறுவது மிகவும் கடினமானது, ஏனென்றால் மனித அறிவிப்பு பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட மனநிலைநோயாளர்கள் தேவைப்படுகிறது, மற்றும் தானாகவே அவர் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு முறையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் நம்பிக்கைக்கும் MBTI சிட்டைகளை சேகரிக்க மட்டுமே நான்கு கவனமாக தேர்ந்த', 'ur': 'Myers-Briggs Type Indicator (MBTI) کو چھوٹے پوسٹوں سے پہلے چند سالوں میں اچھی طرح دکھانے والی توجه کو اٹھایا۔ اگلے تحقیقات نے دکھائی کہ یہ بہت مشکل کام ہے، مخصوصاً ٹویٹر ڈاکٹوں پر۔ MBTI لیبلوں کو پہنچانا بھی مشکل ہے، کیونکہ انسان کی آواز کی تعلیم کی روانشن لوگوں کی ضرورت ہے، اور ان کو حاصل کرنے کے لئے دور پوچھنے کے لئے سوال کرنے کی طویل ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ امانت دار MBTI لابل جمع کرنے کے لئے صرف چار دقت سے انتخاب کئے ہوئے سؤال کے ذریعہ جو کسی طرح کے متن ڈیٹے پر لازم کر سکتے ہیں.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne wykrywanie wskaźnika typu Myers-Briggs (MBTI) z krótkich słupków przyciągnęło zauważalną uwagę w ostatnich latach. Ostatnie badania wykazały, że jest to dość trudne zadanie, zwłaszcza na powszechnie używanych danych Twittera. Uzyskanie etykiet MBTI jest również trudne, ponieważ adnotacja człowieka wymaga wyszkolonych psychologów, a automatyczny sposób ich uzyskania jest poprzez długie kwestionariusze o wątpliwej użyteczności do zadania. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy metodę gromadzenia wiarygodnych etykiet MBTI za pomocą zaledwie czterech starannie dobranych pytań, które można zastosować do dowolnego rodzaju danych tekstowych.', 'uz': "Name Yaqinda o'rganishlar bu juda qiyin vazifa, hususan oddiy Twitter maʼlumotida ishlatilgan qiyin edi. MBTI tugmalarini olish juda qiyin, chunki inson taʼminlovchi psykologistlari kerak, va ularni o'z vazifa uchun maslahal foydalanish uchun avtomatik soʻrov savollari orqali. Bu hujjatda, biz faqat ishonch boʻladigan MBTI labellarini olib tashlash usuli bilan faqat to'rtta taʼminlov qilingan savollar yordamida qoʻllanmagan matn maʼlumotga qoʻllaniladigan.", 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện tự động loại Myes-Briggs ở các trạm ngắn thu hút chú ý trong vài năm qua. Những nghiên cứu gần đây cho thấy đây là một nhiệm vụ khá khó khăn, đặc biệt trên các dữ liệu Twitter được dùng chung. Lấy được nhãn bằng MB cũng rất khó, vì sử dụng ngôn ngữ con người cần những nhà tâm lý học được đào tạo, và cách tự động để có được nó là thông qua những câu hỏi đầy nghi vấn sử dụng cho nhiệm vụ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi có một phương pháp thu thập các nhãn bằng cử chỉ bằng bốn câu hỏi được chọn cẩn thận có thể áp dụng cho bất kỳ kiểu dữ liệu kết cấu nào.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното откриване на типовия индикатор от къси постове привлече забележимо внимание през последните няколко години. Последните проучвания показват, че това е доста трудна задача, особено при често използваните данни в Туитър. Получаването на етикети също е трудно, тъй като човешката анотация изисква обучени психолози, а автоматичният начин за получаване им е чрез дълги въпросници със съмнителна използваемост за задачата. В настоящата статия представяме метод за събиране на надеждни етикети чрез само четири внимателно подбрани въпроса, които могат да бъдат приложени към всякакъв вид текстови данни.', 'nl': 'De automatische detectie van de Myers-Briggs Type Indicator (MBTI) vanuit korte posten trok de laatste jaren opvallende aandacht. Recente studies toonden aan dat dit een vrij moeilijke taak is, vooral op veelgebruikte Twitter-gegevens. Het verkrijgen van MBTI labels is ook moeilijk, omdat menselijke annotatie getrainde psychologen vereist, en automatische manier om ze te verkrijgen is door middel van lange vragenlijsten van twijfelachtige bruikbaarheid voor de taak. In dit artikel presenteren we een methode voor het verzamelen van betrouwbare MBTI labels via slechts vier zorgvuldig geselecteerde vragen die kunnen worden toegepast op elk type tekstgegevens.', 'da': 'Automatisk detektion af Myers-Briggs typeindikator (MBTI) fra korte poster tiltrak mærkbar opmærksomhed i de seneste par år. Nylige undersøgelser viste, at dette er en ret vanskelig opgave, især på almindeligt anvendte Twitter-data. Det er også vanskeligt at opnå MBTI-etiketter, da menneskelige annotationer kræver uddannede psykologer, og automatisk måde at opnå dem på er gennem lange spørgeskemaer af tvivlsom anvendelighed til opgaven. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en metode til at indsamle pålidelige MBTI etiketter via kun fire nøje udvalgte spørgsmål, der kan anvendes på enhver type tekstdata.', 'de': 'Die automatische Erkennung des Myers-Briggs Type Indicators (MBTI) aus Kurzpfosten erregte in den letzten Jahren spürbare Aufmerksamkeit. Jüngste Studien haben gezeigt, dass dies eine recht schwierige Aufgabe ist, insbesondere bei häufig verwendeten Twitter-Daten. Das Erhalten von MBTI-Labels ist auch schwierig, da menschliche Annotation ausgebildete Psychologen erfordert, und automatische Weise, sie durch lange Fragebögen mit fragwürdiger Verwendbarkeit für die Aufgabe zu erhalten. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine Methode vor, anhand von nur vier sorgfältig ausgewählten Fragestellungen zuverlässige MBTI-Etiketten zu sammeln, die auf jede Art von Textdaten angewendet werden können.', 'id': 'Deteksi otomatis dari Indikator Jenis Myers-Briggs (MBTI) dari pos pendek menarik perhatian yang nyata dalam beberapa tahun terakhir. Studi baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahwa ini adalah tugas yang cukup sulit, terutama pada data Twitter yang biasanya digunakan. Menerima label MBTI juga sulit, karena anotasi manusia memerlukan psikolog terlatih, dan cara otomatis untuk mendapatkan mereka adalah melalui pertanyaan panjang yang dapat digunakan untuk tugas. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan metode untuk mengumpulkan label MBTI yang dapat dipercaya melalui hanya empat pertanyaan terpilih dengan hati-hati yang dapat diterapkan pada setiap jenis data teks.', 'ko': '지난 몇 년 동안 짧은 기둥을 자동으로 검출하는 마이어스 브리거스 유형 지시기(MBTI)가 눈길을 끌었다.최근의 연구에 따르면 이것은 상당히 어려운 임무이며, 특히 자주 사용하는 트위터 데이터에 있어서는 그렇다.MBTI 라벨을 얻는 것도 어렵다. 인간의 주석은 훈련된 심리학자가 필요하고, 자동으로 라벨을 얻는 방법은 임무의 가용성에 의문이 있는 긴 설문지를 통해 얻을 수 있기 때문이다.본고에서 우리는 네 가지 정성스럽게 선택한 문제를 통해 신뢰할 수 있는 MBTI 라벨을 수집하는 방법을 제시했는데 이런 문제들은 어떠한 유형의 텍스트 데이터에도 응용될 수 있다.', 'fa': 'شناسایی خودکار نشان\u200cدهنده نوع مایرز-بریگز (MBTI) از نقطه\u200cهای کوتاه در چند سال گذشته توجه مشاهده\u200cای را جذب کرد. تحقیقات اخیرا نشان دادند که این کار بسیار سخت است، مخصوصا در داده های ترویتر معمولا استفاده می\u200cشود. برچسب\u200cهای MBTI همچنین سخت است، زیرا توضیح انسان نیاز به روانشناسیان آموزش داده می\u200cشود، و راه اتوماتیک دریافت آنها از طریق پرسش\u200cهای طولانی از استفاده\u200cای درباره این کار است. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش برای جمع کردن برچسب\u200cهای قابل اعتماد MBTI را از طریق فقط چهار سوال با دقت انتخاب می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتوانند بر هر نوع داده\u200cهای متن کاربرد شوند.', 'sw': 'Kugundua Automatic Indicator Type of Myers-Briggs (MBTI) kutoka makala fupi ilivuta hisia za kutazama katika miaka michache iliyopita. Tafiti za hivi karibuni zilionyesha kuwa hii ni kazi ngumu sana, hasa kwenye taarifa za Twita. Kuupatia mabango ya MBTI pia ni vigumu, kwa sababu matangazo ya binadamu yanahitaji wataalamu wa kisaikolojia waliofundishwa, na njia ya kujitegemea ya kupata hivyo ni kupitia maswali ya muda mrefu ya matumizi ya maswali yanayohojiwa kwa kazi hiyo. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka njia ya kukusanya alama za MBTI zinazotegemea kwa kupitia maswali nne tu yanayochaguliwa kwa makini yanayoweza kutumika kwa aina yoyote ya takwimu za ujumbe.', 'hr': 'Automatski otkrivanje indikatora tipa Myers-Briggs (MBTI) iz kratkih mjesta privlačilo je primjetnu pažnju u posljednjih nekoliko godina. Nedavno ispitivanje pokazalo je da je to prilično težak zadatak, posebno na često korištenim podacima Twitter-a. Uhvaćanje etiketa MBTI-a također je teško, jer ljudska annotacija zahtijeva obučene psihologe, a automatski način da ih dobijete je kroz duge ispitivanja sumnjive korištenosti zadatka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo metodu prikupljanja pouzdanih etiketa MBTI putem samo četiri pažljivo izabrane pitanja koje se mogu primjenjivati na bilo kakve vrste tekstualnih podataka.', 'tr': 'Myers-Parlaklaryň hili indikatorynyň (MBTI) gysga ýerlerinden aýratyn üns çekdi. Ýakyndaky aramalar bu zadyň gaty kyn zadyny görkezildi, ýöne köplenç Twitter maglumatynda ullanýardy. MBTI etiketlerini almak kyn däldir, adamlaryň duýgulanmasy gerekli psihologistler we olaryň ýerine ýetirmek awtomatik ýoly bu işiň üçin uzyn soraglamazlyk soraglarynyň ýoldaşdyr. Bu kagyzda güýçli MBTI etiketlerini diňe dört ünsli saýlanan soraglary bilen ýygnaýarys.', 'sq': "Gjetja automatike e Indikatorit të Tipit të Myers-Briggs (MBTI) nga postimet e shkurtra tërhoqi vëmendje të dukshme në vitet e fundit. Studimet e fundit treguan se kjo është një detyrë mjaft e vështirë, veçanërisht në të dhënat e përdorura zakonisht në Twitter. Marrja e etiketave MBTI është gjithashtu e vështirë, pasi anotacioni njerëzor kërkon psikologë të trajnuar dhe mënyra automatike për t'i marrë ato është nëpërmjet pyetësve të gjata të përdorueshmërisë së dyshimtë për detyrën. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një metodë për mbledhjen e etiketave të besueshme MBTI nëpërmjet vetëm katër pyetjeve të zgjedhura me kujdes që mund të aplikohen në çdo lloj të dhënash tekstuale.", 'af': "Outomatiese opdekking van die Myers- Briggs Tipe Indikator (MBTI) van kort pos wat aandagbaar aandag in die laaste paar jaar aantrek het. Onlangse studie het vertoon dat dit baie 'n moeilike taak is, veral op gewoonlik gebruik Twitter data. Om MBTI etikette te onderhou is ook moeilik, want menslike annotasie vereis onderwerp psykologies, en automaties manier om hulle te verkry is deur lang vraagnaire van vraagbare gebruikbaardigheid vir die taak. In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n metode vir versamel van vertroubare MBTI etikette deur slegs vier versigtig gekose vrae wat kan aanwend word na enige tipe teks data.", 'am': 'የMyers-Briggs Type Indicator (MBTI) ከshort posts በመጨረሻው ጥቂት ዓመታት የተጠቃሚ ማስታወቂያ ያሳያል፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት ትዊተር ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም የሚጠቀም ይህ ነገር በጣም አስቸጋሪ ነው፡፡ የMBTI ምልክቶች ማግኘት ደካማ ነው፣ የሰው ማስታወቂያ የሲኮሎጂዎችን ያስፈልጋል፣ የራሳቸውንም ማግኘት የረጅም ጥያቄ በሚጠያየቁ ጥያቄዎች በጥያቄ ጥያቄዎች ውስጥ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የሚታመነውን የMBTI ምልክቶች ማሰብሰብ ጥያቄን በጥያቄ የተመረጠውን አራት ጥያቄዎች ብቻ እናቀርባታለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջին մի քանի տարիների ընթացքում նկարագրելի ուշադրություն դարձրեց Myers-Briggs տիպի ցուցանիշի (MBTI) ավտոմատ հայտնաբերումը կարճ տեղադրություններից: Վերջին ուսումնասիրությունները ցույց տվեցին, որ սա բավականին դժվար խնդիր է, հատկապես սովորաբար օգտագործվող Թվիթերի տվյալների համար: ՄԲՏԻ պիտակների ստանալը նույնպես դժվար է, քանի որ մարդկային նոտացիան պահանջում է ուսուցանված հոգեբանների, և դրանք ստանալու ավտոմատիկ միջոցը երկար հարցազրույցների միջոցով է, որոնց օգտագործելիությունը հարցադրելի է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք MBTI-ի վստահելի պիտակների հավաքելու մեթոդ միայն չորս ուշադիր ընտրված հարցերով, որոնք կարող են կիրառվել ցանկացած տեսակի տեքստային տվյալների վրա:', 'az': 'Qısa məlumatlardan Myers-Briggs Türü indikatoru (MBTI) avtomatik keşfetməsi son bir neçə il içində gözəl məlumat çekdi. Son təhsil işləri göstərdilər ki, bu çox çətin bir işdir, özlərinə də Twitter verilənlərində. MBTI etiketlərini də almaq çətindir, çünki insan etiketlərinin təhsil edilmiş psikoloqları lazımdır, və onları avtomatik olaraq almaq üçün uzun sorğu-sual çəkilərlə bu işə görə şübhə edə biləcək istifadə edə bilər. Bu kağızda, güvenilir MBTI etiketlərini hər hansı bir məlumat məlumatına uyğulanan dörd təsirli seçilmiş sual vasitəsilə toplamaq üçün bir metodu göstəririk.', 'bn': 'Automatic detection of the Myers-Briggs Type Indicator (MBTI) from short posts attracted noticeable attention in the last few years.  সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা দেখিয়েছে যে এটা খুব কঠিন কাজ, বিশেষ করে টুইটারের তথ্য ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। এমটিআই লেবেল প্রদান করা কঠিন, কারণ মানুষের প্রশিক্ষণিত মনোবিজ্ঞানীদের প্রয়োজন এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তাদের পাওয়া যাওয়ার উপায় দীর্ঘ প্রশ্নে এই কাগজটিতে আমরা শুধুমাত্র চারজন নির্বাচিত প্রশ্নের মাধ্যমে বিশ্বস্ত এমটিআই লেবেল সংগ্রহ করার একটি পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি যা কোন ধরন', 'bs': 'Automatski otkrivanje indikatora tipa Myers-Briggs (MBTI) iz kratkih mjesta privlačilo je primjetnu pažnju u posljednjih nekoliko godina. Nedavno ispitivanje pokazalo je da je ovo prilično težak zadatak, posebno na često korištenim podacima Twitter. Uhvaćanje etiketa MBTI je također teško, jer ljudska annotacija zahtijeva obučene psihologe, a automatski način da ih dobije je kroz duge ispitivanja sumnjive korištenosti zadatka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo metodu prikupljanja pouzdanih etiketa MBTI putem samo četiri pažljivo izabrane pitanja koje se mogu primjenjivati na bilo kakve vrste tekstualnih podataka.', 'ca': "La detecció automàtica de l'indicador de tipus Myers-Briggs (MBTI) a partir de poques posts ha atraït una atenció notable en els últims anys. Estudis recents van demostrar que aquesta és una tasca bastant difícil, especialment en dades de Twitter comunament utilitzades. Obtenir etiquetes MBTI també és difícil, perquè l'anotació humana requereix psicòlegs entrenats, i la manera automàtica d'obtenir-les és a través de llargs qüestionaris d'utilitzabilitat cuestionable per a la tasca. En aquest article presentem un mètode de recollició d'etiquetes MBTI fiables mitjançant només quatre preguntes seleccionates amb cura que poden aplicar a qualsevol tipus de dades textuals.", 'cs': 'Automatická detekce indikátoru typu Myers-Briggs (MBTI) z krátkých příspěvků zaujala v posledních letech znatelnou pozornost. Nedávné studie ukázaly, že je to docela obtížný úkol, zejména u běžně používaných dat Twitteru. Získání MBTI štítků je také obtížné, protože lidská anotace vyžaduje vyškolené psychology a automatickým způsobem jejich získání je prostřednictvím dlouhých dotazníků sporné použitelnosti pro daný úkol. V tomto článku představujeme metodu sběru spolehlivých MBTI etiket pomocí pouze čtyř pečlivě vybraných otázek, které lze aplikovat na libovolný typ textových dat.', 'et': 'Myers-Briggsi tüübi indikaatori automaatne tuvastamine lühikestest postitustest on viimastel aastatel äratanud märgatavat tähelepanu. Hiljutised uuringud näitasid, et see on üsna raske ülesanne, eriti tavaliselt kasutatavate Twitteri andmete puhul. Samuti on raske saada MBTI märgiseid, sest inimese märgistamine nõuab koolitatud psühholooge ja automaatne viis nende saamiseks on pikkade küsimustike kaudu, kus ülesandeks on küsitav kasutatavus. Käesolevas töös tutvustame usaldusväärsete MBTI märgiste kogumise meetodit vaid nelja hoolikalt valitud küsimuse kaudu, mida saab rakendada mis tahes tüüpi tekstiandmetele.', 'fi': 'Myers-Briggsin tyyppiindikaattorin (MBTI) automaattinen havaitseminen lyhyistä viesteistä herätti huomiota viime vuosina. Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset osoittivat, että tämä on melko vaikea tehtävä, varsinkin yleisesti käytetyssä Twitter-datassa. MBTI-merkkien hankkiminen on myös vaikeaa, sillä ihmisen muistiinpanojen tekeminen vaatii koulutettuja psykologeja, ja automaattinen tapa hankkia ne on pitkien kyselylomakkeiden avulla, joiden käytettävyys on kyseenalaista tehtävään. Tässä työssä esittelemme menetelmän luotettavien MBTI-etikettien keräämiseksi vain neljän huolellisesti valitun kysymyksen avulla, joita voidaan soveltaa kaikenlaiseen tekstiaineistoon.', 'jv': 'drawable-action tab-style Nambah-nambah MBTI kuwi susah-susahe kanggo awak dhéwé, dadi nambah sing nyatakake perbudhakan karo perangkat dhéwé, lan akeh automatik dhéwé iso nggawe supoyatan langgar sapa-suarané kanggo nguasakno. Nanging mapani iki, kita nambah sistem kanggo nggawe etiket MBTI luwih apik kanggo nguasai kapan sithik sing bisa aplikasi kanggo mbalke data sithik', 'he': 'גילוי אוטומטי של אינדיקטור סוג מיירס בריגס (MBTI) ממשימות קצרות משך תשומת לב משמעותית בשנים האחרונות. מחקרים לאחרונה הראו שזו משימה די קשה, במיוחד על נתוני טוויטר משתמשים בדרך כלל. להשיג תוויות MBTI גם קשה, כיוון שהציון האנושי דורש פסיכולוגים מאומנים, והדרך אוטומטית להשיג אותם היא דרך שאלונות ארוכים של שימוש ספק למשימה. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים שיטה לאספת תוויות MBTI אמיתיות באמצעות רק ארבעה שאלות שנבחרו בזהירות שאפשר להשתמש בכל סוג של נתונים טקסטיים.', 'sk': 'Samodejno zaznavanje Myers-Briggs Type Indicator (MBTI) iz kratkih objav je v zadnjih letih pritegnilo opazno pozornost. Nedavne študije so pokazale, da je to precej težka naloga, zlasti na splošno uporabljenih Twitterjevih podatkih. Pridobivanje oznak MBTI je tudi težko, saj človeško označevanje zahteva usposobljene psihologe, avtomatski način njihovega pridobivanja pa je z dolgimi vprašalniki vprašljive uporabnosti za nalogo. V prispevku predstavljamo metodo za zbiranje zanesljivih oznak MBTI prek samo štirih skrbno izbranih vprašanj, ki jih je mogoče uporabiti za katero koli vrsto besedilnih podatkov.', 'ha': "@ action: button A yanzu'ar da aka sani cewa wannan aiki mai tsanani ne, hususanci a kan data na Twitter. Ana ƙudura a motsi alama na MTI, kamar yadda mutane na ƙayyade taƙaita masu wa aikin da aka sanar da su na aikin zũciya, kuma hanyon farat ɗaya ya sami sunayen zaman tambayar a tambaya masu tambaya wa aikin. Daga wannan takardar, muna gabatar da wata hanyoyi wa samun alama na GTI da ake iya amintarwa, a bayan su kawai huɗu masu sauran da aka zãɓe su da kuma za'a applet zuwa duk nau'i na takardar rubutu.", 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཞལ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རིགས་སྟོན་པ(MBTI)ལས་གནས་ཡུལ་རམ་པ་ལས་འདས་པའི་ལོ་ངོ་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་གསལ་བཤད་པ ཉེ་ཆར་བརྗོད་ཟིན་བྱ་ཚིག་དག་གིས་འདི་ལས་ཀར་ངལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། ཁྱད་པར་ཆེ་བས་ཌིས་ཌིར་ས Obtaining MBTI labels is also difficult, as human annotation requires trained psychologists, and automatic way of obtaining them is through long questionnaires of questionable usability for the task. In this paper, we present a method for collecting reliable MBTI labels via only four carefully selected questions that can be applied to any type of textual data.'}
{'en': 'Does BERT Understand Idioms? A Probing-Based Empirical Study of BERT Encodings of Idioms', 'ar': 'هل يفهم بيرت التعبيرات الاصطلاحية؟ دراسة تجريبية قائمة على الاستقصاء لترميزات BERT للتعابير الاصطلاحية', 'es': '¿BERT entiende los modismos? Un estudio empírico basado en sondeos de codificaciones BERT de modismos', 'pt': 'O BERT entende expressões idiomáticas? Um estudo empírico baseado em sondagem de codificações BERT de expressões idiomáticas', 'fr': "BERT comprend-il les expressions idiomatiques\xa0? Une étude empirique basée sur le sondage des codages BERT d'expressions idiomatiques", 'ja': 'バートはイディオムを理解していますか？イディオムのBERTエンコーディングの探索に基づく実証的研究', 'hi': 'क्या BERT मुहावरों को समझता है? मुहावरों के BERT एन्कोडिंग का एक जांच-आधारित अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन', 'zh': 'BERT知成语乎? 盖究之成语BERT编码实也', 'ru': 'Понимает ли БЕРТ идиомы? Эмпирическое исследование на основе зондирования кодировок идиомов БЕРТА', 'ga': 'An dtuigeann BERT Idioms? Staidéar Eimpíreach atá Bunaithe ar Thóraíocht ar Ionchóduithe BERT na nDaoine', 'ka': 'ბვპრ პაჱბთპა ლთ თეთჲმთ? BERT იდეომების კოდინეციების განსაზღვრება', 'el': 'Ο BERT καταλαβαίνει τους ηλίθιους; Μια εμπειρική μελέτη των κωδικοποιήσεων των ιδιοτήτων με βάση τον έλεγχο', 'hu': 'A BERT érti az idiótákat? BERT-kódolások vizsgálata Idiómák BERT-kódolásainak vizsgálata', 'it': 'BERT capisce gli idiomi? Uno studio empirico basato su sonde sulle codifiche BERT degli idiomi', 'kk': 'БЕРТ адамдарды түсінеді бе? BERT кодтамасын зерттеу негізінде империялық зерттеу', 'ms': 'Adakah BERT memahami Idiom? Name', 'lt': 'Ar BERT supranta idėjas? Bandymo pagrindu pagrįstas empirinis idiomų BERT kodavimo tyrimas', 'mk': 'Дали Берт ги разбира идиомите? Империска студија на BERT кодирање на идиомиName', 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ട് ഐഡിയോമുകള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാകുമോ? ബെര്\u200dട്ടി കോഡിങ്ങുകളുടെ ഐഡിയോമുകളുടെ ഒരു പ്രോബിങ്ങ്- അടിസ്ഥാനമായ എമിരിക്കല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Does BERT Understand Idioms?  Studju Impiriku Ibbażat fuq Proba tal-Kodifikazzjonijiet BERT tal-Idjomi', 'no': 'Forstår BERT idioms? Name', 'pl': 'Czy BERT rozumie idiotów? Badanie empiryczne oparte na sondach kodowania idiomów BERT', 'mn': 'БЕРТ ИДОМуудыг ойлгож байна уу? BERT Хүмүүсийн кодлогын шалгалтын үндсэн эзэнт засгийн судалгаа', 'sr': 'Da li BERT razumije idiote? Istraživanje na osnovu carstvene studije BERT kodiranja idiota', 'ro': 'BERT înţelege idioţii? Un studiu empiric bazat pe sondaje al codărilor BERT ale idiomelor', 'si': 'බෙර්ට් මෝඩයෝ තේරෙනවද? පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සම්පූර්ණ අධ්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය', 'so': 'BERT ma garan karaa fikrada? A Ceymirical Study of BERT Encodings of Idioms', 'sv': 'Förstår BERT idioter? En undersökning baserad empirisk studie av BERT-kodningar av idiomer', 'ta': 'பெர்ட் ஐடியோம்களை புரிந்து கொள்ளுமா? A Probing-Based Empirical Study of BERT Encodings of Idioms', 'ur': 'BERT احمقوں کو سمجھتا ہے؟ BERT Encodings of Idioms', 'vi': 'ANH có hiểu Idioms không? A Probing-Based Empirical study of BERT Encodings of Idioms', 'uz': 'BERT Idiomlarni tushunasizmi? Name', 'bg': 'BERT разбира ли идиоти? Емпирично изследване на BERT кодировките на идиомите, базирано на сондиране', 'nl': 'Begrijpt BERT idioten? Een empirische studie van BERT-coderingen van idiomen op basis van probering', 'da': 'Forstår BERT idioter? Et undersøgelsesbaseret empirisk studie af BERT-kodninger af idiomer', 'hr': 'Da li BERT razumije idiote? Istraživanje temeljnog carstvenog ispitivanja BERT kodiranja idiota', 'de': 'Versteht BERT Idiome? Eine probenbasierte empirische Studie zu BERT-Kodierungen von Idiomen', 'fa': 'برت احمقا رو درک ميکنه؟ یک مطالعه امپراتوری بنیاد تحقیق بر اساس BERT Encodings of Idioms', 'id': 'Apakah BERT mengerti Idiom? A Probing-Based Empirical Study of BERT Encodings of Idioms', 'ko': '버트는 성어를 아십니까?탐구에 기초한 습어 코딩 실증 연구', 'sw': 'Does BERT Understand Idioms?  Utafiti wa Utamaduni wa Utamaduni wa Utamaduni wa BERT', 'af': "Verstaan Bert Idioms? 'n Probing-Based Empirical Study of BERT Encodings of Idioms", 'tr': 'BERT Dilleriňi düşünýärmi? BERT Diller Ködlemeleri Araştyrylýan Impirik Haýsy', 'sq': 'A e kupton BERT idiotët? Një studim perandor bazuar në prova i kodifikimeve të idiotëve BERT', 'am': 'ብሬት አዲስ ማስተዋል ነውን? የBERT ቀለሞች የኢዲዮም ድምፅ', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք Բերթը հասկանում է իդեոմները: Իդիոմների BER-ի կոդավորումների փորձարկումների հիմնված կայսրական ուսումնասիրությունը', 'bn': 'বের্ট কি আইডিওম বুঝতে পারছে? বার্টি এনকোডিং অফ আইডিওমের একটি প্রবন্ধ ভিত্তিক সামাজিক গবেষণা', 'az': 'BERT dilləri anlar mı? BERT Encodings of Idioms Based Impirical Study of BERT', 'bs': 'Da li BERT razumije idiote? Istraživanje na osnovu carstvene studije BERT kodiranja idiota', 'ca': "Entende els idiomes BERT? Un estudi empíric basat en la prova de codificacions BERT d'idiomes", 'cs': 'Rozum챠 BERT idiom킁m? Empirick찼 studie BERT k처dov찼n챠 idiom킁 zalo탑en찼 na sond찼ch', 'et': 'Kas BERT mõistab idioome? Proovipõhine empiiriline uuring BERT-i idioomide kodeeringute kohta', 'fi': 'Ymm채rt채채k철 BERT idiootteja? Probing-based empirical study of BERT Encodings of idioms', 'jv': 'BERT Ngerti tenan Iwuh ? A Test-bazed empircal Test of BERT koding of idiomas', 'sk': 'Ali BERT razume idiome? Empirična študija BERT kodiranja idiomov, ki temelji na sondiranju', 'he': 'ברט מבין אידיומים? מחקר אימפרי מבוסס על ניסיון של קודים של אידיומים BERT', 'ha': 'Shin, BERT yana fahimta Idiyam? KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'BERT ་སྒྲུང་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་སྐད་ཆ་ཡིན་ནམ། BERT སྐད་ཡིག་གཏོང་ཀྱི་རྩོལ་བ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་དཔྱད་ཞིབ།'}
{'en': 'Understanding idioms is important in NLP. In this paper, we study to what extent pre-trained BERT model can encode the meaning of a potentially idiomatic expression (PIE) in a certain context. We make use of a few existing datasets and perform two probing tasks : PIE usage classification and idiom paraphrase identification. Our experiment results suggest that BERT indeed can separate the literal and idiomatic usages of a PIE with high accuracy. It is also able to encode the idiomatic meaning of a PIE to some extent.', 'ar': 'يعد فهم المصطلحات أمرًا مهمًا في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. في هذه الورقة ، ندرس إلى أي مدى يمكن لنموذج BERT المدرب مسبقًا أن يشفر معنى تعبير اصطلاحي محتمل (PIE) في سياق معين. نحن نستفيد من عدد قليل من مجموعات البيانات الموجودة ونقوم بمهمتين استقصائيتين: تصنيف استخدام PIE وتعريف إعادة صياغة المصطلح. تشير نتائج تجربتنا إلى أن BERT يمكنه بالفعل فصل الاستخدامات الحرفية والاصطلاحية لـ PIE بدقة عالية. كما أنه قادر على ترميز المعنى الاصطلاحي لـ PIE إلى حد ما.', 'fr': "La compréhension des expressions idiomatiques est importante dans la PNL. Dans cet article, nous étudions dans quelle mesure un modèle BERT pré-entraîné peut coder la signification d'une expression potentiellement idiomatique (PIE) dans un certain contexte. Nous utilisons quelques ensembles de données existants et effectuons deux tâches de sondage\xa0: la classification de l'utilisation des EPI et l'identification des paraphrases idiomatiques. Les résultats de notre expérience suggèrent que BERT peut effectivement séparer les usages littéraux et idiomatiques d'un EPI avec une grande précision. Il est également capable de coder le sens idiomatique d'un EPI dans une certaine mesure.", 'es': 'Entender los modismos es importante en la PNL. En este artículo, estudiamos hasta qué punto el modelo BERT previamente entrenado puede codificar el significado de una expresión potencialmente idiomática (PIE) en un contexto determinado. Utilizamos algunos conjuntos de datos existentes y realizamos dos tareas de sondeo: clasificación de uso PIE e identificación de paráfrasis idiomática. Los resultados de nuestro experimento sugieren que BERT puede separar los usos literales e idiomáticos de un PIE con gran precisión. También es capaz de codificar el significado idiomático de un PIE hasta cierto punto.', 'pt': 'Compreender expressões idiomáticas é importante na PNL. Neste artigo, estudamos até que ponto o modelo BERT pré-treinado pode codificar o significado de uma expressão potencialmente idiomática (PIE) em um determinado contexto. Fazemos uso de alguns conjuntos de dados existentes e realizamos duas tarefas de sondagem: classificação de uso de PIE e identificação de paráfrase de idioma. Os resultados de nossos experimentos sugerem que o BERT realmente pode separar os usos literais e idiomáticos de um PIE com alta precisão. Também é capaz de codificar o significado idiomático de um PIE até certo ponto.', 'zh': '解习语在NLP中甚重。 本文,臣等考其先训BERT形于特定上下文,可于多大程度编码潜于习语表达式(PIE)之义。 以见数集行二探事:PIE以法类识成语释义。 吾实验结果表明,BERT实可高精度离PIE者字面用法与语。 犹能编码PIE习语之义。', 'ja': '成語を理解することは、NLPにおいて重要である。この論文では、事前に訓練されたBERTモデルが、特定の文脈における潜在的な成語表現（ PIE ）の意味をどの程度エンコードできるかを研究する。私たちは、いくつかの既存のデータセットを使用し、2つのプロービングタスクを実行します： PIE使用分類と成語パラフレーズ識別。私たちの実験結果は、BERTが高精度にPIEの文字通りの用法と造語的な用法を分離できることを示唆しています。また、パイの造語的な意味をある程度符号化することができる。', 'hi': 'एनएलपी में मुहावरों को समझना महत्वपूर्ण है। इस पेपर में, हम अध्ययन करते हैं कि किस हद तक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित BERT मॉडल एक निश्चित संदर्भ में संभावित मुहावरेदार अभिव्यक्ति (PIE) के अर्थ को एन्कोड कर सकता है। हम कुछ मौजूदा डेटासेट का उपयोग करते हैं और दो जांच कार्य करते हैं: पीआईई उपयोग वर्गीकरण और मुहावरा व्याख्या पहचान। हमारे प्रयोग के परिणाम बताते हैं कि BERT वास्तव में उच्च सटीकता के साथ एक पाई के शाब्दिक और मुहावरेदार उपयोगों को अलग कर सकता है। यह कुछ हद तक एक पाई के मुहावरेदार अर्थ को एन्कोड करने में भी सक्षम है।', 'ru': 'Понимание идиомы важно в NLP. В этой статье мы изучаем, в какой степени предварительно обученная модель BERT может кодировать значение потенциально идиоматического выражения (PIE) в определенном контексте. Мы используем несколько существующих наборов данных и выполняем две задачи зондирования: классификацию использования ПИРОГА и идентификацию парафраз идиомы. Результаты нашего эксперимента показывают, что БЕРТ действительно может разделить буквальное и идиоматическое использование ПИРОГА с высокой точностью. Он также может в некоторой степени кодировать идиоматическое значение ПИРОГА.', 'ga': "Tá tuiscint ar nathanna cainte tábhachtach i NLP. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar a mhéid is féidir le samhail BERT réamh-oilte an bhrí a bhaineann le slonn a d'fhéadfadh a bheith ina ghnáth-theangach (PIE) a ionchódú i gcomhthéacs áirithe. Bainimid úsáid as roinnt tacair sonraí atá ann cheana féin agus comhlíonaimid dhá thasc imscrúdaithe: aicmiú úsáide PIE agus sainaithint athinsint na cainnte. Tugann torthaí ár dturgnaimh le fios gur féidir le BET, go deimhin, úsáidí litriúla agus gnásacha PIE a scaradh le cruinneas ard. Tá sé in ann freisin an bhrí idiotach atá le PIE a ionchódú go pointe áirithe.", 'ka': 'იდეომები გასანიშვნელოვანია NLP-ში. ამ დოკუნტში, ჩვენ ვისწავლობთ რამდენიმე განსაკუთრებული BERT მოდელი შეუძლია კოდინტურად ინდიომატიური გამოსახულების ნიშნავს (PIE) განსაკუთრებული კონტექსტში. ჩვენ ვიყენებთ რამდენიმე მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია და ორი პრობენტის დავაკეთებთ: PIE გამოყენება კლასიფიკაცია და იდიომის პარაფრეზის განსაზღვრება. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტის წარმოდგენა, რომ BERT ნამდვილად შეუძლია გაყოფილი PIE-ის ბერტალური და იდიომატიური გამოყენება მაღალი წარმოდგენით. ასევე შეუძლია კოდირება PIE-ის თეთომატიური ნიშნავს.', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση των ιδιοτήτων είναι σημαντική στο NLP. Στην παρούσα εργασία, μελετάμε σε ποιο βαθμό το προσχεδιασμένο μοντέλο μπορεί να κωδικοποιήσει την έννοια μιας δυνητικά ιδιοματικής έκφρασης (ΠΣΕ) σε ένα συγκεκριμένο πλαίσιο. Χρησιμοποιούμε μερικά υπάρχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων και εκτελούνται δύο εργασίες ανίχνευσης: ταξινόμηση χρήσης ΑΕΠ και ταυτοποίηση ιδιωμάτων παραφράσεων. Τα αποτελέσματα του πειράματος μας δείχνουν ότι ο BERT πράγματι μπορεί να διαχωρίσει τις κυριολεκτικές και ιδιοματικές χρήσεις μιας ΠΣΕ με υψηλή ακρίβεια. Είναι επίσης σε θέση να κωδικοποιήσει σε κάποιο βαθμό την ιδιογραφική έννοια μιας ΠΣΕ.', 'hu': 'A kifejezések megértése fontos az NLP-ben. Ebben a tanulmányban azt tanulmányozzuk, hogy az előkészített BERT modell milyen mértékben tudja kódolni egy potenciálisan idiomatikus kifejezés (PIE) jelentését egy adott kontextusban. Néhány meglévő adatkészletet használunk fel, és két vizsgálati feladatot végezünk: PIE használati osztályozás és nyelvparafrázis azonosítás. Kísérleti eredményeink azt sugallják, hogy a BERT valóban nagy pontossággal képes elválasztani a PIE szó szerinti és idiomatikus használatát. Képes bizonyos mértékben kódolni a PIE idiomatikus jelentését is.', 'it': "Capire gli idiomi è importante nel PNL. In questo articolo, studiamo fino a che punto un modello BERT pre-addestrato può codificare il significato di un'espressione potenzialmente idiomatica (PIE) in un determinato contesto. Facciamo uso di alcuni set di dati esistenti ed eseguiamo due compiti di analisi: classificazione dell'uso PIE e identificazione della parafrasi idiomi. I risultati dell'esperimento suggeriscono che BERT è in grado di separare gli usi letterali e idiomatici di un PIE con alta precisione. È anche in grado di codificare il significato idiomatico di un PIE in una certa misura.", 'kk': 'Идиомдарды түсіну NLP- де маңызды. Бұл қағазда біз BERT үлгісінің қаншалықты бір контексте идеоматикалық өрнегінің мәліметін кодтамыз. Біз бірнеше деректер қорларын қолданып, екі сынақ тапсырмаларын орындаймыз: PIE пайдаланушының шектеу және идиом парафразын идентификациясы. Біздің тәжірибеміздің нәтижелеріміз, BERT шынымен, PIE-нің әріпті және идеоматикалық пайдалануларын жетілдіре алады. Сонымен қатар, PIE идеоматикалық мәліметін бірнеше шегіне кодтауға болады.', 'lt': 'NLP svarbus idiomų supratimas. In this paper, we study to what extent pre-trained BERT model can encode the meaning of a potentially idiomatic expression (PIE) in a certain context.  We make use of a few existing datasets and perform two probing tasks: PIE usage classification and idiom paraphrase identification.  Mūsų eksperimentų rezultatai rodo, kad BERT iš tiesų gali atskirti laipsnišką ir idiomatinį PIE naudojimą labai tiksliai. Ji taip pat gali tam tikru mastu koduoti idiomatinę PIE reikšmę.', 'mk': 'Разбирањето на идиомите е важно во НЛП. In this paper, we study to what extent pre-trained BERT model can encode the meaning of a potentially idiomatic expression (PIE) in a certain context.  Користиме неколку постоечки датотеки и извршуваме две задачи: класификација за користење на PIE и идиомска парафраза идентификација. Our experiment results suggest that BERT indeed can separate the literal and idiomatic usages of a PIE with high accuracy.  It is also able to encode the idiomatic meaning of a PIE to some extent.', 'ms': 'Understanding idioms is important in NLP.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari seberapa besar model BERT yang dilatih-dilatih boleh mengekodkan makna ungkapan potensi idiomatik (PIE) dalam konteks tertentu. Kami menggunakan beberapa set data yang wujud dan melakukan dua tugas penyelidikan: klasifikasi penggunaan PIE dan pengenalan parafrasa idiom. Hasil eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa BERT benar-benar boleh memisahkan penggunaan secara harfiah dan idiomatik PIE dengan ketepatan tinggi. Ia juga boleh mengekodkan makna idiomatik PIE ke suatu kadar.', 'ml': 'എന്\u200dഎല്\u200dപിയില്\u200d വിഡ്ഢികള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു കുറിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള സംസ്കാരത്തില്\u200d ഒരു മണ്ടത്തരത്തിന്\u200dറെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം എന്താണ് മുമ്പ് പരിശീലനം നല്\u200dകപ നിലവിലുള്ള കുറച്ച് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയും രണ്ട് പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. പി നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നത് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥത്തിലും വിഡ്ഢിത്ത ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് പിഐയ ഒരു പിയിയുടെ വിഡ്ഢിത്ത അര്\u200dത്ഥം കുറച്ചു ദിവസത്തിലേക്ക് കോഡ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d കഴിയും.', 'mt': 'Il-fehim tal-idjomi huwa importanti fil-NLP. In this paper, we study to what extent pre-trained BERT model can encode the meaning of a potentially idiomatic expression (PIE) in a certain context.  We make use of a few existing datasets and perform two probing tasks: PIE usage classification and idiom paraphrase identification.  Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti tagħna jissuġġerixxu li BERT tabilħaqq jista’ jissepara l-użu letterali u idjomatiku ta’ PIE b’preċiżjoni għolja. Hija tista’ wkoll tikkodifika t-tifsira idjomatika ta’ PIE sa ċertu punt.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийг ойлгох нь NLP-д чухал. Энэ цаасан дээр бид BERT загварын өмнө сургалтын загварын утгыг тодорхойлох боломжтой идоматик илэрхийлэл (PIE) гэсэн утгыг тодорхойлж чадна. Бид хэд хэдэн өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглаж, хоёр шалгалтын ажил хийдэг: PIE хэрэглээний хуваалтын хуваалтын, идэвхийн параграфийн тодорхойлолт. Бидний туршилтын үр дүнд БЕРТ үнэндээ PIE-ийн бичил, идоматикийн хэрэглээ өндөр зөв байдлаар ялгаж чадна гэдгийг сануулдаг. Мөн PIE-ийн идиоматик утгыг зарим хэмжээнд кодлож чадна.', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie idiomów jest ważne w NLP. W niniejszym artykule badamy, w jakim stopniu wstępnie przeszkolony model BERT może kodować znaczenie potencjalnie idiomatycznego wyrażenia (PIE) w określonym kontekście. Wykorzystujemy kilka istniejących zbiorów danych i wykonujemy dwa zadania sondujące: klasyfikację wykorzystania PIE oraz identyfikację parafraz idiomów. Wyniki naszego eksperymentu sugerują, że BERT rzeczywiście potrafi oddzielić dosłowne i idiomatyczne zastosowania PIE z wysoką dokładnością. Jest również w pewnym stopniu w stanie zakodować idiomatyczne znaczenie PIE.', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea expresiilor este importantă în PNL. În această lucrare, studiem în ce măsură modelul BERT pre-instruit poate codifica semnificația unei expresii potențial idiomatice (PIE) într-un anumit context. Utilizăm câteva seturi de date existente și efectuăm două sarcini de sondare: clasificarea utilizării PIE și identificarea parafrazei idiome. Rezultatele experimentelor noastre sugerează că BERT poate separa într-adevăr utilizările literale și idiomatice ale unui PIE cu o precizie ridicată. De asemenea, este capabil să codeze într-o anumită măsură semnificația idiomatică a unui PIE.', 'so': 'Waxgarashada idimadu waa muhiim NLP. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku barannaa sida qaab horay loo tababaray BERT ay ugu kooban karto micnihiisa ku qoran karto imtixaanka (PIE) oo suurtagal ah. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa dhawr sawirada ee joogta, waxaana sameynaa laba shaqo oo imtixaanka ah: fasaxa isticmaalka PIE iyo aqoonsiga imtixaanka. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqan kara in BERT uu kala sooci karo isticmaalka rasmiga ah iyo idiotiga ee PIE si aad u sahlan. Waxaa sidoo kale suurtagal ah in uu kooban karo micneheeda asalka ah ee PIE.', 'sv': 'Att förstå idiom är viktigt i NLP. I den här uppsatsen studerar vi i vilken utsträckning en färdigutbildad BERT-modell kan koda innebörden av ett potentiellt idiomatiskt uttryck (PIE) i ett visst sammanhang. Vi använder oss av ett fåtal befintliga datauppsättningar och utför två undersökningsuppgifter: PIE-användningsklassificering och idiom parafrasidentifiering. Våra experimentresultat tyder på att BERT verkligen kan separera den bokstavliga och idiomatiska användningen av en PIE med hög noggrannhet. Den kan också koda den idiomatiska betydelsen av en PIE i viss utsträckning.', 'ta': 'புரிந்து கொள்ள முட்டாள்கள் NLP முக்கியமானது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முன் பயிற்சி பிரெட் மாதிரி எவ்வளவு அளவில் கற்றுக்கொள்கிறோம் ஒரு சில சாத்தியமான முட்டாள் தொடர்பின் அர்த் நாம் சில இருக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி இரண்டு சோதிக்கும் செயல்களை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம்: PIE பயன்பாடு வகுப்பு மற்று எங்கள் சோதனை முடிவு அது ஒரு பிஐஐயின் முட்டாள் அர்த்தத்தை சில அளவில் குறியீடாக்க முடியும்.', 'no': 'Forståking av idioma er viktig i NLP. I denne papiret studerer vi kva storleik først trengte BERT-modell kan kode betydninga til ein potensielt idiomatisk uttrykk (PIE) i ein bestemt kontekst. Vi brukar nokre datasett som finst og utfører to proberingsoppgåver: PIE- brukklassifikasjon og idiomparafrase- identifikasjon. Eksperimentresultatet vårt tyder på at BERT faktisk kan separera bokstavelige og idiomatiske brukar av ein PIE med høy nøyaktig. Det kan også koda idiomatisk mening av ein PIE til noko storleik.', 'si': 'මෝඩයෝ තේරුම් ගන්න එක NLP වල වැදගත් වෙනවා. මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ BERT මෝඩල් එකේ අදහසක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් කොච්චර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ කියලා. අපි තියෙන්නේ දත්ත සෙට් කිහිපයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා සහ පරීක්ෂණා වැඩක් දෙකක් කරනවා: PIE භාවිතා විශේෂය ස අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා BERT ඇත්තටම පුළුවන් පුළුවන් PIE එකේ ලේඛිකය ඒකෙන් පුළුවන් PIE එකේ මෝඩයික අදහසක් කියලා කියලා කියලා.', 'ur': 'احمقوں کو سمجھنا NLP میں اہم ہے. ہم اس کاغذ میں پڑھتے ہیں کہ کس طرح پہلے تدریس کی BERT موڈل کا معنی ایک معلوم احساساتی مفصل (PIE) کے ذریعہ ایک مقررہ متصل میں کوڈ کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک کم موجود ڈاٹ سٹ سے استعمال کرتے ہیں اور دو پروپینٹ ٹاکس کرتے ہیں: PIE استعمال کا کلاسپیٹ اور احمق پارافریز شناسایی. ہماری آزمائش نتیجے یہ نشان دیتے ہیں کہ BERT یقیناً ایک PIE کے صحیح اور مطلوب استعمال کو بلند دقیق سے جدا کر سکتا ہے۔ یہ بھی ایک PIE کے مطلوب مطلوبہ کو کچھ اندازہ تک کڑ سکتا ہے.', 'sr': 'Razumevanje idiota je važno u NLP-u. U ovom papiru proučavamo koliko pre-obučeni model BERT može kodirati smisao potencijalnog idiomatskog izraza (PIE) u određenom kontekstu. Koristimo nekoliko postojećih podataka i obavljamo dva istraživanja: klasifikacija korištenja PIE i identifikacija idiom a parafraze. Naši rezultati eksperimenta sugeriraju da BERT zaista može razdvojiti bukvalne i idiomatske upotrebe PIE sa visokom tačnošću. Takoðe je u moguænosti da kodira idiomatsko znaèenje PIE na neki naèin.', 'vi': 'Hiểu được thành ngữ là quan trọng trong chọc dò tủy sống. In this paper, we study how pre-educated BERT model có thể mã hóa ý nghĩa của một biểu thức có thể phân biệt (PIE) trong một số trường hợp nhất định. Chúng tôi sử dụng một số bộ dữ liệu tồn tại và thực hiện hai việc thăm dò: phân loại sử dụng PIE và phân đoạn nhận diện. Kết quả thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy thực chất BERT có thể phân biệt thực chất và ngu ngốc sử dụng PIE với độ chính xác cao. Nó cũng có khả năng mã hóa ý nghĩa phân biệt của một PIE.', 'uz': "Odamlarni o'rganish NLP muhim. Bu qogʻozda biz bir marta o'rganilgan BERT modeli qanday darajada o'rganamiz, bu holatda juda imkoniyatli idiomatik ifodalarning ma'nosini kodlash mumkin. Biz bir necha mavjud maʼlumot saqlaridan foydalanamiz va ikkita tizimni bajaramiz: PIE foydalanuvchi darajalashtirish va idiom paraphrase identification. Bizning tajriba natijalarimiz, BERT aslida PIE'ning asosiy va idiomatik foydalanuvchilarni juda muhimi bilan ajratish mumkin. Bu PIE ma'nosini bir necha darajaga kodlash mumkin.", 'bg': 'Разбирането на идиомите е важно в НЛП. В настоящата статия изследваме до каква степен предварително обучен модел може да кодира значението на потенциално идиоматичен израз (ПИЕ) в определен контекст. Използваме няколко съществуващи набора от данни и изпълняваме две задачи за сондиране: класификация на използването и идентификация на парафразата на идиома. Резултатите от експеримента показват, че BERT наистина може да раздели буквалните и идиоматичните употреби на ПИЕ с висока точност. Той също така е в състояние да кодира идиоматичното значение на PIE до известна степен.', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje idiota je važno u NLP-u. U ovom papiru, proučavamo u kakvoj mjeri predobučeni model BERT može kodirati smisao potencijalnog idiomatskog izraza (PIE) u određenom kontekstu. Koristimo nekoliko postojećih podataka i obavljamo dva ispitivanja: klasifikacija korištenja PIE-a i identifikacija idiotskih parafraza. Naši rezultati eksperimenta sugeriraju da BERT zaista može razdvojiti bukvalno i idiomatsko korištenje PIE sa visokom preciznošću. Također je u mogućnosti kodirati idiomatsko značenje PIE u neku mjeru.', 'nl': 'Het begrijpen van idiomen is belangrijk in NLP. In dit artikel onderzoeken we in hoeverre voorgetrainde BERT-modellen de betekenis van een potentieel idiomatische expressie (PIE) in een bepaalde context kunnen coderen. We maken gebruik van enkele bestaande datasets en voeren twee onderzoekstaken uit: AE gebruiksclassificatie en idiom parafrase identificatie. Onze experimentresultaten suggereren dat BERT inderdaad de letterlijke en idiomatische gebruiken van een PIE met hoge nauwkeurigheid kan scheiden. Het is ook in staat om de idiomatische betekenis van een AE tot op zekere hoogte te coderen.', 'da': 'At forstå idiomer er vigtigt i NLP. I denne artikel undersøger vi i hvilket omfang en prætrænet BERT model kan kode betydningen af et potentielt idiomatisk udtryk (PIE) i en bestemt kontekst. Vi gør brug af nogle få eksisterende datasæt og udfører to undersøgelsesopgaver: PIE brugsklassificering og idiom parafrase identifikation. Vores eksperimentelle resultater tyder på, at BERT faktisk kan adskille de bogstavelige og idiomatiske anvendelser af en PIE med høj nøjagtighed. Det er også i stand til at kode den idiomatiske betydning af en PIE til en vis grad.', 'de': 'Das Verständnis von Idiomen ist wichtig in NLP. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir, inwieweit ein vortrainiertes BERT-Modell die Bedeutung eines potenziell idiomatischen Ausdrucks (PIE) in einem bestimmten Kontext kodieren kann. Wir nutzen einige vorhandene Datensätze und führen zwei Sondierungsaufgaben durch: Klassifizierung der Verwendung von PIE und Identifikation von Idiomparaphrasen. Unsere Experimentergebnisse legen nahe, dass BERT tatsächlich die wörtliche und idiomatische Verwendung eines PIE mit hoher Genauigkeit trennen kann. Es ist auch in der Lage, die idiomatische Bedeutung einer AE zu einem gewissen Grad zu kodieren.', 'ko': '습어를 이해하는 것은 NLP에서 매우 중요하다.본고에서 우리는 미리 훈련된 버트 모델이 어느 정도에 특정한 언어 환경에서 잠재적인 관용 표현(PIE)의 의미를 인코딩할 수 있는지 연구했다.우리는 기존의 데이터 집합을 이용하여 두 가지 탐지 임무를 수행한다. 그것이 바로 파용법 분류와 습어 해석 식별이다.우리의 실험 결과에 의하면, 버트는 확실히 고정밀 지역으로 분배된 서면용법과 관용용법을 가지고 있다.그것은 또한 어느 정도에 파이의 관용적인 의미를 인코딩할 수 있다.', 'id': 'Memahami idioma penting di NLP. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari seberapa besar model BERT yang terlatih dapat mengkode arti ekspresi potensial idiomatis (PIE) dalam konteks tertentu. Kami menggunakan beberapa set data yang ada dan melakukan dua tugas penyelidikan: klasifikasi penggunaan PIE dan identifikasi parafrasa idiom. Hasil eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa BERT benar-benar dapat memisahkan penggunaan secara harfiah dan idiomatis dari PIE dengan akurasi tinggi. It is also able to encode the idiomatic meaning of a PIE to some extent.', 'fa': 'درک کردن احمق در NLP مهم است. در این کاغذ، ما مطالعه می\u200cکنیم تا چه مدل BERT پیش آموزش می\u200cتواند معنی یک مطالعه احمقانه احمقانه\u200cای (PIE) را در یک محیط معین کند. ما از چند مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای موجود استفاده می\u200cکنیم و دو کار آزمایش انجام می\u200cدهیم: مجموعه\u200cبندی استفاده از PIE و شناسایی فرجمه\u200cهای احمق. نتیجه آزمایش ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که BERT واقعا می\u200cتواند استفاده\u200cهای حرفه\u200cای و احمقانه را با دقیق بالا جدا کند. این همچنین قادر است به اندازه\u200cای معنی احمقانه\u200cای از یک PIE را رمز کند.', 'sw': 'Kuelewa upumbavu ni muhimu katika NLP. Katika karatasi hii, tunasoma kwa kiwango gani muundo wa zamani wa BERT unaweza kuingiza maana ya kujieleza upumbavu (PIE) katika muktadha fulani. Tunatumia seti chache zilizopo na kufanya kazi mbili zinazojaribu: usambazaji wa matumizi ya PIE na utambulisho wa upumbavu. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanapendekeza kwamba BERT kwa hakika inaweza kutenganisha matumizi ya kisasa na kiumbavu ya PIE yenye uhakika mkubwa. Pia inaweza kuingiza maana ya kijinga ya PIE kwa kiasi fulani.', 'tr': "Samsyklary düşünmek NLP'da wajypdyr. Bu kagyzda, BERT öňünden öňünden bilinmeli modeliniň beýleki kontekstda potensial dil ifadesiniň (PIE) maksadyny kodlayabileceğini öwrenýärdik. Biz birnäçe bar veri setirlerini ulanýarys we iki synaglama işini ýerine ýetirýäris: PIE ullanç klasifikasy we samsyk parafraz setirlenmesi. Biziň synagymyzyň netijelerimiz BERT hakykatdanam PIE'niň edebiýatny we samsyklygyny ýokarylyk bilen a ýryp biler diýip çaklaýar. Bu hem PIE'nin idiomatik wajypyny birnäçe ýagdaýa kodleyebilir.", 'af': "Verstaan idioms is belangrik in NLP. In hierdie papier, ons studeer tot wat uitbreiding voor-opgelei BERT model kan kodeer die betekenis van 'n potensielle idiomatiese uitdrukking (PIE) in 'n sekere konteks. Ons maak gebruik van 'n paar bestaande datastelle en uitvoer twee probeer taak: PIE gebruik klasifikasie en idiom parafrase identifikasie. Ons eksperiment resultate stel voorstel dat BERT sekerlik die literale en idiomatiese gebruike van 'n PIE met hoë presisie kan skei. Dit is ook in staat om die idiomatiese betekening van 'n PIE na 'n paar uitbreiding te kodeer.", 'sq': 'Të kuptosh idiomat është e rëndësishme në NLP. Në këtë letër, ne studiojmë në çfarë mase modeli BERT i paratrajnuar mund të kodojë kuptimin e një shprehjeje potencialisht idiomatike (PIE) në një kontekst të caktuar. Ne përdorim disa grupe të dhënash ekzistuese dhe kryejmë dy detyra sondazhi: klasifikimin e përdorimit të PIE dhe identifikimin e parafrazës së idiomit. Rezultatet tona të eksperimentit sugjerojnë se BERT me të vërtetë mund të ndajë përdorimin literal dhe idiomatik të një PIE me saktësi të lartë. Ajo është gjithashtu në gjendje të kodojë në një farë mënyre kuptimin idiomatik të një PIE.', 'am': 'አነስተኛዎች በNLP ውስጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ አስቀድሞ የተማረከውን BERT ሞዴል እንዴት እንደሆነ እናስተምራለን፡፡ We make use of a few existing datasets and perform two probing tasks: PIE usage classification and idiom paraphrase identification.  የሞከሩ ውጤታችን BERT እውነተኛ የPIE ውጤታዊ እና የኢንተርናዊ ጥያቄዎችን በተለይ ይችላል፡፡ የPIE ማህበረሰብ በክፍል ይችላል፡፡', 'az': "Dilləri anlamaq NLP içində mövcuddur. Bu kağızda, BERT model in in mümkün olduğu qədər öyrəndiyimiz qədər idiomatik ifadəsinin (PIE) anlamını belə bir məlumatda kodlayacağını öyrənirik. Biz bir neçə mevcut verilən qurğuları istifadə edirik və iki proba işini edərik: PIE istifadəsi klasifikasyonu və idim parafraz kimliğini. Bizim təcrübəmiz sonuçlarımız BERT həqiqətən, bir PIE-nin yazılı və idiomatik istifadələrini yüksək doğruluqla ayırabilir. Bu da PIE'nin idiomatik anlamını bir qədər kodlamağa qadirdir.", 'hy': "ՆԼՊ-ում կարևոր է լեզուների հասկանալը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչքանով կարող է նախապատրաստված BER մոդելը կոդավորել պոտենցիալ իդիոմատիկ արտահայտության (IP) իմաստը որոշ կոնտեքստում: Մենք օգտագործում ենք մի քանի գոյություն ունեցող տվյալների համակարգեր և կատարում ենք երկու ուսումնասիրության առաջադրանքներ' ՊիԵ օգտագործման դասակարգման և իբյոմ պարաֆրեզի հայտնաբերման: Մեր փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ BER-ը իսկապես կարող է բաժանել փորձարկումների բառացիորեն և ինքնագիտական օգտագործումը բարձր ճշգրտությամբ: Այն կարողանում է նաև որոշ չափով կոդավորել IP-ի իմաստը:", 'bn': 'এনএলপিতে বুঝতে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বোকা। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রশিক্ষণ পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত বেরেটি মডেল কিভাবে কোন বিশেষ প্রেক্ষিতে একটি নির্দিষ্ট পরিস্থিতিতে একটি নির্দিষ্ট প আমরা কয়েকটি বিদ্যমান ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করি এবং দুটি পরীক্ষার কাজ করি: পিআইই ব্যবহার করে ব্যবহার করা ক্লাসাফিকেশন এবং বোকামি প্যারা আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল পরামর্শ প্রদান করেছে যে বের্ট সত্যিই একটি পিআইআই এর সাহিত্য এবং নির্বোধ ব্যবহারকারীকে উচ্চপরিস্থিতি এছাড়াও এটি একটি পিআই এর নির্বোধ মানে কিছু পর্যন্ত এনকোড করতে পারে।', 'ca': "Entendre idiomes és important en NLP. En aquest paper estudiem fins a quin punt el model BERT pré-entrenat pot codificar el significat d'una expressió potencialment idiomàtica (PIE) en un cert context. Utilitzem alguns conjunts de dades existents i fem dues tasques d'investigació: classificació de l'ús PIE i identificació de parafrases idiomes. Els nostres resultats suggereixen que BERT pot separar els usos literals i idiomàtics d'un PIE amb alta precisió. També és capaç de codificar en certa medida el significat idiomàtic d'un PIE.", 'cs': 'Porozumění idiomům je v NLP důležité. V tomto článku studujeme, do jaké míry předškolený BERT model může kódovat význam potenciálně idiomatického výrazu (PIE) v určitém kontextu. Využíváme několik existujících datových sad a provádíme dvě sondovací úkoly: klasifikaci použití PIE a identifikaci parafráze idiomu. Výsledky našich experimentů naznačují, že BERT skutečně dokáže oddělit doslovné a idiomatické použití PIE s vysokou přesností. Je také schopen do určité míry kódovat idiomatický význam PI.', 'et': 'NLP-s on oluline mõista idioome. Käesolevas töös uurime, mil määral võib eelnevalt koolitatud BERT mudel kodeerida potentsiaalselt idiomaatilise väljendi (PIE) tähendust teatud kontekstis. Kasutame mõnda olemasolevat andmekogumit ja teeme kaks prooviülesannet: PIE kasutamise klassifitseerimine ja idioomi parafraasi identifitseerimine. Meie katsetulemused näitavad, et BERT suudab tõepoolest eraldada PIE sõnasõnalisi ja idiomaatilisi kasutusviise suure täpsusega. Samuti on see võimeline teatud määral kodeerima PIE idiomaatilist tähendust.', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje idiota je važno u NLP-u. U ovom papiru, proučavamo u kakvoj mjeri predobučeni model BERT može kodirati smisao potencijalnog idiomatskog izraza (PIE) u određenom kontekstu. Koristimo nekoliko postojećih podataka i obavljamo dva ispitivanja: klasifikacija korištenja PIE-a i identifikacija idiotskih parafraza. Naši rezultati eksperimenta sugeriraju da BERT zaista može razdvojiti bukvalne i idiomatske upotrebe PIE sa visokom preciznošću. Također je u mogućnosti kodirati idiomatsko značenje PIE u neku mjeru.', 'fi': 'Kielien ymmärtäminen on tärkeää NLP:ssä. Tässä työssä tutkimme, missä määrin esikoulutettu BERT-malli voi koodata potentiaalisesti idiomaattisen ilmaisun (PIE) merkityksen tietyssä kontekstissa. Hyödynnämme muutamia olemassa olevia aineistoja ja suoritamme kaksi luotaustehtävää: PIE-käytön luokittelu ja idiomin parafraasitunnistus. Kokeiden tulokset viittaavat siihen, että BERT pystyy erottamaan PIE:n kirjaimelliset ja idiomaattiset käyttötavat suurella tarkkuudella. Se pystyy myös koodaamaan PIE:n idiomaattisen merkityksen jossain määrin.', 'ha': "Ki fahimta da idima yana da muhimu a cikin NLP. Ga wannan takardan, munã karatun a tsakanin da misalin BERT ya iya kodi ma'anar maganar wani muhimmin maganar idiot (PIU) cikin wani muhimma. Tuna amfani da wasu masu tsari masu jira kuma Muke cika aikin da ake jarraba su biyu: Shiryoyin amfani da kayan amfani da PIU da shaidar parameteri na diode. Matarinmu na jarrabi yana madaidaita cẽwa BERT zai iya rarraba amfani da masu littãfi da diode da amfani da wani PIU da tabbatacce. Ina iya iya kodi ma'anar tamkar na PIU zuwa wani wuri.", 'he': 'הבנה של אידיוטים חשובה ב-NLP. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו לומדים עד כמה מודל BERT מאומן מראש יכול לקוד את המשמעות של ביטוי פוטנציאלי אידיומטי (PIE) בקשר מסוים. אנו משתמשים בכמה קבוצות נתונים קיימות ובצעים שני משימות חקירה: שימוש PIE מסווג וזיהוי פראפרזים אידיום. תוצאות הניסוי שלנו מצביעות שבאמת BERT יכול להפריד את השימושים המילים והאידיומטיים של PIE עם מדויקה גבוהה. הוא גם מסוגל לקוד את המשמעות האידיומטית של PIE במידה מסוימת.', 'sk': 'Razumevanje jezikov je pomembno v NLP. V prispevku preučujemo, v kolikšni meri lahko predhodno usposobljeni BERT model kodira pomen potencialno idiomatskega izraza (PIE) v določenem kontekstu. Uporabljamo nekaj obstoječih naborov podatkov in opravljamo dve nalogi preiskovanja: klasifikacija uporabe PIE in identifikacija parametrov jezika. Rezultati naših eksperimentov kažejo, da lahko BERT resnično loči dobesedno in idiomatsko uporabo PIE z visoko natančnostjo. Prav tako lahko do neke mere kodira idiomatski pomen PIE.', 'bo': 'སྙན་འདུག་ལ་རྟོགས་ནི་NLP ནང་དུ་གལ་ཆེན་ཡིན། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་སྔོན་གྲངས་འཛིན་པའི་BERT་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཅི་རིང་ལ་སྔོན་གྲངས་འཛིན་པའི་གསལ་བརྗོད་ཀ ང་ཚོས་གནས ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གི་གྲུབ PIE ཡི་མཚོན་རྟགས་ལ་ཆེན་དག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིག་ཉིད་ཀྱང་གསལ་བྱེད་ན་ཆོག་ཡིན།', 'jv': 'Sampeyan salamat sing dikarepaké nLP Nang pepulan iki, kita isih bantuan kanggo sampeyan depan BERT sampek iso nggawe barang kelangan kelangan winih apa idiomatik (PIE) ning sampek dadi. section Reunistik dhéwé éntukno ngerasai BERT iso nguasai bukal karo iso nguasai perusahaan anyar tentang karo PIE nganggo akèh dhéwé. Punika iso nggo kode bahsa idiomatik PIE nang sampeyan.'}
{'en': 'TR-SEQ : Named Entity Recognition Dataset for Turkish Search Engine Queries', 'es': 'TR-SEQ: Conjunto de datos de reconocimiento de entidades nombradas para consultas de motores de búsqueda', 'ar': 'TR-SEQ: مجموعة بيانات التعرف على الكيانات المسماة لاستعلامات محرك البحث التركي', 'pt': 'TR-SEQ: conjunto de dados de reconhecimento de entidade nomeada para consultas do mecanismo de pesquisa turco', 'fr': "TR-SEQ\xa0: jeu de données de reconnaissance d'entités nommées pour les requêtes des moteurs de recherche turcs", 'ja': 'TR - SEQ ：トルコの検索エンジンクエリの名前付きエンティティ認識データセット', 'zh': 'TR-SEQ:土耳其搜索引擎名识数集', 'hi': 'TR-SEQ: तुर्की खोज इंजन क्वेरीज़ के लिए नामित निकाय पहचान डेटासेट', 'ru': 'TR-SEQ: именованный набор данных распознавания сущностей для запросов турецкой поисковой системы', 'ga': 'TR-SEQ: Tacar Sonraí Aitheantais Aonáin Ainmnithe le haghaidh Fiosrúcháin maidir le hInneall Cuardaigh na Tuirce', 'el': 'Σύνολο δεδομένων αναγνώρισης Οντότητας για τουρκικά ερωτήματα μηχανών αναζήτησης', 'hu': 'TR-SEQ: A török keresőmotor lekérdezésekhez megnevezett szervezetek felismerésére vonatkozó adatkészlet', 'ka': 'TR- SEQ: სახელი Entity Recognition Data Database for Turkish Search Engine Queries', 'it': 'TR-SEQ: Set di dati di riconoscimento delle entità nominate per le query sui motori di ricerca turchi', 'kk': 'TR- SEQ: Түрк іздеу тетігінің аталған нысандарды анықтау деректер бағдарламасы', 'mk': 'TR-SEQ: База на податоци за препознавање на именувани ентитети за турски пребарувачки мотор', 'ms': 'TR-SEQ: Named Entity Recognition Dataset for Turkish Search Engine Queries', 'mt': 'TR-SEQ: Sett ta’ Dejta dwar ir-Rikonoxximent ta’ Entitajiet bl-Isem għal Talbiet dwar il-Magni ta’ Tfittxija Tork', 'no': 'TR- SEQ: Namn på databasen for gjenkjenning av einingar for tursk søkjemotor', 'ml': 'TR- SEQ: തുര്\u200dക്കിഷ് തെരച്ചില്\u200d എഞ്ചിനുവേണ്ടി പേരിട്ട എന്\u200dറിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡാ', 'mn': 'TR-SEQ: Туркийн хайлтын хөтөлбөрийн нэртэй Entity Recognition Data Database', 'pl': 'TR-SEQ: Zestaw danych rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów dla tureckich zapytań w wyszukiwarkach', 'ro': 'TR-SEQ: Set de date de recunoaștere a entităților denumite pentru interogările turcești ale motoarelor de căutare', 'lt': 'TR-SEQ: Turkijos paieškos variklio klausimų pavadinimų subjektų pripažinimo duomenų rinkinys', 'sr': 'TR-SEQ: Preimenovani podaci za priznanje podataka za turski pretraživač', 'si': 'TR', 'so': 'TR-SEQ: Named Entity Recognition Dataset for Turkish Search Engine Queries', 'sv': 'TR-SEQ: Datauppsättning för identifiering av namngivna enheter för turkiska sökmotorfrågor', 'ta': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'ur': 'TR-SEQ: ترکیش تلاش انجینٹ کوئریز کے لئے نام رکھا گیا انٹیٹی پتپذیر ڈاٹیسٹ', 'uz': 'QXml', 'vi': 'File tráo đổi vCalendar Comment', 'bg': 'Набор от данни за разпознаване на имена на субекти за заявки за турски търсачки', 'nl': "TR-SEQ: Dataset voor naamsbekendheid voor Turkse zoekmachinequery's", 'hr': 'TR-SEQ: Dati za priznanje podataka za turski pretraživač', 'da': 'TR-SEQ: Datasæt til anerkendelse af navngivne enheder til tyrkiske søgemaskineforespørgsler', 'de': 'TR-SEQ: Named Entity Recognition Dataset für türkische Suchmaschinen-Abfragen', 'id': 'TR-SEQ: Dataset Pengenalan Entitas bernama untuk Pertanyaan Mesin Pencarian Turki', 'ko': 'TR-SEQ: 터키 검색엔진 쿼리의 명명된 엔티티 인식 데이터 세트', 'fa': 'TR- SEQ: داده\u200cهای شناسایی عنوان واحد نامیده برای سوال\u200cهای موتور جستجو ترکیه', 'sw': 'TR-SEQ: Taarifa ya Uturuki ya Kutambua Mashindano ya Uturuki', 'tr': 'TR-SEQ: Türkçe Arama Motoru Query', 'af': 'TR- SEQ: Genaamde Eenheidherkening Databasis vir Turkse Soektog Masjien Naamstellings', 'sq': 'TR-SEQ: Dataset i emëruar i njohjes së njësisë për pyetjet e motorit turk të kërkimit', 'am': 'TR-SEQ: Named Entity Recognition Dataset for Turkish Search Engine Queries', 'hy': 'ԹՌ- SEQ: Թուրքիայի որոնման մեխանիզմի հարցերի անունված անհատականության ճանաչման տվյալներ', 'az': '呒ⵓ䕑㨠哃뱲歩얟⁁牡浡⁍慫楮敳椠叉饮즙泉饲椠쎼쎧쎼渠䅤泄넠䕮瑩瑹⁒散潧湩瑩潮⁖敲楣椊', 'bn': 'TR- SEQ: তুর্কি অনুসন্ধান ইঞ্জিনের জন্য নামের এন্টিটি স্বীকৃতির তথ্য সেট', 'cs': 'TR-SEQ: Dataset rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit pro turecké dotazy ve vyhledávači', 'ca': "TR-SEQ: Estat de dades de reconeixement d'entitats anomenat per a consultar el motor de cerca turc", 'bs': 'TR-SEQ: Datata za priznanje podataka podataka imenovanih podataka za pitanje turskog pretraživačkog motora', 'et': 'TR-SEQ: Türgi otsingumootori päringute nimelise olemi tuvastamise andmekogum', 'fi': 'TR-SEQ: Nimettyjen yhteisöjen tunnistustietosarja turkkilaisille hakukonekyselyille', 'jv': 'TR-SEq: Named Entty Learning Dates for turc Search engines', 'he': 'TR-SEQ: קבוצת נתוני זיהוי יחידות בשם עבור שאלות מנוע חיפוש טורקי', 'ha': 'QFontDatabase', 'sk': 'TR-SEQ: nabor podatkov o prepoznavanju imenovanih subjektov za poizvedbe turškega iskalnika', 'bo': 'TR-SEQ: Named Entity Recognition Dataset for Turkish Search Engine Queries'}
{'en': 'Recognizing named entities in short search engine queries is a difficult task due to their weaker contextual information compared to long sentences. Standard named entity recognition (NER) systems that are trained on grammatically correct and long sentences fail to perform well on such queries. In this study, we share our efforts towards creating a cleaned and labeled dataset of real Turkish search engine queries (TR-SEQ) and introduce an extended label set to satisfy the search engine needs. A NER system is trained by applying the state-of-the-art deep learning method BERT to the collected data and its high performance on search engine queries is reported. Moreover, we compare our results with the state-of-the-art Turkish NER systems.', 'fr': "Reconnaître les entités nommées dans les requêtes courtes des moteurs de recherche est une tâche difficile en raison de leur faible information contextuelle par rapport aux phrases longues. Les systèmes de reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) standard qui sont formés aux phrases longues et grammaticalement correctes ne fonctionnent pas bien sur de telles requêtes. Dans cette étude, nous partageons nos efforts pour créer un ensemble de données nettoyé et étiqueté de requêtes réelles sur les moteurs de recherche turcs (TR-SEQ) et introduisons un ensemble d'étiquettes étendu pour répondre aux besoins des moteurs de recherche. Un système NER est formé en appliquant la méthode d'apprentissage profond de pointe BERT aux données collectées et ses performances élevées sur les requêtes des moteurs de recherche sont signalées. De plus, nous comparons nos résultats avec les systèmes NER turcs de pointe.", 'ar': 'يعد التعرف على الكيانات المسماة في استعلامات محرك البحث القصيرة مهمة صعبة بسبب معلوماتها السياقية الأضعف مقارنة بالجمل الطويلة. أنظمة التعرف على الكيانات المسماة القياسية (NER) التي تم تدريبها على الجمل الطويلة والصحيحة نحويًا تفشل في الأداء الجيد في مثل هذه الاستعلامات. في هذه الدراسة ، نشارك جهودنا نحو إنشاء مجموعة بيانات نظيفة ومعنونة لاستعلامات محرك البحث التركي الحقيقي (TR-SEQ) وتقديم مجموعة ملصقات موسعة لتلبية احتياجات محرك البحث. يتم تدريب نظام NER من خلال تطبيق طريقة التعلم العميق الحديثة BERT على البيانات التي تم جمعها ويتم الإبلاغ عن أدائها العالي في استعلامات محرك البحث. علاوة على ذلك ، نقارن نتائجنا مع أحدث أنظمة NER التركية.', 'es': 'Reconocer entidades nombradas en consultas cortas de motores de búsqueda es una tarea difícil debido a que su información contextual es más débil en comparación con las oraciones largas. Los sistemas estándar de reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) que están entrenados en frases largas y gramaticalmente correctas no funcionan bien en tales consultas. En este estudio, compartimos nuestros esfuerzos para crear un conjunto de datos limpio y etiquetado de consultas reales de motores de búsqueda turcos (TR-SEQ) e introducimos un conjunto de etiquetas ampliado para satisfacer las necesidades de los motores de búsqueda. Un sistema NER se entrena mediante la aplicación del método de aprendizaje profundo BERT de última generación a los datos recopilados y se informa de su alto rendimiento en las consultas de los motores de búsqueda. Además, comparamos nuestros resultados con los sistemas NER turcos de última generación.', 'pt': 'Reconhecer entidades nomeadas em consultas curtas de mecanismos de pesquisa é uma tarefa difícil devido às suas informações contextuais mais fracas em comparação com frases longas. Os sistemas padrão de reconhecimento de entidade nomeada (NER) que são treinados em sentenças gramaticalmente corretas e longas não funcionam bem em tais consultas. Neste estudo, compartilhamos nossos esforços para criar um conjunto de dados limpo e rotulado de consultas reais de mecanismos de pesquisa turcos (TR-SEQ) e introduzimos um conjunto de rótulos estendido para satisfazer as necessidades do mecanismo de pesquisa. Um sistema NER é treinado aplicando o método de aprendizado profundo BERT de última geração aos dados coletados e seu alto desempenho nas consultas do mecanismo de pesquisa é relatado. Além disso, comparamos nossos resultados com os sistemas NER turcos de última geração.', 'ja': '短い検索エンジンのクエリで名前付きエンティティを認識するのは、長い文章に比べてコンテキスト情報が弱いため、難しい作業です。文法的に正しく、長い文がそのようなクエリでうまく機能しないように訓練された標準的な名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）システム。この研究では、実際のトルコの検索エンジンのクエリ（ TR - SEQ ）のクリーンでラベル付けされたデータセットを作成するための努力を共有し、検索エンジンのニーズを満たすための拡張ラベルセットを導入します。NERシステムは、収集されたデータに最先端のディープラーニング法BERTを適用して訓練され、検索エンジンのクエリでの高いパフォーマンスが報告されています。さらに、当社の結果を最先端のトルコのNERシステムと比較しています。', 'zh': '简搜索引擎问名实,上下文信比长句。 语法正与长句,名实 (NER) 不可问也。 于此论之,分享创真土耳其搜索引擎询(TR-SEQ)清标数集所之力,引入广标集以足搜索引擎之求。 因其最先进之深者BERT宜用于收数以练NER统,而告其搜索引擎高性能。 先进之土耳其NER,比于其统。', 'ru': 'Распознавание именованных сущностей в коротких поисковых запросах является сложной задачей из-за их слабой контекстной информации по сравнению с длинными предложениями. Стандартные системы распознавания именованных сущностей (NER), которые обучены грамматически правильным и длинным предложениям, не справляются с такими запросами. В этом исследовании мы делимся своими усилиями по созданию очищенного и маркированного набора данных реальных запросов турецкой поисковой системы (TR-SEQ) и внедряем расширенный набор меток для удовлетворения потребностей поисковой системы. Система NER обучается путем применения современного метода глубокого обучения BERT к собранным данным и сообщается о ее высокой производительности по поисковым запросам. Более того, мы сравниваем наши результаты с современными турецкими системами NER.', 'hi': 'छोटे खोज इंजन क्वेरी में नामित संस्थाओं को पहचानना लंबे वाक्यों की तुलना में उनकी कमजोर प्रासंगिक जानकारी के कारण एक कठिन कार्य है। मानक नामित एंटिटी रिकग्निशन (एनईआर) सिस्टम जो व्याकरणिक रूप से सही और लंबे वाक्यों पर प्रशिक्षित होते हैं, ऐसे प्रश्नों पर अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने में विफल रहते हैं। इस अध्ययन में, हम वास्तविक तुर्की खोज इंजन प्रश्नों (टीआर-एसईक्यू) के एक साफ और लेबल डेटासेट बनाने की दिशा में अपने प्रयासों को साझा करते हैं और खोज इंजन की जरूरतों को पूरा करने के लिए एक विस्तारित लेबल सेट पेश करते हैं। एक एनईआर प्रणाली को एकत्र किए गए डेटा के लिए अत्याधुनिक गहरी सीखने की विधि BERT को लागू करके प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है और खोज इंजन प्रश्नों पर इसके उच्च प्रदर्शन की सूचना दी जाती है। इसके अलावा, हम अत्याधुनिक तुर्की एनईआर सिस्टम के साथ अपने परिणामों की तुलना करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Is tasc deacair é eintitis ainmnithe a aithint i bhfiosruithe gearra inneall cuardaigh mar gheall ar a gcuid faisnéise comhthéacsúla níos laige i gcomparáid le habairtí fada. Teipeann ar chórais chaighdeánacha aitheantais aonáin ainmnithe (NER) atá oilte ar abairtí ceart gramadaí agus fada a bheith ag feidhmiú go maith ar cheisteanna den sórt sin. Sa staidéar seo, roinnimid ár n-iarrachtaí i dtreo tacar sonraí glan agus lipéadaithe a chruthú d’fhiosrúcháin fhíor-inneall cuardaigh na Tuirce (TR-SEQ) agus tugtar isteach sraith lipéad leathnaithe chun riachtanais inneall cuardaigh a shásamh. Cuirtear oiliúint ar chóras NER tríd an modh domhainfhoghlama úrscothach BERT a chur i bhfeidhm ar na sonraí a bhailítear agus tuairiscítear a ardfheidhmíocht maidir le fiosruithe innill chuardaigh. Ina theannta sin, cuirimid ár dtorthaí i gcomparáid leis na córais NER Tuircis úrscothacha.', 'el': 'Η αναγνώριση ονομάτων οντοτήτων σε σύντομα ερωτήματα μηχανών αναζήτησης είναι μια δύσκολη εργασία λόγω των ασθενέστερων πληροφοριών τους σε σχέση με τις μεγάλες προτάσεις. Τα τυποποιημένα συστήματα αναγνώρισης ονομαστικών οντοτήτων (που εκπαιδεύονται σε γραμματικά ορθές και μεγάλες προτάσεις δεν αποδίδουν καλά σε τέτοια ερωτήματα. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, μοιραζόμαστε τις προσπάθειές μας για τη δημιουργία ενός καθαρού και επισημασμένου συνόλου δεδομένων πραγματικών τουρκικών ερωτημάτων μηχανών αναζήτησης (και εισάγουμε ένα εκτεταμένο σύνολο ετικετών για να ικανοποιήσουμε τις ανάγκες των μηχανών αναζήτησης. Ένα σύστημα εκπαιδεύεται με την εφαρμογή της τελευταίας τεχνολογίας μεθόδου βαθιάς μάθησης στα δεδομένα που συλλέγονται και αναφέρεται η υψηλή απόδοση του σε ερωτήματα μηχανών αναζήτησης. Επιπλέον, συγκρίνουμε τα αποτελέσματά μας με τα σύγχρονα τουρκικά συστήματα ΝΕΡ.', 'hu': 'A megnevezett entitások felismerése rövid keresőmotoros lekérdezésekben nehéz feladat, mivel a hosszú mondatokhoz képest gyengébb kontextuális információjuk miatt. A nyelvtanilag helyes és hosszú mondatokra képzett szabványos, nevezett entitás felismerő (NER) rendszerek nem teljesítenek jól ilyen lekérdezéseknél. Ebben a tanulmányban osztjuk erőfeszítéseinket a valódi török keresőmotor-lekérdezésekből (TR-SEQ) álló tiszta és címkézett adatkészlet létrehozására, valamint a keresőmotor igényeinek kielégítésére szolgáló kiterjesztett címkekészlet bevezetésére. A NER rendszert a legkorszerűbb BERT mélytanulási módszer alkalmazásával képezik az összegyűjtött adatokra, és a keresőmotoros lekérdezések nagy teljesítményét jelentik. Ezenkívül összehasonlítjuk eredményeinket a legmodernebb török NER rendszerekkel.', 'ka': 'ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან გავაკეთებელი ინფორმაცია, რადგან მათი უფრო ძალიან კონტექსტური ინფორმაციის შემდეგ ძალიან ძალიან სტანდარტული სახელი ინტერტიკის განაცნობა (NER) სისტემები, რომლებიც გრამიტურად დარწმუნებულიან და ძალიან სიტყვების განაცნობაში არ შეუძლებელია ამ კითხვებ ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ ჩვენი წარმოიდგინეთ მონაცემების საქაღალდე, რომელიც შექმნა რეალური რუქური ძიება მოწყობილობის კითხვები (TR-SEQ) და გავაკეთეთ გაფარგებული მონაცემების შესაძლებელ NER სისტემის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი განსწავლებელი განსწავლებელი პროცემი BERT კოლექცირებული მონაცემებისთვის და შესაბამისი ძიებელი მოწყობილობის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შე დამატებით, ჩვენ შემწყვებით ჩვენი წარმოდგენების შემწყვებით შემწყვებით სახელსაწარმოდგენებელი რუქური NER სისტემი.', 'kk': 'Қысқа іздеу тетігінің сұрақтарындағы аталған нысандарды анықтау - ұзын сөйлемелерден салыстырып, бақытты мәліметтерінің себебі қиын тапсырмасы. Грамматикалық дұрыс және ұзын сөйлемелерді бақылайтын стандартты нысандарды анықтау (NER) жүйелері осы сұраныста жақсы орындалмады. Бұл зерттеулерде біз тек Түрк іздеу тетігінің (TR- SEQ) сұрауларын құру және белгіленген деректер жинағын ортақтастырып, іздеу тетігінің қажеттіліктерін қамтамасыз үшін кеңейтілген жарлықтарын та NER жүйесі біріктірілген деректерге BERT- тің күй- жай оқыту әдісін және іздеу тетігінің сұрауларының жоғары әдістерін қолдануға бақылады. Сонымен қатар, нәтижелерімізді Түрк NER жүйелерімен салыстырып тұрамыз.', 'it': "Riconoscere entità nominate nelle query brevi dei motori di ricerca è un compito difficile a causa delle loro informazioni contestuali più deboli rispetto alle frasi lunghe. I sistemi standard di riconoscimento delle entità denominate (NER) addestrati su frasi grammaticalmente corrette e lunghe non riescono a funzionare bene su tali query. In questo studio condividiamo i nostri sforzi per creare un set di dati pulito ed etichettato di query sui motori di ricerca turchi reali (TR-SEQ) e introdurre un set di etichette esteso per soddisfare le esigenze dei motori di ricerca. Un sistema NER viene addestrato applicando il metodo BERT all'avanguardia di deep learning ai dati raccolti e le sue elevate prestazioni sulle query dei motori di ricerca sono riportate. Inoltre, confrontiamo i nostri risultati con i sistemi NER turchi all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Dėl silpnesnės kontekstinės informacijos, palyginti su ilgais sakiniais, sunku pripažinti nurodytus subjektus trumpų paieškos variklio klausimuose. Standartinės subjekto pripažinimo (NER) sistemos, kurios mokomos gramatiškai teisingais ir ilgais sakiniais, tokiuose klausimuose nepakankamai veiksmingos. Šiame tyrime bendrai stengiamės sukurti išvalytus ir pažymėtus tikrų Turkijos paieškos variklių prašymų duomenų rinkinius (TR-SEQ) ir įvesti išplėstą etiketę paieškos variklio poreikiams patenkinti. NER sistema apmokoma taikant naujausią giliavandenio mokymosi metodą BERT surinktiems duomenims ir pranešama apie jo aukštus rezultatus paieškos variklio prašymuose. Be to, mes palyginame savo rezultatus su naujausiomis Turkijos NER sistemomis.', 'ml': 'ചെറിയ തെരച്ചില്\u200d എഞ്ചിന്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d പേരുള്ള വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് നീണ്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് താല്\u200dക്കാ ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d ശരിയായി പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന വസ്തുവിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള സിസ്റ്റം സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഡേറ്റ് ഡെയിറ ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ശ്രമിക്കുന്നത് വൃത്തിയാക്കുന്നതും ശുദ്ധീകരിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മുടെ ശ്രമിക്കു A NER system is trained by applying the state-of-the-art deep learning method BERT to the collected data and its high performance on search engine queries is reported.  അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d തുര്\u200dക്കിക്ക് നെയിന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമുപയോഗിക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Богино хайлтын машины кверитүүд дээр нэрлэгдсэн биетүүдийг танихыг хүлээн зөвхөн урт өгүүлбэртэй харьцуулахад хэцүү ажил юм. Грамматикийн зөв болон урт өгүүлбэр дээр сургалтын стандарт нэрлэгдсэн нэгж таних системүүд ийм кверитүүд дээр сайн ажиллаж чадахгүй. Энэ судалгаанд бид Турк хайлтын машин (TR-SEQ) хэрэгцээг удовлетворлахын тулд цэвэр болон нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийн санг хуваалцдаг. НЕР систем цуглуулсан өгөгдлийн хувьд BERT-ын гүн гүнзгий суралцах аргыг ашиглаж, хайлтын машины кверитүүд дээрх өндөр үйл ажиллагааг харуулдаг. Үүний үр дүнг Турк НЕР системтэй харьцуулж байна.', 'no': 'Kjenning av namnet einingar i korte søkemotorspørjingar er ein vanskeleg oppgåve på grunn av dei svakere kontekstinformasjonane sammenlignet med lange setningar. Standardoppkjenningssystemet med namnet entitet (NER) som er trent på grammatisk rett og lang setningar kan ikkje utføra godt på slike spørjingar. I denne studien deler vi forsøka våre til å laga eit reint og merke datasett med verkeleg søkjemotor (TR-SEQ) og introdusere eit utvida merkelapp sett for å fullføra søkjemotoren. Ein NER- systemet vert trent ved å bruka døreblæringsmetoden BERT til samlingsdata og rapportera høg utvikling på søkemotorspørjingar. I tillegg samanliknar vi resultatet våre med kunsttilstanden til tyrkiske NER-systemet.', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie nazwanych podmiotów w krótkich zapytaniach wyszukiwarki jest trudnym zadaniem ze względu na ich słabsze informacje kontekstowe w porównaniu do długich zdań. Standardowe systemy rozpoznawania nazwanych entit (NER), które są przeszkolone na gramatycznie poprawnych i długich zdaniach, nie sprawdzają się dobrze w takich zapytaniach. W niniejszym badaniu dzielimy się naszymi wysiłkami na rzecz stworzenia oczyszczonego i oznakowanego zbioru danych prawdziwych tureckich zapytań wyszukiwarki (TR-SEQ) oraz wprowadzamy rozszerzony zestaw etykiet, aby zaspokoić potrzeby wyszukiwarki. System NER jest szkolony poprzez zastosowanie najnowocześniejszej metody głębokiego uczenia BERT do zebranych danych i raportowany jest jego wysoka wydajność w zapytaniach wyszukiwarek. Ponadto porównujemy nasze wyniki z najnowocześniejszymi tureckimi systemami NER.', 'mk': 'Признавањето на именувани ентитети во кратки прашања за пребарувачки мотор е тешка задача поради нивните слаби контекстни информации во споредба со долги реченици. Стандардните системи за препознавање на ентитетите (NER) кои се обучени на граматички коректни и долги реченици не успеваат добро на вакви прашања. In this study, we share our efforts towards creating a cleaned and labeled dataset of real Turkish search engine queries (TR-SEQ) and introduce an extended label set to satisfy the search engine needs.  A NER system is trained by applying the state-of-the-art deep learning method BERT to the collected data and its high performance on search engine queries is reported.  Покрај тоа, ги споредуваме нашите резултати со најсовремените турски НЕР системи.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan entiti bernama dalam pertanyaan enjin gelintar pendek adalah tugas sukar disebabkan maklumat kontekstual yang lemah dibandingkan dengan kalimat panjang. Standard named entity recognition (NER) systems that are trained on grammatically correct and long sentences fail to perform well on such queries.  In this study, we share our efforts towards creating a cleaned and labeled dataset of real Turkish search engine queries (TR-SEQ) and introduce an extended label set to satisfy the search engine needs.  Sistem NER dilatih dengan melaksanakan kaedah pembelajaran dalam-state-of-the-art BERT kepada data yang dikumpulkan dan prestasi tinggi pada pertanyaan enjin gelintar dilaporkan. Selain itu, kita membandingkan hasil kita dengan sistem NER Turki yang terbaik.', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea entităților numite în interogările scurte ale motorului de căutare este o sarcină dificilă datorită informațiilor contextuale mai slabe în comparație cu propozițiile lungi. Sistemele standard de recunoaștere a entităților denumite (NER) care sunt instruite pe propoziții corecte gramatical și lungi nu reușesc să funcționeze bine pe astfel de interogări. În acest studiu, împărtășim eforturile noastre de a crea un set de date curățat și etichetat de interogări reale pentru motoarele de căutare turcești (TR-SEQ) și de a introduce un set extins de etichete pentru a satisface nevoile motoarelor de căutare. Un sistem NER este instruit prin aplicarea metodei de învățare profundă de ultimă oră BERT la datele colectate și este raportată performanța ridicată a acestuia la interogările motorului de căutare. Mai mult decât atât, comparăm rezultatele noastre cu sistemele NER turceşti de ultimă generaţie.', 'sr': 'Prepoznavanje imenih entiteta u kratkom pretraživanju motora je težak zadatak zbog njihovih slabijih kontekstualnih informacija u usporedbi sa dugim rečenicama. Standardni sistem priznanja entiteta (NER) koji su obučeni na gramatički ispravnim i dugim rečenicama ne ispunjavaju dobro na takvim pitanjima. U ovom studiju delimo napore na stvaranje čistog i označenog set a podataka pravih pitanja turskih pretraživačkih motora (TR-SEQ) i predstavljamo produženu etiketu postavljenu da bi zadovoljili potrebe za pretraživačkim motorom. Sistem NER obučen je primjenjivanjem metode dubokog učenja BERT na prikupljene podatke i izveštava se visoka učinka na ispitivanju pretraživačkih motora. Osim toga, uspoređujemo naše rezultate sa državnim turskim sistemima NER-a.', 'sv': 'Att känna igen namngivna enheter i korta sökmotorfrågor är en svår uppgift på grund av deras svagare kontextuella information jämfört med långa meningar. Standard named entity recognition (NER) system som är utbildade på grammatiskt korrekta och långa meningar fungerar inte bra på sådana frågor. I denna studie delar vi våra ansträngningar för att skapa en rengjord och märkt datauppsättning med riktiga turkiska sökmotorfrågor (TR-SEQ) och introducera en utökad etikettuppsättning för att tillgodose sökmotorernas behov. Ett NER-system utbildas genom att tillämpa den senaste djupinlärningsmetoden BERT på insamlade data och dess höga prestanda på sökmotorfrågor rapporteras. Dessutom jämför vi våra resultat med de senaste turkiska NER-systemen.', 'si': 'පොඩි හොයාගෙන ඉන්ජින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇතුලේ නම් කිරීමේ ඇතුල් අඳුරගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අමාරුයි ඔවුන්ගේ පරී ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් නම් නම් ඇතුළු පද්ධතිය (NER) පද්ධතිය, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්ධාරිත විදිහට සහ ලොකු වචන වචන ස මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි අපේ උත්සාහ කරනවා පිරිසිදු සහ ලේබල් කරලා තුර්කිෂ් පරීක්ෂණ එන්ජින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය (TR-SEQ) ගැන දත්ත සැකසුම් ස NER පද්ධතියක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා BERT ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ඉගෙනීම් විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සහ පරීක්ෂණ එන්ජින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා උ ඒවගේම, අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පද්ධතිය සමඟ තුර්කිෂ් NER පද්ධතිය සමඟ සම්බන්ධ කරනවා.', 'ta': 'குறைந்த தேடு இயந்திரம் கேள்விகளில் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள்களை அறியப்படுத்துவது நீண்ட வாக்கியங்களுக்கு ஒப்பிடும் க நிலையான பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடையாளம் (NER) அமைப்புகள் சிறந்த சரியாக சரிசெய்யப்பட்டு மற்றும் நீண்ட வாக்கியங்கள் இவ்வாறு கே இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் ஒரு சுத்தமான மற்றும் சுத்தமாக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்க முயற்சிக்கிறோம். உண்மையான தேடு இயந்திரத்தின் கேள்விகள் ( ஒரு NER அமைப்பு பயிற்சி செய்யப்படுகிறது தேடு இயந்திரத் தேடும் பொறியின் கேள்விகளில் உள்ள நிலையில் ஆழமான கல்வி முறைமையை பயன்படுத் மேலும், நாம் எங்கள் முடிவுகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் துருக்கி மாநிலையில் உள்ள நெயிர் அமைப்புகளுடன்.', 'mt': 'Ir-rikonoxximent ta’ entitajiet imsemmija f’mistoqsijiet qosra dwar magni tat-tiftix huwa kompitu diffiċli minħabba l-informazzjoni kuntestwali aktar dgħajfa tagħhom meta mqabbla ma’ sentenzi twal. Sistemi standard ta’ rikonoxximent ta’ entità msejħa (NER) li huma mħarrġa fuq sentenzi grammatikament korretti u twal jonqsu milli jwettqu tajjeb fuq tali mistoqsijiet. F’dan l-istudju, a ħna naqsmu l-isforzi tagħna lejn il-ħolqien ta’ sett ta’ dejta nadif u ttikkettat ta’ mistoqsijiet reali tal-magni tat-tfittxija Torok (TR-SEQ) u jintroduċu sett estiż ta’ tikketta biex jissodisfa l-ħtiġijiet tal-magni tat-tfittxija. Sistema NER hija mħarrġa bl-applikazzjoni tal-metodu BERT ta’ tagħlim fil-fond l-aktar avvanzat għad-dejta miġbura u hija rrappurtata l-prestazzjoni għolja tagħha fuq mistoqsijiet tal-magni tat-tiftix. Barra minn hekk, aħna nqabblu r-riżultati tagħna mas-sistemi NER Torok l-aktar avvanzati.', 'so': "Aqoonsashada macluumaadka la magacaabay oo lagu qorayo qoraalka mashiinka raadinta ee gaaban waa shaqo adag, sababtoo ah macluumaadkooda la tabaryaraa oo la barbarbarta hadallada dheer. Standard named entity recognition (NER) systems that are trained on grammatically correct and long sentences fail to perform well on such queries.  Waxbarashadan waxaynu ku qaybnaynaa hawlahayaga si a an u sameyno sawirid iyo sawirro la qoray qoraalo mashiinka raadinta (TR-SEQ) oo ah qoraal dheer si aan u buuxino baahida mashiinka raadinta. Tirada NER waxaa lagu tababariyaa si ay u codsadaan habka waxbarashada deegaanka ah ee dowladda aad u yaqaan BERT, taas oo lagu qorayo macluumaadka la soo ururiyey iyo sameyntiisa aad u sareeya su'aalaha mashiinka raadinta. Sidoo kale waxaynu isbarbardhignaa arimahayaga xaalada dowladda ee Turkish-da ah nidaamka NER.", 'ur': 'چھوٹی جگہ انجینٹ کے سواریوں میں نام کے نام کے اختیاروں کو پہچان جانا ایک مشکل کام ہے ان کے کمزور کنٹکسٹ معلومات کے باعث طولانی جماعتوں کے مقابلے میں۔ ایسے سوال پر استاندارڈ ڈیٹنی کے نام کی آنٹنی کی شناسایی (NER) سیسٹم جو گراماتیکی طور پر سیدھی اور طولانی جماعت پر آموزش کی جاتی ہیں وہ اچھی طرح کام نہیں کرسکتے۔ اس مطالعہ میں ہم نے اپنے کوشش کو سفارش کیا ہے کہ ایک پاکیزہ اور لابلیٹ ڈاٹ سٹ کی حقیقی ترکیس جگہ انجینٹ (TR-SEQ) کی کوشش کریں اور جگہ انجینٹ کی نیازوں کو پورا کرنے کے لئے ایک گھیری لابلیٹ کا مقرر کریں نیر سیسٹم کی آموزش کی جاتی ہے جگہ جمع کئے ہوئے ڈاکٹوں پر BERT کی حالت عمیق سیکھنے کی طریقہ کے ذریعے اور اس کی اوپر فعالیت جگہ انجین کے سوال پر گزاری جاتی ہے. اور ہم اپنے نتائج کو ترکیس NER سیستم کے ساتھ مقایسہ کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Name Bu taʼminda, biz turki qidirish vositalarining haqiqiqiy qidirish vositalarini yaratish va qidirish vositasiga murojaat qilish uchun kengaytirilgan yorliqni anglatamiz. Name Ko'rib, biz natijalarimizni Turkish shaxsiy NER tizimi bilan kamaytamiz.", 'vi': 'Nhận dạng các thực thể tên trong các câu hỏi của máy tìm kiếm ngắn là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn do các thông tin ngữ cảnh yếu hơn so với các câu dài. Hệ thống nhận dạng tập thể theo tên chuẩn (NER) được đào tạo về các câu có lỗi theo ngữ pháp và câu dài không thực hiện tốt với các yêu cầu đó. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi chia sẻ nỗ lực tạo ra một bộ dữ liệu sạch và được dán nhãn của các yêu cầu máy tìm kiếm của Thổ Nhĩ Kỳ (TR-SEQ) thực thụ và tạo một bộ nhãn mở rộng để đáp ứng nhu cầu của động cơ tìm kiếm. Một hệ thống nằm dưới được huấn luyện bằng cách áp dụng phương pháp học sâu tiên tiến kiểu BERT vào dữ liệu đã thu thập và khả năng cao của nó trên các câu hỏi của máy tìm kiếm. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi so sánh kết quả với hệ thống tối tân của Thổ Nhĩ Kỳ.', 'bg': 'Разпознаването на имената в кратки заявки в търсачката е трудна задача поради по-слабата контекстуална информация в сравнение с дългите изречения. Стандартните системи за разпознаване на обекти (НЕР), които са обучени на граматически правилни и дълги изречения, не се представят добре при такива заявки. В това проучване споделяме усилията си за създаване на изчистен и обозначен набор от данни от реални турски заявки за търсачки и въвеждане на разширен набор от етикети, за да задоволим нуждите на търсачките. Системата се обучава чрез прилагане на най-съвременния метод за дълбоко обучение към събраните данни и се отчита високата й ефективност при заявки в търсачките. Освен това сравняваме нашите резултати с най-съвременните турски системи.', 'da': 'Genkendelse af navngivne enheder i korte søgemaskine forespørgsler er en vanskelig opgave på grund af deres svagere kontekstuelle oplysninger sammenlignet med lange sætninger. Standard navngivne entitetsgenkendelsessystemer (NER), der er trænet i grammatisk korrekte og lange sætninger, fungerer ikke godt på sådanne forespørgsler. I denne undersøgelse deler vi vores bestræbelser på at skabe et rengjort og mærket datasæt af ægte tyrkiske søgemaskineforespørgsler (TR-SEQ) og introducere et udvidet etiket sæt for at opfylde søgemaskinens behov. Et NER-system trænes ved at anvende den avancerede deep learning metode BERT på de indsamlede data, og dets høje ydeevne på søgemaskineforespørgsler rapporteres. Desuden sammenligner vi vores resultater med de avancerede tyrkiske NER-systemer.', 'nl': "Het herkennen van benoemde entiteiten in korte zoekmachinequery's is een moeilijke taak vanwege hun zwakkere contextuele informatie in vergelijking met lange zinnen. Standaard naamloze entiteitsherkenningssystemen (NER) die zijn getraind op grammaticaal correcte en lange zinnen, presteren niet goed bij dergelijke query's. In deze studie delen we onze inspanningen om een schone en gelabelde dataset van echte Turkse zoekmachinequeries (TR-SEQ) te creëren en introduceren we een uitgebreide labelset om aan de behoeften van zoekmachines te voldoen. Een NER-systeem wordt getraind door de state-of-the-art deep learning methode BERT toe te passen op de verzamelde gegevens en zijn hoge prestaties op zoekmachinequeries worden gerapporteerd. Bovendien vergelijken we onze resultaten met de state-of-the-art Turkse NER systemen.", 'hr': 'Prepoznavanje imenih entitata u kratkom ispitivanju pretraživačkog motora je težak zadatak zbog njihovih slabijih contextualnih informacija u usporedbi s dugim rečenicama. Standardni sustavi priznanja entiteta (NER) koji su obučeni na gramatički ispravnim i dugim rečenicama ne ispunjavaju dobro na takvim pitanjima. U ovom ispitivanju dijelimo naše napore u cilju stvaranja čistog i označenog set a podataka pravih pitanja turskih pretraživačkih motora (TR-SEQ) i predstavljamo proširenu etiketu koja će zadovoljiti potrebe pretraživača. Sistem NER obučen je primjenjivanjem metode dubokog učenja BERT na prikupljene podatke i izvještava se visoka učinka na ispitivanju pretraživačkih motora. Osim toga, uspoređujemo naše rezultate sa državnim turskim sustavima NER-a.', 'de': 'Benannte Entitäten in kurzen Suchmaschinen-Abfragen zu erkennen, ist aufgrund ihrer schwächeren Kontextinformationen im Vergleich zu langen Sätzen eine schwierige Aufgabe. Standard Named Entity Recognition (NER)-Systeme, die auf grammatikalisch korrekte und lange Sätze trainiert sind, funktionieren bei solchen Abfragen nicht gut. In dieser Studie teilen wir unsere Bemühungen, einen bereinigten und beschrifteten Datensatz von echten türkischen Suchmaschinenabfragen (TR-SEQ) zu erstellen und einen erweiterten Labelset einzuführen, um die Bedürfnisse der Suchmaschinen zu erfüllen. Ein NER-System wird unter Anwendung der modernsten Deep Learning-Methode BERT auf die gesammelten Daten trainiert und seine hohe Leistung bei Suchmaschinen-Abfragen gemeldet. Darüber hinaus vergleichen wir unsere Ergebnisse mit den modernsten türkischen NER-Systemen.', 'id': 'Mengenal entitas bernama dalam pertanyaan mesin pencarian pendek adalah tugas sulit karena informasi kontekstual yang lemah mereka dibandingkan dengan kalimat panjang. Sistem pengenalan entitas bernama standar (NER) yang dilatih pada kalimat grammatikal yang benar dan panjang gagal melakukan dengan baik pada pertanyaan tersebut. Dalam penelitian ini, kami berbagi usaha kami untuk menciptakan set data yang bersih dan ditabel dari pertanyaan mesin pencarian asli Turki (TR-SEQ) dan memperkenalkan label yang diperlukan untuk memenuhi kebutuhan mesin pencarian. Sistem NER dilatih dengan menerapkan metode belajar mendalam terbaik BERT pada data yang dikumpulkan dan prestasi tinggi pada pertanyaan mesin pencarian dilaporkan. Selain itu, kita membandingkan hasil kita dengan sistem NER Turki yang terbaik.', 'ko': '짧은 검색엔진 검색에서 명명 실체를 식별하는 것은 어려운 작업이다. 왜냐하면 긴 문장에 비해 상하문 정보가 약하기 때문이다.표준적인 명명실체식별(NER) 시스템은 문법이 정확하고 긴 문장에 대해 훈련을 했지만 이런 검색에서는 좋지 않았다.이 연구에서 우리는 실제 터키 검색엔진 조회(TR-SEQ)의 깨끗한 표기 데이터 집합을 만들기 위한 노력을 공유하고 확장된 라벨 집합을 도입하여 검색엔진의 수요를 충족시켰다.수집된 데이터에 가장 선진적인 딥러닝 방법인 BERT를 적용해 NER 시스템을 훈련하고 검색엔진 검색에서의 고성능을 보고했다.또한 Dell의 결과를 최첨단 터키 NER 시스템과 비교했습니다.', 'fa': 'شناختن واحدهای نامیده در بازجویی موتور کوتاه جستجوی کار سختی است به دلیل اطلاعات ضعیف\u200cترین موقعیت آنها در مقایسه با جمله\u200cهای طولانی. سیستم شناسایی واحد استاندارد نامیده شده (NER) که بر جمله\u200cهای گرامیک درست و طولانی آموزش داده می\u200cشوند، در این سوال خوب انجام نمی\u200cدهند. در این مطالعه، ما تلاش\u200cهایمان را برای ایجاد مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای پاک و برچسب\u200cشده از سوال\u200cهای موتور جستجوی ترکیه (TR-SEQ) شریک می\u200cکنیم و یک برچسب گسترده\u200cای را معرفی می\u200cکنیم تا نیاز\u200cهای موتور جستجوی را به satisf سیستم NER با استفاده از روش یادگیری عمیق هنری BERT به داده های جمع شده آموزش داده می شود و عملکرد بالا در سوال موتورهای جستجو گزارش داده می شود. بعلاوه، نتیجه\u200cهایمان را با سیستم\u200cهای NER ترکیه مقایسه می\u200cکنیم.', 'sw': 'Kutambua vifaa vinavyoitwa katika maswali ya mashine fupi ya kutafuta ni kazi ngumu kutokana na taarifa dhaifu za kisasa ukilinganishwa na hukumu ndefu. Standard named entity recognition (NER) systems that are trained on grammatically correct and long sentences fail to perform well on such queries.  Katika utafiti huu, tunashirikiana na jitihada zetu za kutengeneza seti ya data safi na zilizotajwa kwa utafiti halisi wa Uturuki (TR-SEQ) na kuwasilisha alama mpya ili kuheshimu mahitaji ya mashine ya kutafuta. Mfumo wa NERS unafundishwa kwa kutumia mbinu za kujifunza za kina za sanaa BERT kwa data zilizokusanyika na utendaji wake wa juu juu kwenye maswali ya mashine ya kutafuta. Zaidi ya hayo, tunalinganisha matokeo yetu na mifumo ya NNE ya Uturuki yenye sanaa.', 'tr': 'Uzun sözleri bilen görä adlanan zadlary tanamak kyn zady. gramatik dogry we uzak sözleriň üstünde bilinmeýän bir hedit tanamak sistemalary beýleki soraglarda gowy edip bilmeýär. Bu araştırmada, biz türkilerin gerçek araştırma maşynynyň (TR-SEQ) soraglaryny sağlamak üçin temizlenmiş we etiket edilen veri setirmelerimizi paylaşýarys. NER sistemi toplanýan maglumatlara BERT derejesi bilen çykyş öwrenmäge meýilleşdirilýär we ony gözlemek motorynyň soraglarynda ýokary ukyp bilen bilinýär. Munuçta, netijelerimizi Türk sanat sistemalary bilen karşılaştyrýarys.', 'af': "Onbekende naamde entiteite in kort soektog masjien vraagte is 'n moeilike taak vanweë hul swakker contextual inligting vergelyk met lang setinge. Standaard genaamde entiteit herken (NER) stelsels wat op grammatiese korrekte en lanke setinge onderwerp word, misluk om goed te doen op sodanige navraage. In hierdie studie deel ons versoekte om 'n skoonmaak en etiketeerde datastel van regte Turkse soektog masjien vrae (TR- SEQ) te skep en introduseer 'n uitgebreide etiket stel om die soektog masjien benodigte te voldoen. 'n NER stelsel is onderwerp deur toepassing van die state-of-the-art diep leer metode BERT na die versamele data en sy hoë prestasie op soektog masjien vraagte is raporteer. Maar ons vergelyk ons resultate met die staat van die kuns-Turkse NER stelsels.", 'sq': 'Njohja e njësive të emëruara në pyetje të shkurtra të motorit kërkimi është një detyrë e vështirë për shkak të informacionit më të dobët kontekstual të tyre krahasuar me fjalimet e gjata. Sistemet standarde të njohjes së njësisë (NER) të quajtura që janë trajnuar në fjalë grammatikisht të sakta dhe të gjata dështojnë të kryejnë mirë në pyetje të tilla. Në këtë studim, ne ndajmë përpjekjet tona drejt krijimit të një grupi të dhënash të pastruara dhe të etiketuara të pyetjeve të vërtetë të motorit të kërkimit turk (TR-SEQ) dhe futim një grup të zgjeruar etiketë për të përmbushur nevojat e motorit të kërkimit. A NER system is trained by applying the state-of-the-art deep learning method BERT to the collected data and its high performance on search engine queries is reported.  Përveç kësaj, ne krahasojmë rezultatet tona me sistemet e NER-së turke më të moderne.', 'am': 'ከረጅም ደረጃዎች ጋር በሚያሳየው የአካባቢው መረጃዎች በሚያሳውቅ ቁጥጥር ውስጥ የመረጃ ምርጫዎች በሚያሳውቅ አካባቢዎች ማሰቃየት አስቸጋሪ ነው፡፡ የአካባቢው ስህተት ማውቀት (NER) ስርዓቶች በgrammatically የሚያስተምሩ እና የረጅም ፍርድ በሚያስተምሩ ስርዓቶች በዚህ መጠየቂያዎች ላይ መልካም እንዲያደርጉ አይቻሉም። በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ የቱርክ መረጃዎችን ለመፍጠር እና የዳታዎችን ማነጻ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የNER ስርዓት የጥልቅ ትምህርት ሥርዓት BERT ጥልቅ ትምህርት ማድረጉን ለመቀበል እና የረጅም የፍላጎት ስርዓት በተሰበሰቡ የኢንተርኔት ጥያቄ ጥያቄዎችን በመጠየቅ ይዘረዝራል፡፡ ከዚህም ጋር ፍሬዎቻችንን ከቱርክ አርእስት ጋር እናሳያታለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Կարճ որոնման շարժիչի հարցերում անվանված էակների ճանաչելը դժվար խնդիր է, որովհետև դրանց ավելի թույլ կոնտեքստոնալ տեղեկատվությունը համեմատած երկար նախադասությունների հետ է: Ստանդարտ համակարգերը, որոնք կրթում են գրամատիկապես ճիշտ և երկար նախադասություններով, չեն կարող լավ աշխատել այդպիսի հարցերում: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք կիսում ենք մեր ջանքները, որպեսզի ստեղծենք մաքուր և պիտակ տվյալներ իրական թուրքերի որոնման շարժիչի հարցերի (ԹՌ-SEQ) համար և ներկայացնենք ընդլայնված պիտակ, որը կբավարարի որոնման շարժիչի կար ՆԵՌ համակարգը վարժեցվում է օգտագործելով ամենաբարձր խորը սովորելու մեթոդը BER-ը հավաքված տվյալների վրա, և դրա բարձր արդյունավետությունը հայտարարվում է որոնման շարժիչի հարցերի վրա: Ավելին, մենք համեմատում ենք մեր արդյունքները Թուրքիայի նորագույն համակարգերի հետ:', 'az': "Qısa gözləmə maşınında adlı nöqtələri tanıtmaq uzun cümlələr ilə qarşılaşdığı zəif məlumatlarına görə çətin bir işdir. Qrammatik düzgün və uzun cümlələr üzərində təhsil edilən standart adlı entitə tanıması sistemləri böyük suallarda yaxşı işlər görməz. Bu araşdırma içində biz təmizlənmiş və etiketlənmiş verilən verilən qurbanları (TR-SEQ) şəkildə paylaşırıq və arama maşınının ehtiyaçlarını yerinə yetirmək üçün genişlənmiş etiketi təyin edirik. NER sistemi toplanmış məlumatlara BERT'nin dərin öyrənmə metodlarını və arama maşınının soruşmalarında yüksək performansını təhsil edir. Daha sonra, sonuçlarımızı Türk NER sistemləri ilə qarşılaşdırırıq.", 'bn': 'সংক্ষিপ্ত অনুসন্ধান ইঞ্জিন অনুসন্ধানে নামের বস্তুগুলো চিনতে পারে তাদের দীর্ঘ শাস্তির তুলনায় দুর্বল তথ্য। স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার্ডারেটির নামের বস্তু স্বীকার (NER) সিস্টেম যা গ্রাম্যাটিক্যালিক সঠিক এবং দীর্ঘ শাস্তি এই প্রশ এই গবেষণায় আমরা একটি পরিষ্কার এবং চিহ্নিত তথ্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্য সৃষ্টি করার প্রচেষ্টা শেয়ার করি যেখানে বাস্তবতা তুর্কি সার্চ ইঞ্জিন (TR-SEQ) প সংগ্রহিত তথ্য এবং অনুসন্ধান ইঞ্জিন প্রশ্নের ব্যাপারে সংগ্রহিত তথ্য এবং তার উচ্চ প্রদর্শনের সংবাদ প্রদান করা হয়েছে। এছাড়াও, আমরা আমাদের ফলাফল তুরস্কের রাষ্ট্রের রাষ্ট্রের সাথে তুলনা করি।', 'bs': 'Prepoznavanje imenih entitata u kratkom ispitivanju pretraživačkog motora je težak zadatak zbog njihovih slabijih kontekstualnih informacija u usporedbi s dugim rečenicama. Standardni sistemi priznanja entiteta (NER) koji su obučeni na gramatički ispravnim i dugim rečenicama ne ispunjavaju dobro na takvim pitanjima. U ovom ispitivanju dijelimo napore na stvaranje čistog i označenog set a podataka pravih pitanja turskih pretraživačkih motora (TR-SEQ) i predstavljamo produženu etiketu koja će zadovoljiti potrebe pretraživača. Sistem NER obučen je primjenjivanjem metode dubokog učenja BERT na prikupljene podatke i izvještava se visoka učinka na ispitivanju pretraživačkih motora. Osim toga, uspoređujemo naše rezultate sa državnim turskim sustavima NER-a.', 'cs': 'Rozpoznání pojmenovaných entit v krátkých dotazech ve vyhledávači je obtížný úkol vzhledem k jejich slabším kontextovým informacím ve srovnání s dlouhými větami. Standardní systémy rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (NER), které jsou trénovány na gramaticky správných a dlouhých větách, nefungují u těchto dotazů dobře. V této studii sdílíme naše úsilí o vytvoření vyčištěného a označeného datového souboru reálných tureckých vyhledávačů (TR-SEQ) a zavedeme rozšířenou sadu štítků, která uspokojí potřeby vyhledávačů. NER systém je trénován pomocí nejmodernější metody hlubokého učení BERT na shromážděná data a je hlášen jeho vysoký výkon na dotazy vyhledávačů. Naše výsledky navíc porovnáváme s nejmodernějšími tureckými NER systémy.', 'et': 'Nimetatud olemite äratundmine lühikeste otsingumootorite päringute puhul on keeruline ülesanne, kuna nende kontekstiteave on pikkade lausetega võrreldes nõrgem. Grammatiliselt õigetele ja pikkadele lausetele koolitatud standardsed nimetatud olemi tuvastamise (NER) süsteemid ei suuda selliste päringute puhul hästi toimida. Selles uuringus jagame oma jõupingutusi tõeliste Türgi otsingumootorite päringute puhastatud ja märgistatud andmekogumi (TR-SEQ) loomiseks ning otsingumootorite vajaduste rahuldamiseks laiendatud sildikomplekti kasutuselevõtmiseks. NER-süsteemi koolitatakse, rakendades kogutud andmetele kaasaegset sügavõppe meetodit BERT ning esitatakse selle suur jõudlus otsingumootorite päringutel. Lisaks võrdleme oma tulemusi Türgi tipptasemel NER-süsteemidega.', 'fi': 'Nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistaminen lyhyissä hakukonekyselyissä on vaikea tehtävä, koska niiden kontekstitiedot ovat heikompia pitkiin lauseisiin verrattuna. Kieliopisesti oikeisiin ja pitkiin lauseisiin koulutetut standardinimetyt entiteettitunnistusjärjestelmät (NER) eivät toimi hyvin tällaisissa kyselyissä. Tässä tutkimuksessa jaamme pyrkimyksemme luoda puhdas ja merkitty tietokokonaisuus oikeista turkkilaisista hakukonekyselyistä (TR-SEQ) ja ottaa käyttöön laajennettu tunnistekokonaisuus hakukoneiden tarpeiden tyydyttämiseksi. NER-järjestelmä koulutetaan soveltamalla kerättyyn dataan viimeisintä BERT-menetelmää ja raportoidaan sen korkean suorituskyvyn hakukonekyselyissä. Lisäksi vertaamme tuloksia Turkin viimeisimpiin NER-järjestelmiin.', 'ca': "El reconeixement d'entitats anomenades en petites preguntes del motor de cerca és una tasca difícil degut a la seva informació contextual més dèbil en comparació amb les llargues frases. Standard named entity recognition (NER) systems that are trained on grammatically correct and long sentences fail to perform well on such queries.  En aquest estudi, compartim els nostres esforços per crear un conjunt de dades netejat i etiquetat de preguntes reals de motors de cerca turcs (TR-SEQ) i introduir una etiqueta estesa per satisfer les necessitats del motor de cerca. Un sistema NER està entrenat aplicant el mètode d'aprenentatge profund BERT més avançat a les dades recollides i es diu que té un gran rendiment en les consultas del motor de cerca. A més, comparem els nostres resultats amb els sistemes NER turcs més moderns.", 'jv': 'Nambah kelas Sistem Jagad Entire sing paling nggo Kemerdekaan karo kelangan kelangan Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné beraksi awak dhéwé nggawe gerakan sing nyimpen lan nganggo dataset sing beraksi kanggo sabên engin kanggo ngilangno turk A NUR System is being contextual by aplicating the state-of-the-arts deep Learning method BERT to the gathered data and the top success on the Search engines are report. Label, kita diwujaring pancen nganggo sistem sing tarjamahan karo pertualangan-pertualangan layanan liyane mung HAR', 'he': 'זיהוי ישויות בשמות בשאלות של מנוע חיפוש קצר הוא משימה קשה בגלל המידע הקונטקטי החלש שלהן בהשוואה למשפטים ארוכים. מערכות זיהוי ישויות (NER) שטויות מתאמנות על משפטים מדויקים גרמטית וארוכים לא מסוגלות לבצע היטב בשאלות כאלה. In this study, we share our efforts towards creating a cleaned and labeled dataset of real Turkish search engine queries (TR-SEQ) and introduce an extended label set to satisfy the search engine needs.  מערכת NER מאומנת באמצעות שיטת הלימוד העמוק ביותר BERT על הנתונים האסופים והביצועים הגבוהים שלה על מבקשי מנוע חיפוש דווחים. חוץ מזה, אנחנו משווה את התוצאות שלנו עם מערכות NER הטורקיות המאודמות.', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet v kratkih poizvedbah iskalnikov je težko opravilo zaradi šibkejših kontekstnih informacij v primerjavi z dolgimi stavki. Standardni sistemi za prepoznavanje imen entitet (NER), ki so usposobljeni za slovnično pravilne in dolge stavke, ne delujejo dobro pri takih poizvedbah. V tej študiji delimo svoja prizadevanja za ustvarjanje očiščenega in označenega nabora podatkov resničnih turških iskalnikov poizvedb (TR-SEQ) in uvedbo razširjenega nabora oznak za zadovoljitev potreb iskalnikov. Sistem NER se usposablja z uporabo najsodobnejše metode globokega učenja BERT za zbrane podatke in poroča o njegovi visoki učinkovitosti pri poizvedbah iskalnikov. Poleg tega naše rezultate primerjamo z najsodobnejšimi turškimi sistemi NER.', 'ha': "Suna gane abubuwa wanda aka suna cikin tambayar masu tambayar mashine masu ƙaranci na search, aiki mai nau'i ne don a matsayin su da maras mafi rauni ga maɓallin agogo da aka sammeni da tsari masu yiwuwa. QXml Daga wannan lõkaci, muna raba aikinmu zuwa ka sami tsarin da aka rubũta tsari da aka rubũta tsari na masu tsari da aka rubutu masu cikin askari masu gaskiya na Ingirin Search na Tirkiya (TR-SQ) kuma mu nuna wani alama wanda aka shimfiɗa dõmin ya yarda da mataimaki na search. An sanar da wani na-NER game da ya amfani da shirin ayuka na-halin-sanar da inuwa-kunna-BERT zuwa data wanda aka samu, da kuma ya yi amfani da babban fassararsa a kan tambayar mashine masu kiyaye. Kayya, muna samfani matsalayinmu da na'urar-na'urar-na-turukin na-kungiya.", 'bo': 'འཚོལ་བཤེར་སྣུམ་ཐོག་གི་མིང་བཏགས་པའི་དབུགས་ཆ་རྣམས་ལ་རྟོགས་པ་དེ་ཚོའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཉམས་མེད་པའི་ཚིག་རིང་དང་མཉམ་ས སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་མིང་བཏགས་པའི་དབང་ཆ་རྟོགས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་རིམ་པ་ལྟར་འཛིན་བྱས་མིན་པའི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩིས་ཡོད་མིན་འདུག In this study, we share our efforts towards creating a cleaned and labeled dataset of real Turkish search engine queries (TR-SEQ) and introduce an extended label set to satisfy the search engine needs. A NER system is trained by applying the state-of-the-art deep learning method BERT to the collected data and its high performance on search engine queries is reported. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་འབྲས་ཚོར་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཙོ་རིམ་པ་ཚོར་སྦྱར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Contextual-Lexicon Approach for Abusive Language Detection', 'pt': 'Abordagem de léxico contextual para detecção de linguagem abusiva', 'ar': 'نهج المعجم السياقي لاكتشاف اللغة المسيئة', 'fr': 'Approche par lexique contextuel pour la détection de langage abusif', 'es': 'Enfoque de léxico contextual para la detección del lenguaje abusivo', 'ja': '濫用言語検出のためのコンテキスト-辞書アプローチ', 'zh': '用滥用语言检测上下文词典法', 'hi': 'अपमानजनक भाषा का पता लगाने के लिए प्रासंगिक-शब्दकोश दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Контекстный лексический подход к обнаружению оскорбительного языка', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Comhthéacsúil-Foclóra chun Teangacha a Bhrath go Sár-Úsáideach', 'hu': 'Kontextuális lexikon megközelítés a visszaélések nyelvészleléséhez', 'el': 'Προσέγγιση περιεκτικού λεξικού για την ανίχνευση καταχρηστικής γλώσσας', 'it': 'Approccio contestuale-lessico per il rilevamento di linguaggio abusivo', 'kk': 'Тілді анықтау үшін контексті- лексикалық қатынау', 'lt': 'Kontekstinis leksikono metodas piktnaudžiavimo kalba nustatymui', 'ms': 'Pendekatan-Lexikon Konteksual untuk Pengesanan Bahasa Abusif', 'mk': 'Контекстен- лексиконски пристап за детекција на злоупотребен јазик', 'mt': 'Approċċ Kuntest-Lexicon għall-Iskopri ta’ Lingwi Abużivi', 'mn': 'Хүчирхийлэлтэй хэл олж мэдэхийн тулд', 'pl': 'Kontekstowo-leksykonowe podejście do wykrywania nadużywanych języków', 'no': 'Name', 'ka': 'Name', 'ml': 'അബൂസിവ് ഭാഷയുടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വെക്സ്റ്റല്\u200d- ലെക്സിക്കന്\u200d സമീപത്തിലേക്കു്', 'so': 'Ka baaraandegista luqada Abusive', 'ro': 'Abordarea contextual-Lexicon pentru detectarea limbajului abuziv', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ- ලෙක්සිකෝන් අභ්\u200dයාෂි භාෂාව හොයාගන්න', 'sr': 'Kontekstualni leksički pristup za detekciju nadmaženog jezika', 'ta': 'அபுஸிவ் மொழி கண்டுபிடிப்புக்கான உள்ளமைப்பு- லெக்சிக்சியன் நெருங்கு', 'sv': 'Kontextuell Lexikonmetod för detektering av missbruksspråk', 'ur': 'فساد کی زبان تلاش کے لئے متوسط-لکسیسون تقرب', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tiếp cận kềm chế ngôn ngữ lạm dụng', 'hr': 'Kontekstualno-leksički pristup otkrivanju abusivnog jezika', 'de': 'Kontext-Lexikon Ansatz zur Erkennung missbräuchlicher Sprache', 'da': 'Kontekstuel-Lexicon tilgang til detektering af misbrug af sprog', 'bg': 'Контекстуално-лексиконен подход за откриване на злоупотреби с език', 'id': 'Pendekatan Konteksual-Lexicon untuk Deteksi Bahasa Abusif', 'nl': 'Contextueel-Lexicon aanpak voor misbruikende taaldetectie', 'fa': 'نزدیک دریافت زبان مصنوعی', 'ko': '어경 사전 기반의 남용 언어 검출 방법', 'tr': 'Abusive Dili Aňlamak üçin mod', 'sw': 'Karibu ya Kilexico kwa ajili ya Kugundua Lugha ya Ubusive', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Përqafimi Konteksual-Lexicon për zbulimin e gjuhës abuzive', 'am': 'ቋንቋ ምረጡ', 'hy': 'Կոնտեքստալ լեքսիկոնի մոտեցումը չարաշահույթ լեզվի հայտնաբերման համար', 'az': 'Zövcəli dil keşfetməsi üçün müxtəlif-Lexicon Yaxınlığı', 'bn': 'আবুসিভ ভ ভাষা সনাক্ত করার জন্য বৈচিত্রিক- লেক্সিকোর কাছে', 'bs': 'Kontekstualni leksički pristup za detekciju nadmaženog jezika', 'ca': "L'enfocament context-Lexicon per a la detecció de llenguatges abusives", 'cs': 'Kontextově-Lexikonový přístup pro detekci zneužívaného jazyka', 'et': 'Kontekstuaalne-leksikooniline lähenemisviis kuritarvitava keele tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Kontextual-Lexicon Approach for Abusive Language Detection', 'jv': 'text-tool-action', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Kontekstualno-leksikonski pristop za zaznavanje zlorabe jezika', 'he': 'גישה קונטקסט-לקסיקון לגילוי שפות מתעללות', 'bo': 'འབར་བཤེར་སྐད་རིགས་བཙལ་བཤེར་ལ་ཁོར་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས།'}
{'en': 'Since a lexicon-based approach is more elegant scientifically, explaining the solution components and being easier to generalize to other applications, this paper provides a new approach for offensive language and hate speech detection on social media, which embodies a lexicon of implicit and explicit offensive and swearing expressions annotated with contextual information. Due to the severity of the social media abusive comments in Brazil, and the lack of research in Portuguese, Brazilian Portuguese is the language used to validate the models. Nevertheless, our method may be applied to any other language. The conducted experiments show the effectiveness of the proposed approach, outperforming the current baseline methods for the Portuguese language.', 'ar': 'نظرًا لأن النهج القائم على المعجم أكثر أناقة من الناحية العلمية ، حيث يشرح مكونات الحل ويسهل تعميمه على التطبيقات الأخرى ، توفر هذه الورقة نهجًا جديدًا للغة الهجومية واكتشاف الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، والتي تجسد معجمًا للهجوم الضمني والصريح وتعبيرات الشتائم المشروحة بمعلومات سياقية. نظرًا لخطورة التعليقات المسيئة على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي في البرازيل ، ونقص البحث باللغة البرتغالية ، فإن اللغة البرتغالية البرازيلية هي اللغة المستخدمة للتحقق من صحة النماذج. ومع ذلك ، يمكن تطبيق طريقتنا على أي لغة أخرى. تظهر التجارب التي تم إجراؤها فعالية النهج المقترح ، متفوقة على أساليب خط الأساس الحالية للغة البرتغالية.', 'es': 'Dado que un enfoque basado en léxico es más elegante científicamente, explica los componentes de la solución y es más fácil de generalizar a otras aplicaciones, este artículo proporciona un nuevo enfoque para el lenguaje ofensivo y la detección del discurso de odio en las redes sociales, que incorpora un léxico de ofensiva implícita y explícita y expresiones de juramento anotadas con información contextual. Debido a la gravedad de los comentarios abusivos en las redes sociales en Brasil y la falta de investigación en portugués, el portugués brasileño es el idioma utilizado para validar los modelos. Sin embargo, nuestro método puede aplicarse a cualquier otro idioma. Los experimentos realizados muestran la eficacia del enfoque propuesto, superando los métodos de referencia actuales para el idioma portugués.', 'pt': 'Uma vez que uma abordagem baseada em léxico é mais elegante cientificamente, explicando os componentes da solução e sendo mais fácil de generalizar para outras aplicações, este artigo fornece uma nova abordagem para detecção de linguagem ofensiva e discurso de ódio em mídias sociais, que incorpora um léxico de linguagem ofensiva implícita e explícita. e palavrões anotados com informações contextuais. Devido à gravidade dos comentários abusivos nas redes sociais no Brasil e à falta de pesquisas em português, o português brasileiro é o idioma usado para validar os modelos. No entanto, nosso método pode ser aplicado a qualquer outro idioma. Os experimentos realizados mostram a eficácia da abordagem proposta, superando os atuais métodos de linha de base para a língua portuguesa.', 'fr': "Étant donné qu'une approche basée sur un lexique est plus élégante scientifiquement, expliquant les composants de la solution et étant plus facile à généraliser à d'autres applications, cet article propose une nouvelle approche pour la détection du langage offensant et des discours haineux sur les réseaux sociaux, qui incarne un lexique d'offensant implicite et explicite et des jurons annotés avec des informations contextuelles. En raison de la gravité des commentaires abusifs sur les réseaux sociaux au Brésil et du manque de recherche en portugais, le portugais brésilien est la langue utilisée pour valider les modèles. Néanmoins, notre méthode peut être appliquée à n'importe quelle autre langue. Les expériences menées montrent l'efficacité de l'approche proposée, surpassant les méthodes de base actuelles pour la langue portugaise.", 'ja': '辞書ベースのアプローチは、より科学的にエレガントであり、ソリューションコンポーネントを説明し、他のアプリケーションに一般化しやすいため、ソーシャルメディア上の不快な言語とヘイトスピーチ検出のための新しいアプローチを提供します。これは、文脈情報に注釈された暗黙的で明示的な不快な表現と誓いの表現の辞書を具現しています。ブラジルにおけるソーシャルメディアの非難的なコメントの深刻さと、ポルトガル語での研究の欠如のために、ブラジルポルトガル語がモデルを検証するために使用されています。それにもかかわらず、当社の方法は他の言語にも適用できます。実施された実験は、ポルトガル語の現在のベースライン法を上回る、提案されたアプローチの有効性を示している。', 'zh': '盖词典之法,在科学更雅,解解决方案组件而易及他用,故本文为社交媒体上攻击性言语仇言检测一新之法,见上下文信注隐式显式犯性咒骂之词典。 以巴西社交媒体骂詈之严重性,及乏葡萄牙语,巴西葡萄牙语是以验模形之语。 然吾道可施于他语。 所行实验明其有效性,优于葡萄牙语之基线。', 'ru': 'Поскольку основанный на лексиконе подход является более элегантным с научной точки зрения, объясняя компоненты решения и упрощая обобщение для других приложений, в этой статье предлагается новый подход к обнаружению оскорбительных выражений и ненавистнических высказываний в социальных сетях, который воплощает в себе лексикон неявных и явных оскорбительных и ругательных выражений, аннотированных контекстной информацией. Из-за серьезности оскорбительных комментариев в социальных сетях в Бразилии и отсутствия исследований на португальском языке, бразильский португальский язык является языком, используемым для проверки моделей. Тем не менее, наш метод может быть применен к любому другому языку. Проведенные эксперименты показывают эффективность предлагаемого подхода, превосходящего текущие базовые методы для португальского языка.', 'ga': "Ós rud é go bhfuil cur chuige foclóir-bhunaithe níos galánta go heolaíoch, ag míniú na gcomhpháirteanna réitigh agus go bhfuil sé níos éasca é a ghinearálú d'fheidhmchláir eile, cuireann an páipéar seo cur chuige nua ar fáil maidir le teanga ionsaitheach agus braite fuathchaint ar na meáin shóisialta, a chuimsíonn foclóir ionsaitheach intuigthe agus follasach. agus nathanna mionn a bhfuil anót orthu le heolas comhthéacsúil. Mar gheall ar dhéine na dtuairimí maslacha ar na meáin shóisialta sa Bhrasaíl, agus an easpa taighde sa Phortaingéilis, is í Portaingéilis na Brasaíle an teanga a úsáidtear chun na múnlaí a bhailíochtú. Mar sin féin, is féidir ár modh a chur i bhfeidhm ar aon teanga eile. Léiríonn na turgnaimh a rinneadh éifeachtacht an chur chuige atá beartaithe, rud a sháraíonn na modhanna bonnlíne reatha don Phortaingéilis.", 'hi': 'चूंकि एक शब्दकोश-आधारित दृष्टिकोण वैज्ञानिक रूप से अधिक सुरुचिपूर्ण है, समाधान घटकों की व्याख्या करता है और अन्य अनुप्रयोगों के लिए सामान्यीकरण करना आसान होता है, इसलिए यह पेपर सोशल मीडिया पर आक्रामक भाषा और घृणा स्पीच का पता लगाने के लिए एक नया दृष्टिकोण प्रदान करता है, जो प्रासंगिक जानकारी के साथ एनोटेट किए गए अंतर्निहित और स्पष्ट आक्रामक और शपथ ग्रहण अभिव्यक्तियों के एक शब्दकोश का प्रतीक है। ब्राजील में सोशल मीडिया अपमानजनक टिप्पणियों की गंभीरता के कारण, और पुर्तगाली में अनुसंधान की कमी के कारण, ब्राजील पुर्तगाली मॉडल को मान्य करने के लिए उपयोग की जाने वाली भाषा है। फिर भी, हमारी विधि को किसी भी अन्य भाषा पर लागू किया जा सकता है। आयोजित किए गए प्रयोग प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता को दिखाते हैं, पुर्तगाली भाषा के लिए वर्तमान आधार रेखा विधियों को पछाड़ते हैं।', 'ka': 'რადგან ლექსიკონის დაბათებული პროგრამა უფრო ელეგენტური მეცნიერებულია, რომელიც განახსნას პროგრამენტებს და უფრო მარტივია სხვა პროგრამებისთვის განსაზღვრება, ეს კონფიკონის ახალი პროგრამა განახსნას სოციალური მედიაში, რომელიც ინფლიქტი სოციალური მედიაში ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან გამოყენებული კომენტრები ბრაზილში და პორტეგუტურში შესწავლობა არსებობა, ბრაზილური პორტეგუტური ენაა, რომელიც მოდელების გა მაგრამ ჩვენი მეთოდი შეიძლება ყველა სხვა ენაზე დაყენება. გავაკეთებული ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენებენ პორტეგური ენისთვის მიმდინარე ფექციური მეტი.', 'el': 'Δεδομένου ότι μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη στο λεξικό είναι πιο κομψή επιστημονικά, εξηγώντας τα συστατικά της λύσης και είναι ευκολότερη να γενικευθεί σε άλλες εφαρμογές, η παρούσα εργασία παρέχει μια νέα προσέγγιση για την ανίχνευση προσβλητικής γλώσσας και ρητής ομιλίας μίσους στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, η οποία ενσωματώνει ένα λεξικό σιωπηρών και ρητών προσβλητικών και ορκιστικών εκφράσεων σχολιασμένων με πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος. Λόγω της σοβαρότητας των καταχρηστικών σχολίων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης στη Βραζιλία και της έλλειψης έρευνας στα πορτογαλικά, τα βραζιλιάνικα είναι η γλώσσα που χρησιμοποιείται για την επικύρωση των μοντέλων. Ωστόσο, η μέθοδος μας μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί σε οποιαδήποτε άλλη γλώσσα. Τα πειράματα που διεξήχθησαν δείχνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισης, ξεπερνώντας τις τρέχουσες μεθόδους βάσης για την πορτογαλική γλώσσα.', 'it': "Dal momento che un approccio basato sul lessico è scientificamente più elegante, spiegando le componenti della soluzione e essendo più facile da generalizzare ad altre applicazioni, questo articolo fornisce un nuovo approccio per il rilevamento del linguaggio offensivo e del discorso di odio sui social media, che incarna un lessico di espressioni offensive e parolacce implicite ed esplicite annotate con informazioni contestuali. A causa della gravità dei commenti abusivi sui social media in Brasile e della mancanza di ricerche in portoghese, il portoghese brasiliano è la lingua utilizzata per convalidare i modelli. Tuttavia, il nostro metodo può essere applicato a qualsiasi altra lingua. Gli esperimenti condotti dimostrano l'efficacia dell'approccio proposto, superando gli attuali metodi di base per la lingua portoghese.", 'lt': 'Kadangi mokslo požiūris, pagrįstas leksikonu, yra elegantesnis, paaiškina sprendimo komponentus ir yra lengviau generalizuoti į kitas programas, šiame dokumente numatytas naujas požiūris į priešišką kalbą ir neapykantos kalbos aptikimą socialinėje žiniasklaidoje, kuris apima implicit ų ir aiškių priešiškų ir prisiekiamų išraiškų, užrašytų kontekstine informacija, leksikoną. Dėl piktnaudžiaujančių socialinių žiniasklaidos pastabų Brazilijoje sunkumo ir mokslinių tyrimų portugalų kalba Portugalijos portugalų kalba yra modeliams patvirtinti naudojama kalba. Vis dėlto mūsų metodas gali būti taikomas bet kuriai kitai kalbai. Iš atliktų eksperimentų matyti, kad siūlomas metodas yra veiksmingesnis nei dabartiniai pradiniai Portugalijos kalbos metodai.', 'kk': 'Лексикон негіздеген тәртібі көптеген ғылыми түсініктерді түсініп, басқа қолданбаларға көңіл түсініп, әлемдік медиақтардың жаңа тілді және сөздерді табуға арналған жаңа тәртібі береді. Бұл қағаз әлемдік мәліметті таңдау үшін жаңа тәртібі Бразилиядағы социалдық медиаға қорқынышты түсініктемелер және португалдық зерттеулердің жоқ болуы үшін Бразилияның португалдық тілі - моделдерді тексеру үшін қолданылатын. Бірақ әдіміздің әдіміміз басқа тілде қолданылады. Орындалған тәжірибелер қолданылған тәжірибенің эффектілігін көрсетеді. Португалия тілінің назардағы негізгі тәжірибенің әдістерін шешуі.', 'ms': 'Since a lexicon-based approach is more elegant scientifically, explaining the solution components and being easier to generalize to other applications, this paper provides a new approach for offensive language and hate speech detection on social media, which embodies a lexicon of implicit and explicit offensive and swearing expressions annotated with contextual information.  Kerana keras komentar media sosial yang melampaui batas di Brazil, dan kekurangan kajian dalam bahasa Portugis, bahasa Portugis Brazil adalah bahasa yang digunakan untuk sahkan model. Namun, kaedah kita mungkin digunakan pada bahasa lain. The conducted experiments show the effectiveness of the proposed approach, outperforming the current baseline methods for the Portuguese language.', 'hu': 'Mivel a lexikon alapú megközelítés tudományosan elegánsabb, magyarázza a megoldás összetevőit és könnyebben általánosítható más alkalmazásokra, ez a tanulmány új megközelítést nyújt a sértő nyelv és a gyűlölet beszéd felismerésére a közösségi médián, amely implicit és explicit sértő és káromkodó kifejezéseket testesít meg kontextuális információkkal jegyzett meg. A közösségi média visszaéléseinek súlyossága miatt Brazíliában, valamint a portugál kutatások hiánya miatt a brazil portugál nyelv a modellek validálására használt nyelv. Mindazonáltal a mi módszerünk bármely más nyelvre alkalmazható. Az elvégzett kísérletek kimutatták a javasolt megközelítés hatékonyságát, felülmúlva a portugál nyelv jelenlegi alapvető módszereit.', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്സണ്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഒരു സാങ്കേതം ശാസ്ത്രജ്ഞനാണ്, പരിഹാരത്തിന്റെ ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുകയും മറ്റു പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് സാധാരണമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് എളുപ്പമുള്ളതാണ്, ഈ പേപ്പറിന്  ബ്രാസീലിലെ സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയയുടെ പീഡിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഗുരുതരമായതിനാലും, പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗീഷിലെ പരിശോധന കുറവും കാരണം, ബ്രാസീലിയന്\u200d  എങ്കിലും നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മറ്റൊരു ഭാഷയിലും പ്രയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും. നടപ്പിലുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊത്തുഗീഷ് ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള നിലവിലുള്ള ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത', 'mk': 'Бидејќи пристапот базиран на лексикони е поелегантен научно, објаснувајќи ги компонентите на решението и бидејќи е полесно да се генерализира на други апликации, овој весник обезбедува нов пристап за навредлив јазик и детекција на говор на омраза на социјалните медиуми, кој вклучува лексикон на имплицитни и експлицитни навредлив Поради сериозноста на злоупотребните коментари на социјалните медиуми во Бразил и недостатокот на истражувања на португалски, бразилскиот португалски е јазик кој се користи за валидирање на моделите. Nevertheless, our method may be applied to any other language.  Преводените експерименти ја покажуваат ефикасноста на предложениот пристап, надминувајќи ги актуелните основни методи за португалскиот јазик.', 'no': 'Sidan ein leksikonbasert tilnærming er meir elegant vitenskapelig, som forklarer løsningskomponentane og er lettere å generalisere andre program, gjev denne papiret ein ny tilnærming for offensiv språk og hatt taleoppdaging på sosiale media, som inneheld ein leksikon med implisitt og eksplisitt offensiv og søringsuttrykk med kontekstinformasjon. På grunn av viktigheten av sosiale media-abusive kommentarar i Brasil, og manglene av forskning i portugisisk, er Brasiliansk portugisisk språk brukt til å validera modelane. Men metoden vårt kan likevel brukast til andre språk. Den gjeldande eksperimentane viser effektiviteten av den foreslåde tilnærminga, som utfører gjeldande baseline-metoden for portugisiske språket.', 'pl': 'Ponieważ podejście oparte na leksykonie jest bardziej eleganckie naukowo, wyjaśniające składniki rozwiązania i łatwiejsze do uogólnienia na inne zastosowania, niniejszy artykuł zapewnia nowe podejście do wykrywania obraźliwego języka i mowy nienawiści w mediach społecznościowych, które ucieleśnia leksykon dorozumianych i wyraźnych obraźliwych i przeklinających wyrażeń adnotacyjnych informacjami kontekstowymi. Ze względu na powagę nadużywanych komentarzy mediów społecznościowych w Brazylii i brak badań w języku portugalskim, brazylijski portugalski jest językiem używanym do walidacji modeli. Niemniej jednak nasza metoda może być stosowana do dowolnego innego języka. Przeprowadzone eksperymenty pokazują skuteczność proponowanego podejścia, przewyższając obecne metody bazowe dla języka portugalskiego.', 'mn': 'Лексикон суурилсан арга зам нь илүү сайхан шинжлэх ухааны тулд, шийдвэрлэлийн компонентуудыг тайлбарлаж, бусад хэрэглэмжүүдэд илүү амархан байдаг учраас, энэ цаас нийгмийн хэл, үзэн ядуурлын илтгэл тайлбарлах шинэ арга зам гаргадаг. Энэ нь нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэмжтэй, тодорхой гэм Бразилийн нийгмийн мэдээллийн хүчирхийллийн хүчирхийллийн тулд, Португалийн судалгааны бус байдал, Бразилийн Португалийн хэл нь загваруудыг шалгахад хэрэглэгддэг хэл юм. Гэвч бидний арга нь бусад хэл дээр хэрэглэгдэх боломжтой. Дасгал хийсэн туршилтууд Португалийн хэл дээр орчин үеийн суурь шугам аргыг илүү үр дүнтэй харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Peress li approċċ ibbażat fuq il-lexicon huwa aktar eleganti xjentifikament, li jispjega l-komponenti tas-soluzzjoni u jkun aktar faċli li jiġi ġeneralizzat għal applikazzjonijiet oħra, dan id-dokument jipprovdi approċċ ġdid għad-detezzjoni ta’ lingwa offensiva u diskors ta’ mibegħda fuq il-midja soċjali, li jinkorpora lexicon ta’ espressjonijiet offensivi impliċiti u espliċiti u ta’ ġurament annotati b’informazzjoni kuntestwali. Minħabba s-severità tal-kummenti abbużivi tal-midja soċjali fil-Brażil, u n-nuqqas ta’ riċerka fil-Portugiż, il-Portugiż Brażiljan huwa l-lingwa użata għall-validazzjoni tal-mudelli. Madankollu, il-metodu tagħna jista’ jiġi applikat għal kwalunkwe lingwa oħra. L-esperimenti mwettqa juru l-effettività tal-approċċ propost, li jaqbeż il-metodi bażiċi attwali għall-lingwa Portugiża.', 'ro': 'Deoarece o abordare bazată pe lexicon este mai elegantă științific, explicând componentele soluției și fiind mai ușor de generalizat la alte aplicații, această lucrare oferă o nouă abordare pentru detectarea limbajului ofensator și a discursului de ură pe rețelele de socializare, care întruchipează un lexicon de expresii ofensive implicite și explicite și de înjurături adnotate cu informații contextuale. Datorită severității comentariilor abuzive pe rețelele de socializare din Brazilia și lipsei de cercetare în portugheză, portugheza braziliană este limba folosită pentru validarea modelelor. Cu toate acestea, metoda noastră poate fi aplicată oricărei alte limbi. Experimentele efectuate arată eficacitatea abordării propuse, depășind metodele de bază actuale pentru limba portugheză.', 'si': 'ඉතින් ලෙක්සිකෝන් අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාවික විද්\u200dයාවික විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද බ්\u200dරාජිල් වල සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිසා, පොර්තුජිලි පොර්තු ඒත් අපේ විධානය අනිත් භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්. පරීක්ෂණයක් පොර්තුගුලි භාෂාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්', 'so': 'Sida darteed qaababka leksis ku saleysan waa mid si cilmi badan u yaqaan, si loo caddayn karo qaybaha xafiiska iyo si fudud in loo soo diro codsiga kale, warqadan wuxuu ka bixiyaa qaabab cusub oo ku qoran afka xadgudubka iyo aqoonta hadalka nebcaalka ee ku saabsan shabakadda bulshada, kaas oo ku qoran dhibaato iyo cadaan iyo hadal cadaan oo ku saabsan macluumaadka joogtada ah. Sababta ugu daran commentarada isticmaalka bulshada ee Brazil iyo baahida waxbarashada Burtuqiis ee Burtuqiis ah waa afka Burtuqiis oo loo isticmaalay inuu xaqiijiyo modellada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qaababkayaga waxaa lagu codsan karaa luqad kale. Imtixaanka la sameeyay waxay muujiyaan shaqaalaha qaababka la soo jeeday, waxayna sameynayaan qaababka lagu soo qoray afka Burtuqiis.', 'ur': 'اس وجہ سے کہ ایک لکسیون کی بنیادی طریقہ بہت زیادہ اچھی طریقہ علمی سے ہے، جسے حل کی اجزائیں بیان کرتا ہے اور دوسری کاربریوں کے لئے آسان ہو جاتا ہے، یہ کاغذ ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے جو سوسیل میڈیا میں فساد کی زبان اور نفرت کی بات شناسایی کرتی ہے، جسے مشکل اور صریح فساد کی بات اور قسمیں کھائی جاتی ہیں جو برازیل میں سوسیل میڈیا مہربانی کی کمانٹوں کی سختی کے باعث، اور پورتوگل میں تحقیق کی کمی کے باعث، برازیل پورتوگل کی زبان موڈل کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے استعمال کی جاتی ہے. لیکن ہمارا طریقہ کسی اور زبان پر لازم ہو سکتا ہے۔ آزمائش کی آزمائش پرتغالی زبان کے لئے موجود بنسلین طریقے سے زیادہ فعالیت دکھاتی ہے۔', 'sr': 'Budući da je leksički pristup elegantniji znanstvenički, objašnjavajući komponente rješenja i lakše generalizirati druge aplikacije, ovaj papir pruža novi pristup uvrednim jezikom i detektacijom govora mržnje na društvenim medijima, koji uključuje leksion implicitnog i eksplicitnog ofanzivnog i zakletvog izraza koji su navedeni kontekstualnim informacijama. Zbog težine nasilnih komentara društvenih medija u Brazilu i nedostatka istraživanja na portugalskom jeziku Brazilski portugalski je jezik koji se koristi za potvrdu modela. Ipak, naš metod može biti primjenjen na bilo koji drugi jezik. Provedeni eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog pristupa, iznosi trenutne početne metode portugalskog jezika.', 'sv': 'Eftersom ett lexikonbaserat tillvägagångssätt är mer elegant vetenskapligt, förklarar lösningskomponenterna och är lättare att generalisera till andra applikationer, ger denna uppsats ett nytt tillvägagångssätt för kränkande språk och hattalsdetektering på sociala medier, vilket förkroppsligar ett lexikon av implicit och explicit kränkande och svärande uttryck kommenterade med kontextuell information. På grund av svårighetsgraden av de sociala mediernas kränkande kommentarerna i Brasilien, och bristen på forskning på portugisiska, är brasiliansk portugisiska språket som används för att validera modellerna. Ändå kan vår metod tillämpas på alla andra språk. De utförda experimenten visar hur effektivt det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet är, vilket överträffar de nuvarande basmetoderna för det portugisiska språket.', 'ta': 'ஒரு லெக்சிகான் அடிப்படையிலான செயல்பாடு அறிவியலாக உள்ளது, தீர்வு பொருள்களை விளக்கி, மற்ற பயன்பாடுகளுக்கு பொதுவாக்க எளிதாக இருக்கும் என்பதால், இந்த த தாள் நிரந்தரமான மொழிக்கை பிரேசிலில் உள்ள சமூக ஊடகங்கள் பயிற்சி குறிப்புகளின் கடுமையான காரணத்தால், ப்ராசிலியில் ஆராய்ச்சியின் குறைவு இல்லை ப்ராசிலி ஆனாலும், எங்கள் முறைமை எந்த மொழியிலும் பயன்படுத்தப்படும். செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட சோதனைகள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவை காட்டுகிறது, போர்த்துகீசிஷ் மொழிக்கு தற', 'uz': "Leksika asosida ma'lumotni aniqlash uchun juda qiziq qismi, o'zgarish qismlarini aniqlash va boshqa dasturlar uchun umumiy bo'lish mumkin. Bu hujjat jamiyat media'da hisoblanish va yomon gapirishni aniqlash uchun yangi usul yaratadi. Bu dokumenta ma'lumot bilan bog'liq va muvaffaqiyatli hisoblanishini aniqlaydi. Brazildagi jamiyat media ta'minlovchi izohlari darajasi sababi, Portugalcha taʼminlovchisi yoʻq sababi, Brazil portugisi tili modellarni to ʻgʻri qilish uchun ishlatiladi. Lekin, bizning usuli boshqa tilga qo'llash mumkin. Ishga tushirilgan imtiyozlar portugal tilning joriy baseline usullarini bajarish natijasida qo'llaniladi.", 'vi': 'Bởi vì một phương pháp từ ngữ hóa học khôn ngoan hơn, giải thích các thành phần giải pháp và dễ dàng tổng hợp với các ứng dụng khác, bài báo này cung cấp một phương pháp mới cho việc phát hiện ngôn ngữ tấn công và ghét thuật ngữ trên các phương tiện xã hội, mang tính ngữ văn của ngôn ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngầm và rõ ràng và chửi thề theo ghi chú bằng các thông tin ngữ ngữ ngữ. Do sự nghiêm trọng của các bình luận lạm dụng trên mạng xã hội ở Brazil, và sự thiếu nghiên cứu tại Bồ Đào Nha, Bồ Đào Nha Brazil là ngôn ngữ xác nhận các mô hình. Tuy nhiên, phương pháp của chúng ta có thể áp dụng cho bất kỳ ngôn ngữ khác. Các thí nghiệm đã tiến hành cho thấy hiệu quả của phương pháp được đề nghị vượt qua những phương pháp cơ bản hiện thời cho ngôn ngữ Bồ Đào Nha.', 'da': 'Da en leksikon-baseret tilgang er mere elegant videnskabeligt, forklarer løsningskomponenterne og er lettere at generalisere til andre applikationer, giver denne artikel en ny tilgang til stødende sprog og hadefulde taledetektion på sociale medier, som legemliggør et leksikon af implicitte og eksplicitte offensive og sværgende udtryk kommenteret med kontekstuel information. På grund af alvorligheden af de misbrugende kommentarer på sociale medier i Brasilien, og manglen på forskning på portugisisk, brasiliansk portugisisk er sproget, der bruges til at validere modellerne. Ikke desto mindre kan vores metode anvendes på ethvert andet sprog. De gennemførte forsøg viser effektiviteten af den foreslåede fremgangsmåde, der overgår de nuværende basismetoder for det portugisiske sprog.', 'nl': 'Aangezien een lexicon-gebaseerde benadering wetenschappelijk eleganter is, de oplossingscomponenten uitlegt en gemakkelijker te generaliseren is naar andere toepassingen, biedt dit artikel een nieuwe benadering voor beledigende taal en haatspraak detectie op sociale media, die een lexicon belichaamt van impliciete en expliciete beledigende en vloekende uitdrukkingen geannoteerd met contextuele informatie. Vanwege de ernst van de misbruikende reacties op sociale media in Brazilië, en het gebrek aan onderzoek in het Portugees, Braziliaans Portugees is de taal die wordt gebruikt om de modellen te valideren. Niettemin kan onze methode worden toegepast op elke andere taal. De uitgevoerde experimenten tonen de effectiviteit van de voorgestelde aanpak aan, die overtreft de huidige basismethoden voor de Portugese taal.', 'bg': 'Тъй като лексиконовият подход е по-елегантен научно, обяснявайки компонентите на решението и е по-лесен за обобщаване към други приложения, тази статия предлага нов подход за откриване на обиден език и реч на омраза в социалните медии, който въплъщава лексикон на имплицитни и експлицитни обидни и псувни изрази, анотирани с контекстуална информация. Поради сериозността на грубите коментари в социалните медии в Бразилия и липсата на изследвания на португалски език, бразилски португалски език е езикът, използван за валидиране на моделите. Въпреки това, нашият метод може да се прилага на всеки друг език. Проведените експерименти показват ефективността на предложения подход, надминавайки настоящите базови методи за португалския език.', 'hr': 'Budući da je leksički pristup elegantniji znanstvenički, objašnjavajući komponente rješenja i lakše generalizirati druge primjene, ovaj papir pruža novi pristup uvrednim jezikom i detekcijom govora mržnje na društvenim medijima, koji uključuje leksiju implicitnih i eksplicitih uvredljivih i zakletnih izraza koji su navedeni kontekstualnim informacijama. Zbog težine nasilnih komentara društvenih medija u Brazilu i nedostatka istraživanja na portugalskom jeziku Brazilski portugalski je jezik koji se koristi za potvrdu modela. Ipak, naš metod može biti primjenjen na bilo koji drugi jezik. Provedeni eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog pristupa, iznosi trenutne početne metode portugalskog jezika.', 'id': 'Karena pendekatan berdasarkan leksikon lebih elegan secara ilmiah, menjelaskan komponen solusi dan menjadi lebih mudah untuk menyebarkan ke aplikasi lain, kertas ini menyediakan pendekatan baru untuk bahasa offensive dan deteksi pidato benci di media sosial, yang mengangkut leksikon dari ekspresi offensive dan eksplisit dan bersumpah yang anotasi dengan informasi kontekstual. Karena keras komentar abusif media sosial di Brazil, dan kekurangan penelitian dalam bahasa Portugis, bahasa Portugis Brazil adalah bahasa yang digunakan untuk menentukan model. Namun, metode kita mungkin diterapkan pada bahasa lain. Eksperimen yang dilakukan menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan yang diusulkan, melebihi metode dasar saat ini untuk bahasa Portugis.', 'de': 'Da ein lexikon-basierter Ansatz wissenschaftlich eleganter ist, die Lösungskomponenten erklärt und einfacher auf andere Anwendungen verallgemeinert werden kann, bietet dieser Beitrag einen neuen Ansatz zur Erkennung von beleidigender Sprache und Hassrede in sozialen Medien, der ein Lexikon impliziter und expliziter beleidigender und fluchender Ausdrücke verkörpert, die mit Kontextinformationen kommentiert werden. Aufgrund der Schwere der missbräuchlichen Kommentare in den sozialen Medien in Brasilien und des Mangels an Forschung auf Portugiesisch ist Brasilianisches Portugiesisch die Sprache, die verwendet wird, um die Modelle zu validieren. Trotzdem kann unsere Methode auf jede andere Sprache angewendet werden. Die durchgeführten Experimente zeigen die Wirksamkeit des vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes und übertreffen die bisherigen Basismethoden für die portugiesische Sprache.', 'ko': '사전을 바탕으로 하는 방법이 더욱 과학적이고 해결 방안의 구성 부분을 설명하며 다른 응용에 널리 보급되기 쉽기 때문에 본고는 새로운 소셜 미디어 공격성 언어와 증오 음성 검출 방법을 제공했다. 이 방법은 상하문 정보의 주석을 가진 은식과 현식 공격성과 저주성 표현을 포함하는 사전을 포함한다.브라질 소셜미디어의 남용 평론의 심각성과 포르투갈어 연구의 부족으로 인해 브라질 포르투갈어는 모델을 검증하는 언어이다.그러나 우리의 방법은 다른 언어에 적용될 수 있다.진행된 실험은 이 방법의 유효성을 나타냈으며 현재 포르투갈어를 겨냥한 기선 방법보다 우수하다.', 'fa': 'به خاطر اینکه یک دستور بر اساس زبان\u200cشناسی زیبا\u200cتر از علمی است، توضیح بخش\u200cهای راه حل و ساده\u200cتر از آن برای عمومی به کاربردهای دیگر باشد، این کاغذ یک دستور جدید برای کشف زبان\u200cهای تجاوز و متنفر سخنرانی در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی می\u200cدهد، که به عنوان زبان\u200cشناسی\u200cهای غیرقابل و مشخص\u200cتر و سوگند\u200cخور به دلیل شدت توضیح\u200cهای تجاوز رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی در برزیل و ناتوانی تحقیقات در پورتوژیک، پورتوژیک برزیلی زبانی است که برای تصدیق کردن مدلها استفاده می\u200cشود. با این حال، روش ما ممکن است به هر زبان دیگری کاربرد شود. آزمایشات انجام شده\u200cها موثرت دستور پیشنهاد را نشان می\u200cدهند، بیشتر از روش\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط فعلی برای زبان پورتوژیک انجام می\u200cدهند.', 'tr': 'Leksika tabanly bir ýagdaý döwletlere köp taýýarlandyrylyp, çözüm taýýarlaryny düşündirmek we başga işlemlere a ňsat döwletlere düşündirmek üçin, bu kagyz sosyal medýýatlarda täze bir ýagdaý täze bir ýagdaý täze bir ýagdaý täze etýär we soňra görnüş we netijeli sözlerin sözlerini açmaklygy aňladýar. Bu ýagd Braziliýada sosyal medýýatlaryň ýalňyşlyk ýok terjimelerinden we portugalça araştyrmalaryň ýok bolmagyna sebäbi, Braziliýa portugalça modelleri takyklamak üçin ullanýan dildir. Yöne-de, biziň täzimiz başga dillere uygulanabilir. Döredilen deneyler teklip eden metodlaryň etkinliýetini, Portugalça dilinde häzirki baseline yönlerden çykyp gitýärler.', 'sw': 'Kwa kuwa mbinu za msingi wa lexico ni maarifa zaidi ya kisayansi, kuelezea vipengele vya suluhisho na kuwa rahisi kuzalisha matumizi mengine, gazeti hili linatoa mbinu mpya ya lugha ya uchochezi na kutambua hotuba ya chuki katika mitandao ya kijamii, ambazo zinaonyesha ukosoaji wa mashambulizi na matumizi ya wazi ya kushambulia na kutoa kiashiria cha taarifa za kisasa. Kutokana na ukatili wa maoni yanayotumiwa na mitandao ya kijamii nchini Brazil, na ukosefu wa utafiti wa Kireno, Kireno ya Brazil ni lugha inayotumiwa kuithibitisha mifano. Hata hivyo, njia yetu inaweza kutumika katika lugha yoyote. Majaribio yaliyoendeshwa yanaonyesha ufanisi wa mbinu zilizopendekezwa, kutengeneza mbinu za msingi za sasa za lugha ya Kireno.', 'af': "Omdat 'n lexikon-gebaseerde toegang meer elegante wetenskaplike is, verduidelik die oplossing komponente en makliker te wees om aan ander toepassings te genereer, verskaf hierdie papier 'n nuwe toegang vir offensiv taal en haat spraak beskrywing op sosiale media, wat 'n leksikon van inplisite en eksplisiese offensiv en sweer uitdrukkings wat met kontekslike inligting aangeteken is. Dus die grootheid van die sosiale media abusive kommentaar in Brazilie, en die ontbreek van resetting in Portugees, is Braziliese Portugees die taal gebruik om die modele te bevestig. Ons metode kan tog op enige ander taal toewend word. Die gedragte eksperimente vertoon die effektiviteit van die voorgestelde toegang, uitvoer die huidige basis metodes vir die Portugese taal.", 'sq': 'Meqenëse një qasje bazuar në leksikon është më elegante shkencorisht, duke shpjeguar përbërësit e zgjidhjes dhe duke qenë më e lehtë për të gjeneralizuar në aplikime të tjera, kjo letër ofron një qasje të re për zbulimin e gjuhës ofensive dhe të fjalës së urrejtjes në media sociale, e cila përfshin një leksikon të shprehjeve implicite dhe eksplicite ofensive dhe betimi anotuar me informacion kontekstual. Për shkak të rëndësisë së komenteve abusive të medias sociale në Brazil dhe mungesës së kërkimeve në portugal, portugali brasilez është gjuha e përdorur për të validuar modelet. Nevertheless, our method may be applied to any other language.  Eksperimentet e kryera tregojnë efektshmërinë e qasjes së propozuar, duke kaluar metodat e tanishme bazë për gjuhën portugale.', 'am': 'ለሌክሲኮን በመሠረት ባለው የሳይንቀሳቃዊ ሥርዓት፣ የሕግ ጉዳዮችን ለመግለጽ እና ለሌሎች ፕሮግራሞች ማወያየት ቀላል ሲሆን፣ ይህ ፕሮግራም በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ አዲስ የስቃይ ቋንቋ እና የጠል ንግግር አግኝቷል፡፡ በብራዚል በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የሚያስጨንቀው ትርጓሜዎች እና በፖርቱጋልኛ ውስጥ ምርምርጫዎች ስላልጎደለ የብራዚል ፖርቱጋሊስ ሞዴሎችን ለማስተካከል የተጠቃሚ ቋንቋ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን ልማዳችን በሌላ ቋንቋ ይደረጋል፡፡ በተፈተኑት ፈተናዎች የፖርቱጋሊስ ቋንቋ የአሁኑን የደረጃ ደረጃዎች የጥቅም ሥርዓት ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Leksiyona dayanan tərzim daha çox elmi olaraq, çözüm komponentlərini a çıqlayır və digər proqramlara daha asan olaraq, bu kağıt sosyal mediyalarda həddi aşan dil və nifrət sözlərini keşfetmək üçün yeni bir tərzim sağlar, bu da müxtəlif məlumatlardan əlavə edilən, açıq-aydın offensiv və yemin ifadələrinin sözlərini ifadə edir. Braziliyadakı sosyal media istifadə edən şəhadətlərin ağırlığına görə və Portugalca araştırma yoxdur, Braziliyan portugalca modelləri təsdiqləmək üçün istifadə edilən dildir. Ancaq, metodumuz başqa dillərə uyğulanabilir. İşləndirilən təcrübələrin təcrübəsinin etkinliğini göstərir, Portugalca dilinin günlük təcrübəsinin təcrübəsinin təcrübəsini artırar.', 'bn': 'যেহেতু একটি লেক্সিকোর ভিত্তিক উপায় বেশী বৈজ্ঞানিক বিজ্ঞানিক, সমাধানের উপাদান ব্যাখ্যা করে এবং অন্য অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের সাথে জেনারেল করার জন্য সহজ, এই পাতাটি সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় আক্রান্ত ভাষা এবং  ব্রাজিলে সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের অত্যাচারী মন্তব্যের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এবং পর্তুগীজে গবেষণার অভাবের কারণে ব্রাজিলীয় পোর্টুগীজি মড তবুও, আমাদের পদ্ধতি অন্য কোন ভাষায় প্রযোজ্য হতে পারে। পর্তুগীজ ভাষার বর্তমান বেসালাইন পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করা হচ্ছে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির কার্যক্রম।', 'bs': 'Budući da je leksički pristup elegantniji znanstvenički, objašnjavajući komponente rješenja i lakše generalizirati druge aplikacije, ovaj papir pruža novi pristup uvrednim jezikom i otkrivanju govora mržnje na društvenim medijima, koji uključuje leksion implicitnih i eksplicitnih ofanzivnih i zakletnih izraza koje su navedene kontekstualnim informacijama. Zbog težine nasilnih komentara društvenih medija u Brazilu, a nedostatak istraživanja na portugalskom jeziku Brazilski portugalski je jezik koji se koristi za potvrdu modela. Ipak, naš metod može biti primjenjen na bilo koji drugi jezik. Provedeni eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog pristupa, iznosi trenutne početne metode portugalskog jezika.', 'ca': "Com que un enfocament basat en lexicons és més elegant científicament, explicant els components de solució i ser més fàcil de generalitzar-se a altres aplicacions, aquest article proporciona un nou enfocament per la detecció de llenguatges ofensius i discursos d'odi als mitjans socials, que incorpora un lexicon d'expressions ofensives i juradores implícites i explícites anotats amb informació contextual. A causa de la gravetat dels comentaris abusivs dels mitjans socials al Brasil, i la falta de recerca en portuguès, el portuguès brasiler és la llengua utilitzada per validar els models. No obstant això, el nostre mètode pot ser aplicat a qualsevol altre llenguatge. Els experiments conduïts demostren l'eficacia de l'enfocament proposat, superant els mètodes de base actuals de la llengua portuguesa.", 'hy': 'Քանի որ լեքսիկոնի հիմնված մոտեցումը ավելի էլեգանտ է գիտականորեն, բացատրում է լուծումների բաղադրիչները և ավելի հեշտ է ընդհանուր ընթացքում ընդհանուր ծրագրերի համար, այս թղթին առաջարկում է նոր մոտեցում սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների վրա գրավող լեզուների և ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերման համար, որը ներկայացնում է ենթադրական և բա Որովհետև Բրազիլիայում սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների չարաշահումների ծանրությունը և պորտուգալերեն ուսումնասիրությունների բացակայությունը, Բրազիլիայի պորտուգալերեն լեզուն է, որը օգտագործվում է մոդելների հավասարման համար: Nevertheless, our method may be applied to any other language.  Աշխատեցված փորձերը ցույց են տալիս առաջարկված մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը, որը գերազանցում է պորտուգալիացի լեզվի ներկայիս հիմնական մեթոդները:', 'cs': 'Vzhledem k tomu, že přístup založený na lexikonu je vědecky elegantnější, vysvětluje složky řešení a je snadnější zobecnit na jiné aplikace, tento článek přináší nový přístup k detekci urážlivého jazyka a nenávistné řeči na sociálních médiích, který ztělesňuje lexikon implicitních a explicitních urážlivých a nadávaných výrazů anotovaných kontextovými informacemi. Vzhledem k závažnosti zneužívajících komentářů sociálních médií v Brazílii a nedostatku výzkumu v portugalštině je brazilská portugalština jazykem používaným k ověření modelů. Nicméně, naše metoda může být aplikována na jakýkoliv jiný jazyk. Provedené experimenty ukazují efektivitu navrhovaného přístupu, který překonává současné základní metody pro portugalský jazyk.', 'et': 'Kuna leksikonil põhinev lähenemine on teaduslikult elegantsem, selgitades lahenduse komponente ja seda on lihtsam üldistada teistele rakendustele, pakub käesolev töö uut lähenemisviisi solvava keele ja vihakõne tuvastamiseks sotsiaalmeedias, mis kehastab kaudsete ja selgete solvavate ja vanduvate väljendite leksikoni kontekstiteabega märgitud. Brasiilia sotsiaalmeedia kuritarvitavate kommentaaride raskuse tõttu ja portugalikeelsete uuringute puudumise tõttu on mudelite valideerimiseks kasutatav Brasiilia portugali keel. Sellegipoolest võib meie meetodit rakendada mis tahes muus keeles. Teostatud katsed näitavad kavandatud lähenemisviisi tõhusust, ületades portugali keele praeguseid baasmeetodeid.', 'fi': 'Koska sanastoon perustuva lähestymistapa on tieteellisesti elegantti, selittää ratkaisun komponentit ja on helpompi yleistää muihin sovelluksiin, tämä artikkeli tarjoaa uuden lähestymistavan loukkaavan kielen ja vihapuheen havaitsemiseen sosiaalisessa mediassa, joka ilmentää implisiittisten ja eksplisiittisten loukkaavien ja kiroilevien ilmaisujen sanastoa kontekstitiedoilla. Brasilian sosiaalisen median loukkaavien kommenttien vakavuuden ja portugalin kielen puutteen vuoksi mallien validoinnissa käytetään Brasilian portugalia. Menetelmäämme voidaan kuitenkin soveltaa mihin tahansa muuhun kieleen. Tutkimukset osoittivat ehdotetun lähestymistavan tehokkuuden, sillä se ylitti portugalin kielen nykyiset perusmenetelmät.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh leksik sabanjuré luwih apik saiki, akeh nglanggar sapun diolah sing bakal nggawe aplikasi sing wis ana nggawe nguasai perusahaan anyar nggawe winih dhéwé lan nglanggar kuwi kesempatan online, winih dhéwé kesempatan awak dhéwé kesempatan lan akeh iso nglanggar ujaran oleh nggawe informasi tambah akeh nggagal. Tang langkung wih karo perkaran kanggo komentar tentang media sotiki nang Brazzali, lan ora ono ranjut kanggo ngilanggar portugis, portugis Brazzali sing lengguyu perusahaan kanggo ngerasai model. Nanging, ketahan-ketahan iso nguasakno ning limo sing wis ana. Awak dhéwé éntuk sing ngerasakno nggawe efek nggawe gerakan sing nggawe gerakan, nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang portugis.', 'ha': "Daga da wani hanyor a kan leksikon ya fi fahimta ga fassarar masu da sani, kuma yana da sauƙi zuwa masu shiryuwa da wasu shiryoyin ayuka, wannan takarda yana da wata hanyoyi wa lugha ƙiyayya da gane na ƙi a kan zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane a kan mitandaki masu jami, wanda yana ƙunsa a cikin littafan mataimaki da bayani mai aibanta da kuma magana masu rantsuwa wanda aka yi na zartar da ma'anar aiki. Dukan girgije wa mataimaki na mitanda na jamii a cikin Bjerzil, kuma bã da ƙaranci karatun a cikin Kirangiz, harshen Breziliya ne wanda aka yi amfani da su gaskata misãlai. A lokacin da, za'a iya amfani da hanyarmu ga wani harshe na dabam. Ana nuna mazaɓa na zaɓen aikin da aka yi niyyar da shi, kuma yana samar da shiryoyin ayuka da ake kai yanzu wa harshen Portugal.", 'sk': 'Ker je pristop, ki temelji na leksikonu, znanstveno elegantnejši, pojasnjuje komponente rešitve in ga je lažje posplošiti v druge aplikacije, ta prispevek ponuja nov pristop za ugotavljanje žaljivega jezika in sovražnega govora na družbenih omrežjih, ki uteleša leksikon implicitnih in eksplicitnih žaljivih in prekletih izrazov z oznakami kontekstualnih informacij. Zaradi resnosti zlorabljajočih komentarjev na družbenih medijih v Braziliji in pomanjkanja raziskav v portugalščini je brazilska portugalščina jezik, ki se uporablja za validacijo modelov. Kljub temu se lahko naša metoda uporablja v katerem koli drugem jeziku. Izvedeni poskusi kažejo učinkovitost predlaganega pristopa, ki presega trenutne osnovne metode za portugalski jezik.', 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིན་མིན་ཐག་ཡིན་ལས། གནད་དོན་གྱི་ཆ་ཤས་དེ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལས་ཕར་ཆེ་བ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་མ་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་དང་ སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལག་ལེན་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་བྱ་ཚིག་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་བརྟེན། བྷི་ར་ཛིས་portugalབ་ལ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་མི་འདུག ཡིན་ནའང་དེའི་རྒྱུ་ལམ་དེ་ཞིག་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་རེད། ངལ་ཚོགས་བྱས་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་དེ་གིས་སྔོན་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ལྟར་ན། ད་ལྟོའི་རྨན་གཞི་རྩིས་གཞི་ལམ་ལ', 'he': 'מאחר שגישה מבוססת על לקסיקון היא יותר אלגנטית מבחינה מדעית, להסביר את המרכיבים של הפתרון ולהיות קל יותר להתפשט ליישומים אחרים, העיתון הזה מספק גישה חדשה לגילוי שפת פגיעה ושנאי שנאה בתקשורת חברתית, שמכילה לקסיקון של ביטויים פגיעים ובטחים מפורקים ומבוטחים מוצבים עם מידע קונטקסטי. בגלל הקשה של הערות התעללות של התקשורת החברתית בברזיל, והחוסר מחקר בפורטוגזית, הפורטוגזית הברזילית היא השפה שמשתמשת לאשר את הדוגמנים. Nevertheless, our method may be applied to any other language.  הניסויים המבצעים מראים את היעילות של הגישה המוצעת, מעלית את שיטות הבסיס הנוכחיות לשפה הפורטוגזית.'}
{'en': 'Comparative Analysis of Fine-tuned Deep Learning Language Models for ICD-10 Classification Task for Bulgarian Language', 'ar': 'تحليل مقارن لنماذج لغة التعلم العميق المضبوطة لمهمة تصنيف ICD-10 للغة البلغارية', 'pt': 'Análise Comparativa de Modelos de Linguagem de Aprendizado Profundo Ajustados para Tarefa de Classificação ICD-10 para Língua Búlgara', 'fr': "Analyse comparative de modèles de langage d'apprentissage profond affinés pour la tâche de classification CIM-10 pour la langue bulgare", 'hi': 'बल्गेरियाई भाषा के लिए आईसीडी -10 वर्गीकरण कार्य के लिए ठीक-ठाक डीप लर्निंग लैंग्वेज मॉडल का तुलनात्मक विश्लेषण', 'zh': '保加利亚语ICD-10分务之微,深习言语', 'ja': 'ブルガリア語のICD -10分類タスクのための微調整された深層学習言語モデルの比較分析', 'es': 'Análisis comparativo de modelos lingüísticos de aprendizaje profundo ajustados para la tarea de clasificación de la CIE-10 para el idioma búlgaro', 'ga': 'Anailís Chomparáideach ar Mhúnlaí Teanga Dhomhainfhoghlama do Thasc Aicmithe ICD-10 don Bhulgáiris', 'ru': 'Сравнительный анализ хорошо отлаженных моделей глубокого изучения языка для задачи классификации МКБ-10 для болгарского языка', 'hu': 'Finomhangolt mélytanulási modellek összehasonlító elemzése a bolgár nyelv ICD-10 osztályozási feladataihoz', 'el': 'Συγκριτική ανάλυση λεπτομερώς συντονισμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων βαθιάς μάθησης για την εργασία ταξινόμησης για τη βουλγαρική γλώσσα', 'ka': 'ICD-10 კლასიფიკაციის დავალების ბულდარიური ენათის კლასიფიკაციის მოდელების კონფიკაციური ანალიზი', 'kk': 'Болгария тілінің ICD- 10 классификациялау тапсырмасы үшін Fine- tuned Deep Learning Language Models салыстырылған анализ', 'it': 'Analisi comparativa dei modelli linguistici di apprendimento profondo perfezionati per il compito di classificazione ICD-10 per la lingua bulgara', 'mk': 'Парационална анализа на фино прилагодени модели на јазик на длабоко учење за ICD- 10 класификациска задача за бугарски јазик', 'ms': 'Analisi Comparative of Fine-tuned Deep Learning Language Models for ICD-10 Classification Task for Bulgarian Language', 'mt': 'Analiżi komparattiva ta’ Mudelli ta’ Lingwa ta’ Tagħlim fil-fond aġġustati bir-reqqa għal Kompitu ta’ Klassifikazzjoni ICD-10 għal Lingwa Bulgara', 'ml': 'ഐസിഡി- 10 ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d ടാസ്ക് വേണ്ടി ബുള്\u200dഗേരിയന്\u200d ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d താല്\u200dക്കാല', 'no': 'Sammenligg analyse av finnstillingsspråk-læringsmodeller for ICD-10 klassifikasjonsverkt for bulgarsk språk', 'lt': 'Palyginamoji išsamaus mokymosi kalbos modelių analizė, skirta ICD-10 klasifikavimo užduotims Bulgarijos kalba', 'pl': 'Analiza porównawcza dostrojonych modeli języka głębokiego uczenia się dla zadania klasyfikacji ICD-10 dla języka bułgarskiego', 'mn': 'ICD-10 Болгарийн хэл дахь классификацийн даалгаварын төвөгтэй гүн суралцах хэл загваруудын харьцуулалтын шинжилгээ', 'so': 'Analysis is of Fine-tuned Deep Learn Language Models for ICD-10 Classification Task for Bulgarian language', 'sv': 'Jämförande analys av finjusterade språkmodeller för djupinlärning för ICD-10 klassificeringsuppgift för bulgariska språk', 'si': 'බුල්ගරියාන් භාෂාව සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණ විශේෂණය', 'sr': 'Prepoređena analiza modela dubokog učenja jezika za klasifikaciju ICD-10 za bugarski jezik', 'ta': 'Name', 'ro': 'Analiza comparativă a modelelor lingvistice de învățare profundă reglate fin pentru sarcina de clasificare ICD-10 pentru limba bulgară', 'ur': 'بلغاریی زبان کے لئے فین ٹونڈ ڈیپ سیکھنے کی زبان موڈل کے مقابلہ تحلیل', 'uz': 'Comparative Analysis of Fine-tuned Deep Learning Language Models for ICD-10 Classification Task for Bulgarian Language', 'vi': 'Mô hình ngôn ngữ học sâu hoàn chỉnh Đối với ICD-10 Nhiệm vụ phân tích ngôn ngữ Bulgaria', 'nl': 'Vergelijkende analyse van verfijnde Deep Learning Taalmodellen voor ICD-10 Classificatietaak voor Bulgaarse Taal', 'hr': 'Premjerena analiza modela dubokog učenja jezika fino-navedenog jezika za ICD-10 klasifikacijski zadatak Bugarskog jezika', 'da': 'Sammenlignende analyse af finjusterede sprogmodeller for dyb læring til ICD-10 klassifikationsopgave for bulgarsk sprog', 'bg': 'Сравнителен анализ на фино настроени езикови модели за дълбоко обучение за класификационна задача на МКД-10 за български език', 'de': 'Vergleichende Analyse fein abgestimmter Deep Learning Sprachmodelle für ICD-10 Klassifikationsaufgaben für Bulgarische Sprache', 'id': 'Analisi Comparative of Fine-tuned Deep Learning Language Models for ICD-10 Classification Task for Bulgarian Language', 'fa': 'تحلیل مقایسه\u200cای از مدل\u200cهای یادگیری زبان\u200cهای عمیق تنظیم\u200cشده پاکیزه برای کلاس\u200cشناسی ICD-10 برای زبان بولگاری', 'ko': '불가리아어 ICD-10 분류 임무 미조정 심도 학습 언어 모델의 비교 분석', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi unaofanana na Modeli ya Kufunza Lugha za Kizuri kwa ajili ya kazi ya Makasiliano ya ICD-10 kwa lugha ya Bulgaria', 'af': 'Vergelyklike Analisie van Fine-tuned Deep Learning Language Models vir ICD-10 Klassifikasie Taak vir Bulgaarske Taal', 'sq': 'Analiza krahasuese e modeleve të mësimit të thellë të përshtatshëm të gjuhës për detyrën e klasifikimit ICD-10 për gjuhën bullgare', 'tr': 'ICD-10 Bulgarça Diller üçin Gaty Derje öwrenmek Modelleri', 'am': 'ቋንቋዎች', 'hy': 'Բալգարենի լեզվի IPD-10 դասակարգման խնդրի բարձրացված խորը սովորման լեզվի մոդելների համեմատական վերլուծությունը', 'az': 'ICD-10 Bulgarlıq Dili üçün Sınıflama Görünüş Görünüş İyi-ayarlanmış Derin Öyrənmə Dili Modelləri', 'bn': 'বুলগেরিয়ার ভাষার জন্য ICD-10 ক্লাসিকেশন কাজের জন্য ভাষা শিক্ষা মোডেলের তুলনায় বিশ্লেষণ', 'bs': 'Preporavna analiza modela dubokog učenja jezika za ICD-10 klasifikacijski zadatak Bugarskog jezika', 'ca': "Anàlisi comparatiu de models de llenguatge d'aprenentatge profund millorat per a la tasca de classificació ICD-10 per a la llengua búlgara", 'cs': 'Srovnávací analýza jemně vyladěných jazykových modelů hlubokého učení pro klasifikační úlohu ICD-10 pro bulharský jazyk', 'et': 'Bulgaaria keele ICD-10 klassifitseerimis체lesande t채psustatud s체gav천ppe keelemudelite v천rdlev anal체체s', 'fi': 'Vertaileva analyysi syvällisen oppimisen kielimalleista ICD-10 luokitustehtävään bulgarian kielelle', 'jv': 'Perintah Taal Fine-tuned deep Learning Language', 'sk': 'Primerjalna analiza izpopolnjenih jezikovnih modelov globokega učenja za klasifikacijsko nalogo ICD-10 za bolgarski jezik', 'ha': 'Analyze of Fine- tuned Depth Learn Lugha for ICD-10 Classification Tafiyar wa Bulgaria', 'he': 'Analysis Comparative of Fine-tuned Deep Learning Language Models for ICD-10 Classification Task for Bulgarian Language', 'bo': 'བཟོ་བཅོས་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་བརྗོད་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་Bulgarian Language'}
{'en': 'The task of automatic diagnosis encoding into standard medical classifications and ontologies, is of great importance in medicine-both to support the daily tasks of physicians in the preparation and reporting of clinical documentation, and for automatic processing of clinical reports. In this paper we investigate the application and performance of different deep learning transformers for automatic encoding in ICD-10 of clinical texts in Bulgarian. The comparative analysis attempts to find which approach is more efficient to be used for fine-tuning of pretrained BERT family transformer to deal with a specific domain terminology on a rare language as Bulgarian. On the one side are used SlavicBERT and MultiligualBERT, that are pretrained for common vocabulary in Bulgarian, but lack medical terminology. On the other hand in the analysis are used BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, that are pretrained for medical terminology in English, but lack training for language models in Bulgarian, and more over for vocabulary in Cyrillic. In our research study all BERT models are fine-tuned with additional medical texts in Bulgarian and then applied to the classification task for encoding medical diagnoses in Bulgarian into ICD-10 codes. Big corpora of diagnosis in Bulgarian annotated with ICD-10 codes is used for the classification task. Such an analysis gives a good idea of which of the models would be suitable for tasks of a similar type and domain. The experiments and evaluation results show that both approaches have comparable accuracy.', 'fr': "La tâche de codage automatique du diagnostic dans les classifications et ontologies médicales standard est d'une grande importance en médecine - à la fois pour soutenir les tâches quotidiennes des médecins dans la préparation et le reporting de la documentation clinique, et pour le traitement automatique des rapports cliniques. Dans cet article, nous étudions l'application et les performances de différents transformateurs d'apprentissage profond pour l'encodage automatique dans la CIM-10 de textes cliniques en bulgare. L'analyse comparative tente de trouver l'approche la plus efficace à utiliser pour affiner le transformateur de la famille BERT préentraîné afin de traiter une terminologie de domaine spécifique sur une langue rare comme le bulgare. D'un côté sont utilisés SlavicBert et MultiLiguAlbert, qui sont préformés pour le vocabulaire courant en bulgare, mais manquent de terminologie médicale. D'autre part, dans l'analyse, on utilise BioBert, ClinicAlbert, Sapbert, BlueBert, qui sont préformés à la terminologie médicale en anglais, mais manquent de formation pour les modèles linguistiques en bulgare, et plus encore pour le vocabulaire en cyrillique. Dans notre étude de recherche, tous les modèles BERT sont affinés avec des textes médicaux supplémentaires en bulgare, puis appliqués à la tâche de classification pour coder les diagnostics médicaux en bulgare dans les codes CIM-10. De grands corpus de diagnostic en bulgare annotés avec les codes CIM-10 sont utilisés pour la tâche de classification. Une telle analyse donne une bonne idée du modèle qui conviendrait à des tâches d'un type et d'un domaine similaires. Les expériences et\nles résultats de l'évaluation montrent que les deux approches ont une précision comparable.", 'ar': 'تعتبر مهمة ترميز التشخيص التلقائي في التصنيفات الطبية القياسية والأنطولوجيا ذات أهمية كبيرة في الطب - لدعم المهام اليومية للأطباء في إعداد وتقديم التقارير السريرية ، وكذلك للمعالجة التلقائية للتقارير السريرية. في هذا البحث قمنا بدراسة تطبيق وأداء محولات التعلم العميق المختلفة للترميز التلقائي في ICD-10 للنصوص السريرية باللغة البلغارية. يحاول التحليل المقارن العثور على النهج الأكثر فعالية لاستخدامه في ضبط محولات عائلة BERT سابقة التدريب للتعامل مع مصطلحات مجال معينة على لغة نادرة مثل اللغة البلغارية. من ناحية ، يتم استخدام SlavicBERT و MultiligualBERT ، والتي تم اختبارها مسبقًا للمفردات الشائعة في اللغة البلغارية ، ولكنها تفتقر إلى المصطلحات الطبية. من ناحية أخرى ، يتم استخدام BioBERT و ClinicalBERT و SapBERT و BlueBERT في التحليل ، والتي تم تدريبها مسبقًا للمصطلحات الطبية باللغة الإنجليزية ، ولكنها تفتقر إلى التدريب على نماذج اللغة باللغة البلغارية ، وأكثر من ذلك للمفردات باللغة السيريلية. في دراستنا البحثية ، تم ضبط جميع نماذج BERT بدقة بنصوص طبية إضافية باللغة البلغارية ثم تطبيقها على مهمة التصنيف لترميز التشخيصات الطبية باللغة البلغارية إلى رموز ICD-10. يتم استخدام مجموعة كبيرة من التشخيصات باللغة البلغارية مشروحة برموز ICD-10 لمهمة التصنيف. يعطي مثل هذا التحليل فكرة جيدة عن أي من النماذج سيكون مناسبًا لمهام من نفس النوع والمجال. التجارب و\nتظهر نتائج التقييم أن كلا النهجين لديهما دقة قابلة للمقارنة.', 'pt': 'A tarefa de codificação automática de diagnósticos em classificações e ontologias médicas padrão é de grande importância na medicina - tanto para apoiar as tarefas diárias dos médicos na preparação e elaboração de documentação clínica, quanto para o processamento automático de relatórios clínicos. Neste artigo investigamos a aplicação e o desempenho de diferentes transformadores de aprendizado profundo para codificação automática na CID-10 de textos clínicos em búlgaro. A análise comparativa tenta encontrar qual abordagem é mais eficiente para ser usada no ajuste fino do transformador da família BERT pré-treinado para lidar com uma terminologia de domínio específica em um idioma raro como o búlgaro. Por um lado são usados SlavicBERT e MultiligualBERT, que são pré-treinados para vocabulário comum em búlgaro, mas carecem de terminologia médica. Por outro lado, na análise são usados BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, que são pré-treinados para terminologia médica em inglês, mas carecem de treinamento para modelos de linguagem em búlgaro e mais para vocabulário em cirílico. Em nosso estudo de pesquisa, todos os modelos BERT são ajustados com textos médicos adicionais em búlgaro e, em seguida, aplicados à tarefa de classificação para codificar diagnósticos médicos em búlgaro em códigos CID-10. Grande corpora de diagnóstico em búlgaro anotado com códigos CID-10 é usado para a tarefa de classificação. Essa análise dá uma boa ideia de qual dos modelos seria adequado para tarefas de tipo e domínio semelhantes. Os experimentos e\nos resultados da avaliação mostram que ambas as abordagens têm precisão comparável.', 'ja': '標準的な医療分類とオントロジーにエンコードする自動診断のタスクは、臨床ドキュメントの準備と報告における医師の日常的なタスクと、臨床レポートの自動処理の両方をサポートするために、医学において非常に重要です。 本稿では、ブルガリア語の臨床テキストのICD -10における自動符号化のためのさまざまなディープラーニング変換の応用と性能について検討する。 比較分析は、ブルガリア語などの希少な言語の特定のドメイン用語を扱うために、事前に訓練されたBERTファミリー変圧器の微調整に使用されるより効率的なアプローチを見つけることを試みる。 一方で、ブルガリア語で一般的な語彙のために事前に訓練されているが、医学用語が不足しているSlavicBERTとMultiligualBERTが使用されている。 一方、分析では、BioBERT、ClinicalBERT、SapBERT、BlueBERTが使用されており、これらは英語の医学用語のために事前に訓練されていますが、ブルガリア語の言語モデルのための訓練が不足しており、キリル文字の語彙のために使用されています。 私たちの研究では、すべてのBERTモデルはブルガリア語の追加の医療テキストで微調整され、ブルガリア語の医療診断をICD -10コードにエンコードするための分類タスクに適用されます。 分類タスクには、ICD -10コードで注釈されたブルガリア語の診断の大きなコーパスが使用されています。 このような分析は、どのモデルが類似のタイプおよびドメインのタスクに適しているかについての良いアイデアを提供する。\n評価結果は、両方のアプローチが同等の精度を有することを示している。', 'es': 'La tarea de codificar el diagnóstico automático en clasificaciones y ontologías médicas estándar es de gran importancia en medicina, tanto para apoyar las tareas diarias de los médicos en la preparación y presentación de informes de la documentación clínica como para el procesamiento automático de informes clínicos. En este artículo investigamos la aplicación y el rendimiento de diferentes transformadores de aprendizaje profundo para la codificación automática en la CIE-10 de textos clínicos en búlgaro. El análisis comparativo intenta encontrar qué enfoque es más eficiente para ajustar el transformador de la familia BERT previamente entrenado para tratar una terminología de dominio específica en un idioma raro como el búlgaro. Por un lado se utilizan Slavicbert y MultiLiguAlbert, que están preentrenados para el vocabulario común en búlgaro, pero carecen de terminología médica. Por otro lado, en el análisis se utilizan BioBert, ClinicAlbert, Sapbert, BlueBert, que están preentrenados para la terminología médica en inglés, pero carecen de formación para modelos lingüísticos en búlgaro, y más aún para el vocabulario en cirílico. En nuestro estudio de investigación, todos los modelos BERT se ajustan con textos médicos adicionales en búlgaro y luego se aplican a la tarea de clasificación para codificar diagnósticos médicos en búlgaro en códigos ICD-10. Para la tarea de clasificación se utilizan grandes cuerpos de diagnóstico en búlgaro anotados con códigos ICD-10. Este análisis da una buena idea de cuál de los modelos sería adecuado para tareas de un tipo y dominio similar. Los experimentos y\nlos resultados de la evaluación muestran que ambos enfoques tienen una precisión comparable.', 'zh': '自编码医学之类,本体之要 - 既持医者备告临床文档之常务,亦施于临床告者自处之。 本文研异深度学习转换器在保加利亚语临床文本ICD-10中自编码用性。 较量试图,更有效者,以微调预练之BERT系列变压器,以处希有言语(如保加利亚语)上特定领域术语。 一用SlavicBERTMultiligualBERT,其于保加利亚语中常见词汇豫为训练,而乏医术语。 其一,析用BioBERT,ClinicalBERTSapBERTBlueBERT,预先训练于英语之术语,而阙保加利亚语之训,而西里尔文之词汇益多。 凡诸BERT法,皆用保加利亚语之他医学文本,然后施于分类,以将保加利亚语中医学诊编码为ICD-10代码。 以ICD-10代码注保加利亚语诊语料库以类事。 此可以善知类和域之任也。 实验和\n评估结果表明,二法相当准确性。', 'ru': 'Задача автоматического кодирования диагностики в стандартные медицинские классификации и онтологии, имеет большое значение в медицине - как для поддержки повседневных задач врачей при подготовке и составлении клинической документации, так и для автоматической обработки клинических отчетов. В этой статье мы исследуем применение и производительность различных глубоких обучающих трансформаторов для автоматического кодирования в ICD-10 клинических текстов на болгарском языке. Сравнительный анализ пытается определить, какой подход более эффективен для тонкой настройки предварительно обученного трансформатора семейства BERT, чтобы иметь дело с конкретной терминологией в такой редкой области, как болгарский язык. С одной стороны используются SlavicBERT и MultiligualBERT, которые предварительно обучены общей лексике на болгарском языке, но не имеют медицинской терминологии. С другой стороны, в анализе используются BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, которые предварительно подготовлены для медицинской терминологии на английском языке, но не имеют подготовки для языковых моделей на болгарском языке, и больше для словарного запаса на кириллице. В нашем исследовании все модели BERT дорабатываются с дополнительными медицинскими текстами на болгарском языке, а затем применяются к задаче классификации для кодирования медицинских диагнозов на болгарском языке в коды МКБ-10. Для целей классификации используются крупные диагнозы на болгарском языке, аннотированные кодами МКБ-10. Такой анализ дает хорошее представление о том, какая из моделей подходит для задач аналогичного типа и домена.\nрезультаты оценки показывают, что оба подхода имеют сопоставимую точность.', 'ga': 'Tá an tasc a bhaineann le diagnóis uathoibríoch a ionchódú isteach in aicmithe caighdeánacha leighis agus ontologies, thar a bheith tábhachtach sa leigheas - chun tacú le tascanna laethúla na lianna in ullmhú agus i dtuairisciú doiciméadú cliniciúil, agus chun tuarascálacha cliniciúla a phróiseáil go huathoibríoch. Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid imscrúdú ar fheidhmiú agus ar fheidhmíocht claochladáin éagsúla foghlama domhain le haghaidh ionchódú uathoibríoch i ICD-10 de théacsanna cliniciúla sa Bhulgáiris. Déantar iarracht san anailís chomparáideach a fháil amach cén cur chuige is éifeachtaí le húsáid chun mionchoigeartú a dhéanamh ar chlaochladán teaghlaigh BERT réamhoilte chun déileáil le téarmaíocht fearainn ar leith ar theanga neamhchoitianta mar Bhulgáiris. Ar thaobh amháin úsáidtear SlavicBERT agus MultiligualBERT, atá réamhthraenáilte le haghaidh foclóir coitianta sa Bhulgáiris, ach nach bhfuil téarmaíocht leighis in easnamh orthu. Ar an taobh eile den anailís úsáidtear BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, atá réamhoilte do théarmaíocht leighis an Bhéarla, ach nach bhfuil oiliúint acu ar mhúnlaí teanga sa Bhulgáiris, agus níos mó fós le haghaidh stór focal Coireallach. Inár staidéar taighde déantar gach samhail BERT a mhionchoigeartú le téacsanna leighis breise sa Bhulgáiris agus ansin cuirtear i bhfeidhm iad ar an tasc aicmithe chun diagnóisí leighis sa Bhulgáiris a ionchódú i gcóid ICD-10. Baintear úsáid as corpas mór diagnóis sa Bhulgáiris atá anótáilte le cóid ICD-10 don tasc aicmithe. Tugann anailís dá leithéid smaoineamh maith ar cé acu de na múnlaí a bheadh oiriúnach do thascanna den chineál céanna agus d’fhearann comhchosúil. Na turgnaimh agus\nLéiríonn torthaí meastóireachta go bhfuil cruinneas inchomparáide ag an dá chur chuige.', 'hi': 'मानक चिकित्सा वर्गीकरण और ontologies में स्वचालित निदान एन्कोडिंग का कार्य, चिकित्सा में बहुत महत्व का है - दोनों नैदानिक प्रलेखन की तैयारी और रिपोर्टिंग में चिकित्सकों के दैनिक कार्यों का समर्थन करने के लिए, और नैदानिक रिपोर्टों के स्वचालित प्रसंस्करण के लिए। इस पेपर में हम बल्गेरियाई में नैदानिक ग्रंथों के आईसीडी -10 में स्वचालित एन्कोडिंग के लिए विभिन्न गहरी सीखने के ट्रांसफार्मर के आवेदन और प्रदर्शन की जांच करते हैं। तुलनात्मक विश्लेषण यह पता लगाने का प्रयास करता है कि बल्गेरियाई के रूप में एक दुर्लभ भाषा पर एक विशिष्ट डोमेन शब्दावली से निपटने के लिए प्रीट्रेन्ड BERT परिवार के ट्रांसफॉर्मर की ठीक-ट्यूनिंग के लिए कौन सा दृष्टिकोण अधिक कुशल है। एक तरफ स्लावबर्ट और बहुलैंगिकBERT का उपयोग किया जाता है, जो बल्गेरियाई में आम शब्दावली के लिए पूर्वनिर्धारित हैं, लेकिन चिकित्सा शब्दावली की कमी है। दूसरी ओर विश्लेषण में BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT का उपयोग किया जाता है, जो अंग्रेजी में चिकित्सा शब्दावली के लिए पूर्वनिर्धारित हैं, लेकिन बल्गेरियाई में भाषा मॉडल के लिए प्रशिक्षण की कमी है, और सिरिलिक में शब्दावली के लिए अधिक है। हमारे शोध अध्ययन में सभी BERT मॉडल बल्गेरियाई में अतिरिक्त चिकित्सा ग्रंथों के साथ ठीक ट्यून किए जाते हैं और फिर आईसीडी -10 कोड में बल्गेरियाई में चिकित्सा निदान को एन्कोडिंग करने के लिए वर्गीकरण कार्य पर लागू होते हैं। आईसीडी -10 कोड के साथ एनोटेट किए गए बल्गेरियाई में निदान के बड़े निगम का उपयोग वर्गीकरण कार्य के लिए किया जाता है। इस तरह के विश्लेषण से एक अच्छा विचार मिलता है कि कौन सा मॉडल एक समान प्रकार और डोमेन के कार्यों के लिए उपयुक्त होगा। प्रयोगों और\nमूल्यांकन परिणामों से पता चलता है कि दोनों दृष्टिकोणों में तुलनीय सटीकता है।', 'ka': 'ავტომატიკური დიაგონგიზების კოდინტიკური კლასიფიკაციაში და ონტოლოგიაში მნიშვნელოვანია, მედიციაში - ორივე განსაკუთრებელი დიაგონტიკური კოდინტიკური დოკუმენტიკური კოდინტიკური დოკუმენტიკური და ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ განსხვავებული კლინიკური ტექსტის ICD-10-ში ავტომატური კოდინტიკური კოდინტიკური ტექსტის განსხვავებას და გამოყენებას შევხედავთ. კომპორაციური ანალიზი მოცდილობა, რომელიც პროგრამა უფრო ეფექტიურია, რომელიც გამოყენება BERT-ს საჯარო ტრანფორმეტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრი ერთი მხარედან SlavicBERT და MultiligualBERT გამოყენება, რომლებიც ბულდარიურში საერთო სიტყვალური სიტყვალური სამყაროდ, მაგრამ არსებობს მედიციური ტერმინოლოგია. მეორე მხარეს ანალიზაციაში გამოყენება BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, რომლებიც მედიცინური ტერმინოლოგიაში გადაწყენებულია, მაგრამ ბულდარიურში ენის მოდელების განათლება არსებობს და უფრო მეტი სიტყვებულაციაში. ჩვენი სწავლობაში ყველა BERT მოდელეები ბულდარიურში დამატებული მედიცინური ტექსტებით შემდეგ კლასიფიკაციის რაოდენობაში გამოყენებულია ბულდარიურში მედიცინური დიაგონგიების კოდისტაციის კოდისტ დიაგონოგორაციის დიაგონოგორაცია ბულდარიში, რომელიც ICD-10 კოდეებით დაახლოებია, კლასიფიკაციის დავალებისთვის გამოყენება. ასეთი ანალიზია საკმაოდ იდეა, რომელიც მოდელში იქნება სხვადასხვა ტიპის და დემომინის დავალებისთვის. ექსპერიმენტები და\nშესაბამისი წარმოდგენა რომ ორივე შესაბამისი წარმოდგენების შესაბამისი წარმოდგენება.', 'it': "Il compito di codificare automaticamente la diagnosi in classificazioni mediche standard e ontologie, è di grande importanza in medicina - sia per supportare i compiti quotidiani dei medici nella preparazione e rendicontazione della documentazione clinica, sia per l'elaborazione automatica delle segnalazioni cliniche. In questo articolo esaminiamo l'applicazione e le prestazioni di diversi trasformatori di deep learning per la codifica automatica in ICD-10 di testi clinici in bulgaro. L'analisi comparativa cerca di trovare quale approccio sia più efficiente da utilizzare per la messa a punto di trasformatori di famiglia BERT pre-addestrati per trattare una terminologia specifica di dominio su una lingua rara come il bulgaro. Da un lato vengono utilizzati SlavicBERT e MultiligualBERT, che sono pre-addestrati per il vocabolario comune in bulgaro, ma mancano di terminologia medica. D'altra parte nell'analisi vengono utilizzati BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, che sono pre-addestrati per la terminologia medica in inglese, ma mancano di formazione per modelli linguistici in bulgaro, e molto altro ancora per il vocabolario in cirillico. Nel nostro studio di ricerca tutti i modelli BERT sono perfezionati con testi medici aggiuntivi in bulgaro e poi applicati al compito di classificazione per codificare diagnosi mediche in bulgaro in codici ICD-10. I grandi corpi di diagnosi in bulgaro annotati con i codici ICD-10 vengono utilizzati per il compito di classificazione. Tale analisi dà una buona idea di quale modello sarebbe adatto per compiti di tipo e dominio simili. Gli esperimenti e\nI risultati della valutazione dimostrano che entrambi gli approcci hanno una precisione comparabile.", 'lt': 'Automatinės diagnozės užduotis, įtraukta į standartines medicinines klasifikacijas ir ontologijas, yra labai svarbi medicinos srityje – tiek palaikyti gydytojų kasdienes užduotis rengiant ir pranešant apie klinikinius dokumentus, tiek automatiškai tvarkant klinikines ataskaitas. In this paper we investigate the application and performance of different deep learning transformers for automatic encoding in ICD-10 of clinical texts in Bulgarian.  Palyginamoji analizė bando nustatyti, kuris metodas yra veiksmingesnis, kad būtų tiksliau pritaikytas iš anksto apmokytas BERT šeimos transformatorius, kad būtų sprendžiama konkrečia srities terminologija reta kalba kaip bulgarų kalba. Vienoje pusėje naudojami SlavicBERT ir MultiligualBERT, kurie iš anksto mokomi bendram žodynui bulgarų kalba, tačiau neturi medicininės terminologijos. Kita vertus, analizėje naudojami BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, kurie iš anksto mokomi medicininei terminologijai anglų kalba, tačiau trūksta mokymo kalbų modeliams bulgarų kalba, o daugiau žodynui ciriliškai. Mūsų mokslinių tyrimų metu visi BERT modeliai yra suderinti su papildomais medicininiais tekstais bulgarų kalba, o vėliau taikomi klasifikavimo uždaviniams, susijusiems su medicininių diagnozių kodavimu bulgarų kalba į ICD-10 kodus. Klasifikuojant naudojama didelė diagnozės korpora bulgarų kalba, pažymėta ICD-10 kodais. Tokia analizė suteikia gerą idėją, kurie modeliai būtų tinkami panašaus tipo ir srities užduotims. Eksperimentai ir\nvertinimo rezultatai rodo, kad abu metodai yra palyginamai tikslūs.', 'el': 'Το καθήκον της αυτόματης κωδικοποίησης της διάγνωσης σε τυποποιημένες ιατρικές ταξινομήσεις και οντολογίες, έχει μεγάλη σημασία στην ιατρική τόσο για την υποστήριξη των καθημερινών εργασιών των ιατρών στην προετοιμασία και αναφορά της κλινικής τεκμηρίωσης όσο και για την αυτόματη επεξεργασία των κλινικών αναφορών. Στην παρούσα εργασία διερευνούμε την εφαρμογή και απόδοση διαφορετικών μετασχηματιστών βαθιάς μάθησης για αυτόματη κωδικοποίηση κλινικών κειμένων στα βουλγαρικά. Η συγκριτική ανάλυση επιχειρεί να βρει ποια προσέγγιση είναι πιο αποτελεσματική να χρησιμοποιηθεί για τον συντονισμό του προκαθορισμένου μετασχηματιστή οικογένειας ώστε να αντιμετωπιστεί μια συγκεκριμένη ορολογία τομέα σε μια σπάνια γλώσσα όπως τα βουλγαρικά. Από τη μια πλευρά χρησιμοποιούνται τα ΣλαβικBERT και Πολυθρησκευτικά BERT, τα οποία είναι προ-εκπαιδευμένα για κοινό λεξιλόγιο στα βουλγαρικά, αλλά δεν έχουν ιατρική ορολογία. Από την άλλη πλευρά στην ανάλυση χρησιμοποιούνται τα οποία είναι προ-εκπαιδευμένα για ιατρική ορολογία στα αγγλικά, αλλά δεν έχουν εκπαίδευση για γλωσσικά μοντέλα στα βουλγαρικά, και περισσότερο για λεξιλόγιο στα κυριλλικά. Στην ερευνητική μας μελέτη όλα τα μοντέλα προσαρμόζονται με πρόσθετα ιατρικά κείμενα στα βουλγαρικά και στη συνέχεια εφαρμόζονται στην εργασία ταξινόμησης για την κωδικοποίηση ιατρικών διαγνώσεων στα βουλγαρικά σε κωδικούς ICD-10. Για την εργασία ταξινόμησης χρησιμοποιούνται μεγάλα σώματα διάγνωσης στα βουλγαρικά σχολιασμένα με κωδικούς ICD-10. Μια τέτοια ανάλυση δίνει μια καλή ιδέα για το ποια από τα μοντέλα θα ήταν κατάλληλα για εργασίες παρόμοιου τύπου και τομέα. Τα πειράματα και\nΤα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησης δείχνουν ότι και οι δύο προσεγγίσεις έχουν συγκρίσιμη ακρίβεια.', 'hu': 'Az orvostudományban nagy jelentőséggel bír az automatikus diagnózis szabványos orvosi osztályozásokba és ontológiákba történő kódolásának feladata - mind az orvosok napi feladatainak támogatása a klinikai dokumentáció előkészítésében és bejelentésében, mind a klinikai jelentések automatikus feldolgozásában. Ebben a tanulmányban különböző mélytanulási transzformátorok alkalmazását és teljesítményét vizsgáljuk bolgár nyelvű klinikai szövegek ICD-10-es automatikus kódolására. Az összehasonlító elemzés megpróbálja kideríteni, hogy melyik megközelítés alkalmazható hatékonyabb az előképzett BERT család transzformátorainak finomhangolására egy speciális domain terminológiával foglalkozó ritka nyelven, mint a bolgár. Egyrészt SlavicBERT és MultiligualBERT használják, amelyek előkészítették a közös bolgár szókincset, de hiányzik orvosi terminológia. Másrészt az elemzésben használják a BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, amelyeket előkészítenek az angol orvosi terminológiára, de nincs képzés a bolgár nyelvi modellekre, sőt még többet a cirill nyelvű szókincsre. Kutatásunkban minden BERT modellt finomhangoltunk további bolgár nyelvű orvosi szövegekkel, majd alkalmazzuk a bolgár nyelvű orvosi diagnózisok ICD-10 kódokba történő kódolásához szükséges osztályozási feladatra. Az osztályozási feladat során a bolgár nyelvű, ICD-10 kódokkal megjegyzett diagnózis nagy korosztályzatát használják. Egy ilyen elemzés jó ötletet ad arról, hogy a modellek közül melyik lenne alkalmas hasonló típusú és területű feladatokra. A kísérletek és\nAz értékelési eredmények azt mutatják, hogy mindkét megközelítés hasonló pontossággal rendelkezik.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ഡിവിനോട്ടോയിസിന്റെ ജോലി സ്ഥാനമായ മെഡിക്കല്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റിക് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും സ്വന്തം റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ പ്രയോഗവും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ബുള്\u200dഗേരിയയ ബെര്\u200dട്ടി കുടുംബമാറ്റം മാറ്റുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി നല്ല മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഏത് പ്രായോഗ്യം കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന് താ ഒരു ഭാഗത്ത് സ്ലാവിക്ക് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയും മള്\u200dട്ടിളില്\u200dബെര്\u200dട്ടിയും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് ബുള്\u200dഗേരിയയിലെ സാധാരണ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ട അന്വേഷണത്തില്\u200d ബിയോബെര്\u200dട്ടി, ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200dബെര്\u200dട്ടി, സാപ്ബെര്\u200dട്ടി, ബ്ലൂബെര്\u200dട്ടി, ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ മെഡിക്കല്\u200d ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജിയില്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. പക്ഷെ ബുള്\u200d In our research study all BERT models are fine-tuned with additional medical texts in Bulgarian and then applied to the classification task for encoding medical diagnoses in Bulgarian into ICD-10 codes.  ഐസിഡി-10 കോഡുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന ബുള്\u200dഗേറിയയിലെ വലിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലിക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക ഇതുപോലുള്ള ഒരു അന്യായോജ്യം നല്ല ആശയം കൊടുക്കുന്നു. ഏതിന്റെ മാതൃകങ്ങളിലും ഒരു തരം ഡൊമൈനിലും ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും അത്രയ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d\nവിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു രണ്ട് അടുത്തുള്ള അടുത്തുള്ള അടുത്തുള്', 'ms': 'Tugas diagnosis automatik mengekodkan ke klasifikasi perubatan standard dan ontologi, adalah penting dalam perubatan - kedua-dua untuk menyokong tugas harian doktor dalam persiapan dan laporan dokumentasi klinik, dan untuk pemprosesan automatik laporan klinik. Dalam kertas ini kami menyelidiki aplikasi dan prestasi pengubah belajar dalam berbeza untuk pengekodan automatik dalam ICD-10 teks klinik dalam bahasa Bulgarian. Analisis perbandingan cuba untuk mencari pendekatan mana yang lebih efisien untuk digunakan untuk penyesuaian penukar keluarga BERT yang dilatih sebelum dilatih untuk berurusan dengan terminologi domain tertentu pada bahasa yang jarang sebagai Bulgarian. Di satu sisi digunakan SlavicBERT dan MultiligualBERT, yang dilatih untuk vocabulari umum dalam bahasa Bulgari, tetapi kurang terminologi perubatan. Di sisi lain dalam analisis digunakan BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, yang dilatih untuk terminologi perubatan dalam bahasa Inggeris, tetapi kurang latihan untuk model bahasa dalam bahasa Bulgari, dan lebih untuk vokbulari dalam bahasa Cyrillic. In our research study all BERT models are fine-tuned with additional medical texts in Bulgarian and then applied to the classification task for encoding medical diagnoses in Bulgarian into ICD-10 codes.  Korpora besar diagnosis dalam Bulgarian yang dicatat dengan kod ICD-10 digunakan untuk tugas klasifikasi. Analisis seperti ini memberikan idea yang baik yang mana model akan sesuai untuk tugas jenis dan domain yang sama. Eksperimen dan\nhasil penilaian menunjukkan bahawa kedua-dua pendekatan mempunyai ketepatan yang sama.', 'kk': 'Автоматты диагностикалық тапсырмасы стандартты медицина классификацияларына және онтологиясына кодтамасы - медицина үшін күнделік тапсырмаларын, клиникалық құжаттамасын дайындау және хабарлау және клиникалық хабарламаларды автоматты тү Бұл қағазда біз Болгариядағы клиникалық мәтіндердің ICD-10 клиникалық кодтамасын автоматты түрде кодтамасыз үшін әртүрлі түрлі оқытушылардың қолданбаны және істеуін зерттеп Сәйкестік анализ қай тәсілді болғарша тілде кейбір доменнің терминологиясын қалай тәсілді баптау үшін қолданылатын BERT отбасының түрлендірушісін қалай тәсілдігін табу әрекеттері болады. Бір жағында СлавикBERT және МультилигуалBERT қолданылады, бұл Болгариядағы жалпы сөздер үшін, бірақ медицина терминологиясы жоқ. Басқа жағдайда анализ бағдарламасында BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT қолданылады, бұл ағылшын тілінде медицина терминологиясы үшін ауыстырылған, бірақ Болгария тіл үлгілерінің оқытуы жоқ, және цириллық тілінде сөздер үшін к Біздің зерттеулердің зерттеулерімізде барлық BERT моделдері Болгария тілінде қосымша медицина мәтіндерімен дұрыс түзетіледі. Содан кейін Болгария тілінде медицина диагностикаларын ICD-10 кодтарына кодтамасына Болгария диагностикасының үлкен корпорасы ICD- 10 кодтарымен белгіленген тапсырмалар үшін қолданылады. Бұл анализ ұқсас түрлі мен домендің тапсырмаларының қайсы үлгілердің жақсы идеясын береді. Эсперименттер мен\nоқу нәтижесі екі жағдайда салыстыратын дұрыстығын көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Задачата на автоматска дијагноза кодирање во стандардни медицински класификации и онтологии, е од голема важност во медицината - како за поддршка на дневните задачи на лекарите во подготвувањето и известувањето на клиничката документација, како и за автоматско обработување на клини Во овој документ ја истражуваме апликацијата и изведувањето на различните трансформатори за длабоко учење за автоматско кодирање во ИЦД-10 на клиничките тексти на бугарски јазик. Компаративната анализа се обидува да се пронајде кој пристап е поефикасен да се користи за финетизирање на претренираниот семеен трансформатор на БЕРТ за да се справи со специфична терминологија на домен на редок јазик како бугарски. Од една страна се користат SlavicBERT и MultiligualBERT, кои се претренирани за заеднички зборник на бугарски, но немаат медицинска терминологија. Од друга страна, во анализата се користат БиОБЕРТ, КлиникалБЕРТ, СаПБЕРТ, БлујБЕРТ, кои се претренирани за медицинска терминологија на англиски, но недостасуваат обуки за јазични модели на бугарски, а повеќе за речник на кирилиќ. Во нашата истражувачка студија сите модели на БЕРТ се финетизирани со дополнителни медицински тексти на бугарски и потоа се применуваат на класификациската задача за кодирање на медицинската дијагноза на бугарски во ICD-10 кодови. Големата дијагноза на бугарски анатирана со ICD-10 кодови се користи за класификациската задача. Таква анализа дава добра идеја за тоа кој од моделите би бил соодветен за задачи на сличен тип и домен. Експериментите и\nрезултатите од проценката покажуваат дека двата пристапи имаат споредлива точност.', 'pl': 'Zadanie automatycznego kodowania diagnozy do standardowych klasyfikacji i ontologii medycznych ma ogromne znaczenie w medycynie zarówno dla wspierania codziennych zadań lekarzy w przygotowaniu i raportowaniu dokumentacji klinicznej, jak i dla automatycznego przetwarzania raportów klinicznych. W artykule badamy zastosowanie i wydajność różnych transformatorów głębokiego uczenia do automatycznego kodowania w ICD-10 tekstów klinicznych w języku bułgarskim. Analiza porównawcza próbuje ustalić, które podejście jest bardziej skuteczne do dostrojenia wstępnie trenowanego transformatora rodziny BERT, aby poradzić sobie z określoną terminologią domeny w rzadkim języku jak bułgarski. Z jednej strony używane są SlavicBERT i MultiligualBERT, które są wstępnie przygotowane do powszechnego słownictwa w języku bułgarskim, ale brakują terminologii medycznej. Z drugiej strony w analizie stosowane są BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, które są wstępnie przeszkolone do terminologii medycznej w języku angielskim, ale brakuje szkolenia z modeli językowych w języku bułgarskim, a więcej ponad słownictwa w języku cyrylickim. W naszym badaniu badawczym wszystkie modele BERT są dopracowywane dodatkowymi tekstami medycznymi w języku bułgarskim, a następnie stosowane do zadania klasyfikacyjnego kodowania diagnoz medycznych w języku bułgarskim do kodów ICD-10. Do zadania klasyfikacji wykorzystywane są duże korpusy diagnostyczne w języku bułgarskim adnotowane kodami ICD-10. Taka analiza daje dobry pomysł, który z modeli nadaje się do zadań podobnego typu i domeny. Eksperymenty i\nWyniki oceny pokazują, że oba podejścia mają porównywalną dokładność.', 'mt': 'The task of automatic diagnosis encoding into standard medical classifications and ontologies, is of great importance in medicine - both to support the daily tasks of physicians in the preparation and reporting of clinical documentation, and for automatic processing of clinical reports.  F’dan id-dokument ninvestigaw l-applikazzjoni u l-prestazzjoni ta’ trasformaturi differenti ta’ tagħlim profond għall-kodifikazzjoni awtomatika fl-ICD-10 ta’ testi kliniċi bil-Bulgaru. L-analiżi komparattiva tipprova ssib liema approċċ huwa aktar effiċjenti biex jintuża għall-irfinar tat-trasformatur tal-familja BERT imħarreġ minn qabel biex tittratta terminoloġija speċifika tad-dominju fuq lingwa rari bħala Bulgaru. Min-naħa l-waħda jintużaw SlavicBERT u MultiligualBERT, li huma mħarrġa minn qabel għal vokabulari komuni bil-Bulgaru, iżda m’għandhomx terminoloġija medika. Min-naħa l-oħra fl-analiżi jintużaw BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, li huma mħarrġa minn qabel għal terminoloġija medika bl-Ingliż, iżda ma għandhomx taħriġ għal mudelli lingwistiċi bil-Bulgaru, u aktar għal vokabulari biċ-Ċirilliku. Fl-istudju tagħna tar-riċerka l-mudelli kollha BERT huma aġġustati b’testi mediċi addizzjonali bil-Bulgaru u mbagħad applikati għall-kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni għall-kodifikazzjoni tad-dijanjosi medika bil-Bulgaru fil-kodiċijiet ICD-10. Korpora kbira ta’ dijanjosi bil-Bulgaru annotata bil-kodiċijiet ICD-10 tintuża għall-kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni. Analiżi bħal din tagħti idea tajba ta’ liema mill-mudelli jkunu adattati għal kompiti ta’ tip u dominju simili. L-esperimenti u\nir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni juru li ż-żewġ approċċi għandhom preċiżjoni komparabbli.', 'mn': 'Автоматикийн шинжлэх ухааны ажил бол стандарт эмнэлгийн хэлбэр болон онтологид кодлох нь эмнэлэгт маш чухал, эмч нарын өдөр тутмын ажил нь эмч нарын хичээлийн документацийг бэлдүүлэх, мэдээллийн тулд, мөн эмч нарын мэдээллийн автоматж Энэ цаасан дээр бид Болгарид сургалтын өөр гүн гүнзгий суралцах шилжүүлэгчдийн хэрэглээ болон үйл ажиллагааг судалж байна. Хэрэв харьцуулсан шинжилгээний талаар Болгарын хэл шиг ховор хэл дээрх тодорхой тодорхой томъёоны терминологийг зөвшөөрөх боломжтой болсон вэ? Нэг талд СлавикБерт болон Мэдээллигур Берт хэрэглэгддэг бөгөөд Болгарын ерөнхий үг үгүйсгэх мэт, гэхдээ эмнэлгийн терминологи байхгүй. Нөгөө талаар шинжилгээнд BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ нь Англи хэлний эмнэлгийн терминологийг англи хэлний хэлний үеийн загварын сургалтын тулд багш сургалтын тулд, мөн Кириллийн үеийн үеийн тулд илүү их сургалтын ту Бидний судалгааны судалгаанд БЕРТ загварууд Болгариан дахь нэмэлт эмнэлгийн текстүүдтэй холбогдсон бөгөөд Болгариан дахь эмнэлгийн diagnosticуудыг ICD-10 код руу кодлох хэмжээний ажилд хэрэглэгдсэн. Болгарид ICD-10 кодын нэр тодорхойлогдсон томоохон шинжлэх ухааны корпора хэлбэрийн ажил дээр хэрэглэгддэг. Ийм шинжилгээ нь адилхан төрлийн болон холбооны даалгавруудад ямар загварын тухай зөв санааг өгдөг. туршилтууд,\nоюутнуудын үр дүнг нь хоёуланг харьцуулах зөв байдлыг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Sarcina de codificare automată a diagnosticului în clasificări și ontologii medicale standard este de mare importanță în medicină - atât pentru a sprijini sarcinile zilnice ale medicilor în pregătirea și raportarea documentației clinice, cât și pentru prelucrarea automată a rapoartelor clinice. În această lucrare investigăm aplicarea și performanța diferitelor transformatoare de învățare profundă pentru codificarea automată în ICD-10 a textelor clinice în limba bulgară. Analiza comparativă încearcă să găsească care abordare este mai eficientă pentru reglarea fină a transformatorului familiei BERT pre-instruit pentru a aborda o terminologie specifică de domeniu pe o limbă rară precum bulgara. Pe de o parte sunt folosite SlavicBERT și MultiligualBERT, care sunt pre-instruite pentru vocabularul comun în bulgară, dar lipsesc terminologia medicală. Pe de altă parte, în analiză sunt folosite BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, care sunt pregătite pentru terminologia medicală în limba engleză, dar lipsesc pregătirea pentru modele lingvistice în bulgară, și mai mult pentru vocabularul în chirilică. În studiul nostru de cercetare, toate modelele BERT sunt reglate fin cu texte medicale suplimentare în limba bulgară și apoi aplicate sarcinii de clasificare pentru codificarea diagnosticelor medicale în limba bulgară în coduri ICD-10. Corpora mare de diagnostic în bulgară adnotată cu coduri ICD-10 este folosită pentru sarcina de clasificare. O astfel de analiză oferă o idee bună despre care dintre modele ar fi potrivite pentru sarcini de tip și domeniu similar. Experimentele şi\nRezultatele evaluării arată că ambele abordări au o precizie comparabilă.', 'no': 'Oppgåva av automatisk diagnosiseringskoding i standardklassifikasjonar og ontologiar er av stor viktighet i medikament, både for å støtte daglige oppgåva av leger i forberedning og rapportering av kliniske dokumentasjonar, og for automatisk handling av kliniske rapporter. I denne papiret undersøker vi programmet og utviklinga av ulike dype læringstransformasjonar for automatisk koding i ICD-10 av kliniske tekstar i Bulgarsk. Den sammenliggende analysen prøver å finna kva tilnærming er meir effektivt for å bruka for å finne oppsett av BERT-familieformatoren for å handsama med ein spesifikk domeneterminologi på ein sjelde språk som Bulgarsk. On the one side are used SlavicBERT and MultiligualBERT, which are pretrained for common vocabulary in Bulgarian, but lack medical terminology. On the other hand in the analysis are used BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, which are pretrained for medical terminology in English, but lack training for language models in Bulgarian, and more over for vocabulary in Cyrillic. I forskningsstudien vår er alle BERT-modeller fint opp med ekstra medisinske tekstar i Bulgarsk og så brukt til klassifikasjonsplassen for koding medisinske diagnoser i Bulgarsk til ICD-10-kodar. Stor korpora av diagnostisering i Bulgarsk, oppmerkte med ICD-10-kodar, vert brukt for klassifikasjonsplassen. Denne analysen gjev ein god idee om kva av modelane skal vera passande for oppgåver av ein liknande type og domene. Eksperimentane og\nevalueringsresultat viser at begge tilnærmingar har sammenlignbare nøyaktighet.', 'ta': 'நிலையான மருத்துவ வகுப்புகளுக்கும் தானாகவே கண்டுபிடிக்கும் செயல் இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் பல்வேறு ஆழமான கற்றல் மாற்றங்களின் பயன்பாடு மற்றும் செயல்பாட்டை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம் பூலேரியாவில் உள ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட களத்தின் மொழியைப் பிரெட்டி குடும்பத்தை மாற்றுவதற்காக பயன்படுத்த முயற்சிக்கும் பொழுது ஒப்பிடும் ஒப்பிடும் ஆய்வு முயற்சிகள ஒரு பக்கத்தில் ஸ்லாவிக்பெர்ட் மற்றும் பெருக்கல்பெர்ட் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, இது புல்கேரியாவில் பொதுவான சொல்வளத்திற்கு முன்ன மற்ற பக்கத்தில் பியோபிரெட், கிளினிக்கல்பெர்ட், சாப்பிரெட், ப்ளூப்பெர்ட் ஆங்கிலத்தில் மருத்துவ முறை முறைமையை பார்க்கப்படுகிறது, ஆனால் பூக்கரிய மொழி மாதிரிகளுக்கு  எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சியில் BERT மாதிரிகள் அனைத்து மாதிரிகளும் புல்கேரியாவில் கூடுதல் மருத்துவ உரைகளுடன் நன்றாக முடிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளன மற்றும் பிறகு பங ICD-10 குறியீடுகளுடன் அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட பங்கேரியாவில் பெரிய கண்டுபிடிப்பு நிறுவனம் வகைப்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. இவ்வாறு ஒரு ஆய்வு எந்த மாதிரிகளில் போன்ற வகையில் மற்றும் களத்தின் பணிகளுக்கு பொருத்தமான யோசனை கொடுக்கும். சோதனைகள் மற்றும்\nமதிப்பீடு முடிவுகள் இருவரும் ஒப்பிடும் சரியாக இருக்கிறது என்பதை காட்டுகிறது.', 'si': 'The job of automate Diagram is code in standard doctor classification and ontologies, is of great weight in doctor - both to assist the day job of doctor in the ready and report of climatic Documentation, and for automate processing of climatic report. මේ පත්තරේ අපි බුල්ගරියාන් වලින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සංකේතනය සඳහා වෙනස් ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ වැඩියු සම්පූර්ණ විශ්ලේෂණය හොයාගන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා කොහොමද ප්\u200dරයෝජනය හොයාගන්න කියලා, බුල්ගරියානු වලින් විශේෂ භාෂාවක් සම එක පැත්තෙන් ස්ලාවික්බෙර්ට් සහ ගොඩලිගුල් බෙර්ගරියාන් වල සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිතාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒත් ව අනිත් අතුරුද්දේ විශ්ලේෂණයේ BioBERT, KliniclBERT, SapBERT, bluBERT, ඒක ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ වෛද්\u200dය ශ්\u200dරේෂික ශ්\u200dරේෂාවිද්\u200dයාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරීත්\u200dරීය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒත්  අපේ පරීක්ෂණ අධ්\u200dයාසයේ සියලු BERT මොඩල් හොඳයි බුල්ගරියාන් වල ඉතුරු වෛද්\u200dය පාළුවන් සමඟ හොඳයි, ඊට පස්සේ බුල්ගරියාන් වල ඉන්න ICD-10 කෝඩ් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණය වැඩකට භාවිත කරන්න බුල්ගරියාන් වල ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ. ඒ වගේ විශ්ලේෂණයක් හොඳ අදහසක් තියෙනවා මොඩේල් වලින් වර්ගයක් සහ ඩෝමේන් වලින් වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් මොඩ පරීක්ෂණය සහ\nවිශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා කියලා.', 'sr': 'Zadatak automatske dijagnoze kodiranja u standardne medicinske klasifikacije i ontologije je od velike važnosti u medicini - kako da podrži svakodnevne zadatke liječnika u pripremi i izveštaju kliničke dokumentacije, kao i za automatsku obradu kliničkih izveštaja. U ovom papiru istražujemo primjenu i provedbu različitih transformatora dubokog učenja za automatsku kodiranje u ICD-10 kliničkih tekstova na Bugarskoj. Upoređena analiza pokušava pronaći koji je pristup efikasniji da se koristi za finalnu prilagodbu transformatora porodice BERT, kako bi se suočio sa specifičnom terminologijom domena na rijetkom jeziku kao Bugarski. Na jednoj strani se koriste SlavicBERT i MultiligualBERT, koji se pretvaraju za zajednički rečenik u Bugarskoj, ali nedostaje medicinska terminologija. S druge strane, analiza se koristi BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, koji su pretrenuti za medicinsku terminologiju na engleskom jeziku, ali nedostaje obuke za jezičke modele na Bugarskoj, i više za rečnik na sirilskom jeziku. U našem istraživanju ispitivanja svi modeli BERT su ispravno uključeni dodatnim medicinskim tekstima na Bugarskom i zatim se primjenjivali na klasifikacijski zadatak za kodiranje medicinskih dijagnoza na Bugarske u kodove ICD-10. Velika korpora dijagnoze u Bugarskoj annotirana sa kodovima ICD-10 koristi se za posao klasifikacije. Takva analiza daje dobru ideju o kojoj bi modeli bili odgovarajući za zadatke sličnog tipa i domena. Eksperimenti i\nRezultati procjene pokazuju da obe pristupe imaju usporednu tačnost.', 'so': 'The task of automatic diagnosis encoding into standard medical classifications and ontologies, is of great importance in medicine - both to support the daily tasks of physicians in the preparation and reporting of clinical documentation, and for automatic processing of clinical reports.  Qoraalkan waxaynu ka baaraynaa codsiga iyo bandhigyada bedelka waxbarashada ee mool dheer ah ee iskuulka si automatic ah ugu qoran qoraalka dhakhaatiirta ee Bulgarian. Analyska isbarbardhigga ah wuxuu isku dayaa in ay ka faa’iido badan u isticmaalaan si fiican looga dhigo wareejinta qoyska ee BERT si uu uga macaamilo terminology gaar ah oo ku qoran luqada aad u fudud sida Bulgarian oo kale. Hal dhinaca waxaa lagu isticmaalaa SlavicBERT iyo Multi-TalibalBERT, kuwaas oo loo soo bandhigay afka caadiga ah ee Bulgarian, laakiin aan u baahnayn terminologi caafimaadka. Xilliga kalena waxaa lagu isticmaalaa BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, kaas oo looga soo bandhigay qoraalka caafimaadka Ingiriiska, laakiin laguma baahna waxbarasho tusaale ahaan luuqada Bulgarian ah, iyo wax ka badan oo loogu talagalay qoraalka Kirillic. Waxbarashada baaritaankeenna waxaa lagu qoraa samooyin kasta oo BERT ah oo ku qoran qoraal caafimaad dheeraad ah oo Bulgarian ku jira, kadibna waxaa loo codsadaa shaqada fasaxda si loo qoro qoraalka cudurada caafimaadka ee Bulgaria loogu qoro codsiga ICD-10. Shirkadda cudurka waaweyn ee Bulgaria lagu yaqaan waxaa loo isticmaalaa shaqo fasax. Baaritaanka caynkaas ah wuxuu ka helaa fikrad wanaagsan oo ku haboon tusaalayaasha oo ku habboon shaqada u eg iyo goobta. Imtixaanka iyo\narimaha qiimeyntu waxay muuqataa in labada qaabilood ay leeyihiin saxda u eg.', 'ur': 'اوٹوٹوٹ ڈاگنڈ کا کام استاندارڈ ڈاگنڈ کی کلاسیفوں اور آنٹولوژ میں اکنوڈ کرنا ہے، ڈاگنڈ میں بہت اہم ہے - دونوں ڈاگنڈ کے روزانی کاموں کی تعمیر اور راپورت کرنا اور کلینیکی ڈاگنڈ کے بارے میں، اور کلینیکی راپورتوں کی آٹوٹ ہم اس کاغذ میں بلغارین میں مختلف عمیق تعلیم تغییر کرنے والوں کی کاربرد اور فعالیت کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ ICD-10 میں کلینیکی ٹیکسٹ کے ساتھ اتماٹی اکڈینڈ کریں۔ مقایسہ تحقیقات کی کوشش کرتی ہے کہ کس طریقہ کو دیکھنے کی کوشش کرتی ہے کہ اس طریقہ سے زیادہ فعال ہے کہ بترے ہوئے BERT خاندان تغییر کرنے والے کے لئے ایک مشخص دامین ترمینلوژی کے ساتھ بغیر غیر زبان کی طرح استعمال کریں۔ ایک جانب سے SlavicBERT اور MultiligualBERT کا استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، جو Bulgarian میں مشترک کلمات کے لئے آرام کی گئی ہے، لیکن پزشکی ترمینالوژی کی کمی ہے. دوسری طرف سے تحلیل میں BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT کا استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، جو انگلیسی میں پزشکی ترمینلوژی کے لئے دکھائی جاتی ہیں، لیکن بلگاری میں زبان مدلکوں کے لئے آموزش ناکام ہے، اور سیرلیک میں زیادہ کلمات کے لئے۔ ہمارے تحقیق کی تحقیق میں تمام BERT موڈل بالغارین میں اضافہ پزشکی texts کے ساتھ ٹھیک ترکیب کیا جاتا ہے اور پھر بلغارین میں پزشکی دیاگنس کا اکنوڈ کرنا کے لئے ICD-10 کوڈوں میں استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. بلگارین میں بڑا سی ڈی-10 کوڈ کے ذریعہ مشورہ کیا گیا ہے کہ کلاسپیٹ کے کام کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. اس طرح کی تحلیل ایک اچھی نظر دیتا ہے کہ کس طرح اور ڈومین کے کاموں کے لئے مناسب ہوں گے۔ آزمائش اور\nانصاف کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ دونوں تقریبا کے مطابق برابر دقیق ہے.', 'sv': 'Uppgiften att automatiskt koda diagnosen i standardiserade medicinska klassificeringar och ontologier är av stor betydelse inom medicinen - både för att stödja läkarnas dagliga uppgifter i utarbetandet och rapporteringen av klinisk dokumentation och för automatisk behandling av kliniska rapporter. I denna uppsats undersöker vi tillämpningen och prestandan av olika djupinlärningstransformatorer för automatisk kodning i ICD-10 av kliniska texter på bulgariska. Den jämförande analysen försöker ta reda på vilket tillvägagångssätt som är mer effektivt att använda för finjustering av förkränad BERT-familjetransformator för att hantera en specifik domänterminologi på ett sällsynt språk som bulgariska. Å ena sidan används SlavicBERT och MultiligualBERT, som är förberedda för vanligt ordförråd på bulgariska, men saknar medicinsk terminologi. Å andra sidan används i analysen BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, som är förberedda för medicinsk terminologi på engelska, men saknar utbildning för språkmodeller på bulgariska, och mer över för vokabulär på kyrilliska. I vår forskningsstudie finjusteras alla BERT-modeller med ytterligare medicinska texter på bulgariska och tillämpas sedan på klassificeringsuppgiften för att koda medicinska diagnoser på bulgariska till ICD-10-koder. Stora diagnoskroppar på bulgariska kommenterade med ICD-10-koder används för klassificeringen. En sådan analys ger en god uppfattning om vilka av modellerna som skulle vara lämpliga för uppgifter av liknande typ och domän. Experimenten och\nutvärderingsresultaten visar att båda metoderna har jämförbar noggrannhet.', 'vi': 'Việc nhận chẩn đoán tự động được xếp vào các loại biên tập y khoa và khoa ứng tiêu chuẩn, rất quan trọng trong y học cả hai đều được hỗ trợ các công việc hàng ngày của bác sĩ trong việc chuẩn bị và báo cáo tài liệu lâm sàng và việc xử lý các báo cáo lâm sàng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi điều tra ứng dụng và hiệu quả của các máy biến đổi học sâu khác nhau để cài đặt các loại mã hóa ICD-10 của các văn bản lâm sàng ở Bulgaria. Phân tích tương đối cố tìm ra phương pháp nào hiệu quả hơn dùng để chỉnh sửa máy biến đổi gia đình BERT trước khi sử dụng để giải quyết một thuật ngữ miền đặc biệt ở một ngôn ngữ hiếm ở Bulgaria. Một mặt được sử dụng SlavichBERT và đa ligualBERT, vốn được sử dụng cho ngôn ngữ phổ biến ở Bulgaria, nhưng lại thiếu các thuật ngữ y học. Mặt khác, trong phân tích được sử dụng BioBERT, Clínica ALBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, được dịch bởi các thuật ngữ y khoa ở Anh, nhưng lại thiếu giáo dục ngôn ngữ ở Bulgaria, và nhiều hơn nữa cho từ vựng ở Cyrillic. Trong nghiên cứu của chúng tôi, tất cả các mô hình của thiếu sót sót sót sót sót sót sót đều được chỉnh sửa bằng các văn bản y tế khác ở Bulgaria và sau đó áp dụng cho nhiệm vụ phân loại những chẩn đoán y khoa ở Bulgaria vào mã ICD-10. Tài sản chuẩn bị lớn ở Bulgaria, ghi chú với mã ICD-10, được dùng cho nhiệm vụ phân loại. Một cuộc phân tích như vậy cho thấy một ý tưởng hay về những mẫu nào phù hợp với các công việc tương tự. Các thí nghiệm và\nKết quả đánh giá cho thấy cả hai phương pháp đều có độ chính xác.', 'uz': "The task of automatic diagnosis encoding into standard medical classifications and ontologies, is of great importance in medicine - both to support the daily tasks of physicians in the preparation and reporting of clinical documentation, and for automatic processing of clinical reports.  Bu hujjatda Bulgarian boshqa qanday o'rganish o'zgarishlarni avtomatik kodlash uchun boshqa o'rganish dasturini va bajaramiz. Aniqlik analytiki Bulgariy tilidagi qisqa tilni boshqarish uchun qo'shimcha BERT oilasini ajratish uchun qo'shimcha foydalanishni istaysiz. Bir tomondan SlavicBERT va Multilik BERT ishlatiladi Bulgariy tilida umumiy so'zlarni o'rganish mumkin, lekin tibbiy terminologi yo'q. Boshqa bir tomonda, BioBERT, KlinialBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, ingliz tilida medisinal terminalogi uchun ishlatiladi, lekin Bulgariadagi tilning modellari uchun o'rganish yo'q, Kirilcha tili uchun ko'proq tilni o'rganadi. Biz o'rganishda hamma BERT modellari Bulgariydagi qoʻshimcha tibbiy matnlar bilan yaxshi bog'liq bo'ladi va keyin Bulgariy tibbiy diagnostikasini ICD-10 kodlarga qodlash uchun darajalashtirish vazifasiga qoʻlladi. Name Bu analyzer esa tur va domen vazifalari uchun yordamchi modellar qanday ishga mos keladigan yaxshi g'oya beradi. tajribalar va\nqiymatlar natijalarini ko'rsatadi, ikkita usullar to'g'ri aniqligiga ega.", 'bg': 'Задачата за автоматична диагностика, кодиране в стандартни медицински класификации и онтологии, е от голямо значение в медицината - както за подпомагане на ежедневните задачи на лекарите при подготовката и докладването на клиничната документация, така и за автоматичното обработване на клиничните доклади. В настоящата статия изследваме приложението и ефективността на различни трансформатори за дълбоко обучение за автоматично кодиране в МКД-10 на клинични текстове на български език. Сравнителният анализ се опитва да се установи кой подход е по-ефективен за фина настройка на предварително обучен фамилен трансформатор за справяне със специфична домейнна терминология на рядък език като българския. От една страна се използват СлавиcBERT и МултилигуалBERT, които са предварително обучени за общ речник на български език, но нямат медицинска терминология. От друга страна в анализа се използват които са предварително обучени за медицинска терминология на английски, но липсват обучение за езикови модели на български, а повече за речник на кирилица. В нашето проучване всички модели са фино настроени с допълнителни медицински текстове на български език и след това приложени към класификационната задача за кодиране на медицински диагнози на български език в кодове на МКД-10. За класификацията се използват големи корпуси на диагностика на български език анотирани с кодове на МКД-10. Подобен анализ дава добра представа кои от моделите биха били подходящи за задачи от подобен тип и област. Експериментите и\nрезултатите от оценката показват, че и двата подхода имат сравнима точност.', 'nl': 'De taak van automatische diagnosecodering in standaard medische classificaties en ontologieën, is van groot belang in de geneeskunde, zowel ter ondersteuning van de dagelijkse taken van artsen bij het opstellen en rapporteren van klinische documentatie, als voor de automatische verwerking van klinische rapporten. In dit artikel onderzoeken we de toepassing en prestaties van verschillende deep learning transformatoren voor automatische codering in ICD-10 van klinische teksten in het Bulgaars. De vergelijkende analyse probeert te achterhalen welke aanpak efficiënter kan worden gebruikt voor het finetunen van vooraf getrainde BERT familie transformator om te gaan met een specifieke domeinterminologie op een zeldzame taal als het Bulgaars. Aan de ene kant worden SlavicBERT en MultiligualBERT gebruikt, die vooraf getraind zijn voor algemene woordenschat in het Bulgaars, maar geen medische terminologie hebben. Aan de andere kant in de analyse worden gebruikt BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, die zijn voorgetraind voor medische terminologie in het Engels, maar ontbreekt training voor taalmodellen in het Bulgaars, en meer over voor woordenschat in het Cyrillisch. In ons onderzoek worden alle BERT modellen verfijnd met aanvullende medische teksten in het Bulgaars en vervolgens toegepast op de classificatietaak voor het coderen van medische diagnoses in het Bulgaars in ICD-10 codes. Grote corpora van diagnose in het Bulgaars geannoteerd met ICD-10 codes wordt gebruikt voor de classificatietaak. Een dergelijke analyse geeft een goed idee van welk van de modellen geschikt zou zijn voor taken van een vergelijkbaar type en domein. De experimenten en\nUit de evaluatieresultaten blijkt dat beide benaderingen een vergelijkbare nauwkeurigheid hebben.', 'de': 'Die Aufgabe der automatischen Diagnosekodierung in medizinische Standardklassifikationen und Ontologien ist in der Medizin von großer Bedeutung, sowohl zur Unterstützung der täglichen Aufgaben von Ärzten bei der Erstellung und Berichterstattung klinischer Dokumentationen als auch zur automatischen Verarbeitung klinischer Berichte. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir die Anwendung und Leistung verschiedener Deep Learning Transformatoren für die automatische Kodierung in ICD-10 klinischer Texte in Bulgarisch. Die vergleichende Analyse versucht herauszufinden, welcher Ansatz für die Feinabstimmung des vortrainierten BERT-Familientransformators effizienter ist, um mit einer bestimmten Domänenbezeichnung auf eine seltene Sprache wie Bulgarisch umzugehen. Auf der einen Seite werden SlavicBERT und MultiligualBERT verwendet, die für den allgemeinen Wortschatz im Bulgarischen vortrainiert sind, aber keine medizinische Terminologie haben. Zum anderen werden in der Analyse BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT verwendet, die für medizinische Terminologie in Englisch vortrainiert sind, aber keine Ausbildung für Sprachmodelle in Bulgarisch und mehr über für Vokabeln in Kyrillisch fehlen. In unserer Forschungsstudie werden alle BERT-Modelle mit zusätzlichen medizinischen Texten auf Bulgarisch verfeinert und anschließend auf die Klassifikationsaufgabe zur Kodierung medizinischer Diagnosen in Bulgarisch in ICD-10-Codes angewendet. Für die Klassifikationsaufgabe werden große Diagnosekorpora in bulgarischer Sprache verwendet, die mit ICD-10-Codes annotiert sind. Eine solche Analyse gibt eine gute Vorstellung davon, welches der Modelle für Aufgaben ähnlicher Art und Domäne geeignet wäre. Die Experimente und\nDie Evaluierungsergebnisse zeigen, dass beide Ansätze eine vergleichbare Genauigkeit aufweisen.', 'da': 'Opgaven med automatisk diagnosekodning i almindelige medicinske klassifikationer og ontologier er af stor betydning i medicinen - både for at understøtte lægernes daglige opgaver med udarbejdelse og rapportering af klinisk dokumentation og for automatisk behandling af kliniske rapporter. I denne artikel undersøger vi anvendelsen og ydeevnen af forskellige deep learning transformatorer til automatisk kodning i ICD-10 af kliniske tekster på bulgarsk. Den sammenlignende analyse forsøger at finde ud af, hvilken metode der er mere effektiv til finjustering af forudtrænet BERT familie transformer til at behandle en specifik domæneterminologi på et sjældent sprog som bulgarsk. På den ene side bruges SlavicBERT og MultiligualBERT, der er foruddannet til almindeligt ordforråd på bulgarsk, men mangler medicinsk terminologi. På den anden side i analysen anvendes BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, som er forudtrænet til medicinsk terminologi på engelsk, men mangler træning til sprogmodeller på bulgarsk, og mere over til ordforråd på kyrillisk. I vores undersøgelse er alle BERT modeller finjusteret med yderligere medicintekster på bulgarsk og derefter anvendt til klassifikationsopgaven til kodning af medicinske diagnoser på bulgarsk i ICD-10 koder. Store diagnosekorpora på bulgarsk annoteret med ICD-10 koder bruges til klassifikationsopgaven. En sådan analyse giver en god idé om, hvilke af modellerne der ville være egnede til opgaver af lignende type og domæne. Forsøgene og\nevalueringsresultaterne viser, at begge metoder har sammenlignelig nøjagtighed.', 'id': 'The task of automatic diagnosis encoding into standard medical classifications and ontologies, is of great importance in medicine - both to support the daily tasks of physicians in the preparation and reporting of clinical documentation, and for automatic processing of clinical reports.  Dalam kertas ini kami menyelidiki aplikasi dan prestasi dari transformator belajar dalam berbeda untuk pengekodan otomatis dalam ICD-10 teks klinis dalam bahasa Bulgari. Analisis perbandingan mencoba untuk menemukan pendekatan mana yang lebih efisien untuk digunakan untuk memperbaiki pengubah keluarga BERT yang dilatih sebelum dilatih untuk berurusan dengan terminologi domain spesifik pada bahasa langka sebagai bahasa Bulgari. Di satu sisi digunakan SlavicBERT dan MultiligualBERT, yang dilatih untuk vocabulari umum dalam bahasa Bulgari, tetapi kurang terminologi medis. Di sisi lain dalam analisis digunakan BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, yang dilatih untuk terminologi medis dalam bahasa Inggris, tetapi kekurangan pelatihan untuk model bahasa dalam bahasa Bulgari, dan lebih untuk vocabulari dalam bahasa Cyrillic. Dalam penelitian kami semua model BERT disesuaikan dengan teks medis tambahan dalam bahasa Bulgari dan kemudian diaplikasikan untuk tugas klasifikasi untuk mengekodikan diagnosis medis dalam bahasa Bulgaria ke kode ICD-10. Kopora besar diagnosis di Bulgaria yang dicatat dengan kode ICD-10 digunakan untuk tugas klasifikasi. Analisis seperti ini memberikan ide yang baik dari mana model akan cocok untuk tugas tipe dan domain yang sama. Eksperimen dan\nhasil evaluasi menunjukkan bahwa kedua pendekatan memiliki akurasi yang sama.', 'hr': 'Zadatak automatske dijagnoze kodiranja u standardne medicinske klasifikacije i ontologije je od velike važnosti u lijekovima - kako da podrže dnevne zadatke liječnika pripreme i izvještaje kliničke dokumentacije, kao i za automatsku obradu kliničkih izvješća. U ovom papiru istražujemo primjenu i provedbu različitih transformatora dubokog učenja za automatsko kodiranje u ICD-10 kliničkih tekstova na Bugarskoj. Uspoređena analiza pokušava pronaći koji je pristup učinkovitiji da se koristi za finalnu prilagodbu transformatora obitelji BERT-a kako bi se suočio sa specifičnom terminologijom domena na rijetkom jeziku kao Bugarski. Na jednoj strani se koriste SlavicBERT i MultiligualBERT, koji se pretvaraju za zajednički rečnik u Bugarskoj, ali nedostaje medicinska terminologija. S druge strane, u analizi se koriste BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, koji se pretvaraju za medicinsku terminologiju na engleskom jeziku, ali nedostaje obuka za jezičke modele na Bugarskoj, te više za riječ na sirilskom jeziku. U našem istraživanju ispitivanja svi modeli BERT ispravljaju dodatne medicinske tekste na Bugarskom i zatim se primjenjuju na klasifikacijski zadatak za kodiranje medicinskih dijagnoza na Bugarsku u kodove ICD-10. Velika tijela dijagnoze u Bugarskoj annotirana s kodovima ICD-10 koristi se za zadatak klasifikacije. Takva analiza daje dobru ideju o kojoj će modeli biti odgovarajući za zadatke slične vrste i domena. Eksperimenti i\nRezultati procjene pokazuju da obje pristupe imaju usporedbenu preciznost.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya uchunguzi wa kujitegemea unaoandika katika kutangazwa kwa madawa ya kawaida na utaalam, ni muhimu sana katika dawa - wote ili kuwasaidia kazi za kila siku za madaktari katika kuandaa na kuripoti taarifa za taarifa za kliniki, na kwa upasuaji wa taarifa za kitabibu. Katika gazeti hili tunachunguza matumizi na utendaji wa mabadiliko tofauti ya kujifunza kwa ajili ya kutambuliwa kwa njia ya kujitegemea katika teknolojia za kiserikali nchini Bulgaria. Uchambuzi unaofananisha jaribio hilo la kutafuta njia gani lina ufanisi zaidi ya kutumika kwa ajili ya kuboresha mabadiliko ya familia ya BERT ili kupambana na utambulisho maalum wa ndani kwa lugha nadra kama ilivyo Bulgaria. Kwenye upande mmoja wanatumiwa SlavicBERT na MultiMulti-BERT, ambazo zinasemekana kwa lugha ya kawaida nchini Bulgaria, lakini hawana utambulisho wa matibabu. Kwa upande mwingine katika uchambuzi unatumiwa BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, ambazo zimetumiwa kwa ajili ya uchunguzi wa kitabibu katika lugha ya Kiingereza, lakini ukosefu wa mafunzo kwa mifano ya lugha nchini Bulgaria, na zaidi kwa ajili ya lugha ya lugha nchini Kiroliki. Katika utafiti wetu, mifano yote ya BERT imetumiwa vizuri na ujumbe wa kitabibu zaidi nchini Bulgaria na kisha imetumika katika juhudi la kutangaza maambulizi ya kitabibu nchini Bulgaria katika kanuni za ICD-10. Kampuni kubwa ya uchunguzi nchini Bulgaria iliyotangazwa na sheria za ICD-10 inatumika kwa ajili ya kazi ya kutangaza. Uchambuzi huu unatoa wazo zuri la namna gani mifano itakuwa sahihi kwa kazi za aina hiyo na maeneo yanayofanana. The experiments and\nmatokeo ya uchunguzi yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zote zina uhakika sawa.', 'ko': '자동 진단을 표준 의학 분류와 본체로 인코딩하는 임무는 의학에서 매우 중요하다. 의사가 임상 문서를 준비하고 보고하는 일상적인 임무도 지원하고 임상 보고서의 자동 처리도 지원한다.본고에서 우리는 서로 다른 깊이 학습 변압기가 불가리아 임상 텍스트 ICD-10 자동 인코딩에서의 응용과 성능을 연구했다.비교 분석은 불가리아어 등 보기 드문 언어의 특정 분야 용어를 처리하기 위해 미조정 훈련에 더 효과적인 BERT족 변환기를 찾아내려고 한다.한쪽은 슬라비버트와 도리과버트인데, 이것은 불가리아어의 상용어이지만 의학 용어가 부족하다.한편, 분석에는 영어 의학 용어에 대한 사전 교육을 받은 바이오BERT, 클리니컬BERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT가 사용됐지만 불가리아어 언어 모델에 대한 교육이 부족했고 시릴어 어휘에 대한 교육이 더 많았다.우리의 연구에서 모든 BERT 모델은 불가리아어의 다른 의학 텍스트로 미세하게 조정한 다음에 분류 임무에 응용하여 불가리아어의 의학 진단 코드를 ICD-10 코드로 인코딩했다.분류 작업에는 ICD-10 코드 주석이 있는 불가리아어 대형 진단 자료 라이브러리가 사용됩니다.이런 분석은 어떤 모델이 유사한 유형과 분야의 임무에 적용되는지 잘 설명한다.실험과\n평가 결과 이 두 가지 방법은 상당한 정확성을 가지고 있음을 나타냈다.', 'af': "Die taak van outomatiese diagnosis enkodering binne standaard mediese klasifikasies en ontologies is van groot belangrikheid in mediese - beide om die daglike opdragte van medieke te ondersteun in die voorbereiding en raporteer van kliniske dokumentasie en vir outomatiese verwerking van kliniske raporte. In hierdie papier ondersoek ons die aansoek en effektuur van verskillende diep leer transformeerders vir outomatiese kodering in ICD-10 van kliniske teks in Bulgarse. Die vergelykbare analisie probeer om te vind wat toegang is meer effektief om te gebruik word vir fyn-tuning van voorstrekte BERT familie transformeerder om met 'n spesifieke domein terminologie te behandel op 'n selfde taal as Bulgaries. Op die een kant word SlavicBERT en MultiligualBERT gebruik, wat vir gemeenskaplike woordeboek in Bulgarye aangestrek word, maar miskien mediese terminologie. Op die ander kant van die analisie word BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT gebruik, wat vir mediese terminologie in Engels voorgeskryf word, maar mislukking onderwerking vir taal modele in Bulgarse en meer oor vir woordeboek in Kyrillis. In ons ondersoek studie is alle BERT-modelles fin-tuned met addisionele mediese tekste in Bulgarse en dan toegewend aan die klasifikasie taak vir kodering mediese diagnose in Bulgarse in ICD-10 kode. Groot korpora van diagnose in Bulgarse wat met ICD-10 kode aangetrek is, word gebruik vir die klassifikasie taak. Soos 'n analisie gee 'n goeie idee van watter van die modele sal geskik wees vir werke van 'n gelyke tipe en domein. Die eksperimente en\nevalueringsresultate wys dat beide toegang vergelykbaar presisie het.", 'fa': 'وظیفه تشخیص اتوماتیک رمزبندی در کلاسپین پزشکی و آنتولوژی استاندارد مهم در پزشکی است، هر دو برای حمایت از وظیفه روزی پزشکان در آماده و گزارش مدارک کلینیک و برای پرداخت اتوماتیک گزارش های کلینیک. در این کاغذ ما کاربرد و عملکرد تغییردهندگان عمیق یادگیری متفاوت برای رمزبندی اتوماتیک در ICD-10 از متن کلینیک در بولگاری تحقیق می کنیم. تحلیل مقایسه سعی می\u200cکند که کدام دسترسی موثر\u200cتر است که برای تغییر\u200cساز خانواده BERT پیش\u200cفرض استفاده شود تا با یک ترمینالوژی دامنی خاص در یک زبان نادر به عنوان بولگاری برخورد کند. از یک طرف استفاده می\u200cشود SlavicBERT و MultiligualBERT، که برای کلمات مشترک در بولگاری تسلیم می\u200cشوند، ولی کمتر ترمینالوژی پزشکی است. از طرف دیگر تحلیل از بیوبرت، کلینیکلبرت، سپبرت، بلوبرت استفاده می\u200cشوند، که برای ترمینالوژی پزشکی در انگلیسی تحریک می\u200cشوند، ولی کمی آموزش برای مدل زبانی در بلگاری است، و بیشتر برای کلمه\u200cای در سیریلیک. در مطالعه تحقیقات ما همه مدل BERT با متن های پزشکی اضافه ای در بولگاری تنظیم می شوند و سپس برای رمزبندی تشخیص پزشکی در بولگاری به کدهای ICD-10 applied to the classification task for coding medical diagnoses in Bulgarian into ICD-10 codes. شرکت بزرگی از تشخیص در بولگاری که با کدهای ICD-10 مشخص شده برای کار شناسایی استفاده می\u200cشود. این تحلیل به یک ایده خوب می دهد که کدام از مدلها برای وظیفه های یک نوع و دومین مشابه است. آزمایشات و\nنتایج ارزیابی نشان می دهد که هر دو دسترسی دقیق قابل مقایسه دارند.', 'sq': 'Detyra e diagnostikës automatike që kodon në klasifikimet dhe ontologjitë mjekësore standarde, është me rëndësi të madhe në mjekësi - si për të mbështetur detyrat e përditshme të mjekëve në përgatitjen dhe raportimin e dokumentacionit klinik dhe për përpunimin automatik të raporteve klinike. Në këtë letër ne hetojmë aplikimin dhe shfaqjen e transformuesve të ndryshëm të mësimit të thellë për kodimin automatik në ICD-10 të teksteve klinike në bullgar. Analiza krahasuese përpiqet të gjejë cili qasje është më efikase për të përdorur për rregullimin e transformuesit të familjes BERT të paratrajnuar për të trajtuar një terminologji të posaçme domeni në një gjuhë të rrallë si bullgare. Nga një anë përdoren SlavicBERT dhe MultiligualBERT, të cilat janë paratrajnuar për fjalorin e përbashkët në bullgar, por mungon terminologjia mjekësore. On the other hand in the analysis are used BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, that are pretrained for medical terminology in English, but lack training for language models in Bulgarian, and more over for vocabulary in Cyrillic.  Në studimin tonë të kërkimit të gjithë modelet BERT janë të përshtatur me tekste shtesë mjekësore në bullgar dhe pastaj aplikuar në detyrën e klasifikimit për kodimin e diagnostikës mjekësore në bullgar në kodet ICD-10. Për detyrën e klasifikimit përdoret korpora e madhe e diagnostikës në bullgar e anotuar me kodet ICD-10. Një analizë e tillë jep një ide të mirë se cili nga modelet do të jetë i përshtatshëm për detyra të një lloji dhe domeni të ngjashëm. Eksperimentet dhe\nrezultatet e vlerësimit tregojnë se të dy qasjet kanë saktësi të krahasueshme.', 'tr': 'Otomatik dijagnoýasynyň esasy lukmanyň klasifikasyna we ontologiýana ködleme meselesi, dermanyň içinde hem gündelik zadyny lukmanlaryň taýýarlanmasynda we kliniki dökümleriniň raportlamasynda we awtomatik raportlaryň işlemesi üçin has möhüm. Bu kagyzda biz Bulgarça dilinde kliniki metinleriniň ICD-10-da awtomatik ködleme üçin dürli derin öwrenme täsirleriniň uygulamasyny we taýýarlamasyny barlaýarys. Mazmunlyk analyzasy bolgarça dilde nähili gollanyşyk üçin önsüzlenýän BERT maşgalasynyň üýtgetmesi üçin ullanylşynyň etkinlik taýýarlanmasyna synanyşýar. Birinji tarapynda SlavicBERT we MultiligualBERT ulanylýar, Bulgarça dilinde orta sözler üçin öňünden geçirilýär ýöne lukmanyň terminologiýasy ýok. Näçe tarapynda analýusyň hem BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, iňlis dilinde lukmançylyk terminologiýasy üçin ulanylýar, ýöne bolgarça dil nusgalarynda okuwçylygy ýok bolýar we kirilçe sözleri üçin köpräk boldy. Araştyrymyzda ähli BERT modellerimiz bolgarça mekdeplerde gowy düzümlenýär we soňra bolgarça mekdeplerde ICD-10 kodlara çemelemeler üçin klasifikasyon täblisasyna üýtgedildi. Bulgaristandaky ICD-10 ködler bilen duýýan diagnostikanyň uly korpiýasy klasifikasiýa görevi üçin ullanylar. Böyle bir analiz, modellerin benzer bir tür ve domenin işlerine uygun olacağına dair iyi bir fikir verir. Deneyler we\ndeňlenen netijeler her iki ýagdaýyň dogry ýagdaýynyň bardygyny görkezýär.', 'hy': 'Ավտոմատիկ ախտորոշության խնդիրը, որն ընդգրկում է ստանդարտ բժշկական դասակարգումների և օնտոլոգիաների մեջ, շատ կարևոր է բժշկության մեջ՝ ինչպես աջակցելու բժշկների օրական խնդիրները կլինիկական փաստաթղթերի պատրաստման և տեղեկատվության մեջ, ինչպես նաև Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք բազմաթիվ խորը ուսումնասիրության վերափոխողների կիրառումը և արտադրությունը, որոնք օգտագործվում են բուլգարենի լեզվով կլինիկական տեքստների ինտեքստիդ-10 մեջ: Համեմատական վերլուծությունը փորձում է հայտնաբերել, թե որն է ավելի արդյունավետ օգտագործել BER ընտանիքի վերափոխման նախապատրաստված վերափոխման համար, որպեսզի վերաբերվեն հազվադեպ լեզուների, ինչպիսիք են բուլգարենը, կոնկրետ բոմենլոգի Առաջին կողմից օգտագործվում են ՍլավիկԲերթը և ՄիլիգյուալԲերթը, որոնք նախապատրաստված են բուլգարենի ընդհանուր բառարանի համար, բայց պակասում են բժշկական տերմինոլոգիա: Մյուս կողմից, վերլուծության մեջ օգտագործվում են Բիոբերթը, ԿլինիկալիԲերթը, Սապբերթը, Բլույբերթը, որոնք նախադասում են բժշկական տերմինոլոգիաներին անգլերենում, բայց բացակայում են ուսուցման լեզվի մոդելների համար բուլերենում, և ավելի շատ բառարանի համար Մեր ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում ԲԵՌԹ-ի բոլոր մոդելները լավագույն համապատասխանում են բժշկական ավելացված տեքստների հետ բուլգարեն և հետո կիրառվում են բժշկական ախտորոշումների կոդավորման համար բուլգարեն ինֆորմացիոն համակարգե Բուլգարենում ախտորոշության մեծ կառուցվածքը, որը գրված է ինֆորմացիա-10 կոդերով, օգտագործվում է դասակարգման խնդիրների համար: Այսպիսի վերլուծությունը լավ գաղափար է տալիս, թե մոդելներից ո՞րն է համապատասխան նման տեսակի և բնագավառի խնդիրների համար: Փորձերը և\nգնահատման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ երկու մոտեցումները համեմատական ճշմարտություն ունեն:', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় চিকিৎসা বিভিন্ন সংক্রান্ত চিকিৎসা এবং পরিস্থিতিতে স্বয়ংক্রিয় চিকিৎসা বিভিন্ন সংক্রান্ত বিভিন্ন পরিচিতির কাজ এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয় রিপোর্টে এই পত্রিকায় আমরা বুলগেরিয়ার আইসিডি-১০ ক্লিনিকিনিক্যাল টেক্সটের স্বয়ংক্রিয় এনকোডিং এর জন্য ভিন্ন গভীর শিক্ষা পরিবর্তনের প এই তুলনামূলক বিশ্লেষণের প্রচেষ্টা বুলগেরিয়ার মত বিবেরিটি পরিবারের পরিবার পরিবর্তনের জন্য ব্যবহার করা কোন প্রতিক্রিয়া বেশী কার্যকর ব্যবহার করার চেষ্টা করা হয় একদিকে স্লাভিক্বার্ট এবং মাল্টিলিটুয়াল বের্ট ব্যবহার করা হয়, যা বুলগেরিয়ার সাধারণ শব্দভাষণের জন্য মনোভাব দেয়া হয়, কিন্তু চিকিৎসা  অন্যদিকে বিশ্লেষণে বিওবের্ট, ক্লিনিকাল বের্ট, সাপ বের্ট, ব্লুবের্ট ব্যবহার করা হয়, যা ইংরেজি ভাষায় চিকিৎসা টার্মিনোলজির জন্য প্রেরণ করা হয়, কিন্তু বুলগেরিয়ার ভাষার ম আমাদের গবেষণায় বুলগেরিয়ার আরো চিকিৎসা টেক্সটের মাধ্যমে সকল মডেল ভালোভাবে সুবিধা প্রদান করা হয়েছে এবং তারপর বুলগেরিয়ায় চিকিৎসা চিকিৎসা চিকিৎসা  আইসিডি-১০ কোড দিয়ে বুলগেরিয়ার বিশাল কোর্পোরা এই শ্রেণীবিভাগ কাজের জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। এ ধরনের বিশ্লেষণ একটি ভালো ধারণা দিয়েছে যে মডেল কোনটি একই ধরনের এবং ডোমেইনের কাজের জন্য যথাযথ হবে। পরীক্ষা আর\nমূল্যের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে দুটো প্রতিক্রিয়ার সমান সঠিক আছে।', 'bs': 'Zadatak automatske dijagnoze kodiranja u standardne medicinske klasifikacije i ontologije je od velike važnosti u medicini - kako da podrži svakodnevne zadatke liječnika u pripremi i izvještaju kliničke dokumentacije, kao i za automatsku obradu kliničkih izvještaja. U ovom papiru istražujemo primjenu i provedbu različitih transformatora dubokog učenja za automatsku kodiranje u ICD-10 kliničkih tekstova na Bugarskoj. Upoređena analiza pokušava pronaći koji je pristup učinkovitiji da se koristi za finalnu prilagodbu transformatora obitelji BERT-a pretvaranja kako bi se suočio sa specifičnom terminologom domena na rijetkom jeziku kao bugarski. Na jednoj strani se koristi SlavicBERT i MultiligualBERT, koji su pretkivani za zajednički rečnik u Bugarskoj, ali nedostaje medicinska terminologija. S druge strane, u analizi se koriste BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, koji se pretvaraju za medicinsku terminologiju na engleskom jeziku, ali nedostaje obuke za jezičke modele na Bugarskom, i više za riječ na sirilskom jeziku. U našem istraživanju ispitivanja svi modeli BERT su dobro uključeni dodatnim medicinskim tekstima na Bugarskom i zatim se primjenjivali na klasifikacijski zadatak za kodiranje medicinskih dijagnoza na Bugarske u kodove ICD-10. Velika tijela dijagnoze u Bugarskoj annotirana kodovima ICD-10 koristi se za zadatak klasifikacije. Takva analiza daje dobru ideju o kojoj će modeli biti odgovarajući za zadatke sličnog tipa i domena. Eksperimenti i\nRezultati procjene pokazuju da obje pristupe imaju usporedbenu preciznost.', 'am': 'የአስቶማዊ ድምፅ እና የጤናዊ መድኃኒት ክፍል እና ኦቶሎጂ የሚደረገው ስራ ለድምጽ በጣም ውርደት ነው - የሕመምተኞች ሁኔታዊ ስራዎችን ለመዘጋጀት እና ለኪሎኒካዊ ደብዳቤዎችን ለማዘጋጀት እና ለማዘጋጀት እና ለቻይሎኒካዊ ሪፖርት ማዘጋጀት እና ለማስታወቂያ የሚያስ በዚህ ፕሮግራሙን እና የልዩ ልዩ ጥልቅ ትምህርት ለውጦችን በብልጋሪያዊ የቴክኖኒካዊ ጽሑፎች የኢስኮት-አሥር ማቀናቀል እናምርመራለን፡፡ በተስተያየት ትምህርት መግለጫ ማንኛውን መግለጫ በብልጋሪያዊ ቋንቋ እንደሆነ ብኤርቴን ቤተሰብ ለውጥ ለመጠቀም የሚሻለው ማድረግ ይቻላል፡፡ በአንድ ወገን ስሎቪብERT እና ብዛት ብሬት በተጠቀም፣ በቡልጋሪያን ለብሔራዊ ቃላት ግን የጥምቀት ተርሚናሎጂ አለባቸው፡፡ On the other hand in the analysis are used BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, that are pretrained for medical terminology in English, but lack training for language models in Bulgarian, and more over for vocabulary in Cyrillic.  በብልጋሪያ ያሉት BERT ሞዴላዎች ሁሉ በብልጋሪያዊ የጥምቀት ጽሑፎች የተጠቃቀሙ ናቸው፡፡ በቡልጋሪያው የኢ.ዲ-አሥር ኮዶች የተነሳ ታላቁ ኮርፖርት ለመግለጫው ሥራ ይጠቀማል፡፡ እንደዚህ አስተያየት ምሳሌዎቹ ማንኛቸው ለዓይነት እና ዶሜን ለመስጠት የሚገባው ነው፡፡ ፈተናዎች\nየውጤት ፍጥረቶች ሁለቱ ግንኙነት ትክክል እንዲኖሩ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Avtomatik dijagnostiklərin vəzifəsi standart tıbbi klasifikasyonuna və ontologiyalarına kodlaması, həmçin in tıbbıda çox mövcuddur - həmçinin kliniki dökümətlərin təmizlənməsi və raportların günlük işlərini və kliniki raportların avtomatik işləməsi üçün. Bu kağıtda, Bulgaristandakı kliniki məktubların ICD-10-ində avtomatik kodlaması üçün müxtəlif dərin öyrənmə transformatçıların uygulamasını və performansını incidirik. Qarşılıq analizi, hansı tərzim Bulgariyalı dildə müəyyən bir domen terminologiyası ilə müəyyən edilən BERT ailəsi transformatçısının düzəltməsi üçün istifadə edilməsi üçün daha etkilidir. Bir tərəfdə SlavicBERT və MultiligualBERT istifadə edilir ki, Bulgariyada ortaq sözlər üçün təmizlənir, lakin tıbbi terminoloji yoxdur. Digər tərzdə analizi BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, İngilizce dilində tıbbi terminoloji üçün təhsil edilən, lakin Bulgarca dil modellərinin təhsil edilməsi yoxdur və Cyrillic dilində sözlər üçün daha çox təhsil edilir. Bizim araştırmalarımızda bütün BERT modelləri Bulgaristandakı ekstra tıbbi mətnlərlə düzəldirilir və sonra Bulgaristandakı tıbbi diagnostikaları kodlamaq üçün klasifikasiya görevi ilə ICD-10 kodlara uyguladılar. ICD-10 kodları ilə bildirilən Bulgaristandakı böyük diagnosis korporası klasifikasiya görevi üçün istifadə edilir. Bu analiz kimi modellərin hansının bənzər bir tür və domain işlərinə uyğun olacağına dair yaxşı fikir verir. Həyatlar və\ntəcrübə sonuçları hər ikisinin yaxınlıqlarının müqayisədə ədaləti olduğunu göstərir.', 'ca': "La tasca del diagnòstic automàtic codificat en classificacions mèdiques i ontologies estandards és de gran importància en la medicina - tant per sostenir les tasques diaries dels metges en la preparació i la presentació de documentacions clíniques, com per processar automàticament els informes clínics. En aquest article investigam l'aplicació i el rendiment de diferents transformadors d'aprenentatge profund per codificar automàticament en ICD-10 els textos clínics en búlgar. L'anàlisi comparativa intenta trobar quin enfocament és més eficient per a ajustar el transformador de família BERT pré-treinad per tractar amb una terminologia de domini específica en una llengua rara com búlgara. D'una banda s'utilitzen SlavicBERT i MultiligualBERT, que són pré-entrenats per vocabulari comú en búlgar, però careixen de terminologia mèdica. D'altra banda, en l'anàlisi s'utilitzen BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, que són pré-entrenats per a la terminologia mèdica en anglès, però no tenen formació per a models de llenguatge en búlgar, i més per a vocabulari en cirílic. En el nostre estudi de recerca, tots els models BERT estan perfeccionats amb textos mèdics adicionals en búlgar i després aplicats a la tasca de classificació per codificar diagnòstics mèdics en búlgar en codis ICD-10. Big corpora of diagnosis in Bulgarian annotated with ICD-10 codes is used for the classification task.  Aquesta an àlisi dóna una bona idea de quins dels models serian adequats per tasques d'un tipus i domini similar. Els experiments i\nels resultats de l'evaluació demostren que ambdós enfocaments tenen una precisió comparable.", 'cs': 'Úkol automatického kódování diagnózy do standardních lékařských klasifikací a ontologií má v medicíně velký význam jak pro podporu každodenních úkolů lékařů při přípravě a reportování klinické dokumentace, tak pro automatické zpracování klinických zpráv. V tomto článku zkoumáme aplikaci a výkon různých transformátorů hlubokého učení pro automatické kódování v ICD-10 klinických textů v bulharštině. Srovnávací analýza se snaží zjistit, jaký přístup je efektivnější pro jemné ladění předtrénovaného transformátoru rodiny BERT pro řešení specifické doménové terminologie vzácného jazyka, jako je bulharština. Na jedné straně jsou používány SlavicBERT a MultiligualBERT, které jsou předškoleny pro běžnou slovní zásobu v bulharštině, ale postrádají lékařskou terminologii. Na druhou stranu v analýze jsou použity BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, které jsou předem trénovány pro lékařskou terminologii v angličtině, ale chybí výcvik pro jazykové modely v bulharštině a další přes slovní zásobu v kyriličtině. V naší výzkumné studii jsou všechny modely BERT doladěny o další lékařské texty v bulharštině a následně aplikovány na klasifikační úlohu pro kódování lékařských diagnóz v bulharštině do ICD-10 kódů. Pro klasifikaci jsou použity velké korpusy diagnostiky v bulharštině anotované ICD-10 kódy. Taková analýza dává dobrou představu o tom, který z modelů by byl vhodný pro úkoly podobného typu a domény. Experimenty a\nVýsledky hodnocení ukazují, že oba přístupy mají srovnatelnou přesnost.', 'et': 'Standardsetesse meditsiinilistesse klassifikatsioonidesse ja ontoloogiatesse kodeerimise automaatse diagnoosimise ülesanne on meditsiinis väga oluline - nii arstide igapäevaste ülesannete toetamiseks kliinilise dokumentatsiooni koostamisel ja aruandlusel kui ka kliiniliste aruannete automaatseks töötlemiseks. Käesolevas töös uurime erinevate sügavõppe trafode rakendamist ja jõudlust bulgaaria keelsete kliiniliste tekstide automaatseks kodeerimiseks ICD-10-s. Võrdlevas analüüsis püütakse leida, millist lähenemisviisi on tõhusam kasutada eeltreenitud BERT perekonna trafo peenhäälestamiseks, et käsitleda konkreetset domeeniterminoloogiat haruldases keeles nagu bulgaaria keel. Ühelt poolt kasutatakse SlavicBERT ja MultiligualBERT, mis on eelõpetatud bulgaaria keeles tavalise sõnavara jaoks, kuid puudub meditsiiniline terminoloogia. Teisest küljest analüüsis kasutatakse BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, mis on eelõpetatud meditsiinilise terminoloogia inglise keeles, kuid puudub koolitus bulgaaria keele mudelite ja rohkem üle sõnavara kirillitsa keeles. Meie uurimistöös on kõik BERT mudelid täpsustatud täiendavate bulgaaria keelsete meditsiiniliste tekstidega ning seejärel rakendatud klassifitseerimisülesandele meditsiinidiagnooside kodeerimiseks bulgaaria keeles ICD-10 koodidesse. Klassifitseerimisülesandeks kasutatakse bulgaaria keelset diagnoosi suurkorpuseid, millel on ICD-10 koodid. Selline analüüs annab hea ettekujutuse, millised mudelid sobivad sarnase tüübi ja valdkonna ülesanneteks. Katsed ja\nhindamistulemused näitavad, et mõlemal lähenemisviisil on võrreldav täpsus.', 'fi': 'Tehtävä automaattisesta diagnosoinnista, joka koodataan vakiolääketieteellisiin luokituksiin ja ontologioihin, on lääketieteessä erittäin tärkeä - sekä lääkärien päivittäisten tehtävien tukemiseksi kliinisen dokumentaation valmistelussa ja raportoinnissa että kliinisten raporttien automaattisessa käsittelyssä. Tässä työssä tutkitaan erilaisten syväoppimisen muuntajien soveltamista ja suorituskykyä bulgariankielisten kliinisten tekstien automaattiseen koodaukseen ICD-10:ssä. Vertailevassa analyysissä pyritään selvittämään, mikä lähestymistapa on tehokkaampi esikoulutetun BERT-perheen muuntajan hienosäätöön käsittelemään tiettyä verkkotunnuksen terminologiaa harvinaisella kielellä, kuten bulgaria. Toisaalta käytetään SlavicBERT ja MultiligualBERT, jotka ovat esikoulutettuja yleiseen sanastoon bulgariaksi, mutta puuttuu lääketieteellinen terminologia. Toisaalta analyysissä käytetään BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, jotka on koulutettu lääketieteelliseen terminologiaan englanniksi, mutta eivät ole koulutettuja kielimalleja bulgariaksi, ja enemmän sanastoa kyrilliseksi. Tutkimustutkimuksessamme kaikkia BERT-malleja hiotaan bulgariankielisillä lääketieteellisillä teksteillä ja niitä sovelletaan bulgariankielisten diagnoosien koodaamiseen ICD-10-koodeihin. Luokitustehtävässä käytetään bulgariankielisen diagnoosin isoja korpusia, joihin on merkitty ICD-10-koodeja. Tällainen analyysi antaa hyvän käsityksen siitä, mitkä mallit soveltuisivat samantyyppisiin ja samantyyppisiin tehtäviin. Kokeet ja\narviointitulokset osoittavat, että molemmilla lähestymistavoilla on vertailukelpoinen tarkkuus.', 'ha': "Taimar diagnosis farat-farat ɗaya wanda ke kodi a cikin fassarar takarda na madaidaici da ontoloji, yana da muhimu a cikin dawada - dõmin su ƙarfafa aikin mutane a kwanan kwanan a cikin shirin da aka yi amfani da kuma a wajabtar da takardar takardar da za'a yi amfani da shi, kuma dõmin a yi amfani da aikin bayani farat-daki. A cikin wannan takardan, Munã tambayar shirin ayuka da cikakken shifo masu da aka sanar da mutane masu ƙaranci bakwai ko da kodi farat ɗaya a cikin ICD-10 na littãfin da aka ƙayyade cikin Bulgaria. Anarari da fassarar kwamfyutan ta samu'a gane ni'anar kowanne ta fi fasahan a yi amfani da wa fin-tuning of late-tuned family transformation BERT to address a special Domen therminogy on a rare language as Bulgaria. Yana yi amfani da SlawikBERT da MulkilBERT, wanda aka ƙayyade wa zaman maganar cikin Bulgaria, kuma amma bã da wata taƙaitori na hanyoyi. Ga da kuma a cikin Ana yi amfani da BioBERT, KinikalBERT, SapBERT, BlawBERT, wanda aka ƙayyade wa kafaffiyar hanyoyi na Ingiriya, kuma amma bã da wani wa'azi ga misalin harshe cikin Bulgaria, kuma suna da wasu wa'adin maganar Kibririyya. A cikin fasalinmu duk misalin BERT na da amfani da misalin mutane na mutane na Bulgaria kuma an applied zuwa aikin classified na kode diagnostics na Bulgaria zuwa kodin ICD-10. QFontDatabase Ana bayyana wannan, yana da wani idãna mai kyau daga wanne misalin zai iya daidai wa aikin aiki na daban da ke daidaita. The experiments and\nMatarin evaluation ya nuna cewa duk hanyoyi sun sami tsari daidai.", 'sk': 'Naloga avtomatske diagnostike kodiranja v standardne medicinske klasifikacije in ontologije je v medicini zelo pomembna - tako za podporo vsakodnevnim delom zdravnikov pri pripravi in poročanju klinične dokumentacije kot za avtomatsko obdelavo kliničnih poročil. V prispevku raziskujemo uporabo in delovanje različnih transformatorjev globokega učenja za avtomatsko kodiranje kliničnih besedil v bolgarščini v ICD-10. Primerjalna analiza poskuša ugotoviti, kateri pristop je učinkovitejši za natančno nastavitev predtreniranega družinskega transformatorja BERT za obravnavo specifične domenske terminologije v redkem jeziku, kot je bolgarščina. Na eni strani se uporabljata SlavicBERT in MultiligualBERT, ki sta predtrenirana za skupni besednjak v bolgarščini, vendar nimata medicinske terminologije. Po drugi strani pa se v analizi uporabljajo BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, ki so predtrenirani za medicinsko terminologijo v angleščini, vendar nimajo usposabljanja za jezikovne modele v bolgarščini in še več za besedišče v cirilici. V naši raziskovalni študiji so vsi BERT modeli natančno nastavljeni z dodatnimi medicinskimi besedili v bolgarščini in nato uporabljeni pri klasifikacijski nalogi za kodiranje medicinskih diagnoz v bolgarščini v kode ICD-10. Za opravilo klasifikacije se uporabljajo veliki korpusi diagnoze v bolgarščini z oznakami ICD-10. Takšna analiza daje dobro idejo, kateri modeli bi bili primerni za naloge podobne vrste in domene. Poskusi in\nRezultati ocenjevanja kažejo, da imata oba pristopa primerljivo natančnost.', 'jv': 'Tarjamahan karo sistem sing dikarol automatically sing dikarol kanggo kalagayaan karo ontlogi, akeh laning sak supoyantane ning panjur-ingkang - padha ngubah dhéwé nggunaké gawé dagêr operasi layanan karo nggawe akeh lanian lan ngêpember dhéwé kuwi nggawe dokumentara dhéwé, lan ngêpember automatik kanggo Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé nyulung aplikasi lan nggawe barang nggambar luwih dumateng kanggo nggawe kode otomatik kanggo nggambar barang IID-10 lan textin pancen kanggo bugar. The conversative measurements tries to find that method is a additional effectt to be used for Fin- tuning of presininged BERT group transformer to handle with a special domain terminal on a small language as Bolgarn. Mungkin sampeyan wong liyane mungkin SlavecBERT karo Multi Liguru BERT, sing dipulangan kanggo kelas kelebu kanggo langgar an Burgari, sanes ora ono terme sawar. Panjenengan langgar sampeyan karo panelusisi nggawe biasane bisa nggawe BiBERT, ClilicalBERT, SapBERT, bloBERT, sing diputêrung kanggo terminal dhéwé kanggo inggiles, macem kuwi wis atik dhéwé nggawe model kanggo langgar ning bumulgari, lan sakjane awak dhéwé kanggo kelas kelas kanggo kelas. Nang barêng-barêng kamulêng ngêmên kuwi model BERT kuwi wis luwih-luwih kanggo textil supon sing larang kanggo nggawe Bolgari lan nguwehi kesempatan kanggo kelompok ngéatan panjenengan langgar ingkang dibutêrané kanggo nyenggap ujaran isi disenyongan langgar kanggo kode IK politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Samsul Wanggalih lan\nechoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world', 'bo': 'The task of automatic diagnosis encoding in to standard medical classifications and ontologies, is of great importance in medicine - both to support the daily tasks of physicians in the preparation and reporting of clinical documentation, and for automatic processing of clinical reports. In this paper we investigate the application and performance of different deep learning transformers for automatic encoding in ICD-10 of clinical texts in Bulgarian. The comparative analysis attempts to find which approach is more efficient to be used for fine-tuning of pretrained BERT family transformer to deal with a specific domain terminology on a rare language as Bulgarian. ཕྱོགས་གཅིག་ནས་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྨན་ཞབས་ཞུ་བའི་ནང་གི་སྨན་ཞབས་ཞུ་བའི་ཐ་སྙད་སྙད་དང་། སྨན་ཐོག་གི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་མི་འདུག ཕྱོགས་གཞན་ཞིག་ནས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་འདི་དག་གིས་BioBERT ། ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, དེ་དག་སྨན་གྱི་མཐའ་ནས་དབུལ་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་སྔོན་ཐག་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་མ་ཤེས་པའི་སྐད་ཆ་བའི་ ང་ཚོའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀློག་བརྟན་པར་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱིས་ BERT མིག་གཟུགས་རྣམས་Bulgarian་ནང་གི་སྨན་ཐིག་ཁ་སྐོང་དང་། དེ་ལས་བྱས་ཆོས་ཉེན་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ག དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་ཆེ་ཆུང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པའི་ဗཱལ་རི་ཡིས་དགའ་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱིས་ICD-10 ཡིག་གཟུགས་རྟགས་ཀྱིས་ལག་ལེ Such a analysis gives a good idea of which of the models would be suitable for tasks of a similar type and domain. སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་དང་།\nགཟུགས་རིས་གཉིས་པོ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བའི་precision་ཡིན་མིན་འདུག', 'he': 'המשימה של האבחנה האוטומטית הקודמת לתוך קלאס רפואי סטנדרטי ואונטולוגיות, היא חשובה גדולה ברפואה - גם לתמוך במשימות היומיות של רופאים בהכירה ודיווח של תיעוד קליני, ולעיבוד אוטומטי של דווחים קליניים. In this paper we investigate the application and performance of different deep learning transformers for automatic encoding in ICD-10 of clinical texts in Bulgarian.  הניתוח השוותי מנסה למצוא איזה גישה יעילה יותר להשתמש בהתאמה של משפחת BERT מתאמנת מראש כדי להתמודד עם טמינולוגיה ספציפית בתחום על שפה נדירה כבוגרית. מצד אחד משתמשים SlavicBERT ו MultiligualBERT, אשר מתאמנים מראש למילים משותפים בבולגרית, אבל חסרים טמינולוגיה רפואית. מצד שני בניתוח משתמשים BioBERT, ClinicalBERT, SapBERT, BlueBERT, אשר מתאמנים מראש לטרמינולוגיה רפואית באנגלית, אך חסרים אימונים לדוגמאות שפות בבולגרית, ויותר עבור מילון בסיריליק. במחקר המחקר שלנו כל דוגמנים של BERT מתאימים עם טקסטים רפואיים נוספים בבולגרית ואז מתייחסים למשימת ההזדמנות לקוד אבחנות רפואיות בבולגרית לקודים ICD-10. גופורה גדולה של אבחנה בבולגרית שנעטפת עם קודים ICD-10 משתמשת למשימת ההזדמנות. ניתוח כזה נותן רעיון טוב על איזה מהדוגמנים יהיו מתאימים למשימות של סוג ודמיון דומה. The experiments and\nevaluation results show that both approaches have comparable accuracy.'}
{'en': 'Mistake Captioning : A Machine Learning Approach for Detecting Mistakes and Generating Instructive Feedback', 'ar': 'التسمية التوضيحية الخاطئة: نهج التعلم الآلي لاكتشاف الأخطاء وإنشاء تعليقات إرشادية', 'fr': "Sous-titrage des erreurs\xa0: une approche d'apprentissage automatique pour détecter les erreurs et générer des commentaires instructifs", 'pt': 'Legendagem de erros: uma abordagem de aprendizado de máquina para detectar erros e gerar feedback instrutivo', 'es': 'Subtítulos de errores: un enfoque de aprendizaje automático para detectar errores y generar comentarios instructivos', 'ja': '間違ったキャプション：間違いを検出し、指示的なフィードバックを生成するための機械学習アプローチ', 'zh': '误字幕:一以检误成指导性反馈机器学法', 'hi': 'गलती कैप्शनिंग: गलतियों का पता लगाने और शिक्षाप्रद प्रतिक्रिया उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक मशीन लर्निंग दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Подпись к ошибке: подход к машинному обучению для обнаружения ошибок и генерации обратной связи', 'ga': 'Fotheidealú Botúin: Cur Chuige Meaisín Foghlama chun Botúin a Bhrath agus Aiseolas Teagascach a Ghiniúint', 'ka': 'შეცდომის კაპონიცია', 'it': 'Didascalia degli errori: un approccio di apprendimento automatico per rilevare errori e generare feedback istruttivi', 'hu': 'Hiba feliratozás: Gépi tanulási megközelítés a hibák észlelésére és instruktív visszajelzések generálására', 'el': 'Μια προσέγγιση μηχανικής μάθησης για τον εντοπισμό σφαλμάτων και τη δημιουργία διδακτικών σχολίων', 'kk': 'Қате айдары: Қате қателерді анықтау және құрастыру қатесін құру үшін машинаның оқыту жағдайы', 'lt': 'Klaidų formuluotė: klaidų nustatymo ir instrukcinio atsako sukūrimo mašinų mokymosi metodas', 'mk': 'Напишување на грешки: пристап за учење на машина за детектирање грешки и генерирање инструктивна реакција', 'ms': 'Capsyen Kesilapan: Pendekatan Belajar Mesin untuk mengesan Kesilapan dan Menjana Balas Balas Instruktif', 'ml': '@ info', 'mn': 'Гэвч алдагдлын дараа: Гүйцэтгэлийг олж мэдэх, багш боловсруулах машины суралцах ойлголт', 'no': 'Feil oppskriving: Eit maskinelæringstilgang for å finna feil og laga instruktiv tilbakemelding', 'pl': 'Podejście do uczenia maszynowego do wykrywania błędów i generowania instrukcyjnych informacji zwrotnych', 'ro': 'Captionarea erorilor: o abordare de învățare automată pentru detectarea erorilor și generarea de feedback instructiv', 'sr': 'Pogrešna kapitacija: pristup učenja mašine za otkrivanje grešaka i stvaranje instruktivnih povratka', 'si': 'වැරැද්ධ විශ්වාසය: වැරැද්ධතාවක් හැකීම සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් හොයාගන්න සඳහා මැෂින් ඉගෙන ගන්න අවස්ථාව', 'so': 'Baalad qabsashada: A machine Learning Approach for Detecting Mistake and Generating Instructive Feedback', 'sv': 'Felbildning: En maskininlärningsmetod för att upptäcka misstag och generera instruktiv feedback', 'ta': 'தவறான பிடிப்பு', 'ur': 'Mistake Captioning: A Machine Learning Approach for Detecting Mistakes and Generating Instructive Feedback', 'mt': 'Tfassil ta’ Żbalji: Approċċ ta’ Tagħlim tal-Magni biex jiġu identifikati żbalji u jiġu ġġenerati reazzjonijiet istruttivi', 'uz': '@ info: status', 'vi': 'Đầu đề lỗi: Hướng dẫn về học về máy móc để phát hiện sai lầm và tạo phản ứng tiêu dụng cụ.', 'bg': 'Подход за машинно обучение за откриване на грешки и генериране на инструктивна обратна връзка', 'da': 'Fejltekster: En maskinlæringsmetode til at opdage fejl og generere instruerende feedback', 'hr': 'Pogrešno snimanje: Pristup za učenje strojeva za otkrivanje grešaka i proizvodnju instruktivnih povratka', 'nl': 'Fouten bijschrift: Een machine learning aanpak voor het opsporen van fouten en het genereren van instructieve feedback', 'de': 'Fehlerbeschriftung: Ein Machine Learning Ansatz zur Fehlererkennung und Generierung von hilfreichem Feedback', 'ko': '오류 자막: 오류를 감지하고 지도적인 피드백을 생성하는 기계 학습 방법', 'fa': 'گزینه\u200cگیری اشتباهی: یک نزدیک یادگیری ماشین برای شناسایی اشتباهی و ایجاد دادن feedback آموزشی', 'id': 'Captioning Kesalahan: Sebuah Pendekatan Belajar Mesin untuk mendeteksi Kesalahan dan Membuat Feedback Instruktif', 'sw': 'Toleo lililokosekana: Mtandao wa Kufunza Mashiniki kwa Kuchunguza Vikosa na Kutengeneza Feedback za Kiruhusa', 'af': "Mistake Caption: ' n Masjien leer toegang vir ontdekking van mislukke en genereer instruktiewe terugvoer", 'tr': 'Ýalňyş Käpşeme', 'sq': 'Përshkrimi i gabimeve: Një metodë mësimi i makinës për zbulimin e gabimeve dhe krijimin e reagimeve instruktive', 'hy': 'Սխալ կառավարումը. մեքենայի մոտեցումը սխալների հայտնաբերման և ուսումնասիրելու համար', 'az': 'Xəta Başlıqlama: Bətaları keşfetmək və İnструкtiv Feedback Yapılması üçün Makina Öyrənmə Yaxınlığı', 'bn': 'ভুল ক্যাপ্টেশন: একটি মেশিন শিক্ষা যাওয়া যাচ্ছে ভুল পরিচিতি এবং নির্দেশিত ফিডব্যাক তৈরি করার জন্য', 'am': 'የስህተት ምርጫዎች', 'ca': "Captació d'errors: Un enfocament d'aprenentatge a màquines per detectar errors i generar feedback instructiu", 'bs': 'Pogrešno snimanje: pristup učenja mašine za otkrivanje grešaka i stvaranje instruktivnih povratka', 'cs': 'Titulky chyb: Přístup strojového učení pro detekci chyb a generování instruktivní zpětné vazby', 'et': 'Vigade pealkirjastus: masinõppe lähenemisviis vigade tuvastamiseks ja juhendava tagasiside loomiseks', 'fi': 'Virhekuvaukset: Koneoppimismenetelmä virheiden havaitsemiseen ja opettavan palautteen tuottamiseen', 'jv': 'Mistake', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Mistake Captioning: A Machine Learning Approach for Detecting Mistakes and Generating Instructive Feedback', 'sk': 'Napis napak: pristop strojnega učenja za odkrivanje napak in ustvarjanje navodil za povratne informacije', 'bo': 'Mistake Caption: A Machine Learning Approach for Detecting Mistakes and Generating Instructive Feedback'}
{'en': 'Giving feedback to students is not just about marking their answers as correct or incorrect, but also finding mistakes in their thought process that led them to that incorrect answer. In this paper, we introduce a machine learning technique for mistake captioning, a task that attempts to identify mistakes and provide feedback meant to help learners correct these mistakes. We do this by training a sequence-to-sequence network to generate this feedback based on domain experts. To evaluate this system, we explore how it can be used on a Linguistics assignment studying Grimm’s Law. We show that our approach generates feedback that outperforms a baseline on a set of automated NLP metrics. In addition, we perform a series of case studies in which we examine successful and unsuccessful system outputs.', 'ar': 'لا يقتصر تقديم التعليقات للطلاب على تحديد إجاباتهم على أنها صحيحة أو غير صحيحة ، ولكن أيضًا العثور على أخطاء في عملية تفكيرهم أدت بهم إلى تلك الإجابة غير الصحيحة. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم تقنية التعلم الآلي للتسميات التوضيحية للأخطاء ، وهي مهمة تحاول تحديد الأخطاء وتقديم ملاحظات تهدف إلى مساعدة المتعلمين على تصحيح هذه الأخطاء. نقوم بذلك عن طريق تدريب شبكة التسلسل إلى التسلسل لإنشاء هذه التعليقات بناءً على خبراء المجال. لتقييم هذا النظام ، نستكشف كيف يمكن استخدامه في مهمة لغويات لدراسة قانون جريم. نظهر أن نهجنا يولد ردود فعل تتفوق على خط الأساس على مجموعة من مقاييس البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الآلية. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقوم بإجراء سلسلة من دراسات الحالة التي نفحص فيها مخرجات النظام الناجحة وغير الناجحة.', 'fr': "Donner du feedback aux étudiants ne consiste pas seulement à marquer leurs réponses comme étant correctes ou incorrectes, mais aussi à trouver les erreurs dans leur processus de réflexion qui les ont amenés à cette mauvaise réponse. Dans cet article, nous présentons une technique d'apprentissage automatique pour le sous-titrage des erreurs, une tâche qui tente d'identifier les erreurs et de fournir un retour d'information destiné à aider les apprenants à les corriger. Pour ce faire, nous formons un réseau séquence à séquence afin de générer ce retour d'information sur la base d'experts du domaine. Pour évaluer ce système, nous explorons comment il peut être utilisé dans le cadre d'un travail de linguistique portant sur la loi de Grimm. Nous montrons que notre approche génère des commentaires qui surpassent les performances de base d'un ensemble de mesures NLP automatisées. En outre, nous réalisons une série d'études de cas dans lesquelles nous examinons les résultats du système qui ont réussi et échoué.", 'es': 'Dar retroalimentación a los estudiantes no solo consiste en marcar sus respuestas como correctas o incorrectas, sino también en encontrar errores en su proceso de pensamiento que los llevaron a esa respuesta incorrecta. En este artículo, presentamos una técnica de aprendizaje automático para la subtitulación de errores, una tarea que intenta identificar los errores y proporcionar comentarios para ayudar a los estudiantes a corregirlos. Hacemos esto mediante la capacitación de una red de secuencia a secuencia para generar esta retroalimentación basada en expertos en el dominio. Para evaluar este sistema, exploramos cómo se puede utilizar en una tarea de Lingüística que estudie la Ley de Grimm. Demostramos que nuestro enfoque genera comentarios que superan una línea de base en un conjunto de métricas automatizadas de PNL. Además, realizamos una serie de estudios de casos en los que examinamos los resultados exitosos y fallidos del sistema.', 'pt': 'Dar feedback aos alunos não é apenas marcar suas respostas como corretas ou incorretas, mas também encontrar erros em seu processo de pensamento que os levaram a essa resposta incorreta. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma técnica de aprendizado de máquina para legendagem de erros, uma tarefa que tenta identificar erros e fornecer feedback para ajudar os alunos a corrigir esses erros. Fazemos isso treinando uma rede sequência a sequência para gerar esse feedback com base em especialistas do domínio. Para avaliar este sistema, exploramos como ele pode ser usado em um trabalho de Linguística estudando a Lei de Grimm. Mostramos que nossa abordagem gera feedback que supera uma linha de base em um conjunto de métricas automatizadas de PNL. Além disso, realizamos uma série de estudos de caso nos quais examinamos as saídas do sistema bem-sucedidas e mal-sucedidas.', 'zh': '供反馈非徒书其对为是非也,而又发其思维过程而失之也。 本文引误字幕机器学术,此尝试识误反馈以助学者纠正之也。 训练序列网络以域家成反馈。 为评此统,讨论格林律语言学作业用之。 吾道之所生反馈优于自NLP指标基线。 此外,我们还行一系案例研究,在其中检核成功和不成的系统输出。', 'ja': '学習者にフィードバックを与えるということは、自分の答えを正解または不正解としてマークするだけでなく、その不正解につながった思考プロセスの間違いを見つけることです。この論文では、間違ったキャプション付けのための機械学習テクニックを紹介します。これは、間違いを特定し、学習者がこれらの間違いを修正するのに役立つフィードバックを提供しようとするタスクです。これは、ドメインの専門家に基づいてこのフィードバックを生成するためのシーケンスツーシーケンスネットワークをトレーニングすることによって行われます。このシステムを評価するために、グリムの法則を研究する言語学の課題にどのように使用できるかを探ります。私たちのアプローチは、一連の自動化されたNLP指標のベースラインを上回るフィードバックを生成することを示しています。さらに、成功したシステム出力と失敗したシステム出力を検討する一連のケーススタディを実施します。', 'ru': 'Обратная связь с учащимися заключается не только в том, чтобы пометить их ответы как правильные или неправильные, но и в том, чтобы найти ошибки в их мыслительном процессе, которые привели их к этому неправильному ответу. В этой статье мы вводим технику машинного обучения для субтитров к ошибкам, задача, которая пытается выявить ошибки и предоставить обратную связь, чтобы помочь учащимся исправить эти ошибки. Мы делаем это, обучая последовательную сеть, чтобы генерировать эту обратную связь на основе экспертов домена. Чтобы оценить эту систему, мы исследуем, как она может быть использована в задании по лингвистике, изучая закон Гримма. Мы показываем, что наш подход генерирует обратную связь, которая превосходит базовую по набору автоматизированных метрик NLP. Кроме того, мы проводим серию тематических исследований, в которых анализируем успешные и неудачные результаты работы системы.', 'hi': 'छात्रों को प्रतिक्रिया देना न केवल उनके उत्तरों को सही या गलत के रूप में चिह्नित करने के बारे में है, बल्कि उनकी विचार प्रक्रिया में गलतियों को ढूंढना भी है जो उन्हें उस गलत उत्तर की ओर ले जाता है। इस पेपर में, हम गलती कैप्शनिंग के लिए एक मशीन लर्निंग तकनीक पेश करते हैं, एक ऐसा कार्य जो गलतियों की पहचान करने का प्रयास करता है और शिक्षार्थियों को इन गलतियों को सही करने में मदद करने के लिए प्रतिक्रिया प्रदान करता है। हम डोमेन विशेषज्ञों के आधार पर इस प्रतिक्रिया को उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम नेटवर्क को प्रशिक्षित करके ऐसा करते हैं। इस प्रणाली का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए, हम यह पता लगाते हैं कि ग्रिम के कानून का अध्ययन करने वाले भाषाविज्ञान असाइनमेंट पर इसका उपयोग कैसे किया जा सकता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण प्रतिक्रिया उत्पन्न करता है जो स्वचालित एनएलपी मीट्रिक के सेट पर एक आधार रेखा को मात देता है। इसके अलावा, हम केस स्टडीज की एक श्रृंखला करते हैं जिसमें हम सफल और असफल सिस्टम आउटपुट की जांच करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Ní hamháin go bhfuil sé i gceist le haiseolas a thabhairt do dhaltaí a gcuid freagraí a mharcáil mar chearta nó mícheart, ach freisin le botúin a aimsiú ina bpróiseas machnaimh a thug orthu an freagra mícheart sin. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach teicníocht mheaisínfhoghlama le haghaidh fotheidealú botún, tasc a dhéanann iarracht botúin a aithint agus aiseolas a sholáthar chun cabhrú le foghlaimeoirí na botúin seo a cheartú. Déanaimid é seo trí líonra seicheamh go seicheamh a oiliúint chun an t-aiseolas seo a ghiniúint bunaithe ar shaineolaithe fearainn. Chun an córas seo a mheas, déanaimid iniúchadh ar conas is féidir é a úsáid ar thasc Teangeolaíochta ag déanamh staidéir ar Dhlí Grimm. Léirímid go ngineann ár gcur chuige aiseolas a sháraíonn bonnlíne ar thacar de mhéadracht NLP uathoibrithe. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid sraith cás-staidéir ina scrúdaímid aschuir chórais rathúla agus nár éirigh leo.', 'ka': 'სტუდენტებისთვის გახსნა არა მხოლოდ მათი პასუხების მარტივის ან შეცდომის მარტივის მარტივის შეცდომების პროცესი, რომელიც მათი შეცდომების შეცდომების შესაძლებელობა,  ამ დომენტში ჩვენ შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის განსაცნობა და შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდო ჩვენ ამას გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც სკენესიკენესიკენესიკენესიკენესიკენესიკენესიკენ ქსელის შექმნა, რომელიც დიომინური ექსპერტების ბაზეც და ამ სისტემის განსაზღვრებისთვის, ჩვენ ვაკვირდებით როგორ შეიძლება გამოიყენება ლინგუტისტიკის დასაზღვრებისთვის, როგორ შეიძლება Grimm-ის законодательства ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამა შექმნის შეცდომა, რომელიც ავტომატიკური NLP მეტრიკის ნაწილზე გავაკეთებს. დამატებით, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სერიო სწავლებები, რომლებიც ჩვენ წარმატებული და არსებელი სისტემის შემდეგ გავაკეთებთ.', 'el': 'Η παροχή ανατροφοδότησης στους μαθητές δεν αφορά μόνο την επισήμανση των απαντήσεών τους ως σωστών ή εσφαλμένων, αλλά και την εύρεση σφαλμάτων στη διαδικασία σκέψης τους που τους οδήγησαν σε αυτήν την εσφαλμένη απάντηση. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε μια τεχνική μηχανικής μάθησης για τη λεζάντα λαθών, μια εργασία που επιχειρεί να εντοπίσει λάθη και να παράσχει ανατροφοδότηση για να βοηθήσει τους μαθητές να διορθώσουν αυτά τα λάθη. Το κάνουμε αυτό εκπαιδεύοντας ένα δίκτυο αλληλουχίας προς αλληλουχίας για να δημιουργήσουμε αυτή την ανατροφοδότηση βασισμένη σε ειδικούς τομέα. Για να αξιολογήσουμε αυτό το σύστημα, διερευνούμε πώς μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί σε μια γλωσσική εργασία που μελετά το νόμο του Γκριμ. Δείχνουμε ότι η προσέγγισή μας παράγει ανατροφοδότηση που ξεπερνά μια γραμμή βάσης σε ένα σύνολο αυτοματοποιημένων μετρήσεων ΝΛΠ. Επιπλέον, διεξάγουμε μια σειρά περιπτωσιολογικών μελετών στις οποίες εξετάζουμε επιτυχή και ανεπιτυχή αποτελέσματα συστημάτων.', 'hu': 'Visszajelzést adni a diákoknak nem csak arról szól, hogy helyesnek vagy helytelennek jelöljük meg a válaszaikat, hanem olyan hibákat is találunk a gondolkodási folyamatban, amelyek a helytelen válaszhoz vezettek. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy gépi tanulási technikát a hibák feliratozására, egy olyan feladatot, amely megpróbálja azonosítani a hibákat és visszajelzést nyújtani, amely segít a tanulóknak kijavítani ezeket a hibákat. Ezt egy szekvencia-szekvencia hálózat képzésével tesszük meg, hogy ezt a visszajelzést domain szakértők alapján generáljuk. A rendszer értékeléséhez azt vizsgáljuk, hogyan használható fel egy Grimm jogát tanulmányozó nyelvészeti feladat során. Megmutatjuk, hogy megközelítésünk olyan visszajelzéseket generál, amelyek meghaladják az alapvető teljesítményt az automatizált NLP-mutatók sorozatában. Ezenkívül esettanulmányokat végzünk, amelyekben sikeres és sikertelen rendszer kimeneteket vizsgálunk.', 'it': 'Dare feedback agli studenti non significa solo contrassegnare le loro risposte come corrette o errate, ma anche trovare errori nel loro processo di pensiero che li ha portati a quella risposta errata. In questo articolo, introduciamo una tecnica di apprendimento automatico per la didascalia degli errori, un compito che tenta di identificare gli errori e fornire feedback volti ad aiutare gli studenti a correggere questi errori. Lo facciamo formando una rete sequenza-sequenza per generare questo feedback basato su esperti del dominio. Per valutare questo sistema, esploriamo come può essere utilizzato in un incarico di Linguistica studiando la Legge Grimm. Mostriamo che il nostro approccio genera feedback che superano una base di riferimento su un set di metriche NLP automatizzate. Inoltre, eseguiamo una serie di casi di studio in cui esaminiamo risultati di sistema di successo e non riusciti.', 'kk': 'Студенттерге жауап беру тек жауаптарын дұрыс немесе дұрыс деп белгілеу емес, сондай-ақ оларды оқиға жауап берген оқиға процесінде қате табу. Бұл қағазда, біз қате айдарының машинаны оқыту техникасын, қателерді анықтау және оқытуға көмектесетін тапсырманы таңдап береміз. Біз осыны домен эксперттеріне негізделген рейтинг жасау үшін реттеу-реттеу желімен үйренеміз. Бұл жүйені бағалау үшін, Grimm Заңдығын зерттеу үшін оны Linguistics тапсырмасында қалай қолданатын талап етеміз. Біз өзіміздің тәсіліміз автоматты NLP метрикасының негізгі жолын жасайтынын көрсетедік. Қосымша, біз жүйелік нәтижелерін сәтті және істемеген жүйелік нәтижелерін тексеріп жатырмыз.', 'mk': 'Давањето на враќање на студентите не е само обележување на нивните одговори како правилни или неправилни, туку и откривање грешки во нивниот мислен процес кој ги доведе до тој неправилен одговор. Во овој весник, воведуваме техника на машинско учење за потпишување грешки, задача која се обидува да ги идентификува грешките и да обезбеди враќање со цел да им помогне на учениците да ги исправат овие грешки. Го правиме ова со обука на мрежа од секвенца до секвенца за да ја генерираме оваа реакција базирана на експерти од домен. За да го процениме системот, истражуваме како може да се користи на задача на Лингвистика која го проучува законот на Грим. Покажуваме дека нашиот пристап генерира реакција која ја надминува основата на сет автоматизирани метрики на НЛП. In addition, we perform a series of case studies in which we examine successful and unsuccessful system outputs.', 'ms': 'Memberi balas balik kepada pelajar bukan hanya tentang menandakan jawapan mereka sebagai betul atau salah, tetapi juga mencari kesilapan dalam proses fikiran mereka yang membawa mereka kepada jawapan yang salah. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan teknik pembelajaran mesin untuk penulisan kesilapan, tugas yang cuba untuk mengenalpasti kesilapan dan memberikan balas balik yang bermaksud untuk membantu pelajar memperbaiki kesilapan ini. Kita lakukan ini dengan melatih rangkaian urutan-ke-urutan untuk menghasilkan balas balik ini berdasarkan ahli domain. Untuk menilai sistem ini, kami mengeksplorasi bagaimana ia boleh digunakan dalam tugas bahasa mempelajari Hukum Grimm. We show that our approach generates feedback that outperforms a baseline on a set of automated NLP metrics.  Selain itu, kami melakukan beberapa kajian kes di mana kami memeriksa hasil sistem yang berjaya dan tidak berjaya.', 'lt': 'Atsakymų teikimas studentams reiškia ne tik teisingą ar neteisingą jų atsakymų žymėjimą, bet ir klaidų nustatymą jų mąstymo procese, dėl kurio jie gavo neteisingą atsakymą. Šiame dokumente įvedame mašininio mokymosi metodą klaidų apibūdinimui, užduotį, kuria bandoma nustatyti klaidas ir teikti grįžtamąją informaciją, skirtą padėti mokiniams ištaisyti šias klaidas. Mes tai darome mokydami sekos po sekos tinklą, kad gautume šią grįžtamąją informaciją, pagrįstą srities ekspertais. Siekdami įvertinti šią sistemą, mes tiriame, kaip ją galima naudoti kalbos užduotyje, kuria tiriamas Grimo įstatymas. Mes parodome, kad mūsų požiūris sukuria grįžtamąją informaciją, kuri viršija standartinę bazę automatizuotų NLP metrijų rinkiniu. Be to, atliekame daugelį atvejų tyrimų, kuriuose nagrinėjame sėkmingus ir nesėkmingus sistemos rezultatus.', 'mt': "L-għoti ta’ rispons lill-istudenti mhuwiex biss dwar l-immarkar tat-tweġibiet tagħhom bħala korretti jew inkorretti, iżda wkoll is-sejba ta’ żbalji fil-proċess ta’ ħsieb tagħhom li wassluhom għal dik it-tweġiba inkorretta. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu teknika ta’ tagħlim bil-magna għall-intestatura ta’ żbalji, kompitu li jipprova jidentifika żbalji u jipprovdi feedback maħsub biex jgħin lil dawk li jitgħallmu jikkoreġu dawn l-iżbalji. We do this by training a sequence-to-sequence network to generate this feedback based on domain experts.  Biex tevalwa din is-sistema, nistudjaw kif tista' tintuża f'assenjazzjoni Lingwistika li tistudja l-Liġi ta' Grimm. Aħna nuru li l-approċċ tagħna jiġġenera reazzjonijiet li jaqbżu linja bażi fuq sett ta’ metriċi awtomatizzati tal-NLP. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu sensiela ta' studji ta' każijiet li fihom nagħmlu eżami ta' riżultati tas-sistema li rnexxew u li ma rnexxewx.", 'mn': 'Оюутнуудад хариулт өгөх нь зөвхөн зөв эсвэл буруу хариултыг тэмдэглэх зүйл биш, гэхдээ тэдний бодлоор буруу хариулт руу алдаа олж чаддаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид алдаа хэвлэхийн тулд машин суралцах техникыг танилцуулж, алдаа гаргаж, суралцагчид эдгээр алдаа засах тулд хариу өгөх зорилготой. Бид үүнийг холбооны мэргэжилтнүүдийн үндсэн хариу үйлдвэрлэхийн тулд дарааллаар дарааллаар зохион байгуулан хийдэг. Энэ системийг үнэлэхэд бид Гриммийн хуулийг судлах Лингистик дасгал дээр хэрхэн хэрэглэгдэхийг судалж байна. Бид өөрсдийн арга зам нь автоматжуулагдсан NLP метриктик дээр суурь шугам гаргаж чадахгүй хариулт гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн бид амжилттай, амжилттай системийн үр дүнг шалгаж байгаа олон тохиолдол судалгаа хийдэг.', 'ml': 'വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നത് ശരിയോ തെറ്റോ എന്നോ അടയാളപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി മാത്രമല്ല, പക്ഷെ അവരുടെ ചിന്ത പ്രക്രി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു യന്ത്രം പഠിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. തെറ്റുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ജോലിയാ ഈ ഫിബിബ്ബാക്ക് സൃഷ്ടിക്കാന്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വിശേഷികള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഇത് പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിനാല ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തെ പരിഗണിക്കാന്\u200d, ഗ്രിമ്മിന്റെ നിയമം പഠിക്കുന്ന ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്സ് മിഷനില്\u200d എങ്ങനെ ഉപയോഗിക്കാ We show that our approach generates feedback that outperforms a baseline on a set of automated NLP metrics.  കൂടാതെ, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കേസ് പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിജയിച്ചും വിജയിക്കാത്ത സിസ്റ്റം', 'pl': 'Dawanie opinii uczniom nie polega tylko na oznaczaniu ich odpowiedzi jako poprawnych lub niepoprawnych, ale także na znalezieniu błędów w procesie myślenia, które doprowadziły ich do niepoprawnej odpowiedzi. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy technikę uczenia maszynowego do podpisywania błędów, zadanie, które próbuje zidentyfikować błędy i dostarczyć informacji zwrotnych mających pomóc uczniom poprawić te błędy. Robimy to poprzez szkolenie sieci sekwencji do sekwencji, aby generować te informacje zwrotne w oparciu o ekspertów domeny. Aby ocenić ten system, badamy, jak można go wykorzystać w zadaniu lingwistycznym studiującym prawo Grimma. Pokazujemy, że nasze podejście generuje informacje zwrotne, które przewyższają bazę bazową dla zestawu zautomatyzowanych wskaźników NLP. Ponadto przeprowadzamy serię studiów przypadków, w których badamy udane i nieudane wyniki systemu.', 'sr': 'Vraćanje odgovora studentima nije samo o označavanju odgovora kao prava ili nepravedna, nego i pronalaženju greška u njihovom procesu misli koji ih je doveo do pogrešnog odgovora. U ovom papiru predstavljamo tehniku učenja mašine za pogrešno navedenje, zadatak koji pokušava da identifikuje greške i pruži reakciju koja znači da pomogne učnicima da ispravi ove greške. To radimo trenirajući mrežu sekvence do sekvence da bi stvorili ovu reakciju na temelju stručnjaka domena. Da bi procenili ovaj sistem, istražujemo kako se može iskoristiti na Lingističkom zadatku koji proučava Grimmov zakon. Pokazujemo da naš pristup stvara reakciju koja iznosi početnu liniju na setu automatskih NLP metrika. Osim toga, izvršavamo niz istraživanja slučajeva u kojima pregledamo uspešne i neuspješne ishode sistema.', 'no': 'Gå tilbakemelding til studenten er ikkje berre om å markera svara sine som korrekt eller feil, men også å finna feil i tankeprosessen deres som førte dei til den feil svaret. I denne papiret introduserer vi ein maskinelæringsteknikk for feilskriving, ei oppgåve som prøver å identifisera feil og gjera tilbakemeldingar som skal hjelpa lærarar å korrigera desse feilene. Vi gjer dette ved å læra eit nettverk med sekvens-til-sekvens for å laga denne tilbakemeldinga basert på domeneekspertar. For å evaluera denne systemet, utforskar vi korleis det kan brukast på ein linguistics tillegg som studerer Grimm sin lov. Vi viser at tilnærminga vårt generer tilbakemeldingar som utfører ein grunnlinje på eit sett av automatiske NLP- metrikar. I tillegg utfører vi ei rekkje tilfelle studier som vi undersøker suksessfulle og fullførte utdata av systemet.', 'ro': 'A oferi feedback elevilor nu înseamnă doar să le marchezi răspunsurile drept corecte sau incorecte, ci și să găsești greșeli în procesul lor de gândire care i-a condus la acel răspuns incorect. În această lucrare, introducem o tehnică de învățare automată pentru redarea titlurilor, o sarcină care încearcă să identifice greșelile și să ofere feedback menit să ajute elevii să corecteze aceste greșeli. Facem acest lucru instruind o rețea secvență-la-secvență pentru a genera acest feedback bazat pe experți în domeniu. Pentru a evalua acest sistem, explorăm modul în care acesta poate fi utilizat într-o misiune lingvistică care studiază Legea lui Grimm. Noi arătăm că abordarea noastră generează feedback care depășește o bază de referință pe un set de valori automate ale PNL. În plus, efectuăm o serie de studii de caz în care examinăm rezultatele sistemului de succes și nereușite.', 'si': 'විද්\u200dයාහකට ප්\u200dරතිච්චාර දෙන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය හරි වැරදි නැති විදියට සඳහා වැරදි විදියට නෙවෙයි, ඒත් ඔවුන්ගේ හිත මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණයේ යන්ත්\u200dරය ඉගෙන ඉගෙනීමේ තාක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, වැරදි විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා, ඒ වැරදි අ අපි මේක කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ක්\u200dරමාණික ජාලයෙන් මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න. මේ පද්ධතිය විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කොහොමද ඒක ලින්ග්විස්ටික් අධ්\u200dයානයට පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා කියලා ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය NLP මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් එක්ක සූදානම ඒ වගේම, අපි පරීක්ෂණයක් කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අපි සමහර විශ්වාසයක් සහ අසමහර විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා.', 'so': 'Jawaab u siinta ardayda ma ahan jawaabahooda si sax ah ama khalad ah, laakiin sidoo kale qalad ka helaya xiliga fikirkooda oo sababtay jawaabta saxda ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaynaa teknikada waxbarashada mashiinka oo lagu barto khalad, shaqo uu isku dayayo in uu caddeeyo qaladyo oo uu soo celiyo jawaab-celinta waxaa loola jeedaa in ay caawiyaan waxbarashadaas hagaajiyaan falimahaas. Waxan ku sameynaa waxbarashada shabakadda xilliga ah si aan u sameyno feedbackan oo lagu saleynayo khabiir deegaanka. Si aan u qiimeyno nidaamkan, waxaynu baarinaynaa sida loo isticmaali karo wakiilka lagu baro sharciga Grimm. Waxaynu muujinnaa in dhaqdhaqaaqyadeenu uu sameeyo dib u celin, taasoo ka soo baxa qoraal hoose oo ku yaal koox kamid ah oo ka mid ah NLP metric. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu sameynaa waxbarasho xaalad ah oo aan ku baarayno soo bixinta nidaamka oo aan liibaanayn.', 'sv': 'Att ge feedback till eleverna handlar inte bara om att markera deras svar som korrekta eller felaktiga, utan också hitta misstag i deras tankeprocess som ledde dem till det felaktiga svaret. I den här uppsatsen introducerar vi en maskininlärningsteknik för felskrivning, en uppgift som försöker identifiera misstag och ge feedback för att hjälpa eleverna att rätta till dessa misstag. Vi gör detta genom att utbilda ett sekvens-till-sekvensnätverk för att generera denna feedback baserat på domänexperter. För att utvärdera detta system undersöker vi hur det kan användas på ett lingvistiskt uppdrag som studerar Grimms lag. Vi visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt genererar feedback som överträffar en baslinje på en uppsättning automatiserade NLP-värden. Dessutom utför vi en serie fallstudier där vi undersöker framgångsrika och misslyckade systemresultat.', 'ur': 'دانش آموزوں کو فیڈ واک دینا صرف ان کی جواب درست یا غلطی کے مطابق علامت نہیں کرنا ہے بلکہ ان کی فکر پرسس میں بھی غلطی پیدا کرنا ہے جو ان کو اس غلطی جواب کی طرف لے جاتا ہے اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک ماشین سیکھنے کی تکنیک پیش کریں گے کہ خطاؤں کی تصدیق کرنے کی کوشش کرتا ہے اور ان کی تعلیم کرنے کی کوشش کرتا ہے کہ ان خطاؤں کو درست کرنے والوں کی مدد کریں۔ ہم یہ کام کرتے ہیں ڈومین متخصص لوگوں پر بنیاد رکھنے کے لئے ایک سطح-تا-سطح نیٹ ورک کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ۔ اس سیسٹم کا ارزش کرنا، ہم اسے کس طرح استعمال کر سکتے ہیں گریم کے قانون کی تحقیق کرنا. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ پیدا کرتا ہے جو آٹوٹی NLP میٹریک کے سٹے پر بنیاس لین سے زیادہ کم کرتا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ ہم ایک سری کیس تحقیقات کرتے ہیں جس میں ہم موفق اور ناکام سیستم کے نتائج تحقیق کرتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'மாணவர்களுக்கு பதில் கொடுப்பது சரியாக அல்லது தவறாக குறிப்பிடுவது மட்டும் அல்ல, ஆனால் அவர்கள் தவறான விடையில் தவறு கண்டுபிடிக்கும் என்று நின இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு இயந்திர கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் தொழில்நுட்பத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், தவறு பிடித்துக் கொள்ள முயற்சி மற்றும் பதில் கொட நாம் இதை பயிற்சி செய்யும் தொடர்ச்சி பிணையத்தின் வலைப்பின்னலைப் பயன்படுத்தினால் இந்த பதில் பின்பற்றிக் கொண் இந்த கணினியை மதிப்பிட, கிரிம் சட்டத்தை படிக்கும் ஒரு வரிசைப்படுத்தலில் அதை எப்படி பயன்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை நாம் கண் நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் எங்கள் நெருக்கம் தானியங்கி NLP மெட்ரிக்களில் ஒரு அடிப்படைக்கோட்டை வெளியேற்று மேலும், நாம் ஒரு சில விஷயங்கள் படிப்பியலை செய்கிறோம். அதில் நாம் வெற்றிகரமாக மற்றும் வெற்றியடையாத அமைப்ப', 'uz': "Talablarni javob berish faqat ularning javoblarni notoʻgʻri yoki notoʻgʻri notoʻgʻri deb belgilash haqida emas, balki ularning fikr jarayonini xatolik topishi mumkin. Bu qogʻozda biz xato qabul qilish uchun mashinani o'rganish teknologini anglatamiz. Xatolarni aniqlash va javob berishni o'rganish uchun bu xatolarni to ʻgʻri qilishga yordam berishi mumkin. Biz buni domen ekspert asosida yaratish uchun tarmoq tarmoqni o'rganamiz. Bu tizimni qiymatish uchun, Grimm sharciga o'rganish lingvistika qanday foydalanishini aniqlamiz. Biz shunday qilamiz, bizning fikrimiz avtomatik avtomatik NLP metriklarida asosiy satrlarni bajarish natijasini yaratadi. Ko'pchilik, biz ko'pchilik tizimning muvaffaqiyatli va muvaffaqiyatli tizim natijalarini tekshirimiz.", 'vi': 'Đưa phản hồi cho học sinh không chỉ là đánh dấu câu trả lời đúng hay sai, mà còn tìm ra sai lầm trong quá trình suy nghĩ dẫn đến câu trả lời sai lầm đó. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một kỹ thuật học máy để đánh giá sai lầm, một nhiệm vụ cố gắng xác định sai lầm và cung cấp phản hồi nhằm giúp học sinh sửa những sai lầm này. Chúng tôi làm việc này bằng cách huấn luyện một mạng nối tiếp để tạo ra phản hồi dựa trên chuyên gia lãnh thổ. Để đánh giá hệ thống này, chúng ta s ẽ khám phá cách sử dụng nó trong một nhiệm vụ ngôn ngữ học luật của Grimm. Chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi tạo ra phản hồi vượt khả năng cơ bản trên một bộ đo đo tần số. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi thực hiện một loạt các nghiên cứu ca bệnh mà chúng tôi nghiên cứu kết quả thành công và thất bại.', 'bg': 'Даването на обратна връзка на учениците не е само за маркиране на отговорите им като правилни или неправилни, но и за намиране на грешки в мисловния им процес, които ги доведоха до този неправилен отговор. В тази статия ние въвеждаме техника за машинно обучение за надписване на грешки, задача, която се опитва да идентифицира грешките и да предостави обратна връзка, предназначена да помогне на учащите да коригират тези грешки. Ние правим това чрез обучение на мрежа последователност по последователност, за да генерираме тази обратна връзка въз основа на експерти в областта. За да оценим тази система, изследваме как тя може да бъде използвана при лингвистична задача, изучаваща закона на Грим. Показваме, че нашият подход генерира обратна връзка, която превъзхожда базовата база на набор от автоматизирани показатели за НЛП. Освен това извършваме серия от казуси, в които изследваме успешните и неуспешните изходи на системата.', 'da': 'At give feedback til eleverne handler ikke kun om at markere deres svar som korrekte eller forkerte, men også om at finde fejl i deres tankeproces, der førte dem til det forkerte svar. I denne artikel introducerer vi en maskinlæringsteknik til fejltekster, en opgave, der forsøger at identificere fejl og give feedback, der skal hjælpe eleverne med at rette disse fejl. Det gør vi ved at træne et sekvens-til-sekvens netværk til at generere denne feedback baseret på domæneeksperter. For at evaluere dette system undersøger vi, hvordan det kan bruges på en lingvistisk opgave, der studerer Grimms lov. Vi viser, at vores tilgang genererer feedback, der overstiger en basislinje på et sæt automatiserede NLP-målinger. Derudover udfører vi en række casestudier, hvor vi undersøger succesfulde og mislykkede systemoutput.', 'nl': 'Feedback geven aan studenten gaat niet alleen over het markeren van hun antwoorden als correct of onjuist, maar ook het vinden van fouten in hun denkproces die hen tot dat onjuiste antwoord hebben geleid. In dit artikel introduceren we een machine learning techniek voor foutondertiteling, een taak die probeert fouten te identificeren en feedback te geven die bedoeld is om leerlingen te helpen deze fouten te corrigeren. Dit doen we door een sequence-to-sequence netwerk te trainen om deze feedback te genereren op basis van domeinexperts. Om dit systeem te evalueren, onderzoeken we hoe het gebruikt kan worden bij een taalkundige opdracht die Grimms Recht bestudeert. We laten zien dat onze aanpak feedback genereert die beter presteert dan een basislijn op een set geautomatiseerde NLP-metrics. Daarnaast voeren we een reeks casestudies uit waarin we succesvolle en mislukte systeemoutputs onderzoeken.', 'hr': 'Vraćanje odgovora studentima nije samo o označavanju odgovora kao prava ili nepravedna, već i pronalaženju greška u njihovom procesu misli koji ih je doveo do pogrešnog odgovora. U ovom papiru predstavljamo tehniku učenja mašine za pogrešno navedenje, zadatak koji pokušava identificirati pogreške i pružiti odgovor koji znači pomoći učenicima ispraviti te pogreške. To radimo trenirajući mrežu sekvence do sekvence kako bi stvorili ovu reakciju na temelju stručnjaka domena. Da bi procijenili ovaj sistem, istražujemo kako se može koristiti na Lingističkom zadatku koja proučava Grimmov zakon. Pokazujemo da naš pristup stvara reakciju koja iznosi početnu liniju na setu automatskih NLP metrika. Osim toga, obavljamo niz istraživanja slučajeva u kojima ispitujemo uspješne i neuspješne ishode sustava.', 'de': 'Feedback an Schüler zu geben bedeutet nicht nur, ihre Antworten als richtig oder falsch zu markieren, sondern auch Fehler in ihrem Denkprozess zu finden, die sie zu dieser falschen Antwort geführt haben. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine maschinelle Lerntechnik zur Fehlerbeschriftung vor, eine Aufgabe, die versucht, Fehler zu identifizieren und Feedback zu geben, um Lernenden zu helfen, diese Fehler zu korrigieren. Dazu schulen wir ein Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Netzwerk, um dieses Feedback basierend auf Domain-Experten zu generieren. Um dieses System zu evaluieren, untersuchen wir, wie es in einem linguistischen Auftrag zum Studium des Grimmschen Rechts eingesetzt werden kann. Wir zeigen, dass unser Ansatz Feedback generiert, das eine Basislinie für eine Reihe automatisierter NLP-Metriken übertrifft. Darüber hinaus führen wir eine Reihe von Fallstudien durch, in denen wir erfolgreiche und erfolglose Systemergebnisse untersuchen.', 'ko': '학생들에게 피드백을 제공하는 것은 그들의 답안을 정확하거나 부정확하다고 표시하는 것이 아니라 그들의 사고 과정에서 그들이 잘못된 답안을 얻게 하는 오류를 발견하는 것도 포함한다.본고에서 우리는 오류 자막에 사용되는 기계 학습 기술을 소개했는데 이 임무는 오류를 식별하고 피드백을 제공하여 학습자가 이러한 오류를 바로잡는 데 도움을 주려고 한다.우리는 서열에서 서열까지의 네트워크를 훈련시켜 분야 전문가를 바탕으로 하는 피드백을 생성한다.이 시스템을 평가하기 위해서, 우리는 이를 어떻게 그린의 법칙을 연구하는 언어학 작업에 사용할 것인가를 모색한다.Dell의 접근 방식에서 생성된 피드백은 자동 NLP 지표 집합에서 베이스라인보다 우수하다는 것을 보여줍니다.그 밖에 우리는 일련의 사례 연구를 진행하여 성공과 실패의 시스템 출력을 연구했다.', 'id': 'Memberikan feedback kepada siswa bukan hanya tentang menandai jawaban mereka sebagai benar atau salah, tetapi juga menemukan kesalahan dalam proses pikiran mereka yang membawa mereka ke jawaban yang salah. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan teknik pembelajaran mesin untuk menyatakan kesalahan, tugas yang mencoba untuk mengidentifikasi kesalahan dan memberikan feedback yang bermaksud untuk membantu para pelajar memperbaiki kesalahan ini. Kita melakukan ini dengan melatih rangkaian-ke-rangkaian jaringan untuk menghasilkan feedback ini berdasarkan ahli domain. Untuk mengevaluasi sistem ini, kita mengeksplorasi bagaimana bisa digunakan dalam tugas Linguistics mempelajari Hukum Grimm. Kita menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita menghasilkan feedback yang melebihi dasar pada set metrik NLP otomatis. Selain itu, kami melakukan serangkaian studi kasus di mana kami memeriksa hasil sistem yang sukses dan tidak sukses.', 'sw': 'Kuwapa majibu kwa wanafunzi si tu kuhusu kuadhimisha majibu yao kama sahihi au si sahihi, bali pia kutafuta makosa katika mchakato wao wa mawazo yaliyopelekea jibu hilo lisilo sahihi. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha teknolojia ya kujifunza mashine kwa kuchukua makosa, kazi inayojaribu kutambua makosa na kutoa maoni yanayomaanisha kuwasaidia wanafunzi kuhakikisha makosa haya. Tunafanya hili kwa kufundisha mtandao wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo ili kutengeneza maoni haya kwa sababu ya wataalam wa ndani. Ili kutathmini mfumo huu, tunachunguza jinsi inavyoweza kutumika katika jukumu la lugha linalosoma Sheria ya Grimm. We show that our approach generates feedback that outperforms a baseline on a set of automated NLP metrics.  Zaidi ya hayo, tunafanya mfululizo wa tafiti za kesi ambazo tunachunguza matokeo ya mfumo wa mafanikio na hayafanikiwa.', 'fa': 'بازگشت به دانش آموزان فقط در مورد نشان دادن جواب\u200cهایشان درست یا اشتباهی نیست، بلکه پیدا کردن اشتباهی در فرایند فکرشان که آنها را به این جواب اشتباهی هدایت کرد. در این کاغذ، ما یک تکنیک یادگیری ماشین را معرفی می\u200cکنیم برای یادگیری اشتباهی، یک کار که تلاش می\u200cکند اشتباهی را شناسایی کند و بازگشت را پیشنهاد کند که به یادگیران کمک کند که این اشتباهی را درست کنند. ما این کار را با آموزش یک شبکه به ترکیب به ترکیب انجام می دهیم تا این واکنش را بر اساس متخصص دانشگاهی دومین تولید کنیم. برای ارزیابی این سیستم، ما کشف می\u200cکنیم که چگونه می\u200cتواند از آن استفاده شود در یک ماموریت لینگ\u200cاستیک در مطالعه قانون گریم. ما نشان می دهیم که دسترسی ما برخورداری را تولید می کند که یک خط پایین را بر مجموعه متریک NLP اتوماتیک انجام می دهد. در addition, we perform a series of cases studies in which we examine successful and unsuccessful systems outputs.', 'af': "Gee terugmelding aan studente is nie net om hulle antwoorde as korrekte of verkeerde te merk nie, maar ook om foute te vind in hul gedagte proses wat hulle na daardie verkeerde antwoord gelei het. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons 'n masjien leer teknikkie vir fout titteling, 'n taak wat probeer om foute te identifiseer en terugmelding te verskaf bedoel om leerders te help om hierdie foute te korrigeer. Ons doen dit deur 'n sekwensie-na-sekwensie netwerk te onderwerp om hierdie terugmelding te genereer gebaseer op domein eksperte. Om hierdie stelsel te evalueer, ondersoek on s hoe dit kan gebruik word op 'n Linguistics toewysing wat Grimm se wet studeer. Ons wys dat ons toegang genereer terugmelding wat 'n basisline uitvoer op 'n stel van outomatiese NLP metries. In addition, we perform a series of case studies in which we examine successful and unsuccessful system outputs.", 'tr': 'Okuwçylara jogaplaryny dogry ýa-da ýalňyş şeklinde aýtmak diňe däl, ýöne olaryň pikir prosesynda ýalňyşlyk ýok jogaba tarap berýän ýalňyşlyklaryny tapmak hem däl. Bu kagyzda, biz ýalňyşlyk sözlerini ýalňyşlyk taýýarlamak üçin maşynyň öwrenmek teknikini tapdyryp, ýalňyşlyklary tanyşdyrmak üçin synanyşýan we öwrenmeklere bu ýalňyşlyklary düzeltmek üçin jogap beren täsir Biz bu feedback sistemini domena uzmanlarına dayanan bir şekilde düzenlemek için bir seri-terjime a ğı eğiterek yapıyoruz. Bu sistemi deňlemek üçin Grimm kanuny öwrenmek üçin Lingüstik zadynda nädip ulanylýandygyny gözləýäris. Biz öz ýaryşymyzyň otomatik NLP metriklerinde baz çyzgyny täsirleýän netijeleri döredigini görkeýäris. Munuň üçin başarılı we üstünsiz sistemiň netijelerini barlap birnäçe ýagdaý öwrenmeleri ýerine ýetirýäris.', 'sq': "Të japim përgjigje studentëve nuk është vetëm për të shënuar përgjigjet e tyre si të drejta apo të gabuara, por gjithashtu për të gjetur gabime në procesin e tyre të mendimit që i çoi ata në atë përgjigje të gabuar. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një teknikë mësimi automatik për titullimin e gabimeve, një detyrë që përpiqet të identifikojë gabimet dhe të ofrojë feedback që do të ndihmojë mësuesit të korrigjojnë këto gabime. Ne e bëjmë këtë duke trajnuar një rrjet sekuencë-në-sekuencë për të gjeneruar këtë feedback bazuar në ekspertët në domeni. To evaluate this system, we explore how it can be used on a Linguistics assignment studying Grimm's Law.  Ne tregojmë se qasja jonë gjeneron feedback që kalon një bazë në një set metrike të automatizuar NLP. Përveç kësaj, ne kryejmë një seri studimesh rastesh në të cilat ne shqyrtojmë rezultatet e suksesshme dhe të pashpejta të sistemit.", 'am': 'ለተማሪዎቹ መልስ ስህተት ወይም ስህተት ማሳየት ብቻ አይደለም፥ ነገር ግን የስህተት መልስ በመራሳቸው ስህተት አግኝቷል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የስሕተት መግለጫ ስህተትን ለማግኘት የሞክራዊን ትምህርት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህንን እናደርጋለን በዲሞናዊ ባለሞራተኞች ላይ ለመፍጠር የክፍተት መረብ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህንን ስርዓት ለማስተምር፣ Grimm ሕግ በሚያስተምርበት Linguistics መልዕክት እንዴት እንደሚጠቀም እናውቃለን፡፡ We show that our approach generates feedback that outperforms a baseline on a set of automated NLP metrics.  በተጨማሪም፣ የሥርዓት ጥያቄዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Հետադարձ տալը աշակերտներին ոչ միայն ճիշտ կամ սխալ պատասխաններ նշելն է, այլ նաև սխալներ գտնելը նրանց մտածողական գործընթացում, որը նրանց հանգեցրեց սխալ պատասխանի: In this paper, we introduce a machine learning technique for mistake captioning, a task that attempts to identify mistakes and provide feedback meant to help learners correct these mistakes.  Մենք դա անում ենք, սովորեցնելով հաջորդականության առջև հաջորդականության ցանց, որպեսզի ստեղծենք այս արձագանքը, հիմնված բնագավառի մասնագետների վրա: Այս համակարգը գնահատելու համար մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչպես կարող ենք այն օգտագործվել Գրիմմի օրենքի ուսումնասիրության լեզվաբանության վերագրում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը ստեղծում է արձագանքներ, որոնք գերազանցում են հիմնական արձագանքը մի շարք ավտոմատիկ ՆԼՊ մետրիկների վրա: In addition, we perform a series of case studies in which we examine successful and unsuccessful system outputs.', 'az': 'Öğrencilərə cavab vermək yalnız cavablarını doğru ya da yanlış şəkildə işarə qoymaq deyildir, lakin həmçin in onların fikirlərində xətaları tapmaq və onları yanlış cevaba yolladığı fikirlərin sürətində də. Bu kağızda, yanlış yazılması üçün maşın öyrənmə teknikini tanıdırıq, yanlışları tanıtmaq və öyrənməyənlərə bu hataları düzəltmək məqsədilə tədbir vermək üçün çalışan bir iş. Biz bunu domain ekspertlərinə dayanan bu feedback yaratmaq üçün sequence-to-sequence a ğı təhsil edirik. Bu sistemi değerləşdirmək üçün Grimm Kanunu öyrənmək üçün Linguistics işində necə istifadə ediləcəyini keşfetirik. Bizim tərəfimiz automatski NLP metriklərinin səviyyəsində əsas səviyyəsini daha üstün göstərir. Əvvəlcə, başarısız və başarısız sistem sonuçlarını incidirik.', 'bn': 'শিক্ষার্থীদের কাছে প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রদান করা হচ্ছে তাদের উত্তর সঠিক অথবা ভুল হিসেবে চিহ্নিত করা না, কিন্তু তাদের চিন্তার প্রক্রিয়ায় এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি মেশিন শিক্ষা প্রযুক্তি উপস্থাপন করি ভুল ধরার জন্য, একটি কাজ যা ভুল চিহ্নিত করার চেষ্টা করে এবং উত্তর প্রদান করার চেষ্টা করছে যার মা ডোমেইন বিশেষজ্ঞদের ভিত্তিতে এই ফিডব্যাক তৈরি করার জন্য আমরা এটা প্রশিক্ষণ করি একটি সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন্স নেটওয়ার্ক এই সিস্টেমের মূল্যায়নের জন্য আমরা খুঁজে বের করি এটা কিভাবে ব্যবহার করতে পারে গ্রিমের আইন পড়ার জন্য। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া ফিডিব্যাক তৈরি করে যা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এনএলপি মেট্রিকের উপর একটি বেসেলাইন প্ এছাড়াও আমরা কিছু কেস গবেষণা করি যাতে আমরা সফল এবং সফল সিস্টেমের আউটপুট পরীক্ষা করি।', 'et': 'Õpilastele tagasiside andmine ei tähenda mitte ainult nende vastuste õigete või ebaõigete märgistamist, vaid ka vigade leidmist nende mõtteprotsessis, mis viisid nad ebaõige vastuseni. Käesolevas töös tutvustame masinõppe tehnikat vigade pealdiste jaoks, ülesannet, mis püüab tuvastada vigu ja anda tagasisidet, mis aitab õppijatel neid vigu parandada. Me teeme seda, koolitades järjestusest järjestuseni võrgustikku, et luua tagasisidet, mis põhineb domeeniekspertidel. Selle süsteemi hindamiseks uurime, kuidas seda saab kasutada Grimmi õigust õppivas keeleteaduse ülesandes. Näitame, et meie lähenemisviis annab tagasisidet, mis ületab algväärtuse automatiseeritud NLP mõõdikute kogumi. Lisaks teostame rea juhtumiuuringuid, milles uurime edukaid ja ebaõnnestunud süsteemi väljundeid.', 'ca': "Donar feedback als estudiants no és només marcar les seves respostes com correctes o incorrectes, sinó també trobar errors en el seu procés de pensament que els va portar a aquesta resposta incorrecta. En aquest article introduïm una tècnica d'aprenentatge màquina per a capturar errors, una tasca que intenta identificar errors i proporcionar feedback destinat a ajudar els aprenents a corregir aquests errors. Ho fem formant una xarxa de seqüència a seqüència per generar aquest feedback basat en experts en dominis. Per avaluar aquest sistema, explorem com es pot utilitzar en una tasca lingüística estudiant la llei de Grimm. Mostrem que el nostre enfocament genera feedback que supera una base basal en un conjunt de mètriques automatitzats de NLP. A més, fem una sèrie d'estudis de cas en els quals examinem els resultats del sistema amb èxit i fracàs.", 'cs': 'Poskytování zpětné vazby studentům není jen o označení jejich odpovědí jako správné nebo nesprávné, ale také nalezení chyb v jejich myšlenkovém procesu, které je vedly k nesprávné odpovědi. V tomto článku představujeme techniku strojového učení pro titulky chyb, úkol, který se snaží identifikovat chyby a poskytnout zpětnou vazbu, která má pomoci studentům tyto chyby opravit. Děláme to tím, že školíme síť sekvence k sekvenci, abychom generovali tuto zpětnou vazbu na základě odborníků v oblasti. Pro zhodnocení tohoto systému zkoumáme, jak jej lze využít při lingvistickém úkolu studujícím Grimmovo právo. Ukazujeme, že náš přístup generuje zpětnou vazbu, která překoná základní hodnotu u sady automatizovaných metrik NLP. Kromě toho provádíme řadu případových studií, ve kterých zkoumáme úspěšné i neúspěšné výstupy systému.', 'bs': 'Vraćanje odgovora studentima nije samo o označavanju odgovora kao prava ili nepravedna, već i pronalaženju greška u njihovom procesu misli koji ih je doveo do pogrešnog odgovora. U ovom papiru predstavljamo tehniku učenja mašine za pogrešno navedenje, zadatak koji pokušava identificirati pogreške i pružiti reakciju koja znači pomoći učenicima da ispravi ove greške. To radimo trenirajući mrežu sekvence do sekvence kako bi stvorili ovu reakciju na temelju stručnjaka domena. Da bi procenili ovaj sistem, istražujemo kako se može koristiti na vezi Lingističkog zadatka koja proučava Grimmov zakon. Pokazujemo da naš pristup stvara reakciju koja iznosi početnu liniju na setu automatskih NLP metrika. Osim toga, obavljamo niz istraživanja slučajeva u kojima pregledamo uspješne i neuspješne ishode sistema.', 'fi': 'Palautteen antaminen opiskelijoille ei tarkoita vain vastausten merkitsemistä oikeiksi tai vääriksi, vaan myös virheiden löytämistä heidän ajatteluprosessissaan, jotka johtivat heidät väärään vastaukseen. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään koneoppimistekniikka virheiden tekstitykseen, tehtävä, jolla pyritään tunnistamaan virheet ja antamaan palautetta, jonka tarkoituksena on auttaa oppilaita korjaamaan virheet. Teemme tämän kouluttamalla sekvenssi-sekvenssiverkoston tuottamaan palautetta toimialueen asiantuntijoista. Tämän järjestelmän arvioimiseksi tutkimme, miten sitä voidaan käyttää Grimmin lakia tutkivassa lingvistisessa tehtävässä. Osoitamme, että lähestymistapamme tuottaa palautetta, joka ylittää lähtötilanteen automaattisissa NLP-mittareissa. Lisäksi teemme joukon tapaustutkimuksia, joissa tarkastelemme onnistuneita ja epäonnistuneita järjestelmätuotoksia.', 'jv': 'Ngenyongno barang kanggo langgar-langgar kuwi mau ora nyatakake mên responseng marang liyane apa ora barang, nangé mau ngerasakno Nang paper iki, kéné gunakake tékno ajeng apa kanggo kelalakno ngerasahan ning murah iki, nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasakno pangan lan mbukakipun kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno ngerasakno We do this by testing a order-to-order network to Genere this reference supported on domain special. Ngawe kuwi nggunakake sistem iki, kita sakjane kapan usaha kanggo nggawe Linguistis kuwi nggawe aturan Kasun Grimm. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono hal-hal iki dadi mbukak barang nggawe barang nggawe barang sing nyimpen ning kebutuhan NLP Metika sing otomatik dhéwé. Nambah, awak dhéwé ngertuk sistem sing perusahaan seneng dadi, dadi awak dhéwé ujian akeh nggawe barang sistem sing ora gewujudno.', 'bo': 'ཤེས་མ་ཚོའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ངོས་ལན་གསལ་གཅིག་པུ་མིན་པར་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གནད་སྡུད་ནོར་མེད་པར། ཡིན་ཡང་ན་ཁོང་ཚོའི་བསམ་གྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ནང་ད འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་mašinས་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་བྱས་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བ་ཞིག་དང་། We do this by training a sequence-to-sequence network to generate this feedback based on domain experts. མ་ལག་འདི་རྙེད་ཞིབ་འཇུག་ན་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པར་ཨ་རིའི་སྐོར་ལས། ང་ཚོས་དེ་གིས་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས We show that our approach generates feedback that outperforms a baseline on a set of automated NLP metrics. མ་ཟད། འུ་ཚོས་ལྟ་བུའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡིག', 'sk': 'Dajanje povratnih informacij študentom ne pomeni samo označevanje njihovih odgovorov kot pravilnih ali napačnih, temveč tudi iskanje napak v njihovem mišljenjskem procesu, ki so jih pripeljale do napačnega odgovora. V tem prispevku predstavljamo tehniko strojnega učenja za napisovanje napak, nalogo, ki poskuša prepoznati napake in zagotoviti povratne informacije, ki učencem pomagajo popraviti te napake. To počnemo tako, da usposabljamo mrežo od zaporedja do zaporedja, da ustvarimo te povratne informacije na podlagi strokovnjakov za domeno. Za oceno tega sistema raziskujemo, kako ga lahko uporabimo pri jezikoslovni nalogi, ki preučuje Grimmovo pravo. Pokazali smo, da naš pristop ustvarja povratne informacije, ki presegajo osnovno vrednost na nizu avtomatiziranih meritev NLP. Poleg tega izvajamo vrsto študij primerov, v katerih proučujemo uspešne in neuspešne sistemske izhode.', 'ha': "Ka bãyar da rabo zuwa karni bai zama kawai ba yana tambayar ka gaskata majiɓincinsu kamar marubuci ko kuma da makosa, kuma ka sami makosa a cikin aikin zagonsu wanda ya shiryar da su ga jibin makosa ba. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙara wani masu karanta na kafin da za'a karɓi kuskure, wani aikin wanda yake jarraba ka gane makorari kuma ana bãyar da musamman da za'a ƙara wa masu karanta karkacin da za'a daidaita misalin waɗannan. We do this by training a sequence-to-sequence network to generate this feedback based on domain experts.  To, domin yin evaluation ga wannan na'ura, Munã gane yadda za a yi amfani da shi a kan wani taskõr Linguistics na karatun Sharar Kimm. Tuna nũna cewa hanyarmu yana ƙara baka-baka wanda ke samar da wani bakin-salon na daidaita metricikin NLP farat ɗaya. Da wannan, Munã tafiyar da lissafi masu sakan da ke jarraba masu cin nasara da masu cin nasara.", 'he': 'לתת חזרה לתלמידים זה לא רק לסמן את התשובות שלהם בתור נכונות או לא נכונות, אלא גם למצוא טעויות בתהליך מחשבה שלהם שהוביל אותם לתשובה הלא נכונה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים טכניקת לימוד מכונות לשימוש טעויות, משימה שמנסה לזהות טעויות ולספק חזרה נועדת כדי לעזור ללמודים לתקן את הטעויות האלה. אנחנו עושים את זה באמצעות אימון רשת רצף לרצף כדי ליצור את ההחזרה הזאת מבוססת על מומחים בתחום. כדי להעריך את המערכת הזאת, אנחנו חוקרים איך היא יכולה להשתמש במשימה של לינגוסטיקה ללמוד את החוק של גרים. אנו מראים שהגישה שלנו יוצרת חזרה שמעבירה את המרכז על קבוצת מטריות NLP אוטומטיות. בנוסף, אנחנו מבצעים סדרה של מחקרים מקרים שבהם אנחנו בודקים תוצאות מערכת מצליחות ולא מצליחות.'}
{'en': 'A Novel Machine Learning Based Approach for Post-OCR Error Detection', 'es': 'Un nuevo enfoque basado en el aprendizaje automático para la detección de errores después del OCR', 'ar': 'نهج جديد قائم على التعلم الآلي لاكتشاف أخطاء ما بعد التعرف الضوئي على الحروف', 'fr': "Une nouvelle approche basée sur l'apprentissage automatique pour la détection des erreurs post-OCR", 'pt': 'Uma nova abordagem baseada em aprendizado de máquina para detecção de erros pós-OCR', 'ja': 'OCR後のエラー検出のための新規機械学習ベースのアプローチ', 'hi': 'पोस्ट-ओसीआर त्रुटि का पता लगाने के लिए एक उपन्यास मशीन लर्निंग आधारित दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Núíosach Meaisín-Bhunaithe chun Earráidí a Bhrath Iar-OCR', 'zh': '一本于机器学之后OCR谬检之法', 'ru': 'Новый подход на основе машинного обучения для обнаружения ошибок пост-OCR', 'hu': 'Új gépi tanuláson alapuló megközelítés az OCR utáni hibaészleléshez', 'el': 'Μια νέα προσέγγιση βασισμένη στη μηχανική μάθηση για την ανίχνευση σφαλμάτων μετά την OCR', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': "Un nuovo approccio basato sull'apprendimento automatico per il rilevamento degli errori post-OCR", 'kk': 'ОКР- ден кейін қате анықтау үшін жаңа машинаның оқу негізінде қатынау', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Naujas mokymosi mechanizmu grindžiamas metodas klaidų nustatymui po OCR', 'mt': 'Approċċ Ġdid Ibbażat fuq it-Tagħlim tal-Magni għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Żbalji wara l-OCR', 'ms': 'Name', 'no': 'Name', 'ml': 'പിന്നീട് OCR പിശക് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനായി പഠിക്കുന്ന നോവല്\u200d യന്ത്രം', 'pl': 'Nowe podejście oparte na uczeniu maszynowym do wykrywania błędów po OCR', 'ro': 'O abordare nouă bazată pe machine learning pentru detectarea erorilor post-OCR', 'sr': 'Novel Machine Learning Based Approach for Post OCR Error Detection', 'si': 'Name', 'mn': 'ОКР-ын дараагийн алдаа тогтоохын тулд Новол машин суралцах суралцах суралцах', 'so': 'Masiinka wax barashada Based Approach for Baadiye-OCR', 'sv': 'En ny maskininlärningsbaserad metod för detektering av fel efter OCR', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một phương pháp cung cấp tin tức về lỗi nhận diện sau-OCR', 'nl': 'Een nieuwe machine learning gebaseerde aanpak voor post-OCR foutdetectie', 'hr': 'Novel Machine Learning Based Approach for Post OCR Error Detection', 'da': 'En ny maskinlæringsbaseret tilgang til registrering af fejl efter OCR', 'bg': 'Нов подход, базиран на машинно обучение, за откриване на грешки след OCR', 'de': 'Ein neuartiger, auf maschinellem Lernen basierender Ansatz zur Fehlererkennung nach OCR', 'ko': '기계 학습 기반의 새로운 OCR 후 오류 검출 방법', 'id': 'A Novel Machine Learning Based Approach for Post-OCR Error Detection', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mashine ya Kujifunza Msingi kwa Kugundua Kukosea baada ya OCR', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një metodë e bazuar në mësimin e makinës së re për zbulimin e gabimeve pas OCR', 'hy': 'Նոր մեխանիզմ սովորելու հիմնված մոտեցում OCR-ից հետո սխալների հայտնաբերման համար', 'tr': 'Post-OCR Hata A ňlamak üçin Taze Maşynyň Öwrenmesi', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': 'Post OCR xətasını keşfetmək üçün Novel Makinelərin Öyrənməsi', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Novel Machine Learning Based Approach for Post OCR Error Detection', 'ca': "Una nova aproximació basada en l'aprenentatge de màquines per detectar errors post-OCR", 'et': 'Uus masinõppepõhine lähenemisviis OCR-järgseks veatuvastamiseks', 'cs': 'Nový přístup založený na strojovém učení pro detekci chyb po OCR', 'fi': 'Uusi koneoppimiseen perustuva lähestymistapa OCR-virheiden tunnistamiseen', 'jv': 'New', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'גישה מבוססת ללמוד מכונות חדשות לגילוי שגיאות לאחר OCR', 'sk': 'Nov pristop na podlagi strojnega učenja za odkrivanje napak po OCR', 'bo': 'Post-OCR ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བཙལ'}
{'en': 'Post processing is the most conventional approach for correcting errors that are caused by Optical Character Recognition(OCR) systems. Two steps are usually taken to correct OCR errors : detection and corrections. For the first task, supervised machine learning methods have shown state-of-the-art performances. Previously proposed approaches have focused most prominently on combining lexical, contextual and statistical features for detecting errors. In this study, we report a novel system to error detection which is based merely on the n-gram counts of a candidate token. In addition to being simple and computationally less expensive, our proposed system beats previous systems reported in the ICDAR2019 competition on OCR-error detection with notable margins. We achieved state-of-the-art F1-scores for eight out of the ten involved European languages. The maximum improvement is for Spanish which improved from 0.69 to 0.90, and the minimum for Polish from 0.82 to 0.84.', 'pt': 'O pós-processamento é a abordagem mais convencional para corrigir erros causados por sistemas de reconhecimento óptico de caracteres (OCR). Geralmente, duas etapas são tomadas para corrigir erros de OCR: detecção e correções. Para a primeira tarefa, os métodos de aprendizado de máquina supervisionados mostraram desempenhos de última geração. As abordagens propostas anteriormente se concentraram mais proeminentemente na combinação de recursos lexicais, contextuais e estatísticos para detectar erros. Neste estudo, relatamos um novo sistema para detecção de erros que é baseado apenas na contagem de n-gramas de um token candidato. Além de ser simples e computacionalmente mais barato, nosso sistema proposto supera os sistemas anteriores relatados na competição ICDAR2019 na detecção de erros de OCR com margens notáveis. Alcançamos pontuações F1 de última geração para oito dos dez idiomas europeus envolvidos. A melhora máxima é para o espanhol que melhorou de 0,69 para 0,90, e a mínima para o polonês de 0,82 para 0,84.', 'ar': 'المعالجة اللاحقة هي الطريقة الأكثر تقليدية لتصحيح الأخطاء التي تسببها أنظمة التعرف الضوئي على الحروف (OCR). عادة ما يتم اتخاذ خطوتين لتصحيح أخطاء التعرف الضوئي على الحروف: الاكتشاف والتصحيحات. بالنسبة للمهمة الأولى ، أظهرت أساليب التعلم الآلي الخاضعة للإشراف أداءً متطورًا. ركزت المناهج المقترحة سابقًا بشكل بارز على الجمع بين السمات المعجمية والسياقية والإحصائية لاكتشاف الأخطاء. في هذه الدراسة ، أبلغنا عن نظام جديد لاكتشاف الأخطاء يعتمد فقط على عدد n-gram للرمز المرشح. بالإضافة إلى كونه بسيطًا وأقل تكلفة من الناحية الحسابية ، فإن نظامنا المقترح يتفوق على الأنظمة السابقة التي تم الإبلاغ عنها في مسابقة ICDAR2019 بشأن اكتشاف أخطاء التعرف الضوئي على الحروف بهوامش ملحوظة. لقد حققنا أحدث درجات F1 لثماني من أصل عشر لغات أوروبية معنية. التحسن الأقصى هو للغة الإسبانية التي تحسنت من 0.69 إلى 0.90 ، والحد الأدنى للبولندية من 0.82 إلى 0.84.', 'es': 'El posprocesamiento es el método más convencional para corregir errores causados por los sistemas de reconocimiento óptico de caracteres (OCR). Por lo general, se toman dos pasos para corregir los errores de OCR: detección y corrección. Para la primera tarea, los métodos de aprendizaje automático supervisado han demostrado un rendimiento de vanguardia. Los enfoques propuestos anteriormente se han centrado principalmente en combinar características léxicas, contextuales y estadísticas para detectar errores. En este estudio, informamos de un sistema novedoso para la detección de errores que se basa simplemente en los recuentos de n-gramas de un token candidato. Además de ser simple y computacionalmente más económico, nuestro sistema propuesto supera a los sistemas anteriores informados en el concurso ICDAR2019 sobre detección de errores de OCR con márgenes notables. Logramos puntajes F1 de última generación para ocho de los diez idiomas europeos involucrados. La mejora máxima es para el español, que mejoró de 0.69 a 0.90, y el mínimo para el polaco de 0.82 a 0.84.', 'fr': "Le post-traitement est l'approche la plus conventionnelle pour corriger les erreurs causées par les systèmes de reconnaissance optique de caractères (OCR). Deux étapes sont généralement suivies pour corriger les erreurs d'OCR\xa0: la détection et les corrections. Pour la première tâche, les méthodes d'apprentissage automatique supervisé ont démontré des performances de pointe. Les approches proposées précédemment se sont surtout concentrées sur la combinaison de caractéristiques lexicales, contextuelles et statistiques pour détecter les erreurs. Dans cette étude, nous présentons un nouveau système de détection d'erreurs basé uniquement sur les nombres de n-grammes d'un jeton candidat. En plus d'être simple et moins coûteux sur le plan informatique, notre système proposé surpasse les systèmes précédents présentés dans le concours ICDAR2019 sur la détection des erreurs OCR avec des marges notables. Nous avons obtenu des scores F1 de pointe pour huit des dix langues européennes concernées. L'amélioration maximale concerne l'espagnol, qui est passé de 0,69 à 0,90, et le minimum pour le polonais de 0,82 à 0,84.", 'ja': '後処理は、光学文字認識（ OCR ）システムによって引き起こされるエラーを修正するための最も従来的なアプローチです。通常、OCRエラーを修正するために、検出と修正の2つのステップが実行されます。最初のタスクでは、監督された機械学習方法は最先端のパフォーマンスを示しています。以前に提案されたアプローチは、エラーを検出するための語彙的、文脈的、および統計的特徴を組み合わせることに最も顕著に焦点を当てています。本研究では、候補トークンのn - gramカウントのみに基づくエラー検出に新規システムを報告する。当社の提案するシステムは、シンプルで計算コストが低いことに加えて、OCRエラー検出に関するICDAR 2019コンペティションで報告された以前のシステムに顕著なマージンで勝利しています。ヨーロッパの10言語中8言語で最先端のF 1スコアを達成しました。最大の改善はスペイン語で0.69から0.90に改善され、最小の改善はポーランド語で0.82から0.84に改善されました。', 'zh': '后处理者,正光学字符(OCR)统之误也。 常以两步正OCR误:检正。 其于第一项务,督机器学术已展先进之性。 前法最重者,合词汇、上下文、计特徵以检测之。 于是条上新谬检测系统,盖取选令牌之n-gram数云。 除简计算成本较卑之外,臣等言系统尚破ICDAR2019竞报OCR谬检,且有显余量。 十种欧洲语,八得最先进F1分数。 西班牙语之大改自0.69至于0.90,波兰语之至卑0.82至于0.84。', 'ru': 'Постобработка является наиболее традиционным подходом к исправлению ошибок, которые вызываются системами оптического распознавания символов (OCR). Для исправления ошибок КЛСД обычно выполняются два шага: обнаружение и исправление. Для первой задачи методы контролируемого машинного обучения показали самые современные показатели. Ранее предложенные подходы в первую очередь сосредоточены на объединении лексических, контекстуальных и статистических признаков для обнаружения ошибок. В этом исследовании мы сообщаем о новой системе обнаружения ошибок, которая основана только на подсчете n-грамм токена-кандидата. Помимо простоты и меньших вычислительных затрат, наша предлагаемая система превосходит предыдущие системы, о которых сообщалось в ходе конкурса ICDAR2019 по обнаружению ошибок распознавания с заметным запасом. Мы достигли самых современных показателей F1 для восьми из десяти европейских языков. Максимальное улучшение отмечается в отношении испанского языка, который улучшился с 0,69 до 0,90, а минимальное - в отношении польского языка - с 0,82 до 0,84.', 'hi': 'पोस्ट प्रोसेसिंग ऑप्टिकल कैरेक्टर रिकग्निशन (OCR) सिस्टम के कारण होने वाली त्रुटियों को ठीक करने के लिए सबसे पारंपरिक दृष्टिकोण है। ओसीआर त्रुटियों को ठीक करने के लिए आमतौर पर दो कदम उठाए जाते हैं: पता लगाना और सुधार। पहले कार्य के लिए, पर्यवेक्षित मशीन सीखने के तरीकों ने अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन दिखाए हैं। पहले से प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोणों ने त्रुटियों का पता लगाने के लिए लेक्सिकल, प्रासंगिक और सांख्यिकीय विशेषताओं के संयोजन पर सबसे प्रमुखता से ध्यान केंद्रित किया है। इस अध्ययन में, हम त्रुटि का पता लगाने के लिए एक उपन्यास प्रणाली की रिपोर्ट करते हैं जो केवल एक उम्मीदवार टोकन के एन-ग्राम गिनती पर आधारित है। सरल और कम्प्यूटेशनल रूप से कम महंगा होने के अलावा, हमारी प्रस्तावित प्रणाली उल्लेखनीय मार्जिन के साथ ओसीआर-त्रुटि का पता लगाने पर ICDAR2019 प्रतियोगिता में रिपोर्ट की गई पिछली प्रणालियों को हरा देती है। हमने दस में से आठ शामिल यूरोपीय भाषाओं के लिए अत्याधुनिक एफ 1-स्कोर हासिल किया। अधिकतम सुधार स्पेनिश के लिए है जो 0.69 से 0.90 तक सुधार हुआ है, और पोलिश के लिए न्यूनतम 0.82 से 0.84 तक है।', 'ga': "Is é iarphróiseáil an cur chuige is traidisiúnta chun earráidí a cheartú de bharr córais um Aithint Optúil Carachtair (OCR). De ghnáth tógtar dhá chéim chun earráidí OCR a cheartú: aimsiú agus ceartúcháin. Don chéad tasc, léirigh modhanna meaisínfhoghlama maoirsithe feidhmíochtaí úrscothacha. Dhírigh cineálacha cur chuige a moladh roimhe seo go mór ar ghnéithe foclóireachta, comhthéacsúla agus staidrimh a chomhcheangal chun earráidí a bhrath. Sa staidéar seo, tuairiscímid córas nua chun earráidí a bhrath atá bunaithe ar chomhaireamh n-gram an chomhartha iarrthóra amháin. Chomh maith le bheith simplí agus níos saoire ó thaobh ríomha de, sáraíonn ár gcóras atá beartaithe na córais a tuairiscíodh roimhe seo i gcomórtas ICDAR2019 ar bhrath earráide OCR le corrlaigh shuntasacha. D'éirigh linn scóir F1 den scoth a bhaint amach in ocht gcinn de na deich dteanga Eorpacha a bhí i gceist. Is é an feabhas uasta don Spáinnis a d'fheabhsaigh ó 0.69 go 0.90, agus an t-íosmhéid don Pholainnis ó 0.82 go 0.84.", 'el': 'Η μετα-επεξεργασία είναι η πιο συμβατική προσέγγιση για τη διόρθωση σφαλμάτων που προκαλούνται από τα συστήματα οπτικής αναγνώρισης χαρακτήρων. Συνήθως λαμβάνονται δύο βήματα για τη διόρθωση σφαλμάτων: ανίχνευση και διορθώσεις. Για την πρώτη εργασία, οι εποπτευόμενες μέθοδοι μηχανικής μάθησης έχουν παρουσιάσει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Οι προηγούμενες προτεινόμενες προσεγγίσεις επικεντρώθηκαν κυρίως στο συνδυασμό λεξικών, περιεκτικών και στατιστικών χαρακτηριστικών για την ανίχνευση σφαλμάτων. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, αναφέρουμε ένα νέο σύστημα ανίχνευσης σφαλμάτων το οποίο βασίζεται μόνο στον αριθμό των γραμμάτων ενός υποψήφιου σήματος. Εκτός από το ότι είναι απλό και υπολογιστικά λιγότερο ακριβό, το προτεινόμενο σύστημα ξεπερνά τα προηγούμενα συστήματα που αναφέρθηκαν στον διαγωνισμό για την ανίχνευση σφαλμάτων με αξιοσημείωτα περιθώρια. Επιτύχαμε άριστες βαθμολογίες F1 για οκτώ από τις δέκα εμπλεκόμενες ευρωπαϊκές γλώσσες. Η μέγιστη βελτίωση είναι για τα ισπανικά που βελτιώθηκαν από 0.69 έως 0.90 και η ελάχιστη για τα πολωνικά από 0.82 έως 0.84.', 'ka': 'პოსტიკური პროცესი არის ყველაზე კონგენციოლური პროცესი შეცდომების შეცდომა, რომელიც ოპტიკური სიმბოლოების განაცნობის (OCR) სისტემებით გამო OCR შეცდომების განსაზღვრებისთვის ორი ნაწილის გავაკეთება: განსაზღვრება და კონფიგურაცია. პირველი დავალებისთვის, მაქინის სწავლების მეტისება გამოჩვენებულია სახელსაწყისთვის. პირველი წინაღებული დახმარება უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია ლექსიკალური, კონტექსტური და სტატისტიკური ფუნქციების შეცდომებისთვის შეცდომარებისთვის. ამ კვლევაში, ჩვენ პრომენტის სისტემის შეცდომის განახლებისთვის შეცდომის შესახებ, რომელიც მხოლოდ n-გრამის შესახებ კანდიდენტის სისტემის შესახებ. დამატებით მარტივი და კომპუტაციალურად უფრო ცოტა, ჩვენი საზოგადომა სისტემა უბრუნდება წინა სისტემაში, რომელიც ICDAR2019-ს კონკრენციენტი OCR-შეცდომა ჩვენ მივიღეთ სახელსაწყისო F1-სოფლიოს 8-სოფლიოს 10-სოფლიოში. მაქსიმალური უფლება სპანელისთვის, რომელიც 0,69-დან 0,90-დან უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო', 'hu': 'Az utófeldolgozás a leghagyományosabb megközelítés az optikai karakterfelismerő (OCR) rendszerek által okozott hibák kijavítására. Általában két lépést tesznek az OCR hibák kijavítására: észlelés és javítás. Az első feladat során a felügyelt gépi tanulási módszerek korszerű teljesítményt mutattak. A korábban javasolt megközelítések leginkább a lexikai, kontextuális és statisztikai jellemzők kombinációjára összpontosítottak a hibák felismeréséhez. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új hibakeresési rendszert jelentünk be, amely pusztán egy jelölt token n-grammoszámán alapul. Amellett, hogy egyszerű és számítástechnikailag olcsóbb, javasolt rendszerünk figyelemreméltó margókkal felülmúlja az OCR-hibafelismerésről szóló ICDAR2019 versenyen szereplő korábbi rendszereket. A tíz érintett európai nyelvből nyolc F1-es pontszámot értünk el. A legnagyobb javulás a spanyol, amely 0,69-ről 0,90-re, a lengyel minimum 0,82-ről 0,84-re javult.', 'it': "La post elaborazione è l'approccio più convenzionale per correggere gli errori causati dai sistemi di riconoscimento ottico dei caratteri (OCR). Di solito vengono presi due passi per correggere gli errori OCR: rilevamento e correzioni. Per il primo compito, i metodi di apprendimento automatico supervisionati hanno mostrato prestazioni all'avanguardia. Gli approcci precedentemente proposti si sono concentrati soprattutto sulla combinazione di caratteristiche lessicali, contestuali e statistiche per rilevare gli errori. In questo studio, riportiamo un nuovo sistema di rilevamento degli errori che si basa semplicemente sui conteggi n-grammi di un token candidato. Oltre ad essere semplice e computazionalmente meno costoso, il nostro sistema proposto batte i sistemi precedenti riportati nella competizione ICDAR2019 sul rilevamento degli errori OCR con margini notevoli. Abbiamo ottenuto punteggi F1 all'avanguardia per otto delle dieci lingue europee coinvolte. Il miglioramento massimo è per lo spagnolo che è migliorato da 0,69 a 0,90, e il minimo per il polacco da 0,82 a 0,84.", 'lt': 'Po perdirbimo būdas yra įprastiausias klaidų, kurias sukelia optinio ženklo pripažinimo (OCR) sistemos, ištaisymo metodas. Paprastai atliekami du veiksmai OCR klaidų ištaisymui: nustatymas ir pataisos. Pirmosios užduoties metu prižiūrimi mašinų mokymosi metodai parodė pažangiausius rezultatus. Anksčiau pasiūlyti metodai daugiausia dėmesio skyrė klaidų aptikimui skirtų lexinių, kontekstinių ir statistinių savybių derinimui. Šiame tyrime pranešame apie naują klaidų aptikimo sistemą, kuri grindžiama tik n gram ų skaičiumi kandidato ženklu. Be to, kad mūsų siūloma sistema yra paprasta ir skaičiavimo požiūriu mažiau brangi, jos yra didesnės už ankstesnes sistemas, apie kurias buvo pranešta ICDAR2019 konkurse dėl UŠR klaidų nustatymo, su dideliais skirtumais. Mes pasiekėme naujausius F1 rezultatus aštuonioms iš dešimties susijusių Europos kalbų. Didžiausias pagerėjimas yra Ispanijai, kuri pagerėjo nuo 0,69 iki 0,90, o Lenkijai – nuo 0,82 iki 0,84.', 'mk': 'Пошта процесирање е најконвенционалниот пристап за корекција на грешките кои се предизвикани од системите за оптичко признавање знаци (OCR). Two steps are usually taken to correct OCR errors: detection and corrections.  За првата задача, надгледуваните методи на машинско учење покажаа најсовремени изведувања. Претходно предложените пристапи се фокусираа најистакнувачки на комбинацијата на лексикалните, контекстуалните и статистичките карактеристики за откривање грешки. Во оваа студија, пријавуваме нов систем за детекција на грешки кој е базиран само на бројот на n-грам на кандидатски знак. Покрај тоа што е едноставно и компјутационално помалку скап, нашиот предложен систем ги победи претходните системи објавени во натпреварот ИКДАР2019 за детекција на грешки во ОКР со значителни маргини. Ние постигнавме најдобри резултати F1 за осум од десет вклучени европски јазици. Максималното подобрување е за шпанскиот кој се подобри од 0,69 на 0,90, а минималното за полскиот од 0,82 на 0,84.', 'ml': 'പോസ്റ്റ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ഓപ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന പിശകുകള്\u200dക്കായി ഏറ്റവും സാധാരണ പ് OCR തെറ്റുകള്\u200d ശരിയാക്കുവാന്\u200d രണ്ടു പടികള്\u200d സാധാരണമായി എടുക്കപ്പെടുന്നു; തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും ചെയ്യും. ആദ്യത്തെ ജോലിക്കായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട മെഷിന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും കല മുമ്പ് പ്രായശ്ചിത്ത സമ്മാനങ്ങള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കൽ, കണക്സിക്കൽ, സ്ഥിതികൽ പിശകുകളെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഏറ്റവും പ്രധ ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. പിശക് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടിയാണ് നാം ഒരു നോവല്\u200d സ In addition to being simple and computationally less expensive, our proposed system beats previous systems reported in the ICDAR2019 competition on OCR-error detection with notable margins.  നമ്മള്\u200d എട്ട് ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെട്ട പത്ത് ഭാഷകളില്\u200d എട്ട് സ്കോര്\u200d നേടിയിരുന്നു. 0. 69 മുതല്\u200d 0. 90 വരെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയ സ്പാനിഷിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. 0. 82 മ', 'mn': 'Захирал үйлдвэрлэл нь Optical Character Recognition(OCR) системээс шаардлагатай алдаа засах хамгийн энгийн арга зам юм. ОКР алдаа зөвшөөрөхийн тулд хоёр алхам хэрэглэгддэг. Эхний ажлын хувьд машин суралцах арга нь урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг харуулсан. Өмнө нь санал өгсөн арга барилгууд алдаа гаргахад илүү чухал зүйлсийг холбоотой. Энэ судалгаанд бид зөвхөн n-грамм хэмжээний тооны үндсэн алдаа гаргах шинэ системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Энгийн, тооцоолон бага үнэтэй байхдаа бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн систем ICDAR2019 оны өрсөлдөөнд OCR-ын алдаа гаргах талаар илтгэгдсэн системийг давж байна. Бид 10 Европын хэлний наймын төвшинд урлагийн F1 оноо гаргасан. Хамгийн их сайжруулалт нь 0.69-аас 0.90-аас илүү сайжруулсан Испанийн хувьд, Польшийн хувьд 0.82-аас 0.84-аас хамгийн бага.', 'kk': 'Оптикалық таңбаларды таңдау (OCR) жүйелерінің негізінде қателерді түзету үшін ең әдеттегі тәсілі. Кәдімгі OCR қатесін түзеу үшін екі қадам алды: анықтау мен түзету. Бірінші тапсырма үшін бақылаған машинаны үйрену әдістері күй- әртүрлі жұмыс істеуді көрсетті. Алдыңғы жағдайлар қателерді анықтау үшін лексикалық, контекстік және статистикалық қасиеттерді біріктіру үшін көпшілікті болды. Бұл зерттеулерде біз жаңа жүйені кандидаттардың n- грамм санына негізделген қате анықтау үшін хабарлаймыз. Қарапайым және компьютерлік артық болса да, біздің жүйеміз ICDAR2019 жылы OCR қатесін анықтау үшін алдыңғы жүйелерді басып тастайды. Біз оны Еуропалық тілдерінен сегіз жылдық F1-нұсқасына жеткіздік. Максималдық жақсарту - 0,69- 0,90- ден жақсартылған Испания және 0,82- 0,84- ден төменгі Польша.', 'ms': 'Pemprosesan pos adalah pendekatan paling konvensional untuk memperbaiki ralat yang disebabkan oleh sistem Pengenalan Aksara Optik (OCR). Dua langkah biasanya diambil untuk betulkan ralat OCR: pengesan dan perbaikan. Untuk tugas pertama, kaedah pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi telah menunjukkan prestasi state-of-the-art. Pendekatan yang diusulkan sebelumnya telah fokus paling terutama pada kombinasi ciri-ciri leksikal, kontekstual dan statistik untuk mengesan ralat. In this study, we report a novel system to error detection which is based merely on the n-gram counts of a candidate token.  Selain menjadi sederhana dan kurang mahal secara kira-kira, sistem kami diusulkan mengalahkan sistem terdahulu dilaporkan dalam pertandingan ICDAR2019 mengenai pengesan ralat OCR dengan margin tertentu. Kami mencapai skor F1 terbaik untuk 8 dari 10 bahasa Eropah yang terlibat. Perbaikan maksimum untuk Sepanyol yang diperbaiki dari 0.69 hingga 0.90, dan minimum untuk Polandia dari 0.82 hingga 0.84.', 'pl': 'Postprocessing jest najbardziej konwencjonalnym podejściem do korekcji błędów spowodowanych przez systemy Optical Character Recognition (OCR). W celu skorygowania błędów OCR są zwykle podejmowane dwa kroki: wykrywanie i korekty. W pierwszym zadaniu nadzorowane metody uczenia maszynowego wykazały najnowocześniejsze osiągnięcia. Wcześniej proponowane podejścia koncentrowały się najbardziej na łączeniu funkcji leksykalnych, kontekstowych i statystycznych w celu wykrywania błędów. W niniejszym badaniu zgłaszamy nowy system do wykrywania błędów, który opiera się jedynie na liczbie n-gramów tokena kandydata. Oprócz prostego i tańszego obliczeniowego systemu, proponowany przez nas system pokonuje poprzednie systemy zgłoszone w konkursie ICDAR2019 na wykrywanie błędów OCR o znacznych marżach. Osiągnęliśmy najnowocześniejsze wyniki F1 dla ośmiu z dziesięciu zaangażowanych języków europejskich. Maksymalna poprawa jest dla hiszpańskiego, który poprawił się z 0.69 do 0.90, a minimum dla polskiego od 0.82 do 0.84.', 'mt': 'Post processing is the most conventional approach for correcting errors that are caused by Optical Character Recognition(OCR) systems.  Normalment jittieħdu żewġ passi biex jiġu korretti żbalji OCR: detezzjoni u korrezzjonijiet. Għall-ewwel kompitu, il-metodi ta’ tagħlim bil-magni ssorveljati wrew prestazzjonijiet avvanzati. L-approċċi proposti preċedentement iffukaw l-aktar fuq il-kombinazzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi lexiċi, kuntestwali u statistiċi biex jiġu identifikati żbalji. F’dan l-istudju, nirrappurtaw sistema ġdida għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ żbalji li hija bbażata sempliċement fuq l-għadd ta’ n-grammi ta’ token kandidat. Minbarra li hija sempliċi u inqas għalja fil-komputazzjoni, is-sistema proposta tagħna taqbeż is-sistemi preċedenti rrappurtati fil-kompetizzjoni ICDAR2019 dwar id-detezzjoni ta’ żbalji OCR b’marġini notevoli. Kisbu l-ogħla punteġġi F1 għal tmien minn kull għaxar lingwi Ewropej involuti. It-titjib massimu huwa għall-Ispanjol li tjieb minn 0.69 għal 0.90, u l-minimu għall-Pollakk minn 0.82 għal 0.84.', 'ro': 'Postprocesarea este cea mai convențională abordare pentru corectarea erorilor cauzate de sistemele de recunoaștere optică a caracterelor (OCR). De obicei, se fac doi pași pentru a corecta erorile OCR: detectarea și corecțiile. Pentru prima sarcină, metodele de învățare automată supravegheate au demonstrat performanțe de ultimă generație. Abordările propuse anterior s-au concentrat cel mai important pe combinarea caracteristicilor lexicale, contextuale și statistice pentru detectarea erorilor. În acest studiu, raportăm un nou sistem de detectare a erorilor care se bazează doar pe numărul n-gram al unui token candidat. Pe lângă faptul că este simplu și mai puțin costisitor, sistemul nostru propus depășește sistemele anterioare raportate în competiția ICDAR2019 privind detectarea erorilor OCR cu marje notabile. Am obținut scoruri F1 de ultimă generație pentru opt din cele zece limbi europene implicate. Îmbunătățirea maximă este pentru spaniolă, care s-a îmbunătățit de la 0,69 la 0,90, iar minimul pentru poloneză de la 0,82 la 0,84.', 'no': 'Postprosessering er den mest konvensjonelle tilnærming for korrigering av feil som følgjer av optiske teiknkjenning (OCR) systemet. To trekk vert vanlegvis gjort for å retta OCR- feil: oppdaging og rettingar. For den første oppgåva har kontrollerte maskinelæringsmetodar viste status-of-the-art-performances. Førre foreslått tilnærmingar har fokusert mest på å kombinere leksiske, kontekstske og statistiske funksjonar for oppdaging av feil. I denne studien rapporterer vi eit nytt system til feiloppdaging som berre er basert på n-gram tal av eit kandidat-token. I tillegg til å vera enkelt og datamaskin mindre kostnad, vår foreslått systemet slår tidlegare systemar som er rapportert i ICDAR2019-konkurransen om OCR-feiloppdaging med merkelige marginar. Vi har oppnådd F1-scorer for åtte av dei ti europeiske språka som er involvert. Maksimal forbedring er for spansk som forbedra frå 0,69 til 0,90, og minimum for polsk frå 0,82 til 0,84.', 'sr': 'Poslovno obrađivanje je najkonvencionalniji pristup za korištenje grešaka koji su uzrokovani sistemima prepoznavanja optičkih karaktera (OCR). Obično se poduzimaju dve korake kako bi ispravili greške OCR: otkrivanje i isprave. Za prvi zadatak, nadzorne metode učenja mašine pokazale su state-of-the-art performances. Prethodno su predloženi pristupi najznačajnije fokusirani na kombinaciju leksičkih, contextualnih i statističkih karakteristika za otkrivanje grešaka. U ovoj studiji prijavljujemo novi sistem za otkrivanje grešaka koji se temelji samo n a broju n-grama kandidatskog znaka. Osim toga što je jednostavno i računalno manje skup, naš predloženi sistem pobeđuje prethodne sisteme prijavljene na natjecanju ICDAR2019 o otkrivanju grešaka OCR-a sa poznatim marginama. Postigli smo rezultate države umjetnosti F1 za osam od deset uključenih evropskih jezika. Maksimalno poboljšanje je za španjolski koji je poboljšan od 0,69 do 0,90, a minimalno za poljski od 0,82 do 0,84.', 'sv': 'Efterbehandling är det mest konventionella tillvägagångssättet för att korrigera fel som orsakas av OCR-system (Optical Character Recognition). Två steg tas vanligtvis för att korrigera OCR-fel: detektering och korrigeringar. För den första uppgiften har övervakade maskininlärningsmetoder visat toppmoderna prestanda. Tidigare föreslagna metoder har främst fokuserat på att kombinera lexikala, kontextuella och statistiska funktioner för att upptäcka fel. I denna studie rapporterar vi ett nytt system för feldetektering som enbart baseras på n-gramtal för en kandidattoken. Förutom att vara enkelt och beräkningsmässigt billigare slår vårt föreslagna system tidigare system som rapporterats i ICDAR2019 tävlingen om OCR-feldetektering med anmärkningsvärda marginaler. Vi uppnådde toppmoderna F1-poäng för åtta av de tio involverade europeiska språken. Den maximala förbättringen är för spanska som förbättrades från 0,69 till 0,90, och miniminivån för polska från 0,82 till 0,84.', 'ta': 'பின் செயல்படுத்தல் என்பது ஆப்டிகல் எழுத்து அறிவு (OCR) அமைப்புகளால் திருத்தும் பிழைகளுக்கு மிகவும் வழக்கமான வழியாகு OCR பிழைகளை சரிசெய்ய இரண்டு படிகள் வழக்கமாக எடுக்கப்படுகிறது: கண்டறிதல் மற்றும் திருத்தம். முதல் செயல்பாட்டிற்கு, கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட இயந்திர கற்பிக்கும் முறைமைகள் நிலை- கலை செயல்பாடுகளை காட்டியி முந்தைய பரிந்துரையிடப்பட்ட முன்னோட்டுள்ள நெறிமுறைகள் பிழைகளை கண்டறிவதற்கான லெக்சியல், தற்போதைய மற்றும் புள்ளிவிவர இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பிழை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு அறிவிக்கிறோம். அது n- gram சார்ந்த சுட் எளிய மற்றும் கணக்கீட்டில் சில விலையில் குறைவாக இருக்கும் தவிர, எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பு முந்தைய அமைப்புகளை தோல்விக்கும் ம பத்து மொழிகளில் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட ஐரோப்பிய மொழிகளில் எட்டு புள்ளிகள் நாங்கள் மாநிலையில் F1- புள்ளிகளை அட அதிகபட்ச முன்னேற்றம் 0. 69 லிருந்து 0. 90 வரை மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டது, மற்றும் 0. 82 லிருந்து 0. 84 வரை போலிஷ்க்கு குறைந்தது.', 'ur': 'پوسٹ پرسس کرنا سب سے زیادہ منطقی طریقہ ہے جو غلطوں کی اصلاح کرنے کے لئے ہے جو آپٹیکل کریٹر پتچانی (OCR) سیستموں کے سبب سے سبب ہیں. دو قدم معمولا OCR خطا درست کرنے کے لئے پکڑے جاتے ہیں: شناسایی اور اصلاح. پہلی کام کے لئے، نظارت کی ماشین یادگیری طریقے نے state-of-the-art performances دکھائی ہیں. پہلے سے پہلے پیش کیا گیا ہے کہ تقصیرات کی تعلیم کے لئے زبان, متوسط اور ایستٹیسٹیکل خطاؤں کے پیدا کرنے کے لئے بہت اہم طریقے سے تمرکز کیا گیا ہے۔ اس مطالعہ میں ہم ایک نئی سیسٹم کی راپورت کرتے ہیں کہ غلطی شناسایی پر جو صرف ایک کاندینڈیٹ ٹوکنے کے n-گرم گنتی پر بنیاد ہے. ساده اور کامپیوتروں سے کم گران ہونے کے علاوہ، ہماری پیشنهاد سیسٹم نے پہلے سیسٹم کو ICDAR2019 کی مقابلہ میں OCR-errors detection کے ذریعہ ضرورت دی ہے۔ ہم نے آٹھ مسلط اروپای زبانوں میں سے آٹھ مسلط اف ۱-اسکور کے لئے موجود ہوئے۔ سپانیایی کے لئے سب سے زیادہ بہتر ہے جو 0.69 سے 0.90 تک بہتر ہوگیا ہے اور پولیش کے لئے 0.82 سے 0.84 تک کم کم ہوگیا ہے.', 'si': 'පොස්ටල් ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය තමයි ඔප්ටිකාල් අක්ෂර පද්ධතිය සඳහා වැරදිලි සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විධානය කරන්න. OCR වැරදි සඳහා පැත්තක් දෙකක් සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට ගත්තා: පරීක්ෂණය සහ විධානය. පළමු වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන්, පරීක්ෂා කරපු මැෂින් ඉගෙන ගන්න විදියට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්. පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ වැරදි පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ලෙක්සිකල්, සංවේදනය සහ සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක විශේෂාව සම්බන්ධ මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි නියම පද්ධතියක් වාර්තා කරනවා කියලා ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සොයාගන්න විතරයි. ඒක n-ග්\u200dරාම් ගණනයේ නි සාමාන්\u200dය සහ පරිගණිකාරයෙන් අඩුම ගොඩක් අඩුයි, අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ පද්ධතිය ICDAR2019 පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණා අපිට පුළුවන් විදිය F1-ස්කෝර් වලට යුරෝපිය භාෂාවල් දහයකින් අටක් වෙනුවෙන්. ස්පැනිෂ් විශ්වාසය 0,69 වෙනුවෙන් 0,90 වෙනුවෙන් පොලිෂ් විශ්වාසයෙන් 0,82 වෙනුවෙන් 0,84 වෙනුවෙන්.', 'so': 'Ka baaraandegista dabaqada waa hababka ugu caadiga ah ee hagaajiya khaladda, taas oo sababtay nidaamka aqoonsiga xarafka (OCR). Inta badan waxaa loo qaadaa laba tallaabo si loo hagaajiyo qaladka OCR: cadeynta iyo hagitaanka. Shaqooyinka ugu horeeya ee maamulka waxbarashada lagu ilaaliyey waxay muujiyaan bandhigyada farshaxanka. Previously proposed approaches have focused most prominently on combining lexical, contextual and statistical features for detecting errors.  Waxbarashadan waxaynu wargelinaynaa nidaamka warqadda oo qaladka ah oo ku saleysan n-gram tirada calaamada kandida. Inta aan si fudud iyo xisaab qiimo yar ahayn, nidaamkayaga la soo jeeday ayaa garaacay nidaamka hore oo lagu soo qoray iskutaarinta ku saabsan OCR-cadaynta qaladka ee hore. Tobanka luqada Yurub ee ku saabsan waxaynu gaadhnay qiyaastii F1-da. Horumarinta ugu badnaanta Isbanishka waxaa looga horumariyey 0.69 ilaa 0.90, booliska ugu yaraana waa 0.82-0.84.', 'vi': 'Phần xử lý sau là phương pháp truyền thống nhất để sửa lỗi do các hệ thống nhận dạng Kí tự quang gây ra. Thông thường có hai bước để sửa lỗi OCR: phát hiện và sửa chữa. Đối với nhiệm vụ đầu tiên, các phương pháp giám sát học máy đã cho thấy trình độ nghệ thuật. Trước đây các phương pháp được đề xuất đã tập trung một cách nổi bật để kết hợp các tính năng ngôn ngữ, ngữ cảnh và thống kê để phát hiện lỗi. Trong nghiên cứu n ày, chúng tôi báo cáo một hệ thống mới để phát hiện sai lầm chỉ dựa trên điểm n-gram của một phiếu ứng cử viên. Ngoài việc đơn giản và tính to án ít tốn kém, hệ thống dự kiến của chúng ta còn đánh bại hệ thống trước được báo cáo trong cuộc thi ICDAR99 về lỗi nhận diện OCR với một số dư đáng chú ý. Chúng tôi đạt được điểm F1 hiện đại nhất cho tám trong mười ngôn ngữ Châu Âu liên quan. Sự cải tiến tối đa là cho Tây Ban Nha đã tiến bộ từ 0.69 đến 0.90, và tối thiểu cho chế độ Ba Lan từ 0.82 đến 0.84.', 'uz': "Name Odatda OCR xatolarini to ʻgʻrilash uchun ikkita qadam olingan: aniqlash va toʻgʻrilash. Birinchi vazifa uchun boshqaruvchi mashinalar o'rganish usullari holati- sananing amallari koʻrsatilgan. Oldingi talab qilingan usullar xatolarni aniqlash uchun leksikal, doim va statistik xossalarini birlashtirish uchun eng muhimi foydalanadi. Bu taʼminotda, biz faqat n-gram kandida ravishda yaratilgan novel tizimni aniqlash uchun xabar beramiz. Foydalanuvchi va qiymatlik qiymati bo'lganligidan ortiq bo'lishi mumkin, ilova qilingan tizimmiz OCR notoʻgʻri qismlari bilan qidirilgan ICDAR2019da qidirilgan oldingi tizimlarni qidirish mumkin. Biz yurub tildan sakkiz tildan 8 ta'plab qo'shilgan F1 darajaga yetdik. Ispanchadan eng eng katta taʼminlovchi ispanchaga 0.69 dan 0.90 dan oshirilgan va 0.82 dan 0.84 dan eng kichik Polish uchun yaxshi yaxshi.", 'bg': 'Постобработката е най-конвенционалният подход за коригиране на грешки, причинени от системите за оптично разпознаване на знаци. Обикновено се предприемат две стъпки за коригиране на грешки: откриване и корекции. За първата задача методите на контролирано машинно обучение показаха най-съвременни изпълнения. Предишно предложените подходи са фокусирани най-вече върху комбинирането на лексикални, контекстуални и статистически характеристики за откриване на грешки. В това проучване докладваме за нова система за откриване на грешки, която се основава само на броя на n-грама на кандидат символ. Освен че е проста и изчислително по-евтина, нашата предложена система бие предишните системи, докладвани в конкурса за откриване на грешки с забележителни маржове. Постигнахме най-съвременни резултати за осем от десетте европейски езика. Максималното подобрение е за испанския, който се подобри от 0.69 до 0.90, а минималното за полския от 0.82 до 0.84.', 'hr': 'Poslovno obrađivanje je najkonvencionalniji pristup korištenja grešaka uzrokovanih sustavima prepoznavanja optičkih znakova (OCR). Obično se poduzimaju dvije korake kako bi ispravili greške OCR-a: otkrivanje i isprave. Za prvi zadatak, nadzorne metode učenja strojeva pokazale su state-of-the-art performances. Prethodno predložene pristupe najznačajnije su fokusirane na kombinaciju leksičkih, contextualnih i statističkih karakteristika za otkrivanje grešaka. U ovom ispitivanju, prijavljamo novi sustav otkrivanju grešaka koji se temelji samo n a broju n-grama kandidatskog znaka. Osim toga što je jednostavno i računalno manje skup, naš predloženi sistem pobjeđuje prethodne sustave prijavljene na natjecanju ICDAR2019 o otkrivanju grešaka OCR-a s poznatim marginama. Postigli smo rezultate države umjetnosti F1 za osam od deset uključenih evropskih jezika. Maksimalno poboljšanje je za španjolski koji je poboljšan od 0,69 do 0,90, a minimalno za poljski od 0,82 do 0,84.', 'da': 'Efterbehandling er den mest konventionelle fremgangsmåde til at korrigere fejl, der er forårsaget af Optical Character Recognition (OCR) systemer. Der tages normalt to trin for at rette OCR-fejl: detektion og rettelser. Til den første opgave har overvågede maskinlæringsmetoder vist state-of-the-art præstationer. Tidligere foreslåede tilgange har fokuseret mest på at kombinere leksikalske, kontekstuelle og statistiske funktioner til opdagelse af fejl. I denne undersøgelse rapporterer vi et nyt system til fejldetektion, som udelukkende er baseret på n-gramtal af en kandidat token. Ud over at være enkel og beregningsmæssigt billigere, slår vores foreslåede system tidligere systemer rapporteret i ICDAR2019 konkurrencen om OCR-fejldetektion med bemærkelsesværdige marginer. Vi opnåede topmoderne F1-scorer for otte ud af de ti involverede europæiske sprog. Den maksimale forbedring er for spansk, som forbedres fra 0,69 til 0,90, og minimum for polsk fra 0,82 til 0,84.', 'nl': 'Post processing is de meest conventionele aanpak voor het corrigeren van fouten die worden veroorzaakt door Optical Character Recognition (OCR)-systemen. Meestal worden twee stappen genomen om OCR fouten te corrigeren: detectie en correctie. Voor de eerste taak hebben begeleide machine learning methoden state-of-the-art prestaties laten zien. Eerder voorgestelde benaderingen hebben zich vooral gericht op het combineren van lexicale, contextuele en statistische kenmerken voor het opsporen van fouten. In dit onderzoek rapporteren we een nieuw systeem voor foutdetectie dat louter gebaseerd is op de n-gram telling van een kandidaat token. Ons voorgestelde systeem is niet alleen eenvoudig en rekenkundig goedkoper, maar verslaat ook eerdere systemen die werden gerapporteerd in de ICDAR2019 competitie op OCR-foutdetectie met opmerkelijke marges. We behaalden state-of-the-art F1-scores voor acht van de tien betrokken Europese talen. De maximale verbetering is voor Spaans dat verbeterde van 0.69 tot 0.90, en het minimum voor Pools van 0.82 tot 0.84.', 'id': 'Proses pos adalah pendekatan yang paling konvensional untuk mengkoreksi kesalahan yang disebabkan oleh sistem Pengenalan Karakter Optik (OCR). Dua langkah biasanya diambil untuk memperbaiki kesalahan OCR: deteksi dan koreksi. Untuk tugas pertama, metode pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi telah menunjukkan prestasi terbaik. Pendekatan yang diusulkan sebelumnya telah fokus paling prominenti pada kombinasi karakteristik lexik, kontekstual dan statistik untuk mendeteksi kesalahan. Dalam studi ini, kami melaporkan sistem baru untuk deteksi kesalahan yang berdasarkan hanya hitungan n-gram token kandidat. Selain menjadi sederhana dan secara komputasional kurang mahal, sistem kami diusulkan mengalahkan sistem sebelumnya dilaporkan dalam kompetisi ICDAR2019 pada deteksi kesalahan OCR dengan margin yang terkenal. Kami mencapai skor F1 terbaik untuk delapan dari sepuluh bahasa Eropa yang terlibat. Perbaikan maksimum bagi Spanyol yang meningkat dari 0,69 hingga 0,90, dan minimal bagi Polandia dari 0,82 hingga 0,84.', 'de': 'Die Nachbearbeitung ist der herkömmlichste Ansatz zur Korrektur von Fehlern, die durch Optical Character Recognition (OCR)-Systeme verursacht werden. Zur Korrektur von OCR-Fehlern werden in der Regel zwei Schritte unternommen: Erkennung und Korrektur. Für die erste Aufgabe haben überwachte Methoden des maschinellen Lernens modernste Leistungen gezeigt. Bisher vorgeschlagene Ansätze konzentrierten sich vor allem auf die Kombination lexikalischer, kontextueller und statistischer Merkmale zur Fehlererkennung. In dieser Studie berichten wir über ein neuartiges System zur Fehlererkennung, das lediglich auf den n-Gramm-Zählungen eines Kandidatentokens basiert. Unser vorgeschlagenes System ist nicht nur einfach und rechnerisch kostengünstiger, sondern übertrifft frühere Systeme, die im ICDAR2019 Wettbewerb zur OCR-Fehlererkennung gemeldet wurden, mit bemerkenswerten Margen. Für acht der zehn beteiligten europäischen Sprachen erreichten wir modernste F1-Scores. Die maximale Verbesserung ist für Spanisch, das von 0.69 auf 0.90 verbessert wurde, und das Minimum für Polnisch von 0.82 auf 0.84.', 'fa': 'پرداخت پست بهترین روش معمولی برای اصلاح خطاهایی است که توسط سیستم شناسایی شخصیت\u200cهای آپتیک (OCR) باعث می\u200cشود. دو قدم معمولا برای درست کردن خطاهای OCR برخورد می\u200cشود: شناسایی و اصلاح. برای اولین وظیفه، روش یادگیری ماشین تحت نظر نشان داده اند. پیش از این، روش\u200cهای پیشنهاد بیشتر بر ترکیب ویژگی\u200cهای زبان، موقعیت و آمریکایی برای شناسایی خطاها تمرکز کردند. در این مطالعه، ما یک سیستم رمانی را برای شناسایی خطا گزارش می دهیم که فقط بر شماره n گرم یک نشان کاندیده است. علاوه بر اینکه ساده و کامپیوتر گرون\u200cتر باشیم، سیستم پیشنهاد ما سیستم\u200cهای قبلی که در مسابقه ICDAR2019 گزارش داده شده در مورد شناسایی خطای OCR با مرز مشخصی شکست می\u200cدهد. ما به عنوان هشت از ده زبان اروپايين درگير ايالت هنر ف1 رسيديم. بزرگترین بهترین توسعه برای اسپانیایی است که از 0.69 تا 0.90 بهترین شد و حداقل برای لهستان از 0.82 تا 0.84.', 'ko': '후처리는 광학 문자인식(OCR) 시스템으로 인한 오류를 바로잡는 가장 일반적인 방법이다.일반적으로 OCR 오류를 감지하고 수정하는 두 가지 단계를 수행합니다.첫 번째 임무에 대해 기계 학습을 감독하는 방법이 이미 가장 선진적인 성능을 나타냈다.이전에 제시한 방법은 주로 어휘, 상하문과 통계적 특징을 결합시켜 오류를 검출하는 데 집중되었다.본 연구에서 우리는 새로운 오류 검출 시스템을 보고했는데 이 시스템은 후보 영패의 n-gram 계수만 기반으로 한다.간단하고 계산 원가가 비교적 낮은 것을 제외하고 우리가 제시한 시스템은 OCR 오류 검측에서 ICDAR 2019 경쟁에서 보고된 이전 시스템을 격파하여 현저한 장점을 가진다.우리는 유럽 언어와 관련된 10개 언어 중 8개가 가장 선진적인 F1 성적을 거두었다.스페인어는 0.69에서 0.90으로, 폴란드어는 0.82에서 0.84로 가장 많이 늘었다.', 'af': "Pos verwerking is die mees convensionele toegang vir korrigering foute wat veroorsaak word deur Optiese Karakter herkening( OCR) stelsels. Twee stappe word gewoonlik geneem om OCR foute te korrigeer: opmerking en korrigering. Vir die eerste taak het die superviseerde masjien leermeetode die state-of-the-art uitvoerings vertoon. Vorige voorgestelde toegange het mees prominent gefokus op die kombinasie van leksiese, contextuele en statistiese funksies vir ontdekking van foute. In hierdie studie, ons rapporteer 'n nuwe stelsel n a fout opdekking wat net gebaseer is op die n-gram tel van 'n kandidate token. In addition to being simple and computationally less expensive, our proposed system beats previous systems reported in the ICDAR2019 competition on OCR-error detection with notable margins. Ons het toestand-van-kuns F1-punte bereik vir agt uit die tien geantwoord Europeese tale. Die maksimum verbetering is vir Spaanse wat van 0,69 tot 0,90 verbeter het, en die minimum vir Poles van 0,82 tot 0,84.", 'sq': 'Postprocesimi është qasja më konvencionale për korrektimin e gabimeve që shkaktohen nga sistemet Optical Character Recognition (OCR). Dy hapa merren zakonisht për të korrigjuar gabimet OCR: zbulim dhe korrigjim. Për detyrën e parë, metodat e mbikqyrura të mësimit të makinave kanë treguar shfaqje më të larta. Përqasjet e propozuara më parë janë përqëndruar në mënyrë më të shquar në kombinimin e karakteristikave lexike, kontekstuale dhe statistikore për zbulimin e gabimeve. Në këtë studim, raportojmë një sistem të ri për zbulimin e gabimeve që bazohet thjesht n ë numrin n-gram të një token kandidate. In addition to being simple and computationally less expensive, our proposed system beats previous systems reported in the ICDAR2019 competition on OCR-error detection with notable margins.  Ne arritëm rezultate F1 më të larta për tetë nga dhjetë gjuhët evropiane të përfshira. Përmirësimi maksimal është për spanjollin që u përmirësua nga 0.69 në 0.90 dhe minimumi për polakun nga 0.82 në 0.84.', 'sw': 'Mpango wa posti ni njia ya kawaida zaidi kwa ajili ya kurekebisha makosa yaliyosababishwa na mfumo wa Kutambua Kanuni za KiOptical (OCR). Hatua mbili huchukuliwa ili kurekebisha makosa ya OCR: kutambua na kuharibiwa. Kwa kazi ya kwanza, mbinu za kujifunza za mashine zilizofuatiliwa zimeonyesha hali ya mambo ya sanaa. Matokeo yaliyopendekezwa hapo awali yalijikita zaidi kwenye kuunganisha vipengele vya lexico, vikwazo vya kizamani na takwimu kwa kutambua makosa. Katika utafiti huu, tunaripoti mfumo wa riwaya wa kutambua kosa ambalo unatokana n a idadi ya n-gram ya ishara ya mgombea. Zaidi ya kuwa rahisi na gharama kidogo zaidi, mfumo wetu unapendekezwa unapungua mfumo uliopita uliripotiwa katika mashindano ya ICDAR2019 kuhusu kutambua makosa ya OCR kwa vifaa vyema. Tumefanikiwa vipindi vya sanaa vya F1 kwa nane kati ya lugha kumi zinazohusika na Ulaya. Maboresho ya kiwango kikubwa ni kwa lugha ya Kihispania ambayo iliboresha kutoka 0.69 hadi 0.90, na kwa kiwango cha chini cha Polisi kuanzia 0.82 hadi 0.84.', 'tr': 'Ýabşyrma işlemek Optik Karakter tanamak(OCR) sistemi tarapyndan gelen hatalary düzeltmek üçin iň adil ýagdaýdyr. OCR hatalaryny dogrylmak üçin iki adım edilýär: deteksion we düzeltmek üçin. Ilkinji işiň üçin, gözlemli maşynyň öwrenmek yöntemleri sanat eserlerini görkezildi. Öň öňki golaýlary ýagdaýda hatalary ahtarmak üçin leksiýaly, contextual we statistik düzümlerini birleşdirmek üçin has üns berildi. Bu okuwda, biz adatça sanlarynyň n-gramynda daýa n ýan bir ýagdaý a ňlamak üçin bir roman sistemasyny rapor edip görýäris. Basit we kompýuter ýagdaýynda has miň pahalı bolmakda, teklip eden sistemamyz ICDAR2019-iň öňki sistemalarynyň üstünde möhüm gabdaly bilen bildirilýär. Biz sanat meýdançasynda on sanatdan sekiz sany ýetdik. Azamik gelişmeler 0.69 we 0.90 we Polonyça üçin 0.82 we 0.84 çenli gelişmelerdir.', 'am': 'ፖስቲካ ፕሮግራም በተቀናቀለ ስህተቶችን ለማስተካከል የሚደረገው ትልቅ ቀዳሚ ነው፡፡ የOCR ስህተቶችን ለማስተካከል ሁለት እርምጃዎች በመቀበል ይወሰዳሉ፤ ማግኘት እና ማስተካከል። የመጀመሪያው ስራ፣ የተጠበቀው የመኪን ትምህርት ሥርዓት የ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው የተዘጋጀው ደረጃዎች የሊክሲካዊ፣ የግንኙነት እና የስህተት ስህተቶችን ለማግኘት በመጠቀም ላይ አብልጠዋል፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ በn-gram ቁጥጥር ብቻ የተደጋገመ የስህተት ማግኘት የኖሮውን ስርዓት እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ከቀላል እና በብዛት ዋጋ ካልሆነው በቀር፣ በተዘጋጀው ስርዓታችን የቀድሞውን የICDAR2019 ተቃውሞ የOCR-ስህተት ግንኙነታችንን በተጠቃሚ ስርዓት መግለጫ ይደፋል፡፡ ከዐሥሩ የአውሮፓውያን ቋንቋዎች ስምንት የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የአፍ1 ነጥብ ደረስን፡፡ ከ0.69 ጀምሮ እስከ 0.90 ድረስ ለስፓኒሽ ትልቅ ማድረግ ነው፥ ከ0.82 ጀምሮ እስከ 0.84 ድረስ ለፖሊስ በጣም ታናሽ ነው።', 'hy': 'Պետ-վերամշակումը ամենաավանդական մոտեցումն է սխալների ուղղելու համար, որոնք առաջացել են Օպտիկական բնավորների ճանաչման (OCR) համակարգերի կողմից: Two steps are usually taken to correct OCR errors: detection and corrections.  Առաջին հանձնարարության համար մեքենայի ուսուցման վերահսկված մեթոդները ցույց են տալիս ամենաբարձր արդյունքներ: Նախկինում առաջարկված մոտեցումները ամենակարևորը կենտրոնացել են սխալների հայտնաբերման համար լեքսիկական, կոնտեքստիկական և վիճակագրական հատկությունների համադրման վրա: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք հայտարարում ենք նոր համակարգ սխալների հայտնաբերման համար, որը հիմնված է միայն թեկնածու նշանի n-գրամի հաշվարկի վրա: Ավելի քան պարզ և հաշվարկների առումով ավելի քիչ թանկ լինելը, մեր առաջարկած համակարգը հաղթահարում է նախորդ համակարգերը, որոնք հայտնաբերվել են 2019 թվականի ԻԿԴԱՌ-ի մրցակցության ժամանակ OCR-սխալների հայտնաբերման մասին, հաշվի Մենք հասանք ամենակարևոր F1-ի գնահատականների տասը ներգրավված եվրոպական լեզուներից ութ-ի համար: Մաքսիմալ բարելավումը իսպաներենի համար է, որը բարելավվել է 0.69-ից 0.90-ին, իսկ մյուս մյուս մյուս մյուս մյուս մյուս մյուս մյուսը՝ 0.82-ից 0.84-ին:', 'az': 'Posta işləməsi optik Karakter Recognition( OCR) sistemlərinin səbəbi olan xətaları düzeltmek üçün ən yaygın tərzidir. İki adım genellikle OCR xətalarını düzəltmək üçün alınır: keşif və düzəltmək. İlk iş üçün, gözləyirli maşın öyrənmə metodları tətbiqlərini göstərdilər. Daha əvvəl təbliğ edilmiş tərzlərin xətaları keşfetmək üçün leksik, contextual və statistik özellikləri birləşdirmək üçün ən gözəl tərzlərini göstərmişdir. Bu təhsil içində, sadəcə n-gram sayısın a dayanan xəta tapılması üçün yeni sistemi bildiririk. Basit və hesaplayaraq daha ucuz olmaq üçün, təklif edilmiş sistemimiz ICDAR2019-in OCR xətaları tanımlaması haqqında bildirilmiş əvvəlki sistemlərə müsibət edir. Biz 10 evropa dilindən səkkiz məlumatların F1 nöqtəsini qəbul etdik. Maksimum uzlaşma 0,69-0,90-dan daha yaxşılaşdığı İspanyolca və Polonya üçün 0,82-0,84-dən daha az.', 'bn': 'পোস্ট প্রক্রিয়া হচ্ছে অপটিক্যাল ক্যারেক্টার স্বীকারের (OCR) সিস্টেমের দ্বারা সংশোধনের জন্য সবচেয়ে সাধারণ পদক সাধারণত OCR ত্রুটি সংশোধনের জন্য দুটি পদক্ষেপ নেওয়া হয়: সন্ধান এবং সংশোধন। প্রথম কাজের জন্য, পর্যবেক্ষিত মেশিন শিক্ষা পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে - শিল্পের অবস্থা দেখাচ্ছে। পূর্ববর্তী প্রস্তাবিত পদক্ষেপ লেক্সিক্সিল, প্রাক্তন এবং পরিসংখ্যানের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী সম্পর্কে সবচেয় এই গবেষণায় আমরা একটি নোভেল সিস্টেম প্রার্থীর সংখ্যার উপর ভিত্তি করি যা কেবল n-gram সংখ্যার উপর ভিত্তিক। সাধারণ এবং গণমূল্য কম হওয়ার পরিবর্তে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত ব্যবস্থা অক্ষরিক প্রতিযোগিতায় পূর্ববর্তী আইসিডার্২০১৯-এর প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযো We achieved state-of-the-art F1-scores for eight out of the ten involved European languages.  স্প্যানিশের জন্য সর্বোচ্চ উন্নতি হচ্ছে যা ০. ৬৯ থেকে ০. ৯০ থেকে উন্নত হয়েছে এবং ০. ৮২ থেকে ০. ৮৪ থেকে পোলিশের জন্য সর্বোচ্চ পর্য', 'bs': 'Poslovno obrađivanje je najkonvencionalniji pristup korištenja grešaka uzrokovanih sistemima prepoznavanja optičkih karaktera (OCR). Obično se poduzimaju dva koraka kako bi ispravili greške OCR: otkrivanje i isprave. Za prvi zadatak, metode naučenja mašine pokazale su state-of-the-art performances. Prethodno su predloženi pristupi najznačajnije fokusirani na kombinaciju leksičkih, contextualnih i statističkih karakteristika za otkrivanje grešaka. U ovom ispitivanju, prijavljamo novi sistem za otkrivanje greška koji se temelji samo n a broju n-grama kandidatskog znaka. Osim toga što je jednostavno i računalno manje skup, naš predloženi sistem pobjeđuje prethodne sustave prijavljene na natjecanju ICDAR2019 o otkrivanju grešaka OCR-a sa poznatim maržama. Postigli smo rezultate države umjetnosti F1 za osam od deset uključenih evropskih jezika. Maksimalno poboljšanje je za španjolski koji je poboljšan od 0,69 do 0,90, a minimalno za poljski od 0,82 do 0,84.', 'cs': 'Post processing je nejkonvenčnější přístup k opravě chyb, které jsou způsobeny systémy optického rozpoznávání znaků (OCR). K opravě chyb OCR se obvykle provádějí dva kroky: detekce a opravy. Pro první úkol byly metody strojového učení prokázány nejmodernějšími výkony. Dříve navržené přístupy se nejvýznamněji zaměřily na kombinaci lexikálních, kontextových a statistických funkcí pro detekci chyb. V této studii nahlásíme nový systém detekce chyb, který je založen pouze na počtu n-gramů kandidátského tokenu. Kromě toho, že je náš navržený systém jednoduchý a výpočetně levnější, porazí předchozí systémy hlášené v soutěži ICDAR2019 na detekci chyb OCR s výraznými maržemi. Pro osm z deseti evropských jazyků jsme dosáhli nejmodernějších bodů F1. Maximální zlepšení je pro španělštinu, která se zlepšila z 0.69 do 0.90, a minimum pro polštinu z 0.82 do 0.84.', 'ca': "El postprocessament és l'enfocament més convencional per corregir els errors causats pels sistemes de reconeixement òptic de caràcters (OCR). Normalment es prenen dues etapes per corregir els errors OCR: la detecció i les correccions. Per la primera tasca, els mètodes d'aprenentatge màquinari supervisats han mostrat actuacions més avançades. Els enfocaments proposats anteriorment s'han centrat en combinar característiques lècsiques, contextuals i estadístiques per detectar errors. En aquest estudi, reportem un nou sistema de detecció d'errors basat només en el nombre n-gram d'una fitxa candidata. In addition to being simple and computationally less expensive, our proposed system beats previous systems reported in the ICDAR2019 competition on OCR-error detection with notable margins.  Vam aconseguir puntuacions F1 més modernes per vuit de cada diez llengües europees involucrats. La millora màxima és per l'espanyol que va millorar de 0,69 a 0,90, i el mínim per l'espanyol de 0,82 a 0,84.", 'fi': 'Jälkikäsittely on tavallisin tapa korjata optisten merkkien tunnistusjärjestelmien aiheuttamia virheitä. OCR-virheiden korjaamiseksi tehdään yleensä kaksi vaihetta: havaitseminen ja korjaukset. Ensimmäisessä tehtävässä ohjatut koneoppimismenetelmät ovat osoittaneet huipputason suorituskykyä. Aiemmin ehdotetut lähestymistavat ovat keskittyneet erityisesti sanastollisten, kontekstuaalisten ja tilastollisten ominaisuuksien yhdistämiseen virheiden havaitsemiseksi. Tässä tutkimuksessa raportoimme uudesta virheentunnistusjärjestelmästä, joka perustuu vain ehdokastunnuksen n-gramman lukuihin. Sen lisäksi, että järjestelmämme on yksinkertainen ja laskennallisesti edullisempi, se voittaa aiemmat ICDAR2019-kilpailussa raportoidut järjestelmät OCR-virheiden havaitsemisesta huomattavalla marginaalilla. Saavutimme huippuluokan F1-pisteet kahdeksalle kymmenestä eurooppalaisesta kielestä. Suurin parannus koskee espanjaa, joka parani 0,69:sta 0,90:een, ja puolalaista vähintään 0,82:sta 0,84:een.', 'et': 'Järeltöötlus on kõige tavalisem lähenemisviis optilise märgituvastuse (OCR) süsteemide põhjustatud vigade parandamiseks. OCR vigade parandamiseks võetakse tavaliselt kaks sammu: avastamine ja parandused. Esimese ülesande puhul on juhendatud masinõppe meetodid näidanud kaasaegseid tulemusi. Varem kavandatud lähenemisviisid on keskendunud kõige tähtsamale leksikaalsete, kontekstiliste ja statistiliste tunnuste kombineerimisele vigade tuvastamiseks. Käesolevas uuringus teatame uudsest süsteemist vigade tuvastamiseks, mis põhineb ainult kandidaadimärgi n-grammi arvudel. Lisaks lihtsale ja arvutuslikult odavamale süsteemile on meie kavandatud süsteem märkimisväärsete marginaalidega parem kui varasemad ICDAR2019 konkursil kirjeldatud süsteemid OCR-vigade tuvastamisel. Me saavutasime tipptasemel F1 tulemused kaheksal kümnest Euroopa keelest. Maksimaalne paranemine on Hispaania puhul, mis paranes 0,69-lt 0,90-le, ja Poola puhul miinimum 0,82-lt 0,84-le.', 'sk': 'Postobdelava je najbolj konvencionalen pristop za popravljanje napak, ki jih povzročajo sistemi optičnega prepoznavanja znakov (OCR). Za odpravo napak OCR se običajno sprejmeta dva koraka: odkrivanje in popravki. Za prvo nalogo so nadzorovane metode strojnega učenja pokazale najsodobnejše delovanje. Predhodno predlagani pristopi so se najpomembneje osredotočili na združevanje leksikalnih, kontekstualnih in statističnih značilnosti za odkrivanje napak. V tej študiji poročamo o novem sistemu za odkrivanje napak, ki temelji zgolj na številu n-gramov kandidatnega žetona. Poleg tega, da je naš predlagani sistem preprost in računalniško cenejši, premaga prejšnje sisteme, poročane v tekmovanju ICDAR2019 za odkrivanje napak OCR z opaznimi maržami. Osem od desetih evropskih jezikov smo dosegli najsodobnejše rezultate F1. Največje izboljšanje je za špansko, ki se je izboljšalo z 0,69 na 0,90, in najmanjše za poljščino z 0,82 na 0,84.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis An karɓi ƙẽtare biyu zuwa a daidaita makorari na OCR: zane da kuma za'a daidaita. Kwamba na farkon aikin da aka tsare shiryoyin ayuka da aka tsare mashine sun nuna halin-da-art. Tsarin da aka gabatar da shi, sun zura zura zura zura zura maki kan su haɗi wasu sifati na leksisi, da kiyaye da kuma statistical. Daga wannan lõkaci, Munã sanar da wani n a'ura na nowaya zuwa gane ɓata wanda ke ƙayyade kawai kan ƙidãn n-gram na wata alama. Babu da ya zama masu sauƙi da lissafi kaɗan mai yiwuwa, na'urar da aka buƙata, yana beati na'uranmu wanda aka yi bukãta a gaba cikin shirin da aka bai wa ICDAR2019 a kan kure na OCR-gane da margini masu notable. Mun sami matsayin F1-na-sanar da takwas daga harshen yurubiya masu husũma. Babba da kyakko na spanish, wanda ya kyautata daga 0.69 zuwa 0.90, kuma da kyanƙatan Polish daga 0.82 zuwa 0.84.", 'he': 'העבודה פוסטית היא הגישה הקונסיונלית ביותר לתקן שגיאות שנגרמו על ידי מערכות זיהוי אופטיות (OCR). בדרך כלל לוקחים שני צעדים כדי לתקן טעויות OCR: גילוי ותיקונים. למשימה הראשונה, שיטות לימוד מכונות מושגים הראו הופעות חדשות. הגישויות שהצעו בעבר התמקדו באופן ברור על שילוב תכונות לקסיות, קונטקסטיות וסטטיסטיות כדי לגלות שגיאות. במחקר הזה, אנחנו מדווחים על מערכת חדשה לגלות טעויות שמבוססת רק על ספירת n-גרם של סימן מועמד. בנוסף להיות פשוט וחשבתי פחות יקר, המערכת המוצעת שלנו מנצחת מערכות קודמות דווחות בתחרות ICDAR2019 על זיהוי שגיאות OCR עם שווים משמעותיים. השגנו תוצאות F1 חדשות עבור שמונה מתוך עשר שפות אירופאיות מעורבות. השיפור המקסימלי הוא עבור ספרדית ששיתפרה מ-0.69 ל-0.90, והמינימום עבור פולנים מ-0.82 ל-0.84.', 'bo': 'Post processing is the most conventional approach for correcting errors that are caused by Optical Character Recognition(OCR) systems. རྨང་མ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་OCR་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ལེན་བཅོས་ནུས་མེད་པར་འཛུགས་ཡོད་པ། རྟོག་ཞིབ་དང་བཟོ་བཅོས། དང་པོ་ལ་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་ལྟ་བུའི་མིག་ཆས་ལྟ་བུའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྟོན་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་ལྟ་བུ་རེད། ནོར་འཁྲུལ་རྟོགས་པའི་གནད་དོན་སྔོན་གྱི་དམིགས་བསལ་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་གནས་སྟངས་དང་ཚད་རྩིས་འཁྲུལ ལྟ་ཞིབ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་ལྟ་བུའི་མ་ལག་གི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་རྟོགས་ནུས་མེད་སྙན་ཞུ་བ་རེད། དེ་ལས་སླ་བོ་དང་རྩིས་འཁོར་ཆེ་བ་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་མ་ལག་ཅིག ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་ཕྱོགས་འགྱུར་བ་སྐྱེལ་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་༡༠་ལས་བརྩིས་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཧ་ཅང་མ་ཤོས་ཚད་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཚད་གཅིག་ལས་འགྲོ་བཞིན་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'tab deep Sampeyan pangunahing, sistem ilegal dipunangke sistem sing wis ngerasakno state-of-the-arts barang. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang barêng-barêng iki, kén é baliksi sistem kuwi nyumbang kanggo kebuturan eror sing basa dhéwé kuwi nggawe n-gram kuwi nggawe token kandidé. Genjer-genjer sampeyan sampeyan ngono akeh komputer mengko, siji sistem sing berarti sistem sing dianggawe barang nggawe barang kelas coro barang kelas Awak dhéwé iso nglanggar tarjamah-tarjamah F1 lan sesuk sabanjuré luwih dumadhi sing karo perusahaan Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem kanggo Spanyol sing luwih xéwé, 0.9 ngono'}
{'en': 'ComboNER : A Lightweight All-In-One POS Tagger, Dependency Parser and NER', 'fr': 'ComboNer\xa0: un tagger POS tout-en-un léger, un analyseur de dépendance et un NER', 'pt': 'ComboNER: um POS Tagger leve e tudo-em-um, analisador de dependência e NER', 'ar': 'ComboNER: أداة تمييز نقاط بيع متعددة الإمكانات وخفيفة الوزن ومحلل تبعية و NER', 'es': 'CombONer: un etiquetador POS todo en uno ligero, analizador de dependencias y NER', 'zh': '组合器:轻量级之一体化POS器,赖解析器NER', 'hi': 'कॉम्बोनर: एक लाइटवेट ऑल-इन-वन पॉस टैगर, निर्भरता पार्सर और एनईआर', 'ja': 'ComboNER ：軽量オールインワンPOSタガー、依存関係パーサー、NER', 'ru': 'ComboNER: Легкий универсальный POS-теггер, анализатор зависимостей и NER', 'ga': 'Cumadóir: Clibeálaí POS Uile-I-Aon Éadrom, Parsálaí Spleáchais agus NER', 'ka': 'ComboNER: სიმაღლე ყველა ერთი POS Tagger, განსაზღვრებულობა პერიზერი და NER', 'hu': 'ComboNER: Könnyű All-In-One POS Tagger, Dependency Parser és NER', 'el': 'Ένας ελαφρύς All-In-One μαρκαριστής POS, ανάλυση εξάρτησης και NER', 'it': 'ComboNER: Un leggero All-In-One POS Tagger, Dependency Parser e NER', 'lt': 'ComboNER: lengvas POS žymeklis, priklausomybės analizatorius ir NER', 'mk': 'Comment', 'kk': 'ComboNER: Барлық бір POS тегжері, Тәуелсіздік талдау және NER', 'ms': 'ComboNER: Tagger POS All-In-One Lightweight, Parser Dependency dan NER', 'ml': 'ഒരു ലൈറ്റ് വാങ്ങുന്ന എല്ലാം ഒരു പോസ് ടാഗ്ഗര്\u200d, ആശ്രയിച്ച പാര്\u200dസര്\u200d, പുതിയ പാര്\u200dസര്\u200d', 'mn': 'ComboNER: Нэг POS Tagger, Dependency Parser, NER', 'mt': 'ComboNER: Tagger POS Ħfief Kollox f’Wieħed, Parser tad-Dipendenza u NER', 'pl': 'ComboNER: Lekki wszystko-w-jednym tagger POS, Parser zależności i NER', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'ComboNER: Un All-In-One POS Tagger ușor, Dependency Parser și NER', 'sr': 'Kombinator: svetlost u jednom polju, zavisnost roditelja i NER', 'so': 'ComboNER: A Lightweight All-In-One POS Tagger, Dependence Parser and NER', 'si': 'කෝම්බෝනේර්: ලයිට්වේජ් සියළු එක POS ටැගර්, විශේෂතාවක් පරිස්සර් සහ NER', 'sv': 'ComboNER: En lätt allt-i-ett POS Tagger, beroende Parser och NER', 'ta': 'காம்போன்: ஒரு ஒளி எடை அனைத்தும் ஒரு POS ஒட்டுக்காட்டி, சார்ந்த தொகுப்பாளர் மற்றும் NER', 'ur': 'کمبونر: ایک ہلکا وزن ایک پوس ٹاگر، اعتمادی پارس اور نیر', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'uz': 'KamboNER: Bir necha barcha POS tagger, Tasdiqlik parser va NER', 'bg': 'КомбоНЕР: Лек многофункционален маркер за ПОС, анализ на зависимостта и нерв', 'nl': 'ComboNER: Een lichtgewicht all-in-one POS Tagger, afhankelijkheidsparser en NER', 'da': 'ComboNER: En letvægts alt-i-en POS Tagger, afhængighed Parser og NER', 'hr': 'KomboNER: Lagana težina u jednom POS Tagger, zavisnost roditelja i NER', 'de': 'ComboNER: Ein leichter All-In-One POS Tagger, Dependency Parser und NER', 'id': 'ComboNER: A Lightweight All-In-One POS Tagger, Dependency Parser dan NER', 'ko': 'ComboNER: 경량급 다기능 POS 태그, 의존항 해상도 및 문법 분석기', 'fa': 'کمبونر: یک نقشه\u200cی همه\u200cی نقطه\u200cهای یکی از نقطه\u200cهای نقطه\u200cای، وفاداری و نقطه\u200cای', 'sq': 'ComboNER: A Lightweight All-In-One POS Tagger, Dependence Parser dhe NER', 'af': "KomboNER: 'n Ligte gewig Alle- in- Een Pos etiket, Afhanklikheid Verwerker en NER", 'tr': 'ComboNER: Hafif All-In-One POS Tagger, Dependency Parser and NER', 'sw': 'KamboNE: Mtandao wa mpiga picha wa chama kimoja cha POS, Mvutano wa Kutegemea na NNE', 'am': 'ኮምቦኔር: ቀላል ሚዛን ሁሉ-In-one POS Tagger, Dependency Parser and NER', 'az': 'ComboNER: A şıq bir POS etiketçisi, bağımlılıq anaları və NER', 'bs': 'KomboNER: Lagana težina u jednom POS Tagger, zavisnost roditelja i NER', 'bn': 'ComboNER: A Lightweight All-In-One POS Tagger, Dependency Parser and NER', 'ca': 'ComboNER: Un etiquetador POS lliure, analitzador de dependencies i NER', 'et': 'ComboNER: kerge kõik-ühes POS märgistaja, sõltuvuse parser ja NER', 'fi': 'ComboNER: Kevyt All-In-One POS Tagger, Dependency Parser ja NER', 'hy': 'Comment', 'cs': 'ComboNER: lehký All-In-One POS Tagger, závislostní parser a NER', 'jv': 'COMboNOR: A bright All-In-One po tagger, dependance Paraser and NeR', 'he': 'קומבונר: Tagger POS קל כל-באחד, מחקר תלויות ו NER', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'ComboNER: Lahek večnamenski označevalnik POS, razčlenjevalec odvisnosti in NER', 'bo': 'ComboNER: A Lightweight All-In-One POS Tagger, Dependency Parser and NER'}
{'en': 'The current natural language processing is strongly focused on raising accuracy. The progress comes at a cost of super-heavy models with hundreds of millions or even billions of parameters. However, simple syntactic tasks such as part-of-speech (POS) tagging, dependency parsing or named entity recognition (NER) do not require the largest models to achieve acceptable results. In line with this assumption we try to minimize the size of the model that jointly performs all three tasks. We introduce ComboNER : a lightweight tool, orders of magnitude smaller than state-of-the-art transformers. It is based on pre-trained subword embeddings and recurrent neural network architecture. ComboNER operates on Polish language data. The model has outputs for POS tagging, dependency parsing and NER. Our paper contains some insights from fine-tuning of the model and reports its overall results.', 'fr': "Le traitement actuel du langage naturel est fortement axé sur l'amélioration de la précision. Les progrès se font au prix de modèles très lourds avec des centaines de millions, voire des milliards de paramètres. Cependant, les tâches syntaxiques simples telles que le balisage de parties du discours (POS), l'analyse des dépendances ou la reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) ne nécessitent pas les modèles les plus grands pour obtenir des résultats acceptables. Conformément à cette hypothèse, nous essayons de minimiser la taille du modèle qui exécute conjointement les trois tâches. Nous présentons ComboNer\xa0: un outil léger, beaucoup plus petit que les transformateurs ultramodernes. Il est basé sur des intégrations de sous-mots pré-entraînées et une architecture de réseau neuronal récurrente. ComboNer fonctionne sur la base de données linguistiques polonaises Le modèle possède des sorties pour le balisage POS, l'analyse des dépendances et le NER. Notre article contient quelques informations issues de la mise au point du modèle et rend compte de ses résultats globaux.", 'es': 'El procesamiento actual del lenguaje natural se centra en gran medida en aumentar la precisión. El progreso se produce a costa de modelos superpesados con cientos de millones o incluso miles de millones de parámetros. Sin embargo, las tareas sintácticas simples, como el etiquetado de partes de voz (POS), el análisis de dependencias o el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER), no requieren los modelos más grandes para lograr resultados aceptables. En línea con este supuesto, tratamos de minimizar el tamaño del modelo que realiza conjuntamente las tres tareas. Presentamos ComBoner: una herramienta ligera, órdenes de magnitud más pequeña que los transformadores de última generación. Se basa en incrustaciones de subpalabras previamente entrenadas y una arquitectura de red neuronal recurrente. ComBoner opera con datos en polaco. El modelo tiene salidas para etiquetado de PDV, análisis de dependencias y NER. Nuestro artículo contiene algunas ideas sobre el ajuste fino del modelo e informa de sus resultados generales.', 'ar': 'تركز معالجة اللغة الطبيعية الحالية بشدة على زيادة الدقة. يأتي التقدم على حساب النماذج فائقة الثقل بمئات الملايين أو حتى المليارات من المعلمات. ومع ذلك ، فإن المهام النحوية البسيطة مثل علامات جزء من الكلام (POS) أو تحليل التبعية أو التعرف على الكيان المسماة (NER) لا تتطلب أكبر النماذج لتحقيق نتائج مقبولة. تمشيا مع هذا الافتراض ، نحاول تقليل حجم النموذج الذي يؤدي بشكل مشترك جميع المهام الثلاث. نقدم ComboNER: أداة خفيفة الوزن ، بأحجام أصغر من المحولات الحديثة. وهو يعتمد على تضمين الكلمات الفرعية المدربة مسبقًا وهندسة الشبكة العصبية المتكررة. تعمل ComboNER على بيانات اللغة البولندية. يحتوي النموذج على مخرجات لعلامات POS وتحليل التبعية و NER. تحتوي ورقتنا البحثية على بعض الأفكار من صقل النموذج وتقارير نتائجه الإجمالية.', 'pt': 'O atual processamento de linguagem natural está fortemente focado em aumentar a precisão. O progresso tem o custo de modelos superpesados com centenas de milhões ou mesmo bilhões de parâmetros. No entanto, tarefas sintáticas simples, como marcação de parte de fala (POS), análise de dependência ou reconhecimento de entidade nomeada (NER) não exigem os maiores modelos para obter resultados aceitáveis. De acordo com essa suposição, tentamos minimizar o tamanho do modelo que realiza conjuntamente as três tarefas. Apresentamos o ComboNER: uma ferramenta leve, ordens de grandeza menores que os transformadores de última geração. Ele é baseado em embeddings de subpalavras pré-treinados e arquitetura de rede neural recorrente. O ComboNER opera com dados do idioma polonês. O modelo tem saídas para marcação POS, análise de dependência e NER. Nosso artigo contém alguns insights do ajuste fino do modelo e relata seus resultados gerais.', 'zh': '当今自然语言处分甚重准确性。 此进以数亿至数十亿参数超重型模形为价。 然简语法之务(如词性 (POS) 标记、因名实识 (NER))不待大形而受也。 以此设之,试最小化共行三事之大小。 余言ComboNER:一轻量级之具,小于最先进者变压器数量级。 盖预练子词嵌递归神经网络架构。 ComboNER用波兰语数。 其法有 POS 、恃解析、 NER 输。 我们的论文包含出自模形微调的见解,并告诉了总体。', 'ja': '現在の自然言語処理は、精度の向上に強く焦点を当てている。この進歩には、数億、あるいは数十億のパラメータを持つ超重量モデルのコストがかかります。しかしながら、部分音声（ ＰＯＳ ）タグ付け、依存関係解析、または名前付きエンティティ認識（ ＮＥＲ ）などの単純な構文タスクは、許容可能な結果を達成するために最大のモデルを必要としない。この仮定に沿って、3つのタスクすべてを共同で実行するモデルのサイズを最小限に抑えるようにします。最先端の変圧器よりも数倍小さい軽量ツールComboNERをご紹介します。これは、事前にトレーニングされたサブワード埋め込みと再発ニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャに基づいています。ComboNERはポーランド語データ上で動作します。モデルには、POSタグ付け、依存関係解析、およびNERのための出力があります。私たちの論文には、モデルの微調整から得られたいくつかの洞察が含まれており、全体的な結果を報告しています。', 'hi': 'वर्तमान प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण दृढ़ता से सटीकता बढ़ाने पर केंद्रित है। प्रगति सैकड़ों लाखों या यहां तक कि अरबों मापदंडों के साथ सुपर-भारी मॉडल की लागत पर आती है। हालांकि, सरल वाक्यात्मक कार्यों जैसे पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच (पीओएस) टैगिंग, निर्भरता पार्सिंग या नामित एंटिटी रिकग्निशन (एनईआर) को स्वीकार्य परिणाम प्राप्त करने के लिए सबसे बड़े मॉडल की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है। इस धारणा के अनुरूप हम मॉडल के आकार को कम करने की कोशिश करते हैं जो संयुक्त रूप से सभी तीन कार्यों को निष्पादित करता है। हम ComboNER परिचय: एक हल्के उपकरण, राज्य के अत्याधुनिक ट्रांसफार्मर की तुलना में छोटे परिमाण के आदेश. यह पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित उप-शब्द एम्बेडिंग और आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क वास्तुकला पर आधारित है। ComboNER पोलिश भाषा डेटा पर काम करता है। मॉडल में पीओएस टैगिंग, निर्भरता पार्सिंग और एनईआर के लिए आउटपुट हैं। हमारे पेपर में मॉडल के ठीक-ट्यूनिंग से कुछ अंतर्दृष्टि शामिल हैं और इसके समग्र परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Текущая обработка на естественном языке в значительной степени ориентирована на повышение точности. Прогресс достигается ценой сверхтяжелых моделей с сотнями миллионов или даже миллиардами параметров. Однако простые синтаксические задачи, такие как тегирование части речи (POS), синтаксический анализ зависимостей или распознавание именованных сущностей (NER), не требуют самых больших моделей для достижения приемлемых результатов. В соответствии с этим допущением мы стараемся минимизировать размер модели, которая совместно выполняет все три задачи. Представляем ComboNER - легкий инструмент, на порядок меньший, чем современные трансформаторы. Она основана на предварительно обученных вложениях подслова и рекуррентной архитектуре нейронной сети. ComboNER работает на польском языке данных. Модель имеет выходы для POS-тегов, синтаксического анализа зависимостей и NER. Наша работа содержит некоторые выводы из тонкой настройки модели и сообщает ее общие результаты.', 'ga': 'Tá an phróiseáil teanga nádúrtha atá ann faoi láthair dírithe go láidir ar chruinneas a ardú. Tagann an dul chun cinn ar chostas samhlacha sár-trom leis na céadta milliún nó fiú na billiúin paraiméadair. Mar sin féin, ní éilíonn tascanna comhréire simplí amhail clibeáil cuid cainte (POS), parsáil spleáchais nó aithint aonáin ainmnithe (NER) na samhlacha is mó chun torthaí inghlactha a bhaint amach. Ag teacht leis an toimhde seo déanaimid iarracht méid an mhúnla a chomhlíonfaidh na trí thasc a íoslaghdú. Cuirimid i láthair ComboNER: uirlis éadrom, orduithe méid níos lú ná na claochladáin is nua-aimseartha. Tá sé bunaithe ar leabú fofhocail réamhoilte agus ailtireacht líonra néarach athfhillteach. Feidhmíonn ComboNER ar shonraí sa Pholainnis. Tá aschuir ag an tsamhail do chlibeáil POS, parsáil spleáchais agus NER. Tá roinnt léargais inár bpáipéar ó mhionchoigeartú an mhúnla agus tuairiscítear a thorthaí foriomlána.', 'hu': 'A jelenlegi természetes nyelvfeldolgozás erősen a pontosság növelésére összpontosít. A fejlődés több százmillió vagy akár milliárd paraméterrel rendelkező szupernehéz modellek árával jár. Azonban az egyszerű szintaktikus feladatok, mint például a beszédrész (POS) címkézés, a függőség elemzése vagy a nevezett entitás felismerése (NER) nem igénylik a legnagyobb modelleket az elfogadható eredmények eléréséhez. Ennek a feltételezésnek megfelelően igyekszünk minimalizálni annak a modell méretét, amely mindhárom feladatot közösen végzi. Bemutatjuk a ComboNER-t: egy könnyű szerszám, amely nagyságrendje kisebb, mint a korszerű transzformátorok. Előre képzett alszó beágyazásokon és visszatérő neurális hálózati architektúrán alapul. A ComboNER lengyel nyelvű adatokon működik. A modell kimenetei vannak a POS címkézéshez, a függőség elemzéséhez és a NER-hez. Tanulmányunk tartalmaz néhány betekintést a modell finomhangolásából és beszámol az összes eredményről.', 'el': 'Η τρέχουσα επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας επικεντρώνεται έντονα στην αύξηση της ακρίβειας. Η πρόοδος έρχεται με κόστος υπερβαρέων μοντέλων με εκατοντάδες εκατομμύρια ή ακόμη και δισεκατομμύρια παραμέτρους. Ωστόσο, οι απλές συντακτικές εργασίες, όπως η επισήμανση μέρους ομιλίας, η ανάλυση εξάρτησης ή η αναγνώριση ονομαστικών οντοτήτων (δεν απαιτούν τα μεγαλύτερα μοντέλα για την επίτευξη αποδεκτών αποτελεσμάτων. Σύμφωνα με αυτή την υπόθεση προσπαθούμε να ελαχιστοποιήσουμε το μέγεθος του μοντέλου που εκτελεί από κοινού και τις τρεις εργασίες. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα ελαφρύ εργαλείο, τάξεις μεγέθους μικρότερες από τους μετασχηματιστές τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Βασίζεται σε προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις υπολέξεων και επαναλαμβανόμενη αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικών δικτύων. Η ComboNER βασίζεται σε δεδομένα πολωνικής γλώσσας. Το μοντέλο έχει εξόδους για την επισήμανση POS, ανάλυση εξάρτησης και NER. Η εργασία μας περιέχει μερικές πληροφορίες από την τελειοποίηση του μοντέλου και αναφέρει τα συνολικά αποτελέσματά του.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე თავისუფალური ენის პროცესი ძალიან კონუქტირებულია წარმოდგენისთვის. პროგრესი ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან მოდელეების შესახებ ასეულობით მილიონი ან ასევე მილიონი პარამეტრები. მაგრამ, საუკეთესო სინტაქტიური დავალებები, როგორც საუკეთესო სიტყვანის (POS) ჭდეები, დასაკეთესო პარასიზაცია ან საუკეთესო ინტერტიკის განახლება (NER) არ უნდა უფრო დი ამ წარმოდგენისთვის ჩვენ დავცდილობთ მოდელის ზომას, რომელიც ერთადერთად სამი დავალება. ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ComboNER: სიმაღლე ხელსაწყო, მაგრამ მაგრამის ნაკლებად, ვიდრე ხელსაწყოთა ტრანფორმაციებისგან. ეს უფრო მეტად განსწავლა საბეჭდო სიტყვების შებრუნებისა და რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტიქტიკაზე დაბაზიან. Name მოდელის მონაცემები POS ჭდეებისთვის, დასახლოებისთვის პარალიზაციისთვის და NER. ჩვენი დოკუმენტის შესახებ მოდელის სწორედ შესახებ და მისი ყველა შედეგების შესახებ.', 'it': "L'attuale elaborazione del linguaggio naturale è fortemente focalizzata sull'aumento della precisione. Il progresso arriva a un costo di modelli super-pesanti con centinaia di milioni o addirittura miliardi di parametri. Tuttavia, semplici attività sintattiche come il tag part-of-speech (POS), l'analisi delle dipendenze o il riconoscimento di entità con nome (NER) non richiedono i modelli più grandi per ottenere risultati accettabili. In linea con questa ipotesi cerchiamo di ridurre al minimo le dimensioni del modello che esegue congiuntamente tutte e tre le attività. Vi presentiamo ComboNER: uno strumento leggero, ordini di grandezza inferiori ai trasformatori all'avanguardia. Si basa su incorporazioni di subparole pre-addestrate e architettura di rete neurale ricorrente. ComboNER opera su dati in lingua polacca. Il modello ha output per POS tagging, dipendenza parsing e NER. Il nostro articolo contiene alcune informazioni sulla messa a punto del modello e riporta i suoi risultati generali.", 'kk': 'Назардағы табиғи тіл процессі дұрыстығын көбейту үшін көмектеседі. Бұл бағдарлама жүздеген миллион немесе дағы миллион параметрлердің бағасы бар. Бірақ қарапайым синтактикалық тапсырмалар, мысалы, сөйлеу (POS) тегтері, тәуелдік талдау немесе аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) деген үлкен үлгі нәтижелерді жеткізу үшін керек жоқ. Бұл үшін бірге үш тапсырманың өлшемін төмендету керек. Біз ComboNER-ды таңдап береміз: жылдамдық құралы, әртүрлі түрлендірушілерден кішкентай үлкендік реттері. Бұл алдын- ала оқылған суб- сөздерді ендіру мен қайталанатын неврал желі архитектурасына негізделген. ComboNER Польша тіл деректерінде жұмыс істейді. Үлгі POS тегтері, тәуелдік талдау және NER үшін шығыс бар. Біздің қағаз үлгісін жақсы баптаудан бірнеше түсініктер бар және оның жалпы нәтижесін хабарлап береді.', 'mk': 'Сегашното природно обработување на јазикот е силно фокусирано на зголемување на прецизноста. Прогресот доаѓа по цена на супер тешки модели со стотици милиони или дури и милијарди параметри. Сепак, едноставните синтактички задачи како што се означувањето на дел од говорот (POS), анализирањето на зависноста или препознавањето на именуваниот ентитет (NER) не бараат најголеми модели за да се постигнат прифатливи резултати. Во согласност со оваа претпоставка се обидуваме да ја минимизираме големината на моделот кој заедно ги извршува сите три задачи. Ние го претставуваме Комбонер: лесна алатка, наредби на големина помали од најсовремените трансформатори. Таа се базира на предобучени внесувања на подзборови и рецидентна архитектура на нервната мрежа. Комбонер работи на податоци на полски јазик. The model has outputs for POS tagging, dependency parsing and NER.  Нашиот весник содржи некои информации од подобрувањето на моделот и ги известува неговите целокупни резултати.', 'lt': 'Dabartinis natūralus kalbų apdorojimas yra labai sutelktas į tikslumo didinimą. Pažanga daroma už labai sunkius modelius su šimtais milijonų ar net milijardų parametrų. Tačiau paprastoms sintaksinėms užduotims, pvz., kalbos dalies žymėjimui (POS), priklausomybės analizavimui arba vardinio subjekto pripažinimui (NER), nereikalaujama, kad didžiausi modeliai pasiektų priimtinų rezultatų. Atsižvelgdami į šią prielaidą bandome sumažinti modelio, kuris kartu atlieka visas tris užduotis, dydį. Įvedame ComboNER: lengvą įrangą, mažesnio dydžio, nei moderniausi transformatoriai. Jis grindžiamas iš anksto apmokytais subžodžių įdėjimais ir pasikartojančia neurologinio tinklo architektūra. ComboNER veikia pagal lenkų kalbos duomenis. The model has outputs for POS tagging, dependency parsing and NER.  Mūsų dokumente pateikiama tam tikrų įžvalgų, susijusių su modelio patobulinimu, ir pateikiami jo bendri rezultatai.', 'ms': 'Pemprosesan bahasa alami semasa berfokus kuat pada meningkatkan ketepatan. Kemajuan datang dengan kos model super-berat dengan ratusan juta atau bahkan bilion parameter. Namun, tugas sintaktik sederhana seperti tag-part-of-speech (POS), penghuraian dependensi atau pengenalan entiti bernama (NER) tidak memerlukan model terbesar untuk mencapai keputusan yang diterima. Berdasarkan asumsi ini, kita cuba untuk minimumkan saiz model yang bersama-sama melakukan semua tiga tugas. Kami memperkenalkan ComboNER: alat ringan, perintah ukuran yang lebih kecil daripada pengubah state-of-the-art. Ia berdasarkan penyambungan subkata terlatih dan arkitektur rangkaian saraf berulang. ComboNER operates on Polish language data.  Model mempunyai output untuk tag POS, penghuraian dependensi dan NER. Kertas kami mengandungi beberapa pandangan dari penyesuaian model dan melaporkan hasil keseluruhannya.', 'mn': 'Харин одоогийн байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэл нь зөв байдлыг нэмэгдүүлэхэд хүчтэй төвлөрүүлдэг. Гэтэл хөгжлийн үнэ нь сая сая эсвэл тэрбум мянган параметр байдаг супер хүнд загварын үнэ цэнэтэй. Гэхдээ энгийн шинжлэх ухааны үйл ажиллагаа (POS) хэсэг, хамааралтай хуваалцах, эсвэл нэрлэгдсэн бүтээлүүдийг (NER) хүлээн зөвшөөрөх боломжтой үр дүнг олох хамгийн том загварууд шаардлагагүй. Энэ тодорхойлолтоор бид 3 даалгаварыг нийлүүлэх загварын хэмжээ багасгах гэж оролдож байна. Бид ComboNER-г танилцуулж байна: жингийн хэрэгсэл, урлагийн шилжүүлэгчээс бага хэмжээний захирамж. Энэ нь сургалтын өмнө сургалтын хэлбэрүүд болон сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний архитектур дээр суурилсан. ComboNER Польшийн хэл өгөгдлийн талаар ажилладаг. Загвар нь POS-ийн маркинг, хамааралтай хуваалцах болон NER-ын үр дүн гаргадаг. Бидний цаасан загварыг сайжруулахаас зарим ойлголтыг агуулдаг. Үүний нийтлэг үр дүнг тайлбарладаг.', 'mt': 'L-ipproċessar attwali tal-lingwi naturali huwa ffukat b’mod qawwi fuq iż-żieda tal-preċiżjoni. Il-progress jiġi bi spiża ta’ mudelli super-heavy b’mijiet ta’ miljuni jew saħansitra biljuni ta’ parametri. Madankollu, kompiti sintetiċi sempliċi bħall-ittikkettar tal-parti tad-diskors (POS), l-analizzazzjoni tad-dipendenza jew ir-rikonoxximent tal-entità msejħa (NER) ma jeħtieġux l-akbar mudelli biex jinkisbu riżultati aċċettabbli. F’konformità ma’ din is-suppożizzjoni nippruvaw nimminimizzaw id-daqs tal-mudell li b’mod konġunt iwettaq it-tliet kompiti kollha. Aħna nintroduċu ComboNER: għodda ħafifa, ordnijiet ta’ daqs iżgħar minn trasformaturi avvanzati. It is based on pre-trained subword embeddings and recurrent neural network architecture.  ComboNER operates on Polish language data.  Il-mudell għandu riżultati għat-tikkettar tal-POS, l-analiżi tad-dipendenza u NER. Id-dokument tagħna fih xi fehmiet mill-irfinar tal-mudell u jirrapporta r-riżultati globali tiegħu.', 'ml': 'ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയയുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്തം കൃത്യതയുള്ളതിനെ ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്നത നൂറുകണക്കിന് ലക്ഷം ലക്ഷം മാതൃകങ്ങളുള്ള മോഡലുകളുടെ വിലയിലോ പുരോഗതി വരുന്നു. എന്നാലും, സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഭാഗം, ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d പേരിട്ട വസ്തുത ത തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന് ഏറ്റവും വലിയ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ആവശ് In line with this assumption we try to minimize the size of the model that jointly performs all three tasks.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കോമ്പോണെരിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു: ഒരു ലളിതമായ ഉപകരണത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരവാദിത്വത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥാനത്തേക്കാള്\u200d ചെ ഇത് മുമ്പ് പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട സബ്\u200cവോര്\u200dഡിന്\u200dറെ അകത്തേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും തിരിച്ചുവരുന്ന നെയ കോംബോണെര്\u200d പോളിഷ് ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. പോസ് ടാഗിങ്ങിനും ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങും പിന്നെ മോഡലില്\u200d പുറത്തുണ്ട്. ഞങ്ങളുടെ പേപ്പറില്\u200d മോഡലിന്റെ മുന്\u200dപില്\u200d നിന്നും കുറച്ച് കണ്ണുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ട്. അതിന്റെ മൊത്തം ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d റിപ്പോ', 'pl': 'Obecne przetwarzanie języka naturalnego jest silnie skoncentrowane na podnoszeniu dokładności. Postęp jest kosztem super ciężkich modeli o setkach milionów, a nawet miliardach parametrów. Jednakże proste zadania składni, takie jak tagowanie części mowy (POS), analizowanie zależności czy rozpoznawanie nazwanych jednostek (NER), nie wymagają największych modeli do osiągnięcia akceptowalnych wyników. Zgodnie z tym założeniem staramy się zminimalizować wielkość modelu, który wspólnie wykonuje wszystkie trzy zadania. Wprowadzamy ComboNER: lekkie narzędzie, rzędy wielkości mniejsze niż nowoczesne transformatory. Opiera się on na wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeniach podsłów i powtarzającej się architekturze sieci neuronowej. ComboNER działa na podstawie danych językowych polskiego. Model posiada wyjścia do tagowania POS, parsowania zależności i NER. Nasz artykuł zawiera kilka spostrzeżeń z dostosowania modelu i przedstawia jego ogólne wyniki.', 'no': 'Den gjeldande naturspråkoplinga er sterkt fokusert på oppheving av nøyaktighet. Framgangen kommer med ein kostnad på super tunge modeller med hundre millioner eller even milliarder parametra. Alle enkle syntaktiske oppgåver, slik som ein del av tale (POS) merking, tolking av avhengighet eller gjenkjenning av namnet entitet (NER), krev ikkje dei største modelane for å oppnå akseptabele resultat. I tillegg med denne antaren prøver vi å minimera storleiken på modellen som kopla utfører alle tre oppgåver. Vi introduserer ComboNER: eit lett verktøy, rekkefølgja av storleiken mindre enn kunsttransformeringstilstanden. Det er basert på føretrainerte underordinnbygging og gjentakelige neuralnettverkstarkitektur. ComboNER fungerer på polsk språk- data. Modellen har utdata for POS- merking, avhengighetstolking og NER. Papiret vårt inneheld nokre innsyningar frå finnstilling av modellen og rapporterer overalt resultata.', 'ro': 'Procesarea actuală a limbajului natural este concentrată puternic pe creșterea preciziei. Progresul vine cu costul modelelor super-grele cu sute de milioane sau chiar miliarde de parametri. Cu toate acestea, activitățile sintactice simple, cum ar fi etichetarea în parte-of-speech (POS), analizarea dependențelor sau recunoașterea entităților denumite (NER) nu necesită cele mai mari modele pentru a obține rezultate acceptabile. În conformitate cu această ipoteză încercăm să minimizăm dimensiunea modelului care îndeplinește împreună toate cele trei sarcini. Introducem ComboNER: un instrument ușor, cu ordine de mărime mai mici decât transformatoarele de ultimă generație. Se bazează pe încorporări pre-instruite de subcuvinte și arhitectura rețelei neurale recurente. ComboNER operează pe baza datelor în limba poloneză. Modelul are ieșiri pentru etichetarea POS, analizarea dependențelor și NER. Lucrarea noastră conține câteva informații din ajustarea fină a modelului și raportează rezultatele sale generale.', 'sr': 'Trenutno prirodno obrađivanje jezika je usredotočeno na povećanje tačnosti. Napredak dolazi po cijenu super teških modela sa stotine miliona ili čak i milijardi parametara. Međutim, jednostavni sintaktički zadatak poput označavanja dijela govora (POS), analize zavisnosti ili priznanja imena entiteta (NER) ne zahtevaju najvećih modela za postizanje prihvatljivih rezultata. U skladu sa ovim pretpostavkom pokušavamo da minimiziramo veličinu modela koji zajedno obavlja sve tri zadatke. Predstavljamo ComboNER: lakši alat, naređenje veličine manje od stanja umjetničkih transformatora. On je zasnovan na predobučenoj podriječji integraciji i rekonstrukciji neuralne mreže arhitekture. KomboNER radi na poljskim podacima jezika. Model ima rezultate za označavanje POS-a, analizu zavisnosti i NER-a. Naš papir sadrži neke uvjete iz dobre prilagodbe modela i prijavljuje njegove ukupne rezultate.', 'sv': 'Den nuvarande bearbetningen av naturligt språk är starkt inriktad på att öka noggrannheten. Framstegen kommer till en kostnad av supertunga modeller med hundratals miljoner eller till och med miljarder parametrar. Enkla syntaktiska uppgifter som POS-märkning, beroendetolkning eller namngiven entitetsigenkänning (NER) kräver dock inte de största modellerna för att uppnå godtagbara resultat. I linje med detta antagande försöker vi minimera storleken på den modell som gemensamt utför alla tre uppgifterna. Vi introducerar ComboNER: ett lätt verktyg, storleksordningar mindre än toppmoderna transformatorer. Den är baserad på förklädda underordsbäddningar och återkommande neurala nätverksarkitektur. ComboNER arbetar med polska språkdata. Modellen har utgångar för POS taggning, beroendetolkning och NER. Vår uppsats innehåller några insikter från finjustering av modellen och redovisar dess övergripande resultat.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடு சரியானதை உயர்த்தும் பொருட்டு கவனம் செலுத்தப்படுகிறது. நூறு மில்லியன் அல்லது பில்லியன் அளபுருக்கள் கூட மாதிரிகளின் விலையில் முன்னேறுதல் வருகிறது. However, எளிய ஒத்திசைவு பணிகள், பேச்சின் பகுதி குறிப்பு, சார்ந்த பாடல் அல்லது பெயர் பொருள் அடையாளம் (NER) போன்ற பேச்சின் பெரிய மாதிரிகளை ஏற்றுக் கொ இந்த எண்ணிக்கையில் நாம் மூன்று பணிகளை ஒன்றாக செய்யும் மாதிரியின் அளவை குறைக்க முயற்சிக்கிறோம். நாம் காம்போன்டரை அறிவிக்கிறோம்: ஒரு எளிமையான கருவி, பெரிய அளவிற்கு கட்டளைகள், கலை மாற்றங்களை விட சிறிய நிலையை விட இது முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட துணை வார்த்தைகள் உள்ளடக்கங்களை அடிப்படையாகும் மற்றும் நிகழ்ந்த புதிய பிணைய வலைப் Name Name எங்கள் காகிதத்தில் மாதிரியிலிருந்து சில பார்வைகள் உள்ளன மற்றும் அதன் மொத்த முடிவுகளை அறிவிக்கிறது.', 'so': 'Baaraandegista luqada asalka ah waxay si adag ugu kalsoonaadaa koritaanka saxda. Horumarintu waxay ka timaadaa qiimaha modellada aad u weyn oo ay leedahay boqol milyan ama xataa bilyan baaritaan. However, simple syntactic tasks such as part-of-speech (POS) tagging, dependency parsing or named entity recognition (NER) do not require the largest models to achieve acceptable results.  Markaas waxaan isku dareynaa in aan isku dayno qiyaastii modellka oo wada shaqeeya saddexda shaqo oo dhan. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa ComboNER: qalabka fudud, amar aad u yar sida xaaladda-farshaxanka ah. Waxay ku saleysan tahay xarunta qoraalka hoose-word ee horay loo tababaray iyo dhismaha shabakadda neurada ee dib u socda. ComboNER wuxuu ku shaqeeyaa macluumaadka afka Poland. Tusaalada waxaa ka soo baxa jardiinada POS, jardiinada ku xiran iyo NER. Qoraalkayaga waxaa ku jira aragtida muuqashada hagaajinta, wuxuuna wargeliyaa midhihiisa oo dhan.', 'si': 'දැන් ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය විශ්වාස කරනවා ඇත්ත විශ්වාස කරන්න. මිලියන් සියළුවක් නැත්නම් බිලියන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන විශාලයක් තියෙනවා. නමුත්, සාමාන්\u200dය සංකේතික වැඩක් හරියට, ප්\u200dරතිශීල ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d මේ විශ්වාසයෙන් අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා මොඩල් තුනක් වැඩ කරන්න. අපි කොම්බෝනෙර් වෙනුවෙන්: ලොකු උපකරණයක්, විශාල විදියට වඩා පොඩි විශාල විදියට වඩා පොඩි විදියට අණ් ඒක ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරධානය සබ් වචන සංවිධානය සහ ආපහු ප්\u200dරධානය න Name මොඩල් එකේ POS ටැග් කරන්න, විශේෂතාව විශ්ලේෂණය සහ NER වෙනුවෙන් පුළුවන් තියෙනවා. අපේ පත්තුරේ මොඩල් එක හොඳ සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණාවක් තියෙනවා ඒ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිච', 'ur': 'موجود طبیعی زبان پردازی مضبوط طور پر دقیق بلند کرنے پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے۔ پرمختګ بہت بھاری موڈل کے مطابق سوں میلیونوں یا حتی میلیونوں پارامتر کے ساتھ آتی ہے. However, simple syntactic tasks such as part-of-speech (POS) tagging, dependency parsing or named entity recognition (NER) do not require the largest models to achieve acceptable results. یہ فرض کے ساتھ ہم مدل کی اندازہ کم کرنے کی کوشش کرتے ہیں جو سب تین کام کرتا ہے۔ ہم ComboNER کو معرفی کرتے ہیں: ایک ہلکا تولید، بڑائی کی دستورات جو حیات کی تبدیل کرنے والوں سے چھوٹی ہے. یہ پہلے تدریس کی subword embeddings اور دوبارہ نئورل نیٹ ورک معماری پر بنیاد ہے. Name Model has outputs for POS tagging, dependency parsing and NER. ہمارے کاغذ میں موڈل کی بہترین تدبیر سے کچھ نظر رکھتے ہیں اور اس کے سب نتائج گزارتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Joriy tabiiy tilning boshqaruvi tashkilotni tasdiqlash uchun juda qiziqarli. Mavjud darajada yuqori modellar soni millionlab millionlab yoki millionlab parametrlar bilan keladi. Lekin, gapiring qismlari (POS) qismlari, tashkilotni tasdiqlash yoki tashkilotning nomini tasdiqlash (NER) uchun eng katta modellar kerak emas. Bu g'oya bilan biz hamma uch vazifalarning oʻlchamini kamaytirishni harakat qilamiz. Biz KomboNER'ni anglatamiz: yomon asboblar, shaxsiy o'zgarishlardan kichkina ko'paytirishga qaror qilamiz. @ info: whatsthis Name Name Qogʻozimizda modelning yaxshi ko'rinishidan bir ko'p ko'rinishi bor va uning umumiy natijalari haqida xabar beradi.", 'vi': 'Việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên hiện tại rất tập trung vào việc tăng độ chính xác. Sự tiến bộ đến với cái giá của những mô hình siêu nặng với hàng trăm triệu hay thậm chí hàng tỷ thông số. Tuy nhiên, các công việc cấu tạo cú pháp đơn giản như phần của bài phát âm (POS) để phân tích sự phụ thuộc hay nhận dạng thực thể tên (NER) không yêu cầu các mẫu lớn nhất để đạt kết quả có thể chấp nhận được. Theo giả định này, chúng tôi cố gắng giảm thiểu kích thước của mô hình thực hiện cùng nhau ba nhiệm vụ. Chúng tôi giới thiệu Combo: một công cụ nhẹ, những thứ lệnh tầm cỡ nhỏ hơn các máy biến thế hiện đại. Nó dựa trên sự nhúng đầu từ dự bị và cấu trúc dây thần kinh liên tục. phối hợp với dữ liệu ngôn ngữ Ba Lan. Kiểu này có kết quả kết xuất cho kết vị kết vị kết vị, phân tích độ quan trọng. Trong báo cáo của chúng tôi có những ý tưởng về việc chỉnh sửa mô hình và báo cáo kết quả tổng thể.', 'da': 'Den nuværende behandling af natursprog er stærkt fokuseret på at øge nøjagtigheden. Fremskridtene kommer på bekostning af supertunge modeller med hundredvis af millioner eller endda milliarder af parametre. Enkle syntaktiske opgaver som POS-taggning, afhængighedsparsing eller navngivet entitetsgenkendelse (NER) kræver dog ikke de største modeller for at opnå acceptable resultater. I overensstemmelse med denne antagelse forsøger vi at minimere størrelsen af den model, der i fællesskab udfører alle tre opgaver. Vi introducerer ComboNER: et let værktøj, størrelsesordener mindre end state-of-the-art transformere. Det er baseret på præ-trænede underordsindlejringer og tilbagevendende neurale netværksarkitektur. ComboNER arbejder på polske sprogdata. Modellen har output til POS tagging, afhængighed parsing og NER. Vores artikel indeholder nogle indsigter fra finjustering af modellen og rapporterer dens overordnede resultater.', 'nl': 'De huidige natuurlijke taalverwerking is sterk gericht op het verhogen van nauwkeurigheid. De vooruitgang komt ten koste van superzware modellen met honderden miljoenen of zelfs miljarden parameters. Voor eenvoudige syntactische taken zoals POS-tagging (part-of-speech), afhankelijkheidsparsing of NER (named entity recognition) zijn echter niet de grootste modellen nodig om acceptabele resultaten te behalen. In lijn met deze veronderstelling proberen we de grootte van het model dat gezamenlijk alle drie de taken uitvoert te minimaliseren. We introduceren ComboNER: een lichtgewicht gereedschap, ordes kleiner dan state-of-the-art transformatoren. Het is gebaseerd op vooraf getrainde subwoord embeddings en terugkerende neurale netwerkarchitectuur. ComboNER werkt op Poolse taalgegevens. Het model heeft outputs voor POS tagging, afhankelijkheidsparsing en NER. Ons artikel bevat enkele inzichten uit finetuning van het model en rapporteert de algemene resultaten.', 'bg': 'Настоящата обработка на естествения език е силно фокусирана върху повишаване на точността. Напредъкът идва с цената на супер тежки модели със стотици милиони или дори милиарди параметри. Въпреки това, простите синтактични задачи като маркиране на част от речта (ПОС), анализиране на зависимости или разпознаване на наименовани обекти (НЕР) не изискват най-големите модели за постигане на приемливи резултати. В съответствие с това предположение се опитваме да сведем до минимум размера на модела, който съвместно изпълнява и трите задачи. Представяме лек инструмент, с порядък по-малки от най-съвременните трансформатори. Тя се основава на предварително обучени вграждания на поддуми и повтаряща се архитектура на невронната мрежа. ComboNER работи с данни на полски език. Моделът има изходи за маркиране на ПОС, анализ на зависимости и НЕР. Нашата статия съдържа някои прозрения от фината настройка на модела и докладва общите му резултати.', 'hr': 'Trenutno prirodno obrađivanje jezika usredotočeno je na povećanje preciznosti. Napredak dolazi po cijenu super teških modela sa stotine milijuna ili čak milijardi parametara. Međutim, jednostavni sintaktički zadatak poput označavanja dijela govora (POS), analize zavisnosti ili priznanja imena entiteta (NER) ne zahtijevaju najveći modeli za postizanje prihvatljivih rezultata. U skladu s ovim pretpostavkom pokušavamo smanjiti veličinu modela koji zajedno obavlja sve tri zadatke. Predstavljamo ComboNER: lakši alat, naređenje veličine manje od stanja umjetničkih transformatora. Na temelju je predobučene ugrađene podriječje i ponovne arhitekture neuralne mreže. ComboNER radi na poljskim podacima jezika. Model ima rezultate za označavanje POS-a, analizu zavisnosti i NER-a. Naš novinar sadrži neke uvide iz dobrog prilagođenja modela i prijavljuje njegove ukupne rezultate.', 'de': 'Die aktuelle Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache konzentriert sich stark auf die Erhöhung der Genauigkeit. Der Fortschritt geht auf Kosten von superschweren Modellen mit Hunderten von Millionen oder sogar Milliarden von Parametern. Einfache syntaktische Aufgaben wie Part-of-Speech (POS)-Tagging, Dependency Parsing oder Named Entity Recognition (NER) erfordern jedoch nicht die größten Modelle, um akzeptable Ergebnisse zu erzielen. Entsprechend dieser Annahme versuchen wir, die Größe des Modells zu minimieren, das alle drei Aufgaben gemeinsam erfüllt. Wir stellen ComboNER vor: ein leichtes Werkzeug, das um Größenordnungen kleiner ist als moderne Transformatoren. Es basiert auf vorgetrainierten Subword-Einbettungen und wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerkarchitekturen. ComboNER arbeitet auf polnischen Daten. Das Modell verfügt über Ausgänge für POS-Tagging, Abhängigkeitsparsing und NER. Unser Papier enthält einige Erkenntnisse aus der Feinabstimmung des Modells und berichtet über seine Gesamtergebnisse.', 'id': 'Proses bahasa alami saat ini sangat fokus pada meningkatkan akurasi. Kemajuan datang dengan biaya model super berat dengan ratusan juta atau bahkan miliaran parameter. Namun, tugas sintaks sederhana seperti tag-part-of-speech (POS), penghuraian dependensi atau pengenalan entitas bernama (NER) tidak memerlukan model terbesar untuk mencapai hasil yang diterima. Berdasarkan asumsi ini kita mencoba untuk mengurangi ukuran model yang bersama-sama melakukan semua tiga tugas. Kami memperkenalkan ComboNER: alat ringan, perintah ukuran yang lebih kecil dari transformator state-of-the-art. Ini berdasarkan penerbangan subword yang dilatih dan arsitektur jaringan saraf yang berkurang. ComboNER beroperasi pada data bahasa Polandia. Model memiliki output untuk penanda POS, penghuraian dependensi dan NER. Kertas kami mengandung beberapa pengetahuan dari penyesuaian model dan melaporkan hasil umumnya.', 'fa': 'پرداخت زبان طبیعی فعلی به شدت روی بالا دادن دقیق تمرکز می\u200cشود. پیشرفت با هزینه از مدل های فوق سنگین با صدها میلیون ها یا حتی میلیون میلیارد پارامتر است. ولی کار ساده\u200cهای سنتاکتیک مثل نقاشی پاره\u200cای از سخنرانی (POS)، بررسی بستگی یا شناسایی عنوان اسم (NER) بزرگترین مدل\u200cها برای رسیدن نتایج پذیرفته نیازی ندارند. با این فرض ما سعی می کنیم اندازه مدل را کمتر کنیم که با هم تمام سه کار را انجام می دهد. ما ابزار کمونر را معرفی می کنیم: یک ابزار سبک، دستورات بزرگی کوچکتر از تغییر دهندگان هنری. آن بر اساس ابتدایی\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای پیش آموزش شده و معماری شبکه عصبی بازگشت است. ComboNER روی داده\u200cهای زبان لهستانی کار می\u200cکند. مدل نتیجه\u200cهایی برای نقاشی POS، تقسیم بستگی و NER دارد. کاغذ ما بعضی مشاهده\u200cها از طریق اصلاح کردن مدل وجود دارد و نتیجه\u200cهای کلی آن را گزارش می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Mpango wa lugha ya asili wa sasa umejikita sana katika kukuza ukweli. Maendeleo yanakuja kwa gharama kubwa ya mifano yenye mamia ya mamilioni au hata mabilioni ya parameter. Hata hivyo, kazi rahisi za ushirikiano kama sehemu ya alama za hotuba (POS), kutegemea uchimbaji au kutambuliwa kwa entity (NER) hazihitaji mifano makubwa ili kupata matokeo yanayokubalika. Kwa mujibu wa dhana hii tunajaribu kupunguza ukubwa wa muundo ambao unafanya kazi zote tatu. Tunatambulisha KamboNER: zana nyepesi nyepesi, amri ndogo kuliko hali ya mabadiliko ya sanaa. Ni kwa msingi wa maendeleo ya awali yanayofunzwa na ujenzi wa mtandao wa neura unaoendelea. ComboNER inatumia taarifa za lugha ya Kipolish. Mfano huu una matokeo ya wimbo wa POS, kutegemea wimbo wa kutegemea na UKIMWI. Gazeti letu lina baadhi ya maoni kutoka kwenye maelezo mazuri ya mifano na inaripoti matokeo yake ya jumla.', 'tr': "Häzirki tebigy dil işlemleri dogrudylygy ýokarmak üçin üns berýär. Öňki ýetişik uly kynçylyk nusgalaryň kän bir mysal bar. Ýüzlerçe milyon ýa hatda milliardlaryň parameterleri bar. Ýöne, basit sentaktik zadalar (POS) taglamak, bağlylik parslamak ýa adly bir zat tanamak (NER) ýaly iň uly nusgalary kabul etmek üçin iň uly nusgalary gerek däl. Bu çapda üç işi birleştiren nusganyň ululykyny azaltmak üçin synanyşýarys. Biz ComboNER'i tanyşdyrýarys: ýuwaşlyk araç, sanat transformatörlerinden kiçi görkezilýän araçlar. Bu ýer öňünden eğlenen alt sözler içine daýanýar we ýene-täzelikli näyral şebeke arhitektegine daýanýar. ComboNER Polonça dil maglumatynda işleýär. POS tägleri, baglançylyk ayırmak we NER üçin nusgalar bar. Biziň kagyzymyz nusgasyny düzeltmekden biraz düşünjeleri bar we ähli netijelerini bilýär.", 'ko': '현재의 자연 언어 처리는 주로 정확성을 높이는 데 집중되어 있다.이 진전은 수억, 심지어 수십억 개의 파라미터를 가진 초중형 모델을 대가로 한 것이다.그러나 단어 표기, 의존성 분석, 명명 실체 식별 (NER) 과 같은 간단한 문법 작업은 가장 큰 모델로 받아들일 수 있는 결과를 얻을 필요가 없다.이 가설에 따르면, 우리는 세 가지 임무를 공동으로 수행하는 모델의 크기를 최소화하려고 한다.우리는 가장 선진적인 변압기보다 몇 개의 수량급이 적은 경량급 도구를 소개할 것이다.그것은 미리 훈련된 하위 단어의 삽입과 귀속 신경 네트워크 구조를 바탕으로 한다.ComboNER는 폴란드어 데이터를 처리합니다.이 모델에는 단어 치수, 종속성 분석 및 NER 출력이 있습니다.우리의 논문은 모델에 대한 미세한 견해를 포함하고 전체적인 결과를 보고했다.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ የፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል ትክክለኛውን ማሳየት ነው፡፡ ግንኙነቱ ከመቶ ሚሊዮን ሚሊዮን ወይም ቢልዮን ሚሊዮን ሚሊዮን በሚያዙ ዋጋ ላይ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የንግግር ማሰናከል (POS) ማሰናከል፣ በመጠቀም ማዘጋጀት ወይም የተጠቃሚ አካባቢ ማውቀት (NER) ትልቁ ዓይነቶችን ለማግኘት አያስፈልጋቸውም፡፡ እንደዚህ ስርዓት በሙሉ ሦስቱን ስራ ሁሉ በመተካከል የሚያደርገውን ሞዴል መጠን አጎድልተን እንሞክራለን፡፡ We introduce ComboNER: a lightweight tool, orders of magnitude smaller than state-of-the-art transformers.  አስቀድሞ የተጠቃሚ የደብዳቤ ቃላት አቀማመጥ እና በቀጥሎ የደዌብ መረብ መሠረት የተገኘ ነው፡፡ ኮምቦNER በፖሊስ ቋንቋ ዳታ ላይ ይሠራል ሞዴል የPOS ማተሚያ፣ የመደገፊያ ማዘጋጀት እና የNER ማስታወቂያ ውጤቶች አላቸው። የፕሬዝዳንታችን የሞዴል ግንኙነት የሚያሳውቀው እና ፍሬዎቹን በሙሉ የሚያስታውቀው ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Proçesi i tanishëm natyror i gjuhës është përqëndruar fort në rritjen e saktësisë. Përparimi vjen me një kosto të modeleve super të rënda me qindra miliona apo madje miliarda parametra. Megjithatë, detyrat e thjeshta sintaktike të tilla si etiketa pjesë e fjalimit (POS), analiza e varësisë apo njohja e emëruar e njësisë (NER) nuk kërkojnë modelet më të mëdha për të arritur rezultate të pranueshme. Në përputhje me këtë supozim ne përpiqemi të minimizojmë madhësinë e modelit që kryen së bashku të tre detyrat. Ne prezantojmë ComboNER: një mjet i lehtë, urdhëra të madhësisë më të vogël se transformuesit më të lartë. Ajo bazohet në përfshirjet e paratrajnuara të nënfjalëve dhe arkitekturën e rrjetit neural të përsëritur. ComboNER funksionon në të dhënat e gjuhës polake. The model has outputs for POS tagging, dependency parsing and NER.  Gazeta jonë përmban disa kuptime nga rregullimi i modelit dhe raporton rezultatet e tij të përgjithshme.', 'bn': 'The current natural language processing is strongly focused on raising accuracy.  অগ্রগতি সুপার ভারী মডেলের মূল্যে এসেছে যার মূল্য শত কোটি কোটি কোটি কোটি প্যারামিটার আছে। তবে সাধারণ সিন্ট্যাকটিক কাজ যেমন ভাষণের অংশ (পোএস) ট্যাগিং, নির্ভরিত পার্সিং অথবা নামের বস্তুর স্বীকৃতি প্রদানের জন্য বৃহত্তম মডেলের প্রয়োজন নে এই ধারণার মাধ্যমে আমরা মোডেলের আকার কমানোর চেষ্টা করছি যা একত্রিত তিনটি কাজ করে। আমরা কম্বোনের পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি: হাল্কা টুল, শিল্প পরিবর্তনের চেয়ে কম নির্দেশ। এটি পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত সাবওয়ার্ড এমপ্রেডিং এবং পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামোর উপর ভিত্তিক। কম্বোনের পোলিশ ভাষার তথ্য পরিচালনা। এই মডেলটি পোস ট্যাগিং, নির্ভরিত পার্জিং এবং নিউ এর জন্য আউটপুট রয়েছে। আমাদের কাগজের মধ্যে মডেলের সুন্দর সংক্রান্ত কিছু দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি রয়েছে এবং এর সাধারণ ফলাফল রিপোর্ট করেছে।', 'af': "Die huidige natuurlike taal verwerking is sterk gefokus op die opstaan van presisiteit. Die vordering kom op 'n koste van super-swaar modele met honderd van miljoene of selfs miljoene van parameters. Maar eenvoudige sintaktieke opdragte soos deel-van-woord (POS) merking, afhanklikheid verwerking of genoem entiteiterkenning (NER) nie benodig die grootste modele om aanvaarbare resultate te bereik nie. In lyn met hierdie aanvaar probeer ons om die grootte van die model te minimiseer wat saamstig al drie taak uitvoer. Ons introduiseer ComboNER:  'n liggewig gereedskap, bevele van magnitude kleiner as staat van die kunste transformeerders. Dit is gebaseer op voorafgeleerde subwoord inbêring en herhaalde neuralnetwerk arkitektuur. Name Die model het uitvoerdes vir POS merking, afhanklikheid verwerking en NER. Ons papier bevat sommige inligtings van fyn-tuning van die model en rapporteer sy heeltemal resultate.", 'bs': 'Trenutno prirodno obrađivanje jezika je usredotočeno na povećanje tačnosti. Napredak dolazi po cijenu super teških modela sa stotinama milijuna ili čak milijardi parametara. Međutim, jednostavni sintaktički zadatak poput označavanja dijela govora (POS), analize zavisnosti ili priznanja imena entiteta (NER) ne zahtijevaju najvećih modela za postizanje prihvatljivih rezultata. U skladu s ovim pretpostavkom pokušavamo smanjiti veličinu modela koji zajedno obavlja sve tri zadatke. Predstavljamo ComboNER: lak alat, naređenje veličine manje od stanja umjetničkih transformatora. On je zasnovan na predobučenoj podriječji integraciji i rekonstruiranoj arhitekturi neuralne mreže. ComboNER radi na poljskim podacima jezika. Model ima rezultate za označavanje POS-a, analizu ovisnosti i NER-a. Naš novinar sadrži neke uvide iz dobre prilagodbe modela i prijavljuje njegove ukupne rezultate.', 'az': "Hazırkı təbiətli dil işləməsi doğruluğu artırmağa çox möhkəm odaqlanır. Bu tədbir yüzlərlə milyonlarla və hətta milyonlarla parametru olan süper a ğır modellərin maliyyəti ilə gəlir. Lakin, sözlərin bir parças ı (POS) etiketi, bağımlılıq ayırılması və adlı təşkil tanımlaması kimi basit sintaktik işləri qəbul edilən nəticələrin ən böyük modellərinə ehtiyacı yoxdur. Bu iddia ilə birlikdə bütün üç işləri işlədən modelin böyüklüyünü azaltmağa çalışırıq. Biz ComboNER'i tanıdırırıq: yüngül bir araç, sanat transformatörlərindən daha kiçik böyüklük əmri. Bu, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş süb sözlərin içərisində və yenidən nöral ağ arhitektarına dayanılır. ComboNER Polonyalı dil verilənlərində işləyir. Modelin POS etiketləri, bağlılıq ayırması və NER üçün çıxışları var. Bizim kağızımız modelinin düzəltməsindən bir neçə nəzəriyyəti var və bütün sonuçlarını bildirir.", 'et': 'Praegune looduskeele töötlemine on tugevalt keskendunud täpsuse suurendamisele. Edusammud tulenevad väga rasketest mudelitest, millel on sadu miljoneid või isegi miljardeid parameetreid. Kuid lihtsad süntaktilised ülesanded, nagu kõneosa (POS) sildistamine, sõltuvuse parsimine või nimetatud olemi tuvastamine (NER), ei nõua vastuvõetavate tulemuste saavutamiseks suurimaid mudeleid. Kooskõlas selle eeldusega püüame minimeerida mudeli suurust, mis ühiselt täidab kõiki kolme ülesannet. Tutvustame ComboNERi: kerge tööriista, mille suurusjärgud on väiksemad kui kaasaegsed trafod. See põhineb eelnevalt koolitatud alamsõna manustamisel ja korduval närvivõrgu arhitektuuril. ComboNER tegutseb poola keele andmetel. Mudelil on väljundid POS sildistamiseks, sõltuvuse parsimiseks ja NER. Meie töö sisaldab mõningaid ülevaateid mudeli täpsustamisest ja esitab selle üldised tulemused.', 'hy': 'Այսօրվա բնական լեզվի վերլուծումը ուժեղ կենտրոնացված է ճշգրտության բարձրացման վրա: Այս զարգացումը գնում է գերծանր մոդելների հետ, որոնք ունեն հարյուրավոր միլիոնավոր կամ նույնիսկ միլիարդավոր պարամետրեր: Այնուամենայնիվ, պարզ սինտակտիկ խնդիրները, ինչպիսիք են խոսքի մասի (POS) նշանները, կախվածության վերլուծությունը կամ անվանելի անհատականության ճանաչելը (NOR), չեն պահանջում ամենամեծ մոդելները ընդունակ արդյունքների հասնելու համար: Այս ենթադրության հետ համաձայն մենք փորձում ենք նվազեցնել մոդելի չափը, որը միասին կատարում է բոլոր երեք խնդիրները: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք «Կոբոնիր»-ը՝ թեթև գործիք, մեծության կարգավորումներ, որոնք ավելի փոքր են, քան ամենաբարձր վերափոխողները: Այն հիմնված է նախապատրաստված ենթաբառերի ներգրավման և կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետության վրա: Comment Մոդելը ունի POS-ի նշանների, կախվածության վերլուծության և NOR-ի արդյունքներ: Our paper contains some insights from fine-tuning of the model and reports its overall results.', 'cs': 'Současné zpracování přirozeného jazyka je silně zaměřeno na zvýšení přesnosti. Pokrok přichází na cenu supertěžkých modelů se stovkami milionů nebo dokonce miliardami parametrů. Jednoduché syntaktické úkoly, jako je tagování části řeči (POS), analýza závislostí nebo rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (NER), však k dosažení přijatelných výsledků nevyžadují největší modely. V souladu s tímto předpokladem se snažíme minimalizovat velikost modelu, který společně plní všechny tři úkoly. Představujeme ComboNER: lehký nástroj o řády menší než moderní transformátory. Je založena na předem trénovaných vloženích podslov a recidivující architektuře neuronové sítě. Společnost ComboNER pracuje na údajích v polském jazyce. Model má výstupy pro POS tagování, analýzu závislostí a NER. Náš článek obsahuje některé poznatky z jemného ladění modelu a uvádí jeho celkové výsledky.', 'ca': "El procés natural actual de llenguatges està centrat en augmentar la precisió. El progrés arriba a un cost de models super pesats amb centenars de milions o fins i tot bilions de paràmetres. Tanmateix, tasques sinàctiques simples com etiquetar part-of-speech (POS), analitzar dependencies o reconèixer entitats anomenades (NER) no requereixen els models més grans per aconseguir resultats acceptables. De acord amb aquesta suposició intentem minimitzar la mida del model que fa conjuntament totes les tres tasques. Introduïm ComboNER: una eina lliure, ordres de magnitud més petits que els transformadors d'última generació. Està basat en incorporacions de subparaules i arquitectura recurrent de xarxa neuronal. ComboNER funciona amb dades de llenguatge polac. The model has outputs for POS tagging, dependency parsing and NER.  El nostre article conté algunes idees de la perfeccionació del model i relata els seus resultats generals.", 'fi': 'Nykyinen luonnonkielen käsittely keskittyy vahvasti tarkkuuden parantamiseen. Edistyminen johtuu superraskaista malleista, joissa on satoja miljoonia tai jopa miljardeja parametreja. Yksinkertaiset syntaktiset tehtävät, kuten POS-tagging, riippuvuuksien jäsentäminen tai nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistus (NER), eivät kuitenkaan edellytä suurimpia malleja hyväksyttävien tulosten saavuttamiseksi. Tämän olettamuksen mukaisesti pyrimme minimoimaan mallin koon, joka yhdessä suorittaa kaikki kolme tehtävää. Esittelemme ComboNERin: kevyen työkalun, jonka suuruusluokka on pienempi kuin uusimmat muuntajat. Se perustuu ennalta koulutettuihin alasanojen upotuksiin ja toistuvaan neuroverkkoarkkitehtuuriin. ComboNER käyttää puolan kielen tietoja. Mallissa on lähtökohtia POS-tagaukseen, riippuvuuden parsaukseen ja NER:ään. Paperimme sisältää joitakin oivalluksia mallin hienosäätöstä ja raportoi sen kokonaistuloksista.', 'jv': 'Perintah perusahaan anyar Ngubah barêng-barêng saiki ditambah akeh spis-butur model sing karo atusan akeh milion antar uwong milion ro dadi parameters politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ngawe nambah karo hal-hal iki dadi ono wektu nggawe ngerti dadi tindang model sing bakal terus ono wektu nggawe string" in "context_BAR_stringLink FindOK Name Samsul Awak dhéwé nganggo pertualangan kanggo nggawe barang-barang alih dumateng modèl lan nganggo barang nggawe barang.', 'ha': "Cikakken harshen da ake kai yanzu yanzu ana zura maki a sami tsarin. Bayani na zo da kyauta masu nau'i mai nau'a da millions ɗari ko kuma don billioni na fassarar. A lokacin da, aikin taki masu sauƙi kamar shirin rabon magana (PoS), parse da inganci ko sunan shaidar abun ba ya ƙayyade misãlai mafi girma dõmin su sami matsalan da ake yarda. @ action: button Munã ƙara wa ComboNER: wata zane mai sauƙi, yana da umurni mai girma mafi ƙaranci daga state-of-the-art transformers. Wannan yana a kan da aka riga wa kwanan da aka sanar da abõkan maganar da kuma an sake baka layin tsarin jerin neural. KCharselect unicode block name @ info: whatsthis Gansa da Muke ƙunsa da wasu gannai daga mai kyau wa misalin kuma yana bãyar da lãbãran fassararsa.", 'sk': 'Trenutna obdelava naravnega jezika je močno osredotočena na dvig natančnosti. Napredek prihaja s ceno super težkih modelov s stotinami milijoni ali celo milijardami parametrov. Vendar pa preprosta sintaktična opravila, kot so označevanje del govora (POS), razčlenitev odvisnosti ali prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet (NER), ne zahtevajo največjih modelov za doseganje sprejemljivih rezultatov. V skladu s to predpostavko skušamo zmanjšati velikost modela, ki skupaj opravlja vse tri naloge. Predstavljamo ComboNER: lahko orodje, katerega velikost je manjša od najsodobnejših transformatorjev. Temelji na vnaprej usposobljenih vdelavah podbesed in ponavljajoči se arhitekturi nevronskega omrežja. ComboNER deluje na podlagi podatkov o poljskem jeziku. Model ima izhode za označevanje POS, razčlenitev odvisnosti in NER. Naš prispevek vsebuje nekaj vpogledov iz finega nastavitve modela in poroča o njegovih splošnih rezultatih.', 'he': 'העבודה הטבעית הנוכחית של השפה מתמקדת בכוחות על העלות מדויקת. התקדמות מגיעה במחיר של דוגמנים כבדים ביותר עם מאות מיליונים או אפילו מיליארדי פרמטרים. עם זאת, משימות סינטאקטיות פשוטות כמו תג חלק מהנאום (POS), מחקר תלויות או זיהוי ישות בשם (NER) לא דורשות את הדוגמנים הגדולים ביותר כדי להשיג תוצאות קבלות. בתור ההנחה הזו אנחנו מנסים להפחית את גודל המודל שמבצע ביחד את שלושת המשימות. אנחנו מכירים את קומבונר: כלי קל, פקודות בגודל קטנים יותר ממעברים מצוינים. היא מבוססת על תוכניות מתחת מילים מאומנות מראש וארכיטקטורת רשת עצבית חוזרת. ComboNER פועל על נתוני שפה פולנית. למודל יש תוצאות לתג POS, בדיקת תלויות ו NER. Our paper contains some insights from fine-tuning of the model and reports its overall results.', 'bo': 'ད་ལྟོའི་རང་བཞིན་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་ནི་ངེས་པར་བདེ་སྦྱོར་མཐོང་བ་ཡིན། The progress comes at a cost of super-heavy models with hundreds of millions or even billions of parameters. ཡིན་ནའང་མིན་པར། འཕགས་རིས་སྦྱོར་བྱ་བ་དག་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་ཀྱི་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་མིག་དཔེ་ཆུང་འདི་ལ་ཆུང་བའི་ཚད་གཞི་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་མེད། ང་ཚོས་ComboNER(ComboNER)ལ་ངོ་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་ལག་ཆ་ཞིག་དང་། འདི་ནི་སྔོན་གྱིས་འཛུགས་ཡོད་པའི་ཡུལ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་དང་ཡང་བསྐྱར་དུ་སླར་སྒྲིག་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། ComboNER ཡིས་པོ་སྐད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་ལག་སྟར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གཟུགས་རིས་འདིས་POS ཤོག་བྱང་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ན། རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མིན་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ནུས་མེད ང་ཚོའི་ཤོག་བུ་དེ་ལ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བ་ལས་ལྟ་བུའི་གནད་དོན་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Investigating Annotator Bias in Abusive Language Datasets', 'ar': 'التحقيق في تحيز التعليق التوضيحي في مجموعات بيانات اللغة المسيئة', 'fr': 'Enquête sur le biais des annotateurs dans les ensembles de données linguistiques abusifs', 'pt': 'Investigando o viés do anotador em conjuntos de dados de linguagem abusiva', 'es': 'Investigación del sesgo de anotadores en conjuntos de datos de lenguaje abusivo', 'ja': '非正規言語データセットにおける注釈者の偏見の調査', 'hi': 'अपमानजनक भाषा डेटासेट में एनोटेटर पूर्वाग्रह की जांच करना', 'zh': '勘滥用语数集注器偏差', 'ru': 'Исследование систематической ошибки аннотатора в наборах данных о жестоком языке', 'ga': 'Ag Iniúchadh Laofachta Anótálaí i dtacair Sonraí Teanga Mhí-úsáide', 'el': 'Διερεύνηση προκατάληψης σχολιαστών σε καταχρηστικά σύνολα δεδομένων γλώσσας', 'hu': 'Annotator Bias vizsgálata a visszaélő nyelvi adatkészletekben', 'ka': 'აბუციური ენის მონაცემების ინტექტიგურაცია', 'it': 'Indagine sui bias degli annotatori nei dataset linguistici abusivi', 'kk': 'Тілдер деректер қорларында жаңалықтаушы Bias- ды зерттеу', 'lt': 'Analizuojant anotatorių trūkumus piktnaudžiaujančių kalbų duomenų rinkiniuose', 'ml': 'അബുസിവ് ഭാഷ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d അന്വേഷണര്\u200d ബിയാസുകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн хэл өгөгдлийн мэдээлэл дээр анзаарагчийн Биасын судалгаа', 'ms': 'Investigating Annotator Bias in Abusive Language Datasets', 'mk': 'Истражување на непријатности на анотаторите во базите на податоци за злоупотребни јазици', 'pl': 'Badanie uprzedzeń Annotatorów w zbiorach danych języka nadużywającego', 'sr': 'Istraživanje Annotatora Bias u podacima o abuzivnim jezicima', 'mt': 'L-Investigazzjoni tal-Bias tal-Annotatur f’Settijiet ta’ Dejta tal-Lingwi Abużivi', 'ro': 'Investigarea erorilor adnotatorilor în seturile de date lingvistice abuzive', 'sv': 'Undersökning av kommentatorBias i missbrukande språkdataset', 'so': 'Baaritaanka ka baaraandegista Bias', 'si': 'අබුසිව භාෂා දත්ත සැකසුම් වලින් ඇන්ටෝටර් බියාස් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න', 'ta': 'மொழி தரவுத்தளங்களில் பியாவை ஆய்வு செய்கிறது', 'ur': 'انڈیس زبان ڈاٹیسٹ میں انٹیٹور بیس کی تحقیق کی جاتی ہے', 'no': 'Investigasjon av annotator Bias i Abusive Language Data', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thanh tra chú thích Bis trong hồ sơ ngôn ngữ lạm dụng', 'bg': 'Изследване на анотаторните наклонности в наборите от данни за злоупотреби с езика', 'da': 'Undersøgelse af annontator Bias i misbrugssprogdatasæt', 'nl': 'Annotator Bias onderzoeken in misbruikende taaldatasets', 'de': 'Untersuchung von Annotator Bias in missbräuchlichen Sprachdatensätzen', 'id': 'Menyelidiki Bias Annotator dalam Dataset Bahasa Abusif', 'ko': '언어 데이터 남용 집중의 주석자 편견 조사', 'sw': 'Kuchunguza Annotator Bias katika seti za data za lugha za Abusive', 'hr': 'Istraživanje Annotatora Bias u abusivnim jezičkim podacima', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Hetimi i dëmtimeve të anotatorëve në bazat e të dhënave të gjuhës abuzive', 'am': 'Language Datasets', 'hy': 'Հետազոտությունը նշումների խախտումների մասին չարաշահումների լեզվի տվյալների համակարգերում', 'tr': 'Abusive Dil Maglumaty Taryhçysy Bias', 'fa': 'تحقیقات نویسندگان بیس در داده\u200cهای زبان مزخرف', 'az': "Abusive dil veril톛nl톛rind톛 Annotator Bias'u S톛fl톛t", 'bn': 'অ্যাবুসিভ ভ ভাষা ডাটাসেটে অ্যানোটেটর বিয়াস অনুসন্ধান করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': "Investigar els inconvenients de l'anotació en conjunts de dades de llengües abusives", 'cs': 'Vyšetřování předpokladů anotátorů v datových sadách zneužívajících jazyk', 'bs': 'Istraživanje Annotatora Bias u abusivnim jezičkim podacima', 'fi': 'Anotatorin harhaluulojen tutkiminen väärinkäytöstiedoissa', 'et': 'Anotatori kallakute uurimine kuritarvitavate keeleandmete kogumites', 'jv': 'Gosoko Kemerdekaan Bias nang Dahaset Abusuf Language', 'he': 'חוקר סבלנות נוטוטורים במערכות נתונים שפות מתעללות', 'sk': 'Raziskovanje opotatorskih pristranskosti v zbirkah podatkov zlorabljajočih jezikovnih podatkov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'བསམ་བཤེར་བྱེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གནས་སྟངས་ནང་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་Bias'}
{'en': 'Nowadays, social media platforms use classification models to cope with hate speech and abusive language. The problem of these models is their vulnerability to bias. A prevalent form of bias in hate speech and abusive language datasets is annotator bias caused by the annotator’s subjective perception and the complexity of the annotation task. In our paper, we develop a set of methods to measure annotator bias in abusive language datasets and to identify different perspectives on abusive language. We apply these methods to four different abusive language datasets. Our proposed approach supports annotation processes of such datasets and future research addressing different perspectives on the perception of abusive language.', 'fr': "Aujourd'hui, les plateformes de réseaux sociaux utilisent des modèles de classification pour faire face aux discours haineux et aux propos injurieux. Le problème de ces modèles est leur vulnérabilité aux biais. Une forme courante de biais dans les discours haineux et les ensembles de données linguistiques abusifs est le biais d'annotation causé par la perception subjective de l'annotateur et la complexité de la tâche d'annotation. Dans notre article, nous développons un ensemble de méthodes pour mesurer le biais des annotateurs dans les ensembles de données linguistiques abusifs et pour identifier différents points de vue sur le langage abusif. Nous appliquons ces méthodes à quatre ensembles de données linguistiques abusifs différents. L'approche que nous proposons prend en charge les processus d'annotation de tels ensembles de données et les recherches futures abordant différents points de vue sur la perception du langage abusif.", 'pt': 'Atualmente, as plataformas de mídia social usam modelos de classificação para lidar com o discurso de ódio e linguagem abusiva. O problema desses modelos é sua vulnerabilidade ao viés. Uma forma predominante de viés em conjuntos de dados de discurso de ódio e linguagem abusiva é o viés do anotador causado pela percepção subjetiva do anotador e pela complexidade da tarefa de anotação. Em nosso artigo, desenvolvemos um conjunto de métodos para medir o viés do anotador em conjuntos de dados de linguagem abusiva e identificar diferentes perspectivas sobre linguagem abusiva. Aplicamos esses métodos a quatro conjuntos de dados de linguagem abusiva diferentes. Nossa abordagem proposta suporta processos de anotação de tais conjuntos de dados e pesquisas futuras abordando diferentes perspectivas sobre a percepção de linguagem abusiva.', 'ja': '現在、ソーシャルメディアプラットフォームは、ヘイトスピーチや罵倒的な言葉に対応するために分類モデルを使用しています。これらのモデルの問題は、バイアスに対する脆弱性である。ヘイトスピーチおよび乱用言語データセットにおける一般的なバイアスの形態は、アノテーターの主観的な知覚とアノテーションタスクの複雑さによって引き起こされるアノテーターバイアスである。私たちの論文では、虐待的言語データセットにおける注釈者の偏見を測定し、虐待的言語に関するさまざまな視点を特定するための一連の方法を開発しています。これらの方法は、4つの異なる乱用言語データセットに適用されます。私たちの提案されたアプローチは、このようなデータセットの注釈プロセスと、虐待的言語の認識に関するさまざまな視点に対処する将来の研究をサポートします。', 'zh': '今社交媒体平台以类应仇詈。 此其所以偏见也。 仇言骂性语言数集普遍存在偏见者,注者主知注复杂性注器偏差也。 于我论文,开一法以测骂詈性语言数集之注者偏见,并定对诟骂性语言之异论。 用此法于四者,妄用语数集。 臣等所建方法,赞此数集,与未来研究,以决骂詈性语感知之异。', 'es': 'Hoy en día, las plataformas de redes sociales utilizan modelos de clasificación para hacer frente al discurso de odio y al lenguaje abusivo. El problema de estos modelos es su vulnerabilidad al sesgo. Una forma predominante de sesgo en los conjuntos de datos de discurso de odio y lenguaje abusivo es el sesgo del anotador causado por la percepción subjetiva del anotador y la complejidad de la tarea de anotación. En nuestro artículo, desarrollamos un conjunto de métodos para medir el sesgo de los anotadores en conjuntos de datos de lenguaje abusivo e identificar diferentes perspectivas sobre el lenguaje abusivo. Aplicamos estos métodos a cuatro conjuntos de datos de lenguaje abusivo diferentes. Nuestro enfoque propuesto apoya los procesos de anotación de dichos conjuntos de datos y la investigación futura que abordan diferentes perspectivas sobre la percepción del lenguaje abusivo.', 'ar': 'في الوقت الحاضر ، تستخدم منصات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي نماذج التصنيف للتعامل مع خطاب الكراهية واللغة المسيئة. مشكلة هذه النماذج هي قابليتها للتأثر بالانحياز. إن الشكل السائد للتحيز في خطاب الكراهية ومجموعات بيانات اللغة المسيئة هو تحيز الشرح الناجم عن الإدراك الذاتي للمضيف وتعقيد مهمة التعليق التوضيحي. في ورقتنا البحثية ، قمنا بتطوير مجموعة من الأساليب لقياس تحيز التعليقات التوضيحية في مجموعات بيانات اللغة المسيئة ولتحديد وجهات نظر مختلفة حول اللغة المسيئة. نحن نطبق هذه الأساليب على أربع مجموعات مختلفة من البيانات اللغوية المسيئة. يدعم نهجنا المقترح عمليات التعليقات التوضيحية لمجموعات البيانات هذه والأبحاث المستقبلية التي تتناول وجهات نظر مختلفة حول إدراك اللغة المسيئة.', 'hi': 'आजकल, सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफॉर्म हेट स्पीच और अपमानजनक भाषा से निपटने के लिए वर्गीकरण मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं। इन मॉडलों की समस्या पूर्वाग्रह के लिए उनकी भेद्यता है। हेट स्पीच और अपमानजनक भाषा डेटासेट में पूर्वाग्रह का एक प्रचलित रूप एनोटेटर की व्यक्तिपरक धारणा और एनोटेशन कार्य की जटिलता के कारण एनोटेटर पूर्वाग्रह है। हमारे पेपर में, हम अपमानजनक भाषा डेटासेट में एनोटेटर पूर्वाग्रह को मापने और अपमानजनक भाषा पर विभिन्न दृष्टिकोणों की पहचान करने के लिए तरीकों का एक सेट विकसित करते हैं। हम इन विधियों को चार अलग-अलग अपमानजनक भाषा डेटासेट पर लागू करते हैं। हमारा प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण ऐसे डेटासेट की एनोटेशन प्रक्रियाओं और भविष्य के शोध का समर्थन करता है जो अपमानजनक भाषा की धारणा पर विभिन्न दृष्टिकोणों को संबोधित करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Sa lá atá inniu ann, úsáideann ardáin na meán sóisialta samhlacha aicmithe chun dul i ngleic le fuathchaint agus teanga maslach. Is í an fhadhb atá leis na samhlacha seo ná a leochaileacht do chlaonadh. Foirm choitianta de chlaonadh i dtaca le tacair sonraí ó fhuathchaint agus ó theanga maslach ná laofacht anótálaí de bharr dearcadh suibiachtúil an anótaire agus castacht thasc anótála. Inár bpáipéar, forbraímid sraith modhanna chun laofacht anótálaí i dtacar sonraí teanga maslacha a thomhas agus chun dearcthaí éagsúla ar theanga maslach a aithint. Cuirimid na modhanna seo i bhfeidhm ar cheithre thacar sonraí teanga maslacha. Tacaíonn ár gcur chuige atá beartaithe le próisis nótaí tacair shonraí den sórt sin agus le taighde amach anseo a thugann aghaidh ar dhearcthaí éagsúla ar an mbraistint ar theanga maslach.', 'ru': 'В настоящее время платформы социальных сетей используют классификационные модели для борьбы с ненавистническими высказываниями и оскорбительными высказываниями. Проблема этих моделей заключается в их уязвимости к предвзятости. Преобладающей формой предвзятости в ненавистнических высказываниях и наборах данных оскорбительного языка является предвзятость аннотатора, вызванная субъективным восприятием аннотатора и сложностью задачи аннотации. В нашей работе мы разрабатываем набор методов для измерения смещения аннотатора в наборах данных оскорбительного языка и для выявления различных точек зрения на оскорбительный язык. Мы применяем эти методы к четырем различным наборам данных оскорбительного языка. Наш предлагаемый подход поддерживает процессы аннотирования таких наборов данных и будущие исследования, касающиеся различных точек зрения на восприятие оскорбительного языка.', 'hu': 'Manapság a közösségi média platformok osztályozási modelleket használnak a gyűlöletbeszéd és a visszaélő nyelv megbirkózására. Ezeknek a modelleknek a problémája az elfogultsággal szembeni sérülékenységük. A gyűlöletbeszéd és a visszaélő nyelvi adatkészletek elterjedt formája a kommentátor elfogultsága, amelyet a kommentátor szubjektív érzékelése és a jegyzetelési feladat összetettsége okoz. Tanulmányunkban olyan módszereket dolgozunk ki, amelyek segítségével mérhetők a visszaélő nyelvi adatkészletek kommentátorok elfogultságai és a visszaélő nyelvek különböző perspektívái. Ezeket a módszereket négy különböző visszaélő nyelvi adatkészletre alkalmazzuk. Javasolt megközelítésünk támogatja az ilyen adatkészletek jegyzetelési folyamatait és a jövőbeli kutatásokat, amelyek különböző perspektívákkal foglalkoznak a visszaélő nyelv érzékelésével kapcsolatban.', 'it': "Al giorno d'oggi, le piattaforme di social media utilizzano modelli di classificazione per far fronte al discorso d'odio e al linguaggio offensivo. Il problema di questi modelli è la loro vulnerabilità ai pregiudizi. Una forma prevalente di bias nel linguaggio offensivo e nei discorsi di odio è la bias degli annotatori causata dalla percezione soggettiva dell'annotatore e dalla complessità del compito di annotazione. Nel nostro articolo, sviluppiamo una serie di metodi per misurare il bias degli annotatori nei dataset linguistici abusivi e per identificare diverse prospettive sul linguaggio abusivo. Applichiamo questi metodi a quattro diversi set di dati linguistici abusivi. Il nostro approccio proposto supporta i processi di annotazione di tali set di dati e ricerche future che affrontano diverse prospettive sulla percezione del linguaggio abusivo.", 'el': 'Σήμερα, οι πλατφόρμες κοινωνικής δικτύωσης χρησιμοποιούν μοντέλα ταξινόμησης για να αντιμετωπίσουν τη ρητορική μίσους και την καταχρηστική γλώσσα. Το πρόβλημα αυτών των μοντέλων είναι η ευπάθεια τους στην προκατάληψη. Μια διαδεδομένη μορφή προκατάληψης στα σύνολα δεδομένων μίσους και καταχρηστικών γλωσσών είναι η προκατάληψη σχολιαστών που προκαλείται από την υποκειμενική αντίληψη του σχολιαστή και την πολυπλοκότητα της εργασίας σχολιασμού. Στην εργασία μας, αναπτύσσουμε ένα σύνολο μεθόδων για τη μέτρηση της προκατάληψης σχολιαστών σε σύνολα δεδομένων καταχρηστικών γλωσσών και για τον προσδιορισμό διαφορετικών προοπτικών για την καταχρηστική γλώσσα. Εφαρμόζουμε αυτές τις μεθόδους σε τέσσερα διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων καταχρηστικής γλώσσας. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση υποστηρίζει διαδικασίες σχολιασμού τέτοιων συνόλων δεδομένων και μελλοντική έρευνα που αφορά διαφορετικές προοπτικές στην αντίληψη της καταχρηστικής γλώσσας.', 'kk': 'Қазір, социалдық медиа платформалары салыстыру үлгілерін жұмыс сөйлесу және жеңілікті тілдерге көмектесу үшін қолданылады. Бұл үлгілердің мәселесі - олардың тәуелсіздіктері. Көркіндік сөйлеу және қорқынышты тіл деректер жиындарының көбірек түрі - жаңалықтардың мақсатты түсініктемесі және жаңалықтардың көбірек түсініктемесі. Біз қағаздың бірнеше әдістерін өзгертеміз. Қате деректер қорларында жаңалықтарды өлшейту үшін жаңалықтарды өзгерту және жеңілдіру тілдерінің әртүрлі қарауларын анықтау Бұл әдістерді төрт әртүрлі тіл деректер қорларына қолданамыз. Біздің ұсынысымыз бұл деректер қорларының жазбаларын және болашақ зерттеулерін қолдайды. Бұл тілді қауіпсіздік тілдерді қарау үшін әртүрлі қарауларының қара', 'mk': 'Денес, платформите за социјални медиуми користат класификациски модели за да се справат со говорот на омраза и злоупотребата на јазикот. Проблемот на овие модели е нивната ранливост кон пристрасност. Постојаната форма на предрасуди во говорот на омраза и злоупотребни јазични податоци е предрасуда на анотаторот предизвикана од субјективната перцепција на анотаторот и комплексноста на задачата на анотацијата. Во нашиот весник, развиваме сет методи за мерење на навредата на анотаторот во злоупотребни јазички податоци и идентификување на различни перспективи за злоупотребен јазик. Ги применуваме овие методи на четири различни набори на податоци за злоупотреба на јазиците. Our proposed approach supports annotation processes of such datasets and future research addressing different perspectives on the perception of abusive language.', 'lt': 'Šiandien socialinės žiniasklaidos platformos naudoja klasifikavimo modelius neapykantos kalboms ir piktnaudžiavimui. Šių modelių problema yra jų pažeidžiamumas šališkumui. Dažniausias neapykantos kalbos ir piktnaudžiavimo kalbomis duomenų rinkinių biasas yra anotatoriaus biasas, kurį sukelia objektyvus anotatoriaus suvokimas ir anotacijos užduoties sudėtingumas. Mūsų dokumente parengiame metodų rinkinį, skirtą įvertinti anotatorių nuokrypius piktnaudžiavimo kalbomis duomenų rinkiniuose ir nustatyti skirtingas piktnaudžiavimo kalba perspektyvas. Taikome šiuos metodus keturiems skirtingiems piktnaudžiavimo kalbomis duomenų rinkiniams. Mūsų siūlomas požiūris remia tokių duomenų rinkinių anotacijos procesus ir būsimus mokslinius tyrimus, kuriuose nagrinėjamos skirtingos piktnaudžiavimo kalba suvokimo perspektyvos.', 'ka': 'ახლა სოციალური მედია პლატატურები კლასიფიკაციის მოდელების გამოყენება, რომელიც მპატიური სიტყვების და ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან საუბრო ენაზე გა ამ მოდელების პრობლემა არის ისინი ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან. მარტივი სიტყვების და ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან წინაწერების მონაცემების ფორმა იყო მონაცემები, რომელიც მონაცემების სუბექტიური მონაცემების და მონაცემების დარწ ჩვენი დოკუნეში, ჩვენ განვითარებთ სხვა მეტოვები, რომელიც ამოტორორების წარმოდგენებას ძალიან ძალიან ენაზის მონაცემების შესახებ და განვითარება განსხვავებას გან ჩვენ ამ მეტოვების გამოყენება 4 განსხვავებული ენის მონაცემებისთვის. ჩვენი წარმოიდგინული პროცესი იყენებს ასეთი მონაცემების პროცესი და მომავალური პროცესი, რომელიც განსხვავებული პერსპუტექტის შესახებ ძალიან ძალია', 'mt': 'Illum il-ġurnata, il-pjattaformi tal-midja soċjali jużaw mudelli ta’ klassifikazzjoni biex ilaħħqu mad-diskors tal-mibegħda u l-lingwa abbużiva. Il-problema ta’ dawn il-mudelli hija l-vulnerabbiltà tagħhom għall-preġudizzju. Forma prevalenti ta’ preġudizzju fid-diskors tal-mibegħda u fis-settijiet tad-dejta abbużivi tal-lingwi hija preġudizzju għall-annotatur ikkawżat mill-perċezzjoni suġġettiva tal-annotatur u l-kumplessità tal-kompitu tal-annotazzjoni. Fid-dokument tagħna, a ħna niżviluppaw sett ta’ metodi biex tkejjel il-preġudizzju tal-annotaturi f’settijiet ta’ dejta abbużivi tal-lingwi u biex nidentifikaw perspettivi differenti dwar il-lingwa abbużiva. Aħna napplikaw dawn il-metodi għal erba’ settijiet differenti ta’ dejta abbużivi tal-lingwi. L-approċċ propost tagħna jappoġġja proċessi ta’ annotazzjoni ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta bħal dawn u riċerka futura li tindirizza perspettivi differenti dwar il-perċezzjoni ta’ lingwa abbużiva.', 'mn': 'Өнөөдөр нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчийн хэлбэрүүдийг үзэн ядах яриа, хүчирхийллийн хэл дээр зориулахын тулд хуваалцах загваруудыг ашигладаг. Эдгээр загваруудын асуудал бол тэдний өрөөсгөлд эмзэг байдал юм. Харамсалтай яриа, хүчирхийлэлтэй хэл өгөгдлийн сангуудын тухай ихэвчлэн өрөөсгөл хэлбэрийн хэлбэрүүдийн тухай илүү өрөөсгөл хэлбэрүүдийн тухай байдал нь хүчирхийлэгчийн сэтгэл зүйн ойлголт,  Бид цаасан дээр хүчирхийллийн хэлний өгөгдлийн санд хүчирхийллэг байдлыг хэмжих, хүчирхийллэг хэлний өөр үзэл бодлогыг тодорхойлох арга замыг бүрдүүлдэг. Бид эдгээр аргыг 4 өөр зөрчилдөг хэл өгөгдлийн санд ашиглаж байна. Бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн арга баримтууд ийм өгөгдлийн сангуудыг, ирээдүйн судалгааны үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааг дэмжиж байна.', 'ml': 'ഇന്ന് സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകള്\u200d വെറുപ്പുകളുടെ വാക്കും പീഡിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയുടെയും മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോ ഈ മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രശ്നമെന്താണെന്നാല്\u200d അവരുടെ പ്രശ്നം ബിയയുടെ കാര്യത്തിലാണ്. വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിലും അപകടത്തിലുള്ള ഭാഷ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും ഒരു മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയ രൂപത്തില്\u200d വെറുപ്പുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നം  ഞങ്ങളുടെ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു, അപരിഹാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d അളവ് വരുത്തുന്നതിനാ നാലു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലേക്ക് ഈ രീതികള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. Our proposed approach supports annotation processes of such datasets and future research addressing different perspectives on the perception of abusive language.', 'pl': 'Obecnie platformy mediów społecznościowych wykorzystują modele klasyfikacji, aby radzić sobie z mową nienawiści i obraźliwym językiem. Problemem tych modeli jest ich podatność na stronniczość. Rozpowszechnioną formą uprzedzeń w zbiorach danych dotyczących mowy nienawiści i obraźliwych języków jest uprzedzenie adnotatora spowodowane subiektywną percepcją adnotatora i złożonością zadania adnotacji. W naszym artykule opracowujemy zestaw metod mierzenia stronniczości adnotatorów w zbiorach danych językowych nadużywających oraz identyfikacji różnych perspektyw na język nadużywający. Stosujemy te metody do czterech różnych zbiorów danych dotyczących nadużyć języków. Proponowane przez nas podejście wspiera procesy adnotacji takich zbiorów danych oraz przyszłe badania dotyczące różnych perspektyw postrzegania języka nadużywającego.', 'ms': 'Hari ini, platform media sosial menggunakan model klasifikasi untuk menghadapi ucapan kebencian dan bahasa yang melampaui batas. Masalah model ini adalah kelemahan mereka terhadap bias. Bentuk bias bias dalam ucapan kebencian dan set data bahasa yang mengganggu adalah bias annotator disebabkan oleh percepsi subjektif annotator dan kompleksiti tugas annotasi. Dalam kertas kami, kami mengembangkan satu set kaedah untuk mengukur bias annotator dalam set data bahasa yang mengganggu dan untuk mengenalpasti perspektif yang berbeza tentang bahasa yang mengganggu. Kita gunakan kaedah ini untuk empat set data bahasa yang berbeza. Pendekatan kami yang diusulkan menyokong proses anotasi set data seperti ini dan kajian masa depan yang mengatasi perspektif yang berbeza mengenai perasaan bahasa yang melampaui batas.', 'ro': 'În prezent, platformele de social media folosesc modele de clasificare pentru a face față discursului la ură și limbajului abuziv. Problema acestor modele este vulnerabilitatea lor la părtinire. O formă predominantă de părtinire în discursul de ură și seturile de date despre limbajul abuziv este părtinirea adnotatorului cauzată de percepția subiectivă a adnotatorului și complexitatea sarcinii de adnotare. În lucrarea noastră, dezvoltăm un set de metode pentru a măsura părtinirea adnotatorilor în seturile de date lingvistice abuzive și pentru a identifica diferite perspective asupra limbajului abuziv. Aplicăm aceste metode la patru seturi de date diferite de limbi abuzive. Abordarea noastră propusă sprijină procesele de adnotare a acestor seturi de date și cercetările viitoare care abordează diferite perspective privind percepția limbajului abuziv.', 'so': 'Maanta, jardiinada shabakadda bulshada waxay isticmaalaan tusaalooyin fasax si ay u xambaaraan hadalka nacayb iyo luuqada isticmaalka. Dhibaatooyinka modelladan waa dhaqaalaha ay ku jiraan khiyaanada. Qofka ku qoran hadalka nebcaalka iyo macluumaadka afka la isticmaalayoba waa habaar ku saabsan aragtida waxyaabaha ku saabsan iyo dhibaatada shaqada ku saabsan. Qoraalkayaga waxaynu ku qornaa qaabab kala duduwan si aan u qiyaasno tababarida cadaawayaasha oo ku qoran kooxda macluumaadka isticmaalka iyo si aan u aqoonsanno aragtida kala duduwan oo ku qoran luuqada isticmaalka. Waxaynu u isticmaalaynaa afar koox oo luuqad oo kala duduwan oo isticmaalaya. Our proposed approach supports annotation processes of such datasets and future research addressing different perspectives on the perception of abusive language.', 'sv': 'Numera använder sociala medieplattformar klassificeringsmodeller för att hantera hatpropaganda och kränkande språk. Problemet med dessa modeller är deras sårbarhet för bias. En vanlig form av bias i hatpropaganda och kränkande språkdatauppsättningar är kommentatorbias orsakad av kommentatorns subjektiva uppfattning och komplexiteten i kommentatoruppgiften. I vår uppsats utvecklar vi en uppsättning metoder för att mäta kommentatorbias i missbrukande språkdataset och för att identifiera olika perspektiv på missbrukande språk. Vi tillämpar dessa metoder på fyra olika språkdataset. Vårt föreslagna tillvägagångssätt stöder kommenteringsprocesser för sådana datauppsättningar och framtida forskning som behandlar olika perspektiv på uppfattningen av missbruk av språk.', 'ta': 'இன்று, சமூக ஊடகம் தளங்கள் வகுப்பு மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி வெறுப்பு பேச்சு மற்றும் தீவிரமான மொழியை பொருத்து The problem of these models is their vulnerability to bias.  வெறுப்பு பேச்சிலும் மொழி தகவல் அமைப்பிலும் ஒரு முன்னோக்கு பிசியின் வடிவம் என்பது அறிவிப்பாளரின் சொற்ப பு பார்வையிலும் அறிவிப் எங்கள் காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு முறையான முறைகளை உருவாக்குகிறோம் மொழி தரவுத்தளங்களில் குறிப்பிட்ட பிரச்சனைகளை அளக்க மற் நாம் இந்த முறைகளை நான்கு வேறு வேறு மொழி தரவுத்தளங்களுக்கு பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். எங்கள் பரிந்துரைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட நெறிமுறை இந்த தரவுத்தளங்களின் அறிவிப்பு செயல்களை ஆதரிக்கிறது மற்றும் எதிர்கால ஆராய்ச', 'si': 'අදින්, සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරවේශනය විශේෂණ මොඩේල් භාවිත කරන්න විරෝධ කතාවක් සහ භාෂ මේ මොඩල් එකේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. වෛර කතාව සහ භාෂා දත්ත සැටීමේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණයක් තියෙනවා කියලා අනතුරු ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණය සහ අපේ පත්තරේ අපි විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, භාෂා දත්තසංග්\u200dරහයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා වගේම භාෂාවට අ අපි මේ විදියට වෙනස් භාෂාවක් දත්ත සෙට් හතරක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය සහ අනාගතයේ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා අනාගතයේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විවිධ ප්\u200dරශ්', 'no': 'I dag brukar sosiale mediaplattformar klassifikasjonsmodular for å kopla med hatespråk og abusive språk. Problemet på desse modelane er dei sårbarhetskapen til bias. Eit utbreidde form av forsiktighet i hatespråk og abusive språk-dataset er annotatorsforsiktighet forårsaket av annotatoren s in subjektiv oppfatning og kompleksiteten av notasjonsoppgåva. I papiret vårt utviklar vi eit sett metodar for å måle annotatorsforsikt i abusive språk- datasett og identifisere ulike perspektiv på abusive språk. Vi bruker desse metodane til fire ulike abusive språk- datasett. Vårt foreslått tilnærming støttar annotasjonsprosesser av slike dataset og framtidige forskning som adresserar ulike perspektiv på oppfatninga av abusive språk.', 'sr': 'Danas, socijalne medijske platforme koriste klasifikacijske modele kako bi se suočili sa govorom mržnje i jezikom zlostavljanja. Problem ovih modela je njihova ranjivost prema predrasudama. Preveliki oblik predrasude u govoru mržnje i nasilnim jezičkim podacima je annotatorska predrasude uzrokovana subjektivnim percepcijom annotatora i kompleksnosti zadataka annotacije. U našim novinama razvijamo set metoda za mjerenje annotatorskih pristrasnosti u nasilnim jezičkim setima podataka i identifikaciju različitih perspektiva o nasilnom jeziku. Primjenjujemo ove metode na četiri različite nasilne podatke jezika. Naš predloženi pristup podržava annotacijske procese takvih podataka i budućih istraživanja s obzirom na različite perspektive o percepciji nasilnog jezika.', 'ur': 'آج، سوسیل میڈیا پٹرومٹ فوٹرومٹ شرکت کی موڈل استعمال کرتا ہے کہ ناپسند بات اور ناپسند زبان کے ساتھ ملے۔ ان نمڈلوں کا مسئلہ یہ ہے کہ ان کی رغبت سے زیادتی ہے۔ ناپسندیدہ بات اور زبان ڈاٹ سٹ میں ایک بڑی غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غ ہمارے کاغذ میں، ہم ایک مجموعہ طریقوں کو تولید کرتے ہیں جو زبان ڈیٹسٹ میں نازل کرنے کے لئے نازل کرنے والی روشنی کرنے والے ہیں اور نازل زبان کے بارے میں مختلف طریقوں کو معلوم کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم ان طریقوں کو چار مختلف زبان ڈیٹ سٹ پر لازم کرتے ہیں۔ ہماری پیشنهاد کی طرح اس طرح کے ڈیٹ سٹوں اور مستقبل تحقیقات کے مطابق مختلف نظریوں کے بارے میں پڑھنے کی مدد کرتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Ngày nay, các nền truyền thông xã hội sử dụng các mô hình phân loại để đối phó với ngôn ngữ thù ghét và lạm dụng. Vấn đề của những mô hình này là sự dễ bị thiên vị của chúng. Một hình thức chủ yếu của khuynh hướng trong ngôn ngữ ghét và các tập tin ngôn ngữ lạm dụng là khuynh hướng ghi chú gây ra bởi nhận thức chủ quan của người chú giải và s ự phức tạp của nhiệm vụ ghi chú. Trong báo cáo của chúng tôi, chúng tôi phát triển một loạt phương pháp để đo lường khuynh hướng khách quan trong các nhà dữ liệu ngôn ngữ ngược đãi và xác định quan điểm khác nhau về ngôn ngữ lạm dụng. Chúng tôi áp dụng phương pháp này cho bốn bộ dữ liệu ngôn ngữ hung bạo. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi hỗ trợ các quy trình ghi chú về các bộ dữ liệu và nghiên cứu tương lai về triển vọng khác nhau về nhận thức của ngôn ngữ lạm dụng.', 'uz': "Bugun hozirda, jamiyat media platformlari klassifik modellaridan foydalanadi. Hat so'zni va taqdim tilni birlashtirish uchun. Bu modellarning muammolari bizga qo'llaniladi. Hat so'zlar va tadbirlik tili maʼlumotlar tarkibi birinchi tadbirkorlik turi - taʼminlovchi ma'lumotning ma'lumotlari va taʼminlovchi tashkilotning muhimi fikr va murakkablikligi sababchi. Qogʻozimizda, biz taʼminlovchi tillar maʼlumotlar tarkibini o'zgartirish uchun bir metodlarni o'rganamiz va o'zgaruvchi tillarda boshqa ko'rinishni aniqlash. Biz bu usullarni to'rt boshqa misfoydalanuvchi maʼlumotlar tarkibiga qoʻllamiz. Bu maʼlumotlar tarkibini aniqlash jarayonlarini qo'llaydi va kelajakdagi taʼminlovchilarni o'zgartirish boshqa fikrlarni o'zgartiradi.", 'hr': 'Danas se socijalni medijski platformi koriste klasifikacijske modele kako bi se suočili s govorom mržnje i jezikom zlostavljanja. Problem ovih modela je njihova ranjivost prema pristrasnosti. Prošireni oblik predrasude u govoru mržnje i nasilnim jezičkim podacima je annotatorska predrasude uzrokovana subjektivnim percepcijom annotatora i kompleksnosti zadataka annotacije. U našim novinama razvijamo skup metoda za mjerenje annotatorskih pristrasnosti u nasilnim jezičkim podacima i identificiranje različitih perspektiva o nasilnom jeziku. Primjenjujemo te metode na četiri različite podatke o zlostavljanju jezika. Naš predloženi pristup podržava procese annotacije takvih podataka i budućih istraživanja s obzirom na različite perspektive o percepciji nasilnog jezika.', 'bg': 'В днешно време социалните медии използват класификационни модели, за да се справят с речта на омразата и злоупотребата с езика. Проблемът на тези модели е тяхната уязвимост към пристрастия. Преобладаваща форма на пристрастие в речта на омразата и езиковите набори от данни за злоупотребата е пристрастието на анотатора, причинено от субективното възприятие на анотатора и сложността на задачата за анотация. В нашата статия разработваме набор от методи за измерване на анотаторните отклонения в наборите от данни за злоупотреби с езика и идентифициране на различни гледни точки за злоупотребата с езика. Ние прилагаме тези методи към четири различни езикови набора данни за злоупотреби. Предложеният ни подход подкрепя процесите на анотация на такива набори от данни и бъдещи изследвания, насочени към различни перспективи за възприемането на злоупотребяващия език.', 'nl': 'Tegenwoordig gebruiken social media platforms classificatiemodellen om te gaan met haatspraak en misbruik van taal. Het probleem van deze modellen is hun kwetsbaarheid voor vooroordelen. Een veelvoorkomende vorm van bias in haatspraak en misbruik van taal datasets is annotator bias veroorzaakt door de subjectieve perceptie van de annotator en de complexiteit van de annotatie taak. In onze paper ontwikkelen we een reeks methoden om annotator bias in datasets met misbruik van taal te meten en om verschillende perspectieven op misbruik van taal te identificeren. We passen deze methoden toe op vier verschillende datasets van misbruik. Onze voorgestelde aanpak ondersteunt annotatieprocessen van dergelijke datasets en toekomstig onderzoek naar verschillende perspectieven op de perceptie van misbruikende taal.', 'de': 'Heutzutage nutzen Social-Media-Plattformen Klassifizierungsmodelle, um mit Hassreden und missbräuchlicher Sprache umzugehen. Das Problem dieser Modelle ist ihre Anfälligkeit für Vorurteile. Eine vorherrschende Form von Bias in Hassrede und missbräuchlichen Sprachdatensätzen ist Annotator Bias verursacht durch die subjektive Wahrnehmung des Annotators und die Komplexität der Annotationsaufgabe. In unserem Beitrag entwickeln wir eine Reihe von Methoden, um Annotator Bias in missbräuchlichen Sprachdatensätzen zu messen und verschiedene Perspektiven auf missbräuchliche Sprache zu identifizieren. Wir wenden diese Methoden auf vier verschiedene missbräuchliche Sprachdatensätze an. Unser vorgeschlagener Ansatz unterstützt Annotationsprozesse solcher Datensätze und zukünftige Forschungen, die unterschiedliche Perspektiven auf die Wahrnehmung missbräuchlicher Sprache beleuchten.', 'ko': '오늘날 소셜미디어 플랫폼은 증오 발언과 욕설 언어를 분류모델로 다루고 있다.이 모델들의 문제는 편견이 생기기 쉽다는 데 있다.증오 언론과 욕설 언어 데이터가 보편적으로 존재하는 편견 형식은 주석자의 주관적인 감지와 주석 임무의 복잡성으로 인한 주석자의 편견이다.우리의 논문에서 우리는 남용 언어 데이터가 집중된 주석자의 편견을 측정하고 남용 언어에 대한 서로 다른 관점을 확정하는 방법을 개발했다.우리는 이 방법들을 네 가지 다른 욕설 언어 데이터 집합에 응용할 것이다.우리가 제시한 방법은 이러한 데이터 집합에 대한 주석 과정을 지원하고 미래에 서로 다른 각도에서 언어 남용에 대한 인지를 연구할 수 있도록 지원한다.', 'sw': 'Siku hizi, majukwaa ya mitandao ya kijamii yanatumia mifano ya kutangaza na lugha ya chuki na unyanyasaji. Tatizo la mifano hii ni hatari yao kwa upendeleo. aina iliyopita ya upendeleo katika hotuba ya chuki na seti za taarifa za lugha za unyanyasaji ni tatizo la upendeleo unaosababishwa na mtazamo wa msingi wa mtazamo na utata wa kazi hiyo ya kuchanganyikiwa. Katika karatasi yetu, tunatengeneza njia za kupima upendeleo wa kutisha katika seti za taarifa za lugha zinazotumiwa na kutambua mitazamo tofauti katika lugha ya unyanyasaji. Tunatumia njia hizi kwenye seti nne tofauti za matumizi ya lugha. Matokeo yetu ya pendekezo yanaunga mkono mchakato wa taarifa hizi na utafiti wa baadaye unaoelezea mitazamo tofauti kuhusu mtazamo wa lugha ya matumizi.', 'da': 'I dag bruger sociale medieplatforme klassifikationsmodeller til at håndtere hadefulde tale og misbrug af sprog. Problemet med disse modeller er deres sårbarhed over for bias. En udbredt form for bias i hadefulde tale og misbrugssprogdatasæt er annotatorbias forårsaget af kommentatorens subjektive opfattelse og kompleksiteten af annotationsopgaven. I vores artikel udvikler vi et sæt metoder til at måle kommentatorbias i krænkende sprogdatasæt og til at identificere forskellige perspektiver på krænkende sprog. Vi anvender disse metoder på fire forskellige misbrugssprogdatasæt. Vores foreslåede tilgang understøtter annoteringsprocesser af sådanne datasæt og fremtidig forskning, der omhandler forskellige perspektiver på opfattelsen af misbrug af sprog.', 'tr': 'Şu wagt, sosial mediýaly platformlar ýigrenýän sözleri we ýalňyşlyk dilleri bilen çykmak üçin klasifikasyon nusgalaryny ulanýarlar. Bu nusgalaryň kynçylyklarynyň ýetişdirişligidir. Ýalňyş s özlerinde we ýadaw dil datasetlerinde örän möhüm biçimler, ýazgyşçyň subjektivi düşünjegi we ýazgyşyň sarhoşlygyna sebep eden biçimler däldir. Kagyzymyzda, gürrüňizde, sözleri üçin nähili dillerde nähili sözleri ölçürmek üçin bir topar yöntem gelişýäris we gürrüňsiz diller barada farklı perspektivleri tanymak üçin. Biz bu döwletleri dört dürli hasaplanjak dillerine uygulaýarys Biziň teklip eden metodamyz ýaly veri setirleriniñ we gelejekde araştyrmalaryň farklı perspektiblerini iň ýüze çykyp bilmegi barada üns bermeklerimizi destekleýär.', 'sq': 'Sot, platformet e medias sociale përdorin modele klasifikimi për të përballur me fjalimin e urrejtjes dhe gjuhën abuzive. The problem of these models is their vulnerability to bias.  Një form ë e përhershme e paragjykimit në fjalimin e urrejtjes dhe të dhënat e gjuhës abuzive është paragjykimi i anotatorit i shkaktuar nga perceptimi subjektiv i anotatorit dhe kompleksiteti i detyrës s ë anotacionit. Në letrën tonë, ne zhvillojmë një sërë metodash për të matur paragjykimin e anotatorëve në sërat e dhënash të gjuhës abuzive dhe për të identifikuar perspektiva të ndryshme mbi gjuhën abuzive. Ne i aplikojmë këto metoda katër grupeve të dhënash të ndryshme gjuhësh abuzive. Përqasja jonë e propozuar mbështet proceset e anotacionit të të tillave të të dhënave dhe kërkimet e ardhshme që trajtojnë perspektiva të ndryshme mbi perceptimin e gjuhës abuzive.', 'af': "Vandag gebruik sosiale media platforme klassifikasie modele om te koppel met haat spraak en abusive taal. Die probleem van hierdie modele is hulle vulnerabiliteit tot bias. 'n Oorspronklike vorm van voorspoedige in haat spreek en abusive taal datastelle is annotatoerde voorspoedige wat veroorsaak word deur die annotator se subjektiewe aandag en die kompleksiteit van die annotasie taak. In ons papier, ontwikkel ons 'n stel metodes om annotatoerde bias in abusive taal datastelle te maak en om verskillende perspeksies op abusive taal te identifiseer. Ons wend hierdie metodes aan vier verskillende abusive taal datastel toe. Ons voorgestelde toegang ondersteun annotasie prosesse van sodanige datastelle en toekomstige ondersoek om verskillende perspeksies aan die aandag van abusive taal te raak.", 'id': 'Saat ini, platform media sosial menggunakan model klasifikasi untuk menghadapi pidato kebencian dan bahasa yang kasar. The problem of these models is their vulnerability to bias.  Bentuk bias yang prevalent dalam pidato kebencian dan dataset bahasa yang kasar adalah bias annotator disebabkan oleh persepsi subjektif annotator dan kompleksitas tugas annotasi. Dalam kertas kami, kami mengembangkan set metode untuk mengukur bias annotator dalam set data bahasa yang kasar dan untuk mengidentifikasi perspektif yang berbeda tentang bahasa yang kasar. Kami menerapkan metode ini untuk empat set data bahasa yang berbeda. pendekatan kami yang diusulkan mendukung proses anotasi dari set data dan penelitian masa depan yang mengatasi perspektif yang berbeda tentang persepsi bahasa yang kasar.', 'hy': 'Այսօր սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների պլատֆորմերը օգտագործում են դասակարգման մոդելներ ատելության խոսքի և չարաշահության հետ հաղթահարելու համար: Այս մոդելների խնդիրն այն է, որ նրանք խոցելի են կողմնականության հանդեպ: Նոտոտորարի ենթարկվող ընկալումն ու նշումների բարդությունը առաջացնում է ատելության խոսքերում և չարաշահույթ լեզվի տվյալների համակարգերում: Մեր թղթի մեջ մենք զարգանում ենք մի շարք մեթոդներ, որոնք օգտագործում են նատոտորների կողմնականությունը չափելու լեզվի չարաշահումների տվյալների համակարգերում և որոշում են չարաշահումների տարբեր տեսանկյուններ: Մենք կիրառում ենք այս մեթոդները չորս տարբեր լեզվի չարաշահող տվյալների համար: Մեր առաջարկված մոտեցումը աջակցում է նման տվյալների համակարգերի annoտացիոն գործընթացներին և ապագա հետազոտություններին, որոնք վերաբերում են տարբեր տեսանկյուններին, որոնք վերաբերվում են չարաշահույթի', 'fa': 'در حال حاضر، platformهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی از مدل\u200cهای مختلف استفاده می\u200cکنند تا با سخنرانی متنفر و زبان\u200cهای تجاوز کند. مشکل این مدل آسیب\u200cآسیب\u200cآسیب\u200cآسیب\u200cآسیب است. یک شکل زیادی از طبیعی در سخنرانی از نفرت و داده\u200cهای زبان زبان زبان زبان زبان زبان ناراحت کننده\u200cای است که باعث می\u200cشود مشاهده\u200cهای موضوع و پیچیده\u200cای از وظیفه\u200cی اظهار دهنده است. در کاغذ ما، ما مجموعه\u200cای از روش\u200cهایی را برای اندازه\u200cگیری رضایت\u200cهای ناشناس در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای زبان ناشناس و برای شناسایی perspektiv\u200cهای مختلف در زبان ناشناس توسعه می\u200cکنیم. ما این روش\u200cها را به چهار مجموعه داده\u200cهای زبانی مختلف استفاده می\u200cکنیم. روش پیشنهاد ما فرایندهای اظهار داده\u200cهای چنین دسته\u200cهای داده\u200cها و تحقیقات آینده را پشتیبانی می\u200cکند که در مورد نظر متفاوت در مورد تشخیص زبان زبان\u200cهای تجاوز مشاهده می\u200cکنند.', 'az': "Bu gün sosyal media platformları nifrət sözləri və çirkin dilləri ilə çəkmək üçün klasifikasiya modelləri istifadə edir. Bu modellərin problemi onların təkəbbürlüklərinə zəiflik edir. Nöqsanlıq s özlərində və zəif dil verilənlərində çox böyük təsirlərin şəkilində olması annotator'un subjektiv görünüşünün və annotation işin in qarışıqlığının səbəbi təsirlərindir. Kağıdımızda, pis dil verilənlərin tərzlərini ölçürmək və pis dillərin müxtəlif perspektivlərini təsdiqləmək üçün müxtəlif tərzlərini təşkil edirik. Biz bu metodları dörd fərqli dil verilənlərinə uyğunlaşdırırıq. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz tərzim belə verilən qurbanların və gələcək təhsil təhsil işlərinin fərqli perspektivlərini istifadə edir.", 'bs': 'Danas, socijalne medijske platforme koriste klasifikacijske modele kako bi se suočili sa govorom mržnje i jezikom zlostavljanja. Problem ovih modela je njihova ranjivost prema predrasudama. Preveliki oblik predrasude u govoru mržnje i nasilnim jezičkim podacima je annotatorska predrasude uzrokovana subjektivnim percepcijom annotatora i kompleksnosti zadataka annotacije. U našim novinama razvijamo set metoda za mjerenje annotatorskih pristrasnosti u nasilnim jezicima podataka i identifikaciju različitih perspektiva o nasilnom jeziku. Primjenjujemo ove metode na četiri različite nasilne jezičke podatke. Naš predloženi pristup podržava annotacijske procese takvih podataka i budućih istraživanja s obzirom na različite perspektive o percepciji nasilnog jezika.', 'ca': "Avui dia, les plataformes dels mitjans socials utilitzen models de classificació per afrontar el discurs d'odi i el llenguatge abusiv. El problema d'aquests models és la seva vulnerabilitat al bias. Una forma prevalent de bias en el discurs d'odi i els conjunts de dades abusive s de llenguatges és bias d'anotació causat per la percepció subjectiva del anotator i la complexitat de la tasca d'anotació. En el nostre article, desenvolupem un conjunt de mètodes per mesurar el bias dels anotators en conjunts de dades abusives de llenguatges i per identificar diferents perspectives sobre el llenguatge abusiv. We apply these methods to four different abusive language datasets.  El nostre enfocament proposat suporta els procés d'anotació d'aquests conjunts de dades i la recerca futura que aborden diferents perspectives sobre la percepció del llenguatge abusiv.", 'et': 'Tänapäeval kasutavad sotsiaalmeedia platvormid klassifitseerimismudeleid vihakõne ja kuritarvitava keelega toimetulekuks. Nende mudelite probleem on nende haavatavus eelarvamuste suhtes. Vihakõne ja kuritarvitava keele andmekogumites on levinud eelarvamuse vorm, mille põhjuseks on anotatori subjektiivne tajumine ja anotatsiooniülesande keerukus. Meie töös töötame välja meetodid, et mõõta anotatorite kallakust kuritarvitavates keeleandmekogumites ja tuvastada erinevad vaatenurgad kuritarvitavale keelele. Me rakendame neid meetodeid nelja erineva kuritarvitava keele andmekogumi suhtes. Meie kavandatud lähenemisviis toetab selliste andmekogumite annoteerimisprotsessi ja tulevasi uuringuid, mis käsitlevad erinevaid vaatenurki kuritarvitava keele tajumisest.', 'fi': 'Nykyään sosiaalisen median alustat käyttävät luokittelumalleja vihapuheen ja loukkaavan kielen torjumiseen. Näiden mallien ongelma on niiden alttius ennakkoluuloille. Vihanpuheessa ja loukkaavassa kieliaineistossa esiintyvä ennakkoluulo on selittäjän subjektiivisen havainnoinnin ja selittämistehtävän monimutkaisuuden aiheuttama ennakkoluulo. Työssämme kehitämme joukon menetelmiä, joilla mitataan anotatoriharhaa loukkaavissa kieliaineistoissa ja tunnistetaan erilaisia näkökulmia loukkaavaan kieleen. Sovellamme näitä menetelmiä neljään eri väärinkäyttävään kieliaineistoon. Ehdotettu lähestymistapa tukee tällaisten aineistojen annotointiprosessia ja tulevaa tutkimusta, jossa käsitellään eri näkökulmia loukkaavan kielen havaitsemiseen.', 'am': 'ዛሬ፣ የማኅበራዊ አውታር ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ጦማሪያዎች የጥል ንግግር እና የጥላቻ ቋንቋን ለመቀላቀል ምሳሌዎችን ይጠይቃሉ፡፡ የዚህ ዓይነቶች መከራ የደካማነት ነው፡፡ የጥል ንግግር እና የቋንቋ ዳታዎችን ማሰቃየት የሚደረገው የጥላቻ ፍላጎት እና የአሳባቢው ስርዓት አካባቢ ነው፡፡ በጋዜጠታችን፣ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ዳታዎችን ለማሰናከል እና የተለየ ልዩ ዓይነቶችን በአስጨናቂው ቋንቋ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እነዚህን ሥርዓቶች አራት የተለያዩ የቋንቋ ዳታዎችን እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ልውጤታችን እንደዚህ የዳታ ተቃውሞ እና የቀድሞው ምርጫዎች በተለያዩ ልዩ ልዩ ዓይነት በተጨቃሚ ቋንቋ ላይ ይናገራሉ፡፡', 'bn': 'বর্তমানে সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্লাটফর্ম ব্যবহার করে ঘৃণা ভাষা এবং নির্যাতন ভাষার মুখোমুখি হয়। এই মডেলের সমস্যা হচ্ছে তাদের বৈষম্যের ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত। ঘৃণা ভাষণ এবং নির্যাতন ভাষার তথ্য সেটের প্রাক্তন বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ভাষায় আমাদের কাগজপত্রে আমরা বিভিন্ন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গী ভাষার তথ্য সেটে বিভিন্ন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি চিহ্নিত করার জন্য বিভিন্ন দৃষ্টিভঙ আমরা এই পদ্ধতিগুলোকে চারটি ভিন্ন ভিন্ন অত্যাচারী ভাষার ডাটাসেটে প্রয়োগ করি। আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি এই ধরনের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত প্রক্রিয়াকে সমর্থন করে এবং ভবিষ্যতের গবেষণার বিভিন্ন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি ন', 'cs': 'Platformy sociálních médií dnes používají klasifikační modely k vyrovnání se s nenávistnými řečmi a zneužívajícími jazyky. Problémem těchto modelů je jejich zranitelnost vůči zaujatosti. Převládající formou zaujatosti v datových sadách nenávistné řeči a zneužívajících jazyky je zaujatost anotátorů způsobená subjektivním vnímáním anotátora a složitostí anotace. V našem příspěvku vyvíjíme soubor metod pro měření anotátorové zaujatosti v datových sadách zneužívajících jazyky a identifikaci různých pohledů na zneužívající jazyk. Tyto metody aplikujeme na čtyři různé datové sady zneužívajících jazyků. Náš navržený přístup podporuje anotace těchto datových sad a budoucí výzkum zabývající se různými perspektivami vnímání zneužívajícího jazyka.', 'jv': 'Nganjo, media-soko sistem sistem sing nyebute model sing wis diplarasi kanggo nganggep kuwi kesempatan lan langa kuwi duluran. Rasane ning model iki dadi kapan kanggo biasane. Tulung Nanging pegaturan dhéwé, Awak dhéwé luwih akeh sistem kanggo nyelehake tarjamahan kanggo mbatalé nggawe barang basa sing tukang karo akeh perpekhaan kanggo ngerasakno perspekhaan kanggo langa apik. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno iki dadi kanggo saboh akeh operasi kanggo saboh urip. Awak dhéwé ngerti perusahaan ngertuk kanggo ngerasakno dadi sing berarti karo hal-hal kanggo ngerasakno perspeksiyone kapan kanggo ngerasakno langkung apik.', 'sk': 'Danes platforme socialnih medijev uporabljajo klasifikacijske modele za obvladovanje sovražnega govora in zlorabljajočega jezika. Težava teh modelov je njihova ranljivost na pristranskost. Prevladujoča oblika pristranskosti v zbirkah podatkov o sovražnem govoru in zlorabljajočem jeziku je pristranskost pri oponašanju, ki jo povzroča subjektivna percepcija oponašalca in kompleksnost opravila oponašanja. V našem prispevku smo razvili nabor metod za merjenje pristranskosti pri označevalnih naborih podatkov o zlorabi jezikovnih podatkov in za ugotavljanje različnih perspektiv o zlorabi jezika. Te metode uporabljamo za štiri različne jezikovne nabore podatkov o zlorabi. Naš predlagani pristop podpira procese označevanja takšnih naborov podatkov in prihodnje raziskave, ki obravnavajo različne perspektive glede dojemanja zlorabljajočega jezika.', 'ha': 'Daga yanzu, majarin mitandai na jamii sunã amfani da misãlai mai classifori dõmin su yi amfani da magana na ƙeta da harshen abuse. Mulkin waɗannan misãlai ne mafiya rauni a kanka. Wani irin fitarwa da ke cikin hoto na ƙiyaya da tsarin harshen na abuse, shi ne mai haske da haske wanda ya yi matarwa ga fassarar da fassarar aikin mai basĩri. Ga karatunmu, Munã buɗe wasu hanyõyi dõmin su cika taɓa ta cikin tsarin danasãri na harshe na zartar da kuma dõmin mu gane misãlai daban-daban a kan harshen mai zargi. We apply these methods to four different abusive language datasets.  Mataimakinmu da aka buƙata, yana ƙarfafa aikin zartar da masu tsari na wannan da aka samu da research masu ƙarƙashin da ke samu da gannai dabam-dabam a kan misalin harshen ta istisma.', 'bo': 'ད་ལྟ། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་གླིང་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གཅིག་མཐུན་གྱིས་ཆགས་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག མིག་དབྱིབས་འདི་དག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ནི་ཁོ་ཚོའི་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རང་དབང་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཆུང་བ་དེ་རེད། དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོའི་ཤོག་བྱང་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འགྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་ལ་མཐུན་པའི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་འདྲ་བྱེད ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཆས་བཞིན་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བྱས་པར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པའི་སྐོར་ལས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་དང་མ་འོངས་བའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་', 'he': 'Nowadays, social media platforms use classification models to cope with hate speech and abusive language.  הבעיה של הדוגמנים האלה היא הפגיעה שלהם לחלוטין. צורה שפורסמת של התוודות בנאום שנאה וקבוצות מידע שפות מתעללות היא התוודות של המכתבים שנגרמה על ידי התפיסה הסוביקטיבית של המכתב והמורכבות של משימת ההכתבות. בעיתון שלנו, אנחנו מפתחים קבוצה של שיטות כדי למדוד ההתמחות של המכתבים במערכות מידע שפות מתעללות ולזיהוי פרספקטיבות שונות על שפה מתעללת. אנחנו משתמשים בשיטות אלה לארבעה קבוצות מידע שפות מתעללות שונות. הגישה המוצעת שלנו תומכת בתהליכי ציונים של קבוצות נתונים כאלה ומחקר עתידי מתייחס לפרספקטיבות שונות על התפיסה של שפה מתעללת.'}
{'en': 'Transformer with Syntactic Position Encoding for Machine Translation', 'es': 'Transformador con codificación de posición sintáctica para traducción automática', 'ar': 'محول مع ترميز الموضع النحوي للترجمة الآلية', 'pt': 'Transformador com codificação de posição sintática para tradução automática', 'fr': 'Transformateur avec codage syntaxique de position pour la traduction automatique', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद के लिए वाक्यात्मक स्थिति एन्कोडिंग के साथ ट्रांसफार्मर', 'ja': '機械翻訳のための構文位置エンコード付き変圧器', 'zh': '有句法位编码转换器,施于机器翻译', 'ru': 'Трансформатор с синтаксической кодировкой положения для машинного перевода', 'ga': 'Trasfhoirmeoir le Ionchódú Suímh Syntactic le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Transzformátor szintaktikus pozíciókódolással a gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Μετασχηματιστής με συντακτική κωδικοποίηση θέσης για μηχανική μετάφραση', 'it': 'Trasformatore con codifica sintattica di posizione per traduzione automatica', 'kk': 'Машин аудармасының синтактикалық орны кодтамасыName', 'ms': 'Transformer dengan Pengekodan Posisi Sintaktik untuk Terjemahan Mesin', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള സിന്റാക്റ്റിക് സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ കോഡിങ്ങ് കൊണ്ട് മ', 'lt': 'Transformatorius su sintaktiniu pozicijos kodavimu mašinų vertimui', 'mn': 'Машин хөгжүүлэлтийн синтактик нөхцөлд шилжүүлэгч', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Transformator ze syntaktycznym kodowaniem pozycji dla tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Transformator cu codificare sintattică a poziției pentru traducerea automată', 'mk': 'Name', 'mt': 'Trasformatur b’Kodifikazzjoni tal-Pożizzjoni Sintattika għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna', 'sr': 'Transformer sa kodiranjem sintaktièkog položaja za prevod mašine', 'so': 'Turjumista la xiriira Heshiiska Syntactic', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Transformator med syntaktisk positionskodning för maskinöversättning', 'si': 'මෙෂින් පරිවර්තනය සඳහා සංකේතික ස්ථානය සංකේතනය කරන්න', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dịch biến hình phòng pháp thuật cho máy ảnh', 'da': 'Transformer med syntaktisk position kodning til maskinoversættelse', 'nl': 'Transformator met syntactische positie codering voor machinevertaling', 'bg': 'Трансформатор със синтактично кодиране на позицията за машинен превод', 'hr': 'Transformer sa kodiranjem sintaktičkog položaja za prevod stroja', 'de': 'Transformator mit syntaktischer Positionskodierung für maschinelle Übersetzung', 'sw': 'Transformer with Syntactic Position Encoding for Machine Translation', 'tr': 'Makina terjime üçin Sentaktik Ýeri Ködleme', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Transformues me kodimin sintaktik të pozicionit për përkthimin e makinës', 'fa': 'تغییر\u200cدهنده با رمزبندی موقعیت سنتاکتیک برای ترجمه ماشین', 'ko': '문법 위치 인코딩 기반의 기계 번역 변환기', 'id': 'Transformer dengan Pengkodan Posisi Sintaktik untuk Translation Mesin', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য সিন্ট্যাকটিক অবস্থান এনকোডিং সহ অনুবাদ করুন', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Transformer sa kodiranjem sintaktičkog položaja za prevod mašine', 'ca': 'Transformer amb codificació de posició sintàctica per traducció màquina', 'et': 'Transformer süntaktilise asukohakoodeerimisega masintõlke jaoks', 'am': 'undo-type', 'az': 'Makinat Çeviri üçün Sintaktik Position Kodlaması', 'fi': 'Muuntaja, jossa on synteettinen sijaintikoodaus konekäännöstä varten', 'cs': 'Transformátor se syntaktickým kódováním polohy pro strojový překlad', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Transformator s sintaktičnim kodiranjem položaja za strojno prevajanje', 'he': 'מעבר עם קוד עמדה סינטקטי לתרגום מכונות', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'bo': 'མ་ལག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་གནས་ཡུལ་འདྲ་བཤུ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'It has been widely recognized that syntax information can help end-to-end neural machine translation (NMT) systems to achieve better translation. In order to integrate dependency information into Transformer based NMT, existing approaches either exploit words’ local head-dependent relations, ignoring their non-local neighbors carrying important context ; or approximate two words’ syntactic relation by their relative distance on the dependency tree, sacrificing exactness. To address these issues, we propose global positional encoding for dependency tree, a new scheme that facilitates syntactic relation modeling between any two words with keeping exactness and without immediate neighbor constraint. Experiment results on NC11 GermanEnglish, EnglishGerman and WMT EnglishGerman datasets show that our approach is more effective than the above two strategies. In addition, our experiments quantitatively show that compared with higher layers, lower layers of the model are more proper places to incorporate syntax information in terms of each layer’s preference to the syntactic pattern and the final performance.', 'ar': 'لقد تم الاعتراف على نطاق واسع بأن معلومات بناء الجملة يمكن أن تساعد أنظمة الترجمة الآلية العصبية من طرف إلى طرف (NMT) لتحقيق ترجمة أفضل. من أجل دمج معلومات التبعية في NMT القائمة على المحولات ، فإن الأساليب الحالية إما تستغل العلاقات المحلية المعتمدة على الرأس للكلمات ، وتتجاهل جيرانها غير المحليين الذين يحملون سياقًا مهمًا ؛ أو تقريب العلاقة النحوية لكلمتين من خلال المسافة النسبية بينهما على شجرة التبعية ، مما يضحي بالدقة. لمعالجة هذه المشكلات ، نقترح ترميزًا موضعيًا عالميًا لشجرة التبعية ، وهو مخطط جديد يسهل نمذجة العلاقة النحوية بين أي كلمتين مع الحفاظ على الدقة وبدون قيود الجار الفوري. تظهر نتائج التجربة على NC11 الألمانية → الإنجليزية ، الإنجليزية → الألمانية و WMT الإنجليزية → مجموعات البيانات الألمانية أن نهجنا أكثر فعالية من الاستراتيجيتين المذكورتين أعلاه. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، تُظهر تجاربنا كميًا أنه بالمقارنة مع الطبقات العليا ، فإن الطبقات السفلية من النموذج هي أماكن أكثر ملاءمة لدمج معلومات بناء الجملة من حيث تفضيل كل طبقة على النمط النحوي والأداء النهائي.', 'fr': "Il est largement reconnu que les informations de syntaxe peuvent aider les systèmes de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) de bout en bout à obtenir une meilleure traduction. Afin d'intégrer les informations de dépendance dans la NMT basée sur Transformer, les approches existantes exploitent les relations locales dépendantes de la tête des mots, ignorant leurs voisins non locaux porteurs d'un contexte important\xa0; ou approchent la relation syntaxique de deux mots par leur distance relative sur l'arbre de dépendance, sacrifiant l'exactitude. Pour résoudre ces problèmes, nous proposons un codage positionnel global pour l'arbre de dépendance, un nouveau schéma qui facilite la modélisation des relations syntaxiques entre deux mots avec exactitude et sans contrainte de voisin immédiat. Les résultats de l'expérience sur les ensembles de données NC11 allemand→anglais, anglais→allemand et WMT anglais→allemand montrent que notre approche est plus efficace que les deux stratégies ci-dessus. De plus, nos expériences montrent quantitativement que, par rapport aux couches supérieures, les couches inférieures du modèle sont des endroits plus appropriés pour intégrer des informations de syntaxe en termes de préférence de chaque couche par rapport au modèle syntaxique et aux performances finales.", 'es': 'Se ha reconocido ampliamente que la información sintáctica puede ayudar a los sistemas de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) de extremo a extremo a lograr una mejor traducción. Para integrar la información de dependencia en la NMT basada en Transformer, los enfoques existentes explotan las relaciones locales dependientes de la cabeza de las palabras, ignorando a sus vecinos no locales que llevan un contexto importante; o se aproximan a la relación sintáctica de dos palabras por su distancia relativa en el árbol de dependencias, sacrificando la exactitud. Para abordar estos problemas, proponemos la codificación posicional global para el árbol de dependencias, un nuevo esquema que facilita el modelado de relaciones sintácticas entre dos palabras cualesquiera manteniendo la exactitud y sin restricciones de vecinos inmediatos. Los resultados de los experimentos en los conjuntos de datos NC11 alemán→inglés, inglés→alemán y WMT inglés→alemán muestran que nuestro enfoque es más eficaz que las dos estrategias anteriores. Además, nuestros experimentos muestran cuantitativamente que, en comparación con las capas superiores, las capas inferiores del modelo son lugares más adecuados para incorporar información de sintaxis en términos de la preferencia de cada capa al patrón sintáctico y el rendimiento final.', 'pt': 'Tem sido amplamente reconhecido que as informações de sintaxe podem ajudar os sistemas de tradução automática neural (NMT) de ponta a ponta a obter uma melhor tradução. A fim de integrar informações de dependência em NMT baseado em Transformer, as abordagens existentes exploram as relações dependentes da cabeça local das palavras, ignorando seus vizinhos não locais que carregam contexto importante; ou aproximar a relação sintática de duas palavras por sua distância relativa na árvore de dependência, sacrificando a exatidão. Para resolver esses problemas, propomos a codificação posicional global para árvore de dependência, um novo esquema que facilita a modelagem da relação sintática entre quaisquer duas palavras mantendo a exatidão e sem restrição de vizinhança imediata. Os resultados do experimento nos conjuntos de dados NC11 Alemão→Inglês, Inglês→Alemão e WMT Inglês→Alemão mostram que nossa abordagem é mais eficaz do que as duas estratégias acima. Além disso, nossos experimentos mostram quantitativamente que em comparação com as camadas superiores, as camadas inferiores do modelo são locais mais adequados para incorporar informações de sintaxe em termos de preferência de cada camada ao padrão sintático e ao desempenho final.', 'ja': '構文情報は、エンドツーエンドのニューラル機械翻訳（ ＮＭＴ ）システムがより良い翻訳を達成するのに役立つことが広く認識されている。 従属関係情報をTransformerベースのNMTに統合するために、既存のアプローチは、重要なコンテキストを持つ非ローカル隣接関係を無視して、単語のローカル頭依存関係を利用するか、または正確さを犠牲にして、依存関係ツリー上の相対距離によって2つの単語の構文関係を近似するかのいずれかである。 これらの問題に対処するために、依存関係ツリーのグローバル位置符号化を提案します。この新しいスキームは、正確さを保ち、近隣の制約なしに任意の2つの単語間の構文関係モデリングを容易にするものです。 NC 11ドイツ語→英語、英語ドイツ語、およびWMT英語→→ドイツ語データセットの実験結果は、私たちのアプローチが上記の2つの戦略よりも効果的であることを示しています。 さらに、私たちの実験は、より高いレイヤーと比較して、モデルのより低いレイヤーは、各レイヤーの構文パターンに対する好みと最終的なパフォーマンスの観点から、構文情報を組み込むためにより適切な場所であることを定量的に示しています。', 'zh': '人普遍认为,语法信可以助端到端神经机器翻译(NMT)系统成善译。 为将依信集于Transformer之NMT,今有法乎用单词之局头,而忽其有大上下文者非邻也。 或因两单词以近两单词之句法,而牺牲精确性。 全局编码,此一新策,可促二单词之语法建模,兼精确性无紧邻约束。 NC11德语→英语、英语→德语、WMT英语→德语数集之实验结果表明,吾道有效于此。 此外实验定量,比高层为低层,可以合句法偏善终性以整合语法信息。', 'hi': 'यह व्यापक रूप से मान्यता प्राप्त है कि वाक्यविन्यास जानकारी बेहतर अनुवाद प्राप्त करने के लिए एंड-टू-एंड न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एनएमटी) सिस्टम की मदद कर सकती है। ट्रांसफॉर्मर आधारित एनएमटी में निर्भरता जानकारी को एकीकृत करने के लिए, मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण या तो शब्दों के स्थानीय सिर-निर्भर संबंधों का शोषण करते हैं, महत्वपूर्ण संदर्भ ले जाने वाले अपने गैर-स्थानीय पड़ोसियों की अनदेखी करते हैं; या निर्भरता के पेड़ पर उनकी सापेक्ष दूरी से अनुमानित दो शब्दों के वाक्यात्मक संबंध, सटीकता का त्याग करते हुए। इन मुद्दों को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम निर्भरता पेड़ के लिए वैश्विक स्थितिगत एन्कोडिंग का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, एक नई योजना जो सटीकता रखने और तत्काल पड़ोसी बाधा के बिना किसी भी दो शब्दों के बीच वाक्यात्मक संबंध मॉडलिंग की सुविधा प्रदान करती है। NC11 जर्मन→अंगलिश, अंग्रेजी→जर्मन और WMT अंग्रेजी→जर्मन डेटासेट पर प्रयोग के परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण उपरोक्त दो रणनीतियों की तुलना में अधिक प्रभावी है। इसके अलावा, हमारे प्रयोगों से मात्रात्मक रूप से पता चलता है कि उच्च परतों की तुलना में, मॉडल की निचली परतें वाक्यविन्यास पैटर्न और अंतिम प्रदर्शन के लिए प्रत्येक परत की वरीयता के संदर्भ में वाक्यविन्यास जानकारी को शामिल करने के लिए अधिक उचित स्थान हैं।', 'ru': 'Широко признается, что синтаксическая информация может помочь комплексным системам нейронного машинного перевода (НМП) добиться лучшего перевода. Для того, чтобы интегрировать информацию о зависимостях в NMT на основе Трансформатора, существующие подходы либо используют местные зависимые от головы отношения слов, игнорируя их нелокальных соседей, несущих важный контекст; или приближают синтаксическую связь двух слов по их относительному расстоянию до дерева зависимостей, жертвуя точностью. Для решения этих проблем мы предлагаем глобальное позиционное кодирование для дерева зависимостей, новую схему, которая облегчает синтаксическое моделирование отношений между любыми двумя словами с сохранением точности и без непосредственного ограничения соседа. Результаты эксперимента на наборах данных NC11 German→English, English→German и WMT English→German показывают, что наш подход более эффективен, чем две вышеперечисленные стратегии. Кроме того, наши эксперименты количественно показывают, что по сравнению с более высокими слоями, более низкие слои модели являются более подходящими местами для включения синтаксической информации с точки зрения предпочтения каждого слоя синтаксической модели и конечной производительности.', 'ga': "Aithnítear go forleathan gur féidir le faisnéis chomhréire cabhrú le córais néaraistriúcháin meaisín néarúla ó cheann ceann go ceann (NMT) aistriúchán níos fearr a bhaint amach. Chun faisnéis faoi spleáchas a chomhtháthú le NMT atá bunaithe ar an gClaochladán, baintear leas as na cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana féin idir na focail 'ceann-chleithiúnach áitiúil', gan aird a thabhairt ar a gcomharsana neamháitiúla agus comhthéacs tábhachtach acu; nó gaol comhréire dhá fhocal a neas de réir a n-achar coibhneasta ar chrann an spleáchais, ag íobairt beachtas. Chun dul i ngleic leis na saincheisteanna seo, molaimid ionchódú suímh dhomhanda don chrann spleáchais, scéim nua a éascaíonn samhaltú comhréire idir dhá fhocal ar bith le beacht coinneála agus gan srianadh comharsan láithreach. Léiríonn torthaí turgnaimh ar NC11 Gearmáinis → Béarla, Béarla → Gearmáinis agus WMT Béarla→Gearmáinis tacair sonraí go bhfuil ár gcur chuige níos éifeachtaí ná an dá straitéis thuas. Ina theannta sin, léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go cainníochtúil, i gcomparáid le sraitheanna níos airde, gur áiteanna níos oiriúnaí iad sraitheanna níos ísle den mhúnla chun faisnéis chomhréire a ionchorprú i dtéarmaí rogha gach ciseal don phatrún comhréire agus don fheidhmíocht deiridh.", 'ka': 'სინტექსტის ინფორმაცია შეუძლია დახმარება ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელება (NMT) სისტემის შესაძლებლობად უკეთესი გაგრძელება. NMT-ის განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრებულობის ინფორმაციის ინტერნექტირებისთვის, მსოფლიო სიტყვების ადგილური განსაზღვრებული შესახებ ექსპლექტირება, რომელიც არ არის ლოკალური გაზღვ ან ორი სიტყვების სინტაქტიკური შესახებ მათი პირობილური განმავლობაზე დაახლოებით, საკუთარი განმავლობაზე დაახლოებით. ამ პრობლემების შესახებ, ჩვენ გლობალური პოზაციალური კოდინეცია დასახებების ხელზე, ახალი სქემია, რომელიც სინტაქტიური პრობლემების მოდელეციის შესახებ ყველა ორი სიტყვების შორის NC11 გერმანული ანგლისური, ანგლისური და WMT ინგლისური გერმანური მონაცემების შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი მონაცემები უფრო ეფექტიურია, ვიდრე მეორე ს დამატებით, ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები კონტაქტიურად გამოჩვენება, რომ მეტი სინამდვილეებით შემდგომარებული სინამდვილეები უფრო სწორედ ადგილებია, რომლებიც ყველა სინამდვილეების უფრო', 'it': "È stato ampiamente riconosciuto che le informazioni sintattiche possono aiutare i sistemi end-to-end di traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) per ottenere una traduzione migliore. Al fine di integrare le informazioni sulla dipendenza in NMT basato su Transformer, gli approcci esistenti sfruttano le relazioni locali dipendenti dalla testa delle parole, ignorando i loro vicini non locali che portano un contesto importante; o approssimare la relazione sintattica di due parole dalla loro distanza relativa sull'albero delle dipendenze, sacrificando l'esattezza. Per affrontare questi problemi, proponiamo la codifica posizionale globale per l'albero delle dipendenze, un nuovo schema che facilita la modellazione sintattica delle relazioni tra due parole mantenendo l'esattezza e senza vincoli immediati. I risultati degli esperimenti sui dataset NC11 tedesco inglese, inglese tedesco e WMT inglese tedesco mostrano che il nostro approccio è più efficace delle due strategie di cui sopra. Inoltre, i nostri esperimenti dimostrano quantitativamente che rispetto ai livelli più alti, i livelli più bassi del modello sono luoghi più appropriati per incorporare informazioni sintattiche in termini di preferenza di ogni livello rispetto al modello sintattico e alle prestazioni finali.", 'el': 'Έχει αναγνωριστεί ευρέως ότι οι πληροφορίες σύνταξης μπορούν να βοηθήσουν τα ολοκληρωμένα συστήματα νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης (NMT) για την επίτευξη καλύτερης μετάφρασης. Προκειμένου να ενσωματωθούν πληροφορίες εξάρτησης σε ΜΤ βασισμένες στον μετασχηματιστή, οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις είτε εκμεταλλεύονται τις τοπικές σχέσεις των λέξεων που εξαρτώνται από το κεφάλι, αγνοώντας τους μη τοπικούς γείτονές τους που φέρουν σημαντικό πλαίσιο. ή προσεγγίζουν τη συντακτική σχέση δύο λέξεων με τη σχετική τους απόσταση από το δέντρο εξάρτησης, θυσιάζοντας την ακρίβεια. Για να αντιμετωπιστούν αυτά τα ζητήματα, προτείνουμε παγκόσμια κωδικοποίηση θέσης για το δέντρο εξάρτησης, ένα νέο σχέδιο που διευκολύνει τη συντακτική μοντελοποίηση σχέσεων μεταξύ οποιωνδήποτε δύο λέξεων με διατήρηση ακρίβειας και χωρίς άμεσο περιορισμό γείτονα. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων σε σύνολα δεδομένων NC11 Γερμανικά Αγγλικά, Αγγλικά Γερμανικά και Αγγλικά Γερμανικά δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας είναι πιο αποτελεσματική από τις δύο παραπάνω στρατηγικές. Επιπλέον, τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ποσοτικά ότι σε σύγκριση με τα υψηλότερα στρώματα, τα χαμηλότερα στρώματα του μοντέλου είναι πιο κατάλληλα μέρη για την ενσωμάτωση συντακτικών πληροφοριών όσον αφορά την προτίμηση κάθε στρώματος στο συντακτικό μοτίβο και την τελική απόδοση.', 'lt': "Plačiai pripažinta, kad sintaksinė informacija gali padėti tarpusavio nervinių mašinų vertimo (NMT) sistemoms pasiekti geresnį vertimą. Kad priklausomybės informacija būtų integruota į Transformuojančią NMT pagrįstą informaciją, esami metodai arba naudojasi žodžių vietos glaudžiai priklausomais santykiais, ignoruodami jų ne vietos kaimynus, turinčius svarbų kontekstą; arba apytiksliai dviejų žodžių sintaksinį santykinį atstumą nuo priklausomybės medžio, aukojant tikslumą. Siekdami spręsti šiuos klausimus, siūlome pasaulinį priklausomybės medžio pozicijų kodavimą, naują sistemą, kuri palengvina sintaktinį santykių modeliavimą tarp dviejų žodžių laikantis tikslumo ir be tiesioginių kaimyninių apribojimų. NC11 Vokietijos anglų, anglų vokiečių ir anglų anglų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentų rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris yra veiksmingesnis nei pirmiau minėtos dvi strategijos. In addition, our experiments quantitatively show that compared with higher layers, lower layers of the model are more proper places to incorporate syntax information in terms of each layer's preference to the syntactic pattern and the final performance.", 'hu': 'Széles körben elismert, hogy a szintaxisinformációk segíthetnek a végpontok közötti neurális gépi fordítási (NMT) rendszereknek a jobb fordítás elérésében. Annak érdekében, hogy a transzformátor alapú NMT-be integrálják a függőségi információkat, a meglévő megközelítések vagy kihasználják a szavak helyi fejfüggő kapcsolatait, figyelmen kívül hagyva azokat a nem helyi szomszédokat, amelyek fontos kontextust hordoznak; vagy hozzávetőlegesen két szó szintaktikus kapcsolatát a függőségfától való relatív távolságuk alapján, feláldozva a pontosságot. Ezeknek a problémáknak a megoldására globális pozíciós kódolást javasolunk a függőségek fájához, egy új sémát, amely megkönnyíti a szintaktikus kapcsolat modellezését bármely két szó között, pontossággal és közvetlen szomszédi korlátozás nélkül. Az NC11 német angol, angol német és WMT angol német adatkészleteken végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk hatékonyabb, mint a fenti két stratégia. Emellett kísérleteink mennyiségileg azt mutatják, hogy a magasabb rétegekhez képest a modell alsó rétegei inkább megfelelő helyek a szintaxisinformációk beépítésére, tekintettel arra, hogy minden réteg preferálja a szintaktikus mintát és a végső teljesítményt.', 'mk': 'Широко се препознава дека информациите за синтаксија можат да помогнат на системите на нервен превод (НМТ) од крај до крај да постигнат подобар превод. Со цел да се интегрираат информациите за зависност во НМТ со седиште во Трансформерот, постојните пристапи или ги искористуваат локалните односи на зборовите кои се зависни од главата, игнорирајќи ги нивните нелокални соседи кои носат важен контекст или околу синтактичката врска на два збора според нивната релативна оддалеченост од дрвото на зависноста, жртвувајќи точност. За да ги решиме овие прашања, предложуваме глобално позиционално кодирање за дрвото на зависноста, нова шема која го олеснува синтактичкото моделирање на односите помеѓу двете зборови со одржување на точноста и без итни соседиски ограничувања. Резултатите од експериментите на NC11 германски англиски, англиски германски и WMT англиски германски податоци покажуваат дека нашиот пристап е поефикасен од наведените две стратегии. Покрај тоа, нашите експерименти квантитивно покажуваат дека во споредба со повисоките слоеви, пониските слоеви на моделот се посоодветни места за вклучување на информации за синтаксија во однос на преференцијата на секој слој кон синтактичкиот шаблон и конечната резултатност.', 'kk': 'Синтаксис мәліметі жақсы аудару үшін невралдық компьютердің аяқталуының (NMT) жүйелеріне көмектесе алады. Тәуелсіздік мәліметін NMT бағдарламасына түрлендіру үшін мәліметтердің жергілікті басып тәуелсіздік қатынасын қолдану үшін, олардың жергілікті қоршауларының маңызды контексті немесе екі сөздің синтактикалық қатынасын қатынасыз қашықтығында, тәуелдік ағашындағы қашықтығында қатынасыз келеді. Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін, тәуелсіздік ағаш үшін жалпы орналасатын кодтамыз, жаңа сұлбаның синтактикалық модель үшін екі сөз арасындағы синтактикалық қатынас үшін дұрыс сақтау және тәуелс NC11 неміс ағылшын, ағылшын, неміс және WMT ағылшын неміс деректер жиындарының нәтижелері біздің тәсіліміздің екі стратегиясынан артық болғанын көрсетеді. Қосымша, біздің тәжірибелеріміз көп қабаттармен салыстырып, үлгінің төменгі қабаттары синтаксис үлгісіне және соңғы ықтималдығына арналған синтаксис мәліметін біріктіру үшін, синтаксис мәлімет', 'ms': 'Ia telah dikenali secara luas bahawa maklumat sintaks boleh membantu sistem terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) akhir-akhir untuk mencapai terjemahan yang lebih baik. Untuk mengintegrasikan maklumat dependensi ke dalam NMT berasaskan Transformer, pendekatan sedia ada sama ada mengeksploitasikan hubungan setempat yang bergantung pada kepala perkataan, mengabaikan tetangga bukan setempat mereka yang membawa konteks penting; atau kira-kira hubungan sintaktik dua perkataan dengan jarak relatif mereka pada pokok dependensi, mengorbankan ketepatan. Untuk mengatasi isu-isu ini, kami cadangkan pengekodan kedudukan global untuk pokok dependensi, skema baru yang memudahkan model hubungan sintaktik antara mana-mana dua perkataan dengan menjaga ketepatan dan tanpa halangan tetangga segera. Hasil eksperimen pada NC11 German English, English German dan WMT German datasets menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita lebih efektif daripada dua strategi di atas. Selain itu, eksperimen kita secara kuantitatif menunjukkan bahawa dibandingkan dengan lapisan yang lebih tinggi, lapisan yang lebih rendah model adalah tempat yang lebih tepat untuk memasukkan maklumat sintaks dalam terma keutamaan setiap lapisan kepada corak sintaks dan prestasi akhir.', 'ml': 'സിന്റാക്സ് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അവസാനിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സഹായിക്കുന്നു എന്\u200dഎംടി മെച്ചന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d സഹായിക്കുന്നത് എന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ ലോക്കല്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ NMT-ലേക്ക് ഒരുമ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d രണ്ടു വാക്കുകളുടെ സാങ്കേതികമായ ബന്ധം അവരുടെ അടുത്ത ബന്ധം വിശ്വസ്തമരത്തിന്റെ അടുത്ത ദൂരം കൊണ്ടാണ്  ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ പുതിയ കോഡിങോഡ് നാം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. രണ്ടു വാക്കുകള എന്\u200dസി11 ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d, വിഎംടി ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റേറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണ കൂടാതെ, നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d തടാകങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം തുല്യമായി കാണിക്കുന്നു, മോഡലിന്റെ താഴെ തടാകങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശരിയായ സ്ഥലങ്ങളാണ്. എല്ലാ തടാക്', 'mt': "Ġie rikonoxxut b’mod wiesa’ li l-informazzjoni dwar is-sintaks tista’ tgħin lis-sistemi tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali minn tarf għal tarf (NMT) biex jiksbu traduzzjoni aħjar. In order to integrate dependency information into Transformer based NMT, existing approaches either exploit words' local head-dependent relations, ignoring their non-local neighbors carrying important context;  jew approssimazzjoni tar-relazzjoni sinrattika ta’ żewġ kliem mid-distanza relattiva tagħhom fuq is-siġar tad-dipendenza, li toffri l-eżattezza. Biex nindirizzaw dawn il-kwistjonijiet, nipproponu l-kodifikazzjoni pożizzjonali globali għas-siġar tad-dipendenza, skema ġdida li tiffaċilita l-immudellar tar-relazzjonijiet sintetiċi bejn kwalunkwe żewġ kliem bl-eżattezza u mingħajr restrizzjoni immedjata tal-ġirien. Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti fuq NC11 German English, English German u WMT English German datasets juru li l-approċċ tagħna huwa aktar effettiv miż-żewġ strateġiji ta’ hawn fuq. Barra minn hekk, l-esperimenti tagħna juru kwantitattivament li meta mqabbla ma’ saffi ogħla, saffi aktar baxxi tal-mudell huma postijiet aktar xierqa biex tinkorpora informazzjoni ta’ sintaks f’termini ta’ preferenza ta’ kull saff għall-mudell sintattiku u l-prestazzjoni finali.", 'pl': 'Powszechnie uznano, że informacje składni mogą pomóc kompleksowym systemom tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) w osiągnięciu lepszego tłumaczenia. Aby zintegrować informacje o zależności z transformatorem NMT, istniejące podejścia albo wykorzystują lokalne relacje słów zależne od głowy, ignorując ich nielokalnych sąsiadów mających ważny kontekst; lub przybliżyć relację składni dwóch słów przez ich względną odległość od drzewa zależności, poświęcając dokładność. Aby rozwiązać te problemy, proponujemy globalne kodowanie pozycji dla drzewa zależności, nowy schemat ułatwiający modelowanie relacji składniowych między dowolnymi dwoma słowami z zachowaniem dokładności i bez ograniczeń bezpośredniego sąsiada. Wyniki eksperymentów z NC11 niemieckiego angielskiego, angielskiego niemieckiego i WMT angielskiego niemieckiego zbioru danych pokazują, że nasze podejście jest bardziej skuteczne niż dwie powyższe strategie. Dodatkowo, nasze eksperymenty ilościowo pokazują, że w porównaniu z wyższymi warstwami, niższe warstwy modelu są bardziej odpowiednimi miejscami do włączenia informacji składni pod względem preferencji każdej warstwy wobec wzorca składni i ostatecznej wydajności.', 'ro': 'S-a recunoscut pe scară largă faptul că informațiile sintaxei pot ajuta sistemele de traducere automată neurală end-to-end (NMT) pentru a obține o traducere mai bună. Pentru a integra informațiile despre dependență în NMT bazate pe Transformer, abordările existente fie exploatează relațiile locale dependente de cap ale cuvintelor, ignorând vecinii lor non-locali purtând context important; sau aproximativ relația sintactică a două cuvinte prin distanța lor relativă față de arborele dependenței, sacrificând exactitatea. Pentru a aborda aceste probleme, propunem codificarea pozițională globală pentru arborele de dependență, o nouă schemă care facilitează modelarea relațiilor sintactice între orice două cuvinte cu păstrarea exactității și fără constrângere imediată a vecinilor. Rezultatele experimentelor pe seturile de date NC11 germană engleză, engleză germană și WMT engleză germană arată că abordarea noastră este mai eficientă decât cele două strategii de mai sus. În plus, experimentele noastre arată cantitativ că, în comparație cu straturile superioare, straturile inferioare ale modelului sunt locuri mai potrivite pentru a încorpora informațiile sintaxei în ceea ce privește preferința fiecărui strat față de modelul sintactic și performanța finală.', 'no': 'Det er veldig gjenkjent at syntaksinformasjon kan hjelpa systemet for avslutting av neuralmaskineomsetjing (NMT) for å oppnå bedre omsetjing. For å integrere avhengighetsinformasjon i transformeringsbasert NMT, er det eksisterande tilnærmingar anten brukt lokale hovudavhengige forhold til ord, og ignorerer dei ikkje-lokale naboane som har viktig kontekst. eller omtrent syntaktiske forhold til to ord ved relativ avstanden på avhengighetstrået, som oftast nøyaktighet. For å handtera desse problemene, foreslår vi globale posisjonskoding for avhengighetstre, eit nytt skjema som gjer tilgjengeleg syntaksisk relasjonsmodeling mellom alle to ord med å holde nøyaktighet og uten strauje naboogrenser. Eksperimentresultatet på NC11 tysk, engelsk, tysk og WMT-engelsk datasett viser at tilnærminga vårt er meir effektivt enn dei over to strategiene. I tillegg, eksperimentene våre kvantitativ viser at samanlikninga med høgare lag er mindre rette plassar for å inkludere syntaksinformasjon i uttrykket av syntaksmønsteret for kvar lag og det siste uttrykket.', 'mn': 'Синтаксис мэдээллийг сайхан хөгжүүлэхийн тулд мэдрэлийн мэдээллийг төгсгөлд нь мэдрэлийн мэдрэлийн хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) системд туслах боломжтой болсон. NMT-д хамаарал хамааралтай мэдээллийг Трансформер-д оруулахын тулд оршин нутгийн толгойд хамааралтай харилцаа ашиглаж, чухал нөхцөл байдлаар хөрш орон нутгийн гадна байдлаар байхгүй байдлаар тэдний тухай эсвэл хоёр үгийн синтактикийн харилцааны зай нь хамааралтай модны хувьд тодорхой холбоотой. Эдгээр асуудлуудыг зохицуулахын тулд бид дэлхийн хамааралтай модны байр суурь кодлогыг санал болгож байна. Энэ шинэ төлөвлөгөө нь хоёр үг хоорондын шинжлэх ухааны холбоотой холбоотой зүйлийг зөв байдлыг хадгала NC11 Германы Англи, Англи, Герман, WMT Англи Германы өгөгдлийн сануудын үр дүнд бидний арга баримтыг 2 дахь стратегиудаас илүү үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн бидний туршилтууд хэмжээнд өндөр давхартай харьцуулахад, загварын бага давхар нь синтаксис мэдээллийг бүр синтактик загвар болон эцсийн үйлдвэрлэлээс илүү зөв байрлуулахад илүү зөв газар юм.', 'sr': 'Bilo je široko prepoznato da sintaksičke informacije mogu pomoći sistemima prevoda neuralnih mašina do kraja do kraja kako bi postigli bolji prevod. Da bi integrirali informacije o zavisnosti u NMT-u, postojeće pristupe ili iskoristili lokalne veze ovisnosti o glavi reči, ignorirajući njihove ne-lokalne komšije koje nose važan kontekst; ili približavaju sintaktičku vezu dvije reči njihovom relativnom udaljenosti na drvo zavisnosti, žrtvujući tačnost. Da bi se riješili ovih pitanja, predlažemo globalnu pozicionalnu kodiranje za drvo zavisnosti, novu šemu koja olakšava sintaktičnu vezu između svake dve reči sa zadržavanjem tačnosti i bez odmah ograničenja susjeda. Rezultati eksperimentacija na NC11 njemačkom engleskom, engleskom i WMT njemačkom podacima pokazuju da je naš pristup efikasniji od iznad dve strategije. Osim toga, naši eksperimenti kvantitativno pokazuju da u usporedbi sa višim slojevima, manji slojevi modela su ispravniji mjesti za uključenje sintaksičkih informacija u smislu preferencije svakog sloja sintaktičkog obrazaca i konačnog izvođenja.', 'si': 'වාක්ෂික තොරතුරු අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා පුළුවන් වාක්ෂික පද්ධතිය හොඳ වාක නිර්මාණකය අධිරූපකය NMT වලට විශේෂතා තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිශ්න වචන වලට ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිශ් නැත්තම් වචන දෙකක් වගේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙන්නේ නිර මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ස්ථානික සංකේතනයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, අළුත් සංකේතනයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් ව NC11 ජර්මන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය, ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ජර්මන් සහ WMT ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ජර්මන් දත්ත සේට් එකේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප ඒ වගේම, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි, මොඩේලයේ පහළ ස්ථානය තරම් හොඳ සැකසුම් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න හැම ස්ථානයේ ස', 'sv': 'Det har allmﾃ､nt erkﾃ､nts att syntaxinformation kan hjﾃ､lpa end-to-end neurala maskinﾃｶversﾃ､ttningssystem (NMT) att uppnﾃ･ bﾃ､ttre ﾃｶversﾃ､ttning. Fﾃｶr att integrera beroendeinformation i Transformer-baserade NMT utnyttjar befintliga tillvﾃ､gagﾃ･ngssﾃ､tt antingen ords lokala chefsberoende relationer och ignorerar deras icke-lokala grannar som bﾃ､r viktiga sammanhang; eller ungefﾃ､ra tvﾃ･ ords syntaktiska relation genom deras relativa avstﾃ･nd till beroendetrﾃ､det, offra exakthet. Fﾃｶr att lﾃｶsa dessa problem fﾃｶreslﾃ･r vi global positionskodning fﾃｶr beroendetrﾃ､d, ett nytt schema som underlﾃ､ttar syntaktisk relationsmodellering mellan tvﾃ･ ord med bibehﾃ･llen exakthet och utan omedelbar grannbegrﾃ､nsning. Experimentsresultat pﾃ･ NC11 tyska engelska, engelska tyska och WMT engelska tyska datauppsﾃ､ttningar visar att vﾃ･rt tillvﾃ､gagﾃ･ngssﾃ､tt ﾃ､r effektivare ﾃ､n ovanstﾃ･ende tvﾃ･ strategier. Dessutom visar vﾃ･ra experiment kvantitativt att lﾃ､gre lager i modellen jﾃ､mfﾃｶrt med hﾃｶgre lager ﾃ､r mer lﾃ､mpliga platser att infﾃｶrliva syntaxinformation i termer av varje lagers preferens till det syntaktiska mﾃｶnstret och den slutliga prestandan.', 'ur': 'سینٹکس معلومات کو اچھی ترجمہ حاصل کرنے کے لئے انتہائی نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) سیستموں کی مدد کر سکتی ہے۔ NMT بنیاد ترفنسٹر کی معلومات میں اعتمادی معلومات کو ترفنسٹر کرنے کے لئے موجود ہوتے ہیں یا کلمات کے سر-اعتمادی رابطہ کے مطابق استعمال کرتے ہیں، ان کے غیر محلی گھر والوں کو اہم کنٹنسٹ کے ساتھ اٹھانے کے لئے غفل یا تقریباً دو کلمات کا سینٹیکٹیک ارتباط ان کے مقابلہ دور کے ذریعہ سے مستقل درخت کے درخت کے ذریعہ قربانی کرتے ہیں۔ ہم ان مسائلوں کے بارے میں گلوبی موقعیت کا اکنوڈینگ ڈالتے ہیں، ایک نئی سیکھ جو ہر دو کلمات کے درمیان سینٹکتیک رابطہ موجود کرتی ہے، دقیق رکھنے کے ساتھ اور سریع محدودہ کے بغیر. NC11 جرمن انگلیسی، انگلیسی جرمن اور WMT انگلیسی جرمن ڈاٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا طریقہ دو استراتژی سے زیادہ مفید ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ، ہماری آزمائش محاسبہ طور پر دکھاتی ہے کہ بالاتر لائر کے مقابلہ میں، نمڈل کے نیچے لائر بہت مناسب جگہ ہیں کہ ہر لائر کی سینٹاکسی پٹرن اور آخری عملکرد کے مقابلہ میں سینٹکس معلومات کو جمع کریں.', 'so': 'Waxaa loo xaqiijiyey in macluumaadka kaalmada canshuuraha uu caawinayo tarjumaadka maskinada ee ugu dambaysa dhammaadka ugu dambeeya (NMT) nidaamka ah oo lagu sameyn karo turjumaan wanaagsan. Si aad u qabsato macluumaadka ku xirnaanta ee ku saabsan NMT-ku saleysan turjumista, waxyaabaha joogta ah ayaa isticmaalaya ama isticmaalaya xiriirka degmada ee degmada ah ee ku xiran, Iska tagista derisyadooda aan degmada ahayn oo qabanaya xaalad muhiim ah; ama xiriirka labada eray ee la xiriira xigaalka qaraabadooda ah ee geedka ku xiran, oo bixinaya cadaalad. Si aan u qabsado arrimahan, waxaan u soo jeedaynaa koodeynta booska ah ee caalamiga ah ee geedka ku xiran, qorshaha cusub oo u sahlinaya sameynta isku xiriirka oo u dhexeeya labada erayood oo xafida saxda iyo aan qasabka degdeg ah ee deriskiisa. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda tartixaanka afka Ingiriis, Ingiriis Jarmal iyo WMT-Ingiriis-ka-Ingiriis-Ingiriis-ka-qoraalka Jarmalka ah inay ka shaqeeyaan labada qoraalood. Imtixaankayada waxaa sidoo kale si qiyaas ah u muuqanaya in la barbardhigo sawirada s are, sawirada hoose ee modelkuna waa meelo aad u sahlan in la soo geliyo macluumaadka kaarista ee la xiriira qaababka sameynta iyo sameynta ugu dambeeya.', 'ta': '@ info: status சார்பு தகவல்களை மாற்றும் சார்ந்த NMT அடிப்படையில் ஒன்றாக சேர்க்க, உள்ளூர்ந்த நெறிமுறைகளை வார்த்தைகளின் உள்ளூர்ந்த தலைவர் சார்ந அல்லது இரண்டு வார்த்தைகளின் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தல் தொடர்புடன் அவர்களுடைய சார்ந்த மரத்தின் தூரத்தில் இருந்து, சரியான கொ இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை விளக்க, சார்ந்த மரத்திற்கு உலக நிலையான குறியீட்டை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், புதிய முறைமையை தேர்வு செய்யும் இரண்டு வ NC11 ஜெர்மன் ஆங்கிலம், ஆங்கிலம் ஜெர்மன் மற்றும் WMT ஆங்கிலம் ஜெர்மன் தரவு அமைப்புகளின் முடிவுகள் மேல் இரு திட்டங்களை விட மேலும மேலும், எங்கள் சோதனைகள் அளவில் காட்டுகிறது அதிக அடுக்குகளுடன் ஒப்பிட்டால், மாதிரியின் குறைந்த அடுக்குகள் சேர்க்க வேண்டிய இடங்கள் ஒவ்வொரு அடுக்கும்', 'uz': "@ info Transformer asosidagi NMT asosida qo'llangan maʼlumotni birlashtirish uchun mavjud holatlarni qo'llash uchun lokal asosiy boshqaruvchisi huquqlarini qo'llash mumkin. or approximate two words' syntactic relation by their relative distance on the dependency tree, sacrificing exactness.  Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun, biz tashqi daraxtga, yangi qolip, ikkita so'zlar orasidagi bir xil munosabatlarni aniqlash imkoniyatlariga foydalanishini istasangiz va hozirga murakkab bo'lmaydi. Name Ko'rib, bizning tajribalarimizni ko'paytirishni ko'rsatadi, yuqori qatlamlar bilan kamaytirish, modelning kichik qatlamlari bir qatlamning syntaktik maʼlumotini qo'shish uchun juda yaxshi joylari, har qatlam tizimga va oxirgi imkoniyatlarni qo'shish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Thông tin cú pháp có thể giúp kết thúc hệ thống dịch chuyển máy thần kinh (NMB) để có thể dịch tốt hơn. Để cho thông tin phụ thuộc vào công ty biến áp, các phương pháp tồn tại có thể sử dụng các mối quan hệ dựa trên đầu của từ ngữ, lờ đi những người hàng xóm không địa phương mang lại quan trọng. hoặc gần gũi hai từ ngữ liên quan theo khoảng cách tương đối với cái cây phụ thuộc, hy sinh chính xác. Để giải quyết những vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị xếp hình vị thế toàn cầu cho cây độ phụ thuộc, một kế hoạch mới giúp tạo mối quan hệ nhào lộn giữa hai từ với giữ phẩm chất và không ràng buộc hàng xóm. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên Thống kê Anh quốc Đức, Anh Đức và WRT Đức cho thấy hệ thống dữ liệu của chúng tôi hiệu quả hơn hai phương pháp trên. Hơn nữa, các thí nghiệm của chúng tôi về mặt lượng cho thấy rằng so với các lớp lớn, lớp dưới của mô hình là những nơi thích hợp hơn để chứa thông tin cú pháp về mỗi lớp ưu tiên cho cấu trúc cú pháp và hiệu suất cuối cùng.', 'hr': 'Bilo je široko prepoznato da sintaksijske informacije mogu pomoći sustavima prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT) do kraja do kraja postići bolji prevod. Kako bi integrirali informacije o zavisnosti u NMT-u bazirane na transformatoru, postojeći pristupi ili iskorištavaju odnose lokalnih riječi ovisnih o glavi, ignorirajući svoje ne-lokalne susjede koje nose važan kontekst; ili približavaju sintaktičku vezu dvije riječi njihovom relativnom udaljenosti na drvo zavisnosti, žrtvujući točnost. Za rješavanje tih pitanja predlažemo globalno pozicionalno kodiranje za drvo zavisnosti, novu šemu koja olakšava sintaktičnu vezu s modelima svake dvije riječi sa održavanjem tačnosti i bez odmah ograničenja susjeda. Rezultati iskustva na njemačkom engleskom, engleskom i WMT njemačkom podacima NC11 pokazuju da je naš pristup učinkovitiji od iznad dvije strategije. Osim toga, naši eksperimenti kvantitativno pokazuju da u usporedbi s višim slojevima, niži slojevi modela su ispravniji mjesti za uključenje sintaksičkih informacija u smislu preferencije svakog sloja sintaktičkog obrazaca i konačnog učinka.', 'da': 'Det er blevet almindeligt anerkendt, at syntaksinformation kan hjælpe end-to-end neurale maskinoversættelsessystemer (NMT) til at opnå bedre oversættelse. For at integrere afhængighedsoplysninger i Transformer baseret NMT, udnytter eksisterende tilgange enten ords lokale hovedafhængige relationer og ignorerer deres ikke-lokale naboer, der bærer vigtig kontekst; eller omtrentlige to ords syntaktiske relation ved deres relative afstand til afhængighedstræet, ofre nøjagtigheden. For at løse disse problemer foreslår vi global positionskodning for afhængighedstræ, et nyt skema, der letter syntaktisk relationsmodellering mellem to ord med bevarelse af nøjagtighed og uden umiddelbar nabobegrænsning. Eksperimentelle resultater på NC11 tysk engelsk, engelsk tysk og WMT engelsk tysk datasæt viser, at vores tilgang er mere effektiv end de to ovennævnte strategier. Desuden viser vores eksperimenter kvantitativt, at lavere lag af modellen sammenlignet med højere lag er mere passende steder at indarbejde syntaksinformation i forhold til hvert lag præference for det syntaktiske mønster og den endelige ydeevne.', 'de': 'Es ist weithin anerkannt, dass Syntaxinformationen End-to-End-neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzungssystemen (NMT) helfen können, eine bessere Übersetzung zu erreichen. Um Abhängigkeitsinformationen in Transformer-basierte NMT zu integrieren, nutzen bestehende Ansätze entweder die lokalen head-abhängigen Beziehungen von Wörtern und ignorieren ihre nicht-lokalen Nachbarn, die wichtigen Kontext haben; oder approximieren Sie die syntaktische Beziehung zweier Wörter durch ihren relativen Abstand zum Abhängigkeitsbaum, wobei Genauigkeit geopfert wird. Um diese Probleme anzugehen, schlagen wir eine globale Positionskodierung für Abhängigkeitsbaum vor, ein neues Schema, das syntaktische Relationsmodellierung zwischen beliebigen zwei Wörtern mit Beibehaltung der Genauigkeit und ohne unmittelbare Nachbarbeschränkung ermöglicht. Experimente mit NC11 German English, Englisch German und WMT English German Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser Ansatz effektiver ist als die oben genannten beiden Strategien. Darüber hinaus zeigen unsere Experimente quantitativ, dass niedrigere Schichten des Modells im Vergleich zu höheren Schichten geeignetere Orte sind, um Syntaxinformationen in Bezug auf die Präferenz jeder Ebene gegenüber dem syntaktischen Muster und die endgültige Leistung zu integrieren.', 'bg': 'Широко признато е, че синтаксисната информация може да помогне на системите за невронен машинен превод от край до край (НМТ) да постигнат по-добър превод. За да се интегрира информацията за зависимостта в базираната на трансформатор НМТ, съществуващите подходи или използват локалните отношения между главата и главата на думите, игнорирайки техните неместни съседи, носещи важен контекст; или приблизителна синтактична връзка на две думи чрез относителното им разстояние от дървото на зависимостта, жертвайки точността. За да се справим с тези проблеми, предлагаме глобално позиционно кодиране за дървото на зависимостта, нова схема, която улеснява синтактичното моделиране на отношенията между всяка две думи с запазване на точността и без непосредствено съседско ограничение. Резултатите от експериментите с данни показват, че нашият подход е по-ефективен от горепосочените две стратегии. В допълнение, нашите експерименти количествено показват, че в сравнение с по-високите слоеве, по-ниските слоеве на модела са по-подходящи места за включване на синтаксисната информация по отношение на предпочитанията на всеки слой към синтактичния модел и крайната производителност.', 'nl': 'Het is algemeen erkend dat syntaxisinformatie end-to-end neural machine translation (NMT) systemen kan helpen om betere vertaling te bereiken. Om afhankelijkheidsinformatie te integreren in Transformer gebaseerde NMT, gebruiken bestaande benaderingen ofwel de lokale head-afhankelijke relaties van woorden, waarbij hun niet-lokale buren belangrijke context negeren; of benader de syntactische relatie van twee woorden door hun relatieve afstand tot de afhankelijkheidsboom, waarbij nauwkeurigheid wordt opgeofferd. Om deze problemen aan te pakken, stellen we globale positionele codering voor de afhankelijkheidsboom voor, een nieuw schema dat syntactische relatiemodellering tussen twee woorden vergemakkelijkt met behoud van nauwkeurigheid en zonder directe buurman beperkingen. Experimentele resultaten op NC11 Duits Engels, Engels Duits en WMT Engels Duits datasets tonen aan dat onze aanpak effectiever is dan de bovenstaande twee strategieën. Daarnaast tonen onze experimenten kwantitatief aan dat in vergelijking met hogere lagen lagere lagen van het model meer geschikte plaatsen zijn om syntaxisinformatie op te nemen in termen van de voorkeur van elke laag voor het syntactische patroon en de uiteindelijke prestaties.', 'ko': '사람들은 문법 정보가 끝에서 끝까지의 신경기계 번역(NMT) 시스템이 더욱 좋은 번역을 실현하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있다고 보편적으로 생각한다.의존 정보를 변환기 기반 NMT에 집적하기 위해 기존의 방법은 단어의 국부 머리 의존 관계를 이용하거나 중요한 상하문을 가진 비국부 이웃을 무시한다.또는 나무의 상대적인 거리에 의존하여 두 단어의 문법 관계와 비슷하게 함으로써 정확성을 희생한다.이러한 문제점을 해결하기 위해 우리는 트리에 의존하는 전역 위치 인코딩을 제기했다. 이것은 새로운 방안으로 정확성과 근린의 제약을 받지 않는 상황에서 임의의 두 단어 간의 문법 관계를 모델링하는 데 도움이 된다.NC11 독일어, 영어-독일어, WMT 영어-독일어 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 따르면 우리의 방법은 상술한 두 가지 전략보다 더욱 효과적이다.그 밖에 우리의 실험은 고위층에 비해 모델의 하층부는 각 층이 문법 모델에 대한 선호와 최종 성능에 따라 문법 정보를 통합하는 데 더욱 적합하다는 것을 정량적으로 나타냈다.', 'id': "Sudah dikenal secara luas bahwa informasi sintaks dapat membantu sistem terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) akhir-akhir untuk mencapai terjemahan yang lebih baik. Untuk mengintegrasikan informasi dependensi ke NMT berdasarkan Transformer, pendekatan yang ada baik mengeksploitasi hubungan setempat yang tergantung pada kepala kata, mengabaikan tetangga bukan lokal mereka yang membawa konteks penting; atau kira-kira hubungan sintaks dua kata dengan jarak relatif mereka pada pohon dependensi, mengorbankan ketepatan. To address these issues, we propose global positional encoding for dependency tree, a new scheme that facilitates syntactic relation modeling between any two words with keeping exactness and without immediate neighbor constraint.  Hasil eksperimen pada NC11 German English, English German dan WMT German datasets menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita lebih efektif dari dua strategi di atas. In addition, our experiments quantitatively show that compared with higher layers, lower layers of the model are more proper places to incorporate syntax information in terms of each layer's preference to the syntactic pattern and the final performance.", 'fa': 'به وسیله شناخته شده است که اطلاعات سنتاکس می\u200cتواند سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cی ماشین عصبی (NMT) را به پایان رساندن به ترجمه بهتر کمک کند. برای تغییر اطلاعات بستگی به NMT بنیاد تغییر دهنده، دسترسی موجود هستند یا ارتباط بستگی به کلمات محلی استفاده می کنند، با نادیده گرفتن همسایه های غیر محلی که دارند محیط مهم را حمل می کنند. یا تقریباً ارتباط سنتاکتیک دو کلمه با فاصله نسبت به درخت بستگی، قربانی دقیق است. برای حل این مسائل، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که رمزبندی موقعیت جهانی برای درخت بستگی، نقشه\u200cای جدید که رابطه\u200cهای سنتاکتیک بین هر دو کلمه با نگه داشتن دقیق و بدون محدودیت همسایه فوری آسان می\u200cکند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cهای NC11 انگلیسی آلمانی، انگلیسی آلمانی و WMT داده\u200cهای آلمانی آلمانی نشان می\u200cدهند که دستور ما بیشتر از دو استراتژی بالا موثر است. علاوه بر این، آزمایشات ما به اندازه اندازه\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهند که در مقایسه با طبقه\u200cهای بالاتر، طبقه\u200cهای پایین\u200cتر از مدل جاهای مناسب\u200cترند تا اطلاعات ویژه\u200cسازی را در نظر ترجیح هر طبقه\u200cای از الگوی ویژه\u200cسازی و عملکرد نهای', 'af': "Dit is heeltemal herken dat sintaks inligting kan help die end- to- end neural masjien vertaling (NMT) stelsels om beter vertaling te bereik. Om afhanklikheid-inligting in Transformer-gebaseerde NMT te integreer, bestaande toegang tot die plaaslike kopafhanklike verhouding van woorde of uitbreiding van die plaaslike kop-afhanklike verbindings, wat hulle nie-plaaslike naboeste wat belangrik konteks dra, ignoreer; of omtrent twee woorde se sintaktieke verhouding deur hulle relatiewe afstand op die afhanklikheidsboom, wat presies geoffer. Om hierdie probleme te raak, voorstel ons globale posisiele enkodering vir afhanklikheidsboom, 'n nuwe skema wat sintaksiese verwanting modelleer tussen enige twee woorde met presies en sonder onmiddelike naboeste beheinde te hou. Eksperiment resultate op NC11 Duits Engels, Engels Duits en WMT Engels Duits datastelle vertoon dat ons toegang meer effektief is as die bo twee strategies. In addition, our experiments quantitatively show that compared with higher layer s, lower layers of the model are more proper places to incorporate syntax information in terms of each layer's preference to the syntactic pattern and the final performance.", 'am': 'የሲንካስር መረጃዎች መጨረሻ እስከ መጨረሻ የናዌብ መሣሪያን ትርጉም (NMT) ስርዓቶች ለመግኘት ይችላል፡፡ በተመሳሳይ መረጃዎች ወደ ተርጓሚው ወደNMT ለመቀላቀል፣ የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች የቃላቸውን የአገራዊ ራስ-የታመነ ግንኙነት ለመጠቀም፣ የግንኙነት ጎረቤቶቻቸውን አስቸጋሪ ግንኙነት በመሸከም ይችላሉ፡፡ ወይም የሁለት ቃላት የስናታዊ ግንኙነት የጎረቤታቸው ግንኙነት በአዳራዊ ዛፍ ላይ ያሳርፋል፡፡ እነዚህን ጉዳዮች ለመቀበል፣ በአለምላዊ ቦታዊ የኢንተርነት ዛፍ፣ በሁለቱ ቃላት መካከል እውነተኛውን እና የአገር ባልንጀራው ግድ ሳይኖር የስንታታዊ ግንኙነት ማሰናከል የሚያስፈልገውን አዲስ ፕሮግራም እና አዲስ ጉዳይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የNC11 የጀርመን እንግሊዘኛ፣ እንግሊዘኛ ጀርመን እና WMT የጀርመን አጀርመን ዳታተሮችን የፍጻሜ ውጤቶች ከሁለቱ ተቃውሞ ይልቅ የበለጠ እንደሆነ ያሳያል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ፈተናዎቻችን ከላይኛው ደረጃዎች ጋር እንደተካፈሉ፣ የሞዴል ደረጃዎች ታናሹ የአንዱን ደረጃዎች ከስናክስቲክ መረጃዎች እና የመጨረሻውን ፍጻሜ በመጠቀም የሚሻል ስፍራዎች ናቸው፡፡', 'sw': 'Imetambuliwa vizuri kwamba taarifa za kodi zinaweza kusaidia kutafsiri mashine ya asili ya mwisho (NMT) ili kupata tafsiri bora zaidi. Ili kuunganisha taarifa za kutegemea katika NMT yenye asili ya Transfer, mbinu zinazopo au kutekeleza mahusiano ya awali yenye tegemea maneno, kuacha majirani zao wasio na maeneo muhimu yanayobeba mazingira; au takriban uhusiano wa maneno mawili kwa umbali wao wa karibu kwenye mti wa kutegemea, kutoa ukweli. Ili kukabiliana na masuala haya, tunapendekeza kodi ya kimataifa kwa mti wa kutegemea, mpango mpya unaosaidia muundo wa ushirikiano kati ya maneno yoyote mawili kwa kuendelea ukweli na bila kuzuia vizuizi vya jirani. Matokeo ya majaribio yanayotokana na NC11 Ujerumani, Kiingereza na taarifa za Kiingereza za za Kijerumani na WMT yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zetu zina ufanisi zaidi ya mbinu mbili zilizopita. Zaidi ya hayo, majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kwa kiasi kikubwa kwamba ukilinganishwa na vipande vya juu, vipande vya chini vya mifano ni maeneo sahihi zaidi ya kuingiza taarifa za kodi kwa namna ya upendeleo wa kila daraja na utendaji wa mwisho.', 'tr': "Sintaks maglumaty gowy terjime etmek üçin soňra näyral maşynyň terjime edilmesine kömek edip biler. NMT'a bağlyklyk maglumatyny terjime etmek üçin bar ýaly sözleriniň kelli baglanyşyny ulanmak üçin, ýerleri-ýerleri goňşularynyň möhüm konteksti ýok edýändigini bilmeýär; ýa-da iki sözüň sintaktik baglaýyşyny baglanylyk agajynda görä derejesi boýunça berýär. Bu meselelere çözmek üçin, biz dünýädäki möhüm agaç üçin ýerleşýän ködleme teklip edýäris, täze bir taslaýyn. Bu iki söz arasynda düzgün bolup we derejäk goňşularyň çykarmasyny kömekleyär. Näme üçin örän jalyklaryň netijesi NC11 Almança, iňlisçe, Almança we WMT Iňlisçe geýimçe datasetleri biziň metodamyzyň iki stratejiden has gowydygyny görkezýär. Hemmämiz deneylerimiz ýokary katylar bilen karşılaştyrylýan şekilde, modelleriň aşak katylary syntaks maglumatyny her katyň syntaks döwletlerinden we soňky täblisasynyň tercihleri bilen birleşdirmek üçin has gowy ýerler däldir.", 'sq': 'Është njohur gjerësisht se informacioni sintaks mund të ndihmojë sistemet e përkthimit të makinave nervore nga fundi në fund (NMT) për të arritur përkthimin më të mirë. Për të integruar informacionin e varësisë në NMT me qendër në Transformer, qasjet ekzistuese ose shfrytëzojnë marrëdhëniet lokale të varura nga koka e fjalëve, duke injoruar fqinjët e tyre jo-lokalë që mbajnë kontekst të rëndësishëm; ose rreth dy fjalë lidhje sintaktike me distancën e tyre relative mbi pemën e varësisë, duke sakrifikuar saktësinë. Për të trajtuar këto çështje, ne propozojmë kodimin pozitiv global për pemën e varësisë, një skemë të re që lehtëson modelimin e marrëdhënieve sintaktike midis çdo dy fjalësh me mbajtjen e saktësisë dhe pa kufizime të menjëhershme fqinjë. Experiment results on NC11 German English, English German and WMT English German datasets show that our approach is more effective than the above two strategies.  Përveç kësaj, eksperimentet tona tregojnë në mënyrë kuantitative se krahasuar me shtresa më të larta, shtresa më të ulta të modelit janë vende më të përshtatshme për të përfshirë informacionin sintaks në lidhje me preferimin e çdo shtrese ndaj modelit sintaktik dhe performancës përfundimtare.', 'bn': 'এটি ব্যাপক স্বীকার করা হয়েছে যে সিন্ক্যাক্স তথ্য শেষ পর্যন্ত নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) সিস্টেম সমাপ্তি করতে সাহায্ ট্রান্সফার্ন ভিত্তিক এনএমটিতে নির্ভরিত তথ্য একত্রিত করার জন্য, বিদ্যমান উপেক্ষা করা হচ্ছে শব্দের স্থানীয় প্রধান-নির্ভরিত সম্ অথবা তাদের আত্মীয় দূরত্ব বৃক্ষের মাধ্যমে দুই শব্দের সিন্ট্যাক্টিক সম্পর্কের প্রায় দুই শব্দের সম্পর্ক, যারা স এই বিষয়গুলোর বিষয়গুলোর সাথে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা বিশ্বের নির্ভর গাছের জন্য বিশ্বের অবস্থান কোডিং প্রস্তাব করি, একটি নতুন পরিকল্পনা যা দুই শব্দের মধ্যে স এনসি১১ জার্মানী, ইংরেজী জার্মানী এবং উইএমটি ইংরেজী জার্মান ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে উপরের দুই কৌশলের চেয় এছাড়াও, আমাদের পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষার পরিমাণ পরিমাণ পরিমাণ দেখাচ্ছে যে উচ্চ পর্যায়ের সাথে তুলনা করা হয়েছে, মডেলের নীচের পরিস্থিতি সিন্ট্যাক্স তথ্য প্রত', 'hy': 'Շատ լավ ընդունված է, որ սինտաքսի ինֆորմացիան կարող է օգնել վերջ-վերջ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) համակարգերին ավելի լավ թարգմանել: Որպեսզի կախվածության տեղեկատվությունը ներգրավվի Թանֆորմերի հիմնված ՆՄԹ-ի մեջ, գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները կամ օգտագործում են բառերի գլխավոր կախվածություն ունեցող տեղական հարաբերությունները, անտեսելով իրենց ոչ տեղական հարևան կամ մոտավորապես երկու բառի սինտակտիկ հարաբերությունը կախվածության ծառի հարաբերական հեռավորության վրա, զոհաբերելով ճշմարտությունը: Այս խնդիրներին լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք գլոբալ կոդավորումը կախվածության ծառի համար, նոր համակարգ, որը հեշտացնում է սինտակտիկ հարաբերությունները մոդելավորելու ցանկացած երկու բառի միջև ճշգրտության պահպանելով և առանց անմիջական հարևանների սա NC11-ի գերմաներեն անգլերեն, անգլերեն գերմաներեն և Անգլերեն Անգլերեն տվյալների համակարգերը ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը ավելի արդյունավետ է, քան վերևում գտնվող երկու ռազմավարությունները: Ավելին, մեր փորձարկումները քանակությամբ ցույց են տալիս, որ համեմատած բարձր շերտերի հետ, մոդելի ցածր շերտերը ավելի ճիշտ տեղեր են ներառելու սինտաքսի տեղեկատվությունը յուրաքանչյուր շերտի սինտակտիկ կաղապարի և վերջնական արտադրողության առումով:', 'az': 'Sintaks məlumatının daha yaxşı tercümə yetirmək üçün end-to-end nöral maşın tərcümə sistemlərinə kömək edə biləcəyini çox tanındı. NMT tabanlı Transformer təvəkküllük məlumatlarını birləşdirmək üçün, mövcud sözlərin yerli başlıq bağlı ilişkilerini istifadə etmək üçün, mövcud məlumatlarını daşıyan yerli qonşularını görməyə çalışır; yaxud iki sözün sintaktik ilişkisi, bağımlılıq ağacının qohumluğu ilə müəyyən edilən, həqiqəti qurbanlıq edərlər. Bu məsələləri çəkmək üçün, müvəffəqiyyət a ğacının küresel pozisyonal kodlamasını təklif edirik. Yeni bir taslaq ki, hər iki söz arasında sintaktik ilişki modellərini düzgün tutmaq və müddətli qonşu sıxıntısı olmayan hər iki söz arasında asanlaşdırır. NC11 Almanca İngilizce, İngilizce və WMT İngilizce Almanca verilənlərin təcrübələrinin sonuçları göstərir ki, bizim təcrübəmizin iki stratejidən daha etkilidir. Əvvəlcə, təcrübələrimiz çox yüksək s əviyyələrlə qarşılaşdığını göstərir ki, modellərin düşük səviyyələri sintaksi məlumatlarını hər səviyyənin sintaktik şəklindən və son performansından istifadə etmək üçün daha düzgün yerlərdir.', 'cs': 'Je všeobecně uznáno, že syntaxní informace mohou pomoci end-to-end neuronovým strojovým překladem (NMT) systémům k dosažení lepšího překladu. Za účelem integrace informací o závislosti do transformátoru založených na NMT existující přístupy buď využívají lokálních vztahů slov závislých na hlavě a ignorují jejich nemístní sousedy nesoucí důležitý kontext; nebo přibližujte syntaktický vztah dvou slov jejich relativní vzdáleností od stromu závislosti, což obětuje přesnost. Pro řešení těchto problémů navrhujeme globální polohové kódování pro strom závislostí, nové schéma, které usnadňuje syntaktické modelování vztahů mezi libovolnými dvěma slovy s zachováním přesnosti a bez omezení bezprostředního souseda. Výsledky experimentů na NC11 německé angličtině, anglické němčině a WMT angličtině němčině ukazují, že náš přístup je efektivnější než výše uvedené dvě strategie. Kromě toho naše experimenty kvantitativně ukazují, že ve srovnání s vyššími vrstvami jsou nižší vrstvy modelu správnějšími místy pro začlenění syntaktických informací z hlediska preference každé vrstvy syntaktickému vzoru a konečného výkonu.', 'et': 'On laialdaselt tunnustatud, et süntaksiinfo võib aidata end-to-end neuronal masintõlke (NMT) süsteemidel saavutada parem tõlge. Sõltuvusteabe integreerimiseks transformaatoril põhinevasse NMT-sse kasutavad olemasolevad lähenemisviisid kas sõnade kohalikke peasõltuvaid suhteid, ignoreerides olulist konteksti kandvaid mittekohalikke naabreid; või ligikaudne kahe sõna süntaktiline seos nende suhtelise kauguse järgi sõltuvuspuust, ohverdades täpsuse. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks pakume välja sõltuvuspuu globaalse positsioonikodeerimise, uue skeemi, mis hõlbustab süntaktilist seose modelleerimist mis tahes kahe sõna vahel, säilitades täpsuse ja ilma vahetute naaberpiiranguteta. Katsetulemused NC11 saksa, inglise saksa ja WMT inglise saksa andmekogumite kohta näitavad, et meie lähenemine on tõhusam kui eespool nimetatud kaks strateegiat. Lisaks näitavad meie eksperimendid kvantitatiivselt, et võrreldes kõrgemate kihtidega on mudeli alumised kihid sobivamad kohad süntaksiinfo lisamiseks, arvestades iga kihi eelistusi süntaksilisele mustrile ja lõplikule jõudlusele.', 'ca': "S'ha reconegut ampliament que la informació de sintaxis pot ajudar els sistemes de traducció neural de màquines (NMT) a aconseguir una millor traducció. In order to integrate dependency information into Transformer based NMT, existing approaches either exploit words' local head-dependent relations, ignoring their non-local neighbors carrying important context;  o aproximadament la relació sinàctica de dues paraules per la seva distància relativa a l'arbre de dependencia, sacrificant l'exactitud. Per abordar aquests problemes, proposem codificació de posició global per a l'arbre de dependencia, un nou esquema que facilita la modelació sinàctica de relacions entre dues paraules mantenint exactitut i sense restriccions immediates del veí. Els resultats experimentals dels conjunts de dades alemanys anglès, anglès alemany i anglès WMT mostran que el nostre enfocament és més efectiu que les dues estratègies anteriors. A més, els nostres experiments demostren quantitativament que comparats amb capes més altes, les capes més baixes del model s ón llocs més adequats per incorporar informació de sintaxi en termes de preferència de cada cape al patró s in àctic i el rendiment final.", 'bs': 'Bilo je široko prepoznato da sintaksičke informacije mogu pomoći sustavima prevoda neuralnih strojeva do kraja do kraja kako bi postigli bolji prevod. Kako bi integrirali informacije o zavisnosti u NMT-u na transformatoru, postojeći pristupi ili iskorištavaju lokalne veze ovisnih o glavi riječi, ignorirajući njihove ne-lokalne susjede koje nose važan kontekst; ili približava sintaktičku vezu dvije riječi njihovom relativnom udaljenosti na drvo zavisnosti, žrtvovanje tačnosti. Da bi se riješili ovih pitanja, predlažemo globalnu pozicionalnu kodiranje za drvo zavisnosti, novu šemu koja olakšava sintaktičnu vezu između bilo koje dvije riječi sa zadržavanjem tačnosti i bez odmah ograničenja susjeda. Rezultati iskustva na njemačkom engleskom, engleskom, njemačkom i WMT Engleskom podacima NC11 pokazuju da je naš pristup efikasniji od iznad dvije strategije. Osim toga, naši eksperimenti kvantitativno pokazuju da u usporedbi sa višim slojevima, manji slojevi modela su ispravniji mjesti za uključenje sintaksičkih informacija u smislu preferencije svakog sloja sintaktičkog obrazaca i konačnog izvođenja.', 'fi': 'On yleisesti tunnustettu, että syntaksitiedot voivat auttaa end-to-end neuron konekäännösjärjestelmää (NMT) parempaan käännökseen. Jotta riippuvuustiedot voitaisiin integroida Transformer-pohjaiseen NMT:hen, olemassa olevat lähestymistavat joko hyödyntävät sanojen paikallisia pää-riippuvaisia suhteita unohtamatta niiden ei-paikallisia naapureita, joilla on tärkeä konteksti; tai likimääräinen kahden sanan syntaktinen suhde niiden suhteellinen etäisyys riippuvuuspuusta uhraten tarkkuuden. Näiden ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme riippuvuuspuun maailmanlaajuista paikannuskoodausta, uutta järjestelmää, joka helpottaa syntaktista suhdemallinnusta minkä tahansa sanan välillä pitäen tarkkuuden ja ilman välittömiä naapurirajoituksia. NC11:n saksan, englannin saksan ja WMT:n englannin saksan aineistojen koetulokset osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme on tehokkaampi kuin edellä mainitut kaksi strategiaa. Lisäksi kokeemme osoittavat kvantitatiivisesti, että korkeampiin kerroksiin verrattuna mallin alemmat kerrokset ovat oikeampia paikkoja sisällyttää syntaksitietoa suhteessa kunkin kerroksen mieltymykseen syntaktiseen kuvioon ja lopulliseen suorituskykyyn.', 'sk': 'Splošno je bilo priznano, da lahko sintaksne informacije pomagajo sistemom nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) od konca do konca doseči boljši prevod. Za vključitev informacij o odvisnosti v NMT, ki temelji na transformatorjih, obstoječi pristopi bodisi izkoriščajo lokalne odnose besed od glave, pri čemer ne upoštevajo lokalnih sosedov, ki nosijo pomemben kontekst; ali približno sintaktično razmerje dveh besed z relativno razdaljo od drevesa odvisnosti, žrtvovanje točnosti. Za reševanje teh vprašanj predlagamo globalno pozicijsko kodiranje drevesa odvisnosti, novo shemo, ki omogoča sintaktično modeliranje relacij med katerim koli dvema besedama z ohranjanjem točnosti in brez neposrednih sosedskih omejitev. Rezultati eksperimentov na NC11 angleščini, angleščini nemščine in WMT angleščini podatkov kažejo, da je naš pristop učinkovitejši od zgoraj navedenih dveh strategij. Poleg tega so naši eksperimenti kvantitativno pokazali, da so v primerjavi z višjimi plastmi spodnje plasti modela bolj primerna mesta za vključitev sintaksnih informacij v smislu preference vsake plasti do sintaktičnega vzorca in končne uspešnosti.', 'he': 'הוכר באופן רחב כי מידע סינטקסי יכול לעזור למערכות התרגום של מכונות עצביות (NMT) סוף-סוף להשיג תרגום טוב יותר. על מנת להשתלב מידע על תלויות אל NMT מבוסס Transformer, גישות קיימות או לנצל מערכות יחסים מקומיות תלויות בראש של מילים, להתעלם מהשכנים הלא מקומיים שלהם נושאים קשר חשוב; או להקריב יחסים סינטקטיים של שתי מילים על ידי מרחק יחסי שלהם על עץ ההתלויות, להקריב בדיוק. כדי להתמודד עם הנושאים האלה, אנו מציעים קידום מקומי גלובלי לעץ התלויות, תכנית חדשה שמקלה את הדוגמה של יחסים סינטאקטיים בין כל שתי מילים עם שמירה מדויקת ללא מחסומים שכנים מיידיים. Experiment results on NC11 German English, English German and WMT English German datasets show that our approach is more effective than the above two strategies.  בנוסף, הניסויים שלנו מראים באופן קיבוטיבי כי בהשוואה עם שכבות גבוהות יותר, שכבות נמוכות של המודל הם מקומות יותר מתאימים להכיל מידע סינטקסי במונחים של העדיפות של כל שכבה לדפוס סינטקסי והביצוע הסופי.', 'ha': "An gane shi widely a gane cewa information za'a iya amfani da fassarar ɗin neural na ƙari zuwa-ƙari (NMT) na'ura don ya sami fassarar da mafi kyau. In order to integrate dependency information into Transformer based NMT, existing approaches either exploit words' local head-dependent relations, ignoring their non-local neighbors carrying important context;  Ko kuwa karimci na maganar biyu sun yi syntactic a kan danginsu a kan itãcen dabĩno, abin da ya bãyar da baiko. To, dõmin ka yi tambaya ga masu cikin wannan masu husũma, Munã buɗa kodi na global kode wa itãce ta dõgara, wata na'urar kwamfyuta wanda ke da amfani da shirin haɗi da muhimmanci a tsakanin duk maganar biyu da za'a tsare gaskiyar da kuma bã da lazimta mai kusa. Matariya a kan NC11 Jarman Ingiriya, Ingiriya da Ingiriya da WMT na Ingiriya na Ingiriya, yana nũna cewa hanyoyinmu yana da mafiya amfani ko da takwai biyu. Da wannan, jarrabõyinmu ke iya ƙayyade, a sami da zane-zane mafi girma, zane-zane ƙasƙanci na motel sun fi zama masu tsari dõmin a shigar da ma'anar cikin kowace-zane ta fi son tsarin hancin syntactic da na ƙarami.", 'jv': 'Punika andhados akeh langkung sampeyan seneng sistem sing bisa nglanggar tarjamahan sampeyan (NMT), sistem sing dibutuhke tarjamahan sing luwih. Ngubah penting nggawe informasi dipunangé karo Transformer sing basa NMT, sampeyan sing isih saben nggawe gerakan kelas gambarang kelas dipunangé keamanan lokal echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Rasané iki, kita mudhaya akeh kode persilangan dipunangé nggawe punika, akeh sistem anyar sing perusahaan winih dhéwé kuwi modalat sing nguasakno sistem sing perusahaan kelas wae sampeyan iki word sing dirangkat dhéwé, lan akeh nguasakno tambah nggawe gerakan sampeyan tambah. Rasané perambut nang ingles, alaman, alaman karo dataset alaman, WWT kuwi alaman sing ngenanyisa tambah apik sing luwih apik sing katêpakan karo padha iki. layer s-action', 'bo': "འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྣེ་མང་ཤོས་འཆར་བྱུང་ཡོད་པ་ལྟ་བུའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཆ་གིས་end-to-end neural machine translation དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་NMT ཡང་ན་དེ་ཚོའི་ཐག་རིང་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་པའི་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་དབར་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་པ་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རེད། གནད་དོན་འདི་དག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ན། ང་ཚོས་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཨིན་རྟགས་འབྲེལ་བའི་དབུས་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གསར་པ་ཞི Experiment results on NC11 German English, English and WMT English German datasets show that our approach is more effective than the above two strategies. In addition, our experiments quantitatively show that compared with higher layer s, lower layers of the model are more proper places to incorporate syntax information in terms of each layer's preference to the syntactic pattern and the final performance."}
{'en': 'Towards Sentiment Analysis of Tobacco Products’ Usage in Social Media', 'pt': 'Em direção à análise de sentimento do uso de produtos de tabaco nas mídias sociais', 'ar': 'نحو تحليل المشاعر لاستخدام منتجات التبغ في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي', 'fr': "Vers une analyse du sentiment concernant l'utilisation des produits du tabac sur les réseaux sociaux", 'es': 'Hacia un análisis de sentimientos sobre el uso de productos de tabaco en las redes sociales', 'zh': '情析于社交媒体', 'ru': 'На пути к сентиментальному анализу использования табачных изделий в социальных сетях', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアにおけるタバコ製品の使用感情分析に向けて', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया में तंबाकू उत्पादों के उपयोग के भावना विश्लेषण की ओर', 'ga': 'I dTreo Anailís Mothúchán ar Úsáid Táirgí Tobac sna Meáin Shóisialta', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიაში გამოყენება ტუბაკო პროდისტების გარეშე', 'el': 'Προς την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων της χρήσης προϊόντων καπνού στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης', 'hu': 'A dohánytermékek közösségi médiában történő használatának érzelmi elemzése felé', 'it': "Verso l'analisi sentimentale dell'uso dei prodotti del tabacco nei social media", 'kk': 'Тобак продукттардың қолдануын социалдық медиақтардағы Sentiment Analysis Towards', 'mk': 'Надвор кон анализа на чувствата на употребата на производите од тутун во социјалните медиуми', 'lt': 'Tobako produktų naudojimo socialinėje žiniasklaidoje jautrumo analizės link', 'ms': 'Menuju Analisi Sentiment Penggunaan Produk Tabak dalam Media Sosial', 'mt': "Towards Sentiment Analysis of Tobacco Products' Usage in Social Media", 'ml': 'ടോബാക്കോ പ്രൊട്ടാക്റ്റുകളുടെ ഉപയോഗം സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയിലേക്ക് സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്വേഷിക്കുക', 'mn': "Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглээний Sentiment Analysis of Tobacco Products' Use in Social Media руу", 'sr': 'Prema sentimentnoj analizi upotrebe proizvoda tabake u socijalnim medijima', 'pl': 'W kierunku analizy sentymentów wykorzystania wyrobów tytoniowych w mediach społecznościowych', 'ro': 'Către analiza sentimentelor utilizării produselor din tutun în rețelele sociale', 'no': 'Gå til sentidssanalysen av bruk av tobakprodukter i sosiale mediar', 'so': 'Analyse of Tobacco manufactureedka ee sooshalka', 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමත්වයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශ්ලේෂණය', 'ta': "Tobacco Products' Usage in Social Media", 'sv': 'Mot känsloanalys av tobaksprodukters användning i sociala medier', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا میں توباک پروڈکٹوں کا استعمال سنٹیمینٹ تحلیل کی طرف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hướng tới Bước phân tích thuốc lá trong truyền thông xã hội', 'bg': 'Към сентиментален анализ на употребата на тютюневи изделия в социалните медии', 'nl': 'Naar sentimentanalyse van het gebruik van tabaksproducten in sociale media', 'hr': 'Prema sentimentnoj analizi uporabe proizvoda duhana u socijalnim medijima', 'da': 'På vej mod følelsesanalyse af tobaksprodukters brug i sociale medier', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zur Sentimentanalyse der Verwendung von Tabakprodukten in sozialen Medien', 'ko': '담배 제품이 소셜 미디어에서 사용하는 정서 분석', 'id': 'Menuju Analisi Sentimen Penggunaan Produk Tabak di Media Sosial', 'fa': 'به سمت تحلیل سنتی از استفاده از مواد توباک در رسانه اجتماعی', 'tr': 'Sosyal Medýdançasynda Mazmunlar Taýýarlarynyň Ýabşyrymy Görkezilişi', 'sq': 'drejt analizës së ndjenjave të përdorimit të prodhimeve të duhanit në mediat sociale', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Tume ya Tobacco katika Vyombo vya Habari vya Kijamii', 'am': 'ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የTobacco Products ጥቅም', 'af': "Gaan na Sentiment Analysis of Tobacco Products' Usage in Social Media", 'hy': 'Ինչպես վերաբերվում է ծխածի ապրանքների օգտագործման զգացմունքային վերլուծությանը սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում', 'az': "Sosyal Medya'da Tobak Produktlar캼n캼n istifad톛sinin Sentiment Analizi t톛r톛find톛", 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে টোবাকো প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহারের সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ', 'bs': 'Prema sentimentnoj analizi upotrebe proizvoda tabake u socijalnim medijima', 'ca': "Vers l'anàlisi del sentiment de l'ús dels productes del tabac als mitjans socials", 'cs': 'K analýze sentimentů využití tabákových výrobků v sociálních médiích', 'et': 'Tubakatoodete kasutamise tunnete analüüsi suunas sotsiaalmeedias', 'fi': 'Tupakkatuotteiden käytön tunneanalyysi sosiaalisessa mediassa', 'sk': 'Proti analizi čustva uporabe tobačnih izdelkov v socialnih medijih', 'ha': "Analyze of Tobacco Products' Use in social Media", 'jv': "To Sentiment Test of tobakh Manual'", 'he': 'לניתוח רגשות של השימוש של תוצרי הטבק במדיה חברתית', 'bo': "Towards Sentiment Analysis of Tobacco Products' Usage in Social Media"}
{'en': 'Contemporary tobacco-related studies are mostly concerned with a single social media platform while missing out on a broader audience. Moreover, they are heavily reliant on labeled datasets, which are expensive to make. In this work, we explore sentiment and product identification on tobacco-related text from two social media platforms. We release SentiSmoke-Twitter and SentiSmoke-Reddit datasets, along with a comprehensive annotation schema for identifying tobacco products’ sentiment. We then perform benchmarking text classification experiments using state-of-the-art models, including BERT, RoBERTa, and DistilBERT. Our experiments show F1 scores as high as 0.72 for sentiment identification in the Twitter dataset, 0.46 for sentiment identification, and 0.57 for product identification using semi-supervised learning for Reddit.', 'ar': 'تهتم الدراسات المعاصرة المتعلقة بالتبغ في الغالب بمنصة وسائط اجتماعية واحدة بينما تفقد جمهورًا أوسع. علاوة على ذلك ، فهم يعتمدون بشكل كبير على مجموعات البيانات المصنفة ، والتي تكون مكلفة في صنعها. في هذا العمل ، نستكشف المشاعر وتحديد المنتج على النص المتعلق بالتبغ من منصتي وسائط اجتماعية. أصدرنا مجموعات بيانات SentiSmoke-Twitter و SentiSmoke-Reddit ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع مخطط توضيحي شامل لتحديد مشاعر منتجات التبغ. نقوم بعد ذلك بإجراء تجارب تصنيف معيارية للنص باستخدام أحدث النماذج ، بما في ذلك BERT و RoBERTa و DistilBERT. تُظهر تجاربنا أن درجات F1 تصل إلى 0.72 لتحديد المشاعر في مجموعة بيانات Twitter و 0.46 لتحديد المشاعر و 0.57 لتحديد المنتج باستخدام التعلم شبه الخاضع للإشراف لـ Reddit.', 'fr': "Les études contemporaines liées au tabac portent principalement sur une seule plateforme de médias sociaux tout en passant à côté d'un public plus large. De plus, ils dépendent fortement des ensembles de données étiquetés, dont la fabrication est coûteuse. Dans ce travail, nous explorons le sentiment et l'identification du produit dans des textes relatifs au tabac provenant de deux plateformes de médias sociaux. Nous publions des ensembles de données Sentismoke-Twitter et SentiSmoke-Reddit, ainsi qu'un schéma d'annotation complet pour identifier le sentiment des produits du tabac. Nous effectuons ensuite des expériences de classification de texte de référence à l'aide de modèles de pointe, notamment BERT, Roberta et DistilBERT. Nos expériences montrent que les scores F1 peuvent atteindre 0,72 pour l'identification des sentiments dans le jeu de données Twitter, 0,46 pour l'identification des sentiments et 0,57 pour l'identification du produit grâce à l'apprentissage semi-supervisé pour Reddit.", 'pt': 'Os estudos contemporâneos relacionados ao tabaco estão principalmente preocupados com uma única plataforma de mídia social, perdendo um público mais amplo. Além disso, eles são fortemente dependentes de conjuntos de dados rotulados, que são caros de fazer. Neste trabalho, exploramos o sentimento e a identificação do produto em textos relacionados ao tabaco de duas plataformas de mídia social. Lançamos conjuntos de dados SentiSmoke-Twitter e SentiSmoke-Reddit, juntamente com um esquema de anotação abrangente para identificar o sentimento dos produtos de tabaco. Em seguida, realizamos experimentos de classificação de texto de benchmarking usando modelos de última geração, incluindo BERT, RoBERTa e DistilBERT. Nossos experimentos mostram pontuações F1 tão altas quanto 0,72 para identificação de sentimentos no conjunto de dados do Twitter, 0,46 para identificação de sentimentos e 0,57 para identificação de produtos usando aprendizado semissupervisionado para Reddit.', 'es': 'Los estudios contemporáneos relacionados con el tabaco se centran principalmente en una sola plataforma de redes sociales, mientras que se pierden una audiencia más amplia. Además, dependen en gran medida de conjuntos de datos etiquetados, que son caros de fabricar. En este trabajo, exploramos el sentimiento y la identificación de productos en textos relacionados con el tabaco de dos plataformas de redes sociales. Publicamos conjuntos de datos de Sentismoke-Twitter y Sentismoke-Reddit, junto con un esquema de anotación integral para identificar la opinión de los productos de tabaco. Luego, realizamos experimentos de clasificación de textos de evaluación comparativa utilizando modelos de última generación, incluidos BERT, RobErta y Distilbert. Nuestros experimentos muestran puntuaciones F1 tan altas como 0.72 para la identificación de opiniones en el conjunto de datos de Twitter, 0.46 para la identificación de opiniones y 0.57 para la identificación de productos mediante el aprendizaje semisupervisado para Reddit.', 'zh': '今世烟草相关,要关单一社交媒体台,而忽于广受众。 此外甚赖标记数据集,其制作本甚高。 于此两社交媒体台烟草相关。 发SentiSmoke-TwitterSentiSmoke-Reddit数集,及识烟草情形之综注模式。 然后以最先进之(包BERT,RoBERTa与DistilBERT)准试文本分类实验。 臣等实验显,集于Twitter数,情识F1得分达0.72,情识得分达0.46,用Reddit半督学F1得分达0.57。', 'ru': 'Современные исследования, связанные с табаком, в основном касаются единой платформы социальных сетей, но не охватывают более широкую аудиторию. Кроме того, они в значительной степени зависят от маркированных наборов данных, изготовление которых сопряжено с большими затратами. В этой работе мы исследуем настроения и идентификацию продуктов на тексте, связанном с табаком, с двух платформ социальных сетей. Мы выпускаем наборы данных SentiSmoke-Twitter и SentiSmoke-Reddit, а также комплексную схему аннотаций для определения настроений табачных изделий. Затем мы проводим сравнительные эксперименты по классификации текстов с использованием самых современных моделей, включая BERT, RoBERTa и DistilBERT. Наши эксперименты показывают, что F1 достигает 0,72 для идентификации настроений в наборе данных Twitter, 0,46 для идентификации настроений и 0,57 для идентификации продуктов с использованием полунадзорного обучения для Reddit.', 'ja': '現代のタバコ関連の研究は、ほとんどが単一のソーシャルメディアプラットフォームに関わるものであり、より広範な読者層を見逃しています。さらに、それらは高価なラベル付きデータセットに大きく依存しています。この研究では、2つのソーシャルメディアプラットフォームからのタバコ関連テキストで感情と製品識別を探ります。SentiSmoke - TwitterとSentiSmoke - Redditのデータセットと、タバコ製品の感情を識別するための包括的なアノテーションスキーマをリリースします。次に、BERT、RoBERTa、DistilBERTなどの最先端モデルを使用して、テキスト分類のベンチマーク実験を行います。当社の実験では、Twitterデータセットのセンチメント識別で0.72、センチメント識別で0.46、Redditの半監督学習を使用した製品識別で0.57と高いF 1スコアが示されています。', 'hi': 'समकालीन तम्बाकू से संबंधित अध्ययन ज्यादातर एक एकल सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफॉर्म से संबंधित हैं, जबकि व्यापक दर्शकों पर गायब हैं। इसके अलावा, वे लेबल किए गए डेटासेट पर बहुत अधिक निर्भर हैं, जो बनाने के लिए महंगे हैं। इस काम में, हम दो सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफार्मों से तंबाकू से संबंधित पाठ पर भावना और उत्पाद की पहचान का पता लगाते हैं। हम तम्बाकू उत्पादों की भावना की पहचान करने के लिए एक व्यापक एनोटेशन स्कीमा के साथ SentiSmoke-Twitter और SentiSmoke-Reddit डेटासेट जारी करते हैं। फिर हम BERT, RoBERTa और DistilBERT सहित अत्याधुनिक मॉडल का उपयोग करके बेंचमार्किंग टेक्स्ट वर्गीकरण प्रयोग करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों चहचहाना डेटासेट में भावना पहचान के लिए 0.72 के रूप में उच्च के रूप में F1 स्कोर के रूप में, भावना पहचान के लिए 0.46, और Reddit के लिए अर्ध पर्यवेक्षित सीखने का उपयोग कर उत्पाद की पहचान के लिए 0.57.', 'ga': 'Baineann staidéir chomhaimseartha a bhaineann le tobac den chuid is mó le hardán meán sóisialta amháin agus iad in easnamh ar lucht féachana níos leithne. Ina theannta sin, tá siad ag brath go mór ar thacair sonraí lipéadaithe, atá costasach le déanamh. Sa obair seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar dhearcadh agus sainaithint táirgí ar théacs a bhaineann le tobac ó dhá ardán meán sóisialta. Eisímid tacair sonraí SentiSmoke-Twitter agus SentiSmoke-Reddit, mar aon le scéimre nótaí cuimsitheach chun meon táirgí tobac a shainaithint. Déanaimid ansin turgnaimh thagarmharcála aicmithe téacs ag baint úsáide as samhlacha úrscothacha, lena n-áirítear BERT, RoBERTa, agus DistilBERT. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh scóir F1 chomh hard le 0.72 maidir le sainaithint meon i tacar sonraí Twitter, 0.46 maidir le sainaithint meon, agus 0.57 maidir le sainaithint táirgí ag baint úsáide as foghlaim leath-mhaoirsithe le haghaidh Reddit.', 'el': 'Οι σύγχρονες μελέτες που σχετίζονται με τον καπνό αφορούν κυρίως μια ενιαία πλατφόρμα κοινωνικών μέσων, ενώ χάνουν ένα ευρύτερο κοινό. Επιπλέον, εξαρτώνται σε μεγάλο βαθμό από μαρκαρισμένα σύνολα δεδομένων, τα οποία είναι ακριβά στην κατασκευή. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε το συναίσθημα και την ταυτοποίηση προϊόντων σε κείμενο που σχετίζεται με τον καπνό από δύο πλατφόρμες κοινωνικών μέσων. Κυκλοφορούν σύνολα δεδομένων SentiSmoke-Twitter και SentiSmoke-Reddit, μαζί με ένα ολοκληρωμένο σχήμα σχολιασμού για τον προσδιορισμό των συναισθημάτων των προϊόντων καπνού. Στη συνέχεια, διεξάγουμε πειράματα ταξινόμησης κειμένου χρησιμοποιώντας μοντέλα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, συμπεριλαμβανομένων BERT, RoBERTa και DistilBERT. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν βαθμολογία F1 μέχρι 0.72 για τον προσδιορισμό συναισθημάτων στο σύνολο δεδομένων του Twitter, 0.46 για τον προσδιορισμό συναισθημάτων και 0.57 για τον προσδιορισμό προϊόντων χρησιμοποιώντας ημι-εποπτευμένη μάθηση για το Reddit.', 'hu': 'A kortárs dohányhoz kapcsolódó tanulmányok leginkább egyetlen közösségi média platformra vonatkoznak, miközben szélesebb közönséget hagynak ki. Ezenkívül nagymértékben támaszkodnak a címkézett adatkészletekre, amelyek előállítása drága. Ebben a munkában a dohányhoz kapcsolódó szövegek hangulatát és termékazonosítását vizsgáljuk fel két közösségi média platformról. A SentiSmoke-Twitter és SentiSmoke-Reddit adatkészleteket, valamint a dohánytermékek hangulatának azonosítására szolgáló átfogó megjegyzési sémát is kiadjuk. Ezt követően teljesítményértékelési kísérleteket végzünk a legkorszerűbb modellekkel, többek között BERT, RoBERTa és DistilBERT felhasználásával. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy F1 pontszámok akár 0,72 pontszámot mutatnak a Twitter adatkészletében az érzelmek azonosítására, 0,46 pontszámot az érzelmek azonosítására és 0,57 pontszámot a Reddit számára félig felügyelt tanulás segítségével.', 'ka': 'შემდგომარებული ტანბაკის შესახებ სწავლებები უფრო დარწმუნდება ერთი სოციალური მედია პლატატურაზე, როცა უფრო დიდი აუდიტორიაში გამოსვლა. დამატებით, ისინი ძალიან დარწმუნებელია მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაზე, რომლებიც უფრო ძალიან გამოყენებელია. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ სენტიმენტები და პროდისტურის ინდიდინტიფიკაციის შესახებ ტექსტის ორი სოციალური მედია პლატატურის შესახებ. ჩვენ SentiSmoke-Twitter და SentiSmoke-Reddit მონაცემების საზოგადო სქემას გადაუშვებით, ყველაფერი ანტორაციის სქემა, რომელიც განვიცემებით ტუბაკური პროდისტის სენტიმენტი. შემდეგ ჩვენ ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ, რომლებიც BERT, RoBERTa, და DistilBERT-ს გამოყენებით. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება F1 მონაცემები 0.72-ის განსაზღვრებისთვის სინტემენტის განსაზღვრებისთვის Twitter-ის მონაცემების განსაზღვრებისთვის, 0.46 სინტემენტის განსაზღვრებისთვის და 0.57 პროდი', 'it': "Gli studi contemporanei relativi al tabacco riguardano principalmente un'unica piattaforma di social media mentre mancano un pubblico più ampio. Inoltre, dipendono fortemente da set di dati etichettati, che sono costosi da realizzare. In questo lavoro esploriamo il sentiment e l'identificazione dei prodotti su testi correlati al tabacco da due piattaforme di social media. Rilasciamo i dataset SentiSmoke-Twitter e SentiSmoke-Reddit, insieme a uno schema di annotazione completo per identificare il sentiment dei prodotti del tabacco. Eseguiamo quindi esperimenti di classificazione dei testi di benchmarking utilizzando modelli all'avanguardia, tra cui BERT, RoBERTa e DistilBERT. I nostri esperimenti mostrano punteggi F1 fino a 0,72 per l'identificazione del sentiment nel dataset di Twitter, 0,46 per l'identificazione del sentiment e 0,57 per l'identificazione del prodotto utilizzando l'apprendimento semi-supervisionato per Reddit.", 'lt': 'Dabartiniai su tabaku susiję tyrimai daugiausia susiję su viena socialinės žiniasklaidos platform a, o platesnės auditorijos trūksta. Be to, jos labai priklauso nuo pažymėtų duomenų rinkinių, kurie yra brangūs gaminti. Šiame darbe tiriame su tabaku susijusių tekstų jausmą ir produktų identifikavimą iš dviejų socialinės žiniasklaidos platformų. Mes paskelbiame SentiSmoke-Twitter ir SentiSmoke-Reddit duomenų rinkinius kartu su išsamia annotacijos schema tabako produktų jausmams nustatyti. Tada atliksime lyginamuosius tekstų klasifikavimo eksperimentus naudojant naujausius modelius, įskaitant BERT, RoBERTa ir DistilBERT. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad F1 rezultatai yra iki 0,72 jautrumo identifikavimo Twitter duomenų rinkinyje, 0,46 jautrumo identifikavimo ir 0,57 produkto identifikavimo naudojant pusiau prižiūrimą mokymąsi Reddit.', 'mk': 'Современите студии поврзани со тутунот се претежно загрижени со една единствена платформа за социјални медиуми, додека недостасуваат на поширока публика. Покрај тоа, тие се многу зависни од означените податоци, кои се скапи за создавање. Во оваа работа, ги истражуваме чувствата и идентификацијата на производите на текстот поврзан со тутунот од две платформи на социјалните медиуми. Ги пуштаме податоците SentiSmoke-Twitter и SentiSmoke-Reddit, заедно со сеопфатен шем на анотација за идентификување на чувството на тутунските производи. Потоа спроведуваме експерименти за класификација на текст со користење на најновите модели, вклучително и BERT, RoBERTa и DistilBERT. Our experiments show F1 scores as high as 0.72 for sentiment identification in the Twitter dataset, 0.46 for sentiment identification, and 0.57 for product identification using semi-supervised learning for Reddit.', 'kk': 'Қазіргі табакқа сәйкесті зерттеулер көбінесе бір социалдық медиа платформасына көбінесе көп аудиторияда жоқ болып тұрады. Сонымен қатар, олар жарлық деректер жиындарына қатты сенімді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде екі социаллық медиа платформасынан тұбакқа қатынаған мәтінді көңіл және продуктты идентификациялауды зерттейміз. SentiSmoke-Twitter және SentiSmoke-Reddit деректер қорларын, табақ продукттардың сезімін анықтау үшін толық жаңалықтар сұлбасын басып шығару. Содан кейін BERT, RoBERTa және DistilBERT үлгілерін қолдану мәтін классификациялау тәжірибелерін жасаймыз. Біздің тәжірибеміз Твиттер деректер қорларындағы сезімдер идентификациясы үшін 0,72 деп F1 нөмірлерін көрсетеді, 0,46 сезімдер идентификациясы үшін және 0,57 Редит үшін жарты бақылау оқыту үшін продук', 'ms': 'Contemporary tobacco-related studies are mostly concerned with a single social media platform while missing out on a broader audience.  Selain itu, mereka sangat bergantung pada set data yang ditabel, yang mahal untuk dibuat. Dalam kerja ini, kami mengeksplorasi perasaan dan pengenalan produk pada teks berkaitan tembakau dari dua platform media sosial. Kami melepaskan set data SentiSmoke-Twitter dan SentiSmoke-Reddit, bersama dengan skema kometasi komprensif untuk mengenalpasti perasaan produk tembakau. Kemudian kita melakukan percubaan kelasukan teks benchmarking menggunakan model-state-of-the-art, termasuk BERT, RoBERTa, dan DistilBERT. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan skor F1 setinggi 0.72 untuk pengenalan perasaan dalam set data Twitter, 0.46 untuk pengenalan perasaan, dan 0.57 untuk pengenalan produk menggunakan pembelajaran setengah dijaga untuk Reddit.', 'mt': "Studji kontemporanji relatati mat-tabakk huma l-aktar ikkonċernati b’pjattaforma unika tal-midja soċjali filwaqt li jonqsu minn udjenza usa’. Barra minn hekk, huma jiddependu ħafna fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ttikkettati, li jiswew ħafna. F’dan ix-xogħol, aħna nesploraw is-sensazzjoni u l-identifikazzjoni tal-prodotti dwar it-test relatat mat-tabakk minn żewġ pjattaformi tal-midja soċjali. Aħna nħelsu settijiet ta' dejta SentiSmoke-Twitter u SentiSmoke-Reddit, flimkien ma' skema komprensiva ta' annotazzjoni għall-identifikazzjoni tas-sentiment tal-prodotti tat-tabakk. Imbagħad nagħmlu esperimenti ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test ta’ benchmarking bl-użu ta’ mudelli l-aktar avvanzati, inklużi BERT, RoBERTa, u DistilBERT. L-esperimenti tagħna juru punteġġi F1 għoljin sa 0.72 għall-identifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti fis-sett tad-dejta ta’ Twitter, 0.46 għall-identifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti, u 0.57 għall-identifikazzjoni tal-prodott bl-użu ta’ tagħlim semisorveljat għal Reddit.", 'mn': 'Орчин үеийн таван холбоотой судалгаанууд ихэнхдээ нийгмийн медиа платформаас хамааралтай байдаг. Үүнээс гадна тэд үнэтэй өгөгдлийн санд маш их хамааралтай. Энэ ажил дээр бид хоёр нийгмийн медиа платформаас холбоотой таван холбоотой текст дээр мэдрэмж, бүтээгдэхүүн танихыг судалж байна. Бид SentiSmoke-Твиттер, SentiSmoke-Reddit өгөгдлийн сангуудыг нээж, таван бүтээгдэхүүний мэдрэмжүүдийг тодорхойлдох тухай бүрэн дүгнэлт схемийг ашиглаж байна. Бид дараа нь банкмаркингийн текст хуваалтын туршилтуудыг BERT, RoBERTa, DistilBERT болон урлагийн загварыг ашиглан хийдэг. Бидний туршилтууд Твиттер өгөгдлийн сан дээр мэдрэмжүүдийг тодорхойлох 0.72, мэдрэмжүүдийг тодорхойлдох 0.46, бүтээгдэхүүний тодорхойлдох 0.57, Reddit-ийн тал-удирдлагатай суралцах хэрэгтэй.', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള ടൌക്കോയുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും ഒരു വിശാലമായ കാഴ് അതുകൊണ്ടും, അവര്\u200d ലേബല്\u200d ചെയ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d വളരെ ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d വിലയുള്ളതാ In this work, we explore sentiment and product identification on tobacco-related text from two social media platforms.  നമ്മള്\u200d സെന്റിപ്പോക്ക്-ടൂട്ടറിനെയും സെന്റിപ്പോക്ക്-റെഡിഡിറ്റ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളെയും വിടുന്നു. പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തി പിന്നീട് ബെര്\u200dട്ടി, റോബെര്\u200dട്ട, ഡിസില്\u200dബെര്\u200dട്ടി നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d 0. 72 ഉയരത്തില്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. ട്രൂട്ടര്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d സെന്റിമെന്റ് തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d, 0. 46, റെഡിഡിന് വേണ്ടി', 'no': 'Samtidige tabakasrelaterte studiar er mest bekymret med ein enkelt sosialt mediaplattform mens manglar ut på ein breire publikum. Dei er likevel kraftig reliant på merkelige datasett, som er dykka for å laga. I denne arbeiden utforskar vi sentiment og produktidentifikasjon på tabakkrelatert tekst frå to sosiale mediaplattformar. Vi løyser SentiSmoke-Twitter og SentiSmoke-Reddit-datasett saman med eit komplett annotasjonsskjema for å identifisera sentiment av tabakkproduktar. Vi utfører så benchmarking av tekstklassifikasjon med modeller for kunsten, inkludert BERT, RoBERTa og DistilBERT. Eksperimentane våre viser F1- poeng så høg som 0,72 for sentimentidentifikasjon i Twitter- dataset, 0,46 for sentimentidentifikasjon, og 0,57 for produktidentifikasjon med semioversikt læring for Reddit.', 'pl': 'Współczesne badania związane z tytoniem dotyczą głównie jednej platformy mediów społecznościowych, jednocześnie brakując szerszej publiczności. Ponadto są one w dużej mierze zależne od oznaczonych zbiorów danych, które są drogie w tworzeniu. W niniejszej pracy badamy sentymenty i identyfikację produktów na tekście związanym z tytoniem z dwoma platformami mediów społecznościowych. Udostępniamy zestawy danych SentiSmoke-Twitter i SentiSmoke-Reddit wraz z kompleksowym schematem adnotacji służącym identyfikacji sentymentów wyrobów tytoniowych. Następnie przeprowadzamy porównawcze eksperymenty klasyfikacji tekstu z wykorzystaniem najnowocześniejszych modeli, w tym BERT, RoBERTa i DistilBERT. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują wyniki F1 do 0.72 dla identyfikacji sentymentów w zbiorze danych Twittera, 0.46 dla identyfikacji sentymentów i 0.57 dla identyfikacji produktów za pomocą pół-nadzorowanego uczenia się dla Reddita.', 'ro': 'Studiile contemporane legate de tutun se referă în principal la o singură platformă de social media, lipsind în același timp un public mai larg. Mai mult decât atât, acestea se bazează în mare măsură pe seturi de date etichetate, care sunt costisitoare de realizat. În această lucrare, explorăm sentimentul și identificarea produselor pe textele legate de tutun de pe două platforme de social media. Lansăm seturi de date SentiSmoke-Twitter și SentiSmoke-Reddit, împreună cu o schemă cuprinzătoare de adnotare pentru identificarea sentimentului produselor din tutun. Apoi efectuăm experimente de clasificare comparativă a textelor folosind modele de ultimă generație, inclusiv BERT, RoBERTa și DistilBERT. Experimentele noastre arată scoruri F1 de până la 0,72 pentru identificarea sentimentelor în setul de date Twitter, 0,46 pentru identificarea sentimentelor și 0,57 pentru identificarea produselor folosind învățarea semi-supravegheată pentru Reddit.', 'sv': 'Samtida tobaksrelaterade studier handlar främst om en enda social medieplattform samtidigt som man missar en bredare publik. Dessutom är de starkt beroende av märkta datamängder, som är dyra att tillverka. I detta arbete undersöker vi sentiment och produktidentifiering på tobaksrelaterad text från två sociala medieplattformar. Vi släpper SentiSmoke-Twitter och SentiSmoke-Reddit datauppsättningar, tillsammans med ett omfattande kommentarschema för att identifiera tobaksprodukters sentiment. Vi utför sedan benchmarking textklassificering experiment med hjälp av toppmoderna modeller, inklusive BERT, RoBERTa och DistilBERT. Våra experiment visar F1 poäng så högt som 0,72 för sentimentidentifiering i Twitterdatauppsättningen, 0,46 för sentimentidentifiering och 0,57 för produktidentifiering med hjälp av semi-övervakad inlärning för Reddit.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය තුබාකෝ සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාල ප්\u200dරධානකයෙක් අතුරුදන් වෙලා තියෙනවා. ඒවගේම, ඔවුන් ලේබල් කරපු දත්ත සේට් වලට ගොඩක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒවා කරන්න ගොඩක් බලාපොරොත්තු. මේ වැඩේ අපි සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරවේශනය දෙකක් නිසා තැබැක් සම්බන්ධ පරික්ෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය පර අපි SentiSmoke-Twitter සහ SentiSmoke-Rededit දත්ත සෙට්ටුව නිදහස් කරනවා, සමග සම්පූර්ණයෙන් තැබැක් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් හොයාගන්න සඳහා සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරව අපි පස්සේ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් කරන්න පාළුවන් විශේෂණ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ ස්ථිතිය-of-the-art මොඩේල් භාවිතා කරන්න,  අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ F1 ස්කෝර් 0.72 විතරයි ට්විටර් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ දැනුම් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා, 0.46 විතරයි දැනුම් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා, 0.57 විත', 'so': 'Waxbarashada ku saabsan tobankii waxaa ugu badan la xiriira jardiinada shabakadda bulshada oo kaliya, iyadoo ay ka baaqan tahay dhegayaasha aad u ballaadhan. Weliba waxay ku xiran yihiin koox macluumaad ah oo aad u qaali ah in la sameeyo. Shaqadaas waxaynu ka baaraynaa aqoonsiga fikrada iyo dhaqaalaha warqada tobanko ee labada majaajilood oo mitandada bulshada ah. Waxaannu soo dirnaa garsooridaha SentiSmoke-Twitterka iyo SentiSmoke-Reddit, waxaana sidoo kale lagu qoraa sawir caadiga ah oo lagu ogaanayo fikrada alaabta tobanko. Markaas waxaynu sameynaynaa imtixaanka baaritaanka qoraalka oo lagu isticmaalayo tusaalayaal-state-of-art, including BERT, RoBERTA, and DistilBERT. Imtixaanadayada waxaa ka muuqda aqoonsiga fekerka ee F1 0.72, aqoonsiga fekerka ee Twitterka, 0.46 aqoonsiga fikrada, iyo 0.57 aqoonsiga dhaqaalaha oo lagu isticmaalayo barashada Reddit hal ka mid ah.', 'sr': 'Savremena ispitivanja vezana za duhan uglavnom su zabrinuta za jedno društveno medijsko platforme dok je nestala u širom publiku. Osim toga, oni su teško pouzdani na označene podatke, koje su skupe za napraviti. U ovom poslu istražujemo osjećaj i identifikaciju proizvoda na tekstu povezanim sa duhana iz dve socijalne medijske platforme. Oslobađamo SentiSmoke-Twitter i SentiSmoke-Reddit podatke, zajedno sa kompletnom annotacijskom šemom za identifikaciju osjećaja proizvoda duhana. Onda izvedemo eksperimente za klasifikaciju teksta koji koriste modele state-of-the-art, uključujući BERT, RoBERTa i DistilBERT. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju F1 rezultate visokih od 0,72 za identifikaciju sentimenta u setu podataka Twitter, 0,46 za identifikaciju sentimenta, i 0,57 za identifikaciju proizvoda koristeći polu nadzorno učenje za Reddit.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய தொழில்நுட்பம் தொடர்புடைய படிப்பாடுகள் பெரும்பாலாகவே ஒரு சமூக ஊடக முறைமையை பற்றி கவலைப்படுகின்றன. ஒரு விரி மேலும், அவர்கள் குறிப்பிட்ட தரவுத்தளங்களை மிகவும் நம்புகிறார்கள், அது செய்ய விலையானது. இந்த வேலையில், நாம் உணர்வு மற்றும் தயாரிப்பு அடையாளத்தை தொகுதி தொடர்பு உரையில் தேடுகிறோம் இரண்டு சமூக ஊடக முறை நாங்கள் புகைப் புகை- Twitter மற்றும் SentiSmoke- Reddit தரவுத்தளங்களை வெளியிடுகிறோம், பூமி பொருட்களின் உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிக்கும் ஒரு முழ பின்னர் நாம் பெர்ட், ராபெர்டா, மற்றும் டிஸ்டில்பெர்ட். நம்முடைய சோதனைகள் தொடர் தரவுக்கு உணர்வு அடையாளத்திற்கு அதிகமாக F1 மதிப்பெண்களை காட்டுகிறது, 0. 46 உணர்வு அடையாளத்திற்கு, மற்றும் ரெட்டிட்டிற்கு பாதிக', 'ur': 'موجود توباک کے معاملہ کی تحقیقات اکثر ایک سوسیل میڈیا پلٹورم کے بارے میں مشغول ہیں جبکہ زیادہ وسیع اڈیونٹ پر غائب ہوتے ہیں. اور اس کے علاوہ، یہ لکھے ہوئے ڈیٹسٹ پر بہت زیادہ اعتماد رکھتے ہیں، جو بنانے کے لئے خرچ ہیں. ہم اس کام میں دو سوسیل میڈیا پلٹرومٹ سے تنباک کے معاملہ کے متعلق سے احساسات اور محصولات کی شناسایی کا تحقیق کرتے ہیں. ہم SentiSmoke-Twitter اور SentiSmoke-Reddit ڈاٹسٹ کو آزاد کرتے ہیں، تاب کے مواد کا احساس پہچان کرنے کے لئے ایک گھیری آگاہ طریقہ کے ساتھ۔ اس کے بعد ہم بنچم مارکینگ ٹیکس کلاسیفوں کی آزمائش کریں گے، BERT، RoBERTa، اور DistilBERT کے ساتھ. ہماری آزمائش توئیٹر ڈیٹسٹ میں احساس شناسایی کے لئے 0.72 کے برابر F1 اسکور دکھاتے ہیں، 0.46 احساس شناسایی کے لئے اور 0.57 کے لئے محصولات شناسایی کے لئے ریڈیٹ کے لئے نصف-supervised تعلیم کے مطابق۔', 'uz': "Tashqi tugmalar bilan bog'liq o'rganishlar ko'pchilik muammolar yoʻq paytda bir shaxsiy jamiyat media platformlari bilan bog'liq. Ko'rib, ular yozilgan maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi juda qiymatdir. Bu ishda, biz ikki social media platformlaridan tashkilotga bog'liq matnning fikrlarini topamiz. Biz SentiSmoke- Twitterda va SentiSmoke-Reddit maʼlumotlar tarkibini ajratib turamiz va tobak produktlarning hisobotini aniqlash uchun umumiy taʼminlovchi qolipini ajratish mumkin. Keyin biz BERT, RoBERTA, DistilBERT va DistilBERT kabi matn classification modellarini bajaramiz. Bizning tajribalarimiz Twitter maʼlumotlarida foydalanuvchi foydalanuvchi qiymatning 0.72 darajasi, 0.46 foydalanuvchi identifikatsiyani va Reddit uchun qismini tanlash uchun 0.57 foydalanuvchi qismini koʻrsatish.", 'vi': 'Những nghiên cứu hiện đại về thuốc lá chủ yếu liên quan đến một nền tảng xã hội chung nhưng lại bị bỏ lỡ ở một khán giả rộng hơn. Hơn nữa, chúng dựa vào các bộ dữ liệu được dán nhãn, rất đắt tiền để làm. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi tìm hiểu cảm xúc và nhận dạng sản phẩm trên văn bản liên quan đến thuốc lá từ hai phương tiện truyền thông xã hội. Chúng tôi công bố những tập tin cá nhân của SeniSmoke-Reddit cùng với một chương trình ghi chú đầy đủ để xác định ý kiến của sản phẩm thuốc lá. Sau đó chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm phân tích văn bản định giá bằng cách sử dụng các mẫu thời đại, bao gồm BERT, RoBERTa, và SEALBERT. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy F1 ghi điểm cao như 0.72 để nhận diện cảm xúc trên Twitter, 0.46 để nhận diện cảm xúc, và 0.57 để nhận diện sản phẩm nhờ phép học theo nửa giám sát của Reddit.', 'bg': 'Съвременните изследвания, свързани с тютюна, се занимават предимно с една платформа за социални медии, като същевременно пропускат по-широка аудитория. Освен това те силно разчитат на етикетирани набори от данни, които са скъпи за изработване. В тази работа изследваме сантименталността и идентификацията на продукта върху текста, свързан с тютюна, от две социални медийни платформи. Ние публикуваме набори от данни заедно с изчерпателна схема за анотация за идентифициране на настроенията на тютюневите изделия. След това извършваме сравнителни експерименти за класификация на текста, използвайки най-съвременни модели, включително BERT, RoBERTa и DistilBERT. Нашите експерименти показват резултати от Формула 1 до 0,72 за идентификация на сентименти в набора от данни в Туитър, 0,46 за идентификация на сентименти и 0,57 за идентификация на продукти, използвайки полунадзорено обучение за Редит.', 'nl': 'Hedendaagse tabaksgerelateerde studies houden zich voornamelijk bezig met één social media platform, terwijl ze een breder publiek missen. Bovendien zijn ze sterk afhankelijk van gelabelde datasets, die duur zijn om te maken. In dit werk onderzoeken we sentiment en productidentificatie op tabaksgerelateerde tekst van twee social media platforms. We publiceren SentiSmoke-Twitter en SentiSmoke-Reddit datasets, samen met een uitgebreid annotatieschema voor het identificeren van het sentiment van tabaksproducten. Vervolgens voeren we benchmarking-experimenten uit met behulp van state-of-the-art modellen, waaronder BERT, RoBERTa en DistilBERT. Onze experimenten tonen F1 scores tot 0.72 voor sentimentidentificatie in de Twitter dataset, 0.46 voor sentimentidentificatie en 0.57 voor productidentificatie met semi-supervised learning voor Reddit.', 'hr': 'Savremena ispitivanja vezana za duhan uglavnom se zabrinjava jednom socijalnom medijskom platformom dok je nestala u širom publiku. Osim toga, oni su teško pouzdani na označene podatke, koje su skupe za napraviti. U ovom poslu istražujemo osjećaj i identifikaciju proizvoda na tekstu povezanim sa duhana iz dvije platforme društvenih medija. Oslobađamo SentiSmoke-Twitter i SentiSmoke-Reddit podatke, zajedno s kompletnom annotacijskom šemom za identifikaciju osjećaja proizvoda duhana. Onda izvršimo kritične klasifikacije teksta s modelima stanja umjetnosti, uključujući BERT, RoBERTa i DistilBERT. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju F1 rezultate visokih od 0,72 za identifikaciju osjećaja u setu podataka Twitter, 0,46 za identifikaciju osjećaja i 0,57 za identifikaciju proizvoda koristeći polu nadzorno učenje za Reddit.', 'ko': '현대 담배와 관련된 연구는 대부분 단일한 소셜 미디어 플랫폼에 주목하고 더욱 광범위한 시청자를 소홀히 한다.또한 이들은 표시된 데이터 집합에 심각하게 의존하기 때문에 이런 데이터 집합의 제작 원가가 매우 높다.이 업무에서 우리는 두 개의 소셜 미디어 플랫폼에서 담배 관련 텍스트의 감정과 제품 식별을 연구했다.우리는 SentiSmoke 트위터와 SentiSmoke Reddit 데이터 세트, 그리고 담배 제품의 정서를 식별하는 종합 주석 모델을 발표했다.그 다음에 우리는 가장 선진적인 모델(BERT, RoBERTA, DistilBERT 포함)을 사용하여 텍스트 분류 기준 테스트를 실시했다.우리의 실험에 따르면 트위터 데이터 집중에서 정서인식의 F1 점수는 0.72에 달했고 정서인식의 F1 점수는 0.46에 달했으며 레딧의 반감독학습을 이용하여 제품을 식별하는 F1 점수는 0.57에 달했다.', 'fa': 'مطالعه\u200cهای موجود مربوط به توباک بیشتر نگران یک پلاکتر رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی هستند در حالی که در یک تماشاگر گسترده\u200cتر ناپدید می\u200cشوند. علاوه بر این، آنها بسیار زیادی بر مجموعه\u200cهای اطلاعات نامیده می\u200cشوند که برای ساختن گران هستند. در این کار، ما احساسات و شناسایی محصولات را در متن مربوط به توباک از دو پلاکتر رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای SentiSmoke-Twitter و SentiSmoke-Reddit را آزاد می\u200cکنیم، همراه با یک برنامه\u200cی توضیح کامل برای شناسایی احساسات توباک\u200cها. سپس آزمایش\u200cهای مختصات متن را با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای موقعیت هنر، شامل BERT، RoBERTa و DistilBERT، بررسی می\u200cکنیم. آزمایش\u200cهای ما امتیاز F1 را به اندازه 0.72 برای شناسایی احساسات در مجموعه داده\u200cهای Twitter، 0.46 برای شناسایی احساسات و 0.57 برای شناسایی محصولات با استفاده از یادگیری نیمه\u200cبررسی برای Reddit نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'sw': 'Tafiti zinazohusiana na tumbaku za sasa zinahusiana zaidi na jukwaa moja la mitandao ya kijamii wakati ambapo hazionekani kwenye hadhira kubwa zaidi. Zaidi ya hayo, wanategemea sana kwenye seti za taarifa zilizoonyeshwa, ambazo ni ghali za kutengeneza. Katika kazi hii, tunachunguza hisia na utambulisho wa bidhaa kuhusu maandishi yanayohusiana na tumbaku kutoka majukwaa mawili ya mitandao ya kijamii. Tunaachia taarifa za Sentismoke-Twita na Sentismoke-Reddit, pamoja na mpango wa matangazo makubwa kwa kutambua hisia za bidhaa za tumbaku. We then perform benchmarking text classification experiments using state-of-the-art models, including BERT, RoBERTa, and DistilBERT.  Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha vipimo vya F1 vya juu vya 0.72 kwa ajili ya kutambuliwa hisia katika takwimu za Twita, 0.46 kwa ajili ya kutambua hisia, na 0.57 kwa ajili ya utambulisho wa bidhaa kwa kutumia kujifunza kwa ajili ya Reddit.', 'da': 'Moderne tobaksrelaterede undersøgelser beskæftiger sig primært med en enkelt social medieplatform, mens de går glip af et bredere publikum. Desuden er de stærkt afhængige af mærkede datasæt, som er dyre at lave. I dette arbejde undersøger vi sentiment og produktidentifikation på tobaksrelateret tekst fra to sociale medieplatforme. Vi udgiver SentiSmoke-Twitter og SentiSmoke-Reddit datasæt sammen med et omfattende annotationsskema til identifikation af tobaksvarers stemning. Vi udfører derefter benchmarking tekst klassifikation eksperimenter ved hjælp af state-of-the-art modeller, herunder BERT, RoBERTa og DistilBERT. Vores eksperimenter viser F1 scorer helt op til 0,72 for sentiment identifikation i Twitter datasættet, 0,46 for sentiment identifikation og 0,57 for produktidentifikation ved hjælp af semi-supervised learning for Reddit.', 'id': 'Studi kontemporari berkaitan dengan tembakau kebanyakan tertarik dengan platform media sosial tunggal sementara hilang pada penonton yang lebih luas. Selain itu, mereka sangat bergantung pada set data yang ditabel, yang mahal untuk dibuat. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengeksplorasi perasaan dan identifikasi produk pada teks berkaitan tembakau dari dua platform media sosial. Kami melepaskan SentiSmoke-Twitter dan SentiSmoke-Reddit dataset, bersama dengan skema komentar komprensif untuk mengidentifikasi sentimen produk tembakau. Kemudian kami melakukan percobaan klasifikasi teks benchmarking menggunakan model state-of-the-art, termasuk BERT, RoBERTa, dan DistilBERT. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan skor F1 setinggi 0,72 untuk identifikasi sentimen di set data Twitter, 0,46 untuk identifikasi sentimen, dan 0,57 untuk identifikasi produk menggunakan belajar semi-supervised untuk Reddit.', 'de': 'Zeitgenössische Studien zum Thema Tabak beschäftigen sich meist mit einer einzigen Social-Media-Plattform und verpassen dabei ein breiteres Publikum. Darüber hinaus sind sie stark auf beschriftete Datensätze angewiesen, die teuer in der Herstellung sind. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir Sentiment und Produktidentifikation auf tabakbezogenen Texten von zwei Social-Media-Plattformen. Wir veröffentlichen SentiSmoke-Twitter und SentiSmoke-Reddit Datensätze sowie ein umfassendes Annotationsschema zur Identifizierung der Stimmung von Tabakprodukten. Anschließend führen wir Benchmarking-Textklassifizierungsexperimente mit modernsten Modellen wie BERT, RoBERTa und DistilBERT durch. Unsere Experimente zeigen F1-Werte bis zu 0.72 für Sentiment-Identifikation im Twitter-Datensatz, 0.46 für Sentiment-Identifikation und 0.57 für Produkt-Identifikation mit semi-supervised Learning für Reddit.', 'sq': 'Studime bashkëkohore lidhur me duhanin janë kryesisht të shqetësuar me një platform ë të vetme të medias sociale ndërsa mungon në një audiencë më të gjerë. Përveç kësaj, ata janë shumë të mbështetur në të dhënat e etiketuara, të cilat janë të shtrenjta për të bërë. Në këtë punë, ne eksplorojmë ndjenjat dhe identifikimin e produkteve në tekstin lidhur me duhanin nga dy platforma të medias sociale. Ne lëshojmë të dhënat SentiSmoke-Twitter dhe SentiSmoke-Reddit, së bashku me një skemë të përgjithshme anotacioni për identifikimin e ndjenjave të prodhimeve të duhanit. Pastaj bëjmë eksperimente klasifikimi i tekstit duke përdorur modele më të larta, duke përfshirë BERT, RoBERTa dhe DistilBERT. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë rezultatet F1 sa 0.72 për identifikimin e ndjenjave në Twitter, 0.46 për identifikimin e ndjenjave dhe 0.57 për identifikimin e produkteve duke përdorur mësimin gjysmë-mbikqyrur për Reddit.', 'af': "Onlangse tabak-verwante studie is meeste bekommerd met 'n enkele sosiale media platform a terwyl op 'n breede publiek ontbreek is. Ook, hulle is swaar betroubaar op die gemerkte datastelle wat koste is om te maak. In hierdie werk ondersoek ons sentiment en produktidentifikasie op tabak verwante teks van twee sosiale media platforme. Ons verlos SentiSmoke-Twitter en SentiSmoke-Reddit datastelle, saam met 'n kompenseerde annotasie skema vir die identifiseer van tabakoprodukte se sentiment. Ons uitvoer dan benchmarking teks klassifikasie eksperimente met gebruik van state-of-the-art modele, insluitend BERT, RoBERTa en DistilBERT. Ons eksperimente wys F1 telling so hoog as 0.72 vir sentiment identifikasie in die Twitter datastel, 0.46 vir sentiment identifikasie, en 0.57 vir produkt identifikasie gebruik semi-superviseer leer vir Reddit.", 'tr': 'Şu wagt täbek bilen baglanýan öwrenmeler köplenç soýumsal media platformasyna göz öňünde ýok bolup otyrlar. Munuň ýagdaýda, etiket edilen veri setirlerine örän wajyp baglaýarlar. Bu işde, tabak ile ilgili iki sosyal medya platformundan duýgular we önümleriň tanyşlygyny keşfetýäris. Biz SentiSmoke-Twitter we SentiSmoke-Reddit veri setirlerini, tabak produktlaryň duýgyny tanyşdyrmak üçin daňlap bir duýdurma şemasy bilen çykarýarys. Sonra BERT, RoBERTa, ve DistilBERT kullanarak benchmarking metin klasifikasyonu deneyleri yaparız. Biziň deneylerimiz Twitter veri setinde duýgular identifikaýasy üçin 0.72 अंश, 0.46 duýgular identifikaýasy üçin, we 0.57 ýarym-gözlemeli öwrenmek üçin önüne üýtgetmek üçin urylşyrymyzy görkez.', 'hy': 'Հիմա ծխածի հետ կապված ժամանակակից ուսումնասիրությունները հիմնականում անհանգստանում են միակ սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների հարթակի հետ, չնայած ավելի լայն հանդիսատեսին: Moreover, they are heavily reliant on labeled datasets, which are expensive to make.  Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք թխախով կապված տեքստի զգացմունքները և արտադրանքները երկու սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների միջոցով: Մենք հրապարակում ենք Senti-Սմրուկ-Թվիթեր և Senti-Սմրուկ-Ռեդդիթ տվյալների համակարգեր, միասին մի ամբողջական annoտացիոն սխեմա, որպեսզի բացահայտենք ծխածի ապրանքների զգացմունքները: Հետո մենք կատարում ենք տեքստի դասակարգման համեմատական փորձարկումներ օգտագործելով ամենաբարձր մոդելներ, ներառյալ Բերթը, Ռոբերթը և ԴիստիլԲերթը: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս F1-ի գնահատականները մինչև 0.72 զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման համար Թվիթերի տվյալների համակարգում, 0.46 զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման համար, և 0.57 արտադրանքի հայտնաբերման համար, օգտագործելով Reddit-ի կիսակառավարվող ուսում', 'az': 'Şimdilik tabağıyla bağlı təhsil çox təkcə bir sosyal media platformu ilə gözləyir ki, daha geniş auditoriyada yox olur. Əksinə, onlar etiketli verilən qurbanlara ağır təvəkkül edirlər, bu qurbanlıq üçün mal edirlər. Bu işdə, iki sosyal media platformundan duyguları və ürək kimliğini keşif edirik. Biz SentiSmoke-Twitter və SentiSmoke-Reddit veri qurularını təsdiqləmək üçün tükənmək məhsullarının duygularını təsdiqləmək üçün bütün təsbiq şəkildə yayındırırıq. Sonra, BERT, RoBERTa və DistilBERT modellərini istifadə edərək benchmarking metin klasifikasyonu təcrübələrini işləyirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz Twitter verilənlərində duyguları təşkil etmək üçün 0.72 dərəcələrini göstərir, duyguları təşkil etmək üçün 0.46 dərəcələrini və Reddit üçün yarı-təşkil öyrənmək üçün ürək təşkil etmək üçün 0.57 dərəcələrini göstərir.', 'bn': "বর্তমান টুক্কো সম্পর্কিত গবেষণা বেশীরভাগ একটি সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্লাটফর্মের ব্যাপারে উদ্বিগ্ন, যখন ব্যাপক দর্শকদ এছাড়াও, তারা লেবেলেটের ডাটাসেটের উপর বেশি নির্ভর করে, যা তৈরি করার জন্য দাম। এই কাজে আমরা দুই সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্ল্যাটফর্ম থেকে টাক্কো সম্পর্কিত টেক্সটের উপর আবেগ এবং পণ্য পরিচয় খুঁজে ব We release SentiSmoke-Twitter and SentiSmoke-Reddit datasets, along with a comprehensive annotation schema for identifying tobacco products' sentiment.  তারপর আমরা বেনম্যাঙ্কিং টেক্সফিকেশন পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করি, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে বের্ট, রোবের্তা এবং ডিস্টিল বার্ট। আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে টুইটারের ডেটাসেটে অনুভূতির পরিচয়পত্রের জন্য ফি১ স্কোরের বেশী উচ্চতা 0. 72 হিসেবে, অনুভূতির পরিচয়পত্রের জন্য ০.", 'am': 'Contemporary tobacco-related studies are mostly concerned with a single social media platform while missing out on a broader audience.  ደግሞም በጽሑፍ በሚያደርጉ የከበረ የዳታ መስመር ላይ እጅግ የታመነ ነው። በዚህ ሥራ ሁለት ማኅበራዊ አውታር ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ፕላጦማር ላይ የስሜት እና የፍሬት ግንኙነቶችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሳንቲስኮ-ትዊተር እና የሳንቲስ-Reddit ዳታዎችን እናስቀድዳለን፡፡ በኋላም BERT፣ ሮብERTA እና ዲስቲልBERT እና የሀገር-አርእስት ዓይነቶች በመጠቀም የጽሑፍ ክፍተት ፈተና እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የኢትዮጵያ ዳታተር አዲስ ነጥብ 0.72 ከፍ ያለ የስሜት ማውቀት፣ 0.46 ለስሜት ማውቀት እና 0.57 ለሀብት ግንኙነታችን ለሬድድ የተጠበቀው ትምህርት ማውቀት ይታያል፡፡', 'ca': "Els estudis contemporanis relacionats amb el tabac estan principalment preocupats amb una sola plataforma de mitjans socials mentre falten en públic més ampli. A més, depenen molt de conjunts de dades etiquetats, que són costosos de fer. En aquesta feina, explorem el sentiment i l'identificació de productes en text relacionat amb el tabac de dues plataformes de mitjans socials. Vam publicar conjunts de dades SentiSmoke-Twitter i SentiSmoke-Reddit, juntament amb un esquema d'anotació global per identificar el sentiment dels productes del tabac. Després fem experiments de comparació de classificació de textos utilitzant models més avançats, incloent BERT, RoBERTa i DistilBERT. Els nostres experiments mostran puntuacions F1 fins a 0,72 per identificar sentiments a Twitter, 0,46 per identificar sentiments i 0,57 per identificar productes utilitzant aprenentatge semisupervisat per Reddit.", 'fi': 'Nykyaikaiset tupakkaan liittyvät tutkimukset keskittyvät enimmäkseen yhteen sosiaalisen median alustaan ja jäävät paitsi laajemmasta yleisöstä. Lisäksi ne ovat vahvasti riippuvaisia merkityistä aineistoista, joiden valmistaminen on kallista. Tässä työssä tutkimme tunteita ja tuotteiden tunnistamista tupakkaan liittyvässä tekstissä kahdella sosiaalisen median alustalla. Julkaisemme SentiSmoke-Twitter- ja SentiSmoke-Reddit-aineistoja sekä kattavan merkintäjärjestelmän tupakkatuotteiden tunteiden tunnistamiseksi. Tämän jälkeen teemme tekstiluokituskokeita käyttäen viimeisimpiä malleja, kuten BERT, RoBERTa ja DistilBERT. Kokeidemme mukaan F1-pisteet ovat jopa 0,72 sentimentaalitunnistuksessa Twitter-aineistossa, 0,46 sentimentaalitunnistuksessa ja 0,57 tuotetunnistuksessa puoliohjatun oppimisen avulla Redditille.', 'bs': 'Savremena ispitivanja vezana za duhan uglavnom su zabrinuta za jednu platformu društvenih medija dok je nestala u širom publiku. Osim toga, oni su teško pouzdani na označene podatke, koje su skupe za napraviti. U ovom poslu istražujemo osjećaj i identifikaciju proizvoda na tekstu povezanim sa duhana iz dvije platforme socijalnih medija. Oslobađamo SentiSmoke-Twitter i SentiSmoke-Reddit podatke, zajedno sa kompletnom annotacijskom šemom za identifikaciju osjećaja proizvoda duhana. Onda izvršavamo kritične klasifikacije teksta koji koriste modele state-of-the-art, uključujući BERT, RoBERTa i DistilBERT. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju F1 rezultate visokih od 0,72 za identifikaciju osjećaja u setu podataka Twitter, 0,46 za identifikaciju osjećaja, i 0,57 za identifikaciju proizvoda koristeći polu nadzorno učenje za Reddit.', 'cs': 'Současné studie související s tabákem se většinou zabývají jedinou platformou sociálních médií, přičemž přicházejí o širší publikum. Navíc jsou silně závislé na označených datových sadách, které jsou drahé na výrobě. V této práci zkoumáme sentiment a identifikaci produktů na textech souvisejících s tabákem ze dvou sociálních médií. Vydáváme datové sady SentiSmoke-Twitter a SentiSmoke-Reddit spolu s komplexním anotací schématem pro identifikaci sentimentu tabákových výrobků. Následně provádíme srovnávací experimenty klasifikace textu pomocí nejmodernějších modelů, včetně BERT, RoBERTa a DistilBERT. Naše experimenty ukazují vysoké skóre F1 pro identifikaci sentimentů v datové sadě Twitter, 0.46 pro identifikaci sentimentů a 0.57 pro identifikaci produktů pomocí semi-supervisovaného učení pro Reddit.', 'et': 'Kaasaegsed tubakaga seotud uuringud on peamiselt seotud ühe sotsiaalmeedia platvormiga, kuid jäävad laiemast publikust ilma. Lisaks sõltuvad nad suuresti märgistatud andmekogumitest, mille valmistamine on kallis. Käesolevas töös uurime tundeid ja toodete identifitseerimist tubakaga seotud tekstis kahelt sotsiaalmeedia platvormilt. Avaldame SentiSmoke-Twitter ja SentiSmoke-Reddit andmekogumid koos ulatusliku märkuste skeemiga tubakatoodete tunde tuvastamiseks. Seejärel teostame tekstiklassifikatsiooni võrdlusuuringuid, kasutades kaasaegseid mudeleid, sealhulgas BERT, RoBERTa ja DistilBERT. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et F1 skoorid on Twitteri andmekogumis sentimentaalse identifitseerimise puhul 0,72, sentimentaalse identifitseerimise puhul 0,46 ja toote identifitseerimise puhul 0,57 Redditi pooljuhitatud õppe abil.', 'sk': 'Sodobne študije, povezane s tobakom, se večinoma ukvarjajo z eno platformo družbenih medijev, medtem ko zamujajo širšo občinstvo. Poleg tega so močno odvisni od označenih naborov podatkov, ki so dragi za izdelavo. V tem delu raziskujemo sentimentalnost in identifikacijo izdelkov na besedilih, povezanih s tobakom, iz dveh platform socialnih medijev. Objavljamo zbirke podatkov SentiSmoke-Twitter in SentiSmoke-Reddit, skupaj s celovito shemo opombe za prepoznavanje občutkov tobačnih izdelkov. Nato izvajamo primerjalne eksperimente klasifikacije besedil z uporabo najsodobnejših modelov, vključno z BERT, RoBERTa in DistilBERT. Naši eksperimenti kažejo rezultate F1 do 0,72 za identifikacijo sentimenta v naboru podatkov Twitterja, 0,46 za identifikacijo sentimenta in 0,57 za identifikacijo izdelka s polnadzorovanim učenjem za Reddit.', 'ha': "Akwai karatun masu husũma da tumbaku masu hususan sun yi amfani da platformi guda a lokacin da aka saka bayan saurãre masu shimfiɗa. Ko da haka, ana dõgara masu nauyi a kan matsayin da aka rubũta, masu kyauta ne. Daga wannan aikin, tuna karatun hisia da manuni kan matsayin da aka yi wa tumbaku daga mitandai biyu na jamii. Tuna sakar da sauki-Twitter da sautin-Rededit, sami da wani zane-zane-zane-zane-zane da za'a gane zaɓen abun tumbaku. Sa'an nan kuma, za'a cika jarrabãwa ga kallon matsayin da ke amfani da misãlai-na-sanar, kamar BERT, RoBERTA, da DistilBERT. Kayan jarrabayanmu za'a nuna F1 score ko da 0.42 ga gane na ido cikin bayani na Twitter, 0.46 wa zane gane na hisia, da 0.57 ga shaidar manunukan da aka yi amfani da karanta na ƙari-tsari wa Rededit.", 'bo': 'དུས་མའི་ཤོག་བྱང་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་དཔྱད་ཞིག་ནི་མང་ཆེ་བས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་གིས་བློ་གཏོང་མེད་པའི་ལ Moreover, they are heavily reliant on labeled datasets, which are expensive to make. དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གཉིས་ལས་རང་ཉིད་རྟོགས་དང་ཐུམ་སྒྲིལ་གྱི་ངོས ང་ཚོས་SentiSmoke-Twitter དང་SentiSmoke-Reddit གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་གྱི་མཛུབ་སྤྱོད་ཚོར་མཉམ་དུ་བཏུབ་པ་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་ཌིས་ཌིས་སྟེང་ནས་སྐད་རྟགས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་ཚིག་གྲངས་༡(0.72)དང་།', 'he': 'מחקרים זמניים קשורים לטבק מודאגים בעיקר עם פלטפורמת תקשורת חברתית אחת בעוד חסרים בקהל רחב יותר. חוץ מזה, הם תלויים בצורה רבה על קבוצות מידע מסומנות, שהיו יקרים להכין. In this work, we explore sentiment and product identification on tobacco-related text from two social media platforms.  אנחנו משחררים סנטי-סמוק-טוויטר וסנטי-סמוק-רדיט מסמכים מידע, יחד עם תכנית ציונים מכילה לזהות את רגשות מוצרי הטבק. ואז אנחנו מבצעים ניסויים מסווגים טקסטים בשימוש מודלים חדשים, כולל BERT, RoBERTa, ודיסטילברט. הניסויים שלנו מראים נקודות F1 גבוהות עד 0.72 לזהות רגשות בסט נתונים טוויטר, 0.46 לזהות רגשות, ו-0.57 לזהות מוצרים באמצעות לימוד חצי-מושג עבור רדיט.', 'jv': 'Perintah sing dipunangé karo Tabaké sing dikarepaké karo Perusahaan media sing mengko, nganggo akeh sing rawuh akeh basa sing paling maneh. Label Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné isih perusahaan Seneng lan Gambar uwong nggambar kelas kuwi nggawe barang sampek sing katêpakan karo perangkat media sotiki. Awak dhéwé ngewehi Senti Smoke-Tuter lan Senti Smoke-Resdit dataset, lan akeh akeh populasi sing gak dhéwé kanggo ngilangno Senti Smoke-Tuter. Defs that Where'}
{'en': 'Sentence Structure and Word Relationship Modeling for Emphasis Selection', 'ar': 'بنية الجملة ونمذجة علاقات الكلمات لتحديد التوكيد', 'fr': 'Modélisation de la structure des phrases et des relations entre les mots', 'es': 'Estructura de oraciones y modelado de relaciones de palabras para la selección de énfasis', 'pt': 'Estrutura de frases e modelagem de relacionamento de palavras para seleção de ênfase', 'ja': '強調選択のための文章構造と単語関係モデリング', 'zh': '于重音择句结构与单词关建模', 'ga': 'Struchtúr Pianbhreithe agus Samhaltú Gaol Focal le haghaidh Roghnú Béim', 'hi': 'जोर चयन के लिए वाक्य संरचना और शब्द संबंध मॉडलिंग', 'ru': 'Структура предложения и моделирование взаимоотношений слов для выбора акцента', 'el': 'Δομή φράσεων και μοντελοποίηση σχέσης λέξεων για επιλογή έμφαση', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'mondatszerkezet és szókapcsolat modellezése a hangsúlykijelöléshez', 'it': "Struttura delle frasi e modellazione delle relazioni di parole per la selezione dell'enfasi", 'kk': 'Таңдау үшін сөз құрылымы мен сөз қатынасын үлгілеу', 'lt': 'Sentence Structure and Word Relationship Modeling for Emphasis Selection', 'mk': 'Sentence Structure and Word Relationship Modeling for Emphasis Selection', 'ml': 'ശൂന്യമായ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ സ്ഥാനവും വാക്ക് ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മോഡി', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'L-Istruttura tas-Sentenza u l-Immodellar tar-Relazzjoni tal-Kliem għall-Għażla tal-Enfasi', 'pl': 'Struktura zdań i modelowanie relacji słowa dla wyboru nacisku', 'sr': 'Структура приказа и модел редских отношенија за избор акцента', 'no': 'Uttrykk- struktur og ordrelasjonsmodellering for uttrykk', 'mn': 'Үүний структур болон үгийн харилцааны загвар', 'si': 'වාර්තාව සහ වචන සම්බන්ධතාව මෝඩල් කරන්න', 'ro': 'Structura propoziției și modelarea relațiilor cu cuvintele pentru selectarea accentului', 'ur': 'Comment', 'so': 'Qoraalka la doorasho doorashada xiriirka iyo hadalka', 'sv': 'Meningsstruktur och modellering av ordrelationer för markering av betoning', 'ta': 'வாக்கியம் அமைப்பு மற்றும் வார்த்தை தொடர்பு மாதிரி', 'vi': 'Chế độ kết nối từ ngữ cho phần chọn nhấn mạnh', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': 'Sætningsstruktur og ordrelationsmodellering til fremhævning', 'bg': 'Структура на изреченията и моделиране на отношенията с думи за избор на акцент', 'hr': 'Struktura kazna i model odnosa riječi za izbor naglaska', 'nl': 'Zinnstructuur en woordrelatiemodellering voor nadruk selecteren', 'de': 'Satzstruktur und Wortbeziehungsmodell für die Betonungsauswahl', 'fa': 'ساختار کلمه و مدل ارتباط کلمه برای انتخاب تأثیر', 'sw': 'Miundombinu ya Hukumu na Utoaji wa Hadithi kwa ajili ya Uchaguzi wa Tatizo', 'tr': 'Täze Saýlaw üçin Sözler Structure and Word Relationship Modeling', 'id': 'Struktur Sentensi dan Hubungan Kata Modeling untuk Pemilihan Teks', 'ko': '중점적으로 선택한 문장 구조와 단어 관계 모델링', 'af': 'Stelsel Struktuur en Woord Relasie Modelering vir Emphasis Keuse', 'sq': 'Modelimi i strukturës së fjalëve dhe lidhjes me fjalët për zgjedhjen e theksimit', 'am': 'ምርጫ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Sözlük Qurğulu və Sözlük İlişkisi Modeli', 'bn': 'Emphasis নির্বাচনের জন্য শাস্তি কাঠামো এবং শব্দ সম্পর্ক মোডেল', 'bs': 'Struktura kazna i model odnosa riječi za izbor naglaska', 'ca': 'Sentence Structure and Word Relationship Modeling for Emphasis Selection', 'et': 'Lausestruktuuri ja sõnasuhte modelleerimine rõhuasetuse valimiseks', 'cs': 'Struktura vět a modelování vztahů slov pro výběr důrazu', 'fi': 'Lausekkeen rakenne ja sanasuhteiden mallinnus korostuksen valintaa varten', 'jv': 'structural and Word Relance model for emphasis Select', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'מבנה משפטים ומדגם יחסי מילים לבחירה במצב', 'sk': 'Struktura stavka in modeliranje besednih relacij za izbiro poudarka', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་གཏོང་མཁན་དབྱིབས་དང་ཡིག་གི་འབྲེལ་བ་བཀོད་སྟངས་གདམ་པ'}
{'en': 'Emphasis Selection is a newly proposed task which focuses on choosing words for emphasis in short sentences. Traditional methods only consider the sequence information of a sentence while ignoring the rich sentence structure and word relationship information. In this paper, we propose a new framework that considers sentence structure via a sentence structure graph and word relationship via a word similarity graph. The sentence structure graph is derived from the parse tree of a sentence. The word similarity graph allows nodes to share information with their neighbors since we argue that in emphasis selection, similar words are more likely to be emphasized together. Graph neural networks are employed to learn the representation of each node of these two graphs. Experimental results demonstrate that our framework can achieve superior performance.', 'pt': 'A Seleção de Ênfase é uma tarefa recentemente proposta que se concentra na escolha de palavras para ênfase em frases curtas. Os métodos tradicionais consideram apenas as informações de sequência de uma frase, ignorando a rica estrutura da frase e as informações de relacionamento das palavras. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova estrutura que considera a estrutura da sentença por meio de um gráfico de estrutura de sentença e o relacionamento de palavras por meio de um gráfico de semelhança de palavras. O gráfico de estrutura de sentença é derivado da árvore de análise de uma sentença. O grafo de similaridade de palavras permite que os nós compartilhem informações com seus vizinhos, pois argumentamos que na seleção de ênfase, palavras semelhantes são mais prováveis de serem enfatizadas juntas. As redes neurais gráficas são empregadas para aprender a representação de cada nó desses dois gráficos. Resultados experimentais demonstram que nosso framework pode alcançar um desempenho superior.', 'ar': 'اختيار التوكيد هو مهمة مقترحة حديثًا تركز على اختيار الكلمات للتأكيد في جمل قصيرة. تراعي الطرق التقليدية فقط معلومات التسلسل للجملة بينما تتجاهل بنية الجملة الغنية ومعلومات العلاقة بين الكلمات. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح إطارًا جديدًا يأخذ في الاعتبار بنية الجملة عبر مخطط بنية الجملة والعلاقة بين الكلمات عبر مخطط تشابه الكلمات. الرسم البياني لبنية الجملة مشتق من شجرة تحليل الجملة. يسمح الرسم البياني للتشابه للكلمة بالعقد بمشاركة المعلومات مع جيرانها لأننا نجادل في اختيار التركيز ، من المرجح أن يتم التأكيد على الكلمات المتشابهة معًا. يتم استخدام الشبكات العصبية للرسم البياني لمعرفة تمثيل كل عقدة من هذين الرسمين البيانيين. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن إطار عملنا يمكن أن يحقق أداءً فائقًا.', 'es': 'La selección de énfasis es una tarea recientemente propuesta que se centra en elegir palabras para enfatizar en oraciones cortas. Los métodos tradicionales solo consideran la información de secuencia de una oración e ignoran la rica estructura de la oración y la información de la relación de palabras. En este artículo, proponemos un nuevo marco que considera la estructura de las oraciones mediante un gráfico de estructura de oraciones y la relación de palabras mediante un gráfico de similitud de palabras. El gráfico de estructura de oraciones se deriva del árbol de análisis de una oración. El gráfico de similitud de palabras permite a los nodos compartir información con sus vecinos, ya que argumentamos que en la selección de énfasis, es más probable que las palabras similares se enfaticen juntas. Las redes neuronales de gráficos se emplean para aprender la representación de cada nodo de estos dos gráficos. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que nuestro marco puede lograr un rendimiento superior.', 'fr': "La sélection de l'emphase est une nouvelle tâche proposée qui se concentre sur le choix des mots à mettre en évidence dans des phrases courtes. Les méthodes traditionnelles prennent uniquement en compte les informations de séquence d'une phrase tout en ignorant la structure riche de la phrase et les informations de relation entre les mots. Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau cadre qui prend en compte la structure de la phrase via un graphe de structure de phrase et la relation entre les mots via un graphe de similarité de mots. Le graphe de structure de phrase est dérivé de l'arbre d'analyse d'une phrase. Le graphe de similarité de mots permet aux nœuds de partager des informations avec leurs voisins puisque nous soutenons que dans la sélection de l'emphase, les mots similaires sont plus susceptibles d'être accentués ensemble. Les réseaux neuronaux de graphes sont utilisés pour apprendre la représentation de chaque nœud de ces deux graphes. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que notre cadre peut atteindre des performances supérieures.", 'ja': '強調選択は、短い文章で強調するための単語を選択することに焦点を当てた、新たに提案されたタスクです。従来の方法は、豊富な文章構造と単語関係情報を無視して、文章のシーケンス情報のみを考慮しています。本稿では、文章構造グラフを介した文章構造と、単語類似性グラフを介した単語関係を考慮した新しい枠組みを提案する。文構造グラフは、文の構文解析ツリーに由来する。言葉の類似性グラフは、ノードが隣人と情報を共有することを可能にします。なぜなら、強調選択では、類似の単語が一緒に強調される可能性が高いからです。グラフニューラルネットワークは、これらの２つのグラフの各ノードの表現を学習するために使用される。実験結果は、当社のフレームワークが優れたパフォーマンスを達成できることを示しています。', 'zh': '重择一新之务,侧重于择短句之单词。 古法惟思一句之序,而忽乎富句结构之信。 本文中,发一新框架,句结构图思句,与单词相似性图单词。 句结构图使生解析树。 单词相似性图许节点与邻人共信息,以为在强调择中,相似者单词更可并调也。 图神经网络以学二图之节点也。 实验结果表明,吾框架可以成卓异之性。', 'hi': 'जोर चयन एक नया प्रस्तावित कार्य है जो छोटे वाक्यों में जोर देने के लिए शब्दों को चुनने पर केंद्रित है। पारंपरिक तरीके केवल एक वाक्य की अनुक्रम जानकारी पर विचार करते हैं, जबकि समृद्ध वाक्य संरचना और शब्द संबंध जानकारी को अनदेखा करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक नए ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक वाक्य संरचना ग्राफ के माध्यम से वाक्य संरचना और शब्द समानता ग्राफ के माध्यम से शब्द संबंध पर विचार करता है। वाक्य संरचना ग्राफ एक वाक्य के पार्स पेड़ से लिया गया है। शब्द समानता ग्राफ नोड्स को अपने पड़ोसियों के साथ जानकारी साझा करने की अनुमति देता है क्योंकि हम तर्क देते हैं कि जोर देने वाले चयन में, समान शब्दों पर एक साथ जोर देने की अधिक संभावना है। ग्राफ़ तंत्रिका नेटवर्क को इन दो रेखांकनों के प्रत्येक नोड के प्रतिनिधित्व को सीखने के लिए नियोजित किया जाता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि हमारा ढांचा बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त कर सकता है।', 'ru': 'Выделение - это недавно предложенная задача, которая фокусируется на выборе слов для выделения в коротких предложениях. Традиционные методы учитывают только информацию о последовательности предложения, игнорируя при этом богатую структуру предложения и информацию о соотношении слов. В этой статье мы предлагаем новую структуру, которая рассматривает структуру предложения через график структуры предложения и связь слов через график сходства слов. График структуры предложения получается из дерева синтаксического анализа предложения. Граф сходства слов позволяет узлам обмениваться информацией со своими соседями, поскольку мы утверждаем, что при выборе акцентов сходные слова, скорее всего, будут подчеркиваться вместе. Нейронные сети графов используются для изучения представления каждого узла этих двух графов. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша система может достичь превосходной производительности.', 'ga': 'Is tasc nua-mholta é Roghnú Béim a dhíríonn ar fhocail a roghnú le béim a chur orthu in abairtí gearra. Ní bhreithníonn modhanna traidisiúnta ach faisnéis seicheamh abairte agus neamhaird á dhéanamh ar struchtúr saibhir na habairte agus ar fhaisnéis an chaidrimh focal. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid creat nua a bhreithníonn struchtúr abairtí trí ghraf struchtúr abairte agus caidreamh focal trí ghraf cosúlachta focal. Díorthaítear graf struchtúr na habairte ó chrann parsála abairte. Ligeann an focal graf cosúlachta do nóid eolas a roinnt lena gcomharsana mar áitímid gur mó an seans go leagfar béim ar fhocail chosúla le chéile i roghnú béime. Úsáidtear líonraí néaracha graf chun léiriú gach nóid den dá ghraf seo a fhoghlaim. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha gur féidir lenár gcreat feidhmíocht níos fearr a bhaint amach.', 'ka': 'მონიშნული მონიშნულება ახალი მონიშნული რაოდენობა, რომელიც მონიშნული სიტყვების მონიშნულებაში დააყენება. ტრადიციონალური მეტოვები მხოლოდ შესახებ სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების ინფორმაციას და სიტყვების სიტყვების ინფორმაციას. ამ დონტაქტში ჩვენ ახალი ფრამეტრი, რომელიც საკუთარი სტრუქტურაცია და სიტყვების შესახებ სიტყვების სიტყვების გრაფიკის გამოყენებაში დავწყებთ. სტრუქტურის სტრუქტურის გრაფიკის პარასის ხედან გამოიყენება. სიტყვების სხვადასხვა გრაფიკაში კონდის შესაძლებელია ინფორმაციის გაყოფილი მათი საზოგადოებთან იყოს, რადგან ჩვენ არჩევით, რომ არჩევაში, სხვადასხვა სიტყვები უფრო შე გრაფიკური ნეიროლური ქსელები მომხმარებულია ამ ორი გრაფიკის ყოველ კონდის გამოსახულება. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი პარამეტრის შესაძლებელია უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენა.', 'el': 'Η επιλογή έμφαση είναι μια νέα προτεινόμενη εργασία που επικεντρώνεται στην επιλογή λέξεων για έμφαση σε σύντομες προτάσεις. Οι παραδοσιακές μέθοδοι λαμβάνουν υπόψη μόνο τις πληροφορίες ακολουθίας μιας πρότασης ενώ αγνοούν την πλούσια δομή προτάσεων και τις πληροφορίες σχέσης λέξεων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο που εξετάζει τη δομή των προτάσεων μέσω ενός γραφήματος δομής προτάσεων και τη σχέση λέξεων μέσω ενός γραφήματος ομοιότητας λέξεων. Το γράφημα δομής προτάσεων προέρχεται από το δέντρο ανάλυσης μιας πρότασης. Το γράφημα ομοιότητας λέξεων επιτρέπει στους κόμβους να μοιράζονται πληροφορίες με τους γείτονές τους, δεδομένου ότι υποστηρίζουμε ότι στην επιλογή έμφαση, παρόμοιες λέξεις είναι πιο πιθανό να τονιστούν μαζί. Τα νευρωνικά δίκτυα γραφήματος χρησιμοποιούνται για να μάθουν την αναπαράσταση κάθε κόμβου αυτών των δύο γραφημάτων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το πλαίσιο μας μπορεί να επιτύχει ανώτερη απόδοση.', 'hu': 'Hangsúlykiválasztás egy újonnan javasolt feladat, amely a rövid mondatok hangsúlyozására összpontosít. A hagyományos módszerek csak egy mondat sorozat információit veszik figyelembe, miközben figyelmen kívül hagyják a gazdag mondatszerkezetet és a szókapcsolat információit. Ebben a tanulmányban egy olyan új keretrendszert javasolunk, amely a mondatszerkezetet egy mondatszerkezeti grafikonon keresztül és a szóhasonlósági grafikonon keresztül vizsgálja. A mondatszerkezeti grafikon egy mondat elemezési fájából származik. A szó hasonlósági grafikonja lehetővé teszi a csomópontok számára, hogy információkat osszanak meg a szomszédaikkal, mivel azt állítjuk, hogy a hangsúlykiválasztás során a hasonló szavak nagyobb valószínűséggel hangsúlyozzák együtt. Graf neurális hálózatokat alkalmaznak a két grafikon minden csomópontjának ábrázolására. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a keretrendszerünk kiváló teljesítményt tud elérni.', 'it': "La selezione dell'enfasi è un compito appena proposto che si concentra sulla scelta delle parole per enfatizzare le frasi brevi. I metodi tradizionali considerano solo le informazioni di sequenza di una frase ignorando la struttura ricca della frase e le informazioni sulle relazioni di parola. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo framework che considera la struttura delle frasi tramite un grafico della struttura delle frasi e la relazione delle parole tramite un grafico di somiglianza delle parole. Il grafico della struttura della frase è derivato dall'albero parse di una frase. Il grafico di somiglianza delle parole consente ai nodi di condividere informazioni con i loro vicini poiché sosteniamo che nella selezione dell'enfasi, parole simili sono più propense ad essere enfatizzate insieme. Le reti neurali grafiche sono impiegate per imparare la rappresentazione di ogni nodo di questi due grafici. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro framework può raggiungere prestazioni superiori.", 'mk': 'Го истакнува изборот е ново предложена задача која се фокусира на изборот на зборови за истакнување во кратки реченици. Традиционалните методи ги сметаат само информациите за секвенца на реченица, иако ги игнорираат богатите реченици и информациите за зборовите врски. Во овој весник, предложуваме нова рамка која ја разгледува структурата на речениците преку граф на структурата на речениците и зборен однос преку граф на сличност на зборот. Графот на структурата на речениците е извлечен од дрвото на анализирање на реченицата. Зборот график за сличност им овозможува на јазлите да споделат информации со нивните соседи бидејќи тврдиме дека во изборот на истакнување, сличните зборови најверојатно ќе бидат истакнати заедно. Графските нервни мрежи се употребени за да се научи претставувањето на секој јазол од овие два графики. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашата рамка може да постигне супериорна резултатност.', 'lt': 'Pabrėžti atranką – naujai pasiūlyta užduotis, kuria daugiausia dėmesio skiriama žodžių, skirtų pabrėžti trumpalaikiais sakiniais, pasirinkimui. Tradiciniais metodais atsižvelgiama tik į sakinio sekos informaciją, ignoruojant turtingą sakinio struktūrą ir žodžių santykių informaciją. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują sistemą, kuri svarsto sakinių struktūrą per sakinių struktūros grafiką ir žodžių santykius per žodžio panašumo grafiką. Pasakymų struktūros grafikas gaunamas iš sakinio apdorojimo medžio. Sąvoka panašumo grafika leidžia mazgams dalytis informacija su savo kaimynais, nes mes teigiame, kad pasirinkus pabrėžtą dėmesį panašūs žodžiai labiau tikėtina kartu pabrėžti. Graph neural networks are employed to learn the representation of each node of these two graphs.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų sistema gali pasiekti geresnius rezultatus.', 'ms': 'Memandangkan Pemilihan adalah tugas yang baru diusulkan yang fokus pada memilih perkataan untuk fokus dalam kalimat pendek. Kaedah tradisional hanya mempertimbangkan maklumat urutan kalimat semasa mengabaikan struktur kalimat kaya dan maklumat hubungan perkataan. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangan baru yang mempertimbangkan struktur kalimat melalui graf struktur kalimat dan hubungan perkataan melalui graf persamaan perkataan. Graf struktur kalimat dibina dari pepohon hurai kalimat. Graf persamaan perkataan membolehkan nod berkongsi maklumat dengan jiran-jiran mereka kerana kami menyangka bahawa dalam pemilihan fokus, perkataan-perkataan yang serupa lebih mungkin akan diterangkan bersama-sama. Graph neural networks are employed to learn the representation of each node of these two graphs.  Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kerangka kita boleh mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik.', 'kk': 'Таңдау - қысқа сөздерді таңдау үшін сөздерді таңдау үшін жаңа таңдаған тапсырма. Дәстүрлі әдістер тек сұлба құрылымын және сөз қатынасы туралы мәліметті елемейді. Бұл қағазда сөздердің құрылымын және сөздердің қатынасын сөздердің ұқсас графикасы арқылы сұрақтың құрылымын қалайтын жаңа қоршауын таңдаймыз. Сөздің құрылғысының графигі сөздің талдау бұтағынан шығады. Бұл сөздердің ұқсастық графикасы көңілдеріне мәліметті бөліске мүмкіндік береді, өйткені біз таңдағанда ұқсас сөздерді бірге бағыттауға мүмкін. Графикалық невралдық желілер бұл екі графиктердің әрбір түбірін көрсету үшін қолданылады. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер біздің бағдарламамыздың жоғары істеу мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'mt': 'L-enfasi fuq l-Għa żla hija kompitu ġdid propost li jiffoka fuq l-għażla ta’ kliem għall-enfasi f’sentenzi qosra. Il-metodi tradizzjonali jikkunsidraw biss l-informazzjoni tas-sekwenza ta’ sentenza filwaqt li jinjoraw l-istruttura rikka tas-sentenza u l-informazzjoni dwar ir-relazzjoni tal-kelma. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu qafas ġdid li jikkunsidra l-istruttura tas-sentenza permezz ta’ graff tal-istruttura tas-sentenza u relazzjoni tal-kelma permezz ta’ graff tal-kelma similarità. Il-grafika tal-istruttura tas-sentenza hija dderivata mis-siġar tal-analiżi ta’ sentenza. Il-kelma grafika ta’ similarità tippermetti lin-nodi jaqsmu l-informazzjoni mal-ġirien tagħhom peress li aħna jargumentaw li fl-għażla ta’ enfasi, kliem simili x’aktarx li jiġu enfasizzati flimkien. In-netwerks newrali tal-graff jintużaw biex jitgħallmu r-rappreżentazzjoni ta’ kull nodu ta’ dawn iż-żewġ graffi. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-qafas tagħna jista’ jikseb prestazzjoni superjuri.', 'ml': 'തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് ചുരുക്കിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന പുതിയ പ്രായശ്ചി സമ്പന്നരാജ്യത്തിന്റെ വാക്കിന്റെ ഘടനയും വാക്ക് ബന്ധമുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളും ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ സ്ഥി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ സംവിധാനവും വാക്കിന്റെ സംബന്ധം ഒരു വാക്ക് തുല്യമായ ഗ്രാഫിലൂടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനവും കാ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്ന ഗ്രാഫ് ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ പാര്\u200dസ് വൃക്ഷത്തില്\u200d നിന്നാണ് വന്നത്. ഒരേ വാക്ക് ഗ്രാഫ് അവയുടെ അയല്\u200dക്കാരുടെ കൂടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d നോഡുകള്\u200dക്ക് അനുവദിക്കുന്നു. തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത ഈ രണ്ടു ഗ്രാഫിന്റെ ഓരോ നോഡിന്റെയും പ്രതിനിധിയെ പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗി പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമ്മെക്ക് ഉത്തമമായ പ്രകടനം നേടാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Шинэ сонголт нь богино өгүүлбэрт анхаарлаа сонгох үгийг анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг шинэ санал өгсөн ажил юм. Шинжлэх арга нь зөвхөн өгүүлбэрийн дарааллын мэдээллийг зөвхөн баян өгүүлбэрийн бүтэц болон үгийн харилцааны мэдээллийг үгүйсгэхгүй байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өгүүлбэр бүтэц график болон үгийн харилцааны график аргаар шинэ хэлбэрийг санал болгож байна. Үүний бүтцийн график нь өгүүлбэрийн хураагдах модоос гарч ирсэн юм. Үүнтэй адилхан үг график нь хөршүүдийн хамт мэдээллийг хуваалцах боломжтой болгодог. Яагаад гэвэл бид сонголтыг анхаарлаа анхаарлаа тайлбарлах боломжтой юм. График мэдрэлийн сүлжээг эдгээр хоёр графикийн дугуй бүрийн илэрхийллийг сурахад ашигладаг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний үйл ажиллагаа дээд хүрэх боломжтой гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Wybór nacisku to nowo proponowane zadanie, które skupia się na wyborze słów do podkreślenia w krótkich zdaniach. Tradycyjne metody uwzględniają tylko informacje o sekwencji zdania, ignorując bogatą strukturę zdań i informacje o relacjach słów. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowe ramy, które uwzględniają strukturę zdań za pomocą wykresu struktury zdań i relacji słowa za pomocą wykresu podobieństwa słowa. Wykres struktury zdań pochodzi z drzewa parse zdania. Wykres podobieństwa słów pozwala węzłom dzielić się informacjami ze swoimi sąsiadami, ponieważ twierdzimy, że w wyborze nacisku podobne słowa są bardziej prawdopodobne, że są podkreślane razem. Wykresowe sieci neuronowe są wykorzystywane do nauki reprezentacji każdego węzła tych dwóch wykresów. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz framework może osiągnąć doskonałą wydajność.', 'no': 'Understrekar utval er eit nytt foreslått oppgåve som fokuserer på å velja ord for å understreka i korte setningar. Tradisjonale metodar gjer berre det rekkefølgjande informasjonen om eit setning mens du ignorerer rikke setningsstrukturen og ordforholdsinformasjonen. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit ny rammeverk som ser på setningsstruktur via eit setningsstrukturgraf og ordforholdet via eit ordlikningsgraf. Dette setningsstrukturgrafikket er oppteken frå tolkingstemmet av eit setning. Ordlikningsgrafen tillèt nodene å dele informasjon med naboene sine sidan vi argumenterer at i utvalet er det mest sannsynleg å understreka liknande ord sammen. Grafikk nøyralnettverk er arbeida for å lære representasjonen av kvar node av desse to grafene. Eksperimentale resultat viser at rammeverket vårt kan oppnå øvre utvikling.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තෝරාගන්නේ අළුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ වාක්ය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් වචන තෝරාගන්න සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් විතරයි වාක්ය සම්බන්ධතා තොරතුරු අවස්ථාවක් විතරයි. මේ පත්තරේ අපි අළුත් පත්තරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා කියලා වාක්ය සංවිධානය සහ වචන සම්බන්ධයක් වචන සංවිධානය වාක්ය ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක වාක්යේ විශේෂ ගස් වලින් පිළිගත්තා. වචනය සමාන්\u200dයතාවය ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්ක නෝඩ්ස් එක්ක තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා, වගේ ව ග්\u200dරාෆ් න්\u200dයූරාල් ජාලය සැලසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ මේ දෙකක් ග්\u200dරාෆ් දෙකක් ගැන හැම නොඩ්ගේ ප්\u200dරති පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නවා අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරධානයක් පුළුවන් කියලා.', 'sr': 'Stavlja naglasku na izbor izbora novog predloženog zadatka koji se fokusira na izbor reči za naglasak u kratkim rečenicama. Tradicionalne metode razmatraju samo sekvenčnu informaciju rečenice dok ignorišu bogatu strukturu rečenice i informacije o vezi rečenica. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi okvir koji razmatra strukturu rečenica kroz graf strukture rečenica i vezu rečenica kroz graf sličnosti rečenica. Graf strukture rečenice se nalazi iz drveta analize rečenice. Graf sličnosti reči omogućava čvorovima da podijele informacije sa svojim komšijama jer tvrdimo da će u naglasku selekcije, slične reči biti verovatnije naglasljene zajedno. Grafikske neuralne mreže su zaposlene kako bi naučili zastupanje svakog čvora ovih dva grafika. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš okvir može ostvariti superiornu izvedbu.', 'sv': 'Betoningsval är en nyligen föreslagen uppgift som fokuserar på att välja ord för betoning i korta meningar. Traditionella metoder beaktar bara sekvensinformationen i en mening samtidigt som man ignorerar den rika meningsstrukturen och ordrelationsinformationen. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett nytt ramverk som beaktar meningsstruktur via en meningsstrukturgraf och ordrelation via en ordlikhetsgraf. Frastrukturgrafen härleds från parseträdet i en mening. Ordet likhetsdiagram tillåter noder att dela information med sina grannar eftersom vi hävdar att i betoning val, liknande ord är mer benägna att betonas tillsammans. Graf neurala nätverk används för att lära sig representationen av varje nod av dessa två grafer. Experimentella resultat visar att vårt ramverk kan uppnå överlägsen prestanda.', 'ta': 'தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு ஒரு புதிய பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட செயலாகும், அது சிறிய வாக்கியங்களில் குறைவாக்குதலில் வார்த பழைய வாக்கு அமைப்பு மற்றும் வார்த்தை தொடர்பு தகவல்களை தவிர்க்கும் போது பாரம்பரிய முறைகள் மட்டுமே ஒரு வாக்கின் த இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். ஒரு வாக்கு அமைப்பு வரைபடம் மற்றும் வார்த்தை தொடர்பு வரைபடம் வழ வாக்கியம் அமைப்பு வரைபடம் ஒரு வாக்கியத்தின் பகுதி மரத்திலிருந்து வந்துள்ளது. வார்த்தை ஒத்த வரைபடம் தங்கள் நெடுவரிகளுடன் தகவல்களை பகிர்ந்து கொள்ள அனுமதிக்கிறது ஏனெனில் நாம் தேர்வு செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது என்று வி புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல்கள் ஒவ்வொரு வரைபடத்தின் பிரதிநிதியை கற்றுக்கொள்ள பயன்படுத்தப்படுகின்றன. சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் நமது சட்டத்தில் மேலான செயல்பாட்டை அடைய முடியும் என்பதை காண்பிக்கிறது.', 'so': 'Dalbashada waxqabadka cusub waa shaqo la soo jeeday oo ku focus yahay doorashada hadallada aad ku qoran karto qoraal gaaban. Isticmaalka caadiga ah oo keliya ayaa ka fiirsada macluumaadka qoraalka dhamaadka marka aad ka tagto dhismaha dowladda iyo macluumaadka xiriirka hadalka. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal cusub oo ka fikiraya dhismo kaliya oo ku qoran xarunta dhismaha iyo xiriirka hadalka ee ku qoran xarunta isku mid ah. Tusaale xarunta ereyga waxaa laga soo saaraa geedka baarlamaanka. Hadalka isku mid ah waxaa laga yaabaa in dhammaantood la wada bandhigi karo macluumaad la xiriira derisyadooda, sababtoo ah waxaynu ka fekernay in doorasho la mid ah. Shabakada neurada waxaa loo isticmaalaa si ay u barto mid kasta oo ku saabsan labadaas sawir. Shahaadada imtixaanka waxay muujiyaan in fircoonkeenu uu gaadhi karo tababar ka sareeya.', 'ur': 'انتخاب کی تسبیح کرتی ہے ایک نئی پیشنهاد کی تابع ہے جو چھوٹی جماعتوں میں تسبیح کرنے کے لئے کلمات انتخاب کرنے پر تمرکز کرتی ہے. سنتی طریقے صرف ایک جماعت کی سطح معلومات کی نظر رکھتے ہیں جب کہ جماعت ساختار اور کلمات رابطہ معلومات کو نادانی کرتی ہیں. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نئی فرمود پیش کریں گے جو ایک کلمہ ساختار گراف اور کلمہ رابطہ کے ذریعہ ایک کلمہ سیدھی گراف کے ذریعہ مجازات کرتا ہے. sentence structure graph is derived from the parse tree of a sentence. کلمات مثالی گراف نے نوڈوں کو ان کے گھر والوں کے ساتھ معلومات کا شریک کرنے کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے کیونکہ ہم نے یہ جھگڑا ہے کہ انتخاب میں مثالی کے ساتھ ویسی کلمات زیادہ مشکل ہے۔ یہ دو گراف کے ہر نوڈ کی نمایش سکھانے کے لئے گراف نیورال نیٹورک استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں. آزمائش کے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا فرمود بہترین عمل پہنچا سکتا ہے.', 'ro': 'Selecția accentului este o sarcină nou propusă care se concentrează pe alegerea cuvintelor pentru accent în propoziții scurte. Metodele tradiționale iau în considerare doar informațiile secvențiale ale unei propoziții, ignorând structura bogată a propoziției și informațiile relațiilor cu cuvintele. În această lucrare, propunem un nou cadru care ia în considerare structura propoziției printr-un grafic de structură a propozițiilor și relația cuvântului printr-un grafic de similitudine cuvânt. Graficul structurii propoziției este derivat din arborele parse al unei propoziții. Graficul de similitudine cuvânt permite nodurilor să partajeze informații cu vecinii lor, deoarece susținem că în selecția accentului, cuvinte similare sunt mai probabil să fie subliniate împreună. Rețelele neurale grafice sunt utilizate pentru a învăța reprezentarea fiecărui nod al acestor două grafice. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că cadrul nostru poate obține performanțe superioare.', 'uz': "Oʻzgaruvchini yopish Traditional methods only consider the sequence information of a sentence while ignoring the rich sentence structure and word relationship information.  Bu hujjatda, biz gap tuzilishini tasavvur qilamiz, bir so'zlar tuzilishini tasavvur qiladi va so'zlar murojaat bilan bir so'z shaklga grafik orqali murojaat qiladi. Name Shaxsiy grafik so'zlar qo'llanmalar bilan maʼlumot yordam berishga ruxsat beradi chunki biz bir necha so'zlarni tanlash mumkin, birlashtirish mumkin. Ushbu ikki grafikning har bir noyning representini o'rganish uchun grafik tarmoq ishlaydi. Tekshirish natijalari, freymning tuzilishimiz eng yuqori bajarish imkoniyatini bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Nhấn mạnh phần chọn là một nhiệm vụ mới được đề xuất tập trung vào việc chọn từ để nhấn mạnh trong các câu ngắn. Phương pháp truyền thống chỉ xem xét chuỗi thông tin của một câu nói trong khi lờ đi cấu trúc câu nói giàu có và thông tin các từ liên hệ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở mới xem xét cấu trúc án qua biểu đồ cấu trúc án và quan hệ từ qua biểu đồ giống nhau từ. Hình cấu trúc câu được vẽ từ cây cha xứ của một câu. The Từ tương tự đồ đồ thị cho phép các nút chia sẻ thông tin với hàng xóm vì chúng ta tranh luận rằng trong phần chọn nhấn, những từ tương tự sẽ được nhấn mạnh nhiều hơn khi được nhấn vào nhau. Mạng thần kinh đồ họa được sử dụng để học đại diện của mỗi nút của hai biểu đồ này. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy cơ sở của chúng ta đạt được hiệu suất cao.', 'bg': 'Изборът на акцент е новопредложена задача, която се фокусира върху избора на думи за акцент в кратки изречения. Традиционните методи разглеждат само информацията за последователността на изречение, като същевременно игнорират богатата структура на изречението и информацията за отношенията на думите. В настоящата статия предлагаме нова рамка, която разглежда структурата на изреченията чрез графика на структурата на изреченията и връзката на думите чрез графика на сходство на думи. Графиката на структурата на изречението се извлича от дървото за анализ на изречение. Графиката за сходство на думата позволява възлите да споделят информация със съседите си, тъй като твърдим, че при избора на акцент подобни думи са по-вероятно да бъдат подчертани заедно. Графични невронни мрежи се използват, за да се научи представянето на всеки възел от тези две графики. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашата рамка може да постигне по-добра производителност.', 'nl': 'Nadruk Selectie is een nieuw voorgestelde taak die zich richt op het kiezen van woorden voor nadruk in korte zinnen. Traditionele methoden houden alleen rekening met de volgorde-informatie van een zin, terwijl de rijke zinsstructuur en woordrelatiegegevens worden genegeerd. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuw raamwerk voor dat zinnenstructuur beschouwt via een zinnenstructuurgrafiek en woordrelatie via een woordgelijkenisgrafiek. De zinsstructuur grafiek is afgeleid van de parse boom van een zin. De woordgelijkenisgrafiek stelt knooppunten in staat om informatie te delen met hun buren, omdat we beweren dat bij de selectie van nadruk vergelijkbare woorden eerder samen benadrukt worden. Grafische neurale netwerken worden gebruikt om de weergave van elk knooppunt van deze twee grafieken te leren. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons framework superieure prestaties kan bereiken.', 'da': 'Vægt udvælgelse er en nyforeslået opgave, der fokuserer på at vælge ord til vægt i korte sætninger. Traditionelle metoder overvejer kun sekvensoplysningerne i en sætning, mens de ignorerer den rige sætningsstruktur og oplysninger om ordforhold. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny ramme, der overvejer sætningsstruktur via en sætningsstrukturgraf og ordforhold via en ordlighedsgraf. Sætningsstrukturgrafen er afledt af parsetræet i en sætning. Ordets lighedsgraf giver noder mulighed for at dele oplysninger med deres naboer, da vi hævder, at i vægtvalg, lignende ord er mere tilbøjelige til at blive understreget sammen. Graf neurale netværk anvendes til at lære repræsentationen af hver knude af disse to grafer. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores rammer kan opnå overlegen ydeevne.', 'de': 'Betonung Auswahl ist eine neu vorgeschlagene Aufgabe, die sich auf die Auswahl von Wörtern für Betonung in kurzen Sätzen konzentriert. Traditionelle Methoden berücksichtigen nur die Sequenzinformationen eines Satzes, während die reichhaltige Satzstruktur und Wortbeziehungsinformationen ignoriert werden. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein neues Framework vor, das Satzstruktur über einen Satzstrukturgraphen und Wortbeziehungen über einen Wortähnlichkeitsgraphen berücksichtigt. Der Satzstrukturgraph wird aus dem Parse-Baum eines Satzes abgeleitet. Der Wortähnlichkeitsgraph erlaubt Knoten, Informationen mit ihren Nachbarn zu teilen, da wir argumentieren, dass bei der Betonungsauswahl ähnliche Wörter eher zusammen betont werden. Grafische neuronale Netze werden verwendet, um die Darstellung jedes Knotens dieser beiden Graphen zu lernen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Framework eine überlegene Leistung erzielen kann.', 'ko': '중점 선택은 새로 제기된 임무로 중점은 짧은 문장에서 강조어를 선택하는 것이다.전통적인 방법은 문장의 순서 정보만 고려하고 풍부한 문장 구조와 단어 관계 정보를 소홀히 한다.본고에서 우리는 문장 구조도를 통해 문장 구조를 고려하고 단어 유사도를 통해 단어 관계를 고려하는 새로운 틀을 제시했다.문장 구조도는 문장의 해석 트리에서 파생된 것이다.단어 유사성도는 노드와 이웃이 정보를 공유할 수 있도록 한다. 왜냐하면 강조 선택에서 비슷한 단어가 함께 강조될 가능성이 높다고 생각하기 때문이다.도신경 네트워크는 이 두 그림의 각 노드의 표시를 배우는 데 쓰인다.실험 결과, 우리의 틀은 우수한 성능을 실현할 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'id': 'Emphasis Selection is a newly proposed task which focuses on choosing words for emphasis in short sentences.  Metode tradisional hanya mempertimbangkan informasi urutan kalimat sementara mengabaikan struktur kalimat kaya dan informasi hubungan kata. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan cadangan baru yang mempertimbangkan struktur kalimat melalui grafik struktur kalimat dan hubungan kata melalui grafik persamaan kata. Graf struktur kalimat berasal dari pohon analisis kalimat. Kata grafik persamaan memungkinkan node untuk berbagi informasi dengan tetangga mereka karena kita berdebat bahwa dalam pemilihan fokus, kata-kata yang sama lebih mungkin akan didesak bersama-sama. Jaringan saraf grafik digunakan untuk mempelajari representation setiap node dari dua grafik ini. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa rangka kita dapat mencapai prestasi yang lebih tinggi.', 'hr': 'naglašava odabranje novog predloženog zadatka koji se fokusira na odabiru riječi za naglašavanje u kratkim rečenicama. Tradicionalne metode razmatraju samo sekvenčne informacije rečenice dok ignoriraju strukturu bogate rečenice i informacije o vezi s riječima. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi okvir koji smatra strukturu rečenica kroz graf strukture rečenica i odnos riječi kroz graf sličnosti riječi. Graf strukture rečenice je iz drveta analize rečenice. Graf sličnosti riječi omogućava čvorovima podijeliti informacije sa svojim susjedima jer tvrdimo da će u naglasku izbora biti naglašena slične riječi zajedno. Neuralne mreže grafa su zaposleni kako bi naučili zastupanje svakog čvora ovih dva grafika. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš okvir može postići nadmoćni izvod.', 'sw': 'Tatizo la Uchaguzi ni jukumu mpya lililopendekezwa ambalo linalenga kuchagua maneno kwa ajili ya kusisitiza katika hukumu fupi. Utawala wa kiutamaduni tu unafikiria taarifa za mfululizo wa hukumu wakati wakipuuza muundo tajiri wa hukumu na taarifa za uhusiano wa maneno. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo mpya unaoangalia muundo wa hukumu kupitia mfumo wa seti na uhusiano wa maneno kupitia grafu inayofanana na neno. Graphi ya mfumo wa hukumu inatokana na mti wa bunge wa hukumu. Toleo la simu linaruhusu vifaa vya kushirikiana taarifa na jirani zao kwa sababu tunahoji kwamba katika uchaguzi huo, maneno yanayofanana inawezekana zaidi kuhamasishwa pamoja. Mtandao wa uraia unatumika kujifunza uwakilishaji wa kila upande wa picha hizi mbili. Experimental results demonstrate that our framework can achieve superior performance.', 'af': "Bepaal die keuse is 'n nuwe voorgestelde taak wat fokus op die kies van woorde vir bepaal in kort setinge. Tradisjoneel metodes beskou slegs die volgorde inligting van 'n seting terwyl die ryk setstruktuur en woord verhouding inligting ignoreer word. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n nuwe raamwerk wat voorstel soeklys struktuur deur 'n setstruktuur graf en woord verhouding deur 'n woord gelykenis graf. Die sentence struktuur graaf is afgelei van die verwerking boom van 'n sentence. Die woord gelykbaarheid graaf laat nodes toe om inligting te deel met hul naboeste omdat ons argumenteer dat in uitdrukking van keuse gelykbaar woorde is meer waarskynlik om saam te bepaal. Grafiese neuralnetwerke word gebruik om die voorstelling van elke node van hierdie twee grafieke te leer. Eksperimentale resultate bevestig dat ons raamwerk superior prestasie kan bereik.", 'sq': 'Zgjidhja thekson një detyrë të propozuar sapo që përqëndrohet në zgjedhjen e fjalëve për thekson në fjalë të shkurtra. Metodat tradicionale konsiderojnë vetëm informacionin e sekuencës së një fjale duke injoruar strukturën e pasur të fjalëve dhe informacionin e lidhjes me fjalët. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një kuadër të ri që konsideron strukturën e fjalëve nëpërmjet një grafiku të strukturës së fjalëve dhe lidhjes me fjalë nëpërmjet një grafiku të ngjashmërisë së fjalës. Grafi i strukturës së frazës është nxjerrë nga pema e analizimit të një fraze. Fjala grafik i ngjashmërisë lejon nyjet të ndajnë informacionin me fqinjët e tyre pasi argumentojmë se në zgjedhjen e theksuar, fjalët e ngjashme janë më të ngjashme të theksuara së bashku. Graph neural networks are employed to learn the representation of each node of these two graphs.  Rezultatet eksperimentale demonstrojnë se kuadri ynë mund të arrijë performancë më të lartë.', 'am': 'ምርጫ አዲስ ፈቃድ ነው፡፡ የባሕላዊ ሥርዓት ግንኙነት እና የንግግር ግንኙነት መረጃዎችን በተዉት ጊዜ የንግግር ግንኙነት መረጃ ብቻ ይመለከታሉ፡፡ In this paper, we propose a new framework that considers sentence structure via a sentence structure graph and word relationship via a word similarity graph.  የፍርድ ግንኙነት ግንኙነት ከፋርስ ዛፍ ነው፡፡ የቃላት ምሳሌ ቀለም የጎረቤቶቻቸውን መረጃ ማሳየት እንዲፈቅድ ይችላል፤ በተመረጠን ምክንያት እንደምናረጋግጥ፣ በተለያዩ ቃላት በአንድነት ላይ ማስታወስ ይችላል፡፡ የኔውራዊ መረብ የሁለቱን ቀለሞች የአንዱን ነጥብ ለመማር ይሞክራሉ፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ፍሬማችንን የበለጠ ፍሬማችን እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Seçimləri qısa cümlələrdə təsirlənmək üçün sözləri seçmək üçün yeni təsirləndirilən bir işdir. Dərzinli metodlar yalnız cümlənin seçmə məlumatını baxırlar, zəngin cümlələr qurulması və söz əlaqəsi məlumatını dərk edərlər. Bu kağızda, sözlərin quruluşu və sözlərin ilişkisini sözlərin grafı vasitəsilə düşünən yeni bir framework ə təklif edirik. Sözüm quruluşu grafı cümlənin ayırılma a ğacından alındı. Beləliklə, qonşularıyla məlumatları paylaşdırmağa imkan verir, çünki biz seçməyi təsirləndirmək üçün, bənzər sözlər birlikdə təsirlənəcək olaraq daha mümkün olur. Grafik nöral ağları bu iki Grafiklərin hər düyünün göstərilməsini öyrənmək üçün istifadə edilir. Həqiqətən, təcrübə sonuçlarımız çarşığımızın üstün performansını başa düşə biləcəyini göstərir.', 'fa': 'تسبیح می\u200cکند انتخاب یک کار جدید پیشنهاد شده است که روی انتخاب کلمات برای تسبیح در جمله\u200cهای کوتاه تمرکز می\u200cکند. روش\u200cهای سنتی فقط اطلاعات ترتیب یک جمله را در حالی که ساختار جمله ثروتمند و اطلاعات ارتباط کلمه را نادیده گرفته می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما یک چهارچوب جدید پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از طریق یک گراف ساختار جمله و رابطه\u200cی کلمه با یک گراف شبیه\u200cی کلمه به نظر می\u200cرسد. گراف ساختار جمله از درخت جدا کردن یک جمله است. گراف شبیه\u200cانگیز کلمه به گراف اجازه می\u200cدهد که اطلاعات با همسایه\u200cهایشان را با همسایه\u200cهایشان تقسیم کنند، چون می\u200cگوییم که در انتخاب تأثیر می\u200cدهیم، کلمات شبیه\u200cانگیز بیشتر احتمالاً با هم تأ شبکه\u200cهای عصبی گراف برای یاد گرفتن نمایش هر گراف از این دو گراف استخدام می\u200cشوند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهند که چهارچوب ما می\u200cتواند عملکرد بالاتر را برساند.', 'tr': 'Saýlawy täze bir täze teklip eden täze sözleri saýlamak üçin fokus edýär. Däpli yönler baý sözlem strukturyny we sözlem baglaýyşy maglumaty ýok edip durýan sözlem sequence maglumatyny düşünýärler. Bu kagyzda sözleriň strukturyny we sözleriň derejesi bilen sözleriň derejesi bilen düşünýän täze bir çerçevemi teklif edip bilýäris. Sözler struktury grafiki bir sözleniň analyz agaçyndan çykar. Bu kelime benzeri grafiği komşularıyla bilgi paylaşmasına izin verir çünkü biz de önemli seçimlerde, benzer kelimeler birlikte emphasi edilebilir. - Grafikler bu iki grafiğin her düğümünü öğrenmek için çalışanlar. Aramanyň netijeleri biziň çarpyşymyzyň üst edip biljekdigini görkezýär.', 'hy': 'Ցույց տալ ընտրությունը նորից առաջարկված խնդիր է, որը կենտրոնանում է կարճ նախադասություններում ընտրելու բառերի վրա: Հավանդական մեթոդները ընդունում են միայն նախադասության հաջորդականության տեղեկատվությունը, չնայած հարուստ նախադասությունների կառուցվածքը և բառերի հարաբերությունների տեղեկատվությունը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր շրջանակ, որը հաշվի առնում է նախադասությունների կառուցվածքը նախադասությունների կառուցվածքի գրաֆիկի միջոցով և բառերի հարաբերությունների միջոցով նմանության գրա Առասության կառուցվածքի գրաֆիկը ստացվում է նախադասության վերլուծության ծառից: Նմանության գրաֆիկը թույլ է տալիս կետերին տեղեկատվություն կիսել իրենց հարևանների հետ, քանի որ մենք պնդում ենք, որ ընտրության ընթացքում նման բառերը ավելի հավանական են միասին կենտրոնանալու: Գրաֆային նյարդային ցանցերը օգտագործվում են այս երկու գծագրերի յուրաքանչյուր կետի ներկայացումը սովորելու համար: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր շրջանակը կարող է հասնել գերազանցության:', 'bs': 'Stavlja naglasak na izbor izbora novog predloženog zadatka koji se fokusira na izbor riječi za naglasak u kratkim rečenicama. Tradicionalne metode razmatraju samo sekvenčne informacije rečenice dok ignoriraju bogate strukture rečenice i informacije o vezi riječi. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi okvir koji smatra strukturu rečenica kroz graf strukture rečenica i odnos riječi kroz graf sličnosti riječi. Graf strukture rečenice se nalazi iz drveta analize rečenice. Graf sličnosti riječi omogućava čvorovima da podijele informacije sa svojim susjedima jer tvrdimo da će u naglasku selekcije, slične riječi biti vjerojatnije naglasiti zajedno. Grafičke neuralne mreže su zaposlene kako bi naučili zastupanje svakog čvora ovih dva grafika. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš okvir može postići nadmoćni izvod.', 'cs': 'Výběr důrazu je nově navržený úkol, který se zaměřuje na výběr slov pro zdůraznění v krátkých větách. Tradiční metody berou v úvahu pouze informace o sekvenci věty a ignorují bohatou strukturu vět a informace o vztahu slov. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový rámec, který bere strukturu vět pomocí grafu struktury vět a slovní vztah pomocí grafu podobnosti slov. Graf struktury věty je odvozen ze stromu parse věty. Graf podobnosti slov umožňuje uzlům sdílet informace se svými sousedy, protože argumentujeme, že při výběru důrazu jsou podobná slova pravděpodobně zdůrazněna společně. Grafové neuronové sítě se používají k naučení reprezentace každého uzlu těchto dvou grafů. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš rámec může dosáhnout vynikajícího výkonu.', 'bn': 'নির্বাচন একটি নতুন প্রস্তাবিত কাজ যেটি সংক্ষিপ্ত বাক্যের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করে। ঐতিহ্যবাহী পদ্ধতি শুধুমাত্র সমৃদ্ধ বাক্যের কাঠামো এবং শব্দ সম্পর্কের তথ্য উপেক্ষা করার সময় একটি বাক্যের প্রাকৃতি এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নতুন ফ্রেমের প্রস্তাব করি যা একটি শব্দের একই ধরনের গ্রাফের মাধ্যমে বাক্যের কাঠামো কাঠামো এবং শব্দ সম্পর্কে এই বাক্যের কাঠামো গ্রাফ একটি বাক্যের পার্স গাছ থেকে উৎপাদন করা হয়েছে। The word similarity graph allows nodes to share information with their neighbors since we argue that in emphasis selection, similar words are more likely to be emphasized together.  এই দুই গ্রাফের প্রত্যেক নোডের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের ফ্রেম কার্যক্রম বেশী ভালো কার্যক্রম অর্জন করতে পারে।', 'ca': "Subrayar la selecció és una tasca novament proposada que es centra en triar paraules per a subrayar en frases curtes. Traditional methods only consider the sequence information of a sentence while ignoring the rich sentence structure and word relationship information.  En aquest paper, proposem un nou marc que considera l'estructura de frases a través d'un gràfic de l'estructura de frases i la relació de paraules a través d'un gràfic de similitud de paraules. El gràfic de l'estructura de frases es deriva de l'arbre d'analització d'una frase. The word similarity graph allows nodes to share information with their neighbors since we argue that in emphasis selection, similar words are more likely to be emphasized together.  Les xarxes neurals gràfics es fan servir per aprendre la representació de cada nod d'aquests dos gràfics. Els resultats experimentals demostren que el nostre marc pot aconseguir un rendiment superior.", 'et': 'Rõhuasetus Valik on äsja pakutud ülesanne, mis keskendub sõnade valimisele rõhuasetuseks lühikestes lausetes. Traditsioonilised meetodid võtavad arvesse ainult lause jadateavet, ignoreerides rikkalikku lausestruktuuri ja sõnasuhte teavet. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uue raamistiku, mis käsitleb lausestruktuuri lausestruktuuri graafiku kaudu ja sõnasuhet sõna sarnasuse graafiku kaudu. Lause struktuuri graafik tuletatakse lause parsimispuust. Sõna sarnasuse graafik võimaldab sõlmedel jagada teavet oma naabritega, kuna me väidame, et rõhuasetuse valimisel rõhutatakse sarnaseid sõnu tõenäolisemalt koos rõhutatakse. Graafilised närvivõrgud on kasutatud, et õppida iga sõlm nende kahe graafiku. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie raamistik suudab saavutada suurepärase jõudluse.', 'fi': 'Painopiste Valinta on hiljattain ehdotettu tehtävä, jossa keskitytään valitsemaan sanoja korostettaviksi lyhyiksi lauseiksi. Perinteiset menetelmät huomioivat vain lauseen sekvenssitiedot jättäen huomiotta rikkaan lauserakenteen ja sanasuhteen tiedot. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta viitekehystä, joka tarkastelee lauserakennetta lauserakenteen kaavion kautta ja sanasuhdetta sanan samankaltaisuuskaavion kautta. Lausekkeen rakennekaavio on johdettu lauseen jäsennyspuusta. Sanan samankaltaisuuskaavion avulla solmut voivat jakaa tietoja naapureidensa kanssa, koska väitämme, että korostusvalinnassa samankaltaisia sanoja korostetaan todennäköisemmin yhdessä. Graafisten hermoverkkojen avulla opitaan näiden kahden graafisen solmun esitystä. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että kehyksemme voi saavuttaa ylivoimaisen suorituskyvyn.', 'he': 'להדגיש את הבחירה היא משימה מציעה חדשה שמתמקדת בבחירת מילים להדגיש במשפטים קצרים. שיטות מסורתיות שוקלות רק את מידע הרצף של משפט בזמן שהתעלמו ממבנת המשפט העשירה ומידע מערכת יחסים מילים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מסגרת חדשה שמשקלת מבנה משפטים באמצעות גרף מבנה משפטים ומערכת יחסים מילים באמצעות גרף דומה מילה. גרף מבנה המשפטים מווצא מעץ המחקר של משפט. הגרף של המילה דומה מאפשר לחלוק נודות מידע עם השכנים שלהם מאחר שאנחנו טוענים שבמבחירת הדגישה, מילים דומות יותר סביר להדגיש ביחד. רשתות עצביות גראפ משתמשות כדי ללמוד את מייצג כל קשר של שני הגרפים האלה. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שהמסגרת שלנו יכולה להשיג ביצועים מעולים יותר.', 'jv': 'echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Traditional Methods Only take the order information of a word Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing bagian nggawe ngubah perusahaan winih karo perusahaan langgar wigatining kuwi nggambar kuwi: Attribute Perintah sing dibutuhke graphing Pametuné sing paling nggambar kelas kuwi nggawe barang kelas pengguna sing luwih hayo.', 'bo': 'འདེམས་པ་དེ་ཚིག་ཐག་ཆེ་བའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་གཏད་པར་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་གསར་པ་ཞིག་རེད། སྔོན་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚིག་ཚིག་གི་དབྱེ་རིམ་དང་བརྡ་འབྲེལ་ཆ་ཚུལ་སྣང་མེད་པའི་སྐབས་ལྟར་བསམ་བླ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་ཚིག་གི་དབྱིབས་བཀོད་རིས་དང་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་ཚོར་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་གྲངས་ ཚིག་སྒྲུང་གི་དབྱིབས་འབྲི་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྩིས་ཐོའི་ནང་ལས་འབྲེལ་བ་རེད། The word similarity graph allows nodes to share information with their neighbors since we argue that in emphasis selection, similar words are more likely to be emphasized together. རྣམ་འགྱུར་བའི་དྲ་བ་དེ་ཚོས་ཡིག་རེའི་སྐོར་གཉིས་ཡིག་གི་མཐོ་ཁག་རེ་རེ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བ་རེད། ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་གཞི་ཁུང་གིས་མཐོ་ཤོས་ཚད་ལྡན་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན་པས།', 'ha': "Emphasis Selection is a newly proposed task which focuses on choosing words for emphasis in short sentences.  Tsarin da aka kiyaye kawai, suna bincike information masu ƙaranci na maganar a lokacin da za'a ƙyale masu tajiri na tsarin maganar da kuma tsarin da mazaɓa na maganar. Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani firam na dabam, wanda ke ƙayyade tsarin maganar a yi amfani da zane-zane-zane-zane da zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane. Ana motsa graphin tsarin maganar zuwa itãcen parse daga cewa. Rufen grafi da daidai na yarda da node su share information tãre da majiransu, kamar yadda muna yi musu jãyayya cẽwa, cikin shirin rabo, za'a iya ƙayyade maganar kwamfyuta masu daidaita. Ana yi amfani da zanen grafi na neural dõmin su iya fahimtar wa duk node na biyu. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna cewa firam kanmu yana iya sãmun mafiya kyauta.", 'sk': 'Izbor poudarka je na novo predlagana naloga, ki se osredotoča na izbiro besed za poudarek v kratkih stavkih. Tradicionalne metode upoštevajo le informacije o zaporedju stavka, pri čemer ignorirajo bogato strukturo stavka in informacije o besednem odnosu. V prispevku predlagamo nov okvir, ki upošteva strukturo stavkov prek grafa strukture stavkov in besedno razmerje prek grafa podobnosti besed. Graf strukture stavka je izpeljan iz drevesa razčlenitve stavka. Graf podobnosti besed omogoča vozlišču, da delijo informacije s svojimi sosedi, saj trdimo, da so podobne besede pri izbiri poudarka bolj verjetne skupaj poudarjene. Grafična nevronska omrežja se uporabljajo za učenje reprezentacije vsakega vozlišča teh dveh grafov. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da lahko naš okvir doseže vrhunsko zmogljivost.'}
{'en': 'Utterance Position-Aware Dialogue Act Recognition', 'ar': 'التعرّف على قانون الكلام في موقف الإدراك اللفظي', 'es': 'Reconocimiento de la Ley de Diálogo Consciente de la Posición', 'fr': "Reconnaissance de la Loi de dialogue sensible à la position de l'énoncé", 'pt': 'Reconhecimento da Lei de Diálogo Consciente da Posição do Enunciado', 'ja': '発話ポジション意識対話法の認識', 'hi': 'उच्चारण स्थिति-जागरूक संवाद अधिनियम मान्यता', 'zh': '语位感知言行识', 'ru': 'Признание закона о диалоге, основанном на понимании позиции', 'ga': 'Aitheantas Acht Utterance Seasamh-Aware Dialogue', 'ka': 'მომხმარებელი დიალოგის აქტის განახლება', 'hu': 'Utterance Position-Aware Dialogue Act Elismerés', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση νόμου για τον διάλογο με επίγνωση της θέσης', 'it': "Riconoscimento dell'Atto di dialogo consapevole della posizione", 'kk': 'Шығыс бойынша қарау диалогын қалау', 'lt': 'Įgyvendinimo vietos dialogo akto pripažinimas', 'mk': 'Utterance Position-Aware Dialogue Act Recognition', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Akt Dialog Sedia-Posisi Utterance', 'ml': 'സ്ഥാനം- അറിയുന്ന ഡയലോഗ് പ്രമാണം തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн байр суурь-ухамсар диалогын хууль танилцуулах', 'mt': 'Utterance Position-Aware Dialogue Act Recognition', 'no': 'Kjentering av dialogvindauget for posisjonsvekking', 'pl': 'Ustawa o rozpoznawaniu dialogu z uwzględnieniem stanowiska', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea actului privind dialogul conștient de poziție', 'sr': 'Priznavanje zakona o razumevanju položaja za upotrebu', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ස්ථානය- පැහැදිලි සංවාද ක්\u200dරියාව පැහැදිළීම', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada sharciga diyaarinta', 'sv': 'Utterance Position Aware Dialogue Act Erkännande', 'ta': 'வெளிப்படையான நிலையில் அறிந்து கொள்ளும் உரையாடல் வார்த்தை அடையாளம்', 'ur': 'استعمال موقعیت-Aware Dialog Act Recognition', 'vi': 'Trình nhận biết sẵn ngôn ngữ', 'uz': 'Manzil', 'da': 'Udterance Position Aware Dialogue Act Anerkendelse', 'hr': 'Priznavanje zakona o razumijevanju dijaloga o poziciji upotrebe', 'nl': 'Erkenning van de wet op basis van de positie van de dialoog', 'id': 'Pengenalan Akte Dialog Pengetahuan Posisi Utterance', 'de': 'Anerkennung des Gesetzes über die Position des Dialogs', 'bg': 'Признаване на акта за диалог с ясна позиция', 'sw': 'Utterance Position-Aware Dialogue Act Recognition', 'tr': 'Ýery Aç', 'ko': '언어 위치 감지 대화 행위 식별', 'af': 'Gebruiker Posisie- Aware dialoog Wet herkening', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'hy': 'Օգտագործման դիրքով գիտակցած խոսակցային գործընթացի ճանաչելը', 'fa': 'شناسایی قانون محل آگاهی محل استفاده', 'az': '캻stifad톛칞ilik m톛qam캼-Aware Dialoog Hutunu Tan캼ma', 'bs': 'Priznavanje zakona o razumijevanju položaja za upotrebu', 'ca': "Recognició de la Llei de Diàleg sobre la Posició d'Utterance", 'sq': 'Njohja e ligjit të dialogut për pozicionin e përdorueshëm', 'cs': 'Uznávání zákona o dialogu s orientací na pozice', 'et': 'Positsiooniteadliku dialoogi akti tunnustamine', 'bn': 'অবস্থান- পরিচিত ডায়ালগ আইন পরিচিতি', 'fi': 'Lausunto Position Aware Dialogue Act Recognition', 'jv': 'cage-mode', 'ha': 'Ana gane na Fason Aiki na Filin Hagon Wurin da Ya sani', 'sk': 'Priznavanje akta o dialogu, ki se zaveda stališča', 'bo': 'སྤྱོད་རུང་བྱེད་པའི་གནས་ཡུལ་དང་ཤེས་པའི་ཌའི་ལོག་གནས་སྟངས་རྟོགས་བྱེད་སྟངས', 'he': 'זיהוי חוק דיאלוג מודע למצב השימוש'}
{'en': 'This study proposes an utterance position-aware approach for a neural network-based dialogue act recognition (DAR) model, which incorporates positional encoding for utterance’s absolute or relative position. The proposed approach is inspired by the observation that some dialogue acts have tendencies of occurrence positions. The evaluations on the Switchboard corpus show that the proposed positional encoding of utterances statistically significantly improves the performance of DAR.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الدراسة نهجًا مدركًا لموقف الكلام لنموذج التعرف على عمل الحوار القائم على الشبكة العصبية (DAR) ، والذي يتضمن الترميز الموضعي لموقف الكلام المطلق أو النسبي. النهج المقترح مستوحى من ملاحظة أن بعض أعمال الحوار لها ميول لمواقف الحدوث. تظهر التقييمات على مجموعة Switchboard أن الترميز الموضعي المقترح للألفاظ يحسن بشكل كبير من أداء DAR.', 'pt': 'Este estudo propõe uma abordagem consciente da posição do enunciado para um modelo de reconhecimento de ato de diálogo baseado em rede neural (DAR), que incorpora codificação posicional para a posição absoluta ou relativa do enunciado. A abordagem proposta é inspirada na observação de que alguns atos de diálogo possuem tendências de posições de ocorrência. As avaliações no corpus Switchboard mostram que a codificação posicional de enunciados proposta melhora estatisticamente significativamente o desempenho do DAR.', 'fr': "Cette étude propose une approche tenant compte de la position de l'énoncé pour un modèle de reconnaissance d'acte de dialogue (DAR) basé sur un réseau neuronal, qui intègre un codage positionnel pour la position absolue ou relative de l'énoncé. L'approche proposée s'inspire de l'observation selon laquelle certains actes de dialogue ont tendance à avoir des positions d'occurrence. Les évaluations sur le corpus Switchboard montrent que le codage positionnel proposé des énoncés améliore statistiquement de manière significative les performances du DAR.", 'es': 'Este estudio propone un enfoque consciente de la posición del enunciado para un modelo de reconocimiento de actos de diálogo (DAR) basado en redes neuronales, que incorpora codificación posicional para la posición absoluta o relativa del enunciado. El enfoque propuesto se inspira en la observación de que algunos actos de diálogo tienen tendencias de posiciones de ocurrencia. Las evaluaciones en el corpus de Switchboard muestran que la codificación posicional propuesta de los enunciados mejora de manera estadísticamente significativa el rendimiento de DAR.', 'zh': '本研为神经网络言行(DAR)为言位感知,合言绝对之位编码。 其灵感自观于言行有位势。 Switchboard 语料库之评明,所言语位编码著于计 DAR 之性。', 'ja': '本研究は、発話の絶対位置または相対位置の位置符号化を組み込んだ、ニューラルネットワークベースの対話行為認識（ ＤＡＲ ）モデルの発話位置認識アプローチを提案する。提案されたアプローチは、いくつかの対話行為には発生傾向があるという観察に触発されている。Switchboardコーパスの評価は、発話の提案された位置符号化が統計的にDARのパフォーマンスを有意に向上させることを示しています。', 'hi': 'यह अध्ययन एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क-आधारित संवाद अधिनियम मान्यता (डीएआर) मॉडल के लिए एक उच्चारण स्थिति-जागरूक दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करता है, जिसमें उच्चारण की पूर्ण या सापेक्ष स्थिति के लिए स्थितीय एन्कोडिंग शामिल है। प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण इस अवलोकन से प्रेरित है कि कुछ संवाद कृत्यों में घटना की स्थिति की प्रवृत्ति होती है। स्विचबोर्ड कॉर्पस पर मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि कथनों का प्रस्तावित स्थितीय एन्कोडिंग सांख्यिकीय रूप से DAR के प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार करता है।', 'ru': 'В этом исследовании предлагается подход, основанный на распознавании положения высказывания, для модели распознавания действий на основе нейронной сети (DAR), которая включает позиционное кодирование для абсолютного или относительного положения высказывания. Предлагаемый подход основывается на замечании о том, что некоторые диалоговые акты имеют тенденции к возникновению позиций. Оценки на корпусе коммутатора показывают, что предлагаемое позиционное кодирование высказываний статистически значительно улучшает производительность DAR.', 'ga': 'Molann an staidéar seo cur chuige cainte atá feasach ar shuíomh le haghaidh samhail aitheantais gnímh idirphlé néarbhunaithe (DAR) líonra-bhunaithe, a ionchorpraíonn ionchódú suímh do shuíomh iomlán nó coibhneasta na cainte. Tá an cur chuige atá beartaithe spreagtha ag an tuairim go bhfuil claonadh ag roinnt gníomhartha comhphlé maidir le suíomhanna tarluithe. Léiríonn na meastóireachtaí ar chorpas an lasc-chláir go gcuireann an t-ionchódú suímh atá beartaithe ar chainteanna go mór le feidhmíocht DAR go staitistiúil.', 'ka': 'ამ სწავლის შესახებ ნეიროლური ქსელის დაბათი დიალოგის მოდულის განაცნობა (DAR) მოდელისთვის, რომელიც პოზიციალური კოდირების აბსოლუტური ან რედაციალური პოზიციის კოდირების პროგრამის მიზეზი იქნება დაახლოებით, რომ რამდენიმე დიალოგის აკეთებები არსებობს მოხდება პოზიციების ტენენციები. ქგვიფორდის კოპუსის განსაზღვრებულებები აჩვენებენ, რომ პოზიციალური კოდირება სტატისტიკურად მნიშვნელოვანია DAR-ის გამოსახულებას.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα μελέτη προτείνει μια προσέγγιση συνειδητής θέσης εκφρασμού για ένα μοντέλο αναγνώρισης πράξεων διαλόγου βασισμένο στο νευρωνικό δίκτυο, το οποίο περιλαμβάνει κωδικοποίηση θέσης για την απόλυτη ή σχετική θέση της εκφρασής. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση εμπνέεται από την παρατήρηση ότι ορισμένες πράξεις διαλόγου έχουν τάσεις εμφάνισης θέσεων. Οι αξιολογήσεις στο σώμα του πίνακα ελέγχου δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη κωδικοποίηση θέσης των εκφράσεων βελτιώνει στατιστικά σημαντικά την απόδοση της DAR.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány egy neurális hálózat alapú párbeszéd-felismerő (DAR) modellhez javasolja a kijelentés abszolút vagy relatív pozíciós kódolását. A javasolt megközelítést az a megfigyelés ihlette, hogy egyes párbeszédcselekményeknek előfordulási tendenciái vannak. A Switchboard korpuszon végzett értékelések azt mutatják, hogy a kifejezések javasolt pozíciós kódolása statisztikailag szignifikánsan javítja a DAR teljesítményét.', 'kk': 'Бұл зерттеу невралдық желінде негізделген диалогты анықтау (DAR) үлгісінің сөздердің абсолюттік немесе қатынасыз орналасқан кодтамасы үшін сөздердің орналасатын орындық кодтамасын көрсетеді. Кейбір диалог әрекеттерінің орындарының тенденциялары бар дегенді көрсету үшін қолданылатын тәртіпті. Швейцариялық корпус бағалауындағы мәліметтердің орналасқан кодтамасы статистикалық түрде DAR жұмысын жақсы жасайды.', 'it': "Questo studio propone un approccio positionsaware per un modello DAR (Neural Network-based Dialog Act Recognition), che incorpora la codifica positionale per la posizione assoluta o relativa dell'espressione. L'approccio proposto è ispirato dall'osservazione che alcuni atti di dialogo hanno tendenze di posizione di avvenimento. Le valutazioni sul corpus dello Switchboard mostrano che la codifica posizionale proposta delle parole migliora statisticamente significativamente le prestazioni del DAR.", 'mk': "This study proposes an utterance position-aware approach for a neural network-based dialogue act recognition (DAR) model, which incorporates positional encoding for utterance's absolute or relative position.  Предложениот пристап е инспириран од набљудувањето дека некои дејства на дијалог имаат тенденции на позиции на настани. Овалекциите на корпусот на Свитбордот покажуваат дека предложеното позиционално кодирање на изразите статистички значително ја подобрува перформансата на ДАР.", 'lt': 'Šiame tyrime siūlomas požiūris į išraiškos padėtį suprantamas naudojant neuralinio tinklo dialogo akto pripažinimo (DAR) model į, kuriame pateikiamas išraiškos absoliučios arba santykinės padėties pozicijos kodavimas. The proposed approach is inspired by the observation that some dialogue acts have tendencies of occurrence positions.  The evaluations on the Switchboard corpus show that the proposed positional encoding of utterances statistically significantly improves the performance of DAR.', 'ms': "This study proposes an utterance position-aware approach for a neural network-based dialogue act recognition (DAR) model, which incorporates positional encoding for utterance's absolute or relative position.  Pendekatan yang diusulkan diinspirasi oleh pengamatan bahawa beberapa tindakan dialog mempunyai kecenderungan kedudukan kejadian. Evaluasi pada korpus Switchboard menunjukkan bahawa pengekodan kedudukan yang diusulkan bagi ungkapan meningkatkan prestasi DAR secara statistik secara signifikan.", 'mt': "This study proposes an utterance position-aware approach for a neural network-based dialogue act recognition (DAR) model, which incorporates positional encoding for utterance's absolute or relative position.  L-approċċ propost huwa ispirat mill-osservazzjoni li xi atti ta’ djalogu għandhom tendenzi ta’ pożizzjonijiet ta’ okkorrenza. L-evalwazzjonijiet fuq il-korpus tal-Switchboard juru li l-kodifikazzjoni pożizzjonali proposta ta’ dikjarazzjonijiet ittejjeb b’mod statistikament sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni tad-DAR.", 'ml': "This study proposes an utterance position-aware approach for a neural network-based dialogue act recognition (DAR) model, which incorporates positional encoding for utterance's absolute or relative position.  നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട നിലപാടുകള്\u200d സംഭവിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥിതികളുടെ സ്വഭാവങ്ങളാണെന്ന് നോക് സ്വിച്ച്ബോര്\u200dഡ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്റെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാപികമായ കോഡ", 'mn': 'Энэ судалгаа нь мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан диалог хүлээн зөвшөөрөх (DAR) загварын тухай ярианы байр сууриллагааг мэдрэх байр сууриллагааг сануулдаг. Энэ нь илтгэлийн абсолют эсвэл харьцангуй байр сууриллагааны Зарим диалог үйлдвэрлэлүүд үйлдвэрлэх нөхцөл байдалтай байдаг гэдгийг анзаарсан. Швейчбуудын корпус дахь дүгнэлт нь хэлэлцээний байр суурь кодлог статистик дээр ДАР-ын үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Acest studiu propune o abordare conștientă de poziția rostirii pentru un model de recunoaștere a actelor de dialog bazat pe rețele neurale (DAR), care încorporează codificarea pozițională pentru poziția absolută sau relativă a rostirii. Abordarea propusă este inspirată de observația că unele acte de dialog au tendințe de poziții de eveniment. Evaluările privind corpusul tabloului de bord arată că codificarea pozițională propusă a pronunțărilor îmbunătățește semnificativ statistic performanța DAR.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym opracowaniu proponuje się podejście świadome pozycji wypowiedzi dla modelu rozpoznawania dialogu opartego na sieci neuronowej (DAR), który obejmuje kodowanie pozycjonalne dla pozycji absolutnej lub względnej wypowiedzi. Proponowane podejście jest inspirowane zauważeniem, że niektóre akty dialogowe mają tendencje do występowania pozycji występowania. Oceny korpusu Switchboard pokazują, że proponowane kodowanie pozycjonalne wypowiedzi statystycznie poprawia wydajność DAR.', 'sr': 'Ova istraživanja predlaže pristup svesnom poziciji reči za model priznanja dijaloga na neuralnoj mreži (DAR), koji uključuje pozicionalnu kodiranje za apsolutnu ili relativnu poziciju reči. Predloženi pristup je inspirisan posmatranjem da neki dijalogski akti imaju tendencije pozicija događaja. Procjenjivanja korpusa Švicarskog odbora pokazuju da je predloženo pozicionalno kodiranje reči statistički značajno poboljšalo učinkovitost DAR-a.', 'so': 'Waxbarashadan wuxuu soo jeedaa qaab aad u taqaan hadal, kaas oo ku qoran qaabka aqoonsashada bulshada ee shabakadda neurada ah (DAR), kaas oo ku qoran qoraalka suurtagalka ah oo ku qoran booska aqoonsashada hadalka oo dhamaan ama xiriirka ah. Dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeedo waxaa laga yaabaa in qaar falimaha dialogue ay leeyihiin meelo dhacda. Qiimeynta baaritaanka baaritaanka looga jeedo in qofka la soo jeeday qoraalka hadalka lagu qorayo uu si qiimo ah u kordhinayo sameynta DAR.', 'sv': 'Denna studie föreslår ett utterance positionsmedvetet tillvägagångssätt för en neural nätverksbaserad dialog act recognition (DAR) modell, som innefattar positionskodning för utterances absoluta eller relativa position. Det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet är inspirerat av observationen att vissa dialogakter har tendenser till händelsepositioner. Utvärderingarna av Switchboard-korpusen visar att den föreslagna positionskodningen av yttranden statistiskt signifikant förbättrar prestandan för DAR.', 'si': 'මේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය සඳහා සංවාදය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ සංවාදය සමහර සංවාදයේ ස්ථානයක් තිය ස්විච්බෝර්ඩ් කොර්පුස් වලින් විශේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ කියලා කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු ස්ථානය සංකේතයේ කිරී', 'ta': 'இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் அடிப்படையிலுள்ள உரையாடல் செயல் அடிப்படையாக (DAR) மாதிரிக்கு ஒரு வார்த்தை நிலையான குறியீட்டை சேர் The proposed approach is inspired by the observation that some dialogue acts have tendencies of occurrence positions.  மாற்றுபோர்டு குறியீட்டின் மதிப்புகள் புள்ளிவெளிப்பாட்டில் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளின் நிலைகுறியீடு', 'ur': 'یہ مطالعہ ایک نئورل نیٹورک کی بنیادی دیالوگ کے لئے ایک بات موقعیت-آگاہ طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، جو بات کی مطلق یا نسبتی موقعیت کے لئے موقعیت کا اکنوڈینگ شامل ہوتا ہے. پیشنهاد کی تقریبا اس نظر سے الهام کی جاتی ہے کہ بعض ڈیلوگو کے عملوں میں اتفاق کی موقعیت ہیں. سوئیچبورڈ کورپوس کے ارزیابی دکھاتے ہیں کہ کلمات کی موقعیت اکنوڈینگ کا مقرر کیا گیا ہے کہ DAR کے عملکرد کو اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'no': 'Denne studien foreslår eit uttrykk-posisjonsbehandling for eit dialogvindauge som er basert på ein nuralnettverk, som inkluderer posisjonskoding for absolutt eller relative posisjon til uttrykk. Den foreslåde tilnærminga er inspirert av observasjonen at nokre dialoghandlingar har tendenser for oppgåve. Evalueringane på korpusen i Switchboard viser at den foreslåde posisjonskodinga av uttalene er statistisk betydelig forbedra DAR-funksjonen.', 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu này đề xuất một phương pháp nhận biết vị trí phát biểu cho một mô hình nhận diện hành lang dựa trên mạng thần kinh, chứa đựng mã hóa vị trí tuyệt đối hay tương đối của đối đối đối. Cách tiếp cận được đề xuất dựa trên nhận thức rằng một số hành động đối thoại có xu hướng tình huống. Các đánh giá trên tập đoàn Switchard cho thấy rằng mức độ chào khoang vị trí dự kiến của lời nói tăng vọt theo tính toán của DARPA.', 'uz': "Bu ta'qituvni nazar tarmoq asosida muloqat loyihasi (DAR) modelini aniqlash uchun gapiruvchi holatini tahrirlash imkoniyatini anglatadi. Bu gapiruvning butunlay yoki bog'liq joyida joylashtirish mumkin. Name The evaluations on the Switchboard corpus show that the proposed positional encoding of utterances statistically significantly improves the performance of DAR.", 'bg': 'Това проучване предлага подход, осъзнаващ позицията на изказването, за модел на разпознаване на диалогови актове, базиран на невронна мрежа, който включва позиционно кодиране за абсолютната или относителната позиция на изказването. Предложеният подход е вдъхновен от наблюдението, че някои диалогови актове имат тенденции за възникване на позиции. Оценките на корпуса на таблото показват, че предложеното позиционно кодиране на изказванията статистически значимо подобрява ефективността на ДАР.', 'nl': 'Deze studie stelt een uitspraakpositie-bewuste benadering voor voor een neuraal netwerk-based dialogact recognition (DAR) model, dat positiecodering voor de absolute of relatieve positie van uitspraak omvat. De voorgestelde aanpak is geïnspireerd op de constatering dat sommige dialoghandelingen tendensen vertonen tot stand te komen. Uit de evaluaties op het Switchboardcorpus blijkt dat de voorgestelde positionele codering van uitingen statistisch significant de prestaties van DAR verbetert.', 'hr': 'U ovom ispitivanju predlaže pristup poznavanju izraza za model priznanja dijaloga koji temelji na neuralnoj mreži (DAR), koji uključuje pozicionalni kodiranje za apsolutnu ili relativnu poziciju izraza. Predloženi pristup je inspirisan posmatranjem da neki dijalogski aktovi imaju tendencije postojanja događaja. Procjenjivanja korpusa Švicarskog odbora pokazuju da je predloženo pozicionalno kodiranje izraza statistički značajno poboljšalo učinkovitost DAR-a.', 'da': "Dette studie foreslår en ytringspositionsbevidst tilgang til en neural netværksbaseret dialog act recognition (DAR) model, som inkorporerer positionskodning for ytrings absolutte eller relative position. Den foreslåede fremgangsmåde er inspireret af observationen af, at nogle dialoghandlinger har tendenser til forekomstpositioner. Evalueringerne af Switchboard korpus viser, at den foreslåede positionskodning af udtalelser statistisk signifikant forbedrer DAR's ydeevne.", 'de': 'Diese Studie schlägt einen positionsbewussten Ansatz für ein neuronales Netzwerk-basiertes Dialogact Recognition (DAR) Modell vor, das eine Positionskodierung für die absolute oder relative Position der Äußerung beinhaltet. Der vorgeschlagene Ansatz basiert auf der Beobachtung, dass einige Dialogakte Tendenzen von Auftretenpositionen aufweisen. Die Auswertungen am Switchboard-Korpus zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Positionskodierung von Äußerungen statistisch signifikant die Leistung von DAR verbessert.', 'id': 'Studi ini mengusulkan pendekatan posisi-sadar untuk model dialog berdasarkan jaringan saraf pengakuan tindakan (DAR), yang mengandung pengekodan posisi untuk posisi mutlak atau relatif utterance. pendekatan yang diusulkan diinspirasi oleh pengamatan bahwa beberapa tindakan dialog memiliki tendensi posisi kejadian. Evaluasi pada korpus Switchboard menunjukkan bahwa pengekodan posisi yang diusulkan dari ucapan secara statistik signifikan meningkatkan prestasi DAR.', 'ko': '본 연구는 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 대화 행위 식별(DAR) 모델의 말 위치 감지 방법을 제시했는데 이 모델은 말의 절대적 또는 상대적인 위치의 위치 인코딩을 결합시켰다.이런 방법의 영감은 일부 대화 행위가 발생하는 위치가 있는 경향에서 나온다.본사 어료 라이브러리에 대한 평가에 따르면 제시된 언어 위치 인코딩은 통계학적으로 DAR의 성능을 현저히 향상시켰다.', 'fa': 'این مطالعه پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که یک روش آگاهی به موقعیت\u200cهای آگاهی برای یک مدل شناسایی (DAR) از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی، که شامل یک رمزبندی موقعیت برای موقعیت مطلق یا نسبت سخنرانی است. این دستور پیشنهاد توسط مشاهده\u200cای که بعضی عملیات محاوره\u200cای از موقعیت اتفاق می\u200cافتد الهام می\u200cگیرد. ارزیابی در کورپوس بورد سویچ نشان می دهد که کوندوژن موقعیت سخنرانی آمار به طور معنی عملکرد DAR را بهتر می کند.', 'af': "Hierdie studie voorstel 'n uitspraak posisie bewys toegang vir 'n neuralnetwerk-gebaseerde dialoog aksie herkening (DAR) model, wat insluit posisieele kodering vir uitspraak se absolute of relatiewe posisie. Die voorgestelde toegang is inspireer deur die observasie dat sommige dialoog aksies tendensies van voorkoms posisies het. Die evaluasies op die Switchboard corpus vertoon dat die voorgestelde posisionele kodering van uitspraak statistiese betekeurig die prestasie van DAR verbeter.", 'sw': 'Utafiti huu unapendekeza mbinu za kujieleza kwa ajili ya kutambua kitendo cha mazungumzo kilichoko kwenye mtandao wa kijamii cha kidini (DAR), ambacho kinajumuisha kodi chanya kwa ajili ya nafasi kamili ya hotuba au yenye relative. Hatua ya pendekezo inahamasishwa na mtazamo kwamba baadhi ya mazungumzo yanakuwa na tabia za matukio. Tathmini zinazohusu makampuni ya Switchboard zinaonyesha kwamba ujumbe uliopendekezwa nafuu wa lugha kwa takwimu unaongezea utendaji wa DAR.', 'sq': 'Ky studim propozon një qasje të ndërgjegjshme për pozicionin e shprehjes për një model të njohjes s ë veprimeve të dialogut me bazë në rrjetin nervor (DAR), i cili përfshin kodimin pozitiv për pozicionin absolut apo relativ të shprehjes. Përqasja e propozuar frymëzohet nga vëzhgimi se disa veprime të dialogut kanë tendenca të pozicioneve të ndodhjes. Vlerësimet në korpus Switchboard tregojnë se kodimi pozitiv i propozuar i shprehjeve përmirëson statistikisht ndjeshëm performancën e DAR.', 'tr': "Bu araşdyrma näyral şebeke tabanly dialog tanamak (DAR) nusgasynda s özleşme üçin ýerleşikli ködleme teklip edýär. Görmek üçin teklip eden ýagdaýyň käbir dýalogyň ýerleri bolan ýagdaýy görnüşi tarapyndan ilham alýar. Şweýsariýa korpusynyň deňlenmeleri sözlerin ýerleşýän ködlemeleriniň statistiki DAR'yň netijesini gowuraýandygyny görkezýär.", 'am': 'ይህም ትምህርት የደዌብ መረብ-አካባቢ የጥያቄ አካባቢ መግለጫ (DAR) ሞዴል የሚያሳውቀው የንግግር አካባቢ ወይም የአካባቢ ቦታ የሚቆጠር የሆኑን የድምፅ አካባቢ የሚያስፈልጋል፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ጥያቄ አንዳንዶች የጥያቄ ሥርዓት የሁኔታ ቦታዎች እንዲኖሩ በማሳየቱ ነው፡፡ በስዊትቦር ካርፓስ ላይ የተመሳሳይ የንግግር ቃላት በstatistically የሚያሳውቅ የዳርስ አካባቢ ግንኙነት እንዲያሳድግ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': "This study proposes an utterance position-aware approach for a neural network-based dialogue act recognition (DAR) model, which incorporates positional encoding for utterance's absolute or relative position.  Պատրաստված մոտեցումը ոգեշնչվում է հետազոտությամբ, որ որոշ երկխոսային գործողությունները հակված են իրադարձությունների դիրքերին: The evaluations on the Switchboard corpus show that the proposed positional encoding of utterances statistically significantly improves the performance of DAR.", 'az': 'Bu araşdırma nöral a ğ tabanlı dijalog tanıması (DAR) modeli üçün s özlərin absolutu və ya qohum pozisyon kodlaması barəsindəki sözlərin vəzifəsi təklif edir. Önülləşdirilmiş tərzim, bəzi dijalog əməllərinin baş verəcək məqamlarının məqamlarına nəsihət verilmişdir. İsviçbord korpusunun değerlendirmələri göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş sözlərin pozisyonal kodlaması statistik olaraq DAR performansını daha yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bn': 'এই গবেষণাটি নিউরুল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক ডায়ালগ চিহ্নিত (ডিএআর) মডেলের জন্য একটি বক্তৃতার পদক্ষেপ-সচেতনতা প্রস্তাব করেছে, যা কথার সম্পূর্ণ অথবা আ প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি দ্বারা অনুপ্রাণিত হয়েছে যে কিছু ডায়ালগের কিছু কর্মকাণ্ডের ঘটনার অবস্থানের প্রাকৃতিক প সুইটবোর্ড কোর্পাসের মূল্য দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ভাষণের প্রস্তাবিত অবস্থান কোডিং পরিসংখ্যানে পরিসংখ্যানে ডিএআরের কার্যক্রমের', 'cs': 'Tato studie navrhuje přístup pro rozpoznávání dialogových aktů založený na neuronové síti (DAR), který zahrnuje polohové kódování absolutní nebo relativní pozice výroku. Navržený přístup je inspirován pozorováním, že některé dialogové akty mají tendenci výskytu pozic. Hodnocení korpusu Switchboardu ukazují, že navržené polohové kódování výroků statisticky významně zlepšuje výkon DAR.', 'ca': "Aquest estudi propon un enfocament conscient de posició d'expressió per a un model de reconeixement d'actes de diàleg basat en xarxa neural (DAR), que incorpora codificació de posició per a la posició absoluta o relativa de l'expressió. The proposed approach is inspired by the observation that some dialogue acts have tendencies of occurrence positions.  Les avaluacions del corpo Switchboard mostren que la codificació posicional proposada de les expressions millora estatísticament significativament el rendiment del DAR.", 'bs': 'U ovom ispitivanju predlaže pristup pozornosti izraza za model priznanja dijaloga na neuralnoj mreži (DAR), koji uključuje pozicionalnu kodiranje za apsolutnu ili relativnu poziciju izraza. Predloženi pristup je inspirisan posmatranjem da neki dijalogski akti imaju tendencije pozicija događaja. Procjenjivanja korpusa Švicarskog odbora pokazuju da predloženo pozicionalno kodiranje govora statistički značajno poboljšava učinkovitost DAR-a.', 'et': 'Kﾃ､esolev uuring pakub vﾃ､lja vﾃ､ljenduspositsiooniteadliku lﾃ､henemisviisi neurovﾃｵrgupﾃｵhisele dialoogi akti tuvastamise mudelile (DAR), mis sisaldab vﾃ､ljenduse absoluutse vﾃｵi suhtelise positsiooni positsioonikodeerimist. Kavandatud lﾃ､henemisviis on inspireeritud tﾃ､helepanekust, et mﾃｵnedel dialoogiaktidel on kalduvus esinemispositsioonidele. Switchboard korpuse hinnangud nﾃ､itavad, et vﾃ､ljendite positsionaalne kodeerimine parandab statistiliselt oluliselt DAR-i jﾃｵudlust.', 'fi': 'Tässä tutkimuksessa ehdotetaan lauseen sijaintitietoista lähestymistapaa neuroverkkopohjaiseen dialog act recognition (DAR) -malliin, joka sisältää lauseen absoluuttisen tai suhteellisen sijainnin paikannuskoodauksen. Ehdotetun lähestymistavan taustalla on havainto siitä, että joillakin dialogiteoksilla on taipumus esiintymään. Switchboard-korpusen arvioinnit osoittavat, että ehdotettu lauseiden paikkakoodaus parantaa tilastollisesti merkitsevästi DAR:n suorituskykyä.', 'jv': 'Lo arah sing supoyo nggunakake kapan-awake tarjamahan kanggo ngilangno sistem netwisik-sistem sing aksi nggunakake tarjamahan Awak dhéwé nggunakake dipunangé kelompok ngéwé éntukang karo dialog Wanggalih sing dipunanggé karo peranggé Switch', 'sk': 'Ta študija predlaga pristop zavedanja položaja izraza za model prepoznavanja dialognih aktov (DAR), ki vključuje pozicijsko kodiranje absolutnega ali relativnega položaja izraza. Predlagani pristop je navdihnjen z ugotovitvijo, da imajo nekateri dialogni akti nagnjenost k pojavljanju položajev. Ocene na korpusu Switchboard kažejo, da predlagano pozicijsko kodiranje izgovorov statistično značilno izboljša učinkovitost DAR.', 'ha': "Wannan kõyi yana gaya wata hanyor maganar-mai-gaya wa wani misali na gane kwamfyutan aikin bayani na danne da neural (DAR), wanda ya ƙunsa da kodi mai zura wa wurin da ke cikakken ko danganta. Tsarin da aka rufe shi ya yi wahayi zuwa ga tsarin da wasu masu cikin zauren akwatin bayani sun samu'a da wasu matsayi. The evaluations on the Switchboard corpus show that the proposed positional encoding of utterances statistically significantly improves the performance of DAR.", 'bo': "This study proposes a utterance position-aware approach for a neural network-based dialog act recognition (DAR) model, which includes positional encoding for utterance's absolute or relative position. Name དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་འདྲི་ཚིག་ནི་མཐོང་སྣང་ལ་གཞན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐོང་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཡོད། སུའུཊ་མཁན་གྱི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དཔྱད་ཞིག་དག་ནི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཡུལ་ཨང་ཀིའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གནས་ཡུལ", 'he': "This study proposes an utterance position-aware approach for a neural network-based dialogue act recognition (DAR) model, which incorporates positional encoding for utterance's absolute or relative position.  The proposed approach is inspired by the observation that some dialogue acts have tendencies of occurrence positions.  The evaluations on the Switchboard corpus show that the proposed positional encoding of utterances statistically significantly improves the performance of DAR."}
{'en': 'Generic Mechanism for Reducing Repetitions in Encoder-Decoder Models', 'ar': 'آلية عامة لتقليل التكرار في نماذج وحدة فك التشفير', 'es': 'Mecanismo genérico para reducir las repeticiones en los modelos de codificador-decodificador', 'fr': 'Mécanisme générique pour réduire les répétitions dans les modèles codeur-décodeur', 'pt': 'Mecanismo Genérico para Redução de Repetições em Modelos Codificador-Decodificador', 'ja': 'エンコーダデコーダモデルの繰り返しを減らすための一般的なメカニズム', 'zh': '减编码器-解码器模重数通用机制', 'hi': 'एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल में पुनरावृत्ति को कम करने के लिए जेनेरिक तंत्र', 'ru': 'Общий механизм уменьшения повторений в моделях кодировщик-декодер', 'ga': 'Meicníocht Cineálach chun Athrá a Laghdú i Múnlaí Ionchódóra-Díchódóra', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Általános mechanizmus az ismétlések csökkentésére a kódoló-dekódoló modellekben', 'el': 'Γενικός μηχανισμός για τη μείωση των επαναλήψεων σε μοντέλα κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή', 'lt': 'Bendras kodavimo kodavimo modelių pakartojimų mažinimo mechanizmas', 'ms': 'Generic Mechanism for Reducing Repetitions in Encoder-Decoder Models', 'kk': 'Кодер- декодер үлгілерінде қайталану үшін жалпы механизмі', 'mt': 'Mekkaniżmu Ġeneriku għat-Tnaqqis tar-Ripetizzjonijiet fil-Mudelli tad-Dekodifikatur', 'it': 'Meccanismo generico per ridurre le ripetizioni nei modelli Encoder-Decoder', 'mk': 'Генерален механизам за намалување на повторувањата во моделите на кодерот', 'no': 'Generisk mekanisme for å redusera gjentakingar i koderingsmodeller', 'ml': 'എക്കോഡെര്\u200d- ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d മോഡലില്\u200d റിപ്റ്റിഷനുകള്\u200d കുറവ് വരുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള സാധാരണ മെക്കിനിമയം', 'sr': 'Generički mehanizam za smanjenje ponavljanja u modelima kodera', 'si': 'Name', 'ro': 'Mecanism generic pentru reducerea repetărilor în modelele de codare-decodor', 'mn': 'Encoder-Decoder загварын давталтыг багасгах генерал механизм', 'pl': 'Ogólny mechanizm redukcji powtórzeń w modelach kodera-dekodera', 'ur': 'Encoder-Decoder Models میں دوبارہ کم کرنے کے لئے جنریکی مکانیسم', 'ta': 'குறியீட்டாளர்- குறியீட்டாளர் மாதிரிகளில் மீட்டெடுக்கும் பொதுவான முறைமை', 'sv': 'Generisk mekanism för att minska repetitioner i kodare-dekoder modeller', 'so': 'Mechanism General for Reducing Repetitions in Encoder-Decoder Models', 'vi': 'Thiết bị Chung để giảm cưỡng chế trong chế mã hóa.', 'uz': 'Name', 'hr': 'Generalni mehanizam za smanjenje ponavljanja u modelima kodera', 'nl': 'Algemeen mechanisme voor het verminderen van herhalingen in encoder-decodermodellen', 'bg': 'Генерален механизъм за намаляване на повторенията в кодер- декодерни модели', 'ko': '인코더 - 인코더 모형의 중복 횟수를 줄이는 일반적인 메커니즘', 'de': 'Generischer Mechanismus zur Reduzierung von Wiederholungen in Encoder-Decoder-Modellen', 'da': 'Generisk mekanisme til reduktion af gentagelser i koder-dekoder modeller', 'tr': 'Tekrarlamak üçin Ýardimik Mazmunlar', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa ujumla wa Kupunguza Mabadiliko katika Modeli za Kufungua', 'fa': 'مکانیسم عمومی برای کاهش تکرار در مدل\u200cهای رمزبندی', 'sq': 'Mekanizmi gjeneral për zvogëlimin e përsëritjeve në modelet e kodifikuesit', 'af': 'Name', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Kodlay캼c캼-Dekodlay캼c캼 Modell톛rind톛 yenil톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n generiki Mehanizm', 'bn': 'এনকোডার- ডিকোডার মডেলে প্রতিক্রিয়া কমানোর জন্য সাধারণ মেকেনিস্টেম', 'hy': 'Գլխավոր մեխանիզմ կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելների կրճատումների նվազեցնելու համար', 'id': 'Mekanisme Generik untuk mengurangi ulangan dalam Model Pengkode', 'bs': 'Generični mehanizam za smanjenje ponavljanja u modelima kodera', 'fi': 'Yleinen mekanismi toistojen vähentämiseksi kooderi- dekooderimalleissa', 'cs': 'Obecný mechanismus pro snižování opakování v modelech kodéru-dekodéru', 'ca': 'Mécanisme genèric de reducció de repeticions en models de codificador', 'et': 'Kodeerija- dekodeerimismudelite korduse vähendamise üldine mehhanism', 'sk': 'Splošni mehanizem za zmanjšanje ponovitev v modelih kodiranja in dekodiranja', 'jv': 'Generik Mehanisms kanggo Mbalasi Tekong Ngucap Nang koder-Dekoder model', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'སྔོན་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཆས་གསལ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཆུང་བའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ', 'he': 'Mechanism Generic for Reducing Repetitions in Encoder-Decoder Models'}
{'en': 'Encoder-decoder models have been commonly used for many tasks such as machine translation and response generation. As previous research reported, these models suffer from generating redundant repetition. In this research, we propose a new mechanism for encoder-decoder models that estimates the semantic difference of a source sentence before and after being fed into the encoder-decoder model to capture the consistency between two sides. This mechanism helps reduce repeatedly generated tokens for a variety of tasks. Evaluation results on publicly available machine translation and response generation datasets demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposal.', 'fr': "Les modèles encodeur-décodeur sont couramment utilisés pour de nombreuses tâches telles que la traduction automatique et la génération de réponses. Comme l'ont indiqué des recherches précédentes, ces modèles souffrent de la génération de répétitions redondantes. Dans cette recherche, nous proposons un nouveau mécanisme pour les modèles codeur-décodeur qui estime la différence sémantique d'une phrase source avant et après avoir été introduite dans le modèle codeur-décodeur afin de capturer la cohérence entre les deux côtés. Ce mécanisme permet de réduire les jetons générés de manière répétée pour diverses tâches. Les résultats de l'évaluation des ensembles de données de traduction automatique et de génération de réponses accessibles au public démontrent l'efficacité de notre proposition.", 'es': 'Los modelos de codificador-decodificador se han utilizado comúnmente para muchas tareas, como la traducción automática y la generación de respuestas. Como informaron investigaciones anteriores, estos modelos sufren la generación de repeticiones redundantes. En esta investigación, proponemos un nuevo mecanismo para modelos de codificador-decodificador que estima la diferencia semántica de una oración fuente antes y después de ser introducida en el modelo codificador-decodificador para capturar la consistencia entre dos lados. Este mecanismo ayuda a reducir los tokens generados repetidamente para una variedad de tareas. Los resultados de la evaluación de conjuntos de datos de traducción automática y generación de respuestas disponibles públicamente demuestran la eficacia de nuestra propuesta.', 'ar': 'تم استخدام نماذج التشفير وفك التشفير بشكل شائع للعديد من المهام مثل الترجمة الآلية وتوليد الاستجابة. كما ذكرت الأبحاث السابقة ، فإن هذه النماذج تعاني من توليد تكرار زائد. في هذا البحث ، نقترح آلية جديدة لنماذج التشفير وفك التشفير التي تقدر الاختلاف الدلالي لجملة المصدر قبل وبعد إدخالها في نموذج وحدة فك التشفير لالتقاط الاتساق بين الجانبين. تساعد هذه الآلية في تقليل الرموز المميزة التي يتم إنشاؤها بشكل متكرر لمجموعة متنوعة من المهام. تظهر نتائج التقييم على مجموعات البيانات الخاصة بالترجمة الآلية المتاحة للجمهور وتوليد الاستجابة فعالية اقتراحنا.', 'pt': 'Os modelos codificador-decodificador têm sido comumente usados para muitas tarefas, como tradução automática e geração de respostas. Conforme relatado em pesquisas anteriores, esses modelos sofrem por gerar repetição redundante. Nesta pesquisa, propomos um novo mecanismo para modelos codificador-decodificador que estima a diferença semântica de uma sentença fonte antes e depois de ser inserida no modelo codificador-decodificador para capturar a consistência entre dois lados. Esse mecanismo ajuda a reduzir tokens gerados repetidamente para uma variedade de tarefas. Os resultados da avaliação em conjuntos de dados de tradução automática e geração de respostas disponíveis publicamente demonstram a eficácia de nossa proposta.', 'zh': '编码器-解码器模常用于许多任务,如机器翻译应生。 如前所论,则生冗余复。 于此论之,吾建编码器-解码器模之新机制,其机可度源句于馈遗编码器-解码器前与后语义异,以获其一致性。 此机有助于损益为百务重成之令牌。 明可用之机器翻译,应生数之评,以验吾提案之有效性。', 'ru': 'Модели кодировщик-декодер широко используются для многих задач, таких как машинный перевод и генерация ответов. Как сообщалось в предыдущих исследованиях, эти модели страдают от создания избыточного повторения. В этом исследовании мы предлагаем новый механизм для моделей кодировщик-декодер, который оценивает семантическую разницу исходного предложения до и после подачи в модель кодировщик-декодер для захвата согласованности между двумя сторонами. Этот механизм помогает уменьшить количество повторно сгенерированных токенов для различных задач. Результаты оценки общедоступных наборов данных машинного перевода и генерации ответов демонстрируют эффективность нашего предложения.', 'ja': 'エンコーダデコーダモデルは、機械翻訳および応答生成などの多くのタスクに一般的に使用されてきた。以前の研究で報告されているように、これらのモデルは冗長な繰り返しを生成することに苦しんでいる。本研究では、エンコーダデコーダモデルに入力される前後のソース文の意味差を推定し、双方の整合性をとるエンコーダデコーダモデルの新たな仕組みを提案する。このメカニズムは、さまざまなタスクのために繰り返し生成されるトークンを減らすのに役立ちます。一般に入手可能な機械翻訳およびレスポンス生成データセットの評価結果は、当社の提案の有効性を示しています。', 'hi': 'एनकोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल का उपयोग आमतौर पर कई कार्यों के लिए किया जाता है जैसे कि मशीन अनुवाद और प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी। जैसा कि पिछले शोध ने बताया, ये मॉडल अनावश्यक पुनरावृत्ति उत्पन्न करने से पीड़ित हैं। इस शोध में, हम एनकोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल के लिए एक नए तंत्र का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो दो पक्षों के बीच स्थिरता को पकड़ने के लिए एनकोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल में खिलाए जाने से पहले और बाद में स्रोत वाक्य के शब्दार्थ अंतर का अनुमान लगाता है। यह तंत्र विभिन्न प्रकार के कार्यों के लिए बार-बार उत्पन्न टोकन को कम करने में मदद करता है। सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध मशीन अनुवाद और प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी डेटासेट पर मूल्यांकन परिणाम हमारे प्रस्ताव की प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Baineadh úsáid go coitianta as samhlacha ionchódóra-díchódóra le haghaidh go leor tascanna ar nós aistriúchán meaisín agus giniúint freagraí. Mar a thuairiscigh taighde roimhe seo, bíonn athrá iomarcach á ghiniúint ag na samhlacha seo. Sa taighde seo, molaimid meicníocht nua le haghaidh samhlacha ionchódóra-díchódóra a dhéanann meastachán ar an difríocht shéimeantach d’abairt foinseach roimh agus tar éis í a thabhairt isteach sa mhúnla ionchódóra-díchódóra chun an chomhsheasmhacht idir an dá thaobh a ghabháil. Cuidíonn an meicníocht seo le comharthaí a ghintear arís agus arís eile a laghdú le haghaidh tascanna éagsúla. Léiríonn torthaí meastóireachta ar thacair sonraí aistrithe meaisín agus giniúna freagartha atá ar fáil go poiblí éifeachtacht ár dtogra.', 'ka': 'Name როგორც წინა შესწავლა, ეს მოდელები შეიძლება გადავიწყენოთ უკეთესი განმეორება. ამ სწავლობაში ჩვენ ახალი მექანსიკოდირების მოდელისთვის, რომელიც სემონტიკური განსხვავება მხოლოდ და შემდეგ კოდირების მოდელისთვის, რომელიც ორი მხარეს შორის კონსტენტიკური განსხვავებას დავწერა. ეს მექანიზმი დახმარებს განსხვავებული საქმედებისთვის განსხვავებული საქმედებისთვის განსხვავებული მონაცემები. გასაგების შედეგი სახელსაწინო მაქინის გასაგებით და განახლებების მონაცემების შესახებ მონაცემების ეფექტიურობა ჩვენი წინახულების შესახებ.', 'hu': 'A kódoló-dekódoló modelleket gyakran használják számos feladathoz, mint például a gépi fordítás és a válasz generálása. Ahogy korábbi kutatások jelentették, ezek a modellek szenvednek a redundáns ismétléstől. Ebben a kutatásban egy új mechanizmust javasolunk a kódoló-dekóder modellek számára, amely becsüli egy forráskód szemantikai különbségét a kódoló-dekóder modellbe történő bevitel előtt és után, hogy rögzítse a két oldal közötti konzisztenciát. Ez a mechanizmus segít csökkenteni az ismételten generált tokeneket a különböző feladatokhoz. A nyilvánosan elérhető gépi fordítási és válaszkészítő adatkészletek értékelési eredményei bizonyítják javaslatunk hatékonyságát.', 'it': "I modelli codificatori-decodificatori sono stati comunemente utilizzati per molte attività come la traduzione automatica e la generazione di risposte. Come riportato da ricerche precedenti, questi modelli soffrono di generare ripetizioni ridondanti. In questa ricerca, proponiamo un nuovo meccanismo per i modelli encoder-decoder che stima la differenza semantica di una frase sorgente prima e dopo essere stata immessa nel modello encoder-decoder per catturare la coerenza tra due lati. Questo meccanismo aiuta a ridurre i token generati ripetutamente per una varietà di attività. I risultati delle valutazioni sulla traduzione automatica pubblicamente disponibili e sulla generazione di risposte dimostrano l'efficacia della nostra proposta.", 'lt': 'Kodavimo kodavimo modeliai dažnai naudojami daugeliui užduočių, pvz., vertimui mašinomis ir atsako generavimui. Kaip buvo pranešta ankstesniuose tyrimuose, šie modeliai kartoja nereikalingai. Šiame tyrime siūlome naują kodavimo kodavimo modelių mechanizmą, pagal kurį būtų įvertintas semantinis pradinio sakinio skirtumas prieš ir po to, kai jis bus įtrauktas į kodavimo kodavimo model į, siekiant nustatyti abiejų pusių nuoseklumą. Šis mechanizmas padeda sumažinti kartotinai sukauptų ženklų, skirtų įvairioms užduotims. Viešai prieinamų vertimo mašinomis ir atsako generavimo duomenų rinkinių vertinimo rezultatai rodo mūsų pasiūlymo veiksmingumą.', 'mk': 'Моделите за декодирање на кодерите се обично употребени за многу задачи како што се машински превод и генерација на одговор. Како што објавија претходните истражувања, овие модели страдаат од генерирање на претерани повторувања. Во ова истражување, предложуваме нов механизам за моделите на кодер-декодер кои ја проценуваат семантичната разлика на изворната реченица пред и откако ќе бидат внесени во моделот на кодер-декодер за да ја зафатат констанцијата помеѓу двете страни. Овој механизам помага во намалувањето на постојано генерираните знаци за различни задачи. Резултатите од евалуацијата на јавно достапните компјутери на машински превод и генерација на податоци покажуваат ефикасност на нашиот предлог.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί συνήθως για πολλές εργασίες όπως η μηχανική μετάφραση και η παραγωγή απόκρισης. Όπως ανέφερε προηγούμενη έρευνα, αυτά τα μοντέλα υποφέρουν από την παραγωγή περιττής επανάληψης. Στην έρευνα αυτή, προτείνουμε έναν νέο μηχανισμό για μοντέλα κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή που εκτιμά τη σημασιολογική διαφορά μιας πρότασης προέλευσης πριν και μετά την εισαγωγή στο μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή για να καταγράψει τη συνέπεια μεταξύ δύο πλευρών. Αυτός ο μηχανισμός βοηθά στη μείωση των επανειλημμένα παραγόμενων σημάτων για μια ποικιλία εργασιών. Τα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησης σε δημόσια διαθέσιμα σύνολα δεδομένων μηχανικής μετάφρασης και δημιουργίας απαντήσεων αποδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της πρότασης μας.', 'kk': 'Кодер- декодер үлгілері машинаны аудару мен жауап беру үшін көпшілік тапсырмалар үшін қолданылады. Алдыңғы зерттеу туралы, бұл үлгілер қайталанатын қайталау қиындығында болады. Бұл зерттеулерде, біз кодер декодер үлгілерінің жаңа механизмін таңдаймыз. Бұл көздегі сөздің семантикалық айырмашылығын алдында және кейін кодер декодер үлгісіне ендірілген кезде екі жағындағы тәуелсіздігі Бұл механизм бірнеше тапсырмалар үшін қайталап құрылған белгілерді азайтады. Қолданатын машинаны аудару және жауап беру деректер жиындарының нәтижесін оқу нәтижесі біздің ұсынысымыздың эффективнігін көрсетеді.', 'mt': 'Mudelli ta’ kodiċi-dekodifikatur intużaw b’mod komuni għal ħafna kompiti bħat-traduzzjoni tal-magna u l-ġenerazzjoni tar-rispons. Kif irrappurtat mir-riċerka preċedenti, dawn il-mudelli jbatu mill-ġenerazzjoni ta’ ripetizzjoni żejda. F’din ir-riċerka, qed nipproponu mekkaniżmu ġdid għall-mudelli ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder li jistma d-differenza semantika ta’ sentenza tas-sors qabel u wara li tiġi mdaħħla fil-mudell ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder biex tinqabad il-konsistenza bejn iż-żewġ naħat. This mechanism helps reduce repeatedly generated tokens for a variety of tasks.  Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni dwar settijiet tad-dejta dwar it-traduzzjoni tal-magni u l-ġenerazzjoni tar-rispons disponibbli għall-pubbliku juru l-effettività tal-proposta tagħna.', 'mn': 'Encoder-decoder загварууд машин орчуулалт болон хариу үйлдэл зэрэг олон ажил дээр ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг. Өмнөх судалгааны хэлбэрээр эдгээр загварууд дахин дахин давтах боломжтой болдог. Энэ судалгаанд бид кодлогч-декодлогч загварын шинэ механизм санал болгож байна. Энэ нь эх үүсвэрийн өгүүлбэрийн semantic ялгааг өмнө болон дараа нь кодлогч-декодлогч загвар руу хоёр талын хоорондын тогтвортой байдлыг барьж авсан. Энэ механизм олон ажил дээр олон дасгал гаргасан тэмдэгтийг багасгаж чадна. Машин хөгжлийн орчуулалт болон хариу үйлдвэрлэлийн өгөгдлийн сангуудын үндсэн үр дүнг бидний санал дэвшүүлэх үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Koder- dekodermodeller er vanlegvis brukte for mange oppgåver som maskineoversettelse og svar. Som førre forskning rapporterte, har desse modelane gått frå å laga redundant gjentakingar. I denne forskningen foreslår vi ein ny mekanisme for koderingsmodeller som vurder det semantiske forskjellen av ein kjeldesetning før og etter at dei vert fått inn i koderingsmodellen for å henta konsistens mellom to sider. Denne mekanismen hjelper til å redusera gjentaande teikn for mange oppgåver. Evalueringsresultatet på tilgjengelege maskinsomsetjingar og datasett for å laga svar viser effektiviteten av forslag vårt.', 'ml': 'മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷവും മറുപടി തലമുറയും പോലുള്ള പല ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും സാധാരണ ഉപയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. മുമ്പ് ഗവേഷണം റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്തത് പോലെ, ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞ ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്ന് അന ഈ ഗവേഷണത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ മെക്കനിസ്റ്റം പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരു സോര്\u200dസ്സ് വാക്കിന്റെ സെമാന്റിക് വ്യത്യാസവും മുമ്പും പിന്നെ രണ്ടു ഭാഗത്ത പല ജോലികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d ആവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഈ മെക്കാനിസംവിധാനം കുറച പ്രസിദ്ധമായ മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷവും മറുപടി തലമുറയ്ക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രോജക്രിയയുടെ', 'pl': 'Modele kodera-dekodera są powszechnie stosowane do wielu zadań, takich jak tłumaczenie maszynowe i generowanie odpowiedzi. Jak doniosły wcześniejsze badania, modele te cierpią na generowanie zbędnych powtórzeń. W tym badaniu proponujemy nowy mechanizm modeli kodera-dekodera, który oszacowuje różnicę semantyczną zdania źródłowego przed i po wprowadzeniu do modelu kodera-dekodera, aby uchwycić spójność między dwoma stronami. Mechanizm ten pomaga zmniejszyć wielokrotnie generowane tokeny dla różnych zadań. Wyniki oceny publicznie dostępnych zbiorów danych dotyczących tłumaczeń maszynowych i generowania odpowiedzi pokazują skuteczność naszej propozycji.', 'sr': 'Modeli kodera-dekodera su često korišteni za mnoge zadatke poput prevoda i generacije odgovora. Kao što je prijavljeno prethodno istraživanje, ovi modeli pate od stvaranja redundantnih ponavljanja. U ovom istraživanju predlažemo novi mehanizam za modele kodera-dekodera koji procjenjuje semantičku razliku izvorne rečenice prije i nakon što su se hranili u model kodera-dekodera kako bi uhvatili konsekvenciju između dve strane. Ovaj mehanizam pomaže da smanji ponovno stvorene znakove za razne zadatke. Rezultati procjene javno dostupnih prevoda i podataka za generaciju odgovora pokazuju učinkovitost našeg prijedloga.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සංකේතකය- ඩිකෝඩර් මොඩේල්ස් භාවිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ මැෂින් අවවාදය සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dර මුලින් පරීක්ෂණය පුළුවන් විදිහට, මේ මොඩේල් සිද්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නිර් මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි අලුත් පරීක්ෂණයක් සැකසුම් කරනවා කොඩර් ඩිකෝඩර් මොඩේල්ස් වලට අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා මුළු වාක්ෂණ මේ පද්ධතිය සමහර විවිධ වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න උදව් කරනවා. සාර්වාධික විවාහය සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක දත්ත සැකසුම් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂණ ප්\u200dරතික', 'so': 'Tusaalada koodeynta waxaa inta badan loo isticmaalay shaqooyin badan, tusaale ahaan turjumista machine iyo generashada jawaabta. Sidii baaritaankii hore loo soo sheegay, modelladan waxay ka xanuunsadaan in dib loo soo celiyo. Waxbarashadan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa meyminimo cusub oo u qoran qaababka codcodsiga, taasoo qiimeynaya isbedelka kala duwan ee ereyga sourceed horta iyo ka dib marka loo quudiyo modelka codcodcoder si aan u qabsado isku xirka labada dhinac. Maamulkanu waxay caawinaysaa in uu hoos u dhigo calaamado lagu sameeyo oo lagu soo noqdo shaqooyin kala duduwan. Evaluation results on publicly available machine translation and response generation datasets demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposal.', 'ms': 'Model penyekod-penyekod telah biasanya digunakan untuk banyak tugas seperti penerjemah mesin dan generasi balas. Seperti penelitian terdahulu dilaporkan, model ini menderita daripada menghasilkan ulangan yang berlebihan. Dalam kajian ini, kami cadangkan mekanisme baru untuk model pengekod-dekoder yang menghargai perbezaan semantik kalimat sumber sebelum dan selepas dimasukkan ke dalam model pengekod-dekoder untuk menangkap konsistensi antara dua sisi. Mekanisme ini membantu mengurangi token yang dijana berulang kali untuk pelbagai tugas. Evaluation results on publicly available machine translation and response generation datasets demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposal.', 'sv': 'Kodare-avkodarmodeller har ofta använts för många uppgifter såsom maskinöversättning och svarsgenerering. Som tidigare forskning rapporterat lider dessa modeller av att generera redundant repetition. I denna forskning föreslår vi en ny mekanism för encoder-avkodarmodeller som uppskattar den semantiska skillnaden för en källmening före och efter inmatning i encoder-avkodarmodellen för att fånga konsistensen mellan två sidor. Denna mekanism hjälper till att minska upprepade tokens för en mängd olika uppgifter. Utvärderingsresultat av allmänt tillgängliga maskinöversättnings- och svarsgenereringsdataset visar hur effektivt vårt förslag är.', 'ta': 'Name முந்தைய ஆய்வு அறிவிக்கப்பட்டது போல், இந்த மாதிரிகள் குறைவான திரும்பச் செய்ய வேண்டும். In this research, we propose a new mechanism for encoder-decoder models that estimates the semantic difference of a source sentence before and after being fed into the encoder-decoder model to capture the consistency between two sides.  இந்த முறைமையில் பல பணிகளுக்கு தொடர்ந்து உருவாக்கப்பட்ட குறிகளை குறைக்க உதவுகிறது. பொது கிடைக்கும் இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மற்றும் பதில் உருவாக்கும் தரவு அமைப்புகளின் முடிவுகள் எங்கள் பரிந்த', 'ur': 'اکڈر ڈیکوڈر موڈل بہت سی کاموں کے لئے استعمال کئے گئے ہیں جیسے ماشین ترجمہ اور جواب پیدا کرنے کے لئے۔ جیسے پہلے کی تحقیقات گزاری تھی، یہ موڈل دوبارہ تکرار کرنے سے رنج لگتے ہیں. اس تحقیقات میں ہم ایک نئی مکانیزی پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ایک کوڈر-ڈیکوڈر موڈل کے لئے جو پہلے اور اس کے بعد ایک سورج ویدھی کا سیمانٹیک تفاوت کا اندازہ رکھتا ہے کہ دو جانوں کے درمیان ایک کوڈر-ڈیکوڈر موڈل میں کھایا جاتا ہے۔ یہ مکانیسم ایک طرح طرح کے کاموں کے لئے دوبارہ پیدا کئے ہوئے علائم کاٹنے کی مدد کرتا ہے. ہماری پیشنهاد کی عمدگی دکھاتی ہے۔', 'ro': 'Modelele encoder-decoder au fost utilizate în mod obișnuit pentru multe sarcini, cum ar fi traducerea automată și generarea de răspunsuri. După cum au raportat cercetările anterioare, aceste modele suferă de generarea repetării redundante. În această cercetare, propunem un nou mecanism pentru modelele encoder-decoder care estimează diferența semantică a unei propoziții sursă înainte și după introducerea în modelul encoder-decoder pentru a capta consistența dintre cele două părți. Acest mecanism ajută la reducerea jetoanelor generate în mod repetat pentru o varietate de sarcini. Rezultatele evaluării privind seturile de date pentru traducerea automată disponibile publicului și generarea de răspunsuri demonstrează eficacitatea propunerii noastre.', 'vi': 'Mẫu mã hóa lậu thường được dùng cho nhiều công việc như dịch phụ máy và sản xuất phản ứng. Như những nghiên cứu trước đây được báo cáo, các mô hình này thiếu số lần lặp lại. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ chế mới cho các mô hình mã hóa, ước tính phân biệt ngữ pháp của một câu từ trước và sau khi được đưa vào mô hình mã hóa để nắm bắt sự đồng nhất giữa hai mặt. Cơ chế này giúp giảm các thẻ phát sinh liên tục cho nhiều nhiệm vụ. Kết quả đánh giá các bộ dữ liệu chuyên dịch sẵn sàng công khai và sản xuất phản ứng cho thấy hiệu quả của đề nghị.', 'uz': "Name Oldingi taʼminlovchilar davom etilganda, bu modellar qo'shimcha takrorlanishni yaratadi. Bu taʼminotda, biz kodkoder modellari uchun yangi mekanikani tahmil qilamiz. Bir nechta bir manba so'zning semantik o'zgarishni oldin va keyin to'plab qodcoder modelidagi bir ikki tomoniga bir qanday birlikni qabul qilish mumkin. @ info Taʼrifi natijasi mavjud boʻlgan mashina tarjima va javob yaratish maʼlumotlar tarjimalarining natijalari rivojlanishimizni tasavvur qiladi.", 'da': 'Encoder-dekoder modeller er almindeligt blevet brugt til mange opgaver såsom maskinoversættelse og responsgenerering. Som tidligere forskning rapporterede, lider disse modeller af at generere redundant gentagelse. I denne forskning foreslår vi en ny mekanisme til encoder-dekoder modeller, der estimerer den semantiske forskel i en kildesætning før og efter at være indført i encoder-dekoder modellen for at fange konsistensen mellem to sider. Denne mekanisme hjælper med at reducere gentagne gange genererede tokens til en række opgaver. Evalueringsresultater af offentligt tilgængelige datasæt til maskinoversættelse og responsgenerering viser effektiviteten af vores forslag.', 'hr': 'Modeli kodera-dekodera često se koriste za mnoge zadatke poput prevoda strojeva i generacije odgovora. Kao što je prijavljeno prethodno istraživanje, ovi modeli pate od stvaranja redundantne ponavljanja. U ovom istraživanju predlažemo novi mehanizam za modele kodera-dekodera koji procjenjuje semantičku razliku izvorne rečenice prije i nakon primjene u model kodera-dekodera kako bi uhvatili konsekvenciju između dvije strane. Ovaj mehanizam pomaže smanjiti ponovno proizvedene znakove za razne zadatke. Rezultati procjene javno dostupnih prevoda i podataka za generaciju odgovora pokazuju učinkovitost našeg prijedloga.', 'nl': 'Encoder-decoder modellen zijn vaak gebruikt voor vele taken, zoals machinevertaling en responsgeneratie. Zoals eerder onderzoek meldde, lijden deze modellen onder het genereren van redundante herhaling. In dit onderzoek stellen we een nieuw mechanisme voor encoder-decoder modellen voor dat het semantische verschil van een bronzin voor en na invoer in het encoder-decoder model schat om de consistentie tussen twee zijden vast te leggen. Dit mechanisme helpt om herhaaldelijk gegenereerde tokens voor een verscheidenheid aan taken te verminderen. Evaluatieresultaten van publiek beschikbare datasets voor machinevertaling en responsgeneratie tonen de effectiviteit van ons voorstel aan.', 'bg': 'Моделите на кодер-декодер често се използват за много задачи като машинен превод и генериране на отговор. Както съобщават предишните изследвания, тези модели страдат от генериране на излишно повторение. В настоящото изследване предлагаме нов механизъм за моделите кодер-декодер, който оценява семантичната разлика на изречение преди и след въвеждане в модела кодер-декодер, за да улови последователността между двете страни. Този механизъм помага да се намалят многократно генерирани токени за различни задачи. Резултатите от оценката на публично достъпни масиви от данни за машинен превод и генериране на отговори показват ефективността на нашето предложение.', 'id': 'Model kode-dekoder telah biasanya digunakan untuk banyak tugas seperti terjemahan mesin dan generasi respon. Seperti yang dilaporkan penelitian sebelumnya, model-model ini menderita dari menghasilkan ulangan yang berlebihan. Dalam penelitian ini, kami mengusulkan mekanisme baru untuk model decoder-decoder yang memperkirakan perbedaan semantis dari kalimat sumber sebelum dan setelah dimakan ke model decoder-decoder untuk menangkap konsistensi antara dua sisi. Mekanisme ini membantu mengurangi token yang sering dihasilkan untuk berbagai tugas. Hasil evaluasi pada masyarakat terjemahan yang tersedia publik dan dataset generasi respon menunjukkan efektivitas tawaran kami.', 'ko': '인코더 - 디코더 모형은 일반적으로 기계 번역과 응답 생성 등 많은 작업에 사용된다.이전 연구 보고서에서 말한 바와 같이, 이 모델들은 불필요한 중복을 일으킬 것이다.본 연구에서 우리는 새로운 디코더 모델 메커니즘을 제기하여 원어구가 디코더 모델을 입력하기 전과 후의 의미 차이를 예측하여 쌍방 간의 일치성을 포착하는 데 사용한다.이런 메커니즘은 각종 임무를 반복적으로 생성하는 영패를 줄이는 데 도움이 된다.공개된 기계 번역과 응답 생성 데이터 집합에 대한 평가 결과는 우리의 제안의 유효성을 증명했다.', 'de': 'Encoder-Decoder-Modelle wurden häufig für viele Aufgaben wie maschinelle Übersetzung und Antwortgenerierung verwendet. Wie frühere Untersuchungen berichteten, leiden diese Modelle unter redundanter Wiederholung. In dieser Forschung schlagen wir einen neuen Mechanismus für Encoder-Decoder-Modelle vor, der die semantische Differenz eines Quellsatzes vor und nach der Einspeisung in das Encoder-Decoder-Modell schätzt, um die Konsistenz zwischen zwei Seiten zu erfassen. Dieser Mechanismus hilft, wiederholt generierte Token für eine Vielzahl von Aufgaben zu reduzieren. Auswertungsergebnisse zu öffentlich zugänglichen maschinellen Übersetzungen und Antwortgenerierungsdatensätzen belegen die Wirksamkeit unseres Vorschlags.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cها معمولا برای بسیاری از کارها مثل ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین و نسل پاسخ استفاده می\u200cشوند. همانطور که تحقیقات قبلی گزارش داده شده، این مدل ها از تولید تکرار زیادی رنج می برند. در این تحقیقات، ما یک مکانیسم جدید برای مدل\u200cهای رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزگذاری پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که تفاوت semantic از یک جمله منبع قبل و بعد از آن به مدل رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزگذاری می\u200cشود تا هماهنگی بین دو طرف بگیرد. این مکانیسم کمک می\u200cکند تا نشانه\u200cهای بسیاری از کارهای مختلف را کاهش دهد. نتایج ارزیابی بر ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین و تولید داده\u200cهای پاسخ عمومی موجود است که فعالیت پیشنهاد ما را نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Encoder-decoder models have been commonly used for many tasks such as machine translation and response generation.  Kama utafiti wa zamani ulivyoripoti, mifano hii inakabiliwa na kutengeneza tena kwa kiasi kikubwa. Katika utafiti huu, tunapendekeza mfumo mpya wa mifano ya kodi inayokadiria tofauti ya kigaidi ya sentensi ya vyanzo kabla na baada ya kutumia mifano ya kodi ya kuweka kumbukumbu ya kushikilia umuhimu kati ya pande mbili. Mfumo huu unasaidia kupunguza ishara zilizotengenezwa mara kwa mara kwa mara kwa ajili ya kazi mbalimbali. Matokeo ya uthibitisho kuhusu tafsiri ya mashine na taarifa za majibu yanaonyesha ufanisi wa pendekezo letu.', 'af': "Enkoder- dekoder modele is gewoonlik gebruik vir baie taak soos masjien vertaling en antwoord genereering. Soos vorige ondersoek verspreek het, lyk hierdie modele van die genereer van herhaalde herhaal. In hierdie ondersoek, voorstel ons 'n nuwe mekanisme vir enkoder-dekoder modele wat die semantiese verskil van 'n bron seting voor en na gevoer word in die enkoder-dekodermodel om die konsistensie tussen twee kante te vang. Hierdie mekanisme hulp herhaaldelik genereerde tekens vir 'n verskeie werke te reduseer. Evalueringsresultate op openlik beskikbaar masjien vertaling en antwoordegenerasie datastelle vertoon die effektiviteit van ons voorstel.", 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s የቀድሞው ትምህርት እንደተጻፈ፣ እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች አዲስ መደጋገሚያ ከመፍጠር ይቀበላሉ፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ የሆኑት የሆድ ክፍተት ውጤቱን አስቀድሞ እና በሁለቱ ወገኖች መካከል የሚቆዩትን የሆድ ክፍል መቆጣጠር የሚቆጠር አዲስ የሆድ ዶላር ማሰናከል፡፡ ይህ አካባቢ በተለያዩ ስራ ምልክቶችን ለማሳደግ ይረዳል፡፡ የድምፅ ውጤቶች በህዝብ የተገኘ የmachine ትርጉም እና የድምፅ ትውልድ ዳታተር ማድረጊያውን የፕሮጀክታችንን ጥያቄ እያሳየቱ ነው፡፡", 'tr': 'Aýratyn terjime we jogap döredişi ýaly köp işe üçin ullanýar. Öňki barlag bildirilen ýaly, bu nusgalar daşary gaýtalandyrmakdan çykýar. Bu araştyrmada, biz bu ködleme kodleme modelleri üçin täze bir mehanizam teklif edip, bu semantik sözläniň öňki we ondan soňra kodleme modeliniň durumyny iki tarapyň arasynda almak üçin deňleýäris Bu mekanizam birnäçe iş üçin ýene-täzeden üretilen işaretleri azaltmaga kömek edir. Maksad terjimelerinden we jogabat generalizasynda baýramçylyklaryň netijeleri biziň teklibimiziň täsirini görkez.', 'az': 'Enkoder-dekoder modelləri maşın çeviri və cavab nəzəriyyəti kimi çox işlər üçün yayınlaşdırılır. Əvvəlki araştırmalar bildirdikləri kimi, bu modellər çox dəyişiklik təkrar yaratmaqdan əziyyət verirlər. Bu araştırma içində, biz kodlayıcı modellər üçün yeni bir mehanizam təklif edirik ki, əvvəl və sonra bir mənbə cümləsinin semantik fərqlini, iki tərəflərin arasındakı müəyyənləşdirmək üçün kodlayıcı modellərə verilmişdir. Bu mehanizmi bir çoxlu işlər üçün bir çoxlu dəyişiklik yaratdığı möcüzələri azaltmağa kömək edir. Yaxınlıqla faydalanır maşın çevirilməsi və cavab verən veri qurğuları təklifimizin etkinliğini göstərir.', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং প্রজন্মের মতো অনেক কাজের জন্য এনকোডার-ডেকোডার মডেল ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণা রিপোর্ট করা হয়েছিল, এই মডেলগুলো ক্ষতিকর পুনরাবৃত্তি তৈরি করার ক্ষেত্রে কষ্ In this research, we propose a new mechanism for encoder-decoder models that estimates the semantic difference of a source sentence before and after being fed into the encoder-decoder model to capture the consistency between two sides.  এই বিভিন্ন কাজের জন্য বার বার তৈরি চিহ্ন কমানোর সাহায্য করে। মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং প্রজন্মের ডাটাসেট প্রকাশ্যে প্রস্তাবের কার্যকর ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে।', 'bs': 'Modeli kodera-dekodera su često korišteni za mnoge zadatke poput prevoda i generacije odgovora. Kao što je prijavljeno prethodno istraživanje, ovi modeli pate od stvaranja redundantne ponavljanja. U ovom istraživanju predlažemo novi mehanizam za modele kodera-dekodera koji procjenjuje semantičku razliku izvorne rečenice prije i nakon što se hrani u model kodera-dekodera kako bi uhvatili konsekvenciju između dvije strane. Ovaj mehanizam pomaže da smanji ponovno stvorene znakove za razne zadatke. Rezultati procjene na javno dostupnim prijevozima i podacima generacije odgovora pokazuju učinkovitost našeg prijedloga.', 'cs': 'Modely kodérů a dekodérů byly běžně používány pro mnoho úkolů, jako je strojový překlad a generování odpovědí. Jak uvedl předchozí výzkum, tyto modely trpí nadbytečným opakováním. V tomto výzkumu navrhujeme nový mechanismus pro modely kodérů-dekodérů, který odhaduje sémantický rozdíl zdrojové věty před a po vložení do modelu kodérů-dekodérů pro zachycení konzistence mezi dvěma stranami. Tento mechanismus pomáhá snížit opakovaně generované tokeny pro různé úkoly. Výsledky hodnocení veřejně dostupných datových sad strojového překladu a generování reakcí ukazují efektivitu našeho návrhu.', 'sq': 'Modelet e kodifikuesit janë përdorur zakonisht për shumë detyra të tilla si përkthimi i makinave dhe gjenerimi i përgjigjeve. Siç raportoi kërkimi i mëparshëm, këto modele vuajnë nga krijimi i përsëritjeve të tepërta. In this research, we propose a new mechanism for encoder-decoder models that estimates the semantic difference of a source sentence before and after being fed into the encoder-decoder model to capture the consistency between two sides.  Ky mekanizëm ndihmon në reduktimin e shenjave të gjeneruara në mënyrë të përsëritur për një shumicë detyrash. Evaluation results on publicly available machine translation and response generation datasets demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposal.', 'ca': "Els models de codificador s'han utilitzat comunament per a moltes tasques, com la traducció automàtica i la generació de resposta. Com va dir la recerca anterior, aquests models pateixen generant repeticions redundants. En aquesta recerca, proposem un nou mecanisme per a models de codificador-decoder que estima la diferència semàntica d'una frase fontal abans i després d'entrar en el model de codificador-decoder per capturar la consistencia entre dos costats. Aquest mecanisme ajuda a reduir les fitxes generades repetidament per una varietat de tasques. Els resultats de l'evaluació dels conjunts de dades de traducció màquina i generació de resposta disponibles demostren l'eficacia de la nostra proposta.", 'hy': 'Կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելները սովորաբար օգտագործվել են շատ խնդիրների համար, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ մեքենայի թարգմանությունը և պատասխանը ստեղծելը: As previous research reported, these models suffer from generating redundant repetition.  Այս հետազոտության մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեխանիզմ կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելների համար, որը գնահատում է աղբյուր նախադասության սեմանտիկ տարբերությունը նախքան և հետո, երբ այն ներառվում է կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելի մեջ, որպեսզի վերցնենք երկու կողմերի միջև կատարվող This mechanism helps reduce repeatedly generated tokens for a variety of tasks.  Արժեքի արդյունքները հանրային հասանելի մեքենայի թարգմանման և արձագանքի ստեղծման տվյալների համակարգերի վրա ցույց են տալիս մեր առաջարկության արդյունավետությունը:', 'et': 'Kodeerija-dekooder mudeleid on tavaliselt kasutatud paljude ülesannete jaoks, nagu masintõlke ja vastuse genereerimine. Nagu varasemad uuringud teatasid, kannatavad need mudelid liigse korduse tekitamise tõttu. Selles uurimistöös pakume välja kodeerija-dekooderi mudelite uus mehhanism, mis hindab lähtelause semantilist erinevust enne ja pärast kodeerija-dekooderi mudeli sisestamist, et jäädvustada kahe poole vaheline sidusus. See mehhanism aitab vähendada mitmesuguste ülesannete korduvalt genereeritud tokeneid. Avalikult kättesaadavate masintõlke ja vastuste genereerimise andmekogumite hindamistulemused näitavad meie ettepaneku tõhusust.', 'fi': 'Kooderi-dekooderimalleja on käytetty yleisesti monissa tehtävissä, kuten konekäännöksessä ja vastausten tuottamisessa. Kuten aiemmissa tutkimuksissa on raportoitu, nämä mallit kärsivät tarpeettoman toiston tuottamisesta. Tässä tutkimuksessa ehdotamme uutta mekanismia kooderi-dekooderimalleille, joka arvioi lähdelauseen semanttisen eron ennen ja jälkeen syöttämistä kooderi-dekooderimalliin saadakseen selville kahden puolen välisen johdonmukaisuuden. Tämä mekanismi auttaa vähentämään toistuvasti luotuja poletteja erilaisiin tehtäviin. Julkisesti saatavilla olevien konekäännös- ja vastausaineistojen arviointitulokset osoittavat ehdotuksemme tehokkuuden.', 'jv': 'File Awak dhéwé éntuk mulai, kuwi model kuwi iki dadi ngono nggawe gerakan sing apik. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita unêmên sistem anyar kanggo model koder Mehanis iki dadi nggunggo ngerewanggo token kanggo kalaha operasi banget Tarjamahan kang dipunangé kapan pangan anyar tentang karo perusahaan lan dataGenerasi responsa sing bisalahan nggambar efekat kanggo nyebah awak dhéwé', 'ha': "An yi amfani da misãlai na kode-koda wa masu yawa wa aikin misãlai masu fassarar zane da kuma tsari. Kamar da research na gabãni ya faɗi, waɗannan misãlai za'a cũtar ka ƙara da rabo. In this research, we propose a new mechanism for encoder-decoder models that estimates the semantic difference of a source sentence before and after being fed into the encoder-decoder model to capture the consistency between two sides.  Wannan aminci yana taimakon ya ƙara ƙara alama wanda aka ƙididdige wa wasu aikin dabam-daba. Kanamatarwa ta nuna fassarar zane da zane-zane da zane-zane-zane da zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane", 'sk': 'Modeli kodiranja in dekodiranja so se pogosto uporabljali za številne naloge, kot so strojno prevajanje in ustvarjanje odzivov. Kot so poročali prejšnje raziskave, ti modeli trpijo zaradi ustvarjanja odvečnega ponavljanja. V raziskavi predlagamo nov mehanizem za modele kodirnika-dekoderja, ki ocenjuje semantično razliko izvornega stavka pred in po vnosu v model kodirnika-dekoderja, da bi zajeli doslednost med obema stranema. Ta mehanizem pomaga zmanjšati večkrat ustvarjene žetone za različna opravila. Rezultati ocenjevanja javno dostopnih naborov podatkov o strojnem prevajanju in ustvarjanju odzivov kažejo učinkovitost našega predloga.', 'he': 'דוגמנים של קודד-קידור השתמשו בדרך כלל למשימות רבות כמו תרגום מכונות ודור תגובה. כפי שהמחקר הקודם דיווח, הדוגמנים האלה סובלים מליוצרים חזרות מוגזמות. במחקר הזה, אנו מציעים מנגנון חדש למודלים של קודד-קודד שמעריך את ההבדל הסמנטי של משפט מקור לפני ואחרי שנאכיל למודל של קודד-קודד כדי לתפוס את התקבילות בין שני צדדים. המנגנון הזה עוזר להפחית סימנים שנוצרים שוב ושוב למגוון משימות. תוצאות הערכה על קבוצות נתונים של תרגום מכונות ותגובה זמינות לציבור מראים את היעילות של הצעה שלנו.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་གསང་ཨང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རྩིས་པ་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཚར་བ། སྔོན་གྱི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་སྐབས་བརྗོད་བྱས་ན། མིག་དཔེ་འདི་དག་ནི་བསྐྱར འུ་ཅག་གིས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་འདི་ནང་དུ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ་དེ་རྐྱེན་འདྲེན་གྱི་སྔོན་དང་། གསལ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྗེས་སུ་ཕན་ཚུན་མ ཐབས་ལམ་འདིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་བྱས་པར་རྗེས་བསྐྱེད་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་སྟངས་སྣ་ཚོགས་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཉར་གཏོང་། མི་མང'}
{'en': 'Delexicalized Cross-lingual Dependency Parsing for Xibe', 'ar': 'تحليل التبعية عبر اللغات Delexicalized لـ Xibe', 'es': 'Análisis de dependencias multilingüe delicalizado para Xibe', 'fr': 'Analyse de dépendance multilingue délexicalisée pour Xibe', 'pt': 'Análise de dependência multilíngue deslexicalizada para Xibe', 'zh': '用 Xibe 者 Delexicalized 跨语赖解析', 'ja': 'Xibeのためのデレクシカルなクロスリンガル依存関係解析', 'ru': 'Делексикализованный кросс-лингвистический анализ зависимости для Xibe', 'hi': 'Xibe के लिए Delexicalized क्रॉस-भाषाई निर्भरता पार्सिंग', 'ga': 'Parsáil Spleáchais Thrastheangach le haghaidh Xibe', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Απεξαξιοποιημένη ανάλυση διασταυρούμενης εξάρτησης για το Xibe', 'hu': 'Delexikalizált többnyelvű függőségi értelmezés Xibe-hez', 'kk': 'Name', 'it': 'Analisi di dipendenza multilingue delessicalizzata per Xibe', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Deleksilizuotas tarpkalbinis priklausomybės vertinimas Xibe', 'ms': 'Penghuraian Dependensi Selasa-Bahasa Didelegasikan untuk Xibe', 'ml': 'ജിബിന്റെ പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്കില്\u200d ആശ്രയിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Analiżi ta’ Dipendenza Cross-lingwistika Delessizzata għal Xibe', 'mn': 'Дэлексиксик хэлний олон хамааралтай байдлыг Xibe-д хуулбарлах', 'no': 'Deleksisert krysspråk avhengighetstolking for Xibe', 'pl': 'Deleksykalizowane parowanie zależności między językami dla Xibe', 'sr': 'Deleksikalizirano razmatranje preko jezika zavisnosti za Xibe', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Xibe baaritaanka ku xiran ee iskuulka luqada', 'ro': 'Interpretarea dependenței interlingvistice delexicalizată pentru Xibe', 'ur': 'Name', 'sv': 'Delexikaliserad tvärspråkig beroendetolkning för Xibe', 'ta': 'கிராஸ்- மொழி சார்ந்த சார்ந்த பாசிங்க் நீக்கப்பட்டது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Xoá chế độ chứa ngôn ngữ rộng', 'da': 'Deleksiseret tværsproget afhængighedsanalyse for Xibe', 'hr': 'Deleksikalizirano razmatranje preko jezika zavisnosti za Xibe', 'id': 'Analisasi Dependensi Selata Bahasa Deleksialisasi untuk Xibe', 'nl': 'Delexicaliseerde cross-lingual afhankelijkheidsparsing voor Xibe', 'bg': 'Делексикализирано междуезично анализиране на зависимостта за Xibe', 'de': 'Delexikalized Cross-lingual Dependency Parsing für Xibe', 'fa': 'وابستگی\u200cهای مختلف زبان پاک\u200cسازی برای Xibe', 'sw': 'Kuchapisha Uhuru wa lugha-lugha inayoondolewa kwa ajili ya Xibe', 'tr': '횉yky힊', 'af': 'Deleksikasiseerde kruistale afhanklikheid verwerking vir Xibe', 'sq': 'Analizimi i Dependencës Ndërgjuhësore të Deleksifikuar për Xibe', 'am': 'undo-type', 'az': 'Xüsusiyyətli Xüsusiyyətli Xüsusiyyətli bağlılıq analizi Xibe üçün', 'bn': 'জিবের জন্য মুছে ফেলা ক্রস-ভাষার নির্ভরিত পার্সিং', 'ca': 'Analització de Dependencies Translingües Delexicalitzada per Xibe', 'hy': 'Comment', 'cs': 'Delexikalizované parsování závislosti mezi jazyky pro Xibe', 'bs': 'Deleksikalizirano razmatranje krstojezičke zavisnosti za Xibe', 'fi': 'Deleksikalisoitu kielienvälinen riippuvuuden analysointi Xibe:lle', 'et': 'Deleksikaliseeritud keeleülese sõltuvuse parsimine Xibe jaoks', 'ko': '시베족의 비어휘화 다중 언어 의존 분석', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Dijelokake Ketokisan Yusri Langan Ketokisan kanggo Sibe', 'he': 'מחקר תלויות דרך שפתיים דלקסיקלי עבור Xibe', 'sk': 'Deleksikalizirano razčlenjenje medjezične odvisnosti za Xibe', 'bo': 'བསུབ་པ་ཡིན་མིན་པའི་ཚོབ་གཞུང་གི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་ལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Manually annotating a treebank is time-consuming and labor-intensive. We conduct delexicalized cross-lingual dependency parsing experiments, where we train the parser on one language and test on our target language. As our test case, we use Xibe, a severely under-resourced Tungusic language. We assume that choosing a closely related language as the source language will provide better results than more distant relatives. However, it is not clear how to determine those closely related languages. We investigate three different methods : choosing the typologically closest language, using LangRank, and choosing the most similar language based on perplexity. We train parsing models on the selected languages using UDify and test on different genres of Xibe data. The results show that languages selected based on typology and perplexity scores outperform those predicted by LangRank ; Japanese is the optimal source language. In determining the source language, proximity to the target language is more important than large training sizes. Parsing is also influenced by genre differences, but they have little influence as long as the training data is at least as complex as the target.', 'pt': 'Anotar manualmente um banco de árvores é demorado e trabalhoso. Conduzimos experimentos de análise de dependência multilíngue deslexicalizada, onde treinamos o analisador em um idioma e testamos em nosso idioma de destino. Como nosso caso de teste, usamos Xibe, uma linguagem Tungusic com poucos recursos. Assumimos que a escolha de um idioma intimamente relacionado como idioma de origem fornecerá melhores resultados do que parentes mais distantes. No entanto, não está claro como determinar esses idiomas intimamente relacionados. Investigamos três métodos diferentes: escolher a linguagem tipologicamente mais próxima, usando LangRank, e escolher a linguagem mais semelhante com base na perplexidade. Treinamos modelos de análise nas linguagens selecionadas usando UDify e testamos em diferentes gêneros de dados Xibe. Os resultados mostram que os idiomas selecionados com base na tipologia e nos escores de perplexidade superam os previstos pelo LangRank; Japonês é o idioma de origem ideal. Ao determinar o idioma de origem, a proximidade com o idioma de destino é mais importante do que grandes tamanhos de treinamento. A análise também é influenciada por diferenças de gênero, mas elas têm pouca influência desde que os dados de treinamento sejam pelo menos tão complexos quanto o destino.', 'fr': "L'annotation manuelle d'une banque d'arbres demande beaucoup de temps et de main-d'œuvre. Nous menons des expériences délexicalisées d'analyse de dépendance interlinguale, dans lesquelles nous formons l'analyseur sur une langue et nous testons sur notre langue cible. Comme scénario de test, nous utilisons le xibe, une langue tungusique gravement sous-financée. Nous supposons que le choix d'une langue étroitement apparentée comme langue source donnera de meilleurs résultats que des parents plus éloignés. Cependant, il n'est pas clair comment déterminer ces langues étroitement liées. Nous étudions trois méthodes différentes\xa0: choisir la langue typologiquement la plus proche, utiliser Langrank, et choisir la langue la plus similaire en fonction de la perplexité. Nous formons des modèles d'analyse sur les langues sélectionnées à l'aide d'UDify et testons différents genres de données Xibe. Les résultats montrent que les langues sélectionnées sur la base de la typologie et des scores de perplexité surpassent celles prévues par Langrank\xa0; le japonais est la langue source optimale. Pour déterminer la langue source, la proximité de la langue cible est plus importante que les formations de grande taille. L'analyse est également influencée par les différences de genre, mais elles ont peu d'influence tant que les données d'entraînement sont au moins aussi complexes que la cible.", 'ar': 'إن إجراء التعليقات التوضيحية على بنك الشجرة يدويًا يستغرق وقتًا طويلاً ويتطلب عمالة مكثفة. نجري تجارب تحليل تبعية غير لغوية ، حيث نقوم بتدريب المحلل اللغوي على لغة واحدة واختبار لغتنا المستهدفة. كحالة اختبارية لدينا ، نستخدم لغة Xibe ، وهي لغة تنغوسية تعاني من نقص شديد في الموارد. نفترض أن اختيار لغة وثيقة الصلة كلغة مصدر سيوفر نتائج أفضل من الأقارب البعيدين. ومع ذلك ، ليس من الواضح كيفية تحديد تلك اللغات وثيقة الصلة. نحن نبحث في ثلاث طرق مختلفة: اختيار اللغة الأقرب من الناحية النمطية ، واستخدام LangRank ، واختيار اللغة الأكثر تشابهًا على أساس الحيرة. نقوم بتدريب نماذج الإعراب على اللغات المحددة باستخدام UDify واختبار أنواع مختلفة من بيانات Xibe. تظهر النتائج أن اللغات المختارة بناءً على درجات التصنيف والحيرة تتفوق في الأداء على تلك التي تنبأ بها LangRank ؛ اليابانية هي لغة المصدر المثلى. عند تحديد اللغة المصدر ، يعتبر القرب من اللغة المستهدفة أكثر أهمية من أحجام التدريب الكبيرة. يتأثر الإعراب أيضًا بالاختلافات في النوع ، لكن تأثيرها ضئيل طالما أن بيانات التدريب معقدة مثل الهدف على الأقل.', 'es': 'Anotar manualmente un banco de árboles lleva mucho tiempo y trabajo. Llevamos a cabo experimentos delicados de análisis de dependencias multilingües, en los que entrenamos al analizador en un idioma y realizamos pruebas en nuestro idioma de destino. Como nuestro caso de prueba, utilizamos el xibe, un idioma tungusic con muy pocos recursos. Suponemos que la elección de un idioma estrechamente relacionado como idioma de origen proporcionará mejores resultados que los parientes más lejanos. Sin embargo, no está claro cómo determinar esos idiomas estrechamente relacionados. Investigamos tres métodos diferentes: elegir el idioma más cercano tipológicamente, usar LangRank y elegir el idioma más similar en función de la perplejidad. Entrenamos modelos de análisis en los idiomas seleccionados usando UDify y probamos en diferentes géneros de datos de Xibe. Los resultados muestran que los idiomas seleccionados en función de la tipología y las puntuaciones de perplejidad superan a los pronosticados por LangRank; el japonés es el idioma de origen óptimo. Para determinar el idioma de origen, la proximidad al idioma de destino es más importante que los entrenamientos de gran tamaño. El análisis también está influenciado por las diferencias de género, pero tienen poca influencia siempre que los datos de entrenamiento sean al menos tan complejos como el objetivo.', 'hi': 'मैन्युअल रूप से एक treebank annotating समय लेने वाली और श्रम-गहन है. हम delexicalized क्रॉस-लिंगुअल निर्भरता पार्सिंग प्रयोगों का संचालन करते हैं, जहां हम एक भाषा पर पार्सर को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं और हमारी लक्षित भाषा पर परीक्षण करते हैं। हमारे परीक्षण के मामले के रूप में, हम Xibe का उपयोग करते हैं, जो एक गंभीर रूप से कम संसाधन वाली Tungusic भाषा है। हम मानते हैं कि स्रोत भाषा के रूप में एक निकटता से संबंधित भाषा का चयन अधिक दूर के रिश्तेदारों की तुलना में बेहतर परिणाम प्रदान करेगा। हालांकि, यह स्पष्ट नहीं है कि उन निकटता से संबंधित भाषाओं को कैसे निर्धारित किया जाए। हम तीन अलग-अलग तरीकों की जांच करते हैं: टाइपोलॉजिकल रूप से निकटतम भाषा चुनना, लैंगरैंक का उपयोग करना, और उलझन के आधार पर सबसे समान भाषा चुनना। हम UDify का उपयोग करके चयनित भाषाओं पर पार्सिंग मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं और Xibe डेटा की विभिन्न शैलियों पर परीक्षण करते हैं। परिणामों से पता चलता है कि टाइपोलॉजी और उलझन स्कोर के आधार पर चयनित भाषाएं लैंगरैंक द्वारा भविष्यवाणी की गई उन लोगों से बेहतर हैं; जापानी इष्टतम स्रोत भाषा है। स्रोत भाषा का निर्धारण करने में, लक्ष्य भाषा की निकटता बड़े प्रशिक्षण आकारों की तुलना में अधिक महत्वपूर्ण है। पार्सिंग भी शैली के मतभेदों से प्रभावित होता है, लेकिन जब तक प्रशिक्षण डेटा लक्ष्य के रूप में कम से कम जटिल होता है, तब तक उनका बहुत कम प्रभाव पड़ता है।', 'ru': 'Ручное аннотирование берега деревьев является трудоемким и трудоемким процессом. Мы проводим делексикализованные эксперименты по разбору кросс-лингвистических зависимостей, где обучаем парсер на одном языке и тестируем на нашем целевом языке. В качестве нашего тестового примера мы используем Xibe, сильно не обеспеченный ресурсами тунгусский язык. Мы предполагаем, что выбор близкого родственного языка в качестве исходного языка даст лучшие результаты, чем более отдаленные родственники. Однако неясно, как определить эти тесно связанные между собой языки. Мы исследуем три различных метода: выбор типологически наиболее близкого языка, использование LangRank и выбор наиболее сходного языка на основе недоумения. Мы обучаем модели синтаксического анализа на выбранных языках с помощью UDify и тестируем на различных жанрах данных Xibe. Результаты показывают, что языки, выбранные на основе типологии и баллов недоумения, превосходят языки, предсказанные LangRank; японский язык является оптимальным исходным языком. При определении исходного языка близость к целевому языку важнее, чем большие размеры обучения. На синтаксический анализ также влияют жанровые различия, но они мало влияют, пока данные обучения по крайней мере так же сложны, как и цель.', 'zh': '手动注树库既耗时又费力。 去中心化跨语依赖性解析实验,练解析器于一言,试之于言。 为我试用例,我用Xibe,一资严重不足之通古斯语。 我们假设选择一种密相关的话为源头言语将比更远的亲戚。 然尚未详所以定其密语。 臣等考其三术:择类学上近言,用LangRank,及以困惑择最相似之言。 以 UDify 训解析,试之 Xibe 数。 结果表明,以类型学惑度分数言优于LangRank占。 日语最佳源语。 其定源言语,与语言相近,较大练规模为重。 解析亦染于流异,但练数少与趋向同,则几无影响力。', 'ja': 'ツリーバンクに手動で注釈を付けるのは時間と手間がかかる。 私たちは、1つの言語で構文解析器を訓練し、ターゲット言語でテストする、非複雑化されたクロスリンガル依存性構文解析実験を行います。 私たちのテストケースとして、資源が非常に不足しているツングース語であるXibeを使用しています。 私たちは、ソース言語として密接に関連する言語を選択することは、より遠い親戚よりも良い結果をもたらすと考えています。 しかし、それらの密接に関連する言語をどのように決定するかは明確ではない。 類型的に最も近い言語を選択し、LangRankを使用し、困惑に基づいて最も類似した言語を選択するという3つの異なる方法を調査します。 UDifyを使用して選択した言語でモデルを解析し、Xibeデータのさまざまなジャンルでテストします。 その結果、類型と困惑スコアに基づいて選択された言語は、LangRankによって予測されたものよりも優れており、日本語が最適なソース言語であることが示されました。 ソース言語を決定する際には、大規模なトレーニングサイズよりも、ターゲット言語に近いことが重要です。 解析はジャンルの違いにも影響されますが、トレーニングデータが少なくともターゲットと同じくらい複雑である限り、影響はほとんどありません。', 'ga': 'Tógann sé am agus diansaothrú ar bhruach crann de láimh. Déanaimid turgnaimh pharsála spleáchais trasteangacha, áit a gcuirimid oiliúint ar an bparsálaí ar aon teanga amháin agus mar a ndéanaimid tástáil ar ár sprioctheanga. Mar ár gcás tástála, bainimid úsáid as Xibe, teanga Tungusach a bhfuil dóthain acmhainní aici. Glacaimid leis má roghnaítear teanga atá dlúthghaolmhar mar theanga fhoinseach go mbeidh torthaí níos fearr ar fáil ná ar ghaolta níos faide i gcéin. Mar sin féin, níl sé soiléir conas na teangacha sin a bhfuil dlúthbhaint acu leo a chinneadh. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar thrí mhodh dhifriúla: an teanga is gaire don tíopeolaíocht a roghnú, LangRank a úsáid, agus an teanga is cosúla a roghnú bunaithe ar imtharraingt. Déanaimid oiliúint ar mhúnlaí parsála ar na teangacha roghnaithe trí úsáid a bhaint as UDify agus déanaimid tástáil ar sheánraí éagsúla sonraí Xibe. Léiríonn na torthaí go sáraíonn na teangacha a roghnaítear bunaithe ar thíopeolaíocht agus scóir na himní na cinn a bhí tuartha ag LangRank; Is í an tSeapáinis an teanga foinse is fearr. Agus an teanga fhoinseach á chinneadh, tá sé níos tábhachtaí ná an méid oiliúna atá gar don sprioctheanga. Bíonn tionchar ag difríochtaí seánra ar pharsáil freisin, ach is beag tionchar a bhíonn acu chomh fada agus a bhíonn na sonraí oiliúna ar a laghad chomh casta leis an sprioc.', 'ka': 'პირდაპირად ატვირთვა საბოლოო საბოლოო საბოლოო და სამუშაო ინტენსტიგურია. ჩვენ დელექსიკურად გავაკეთებთ კრესიკურად მნიშვნელოვანობის გადავწერება ექსპერიმენტები, სადაც ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ პანსერიმენტები ერთი ენაზე და ჩვენი მიზე როგორც ჩვენი ტესტის შემთხვევაში, ჩვენ გამოიყენებთ Xibe, ძალიან სამყარო Tungusic ენაზე. ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ აირჩიეთ ძალიან დაკავშირებული ენაზე, როგორც წიგნის ენაზე უკეთესი შედეგი შედეგი შემდეგი შემდეგი შემდეგი შემდეგი გა მაგრამ არ არის წარმოდგენი, როგორ განსაზღვრება ამ მხოლოდ დაკავშირებული ენების. ჩვენ სამი განსხვავებული მეტოვები გავაკეთებთ: ტიპოლოგიურად უფრო დაბრუნებული ენაზე, LangRank გამოყენებული, და ყველაზე განსხვავებული ენაზე პროპლექტის ბაზეც. ჩვენ მონიშნული ენების მოდელების პანსტირებას UDify და გამოყენებული სხვადასხვა გენერების ტესტირება. წარმოდგენები ჩვენებენ, რომ ტიპოლოგია და პროპლექტის წარმოდგენები LangRank-ის განსაზღვრებული წარმოდგენების გარეშე; იაპონი არის ოპტიმალური მხოლოდ ენაა. სამყარო ენათის განსაზღვრებაში, მისაღების ენათის დაკვეთობა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, ვიდრე დიდი სამყარო ზომაზე. პასუხის განსხვავებას ასევე იქნება გენერის განსხვავებას, მაგრამ ისინი არ აქვს ცოტა ინფორმაცია, თუმცა განსხვავებული მონაცემები უფრო კომპლექსია, რო', 'el': 'Το χειροκίνητο σχολιασμό μιας τράπεζας δέντρων είναι χρονοβόρο και εργατικό. Διεξάγουμε πειράματα ανάλυσης διγλωσσίας εξάρτησης, όπου εκπαιδεύουμε τον αναλυτή σε μια γλώσσα και δοκιμάζουμε στη γλώσσα-στόχο μας. Ως δοκιμαστική μας περίπτωση, χρησιμοποιούμε Xibe, μια πολύ φτωχή γλώσσα Τουνγκουσικών. Υποθέτουμε ότι η επιλογή μιας συγγενικής γλώσσας ως γλώσσας προέλευσης θα προσφέρει καλύτερα αποτελέσματα από τους πιο μακρινούς συγγενείς. Ωστόσο, δεν είναι σαφές πώς να προσδιοριστούν αυτές οι στενά συνδεδεμένες γλώσσες. Ερευνούμε τρεις διαφορετικές μεθόδους: την επιλογή της τυπολογικά πλησιέστερης γλώσσας, χρησιμοποιώντας το και την επιλογή της πιο όμοιας γλώσσας με βάση την σύγχυση. Εκπαιδεύουμε μοντέλα ανάλυσης στις επιλεγμένες γλώσσες χρησιμοποιώντας και δοκιμάζουμε σε διαφορετικά είδη δεδομένων. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι οι γλώσσες που επιλέγονται με βάση την τυπολογία και τις βαθμολογίες σύγχυσης ξεπερνούν αυτές που προβλέπονται από το LangRank. Τα ιαπωνικά είναι η βέλτιστη γλώσσα προέλευσης. Για τον προσδιορισμό της γλώσσας προέλευσης, η εγγύτητα στη γλώσσα-στόχο είναι πιο σημαντική από τα μεγάλα μεγέθη κατάρτισης. Η ανάλυση επηρεάζεται επίσης από τις διαφορές των ειδών, αλλά έχουν μικρή επιρροή εφόσον τα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης είναι τουλάχιστον τόσο πολύπλοκα όσο ο στόχος.', 'hu': 'A fák kézi jegyzetelése időigényes és munkaigényes. Delexikalizált, többnyelvű függőség elemzési kísérleteket végezünk, ahol az elemzőt egy nyelven képezzük és teszteljük célnyelvünket. Vizsgálatunként a Xibe-t használjuk, egy súlyosan kevés forrásokkal rendelkező tunguzikus nyelvet. Feltételezzük, hogy a szorosan rokon nyelv forrásnyelvként való kiválasztása jobb eredményeket fog eredményezni, mint a távoli rokonok. Nem világos azonban, hogyan lehet meghatározni ezeket a szorosan rokon nyelveket. Három különböző módszert vizsgálunk: a tipológiailag legközelebbi nyelv kiválasztása, a LangRank használata és a leghasonlóbb nyelv kiválasztása a zavarosság alapján. A kiválasztott nyelveken képzünk elemzési modelleket UDify segítségével, és különböző Xibe adatokat tesztelünk. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a tipológia és a zavarossági pontszámok alapján kiválasztott nyelvek meghaladják a LangRank által előrejelzetteket; A japán az optimális forrásnyelv. A forrásnyelv meghatározása során a célnyelvhez való közelség fontosabb, mint a nagy képzési méretek. Az értelmezést a műfaji különbségek is befolyásolják, de kevés hatásuk van mindaddig, amíg az edzési adatok legalább olyan összetettek, mint a cél.', 'kk': 'Қолмен жаңалық сызығын түсіндіру - уақыт пайдалану және жұмыс қатынасы. Біз делегсикалық тілдер тәуелдігін талдау тәжірибелерін жасап, оларды бір тілде талдап, мақсатты тілімізге сынап береміз. Біздің сынақтарымыз сияқты Тунгус тіліне көп көмектесетін Xibe қолданамыз. Біз жақын тілді таңдау үшін көпшілік тілді көпшілікті қашықтағылардан артық нәтижелерді көрсетеді деп ойлаймыз. Бірақ оның жақын тілдерін қалай анықтауға болмайды. Біз үш түрлі әдістерді зерттеп, типтологиялық ең жақын тілді таңдап, LangRank қолданатын және қарапайым тілді таңдау. Біз таңдалған тілдер үлгілерін UDify және Xibe деректерінің түрлі жанрларын тексеріп талдау үлгілерін үйрендік. Нәтижелер таңдалған тілдер типтология және қарапайым нәтижелеріне негізделген тілдер LangRank таңдалған тілдеріне артық болады. Жапон - оптимал көзі тілді. Бастапқы тілді анықтау үшін, мақсатты тілдің жақындағы көп оқыту өлшемінен артық. Тапсырма және жанрлық айырмашылықтардан әсер етеді, бірақ олардың оқыту деректері кемінде мақсатты сияқты тәжірибеге жеткілікті.', 'it': "L'annotazione manuale di un albero richiede tempo e manodopera. Conduciamo esperimenti delessicalizzati di analisi delle dipendenze cross-lingual, dove addestriamo il parser su una lingua e testiamo sulla nostra lingua di destinazione. Come nostro caso di prova, usiamo Xibe, un linguaggio tungusico gravemente poco dotato di risorse. Supponiamo che la scelta di una lingua strettamente correlata come lingua di origine fornirà risultati migliori rispetto ai parenti più lontani. Tuttavia, non è chiaro come determinare tali lingue strettamente correlate. Investighiamo tre diversi metodi: scegliere la lingua tipologicamente più vicina, utilizzare LangRank e scegliere la lingua più simile in base alla perplessità. Formiamo modelli di analisi sulle lingue selezionate utilizzando UDify e testiamo su diversi generi di dati Xibe. I risultati mostrano che le lingue selezionate in base ai punteggi di tipologia e perplessità superano quelle previste da LangRank; Il giapponese è la lingua di partenza ottimale. Per determinare la lingua di origine, la vicinanza alla lingua di destinazione è più importante di grandi dimensioni di formazione. Anche il parsing è influenzato dalle differenze di genere, ma hanno poca influenza fintanto che i dati di allenamento sono almeno altrettanto complessi del target.", 'lt': 'Rankiai užrašyti medžio ranką reikia laiko ir daug darbo. Mes atliekame deleksilizuotus tarpkalbinio priklausomybės analizavimo eksperimentus, kuriuose mokome analizatorių viena kalba ir bandome tikslinę kalbą. Mūsų bandymo atveju mes naudojame Xibe, labai nepakankamai išteklių turinčią kalbą. Manome, kad pasirinkus glaudžiai susijusią kalbą kaip pradinę kalbą bus pasiekti geresni rezultatai nei tolimesni giminaičiai. Tačiau neaišku, kaip nustatyti šias glaudžiai susijusias kalbas. Mes tiriame tris skirtingus metodus: pasirinkti tipologiškai artimiausią kalbą, naudoti LangRank ir pasirinkti panašiausią kalbą remiantis perpleksija. We train parsing models on the selected languages using UDify and test on different genres of Xibe data.  Rezultatai rodo, kad pasirinktos kalbos, pagrįstos tipologija ir perpleksijos rezultatais, viršija LangRank prognozuojamas kalbas; Japoniška yra optimali šaltinio kalba. Nustatant pradinę kalbą, artimumas tikslinei kalbai yra svarbesnis nei dideli mokymo dydžiai. Lyčių skirtumai taip pat daro įtaką analizavimui, tačiau jie nedaro įtakos, kol mokymo duomenys yra bent jau toks sudėtingi kaip tikslas.', 'mk': 'Рачно анотирање на дрвената лента е потребно време и напорно. Правиме делексикализирани експерименти за анализирање на меѓујазичната зависност, каде што го обучуваме анализаторот на еден јазик и тестираме на нашиот јазик на метата. Како наш тестирачки случај, користиме Кјиб, јазик на тунгуски јазик. Претпоставуваме дека изборот на блиски поврзан јазик како изворен јазик ќе обезбеди подобри резултати отколку подалеку роднини. Сепак, не е јасно како да се одредат тие блиски поврзани јазици. Истражуваме три различни методи: избирање на најблискиот типологички јазик, користење на LangRank, и избирање на најсличен јазик базиран на збунетост. Тренираме анализирање на модели на избраните јазици користејќи UDify и тестирање на различни генери на Xibe податоци. The results show that languages selected based on typology and perplexity scores outperform those predicted by LangRank;  Japanese is the optimal source language.  Во одредувањето на изворниот јазик, близината до јазикот на целта е поважна од големите големини на обука. Исто така, анализирањето е влијано и на разликите во генерот, но тие имаат мало влијание сé додека податоците за обука се барем толку комплексни како целта.', 'ms': 'Menganotasi pangkalan pokok secara manual adalah memakan masa dan kerja-intensiv. Kami melakukan eksperimen penghuraian dependensi saling bahasa, di mana kami melatih penghuraian pada satu bahasa dan menguji pada bahasa sasaran kami. Sebagai kes ujian kami, kami menggunakan Xibe, bahasa Tungusic yang sangat kurang sumber. Kami menganggap bahawa memilih bahasa yang berkaitan rapat sebagai bahasa sumber akan memberikan keputusan yang lebih baik daripada kerabat yang lebih jauh. Namun, tidak jelas bagaimana untuk menentukan bahasa yang berkaitan rapat. Kami menyelidiki tiga kaedah yang berbeza: memilih bahasa yang paling dekat secara tipologi, menggunakan LangRank, dan memilih bahasa yang paling sama berdasarkan kekacauan. Kami melatih penghuraian model pada bahasa yang dipilih menggunakan UDify dan menguji pada jenis data Xibe yang berbeza. Keputusan menunjukkan bahasa yang dipilih berdasarkan skor tipologi dan kekacauan melebihi yang dijangka oleh LangRank; Bahasa Jepun adalah bahasa sumber optimal. Dalam menentukan bahasa sumber, kedekatan bahasa sasaran lebih penting daripada saiz latihan besar. Menghurai juga dipengaruhi oleh perbezaan jenis, tetapi mereka mempunyai sedikit pengaruh selama data latihan sekurang-kurangnya sama kompleks seperti sasaran.', 'ml': 'ഒരു ട്രീബാങ്കിനെ കൈകാര്യമായി വിഷമിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് സമയം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതും ജോലിക്കുന്നതുമാണ്. നമ്മള്\u200d ഡെക്സിക്സിക്കേഷന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്ന ക്രിസ്ലാങ്കുല്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. അവിടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഭാഷയി നമ്മുടെ ടെസ്റ്റ് കേസ് പോലെ, നമ്മള്\u200d സൈബിനെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വിഭവപ്പെട്ട ട ടുങ്കുസിക്ക് ഭാഷ നമ്മള്\u200d കരുതുന്നു, അടുത്ത് ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഭാഷ വിദൂരബന്ധുക്കളെക്ക However, it is not clear how to determine those closely related languages.  നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികളെ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു: സാധാരണ അടുത്ത ഭാഷ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് ലാങ്ങ് റാങ്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത ഞങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശീലനം ചെയ്യുന്നു. യുഡിഫി ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വ്യത്യസ് അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ലാങ്ങ്രാങ്കിന്റെ പ്രത്യേകിച്ചതിനെക്കാള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത ഭാഷകള്\u200d ടൈപ്പോളജ ജപ്പാനീസ് സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഭാഷ ആണ്. ഉറവിട ഭാഷ തീരുമാനിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള അടുത്ത സാമീപ്യം വലിയ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വലിപ്പം പ് പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നത് ജനം വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളാലും പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യം പോലെ കുറഞ്ഞത്', 'mt': "L-annotazzjoni manwali ta’ bank tas-siġar tieħu ħafna ħin u teħtieġ ħafna xogħol. Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti ta' analizzazzjoni tad-dipendenza translingwistika ddelikċjalizzati, fejn aħna nħarrġu l-analizzatur b'lingwa waħda u nħarrġu l-lingwa fil-mira tagħna. As our test case, we use Xibe, a severely under-resourced Tungusic language.  Aħna nassumu li l-għa żla ta’ lingwa relatata mill-qrib bħala l-lingwa tas-sors se tipprovdi riżultati aħjar minn qraba aktar distanti. Madankollu, mhuwiex ċar kif jiġu ddeterminati dawk il-lingwi relatati mill-qrib. Investigaw tliet metodi differenti: l-għażla tal-lingwa l-eqreb tipikament, l-użu ta’ LangRank, u l-għażla tal-lingwa l-aktar simili bbażata fuq il-perplessità. Aħna nħarrġu mudelli ta’ analiżi fuq il-lingwi magħżula bl-użu ta’ UDify u ntestjaw fuq ġeneri differenti ta’ dejta Xibe. Ir-riżultati juru li l-lingwi magħżula bbażati fuq il-punteġġi tat-tipoloġija u tal-perplessità jaqbżu dawk imbassra minn LangRank; Il-Ġappuniż huwa l-aħjar lingwa tas-sors. Fid-determinazzjoni tal-lingwa tas-sors, il-viċinanza mal-lingwa fil-mira hija aktar importanti minn daqsijiet kbar ta’ taħriġ. L-analiżi hija influwenzata wkoll mid-differenzi fil-ġeneru, iżda ftit li xejn għandhom influwenza sakemm id-dejta tat-taħriġ tkun mill-inqas kumplessa daqs il-mira.", 'mn': 'Гарван салбарыг гараараа анзаарах нь цаг хугацаанд хэрэглэж, ажиллах хүчтэй. Бид хэлний олон хэлний хамааралтай хамааралтай байдлыг хуваалцах туршилтыг хийдэг. Тэнд бид хуваалцагчийг нэг хэл дээр суралцаж, зориулагдсан хэл дээр шалгана. Бидний шалгалтын тохиолдолд бид Цибег хэрэглэдэг. Бид ойролцоогоор холбоотой хэл сонгох нь эх үүсвэрийн хэл нь илүү хоорондын харьцаатаас илүү сайн үр дүнг гаргах болно гэж боддог. Гэхдээ ойролцоогоор холбоотой хэлнүүдийг хэрхэн тодорхойлох нь тодорхой биш. Бид гурван төрлийн арга судалгаа хийдэг: хэлбэрийн хамгийн ойрхон хэл сонгож, LangRank ашиглаж, хамгийн ижил хэл сонгож, гүйцэтгэл дээр үндсэн. Бид сонгогдсон хэл дээр UDify болон Xibe өгөгдлийн өөр жанрлуудыг шалгаж суралцаж өгдөг. Үүний үр дүнд хэл нь хэлбэрээр сонгогдсон хэл нь LangRank-ын таамагласан хэлбэрээс илүүтэй байдаг. Япон бол эерэг эх үүсвэрийн хэл. Хэрэв эх үүсвэрийн хэл тодорхойлохын тулд, зорилготой хэл дээр ойртох нь том сургалтын хэмжээс илүү чухал. Тайлбарлах нь зэрэг төрлийн ялгаатай нөлөөлдөг. Гэхдээ тэд бага нөлөөлдөг.', 'pl': 'Ręczne adnotacje drzewa są czasochłonne i pracochłonne. Prowadzimy deleksykalizowane eksperymenty parsowania zależności między językami, w których trenujemy parser na jednym języku i testujemy na naszym języku docelowym. Jako nasz przypadek testowy używamy Xibe, znacznie niewyposażonego języka tunguzycznego. Zakładamy, że wybór języka źródłowego ściśle pokrewnego jako języka źródłowego zapewni lepsze rezultaty niż bardziej odległych krewnych. Nie jest jednak jasne, jak określić te blisko powiązane języki. Badamy trzy różne metody: wybór najbliższego typologicznie języka, używanie LangRank oraz wybór najbardziej podobnego języka w oparciu o zdezorientowanie. Trenujemy modele parsowania na wybranych językach za pomocą UDify i testujemy na różnych gatunkach danych Xibe. Wyniki pokazują, że języki wybrane w oparciu o typologię i wyniki zdezorientowania przewyższają te przewidywane przez LangRank; Japoński jest optymalnym językiem źródłowym. W określaniu języka źródłowego bliskość języka docelowego jest ważniejsza niż duża wielkość szkoleń. Na analizę wpływają również różnice gatunkowe, ale mają one niewielki wpływ, o ile dane treningowe są co najmniej tak złożone, jak cel.', 'no': 'Manuelt oppmerking av ei treebank er tidsbruk og arbeidintensiv. Vi gjer deleksiserte krysspråk avhengighetseksperimenter, der vi treng tolkaren på ein språk og testar på målspråket vårt. Som testtilfellet vår, bruker vi Xibe, ein vanskeleg underressursert Tungusisk språk. Vi antar at å velja eit nærare relatert språk som kjeldespråket vil gi bedre resultat enn fleire avstandane. Men det er ikkje klart korleis å bestemme dei nærare relaterte språka. Vi undersøker tre ulike metodar: veljer den typologisk næraste språket, brukar LangRank, og veljer den mest liknande språket basert på perpleksitet. Vi treng tolkingsmodular på dei valde språka med UDify og testar på ulike gener av Xibe-data. Resultatet viser at språk som er valde basert på typologikk og plasseringspoeng utfører dei som er foregått av LangRank. Japansk er den optimale kjeldespråket. For å bestemme kjeldespråket er nærleiken til målspråket viktigere enn stor treningsstorleik. Tolking er også påvirka av generelle forskjeller, men dei har lite påvirkning så lenge opplæringsdata er minst så komplekse som målet.', 'ro': 'Adnotarea manuală a unui brad necesită timp și muncă intensivă. Realizăm experimente delexicalizate de analizare a dependenței între limbi, unde instruim parserul pe o singură limbă și testam pe limba noastră țintă. Ca caz de testare, folosim Xibe, un limbaj tungusic grav insuficient de resurse. Presupunem că alegerea unei limbi strâns legate ca limbă sursă va oferi rezultate mai bune decât rudele mai îndepărtate. Cu toate acestea, nu este clar cum să se determine aceste limbi strâns legate. Investigăm trei metode diferite: alegerea celui mai apropiat limbaj tipologic, folosirea LangRank și alegerea celui mai similar limbaj bazat pe perplexitate. Instruim modele de analizare pe limbile selectate folosind UDify și testăm pe diferite genuri de date Xibe. Rezultatele arată că limbile selectate pe baza scorurilor de tipologie și perplexitate depășesc cele prevăzute de LangRank; Japoneza este limba sursă optimă. În determinarea limbii sursă, apropierea de limba țintă este mai importantă decât dimensiunile mari de formare. Interpretarea este, de asemenea, influențată de diferențele de gen, dar acestea au o influență redusă atâta timp cât datele de antrenament sunt cel puțin la fel de complexe ca ținta.', 'sr': 'Ruèno annotiranje treebana je potrošenje vremena i intenzivno rada. Provodimo eksperimente za analizu deleksikaliziranog preko jezika zavisnosti, gde treniramo analizatora na jednom jeziku i testiramo naš ciljni jezik. Kao naš test slučaj, koristimo Xibe, teško pod resursima Tungusijski jezik. Pretpostavljamo da će izabrati bliski povezan jezik jer izvorni jezik pružiti bolji rezultat nego daleki rođaci. Međutim, nije jasno kako odrediti one bliske jezike. Istražujemo tri različite metode: odabrati najbliži jezik tipološki, koristeći LangRank, i odabrati najsličniji jezik na temelju perpleksije. Naučavamo analizu modela na odabranim jezicima koristeći UDify i testiranje različitih genra Xibe podataka. Rezultati pokazuju da jezici koji su odabrani na temelju tipologije i rezultata kompleksnosti iznose one koje je predviđao LangRank; Japanci je optimalni jezik izvora. U određivanju izvornog jezika, blizina ciljnog jezika je važnija od velikih veličina obuke. Oženjenje takođe utječe na razlike od genre, ali imaju malo uticaja dok je podaci o obuci najmanje kompleksno kao cilj.', 'so': 'Sida horay loogu dhibayo treebanku waa isticmaalka waqtiga la isticmaalayo iyo shaqo aad u badan. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaanka baaritaanka ku xiran luqadaha oo la xiriiray, halkaas oo aynu ku tababarinno baaritaanka ku qoran af kaliya iyo baaritaanka luuqadeena goalka ah. Sida xaaladeena imtixaanka ah xibe, waxaynu isticmaalnaa luqada Tungusiska si adag ugu hooseeya. Waxaynu malaynaynaa in doorashada luuqada aad u dhow leedahay, sababtoo ah luqada asalka ayaa keeni doona resulto ka wanaagsan kuwa ka badan xigaalka fog. However, it is not clear how to determine those closely related languages.  Waxaynu baaraynaa saddex qaabab oo kala duduwan: doorashada luqada ugu dhaw, isticmaalka LangRank, iyo doorashada luqada ugu haboon ee ku saabsan dhibaatada. Tusaalada baaritaanka waxaynu ku tababarinnaa luuqadaha la doortay oo ku isticmaalaya UDify iyo imtixaanka agagaarka xibe oo kala duduwan. Abaalku waxay muuqataa in luqadaha la doortay oo ku saleysan tababar iyo iskuul adag ay soo bandhigaan waxyaabaha la sii sheegay LangRank; Jabanees waa luqada asalka ah. Inta lagu gaaro luqada asalka ah, ku dhowaanshada luqada goalka waa ka muhiim badan yihiin tirada waxbarashada waaweyn. Xittaa baarlamaanka waxaa saameyn ku leh kala duwan jinsiga, laakiin waxay saameyn ku leeyihiin in marka macluumaadka waxbarashadu ay tahay ugu yaraan sida goalku ay u adag tahay.', 'si': 'අත්තර්ගයෙන් බැන්ක් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න තමයි වෙලාව ප්\u200dරවර්තනය සහ ව්\u200dයාපාර කරනවා. අපි ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශාල භාෂාවික විශාල පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, අපි ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශාල කරනවා එක භාෂාවෙන් විශාල අපේ පරීක්ෂණ කේස් විදිහට, අපි Xibe භාවිතා කරනවා, ටුන්ගුසික් භාෂාවක් විශේෂයෙන්. අපි හිතන්නේ ලොකු සම්බන්ධ භාෂයක් තෝරාගන්න ප්\u200dරභාෂ භාෂාවට වඩා දුරස්ථාන සම්බන්ධ වලට වඩා  ඒත් ඒක පැහැදිලි නැහැ කොහොමද ඒවා ලඟ සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවක් තියෙන්නේ කියලා. අපි වෙනස් විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න විදියට තුනක් විදියට: ලැන්ග්\u200dරෑන්ක් භාෂාව තෝරාගන්න, පර්ප්ලෙක්සිට් විදි අපි තෝරාගත භාෂාවට තෝරාගත් භාෂාවට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා UDID සහ Xibe දත්තේ වෙනස් ජනර් පරීක්ෂණය. ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ලංග්\u200dරෑන්ක් වලින් තෝරාගත් භාෂාව සහ පර්ප්ලෙක්සිටි ස්කෝර්සිට් වලි ජාපානිය තමයි හොඳම මූල භාෂාව. මුළු භාෂාව නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න, ලක්ෂණ භාෂාව සම්බන්ධතාවය ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරමාණයකට වඩා වැද විශ්වාස කරන්න තියෙන්නේ ජාතික වෙනස් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒත් ඔවුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අඩුම තරම', 'sv': 'Att manuellt kommentera en trädbank är tidskrävande och arbetsintensiv. Vi genomför delexikaliserade cross-lingual beroende parsing experiment, där vi tränar parsern på ett språk och testar på vårt målspråk. Som vårt testfall använder vi Xibe, ett tungusiskt språk som är svårt underresursat. Vi utgår från att valet av ett närbesläktat språk som källspråk ger bättre resultat än mer avlägsna släktingar. Det är dock inte klart hur man ska fastställa dessa närbesläktade språk. Vi undersöker tre olika metoder: att välja det typologiskt närmaste språket, använda LangRank och välja det mest liknande språket baserat på förvirring. Vi tränar tolkningsmodeller på de valda språken med UDify och testar på olika genrer av Xibe-data. Resultaten visar att språk som valts utifrån typologi och förvirringspoäng överträffar LangRank förutspådda. Japanska är det optimala källspråket. Närheten till målspråket är viktigare för att bestämma källspråket än stora utbildningsstorlekar. Tolkning påverkas också av genreskillnader, men de har lite inflytande så länge träningsdata är minst lika komplexa som målet.', 'ta': 'கைமுறையாக ஒரு மூன்று பாங்க் நேரத்தை பயன்படுத்தி மற்றும் வேலை உறுதியாக உள்ளது. நாம் பிரிந்திசைக்கப்பட்ட மொழியின் சார்பு சார்பு சோதனைகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம், அங்கே நாம் ஒரு மொழியில் பயிற்சி ச எங்கள் சோதனைப் பெயராக, நாம் சைப் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், ஒரு கடுமையான மூலம் வளர்ந்த துங்குசிக் மொழி. நாங்கள் நினைக்கிறோம் மூலத்தின் மொழியை தேர்ந்தெடுத்தால் தூரத்தில் உறவினர்களை விட சிறந்த முடிவுகளை க However, it is not clear how to determine those closely related languages.  நாம் மூன்று வித்தியாசமான முறைகளை தேர்வு செய்கிறோம்: பொதுவாக நெருங்க மொழியை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கவும், லாங்க்ராங்கை பயன் @ info @ info: whatsthis ஜப்பானிய மூலத்தின் மொழி. மூலத்தின் மொழியை தீர்மானிக்கும் போது, இலக்கு மொழிக்கு நெருங்கிய மொழியை பெரிய பயிற்சி அளவுகளை வி பாசிங் இனம் வேறுபாடுகளாலும் பாதிக்கப்படுகிறது, ஆனால் பயிற்சி தகவல் குறைந்தது இலக்குக்கு சிக்கலாக இருக்கும் வரை குறைந', 'ur': 'ایک ٹریب بانک کو اپنا اظہار کرنا زمانہ کھانے والا اور سخت کام کرنے والا ہے ہم ایک زبان پر پارچسٹر کی تطابق کریں گے اور ہماری موجود زبان پر آزمائش کریں گے۔ ہماری آزمائش کیس کے طور پر ہم Xibe کو استعمال کرتے ہیں، ایک بہت کم رسسورٹ ٹونگوسیک زبان. ہم یہ سمجھتے ہیں کہ ایک نزدیک مرتبہ زبان کا انتخاب کرنا کیونکہ سورج زبان بہترین نتیجہ دیتا ہے اس سے زیادہ دور رشتہ داروں سے۔ لیکن یہ بات واضح نہیں ہے کہ کس طرح ان کی نسبت کی زبانیں مقرر کریں۔ ہم تین مختلف طریقے کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں: تایپولوژیک سے زیادہ قریبی زبان کا انتخاب کریں، لانگ رانک کے استعمال کریں، اور اس سے زیادہ مشابہ زبان کا انتخاب کریں۔ ہم نے UDify اور Xibe ڈیٹے کے مختلف جنر پر آزمائش کے مطابق برگزیدہ زبانوں میں نمڈل پارسینگ کی ترین کی۔ نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ٹائیپولوژی اور پرلکسٹی اسکور پر انتخاب کئے ہوئے زبانیں لانگ رانک کی پیش بینی سے زیادہ ہیں۔ جاپانی بہترین سراسر زبان ہے۔ سراسر زبان کا مقرر کرنے کے لئے، موجود زبان کے قریب تر تعلیم اندازے سے زیادہ اہم ہے. پارسینگ بھی جنس اختلاف کے ذریعہ اثر دیتی ہے، لیکن ان کے پاس کم اثر ہے جب تک تربینگ ڈیٹا حد سے زیادہ پیچیدہ ہے جیسے موقع.', 'uz': "Treebankni qo'lbola tasavvur qilish vaqt ishlab chiqarishi va vaqt juda katta. Biz deleksikatsiya tillar qo'llangan tashqi tajribalarini bajaramiz. Bu yerda biz o'zgarishni bir tilda o'rganamiz va eng tildagi tillarni sinash imkoniyatini bajaramiz. Biz sinov tilimizda Xibe tilidan foydalanamiz, juda qiyin tuzuvchi Tungusisk tildan foydalanamiz. We assume that choosing a closely related language as the source language will provide better results than more distant relatives.  Lekin bu tilni qanday aniqlashni o'rganish shaxsiyat emas. Biz uchta boshqa usullarni qidirimiz: o'zimni o'rtasida eng yaxshi tilni tanlash, LangRank yordamida o'zgartirish, va muvaffaqiyatli asosida ko'proq tilni tanlash. @ info Natijalar yordamida tanlangan tillar turologi va muvaffaqiyatli qiymatlari uchun LangRank koʻrsatilgan tilni bajaradi; Yaponcha optimal manba tili. Manba tilni aniqlashda, shaxsiy tillarning eng katta taʼminlovchi oʻlchamidan eng muhim. Парлаш ўзгаришларни ҳам эркак ўзгаришлар томонидан таъсир беради, аммо тайин қилиш маълумотлар Маккада моддий бўлиши мумкин бўлган вақтда уларга нисбатан муҳим таъсир бериш жуда оз таъсир йўқдир.", 'vi': 'Đánh vần kỹ thuật ba chiều là tốn thời gian và sức lao động. Chúng tôi thực hiện các thí nghiệm phân tích độ phân biệt ngôn ngữ, chia sẻ độ phân biệt ngôn ngữ, đào tạo cha xứ bằng một ngôn ngữ và kiểm tra ngôn ngữ đích. Để kiểm tra, ta dùng Xi be, một ngôn ngữ khó xoay xở. Chúng tôi cho rằng chọn một ngôn ngữ có liên quan mật thiết với ngôn ngữ nguồn sẽ có kết quả tốt hơn những người thân xa xôi. Tuy nhiên, không rõ làm thế nào để xác định các ngôn ngữ có liên quan mật thiết. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu ba phương pháp khác nhau: chọn ngôn ngữ theo tiêu đề gần nhất, sử dụng LangRang, và chọn ngôn ngữ tương tự dựa trên sự phức tạp. Chúng tôi huấn luyện phân tích các mô hình các ngôn ngữ đã chọn sử dụng UDify và thử nghiệm các thể loại khác nhau của dữ liệu Xi be. Kết quả cho thấy các ngôn ngữ được chọn dựa trên hạng học và tính toán phức tạp vượt qua những gì đã được dự đoán bởi LangRank; Tiếng Nhật là ngôn ngữ nguồn tối ưu. Để xác định ngôn ngữ nguồn, gần với ngôn ngữ đích còn quan trọng hơn kích thước huấn luyện lớn. Nghiên cứu cũng bị ảnh hưởng bởi các khác biệt về thể loại, nhưng chúng có ảnh hưởng rất ít chừng nào dữ liệu về huấn luyện còn phức tạp bằng với mục tiêu.', 'bg': 'Ръчното анотиране на дърво отнема време и е трудоемко. Провеждаме делексикализирани междуезични експерименти за анализ на зависимостта, при които тренираме анализатора на един език и тестваме на целевия език. Като наш тест случай използваме Ксибе, силно недостиг на ресурси тунгузичен език. Предполагаме, че изборът на тясно свързан език като изходен език ще даде по-добри резултати от по-далечните роднини. Не е ясно обаче как да се определят тези тясно свързани езици. Проучваме три различни метода: избор на типологично най-близкия език, използване на и избор на най-подобен език въз основа на объркване. Тренираме модели за анализ на избраните езици с помощта на и тестваме на различни жанрове данни. Резултатите показват, че избраните езици въз основа на типологията и оценките за объркване превъзхождат прогнозираните от ЛангRank; Японският е оптималният изходен език. При определянето на изходния език близостта до целевия език е по-важна от големите размери на обучението. Анализирането също е повлияно от жанровите различия, но те имат малко влияние, стига данните за обучение да са поне толкова сложни, колкото целта.', 'da': 'Manuel notering af en træbank er tidskrævende og arbejdskrævende. Vi udfører delekskaliserede tværsprogede afhængighedsanalyseeksperimenter, hvor vi træner fortolkeren på ét sprog og tester på vores målsprog. Som vores test case bruger vi Xibe, et alvorligt underressourcer tungusisk sprog. Vi antager, at valget af et nært beslægtet sprog som kildesprog vil give bedre resultater end mere fjerne slægtninge. Det er imidlertid ikke klart, hvordan man bestemmer disse nært beslægtede sprog. Vi undersøger tre forskellige metoder: at vælge det typologisk nærmeste sprog, bruge LangRank og vælge det mest lignende sprog baseret på forvirring. Vi træner parsing modeller på de valgte sprog ved hjælp af UDify og tester på forskellige genrer af Xibe data. Resultaterne viser, at sprog, der er valgt ud fra typologi og forvirring scores, overgår dem, der forudsiges af LangRank; Japansk er det optimale kildesprog. Når kildesproget bestemmes, er nærheden til målsproget vigtigere end store træningsstørrelser. Parsing påvirkes også af genreforskelle, men de har ringe indflydelse, så længe træningsdataene er mindst lige så komplekse som målet.', 'hr': 'Ručno annotiranje trbuha je potrošenje vremena i intenzivno radno vrijeme. Provodimo eksperimente za analizu deleksikaliziranog preko jezika zavisnosti, gdje treniramo analizatora na jednom jeziku i testiramo naš ciljni jezik. Kao naš test slučaj, koristimo Xibe, teško pod resursima Tungusijski jezik. Pretpostavljamo da će odabrati bliski povezan jezik jer izvorni jezik pružiti bolji rezultat nego daleki rođaci. Međutim, nije jasno kako utvrditi te bliski odnose jezike. Istražujemo tri različite metode: odabrati tipološki najbliži jezik, koristeći LangRank, i odabrati najsličniji jezik na temelju perpleksije. Vježbamo analizu modela na odabranim jezicima koristeći UDify i testiranje različitih genra podataka Xibe. Rezultati pokazuju da jezici koji su odabrani na temelju tipologije i rezultata perpleksije iznosili one koje je predviđao LangRank; Japanci je optimalni jezik izvora. U određivanju izvornog jezika, blizina ciljnog jezika je važnija od velikih veličina obuke. Očitanje također utječe na razlike od genre, ali imaju malo utjecaja dok je podaci o obuci najmanje složeni kao cilj.', 'nl': 'Het handmatig annoteren van een boombank is tijdrovend en arbeidsintensief. We voeren gedexicaliseerde cross-lingual dependence parsing experimenten uit, waarbij we de parser trainen op één taal en testen op onze doeltaal. Als onze testcase gebruiken we Xibe, een sterk onderontwikkelde Tungusic taal. We gaan ervan uit dat het kiezen van een nauw verwante taal als brontaal betere resultaten zal opleveren dan meer verre familieleden. Het is echter niet duidelijk hoe deze nauw verwante talen moeten worden bepaald. We onderzoeken drie verschillende methoden: het kiezen van de typologisch dichtstbijzijnde taal, het gebruik van LangRank, en het kiezen van de meest vergelijkbare taal op basis van verwarring. We trainen parsing modellen op de geselecteerde talen met behulp van UDify en testen op verschillende genres van Xibe data. De resultaten tonen aan dat talen die geselecteerd zijn op basis van typologie en verwarringsscores overtreffen die voorspeld zijn door LangRank; Japans is de optimale brontaal. Bij het bepalen van de brontaal is de nabijheid van de doeltaal belangrijker dan grote opleidingsgroepen. Parsen wordt ook beïnvloed door genreverschillen, maar ze hebben weinig invloed zolang de trainingsgegevens minstens zo complex zijn als het doel.', 'de': 'Das manuelle Kommentieren einer Baumbank ist zeitaufwendig und arbeitsintensiv. Wir führen delexikalisierte crosslinguale Dependency Parsing Experimente durch, bei denen wir den Parser auf einer Sprache trainieren und auf unserer Zielsprache testen. Als Testfall verwenden wir Xibe, eine stark unterversorgte Tungusische Sprache. Wir gehen davon aus, dass die Wahl einer eng verwandten Sprache als Ausgangssprache bessere Ergebnisse liefert als entferntere Verwandte. Es ist jedoch nicht klar, wie diese eng verwandten Sprachen zu bestimmen sind. Wir untersuchen drei verschiedene Methoden: Auswahl der typologisch nächstgelegenen Sprache, Verwendung von LangRank und Auswahl der am ähnlichsten ähnlichen Sprache basierend auf Verwirrung. Wir trainieren Parsing-Modelle für die ausgewählten Sprachen mit UDify und testen auf verschiedenen Genres von Xibe-Daten. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass Sprachen, die aufgrund von Typologie und Verwirrung ausgewählt wurden, die von LangRank vorhergesagt wurden, übertreffen; Japanisch ist die optimale Ausgangssprache. Bei der Bestimmung der Ausgangssprache ist die Nähe zur Zielsprache wichtiger als große Trainingsgrößen. Auch das Parsing wird von Genreunterschieden beeinflusst, aber sie haben wenig Einfluss, solange die Trainingsdaten mindestens so komplex sind wie das Ziel.', 'ko': '수동 주석 트리 라이브러리는 시간과 힘을 소모합니다.우리는 어휘화된 다중 언어 의존 분석 실험을 실시했다. 실험에서 우리는 하나의 언어로 해석기를 훈련하고 우리의 목표 언어로 테스트를 실시했다.우리의 테스트 사례로서, 우리는 자원이 심각하게 부족한 퉁구스어를 사용한다.우리는 밀접한 관계를 가진 언어를 원시 언어로 선택하는 것이 더 먼 친척 언어를 선택하는 것보다 더 좋은 결과를 제공할 것이라고 생각한다.그러나 이 밀접한 관련이 있는 언어들을 어떻게 확정할지는 아직 분명하지 않다.우리는 세 가지 다른 방법을 연구했다. 그것이 바로 유형이 가장 가까운 언어를 선택하고, LangRank를 사용하며, 곤혹스러움을 바탕으로 가장 비슷한 언어를 선택하는 것이다.우리는 Udify를 사용하여 선택한 언어에서 해석 모델을 훈련하고 서로 다른 유형의 시베족 데이터를 테스트합니다.그 결과 유형학과 곤혹도 점수를 바탕으로 선택한 언어가 랭크가 예측한 언어보다 우수한 것으로 나타났다.일본어는 가장 좋은 원어다.원시 언어를 확정할 때 목표 언어에 접근하는 것이 대규모 훈련보다 중요하다.문법 분석도 장르 차이의 영향을 받지만 훈련 데이터가 적어도 목표와 같이 복잡하면 장르 차이는 거의 영향을 주지 않는다.', 'id': 'Menganotasi pangkalan pohon secara manual memakan waktu dan bekerja intensiv. Kami melakukan eksperimen pengenalisan keterlibatan saling bahasa, di mana kami melatih pengenalisan dalam satu bahasa dan menguji bahasa sasaran kami. Sebagai kasus tes kami, kami menggunakan Xibe, bahasa Tungusic yang sangat kurang sumber daya. Kami menganggap bahwa memilih bahasa yang berhubungan dengan dekat sebagai bahasa sumber akan memberikan hasil yang lebih baik dari keluarga yang lebih jauh. Namun, tidak jelas bagaimana menentukan bahasa-bahasa yang berhubungan dekat. Kami menyelidiki tiga metode berbeda: memilih bahasa tipologi terdekat, menggunakan LangRank, dan memilih bahasa yang paling mirip berdasarkan kekacauan. Kami melatih penghuraian model pada bahasa yang dipilih menggunakan UDify dan menguji pada genre yang berbeda dari data Xibe. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahasa yang dipilih berdasarkan skor tipologi dan kekacauan melebihi yang diprediksi oleh LangRank; Bahasa Jepang adalah bahasa sumber optimal. Dalam menentukan bahasa sumber, dekat dengan bahasa sasaran lebih penting daripada ukuran latihan besar. Analisasi juga dipengaruhi oleh perbedaan genre, tapi mereka memiliki sedikit pengaruh selama data latihan setidaknya sama kompleks dengan sasaran.', 'fa': 'دستگیر کردن یک بانک درخت زمان صرف کردن و سخت کار است. ما آزمایش\u200cهای تجزیه کردن بستگی متوسط زبان\u200cهای دلیکسیکیزی را انجام می\u200cدهیم، جایی که پارچر را روی یک زبان آموزش می\u200cدهیم و روی زبان هدف\u200cمان آزمایش می\u200cکنیم. به عنوان پرونده آزمایش ما از سیب استفاده می کنیم، یک زبان تنگوسیک زیر منبع است. ما فرض می کنیم که برگزیدن یک زبان نزدیک به عنوان زبان منبع نتیجه بهتر از نزدیکان فاصله\u200cتری را فراهم می\u200cکند. با این حال، مشخص نیست چگونه تعیین کردن زبانهای نزدیک است. ما سه روش متفاوت را تحقیق می کنیم: انتخاب کردن زبان تایپولوژیکی نزدیک\u200cترین زبان، استفاده از لانگرنک، و انتخاب کردن زبان مشابه\u200cترین زبان بر اساس پرپرچستگی. ما مدلها را در زبانهای برگزیده با استفاده از UDify و آزمایش در ژنتهای مختلف داده های Xibe آموزش می دهیم. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که زبان\u200cهای برگزیده بر اساس تایپولوژی و نقطه\u200cهای مختلف بیشتر از آن\u200cها که توسط لانگرنک پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنند انجام می\u200cدهند. ژاپنی زبان منبع optimal است. در تعیین زبان منبع، نزدیکترین زبان هدف از اندازه\u200cهای بزرگ آموزش مهم\u200cتر است. تولید کردن همچنین توسط تفاوت\u200cهای جنسی تاثیر می\u200cیابد، ولی آنها تاثیر کمی دارند تا زمانی که داده\u200cهای آموزش حداقل به اندازه هدف پیچیده است.', 'sw': 'Kuudhi kwa mara nyingi benki ya miti ni matumizi ya muda na yenye nguvu ya ajira. Tunafanya majaribio yanayotegemea mabadiliko ya lugha kwa lugha tofauti, ambapo tunawafundisha mchambuzi kwa lugha moja na kujaribu kwa lugha yetu inayolenga. Kama kesi yetu ya jaribio, tunatumia Xibe, lugha ya Kitungusi yenye msimamo mkali. Tunafikiri kuwa kuchagua lugha inayohusiana na karibu kwani lugha ya msingi itatoa matokeo bora kuliko ndugu wa mbali. Hata hivyo, si wazi jinsi ya kuamua lugha hizo zinazohusiana na karibu. Tunatachunguza njia tatu tofauti: kuchagua lugha ya kawaida ya karibu zaidi, kwa kutumia LangRank, na kuchagua lugha inayofanana zaidi kwa utata. Tunafundisha mifano ya kuiba katika lugha zilizochaguliwa kwa kutumia UDify na kujaribu kwenye aina mbalimbali ya takwimu za Xibe. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa lugha zilizochaguliwa kwa kutumia utamaduni na vipindi vya kusikitisha vinavyotarajiwa na LangRank; Kijapani ni lugha yenye matumaini. Katika kutambua lugha ya chanzo, karibu na lugha ya lengo ni muhimu zaidi ya ukubwa wa mafunzo. Uchapishaji pia umeathiriwa na tofauti za kijinsia, lakini hawana ushawishi kidogo kwa kadri takwimu za mafunzo ni tatizo kama lengo hilo.', 'af': "Hand die annotering van 'n treebank is tyd-gebruik en arbeid-intensief. Ons gedoen deleksikaliseerde kruistale afhanklikheid verwerking eksperimente waar ons die ontwerker op een taal tref en toets op ons doel taal. As ons toets geval, gebruik ons Xibe, 'n swaar onder-hulpbronne Tungusiese taal. Ons aanvaar dat die kies van 'n naby verwante taal as die bron taal beter resultate sal verskaf as meer afgeleë relatives. Maar dit is nie duidelik hoe om daardie naby verwante tale te bepaal nie. Ons ondersoek drie verskillende metodes: kies die tipologies nabiese taal, gebruik LangRank, en kies die mees gelyke taal gebaseer op perpleksie. Ons trein inlys modelle op die gekose taal met UDify en toets op verskillende genre van Xibe data. Die resultate vertoon dat taals gekose gebaseer op tipologie en perpleksie telling uitvoer die voorskou deur LangRank; en Japanse is die optimale bron taal. Om die bron taal te bepaal, is nabytigheid tot die doel taal meer belangrik as groot onderwerp grootte. Verwerking is ook influens deur genre verskille, maar hulle het klein influens so lank as die onderwerking data is ten minste so kompleks as die doel.", 'tr': "Arzan çyzygyny elimden duýdurmak zaman ahmal we işgärlik. Biz deleksikalizýän çarpaky dil baglanylygynyň çözümlenmesi deneylerini ýerine ýetirdik. Biz çözümlerini bir dilde öwredýäris we maksadyň dilinde test edip barýarys. Synagymyz ýaly, biz Xibe'i, Tungus dilinden daşary ukyp ulanýarys. Biz ýakyn bir dil saýlamak üçin çeşme dilinden uzak jaýyndan gowy netijede bolar diýip pikir edýäris. Ýöne şu ýakyn dillerden nähili takyklaşmalydygyny düşünmedik. Biz üç dürli ýoly barlap çykýarys: tipologik ýakyn dilini saýlap, LangRank dilini ullap, we çykyşlyk bilen iň ýakyn dilini saýlap. Biz saýlanan dillerde UDify bilen hat laýyşlaryny we beýleki senaryny Xibe maglumatynyň üstünde test edip otyrys. Netijeler tipologiýa we complexitýa düzümlerinde saýlanan diller LangRank tarapyndan öňlenen ýagdaýlary üstün edýändigini görkez; Japonça iň gowy çeşme dilidir. Menbärde dili takyklamak üçin, maksadyň diline golaýlaşyk uly okuwçylardan has möhüm. Çaplanjak hem jeneral üýtgeşiklerden täsir edýär, ýöne okuw maglumatlary iň azyndan bu maksadyň ýaly karmaşıklygy täsiri bar.", 'sq': 'Njoftimi manual i një baze druri është i nevojshëm për kohë dhe i nevojshëm për punë. Ne kryejmë eksperimente të deleksializuara të analizimit të varësisë ndërgjuhësore, ku e trajnojmë analizuesin në një gjuhë dhe testojmë gjuhën tonë të objektivit. Si rasti ynë i testit, ne përdorim Xibe, një gjuhë tunguze shumë të pakufishme. Ne supozojmë se zgjedhja e një gjuhe të lidhur ngushtë si gjuha burimi do të ofrojë rezultate më të mira se të afërmit më të largët. Megjithatë, nuk është e qartë se si të përcaktohen ato gjuhë të lidhura ngushtë. Ne hetojmë tre metoda të ndryshme: zgjedhjen e gjuhës më të afërt tipologjikisht, përdorimin e LangRank dhe zgjedhjen e gjuhës më të ngjashme bazuar në perplexitet. Ne trajnojmë analizimin e modeleve në gjuhët e zgjedhur duke përdorur UDify dhe duke testuar në gjenera të ndryshme të të dhënave Xibe. Rezultatet tregojnë se gjuhët e zgjedhura bazuar në pikëpamjet tipologjike dhe të ngatërresave kalojnë ato të parashikuara nga LangRank; Japonisht është gjuha e burimit optimal. Në përcaktimin e gjuhës burimore, afërsia ndaj gjuhës objektive është më e rëndësishme se madhësitë e mëdha të trajnimit. Parsing is also influenced by genre differences, but they have little influence as long as the training data is at least as complex as the target.', 'am': 'በጭራሽ መደገፍ የጊዜው እና የድካም መደገፍ ነው፡፡ የሜሌክሲካዊ ቋንቋ የመደገፊያውን የፓርቲ ፈተና እናደርጋለን፤ በዚያው አንዲት ቋንቋ ምላሳችንን እናስተምረዋለን እና በተቃውሞ ቋንቋችንን እንፈትናለን፡፡ እንደፈተናችን ጉዳይ፣ Xibe፣ በተገኘው የቱንጉሲክ ቋንቋ በጭንቀት እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ከሩቅ ዘመዶች ይልቅ የተሻለ ፍሬዎችን እንዲሰጥ እናስባለን፡፡ ነገር ግን እነዚህ ቋንቋዎች እንዴት እንደተገለጹ አይገልጽም፡፡ ሦስት ልዩ ልዩ ዓይነቶች እንመረምራለን፤ በተለየው ቋንቋን በመምረጥ፣ LangRank በመምረጥ እና በብዛት በተመሳሳይ ቋንቋ በመምረጥ፡፡ በተመረጠው ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ የUDify እና በተለየ የXibe ዳታዎችን እናስፈትናለን፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ በተመረጠው ቋንቋዎች በቶሎጂ እና በተጨማሪነት ነጥቦች ላይ የተመረጡ ቋንቋዎች ይታያል፡፡ ጃፓንኛ የኩነቶች ቋንቋ ነው። የቋንቋ ቋንቋን በማስተካከል፣ ለደረጃ ቋንቋ መቅረብ ከትልቅ ትምህርት መጠን ይልቅ የተለየ ነው፡፡ ፓርቲው ደግሞ በgender ልዩ ልዩነት ይጨምርበታል፤ ነገር ግን ማኅበረሰቢያው ዳታዎች እንደ አካባቢው አካባቢ ሲሆን ትንሽ ጥቅም አላቸው።', 'hy': 'Ձեռքով նշում ծառի տակ ժամանակ է պահանջում և աշխատանքի ինտենսիվ է: Մենք կատարում ենք թեքսիկալիզացված լեզվային կախվածության վերլուծության փորձարկումներ, որտեղ մենք վարժեցնում ենք վերլուծողը մեկ լեզվով և փորձարկում ենք մեր նպատակային լեզվով: As our test case, we use Xibe, a severely under-resourced Tungusic language.  Մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ սեփական կապված լեզու ընտրությունը որպես աղբյուր լեզու ավելի լավ արդյունքներ կտա, քան հեռավոր հարաբերությունները: Այնուամենայնիվ, պարզ չէ, թե ինչպես որոշել այդ խիստ կապված լեզուները: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երեք տարբեր մեթոդ. ընտրել ամենամեծ լեզուն, օգտագործել ԼանգՌանքը և ընտրել ամենամեծ լեզուն, հիմնված խառնաշփոթի վրա: Մենք սովորեցնում ենք վերլուծում մոդելներ ընտրված լեզուների վրա օգտագործելով UDIF-ը և փորձում ենք Xbe տվյալների տարբեր գեներով: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ լեզուները, որոնք ընտրվել են ըստ տիպոլոգիայի և խառնաշփոթի գնահատականների, գերազանցում են լենգRank-ի կանխատեսված լեզուներին: Japanese is the optimal source language.  Առաջին լեզուն որոշում նպատակային լեզուն մոտեցումը ավելի կարևոր է, քան մեծ ուսուցման չափերը: Փորձարկումները նույնպես ազդում են գենդերային տարբերություններից, բայց դրանք քիչ ազդեցություն ունեն, քանի դեռ փորձարկումների տվյալները առնվազն այնքան բարդ են, ինչքան նպատակը:', 'az': "Ərçək çubuğunu öz əlində bildirmək zamanı istifadə etmək və işin çox a ğırlığıdır. Biz deleksiksikalizirləndirilmiş çox dil bağlılığı analizə təcrübələrini təhsil edirik, bir dildə analizi təhsil edirik və məqsəd dilimizdə test edirik. Testimiz olaraq, Xibe'i çox qüvvətli Tungus dilindən istifadə edirik. Biz düşünürük ki, mənbə dili çox uzaq qohumlardan daha yaxşı sonuçlar verər. Lakin bu dilləri yaxınlaşdırmağı açıq deyil. Biz üç müxtəlif metodları araşdırırıq: typolojik ən yaxın dili seçərək, LangRank vasitəsilə və müxtəlif dilə dayanan ən bənzər dili seçərək. Biz seçilmiş dillərdə UDify vasitəsilə modelləri ayırmaq və Xibe verilənlərin müxtəlif genrlərini sınamaq üçün təhsil edirik. Sonuçlar LangRank tədbir edilənlərin tədbir edilmiş dillərin typoloji və müxtəlif nöqtələrinə dayandığını göstərir. Japonca optimal mənbə dilidir. Məqsəd dilini təyin etmək üçün, məqsəd dilinin yaxınlığı böyük təhsil ölçülərindən daha vacib. Parsing də cənr fərqliyindən etkilenir, amma təhsil məlumatlarının ən azından məqsəd kimi kompleks olduğu qədər az etkilər var.", 'bn': 'মাধ্যমে একটি ত্রিব্যাংকের বিরক্তিকর ব্যাপার হচ্ছে সময়-ভক্ষণ এবং শ্রমের ক্ষতিশালী। আমরা প্রতিনিধিত্বিত ক্রস-ভাষায় নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করি, যেখানে আমরা একটি ভাষায় প্রশিক্ষণ দেই এবং লক্ষ্য ভাষ আমাদের পরীক্ষার মামলা হিসেবে আমরা জিব ব্যবহার করি, একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ টিঙ্গুসিক ভাষায় ব্যবহার করি। আমরা ধারণা করছি যে কাছাকাছি সংশ্লিষ্ট ভাষা বেছে নিতে পারে যেহেতু সূত্র ভাষা দূরবর্তী আত্মীয়ের চেয়ে ভাল তবে এটা পরিষ্কার নয়, কিভাবে কাছাকাছি সম্পর্কিত ভাষাগুলো নির্ধারণ করা যায়। আমরা তিনটি ভিন্ন পদ্ধতি অনুসন্ধান করি: সাধারণ ভাষায় কাছাকাছি ভাষাকে বেছে নেয়, ল্যাংর্যাঙ্ক ব্যবহার করে এবং বিভিন্ন ভাষার ভিত্ আমরা নির্বাচিত ভাষায় পার্সিং মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করি যা ইউডিফি ব্যবহার করে বিভিন্ন জিনিসের তথ্যে পরীক্ষা করে। ফলাফল দেখা যায় যে ভাষাগুলো টাইপোলজির ভিত্তিতে নির্বাচিত ভাষা এবং পার্পলিক্সিটি স্কোরের ভিত্তিতে ল্যাং জাপানীয় সোর্স ভাষা। In determining the source language, proximity to the target language is more important than large training sizes.  পার্সিং গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভিন্ন প্রভাবিত হয়েছে, কিন্তু প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য যতদিন পর্যন্ত গুরুত্বপূর্ণ তথ্য তাদের প্রভাব', 'bs': 'Ručno annotiranje trbuha je potrošenje vremena i intenzivno rada. Provodimo eksperimente za analizu deleksikaliziranog preko jezika zavisnosti, gdje treniramo analizatora na jednom jeziku i testiramo naš ciljni jezik. Kao naš test slučaj, koristimo Xibe, teško pod resursima Tungusički jezik. Pretpostavljamo da će odabrati bliski povezan jezik jer izvorni jezik pružiti bolji rezultat nego daleki rođaci. Međutim, nije jasno kako utvrditi te bliski odnose jezike. Istražujemo tri različite metode: odabrati najbliži jezik tipološki, koristeći LangRank, i odabrati najsličniji jezik na temelju perpleksije. Vježbamo analizu modela na odabranim jezicima koristeći UDify i testiranje različitih genra Xibe podataka. Rezultati pokazuju da jezici koji su odabrani na temelju tipologije i rezultata kompleksnosti iznose one koje je predviđao LangRank; Japanci je optimalni jezik izvora. U određivanju izvornog jezika, blizina ciljnog jezika je važnija od velikih veličina obuke. Oženjenje također utječe na razlike od genre, ali imaju manje utjecaja dok je podaci o obuci najmanje složeni kao cilj.', 'cs': 'Ruční anotování stromového břehu je časově náročné a pracovně náročné. Provádíme delexikalizované experimenty parsování závislostí mezi jazyky, kde trénujeme parser na jednom jazyce a testujeme na našem cílovém jazyce. Jako náš testovací případ používáme Xibe, silně nedostatečně zdrojovaný tungusický jazyk. Předpokládáme, že výběr úzce příbuzného jazyka jako zdrojového jazyka poskytne lepší výsledky než vzdálenější příbuzní. Není však jasné, jak určit tyto úzce příbuzné jazyky. Zkoumáme tři různé metody: výběr typologicky nejbližšího jazyka, použití LangRanku a výběr nejvíce podobného jazyka na základě zmatenosti. Trénujeme parsovací modely na vybraných jazycích pomocí UDify a testujeme na různých žánrech dat Xibe. Výsledky ukazují, že jazyky vybrané na základě typologie a skóre zmatenosti překonávají ty, které předpovídá LangRank; Japonština je optimálním zdrojovým jazykem. Při určování zdrojového jazyka je blízkost cílového jazyka důležitější než velké velikosti školení. Parsing je také ovlivněn žánrovými rozdíly, ale mají jen malý vliv, pokud jsou tréninková data alespoň stejně složitá jako cíl.', 'et': "Puupanga käsitsi annoteerimine on aeganõudev ja töömahukas. Teostame deleksikaliseeritud keeleülese sõltuvuse parsimise eksperimente, kus treenime parserit ühel keelel ja testime sihtkeelt. Meie testijuhtumina kasutame Xibe't, tõsiselt alaressurssidega tungusic keelt. Eeldame, et lähedaselt seotud keele valimine lähtekeeleks annab paremaid tulemusi kui kaugemad sugulased. Siiski ei ole selge, kuidas määrata kindlaks need tihedalt seotud keeled. Uurime kolme erinevat meetodit: valida tüpoloogiliselt lähim keel, kasutada LangRanki ja valida kõige sarnasem keel hämmelduse põhjal. Koolitame valitud keelte parsimismudeleid UDify abil ja testime Xibe andmete eri žanritega. Tulemused näitavad, et tüpoloogia ja segaduskooride alusel valitud keeled ületavad LangRanki prognoositavaid keeli; Jaapani keel on optimaalne lähtekeel. Lähtekeele määramisel on sihtkeele lähedus olulisem kui suured koolitusmahud. Parsimist mõjutavad ka žanri erinevused, kuid neil on vähe mõju, kui treeninguandmed on vähemalt sama keerulised kui sihtmärk.", 'ca': "Anotar manualment un banc d'arbres consumeix temps i treball. Fem experiments de analització de la dependencia translingüística desxicalitzats, on entrenem l'analitzador en una llengua i provem la nostra llengua alvo. As our test case, we use Xibe, a severely under-resourced Tungusic language.  Suposem que escollir una llengua estretament relacionada com la llengua de font proporcionarà millors resultats que parents més llunyans. No obstant això, no és clar com determinar aquestes llengües estretament relacionades. Investiguem tres mètodes diferents: triar el llenguatge tipològicament més proper, utilitzar LangRank, i triar el llenguatge més similar basat en la perplexitat. Ensenyem els models d'analització de les llengües seleccionates utilitzant UDify i provant diferents gèneres de dades Xibe. The results show that languages selected based on typology and perplexity scores outperform those predicted by LangRank;  El japonès és el llenguatge de fonts optim. Per determinar el llenguatge d'origen, la proximitat al llenguatge d'objectiu és més important que les grans dimensions d'entrenament. Parsing is also influenced by genre differences, but they have little influence as long as the training data is at least as complex as the target.", 'fi': 'Puupenkin manuaalinen merkitseminen on aikaa vievää ja työvoimavaltaista. Teemme deleksikalisoituja kielienvälisiä riippuvuuden jäsennyskokeita, joissa koulutamme jäsentäjän yhdellä kielellä ja testaamme kohdekielellämme. Testitapauksemme käytämme Xiben kieltä, joka on erittäin vajaakäyttöinen tungusikieli. Oletamme, että lähisukulaisen kielen valitseminen lähdekieleksi tuottaa parempia tuloksia kuin kaukaisemmat sukulaiset. On kuitenkin epäselvää, miten nämä läheisesti toisiinsa liittyvät kielet määritetään. Tutkimme kolmea eri menetelmää: typologisesti lähimmän kielen valitseminen, LangRankin käyttö ja samankaltaisimman kielen valitseminen hämmennyksen perusteella. Harjoittelemme jäsennysmalleja valituilla kielillä UDifyn avulla ja testaamme Xibe-datan eri genrejä. Tulokset osoittavat, että typologian ja hämmennyspisteiden perusteella valitut kielet ylittävät LangRankin ennustamat kielet. Japani on optimaalinen lähdekieli. Lähtökielen määrittämisessä kohdekielen läheisyys on tärkeämpää kuin suuret koulutuskoot. Parsaukseen vaikuttavat myös genreerot, mutta niillä on vähän vaikutusta, kunhan harjoitusdata on vähintään yhtä monimutkainen kuin tavoite.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé nggunakake perusahaan kanggo nggawe barang langgar sampeyan ingkang dipun Ngetongke test durung, kéné gambar Hybe, sak susah-susahe kanggo ngerasakno tentang. Awak dhéwé isih luwih akeh pinter nggawe luwih apik lan luwih dumadhi kaya nggawe barang langkung sampeyan luwih apik. Nanging, ora ngerasakno piye isakno kanggo ngerasakno ning langgar sak saben. Awak dhéwé yatêp éntukno telu maneh sing sampeyan: tighir kesempatan kanggo kelas basa, nggawe langrank, lan uga tighir langgar sapa-sampeyan sing apik terus apik. Awak dhéwé ngewehke model nang langgambar sing diulangno sistem podho podho Rejalakno ngomong langgambar sing dipilih anyar tentang karo perpliksi Laptop" and "Desktop Ing dolanan ingkang perkoro, jewisan kanggo langkung nggawe luwih apik sing luwih apik. "%s"', 'ha': "Ina zartar da wani matabbaci da hannuwansa yana mai amfani da lokaci da mai ƙaranci. Tuna tafiyar jarrabar parse na'urar-lugha da aka yi diƙaitacce a kanzu-linguin, inda Muke kõre fasalin parser kan lugha guda kuma mu jarraba kan harshen bangonmu. Kama jarrabonmu, za mu yi amfani da Xibe, wata harshen Tungusic mai ƙaranci da aka samar da shi. Tuna ƙayyade cẽwa, za'a zãɓi wata harshe wanda yake kusanta da shi kamar harshen source, zai zaɓe mafiya alhẽri ga matsayi daga dangi masu nĩsa. A lokacin da bai bayyana yadda za'a ƙaddara waɗanda ke cikin harshen nan makusanta ba. Tuna karatun hanyõyi uku daban: domin zãɓi lugha ɗin da aka fi kusa a typically, ana yi amfani da LonggRank, kuma za'a zãɓe harshen masu daidaita a kan misãlai. @ info: whatsthis Mataimakin na nuna cẽwa harshen waɗanda aka zãɓa a kan takardar typogi da matsalar masu bastarwa su gabatar da waɗanda aka ƙayyade na LonggRank; @ item Spelling dictionary Idan an gane lugha na source, za'a iya kusanta zuwa harshen wanda aka yi goani, yana da muhimmi ko girma wa tsarin mai girma. Parse yana da amfani da sãɓãnin jini, kuma suna da amfani da abu kaɗan sai da dai data na amfani da shi ya zama adadi da amfani ɗin gaba ɗaya.", 'sk': 'Ročno označevanje drevesne plošče je dolgotrajno in delovno intenzivno. Izvajamo deleksikalizirane medjezične razčlenjevanje odvisnosti, kjer razčlenjevalca treniramo na enem jeziku in testiramo na ciljnem jeziku. Kot naš testni primer uporabljamo Xibe, zelo premalo virov tungusičnega jezika. Predvidevamo, da bo izbira tesno sorodnega jezika kot izvornega jezika zagotovila boljše rezultate kot bolj oddaljeni sorodniki. Vendar pa ni jasno, kako določiti te tesno sorodne jezike. Raziskujemo tri različne metode: izbira tipološko najbližjega jezika, uporaba LangRanka in izbira najbolj podobnega jezika na podlagi zmedenosti. Modele razčlenjevanja na izbranih jezikih usposabljamo z uporabo UDify in testiramo na različnih zvrstih Xibe podatkov. Rezultati kažejo, da jeziki, izbrani na podlagi tipologije in rezultatov zmedenosti, presegajo tiste, ki jih predvideva LangRank; Japonščina je optimalni izvorni jezik. Pri določanju izvornega jezika je bližina ciljnega jezika pomembnejša od velikih usposabljanj. Na parsing vplivajo tudi žanrske razlike, vendar imajo malo vpliva, dokler so podatki o treningu vsaj tako kompleksni kot cilj.', 'he': 'ציוני עץ דרך ידיים זה לוקח זמן ומזל עבודה אינטנסיבי. אנו מבצעים ניסויים של בדיקת תלויות דרך שפת משותפת, שבו אנו מאמן את המחקר בשפה אחת ומבחנים על שפת המטרה שלנו. כתיק המבחן שלנו, אנו משתמשים בסיבה, שפה טנגוסית מתחת למוצאות. אנחנו מניחים שבחירת שפה קשורה מקרוב כשפת המקור יספק תוצאות טובות יותר משפחות קרובים רחוקים יותר. עם זאת, לא ברור איך לקבוע את השפות הקשורות קרובות אלה. אנו חוקרים שלושה שיטות שונות: לבחור את השפה הכי קרובה בטיפולוגית, באמצעות LangRank, ובחר בשפה הכי דומה בהתבסס על התבלבות. אנו מאמן בדיקת דוגמנים על השפות הנבחרות באמצעות UDify ומבחנים על גנרס שונים של מידע Xibe. התוצאות מראות שפות שנבחרו בהתבסס על ציוני טיפולוגיה ותבלבות יוצאות מעל אלה שצפויים על ידי LangRank; יפנית היא שפת המקור האופטימית. בקשר לשפה המקורית, קרובות לשפה המטרה חשובה יותר מגודלים גדולים של אימונים. הפרסום משפיע גם על ידי הבדלים בגינר, אבל יש להם קצת השפעה כל עוד נתוני האימון הוא לפחות מורכב כמו המטרה.', 'bo': 'ལག་བཟོས་ཐོག་ཏུ་བསྡོམས་པ་ཞིག་ནི་དུས་ཚོད་ལས་བརྩོན་འགྱུར་བ་དང་ལས་བརྩོན་གཏན་ཁེལ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་བསུབ་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ན། ང་ཚོས་Xibe་སྤྱད་ནས་བཟོས་མཁན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤིང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་འདེམས་པ་ལས་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤིག་གདམ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཇི་ལྟར་འབྲེལ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་འདི་དག་གི་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་ན་གསལ་པོ་མེད། ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་འདྲ་མི་འདྲ་བར་གནད་དོན་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་བདམས་ཟིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་གདམ་ཟིན་པའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་དང་ལས་འཕགས་པའི་མཐོ་རིམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གདམ་པ་ཡིན་ན། ཇ་པོ་ནི་ཡིག་ནི་ཁུངས་འབུལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་རེད། ཐོག་མའི་སྐད་རིགས་འདི་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པར་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་གཟུགས་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ཆེ་བ་ལས་གལ་ཆེ། དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཁྱད་པར་ལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱིས་འགྱུར་བ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Towards Code-Mixed Hinglish Dialogue Generation', 'ar': 'نحو جيل حوار هنجليش مختلط كود', 'fr': 'Vers une génération de dialogue hinglish mixte', 'es': 'Hacia la generación de diálogo Hinglish con código mixto', 'pt': 'Em direção à geração de diálogo Hinglish de código misto', 'zh': '杩堝悜浠ｇ爜娣峰悎涔婬inglish,瀵硅瘽鐢熸垚', 'ja': 'コードミックスヒンジリッシュダイアログ生成に向けて', 'hi': 'कोड-मिश्रित हिंग्लिश संवाद पीढ़ी की ओर', 'ru': 'На пути к созданию смешанного кодового хинглиша', 'ga': 'I dtreo Giniúint Idirphlé Hinglish Cód-Mheasctha', 'ka': 'კოდის შემთხვევაში შესაძლებელი დიალოგის შექმნა', 'hu': 'A kódkeverett hinglish párbeszéd generálása felé', 'it': 'Verso la generazione di dialoghi hinglish misti con codice', 'mk': 'За генерација на дијалог со мешан код', 'ms': 'Ke arah Jenerasi Dialog Hinglish-Mixed Kod', 'ml': 'മുകളിലേക്കു് കോഡ്- മിക്സിഡ് ഹിങ്ങിഷ് ഡയലോഗ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു', 'el': 'Προς τη δημιουργία διαλόγων μικτών κωδικών', 'kk': 'Код араластырылған жаңалық диалогын құру', 'lt': 'Kodų mišraus kliūčių dialogo kūrimo link', 'no': 'Gå til generering av dialogvindauget med kodeflikt hint', 'mt': 'Lejn il-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Djalogu ta’ Hinglish imħallat bil-Kodiċi', 'mn': 'Код-холбогдсон шинжлэх диалог үүсгэх рүү', 'pl': 'W kierunku generowania dialogów mieszanych kodem Hinglish', 'ro': 'Către generarea dialogurilor hinglish combinate cu coduri', 'si': 'කෝඩ් මික්ස් සංවාදය සංවාදය නිර්මාණය', 'sr': 'На генерацију диалога за смештење кодова', 'so': 'Generation of dialogue', 'ta': 'குறியீடு- கலக்கப்பட்ட குறிமுறை உரையாடலின் உருவாக்கம்', 'sv': 'Mot kodblandad hinglisk dialoggenerering', 'ur': 'کوڈ میکس ڈیلوگ ڈیلوگ پیدا کرنے کی طرف', 'uz': 'Kodlash oynasi yaratish', 'vi': 'Hướng tới Thế hệ thoại bi- hoà', 'bg': 'Към генериране на диалогов диалог със смесени кодове', 'da': 'På vej mod kodeblandet hinglish dialog generation', 'hr': 'Prema generaciji dijaloga o miješanju koda', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zur Generierung von Code-Mixed Hinglish Dialogs', 'id': 'Ke Generasi Dialog Hinglish Bercampuran Kode', 'nl': 'Naar codegemengde Hinglish Dialoggeneratie', 'fa': 'به سمت تولید محاورۀ پیوند پیوند پیوند کد', 'sw': 'Mtengenezaji wa Dialogu ya Kuzungumzwa', 'af': 'Gaan na Kode gemengde Hinglis dialoog Genereer', 'sq': 'Për gjenerimin e dialogut të përzier me kod', 'ko': '부호가 혼합된 한영 대화 생성', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'az': 'Kod KarńĪŇüńĪlmńĪŇü ńįzl…ôm…ô Dialoońüu √únvanńĪna', 'hy': 'Գործիքով խառնված խորհրդանոցի ստեղծման ուղղությամբ', 'tr': 'Ködlemeler Karışma Dälogy Bejer', 'bn': 'কোড- মিক্সেড হিঙ্গ্লিশ ডায়ালগ জেনারেশন', 'bs': 'Prema generaciji dialoga o miješanju koda', 'cs': 'K generování závěsných dialogů smíšených kódem', 'fi': 'Kohti koodisekoitettua hinglish-dialogia', 'et': 'Koodidega segatud hinglish dialoogi loomise suunas', 'ca': 'En direcció a la generació de diàleg Hinglish combinat amb codis', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'K ustvarjanju šifriranega dialoga', 'he': 'לעבור ליצירת דילוג הינגלית מעורבת בקוד', 'bo': 'མཉམ་བསྡོམས་པའི་བརྡ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་གསར་འཛུགས'}
{'en': 'Code-mixed language plays a crucial role in communication in multilingual societies. Though the recent growth of web users has greatly boosted the use of such mixed languages, the current generation of dialog systems is primarily monolingual. This increase in usage of code-mixed language has prompted dialog systems in a similar language. We present our work in Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, an unexplored task in code-mixed languages, generating utterances in code-mixed language rather than a single language that is more often just English. We present a new synthetic corpus in code-mix for dialogs, CM-DailyDialog, by converting an existing English-only dialog corpus to a mixed Hindi-English corpus. We then propose a baseline approach where we show the effectiveness of using mBART like multilingual sequence-to-sequence transformers for code-mixed dialog generation. Our best performing dialog models can conduct coherent conversations in Hindi-English mixed language as evaluated by human and automatic metrics setting new benchmarks for the Code-Mixed Dialog Generation task.', 'ar': 'تلعب اللغة المختلطة في الشفرات دورًا مهمًا في التواصل في المجتمعات متعددة اللغات. على الرغم من أن النمو الأخير لمستخدمي الويب قد عزز بشكل كبير استخدام مثل هذه اللغات المختلطة ، إلا أن الجيل الحالي من أنظمة الحوار أحادي اللغة في المقام الأول. هذه الزيادة في استخدام لغة مختلطة الأكواد دفعت أنظمة الحوار بلغة مماثلة. نقدم عملنا في إنشاء حوار Code-Mixed Dialog ، وهي مهمة غير مستكشفة بلغات مختلطة الأكواد ، وتولد كلمات في لغة مختلطة الأكواد بدلاً من لغة واحدة غالبًا ما تكون الإنجليزية فقط. نقدم مجموعة تركيبية جديدة في مزيج الأكواد لمربعات الحوار ، CM-DailyDialog ، عن طريق تحويل مجموعة حوار إنجليزية فقط موجودة إلى مجموعة مختلطة بين الهندية والإنجليزية. ثم نقترح نهجًا أساسيًا حيث نظهر فعالية استخدام mBART مثل محولات التسلسل إلى التسلسل متعددة اللغات لإنشاء حوار مختلط بالشفرات. يمكن لنماذج الحوار الأفضل أداءً لدينا إجراء محادثات متماسكة بلغة مختلطة بين الهندية والإنجليزية كما تم تقييمها من خلال المقاييس البشرية والتلقائية التي تضع معايير جديدة لمهمة إنشاء حوار Code-Mixed.', 'pt': 'A linguagem de código misto desempenha um papel crucial na comunicação em sociedades multilíngues. Embora o recente crescimento de usuários da web tenha impulsionado muito o uso de tais idiomas mistos, a geração atual de sistemas de diálogo é principalmente monolíngue. Esse aumento no uso de linguagem de código misto levou sistemas de diálogo em uma linguagem semelhante. Apresentamos nosso trabalho em Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, uma tarefa inexplorada em linguagens code-mixed, gerando enunciados em code-mixed language ao invés de um único idioma que é mais frequentemente apenas o inglês. Apresentamos um novo corpus sintético em code-mix para diálogos, CM-DailyDialog, convertendo um corpus de diálogo existente somente em inglês em um corpus misto hindi-inglês. Em seguida, propomos uma abordagem de linha de base onde mostramos a eficácia do uso de mBART como transformadores multilíngues de sequência a sequência para geração de diálogos de código misto. Nossos modelos de diálogo de melhor desempenho podem conduzir conversas coerentes no idioma misto hindi-inglês, conforme avaliado por métricas humanas e automáticas, definindo novos padrões para a tarefa de geração de diálogos mistos de código.', 'fr': "Le langage à code mixte joue un rôle crucial dans la communication dans les sociétés multilingues. Bien que la récente augmentation du nombre d'utilisateurs du Web ait fortement stimulé l'utilisation de ces langages mixtes, la génération actuelle de systèmes de dialogue est principalement monolingue. Cette augmentation de l'utilisation du langage à code mixte a incité les systèmes de dialogue à utiliser un langage similaire. Nous présentons notre travail dans Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, une tâche inexplorée dans les langages à code mixte, qui génère des énoncés dans un langage mixte de code plutôt que dans une seule langue qui est le plus souvent uniquement l'anglais. Nous présentons un nouveau corpus synthétique en mélange de code pour les dialogues, CM-DailyDialog, en convertissant un corpus de dialogue existant uniquement en anglais en un corpus mixte hindi-anglais. Nous proposons ensuite une approche de base dans laquelle nous montrons l'efficacité de l'utilisation de mBart comme des transformateurs séquence-séquence multilingues pour la génération de dialogues mixtes en code. Nos modèles de dialogue les plus performants peuvent mener des conversations cohérentes dans une langue mixte hindi-anglais évaluée par des mesures humaines et automatiques établissant de nouveaux points de référence pour la tâche de génération de dialogues mixtes de codes.", 'es': 'El lenguaje de código mixto desempeña un papel crucial en la comunicación en las sociedades multilingües. Aunque el reciente crecimiento de los usuarios web ha impulsado considerablemente el uso de estos lenguajes mixtos, la generación actual de sistemas de diálogo es principalmente monolingüe. Este aumento en el uso del lenguaje de código mixto ha generado sistemas de diálogo en un lenguaje similar. Presentamos nuestro trabajo en Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, una tarea inexplorada en lenguajes de código mixto, que genera enunciados en un lenguaje de código mixto en lugar de un solo idioma que, a menudo, es solo el inglés. Presentamos un nuevo corpus sintético en code-mix para diálogos, CM-DailyDialog, mediante la conversión de un corpus de diálogos existente solo en inglés en un corpus mixto hindi-inglés. A continuación, proponemos un enfoque de referencia en el que mostramos la eficacia de usar mBART como transformadores multilingües de secuencia a secuencia para la generación de diálogos de código mixto. Nuestros modelos de diálogo de mejor rendimiento pueden llevar a cabo conversaciones coherentes en idiomas mixtos hindi-inglés evaluados por métricas humanas y automáticas que establecen nuevos puntos de referencia para la tarea de generación de diálogos de código mixto.', 'ja': 'コード混合言語は、多言語社会におけるコミュニケーションにおいて重要な役割を果たしている。 最近のウェブユーザーの増加は、そのような混合言語の使用を大幅に促進しましたが、現在の世代のダイアログシステムは主に単一言語です。 コード混合言語の使用の増加は、同様の言語のダイアログシステムを促進しました。 コードミックスダイアログ生成で私たちの仕事を発表しますコードミックスダイアログジェネレーションはコードミックス言語では探索されていないタスクであり、単一の言語ではなくコードミックス言語で発話を生成します。 既存の英語のみのダイアログコーパスをヒンディー語と英語の混合コーパスに変換して、ダイアログ用のコードミックスであるCM - DailyDialogで新しい合成コーパスを提示します。 次に、コード混合ダイアログ生成のために多言語シーケンスツーシーケンストランスフォーマーのようなmBARTを使用することの有効性を示すベースラインアプローチを提案します。 当社の最高のパフォーマンスを発揮するダイアログモデルは、コードミックスダイアログ生成タスクの新しいベンチマークを設定する人間と自動測定基準によって評価されるように、ヒンディー語と英語の混合言語で一貫した会話を行うことができます。', 'hi': 'बहुभाषिक समाजों में संचार में कोड-मिश्रित भाषा एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाती है। हालांकि वेब उपयोगकर्ताओं की हालिया वृद्धि ने ऐसी मिश्रित भाषाओं के उपयोग को बहुत बढ़ावा दिया है, संवाद प्रणालियों की वर्तमान पीढ़ी मुख्य रूप से मोनोलिंगुअल है। कोड-मिश्रित भाषा के उपयोग में इस वृद्धि ने एक समान भाषा में संवाद प्रणालियों को प्रेरित किया है। हम कोड-मिश्रित संवाद पीढ़ी में अपना काम प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो कोड-मिश्रित भाषाओं में एक अनपेक्षित कार्य है, जो एक ही भाषा के बजाय कोड-मिश्रित भाषा में उच्चारण उत्पन्न करता है जो अक्सर सिर्फ अंग्रेजी होती है। हम एक मौजूदा अंग्रेजी-केवल संवाद कॉर्पस को मिश्रित हिंदी-अंग्रेजी कॉर्पस में परिवर्तित करके संवादों, सीएम-डेलीडायलॉग के लिए कोड-मिक्स में एक नया सिंथेटिक कॉर्पस प्रस्तुत करते हैं। फिर हम एक बेसलाइन दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जहां हम कोड-मिश्रित संवाद पीढ़ी के लिए बहुभाषी अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम ट्रांसफार्मर जैसे mBART का उपयोग करने की प्रभावशीलता दिखाते हैं। हमारे सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन संवाद मॉडल हिंदी-अंग्रेजी मिश्रित भाषा में सुसंगत वार्तालापों का संचालन कर सकते हैं जैसा कि मानव और स्वचालित मैट्रिक्स द्वारा मूल्यांकन किया गया है, जो कोड-मिश्रित संवाद जनरेशन कार्य के लिए नए बेंचमार्क स्थापित करते हैं।', 'zh': '代码混言多言中起至重之用也。 虽近网络用户之长,大趣其言,而一代之对,盖单语也。 代码合言者使言统用类语。 吾于代码混合言生中,此代码混合语中一未究之务,其用代码混合言语,非常英语语也。 以见英语对语料库转为印地语-英语语料库,于代码中呈一新合成语料库 CM-DailyDialog。 然后发一基线之法,示用mBART(如多语言序列于序转换器)代码混合生成之有效性。 至善之对,以印地语-英语连言,以人自指标,以代码合生成任务设新。', 'ru': 'Язык со смешанным кодом играет решающую роль в общении в многоязычных обществах. Хотя недавний рост числа пользователей Интернета значительно ускорил использование таких смешанных языков, нынешнее поколение диалоговых систем в основном является одноязычным. Это увеличение использования языка со смешанным кодом побудило диалоговые системы на аналогичном языке. Мы представляем нашу работу в Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, неизученной задаче на языках со смешанным кодом, генерируя фразы на языке со смешанным кодом, а не на одном языке, который чаще всего является просто английским. Мы представляем новый синтетический корпус в кодовом миксе для диалогов, CM-DailyDialog, путем преобразования существующего диалогового корпуса только на английском языке в смешанный хинди-английский корпус. Затем мы предлагаем базовый подход, где мы показываем эффективность использования mBART, как многоязычные трансформаторы последовательности в последовательность для создания кодо-смешанного диалога. Наши наиболее эффективные диалоговые модели могут вести согласованные беседы на смешанном языке хинди-английский язык, что оценивается с помощью человеческих и автоматических метрик, устанавливающих новые критерии для задачи создания смешанного диалога с кодом.', 'ga': 'Tá ról ríthábhachtach ag teanga cód-mheasctha sa chumarsáid i sochaithe ilteangacha. Cé gur chuir an fás atá tagtha ar líon na n-úsáideoirí gréasáin le déanaí go mór le húsáid na dteangacha measctha sin, tá an ghlúin reatha de chórais dialóige aonteangacha go príomha. Spreag an méadú seo ar úsáid teanga cód-mheasctha córais dialóige i dteanga chomhchosúil. Cuirimid ár gcuid oibre i láthair i nGiniúint Dialóige Cód-mheasctha, tasc nach bhfuil iniúchadh déanta air i dteangacha cód-mheasctha, a ghintear cainteanna i dteanga cód-mheasctha seachas teanga amháin nach bhfuil inti ach Béarla go minic. Cuirimid i láthair corpas sintéiseach nua i gcómheascán le haghaidh dialóga, CM-DailyDialog, trí chorpas dialóige Béarla amháin atá ann cheana a thiontú go corpas measctha Hiondúis-Béarla. Molaimid ansin cur chuige bonnlíne ina léirímid éifeachtacht úsáid a bhaint as BART cosúil le claochladáin ilteangacha seicheamh-go-seicheamh chun dialóg cód-mheasctha a ghiniúint. Is féidir lenár múnlaí dialóige is fearr feidhmíochta comhráite comhleanúnacha a dhéanamh i dteanga mheasctha Hiondúis-Bhéarla arna measúnú ag méadracht dhaonna agus uathoibríoch ag socrú tagarmharcanna nua don tasc Giniúint Dialóige Cód-Mheasctha.', 'hu': 'A kódkevert nyelv kulcsfontosságú szerepet játszik a többnyelvű társadalmak kommunikációjában. Bár a webfelhasználók közelmúltbeli növekedése nagymértékben fellendítette az ilyen vegyes nyelvek használatát, a párbeszédrendszerek jelenlegi generációja elsősorban egynyelvű. A kódkevert nyelv használatának növekedése hasonló nyelvű párbeszédrendszereket eredményezett. Munkánkat a kódkevert párbeszéd generációban mutatjuk be, amely egy feltáratlan feladat kódkevert nyelvekben, amelyek kódkevert nyelven hoznak létre, nem pedig egyetlen, gyakrabban csak angol nyelven. Bemutatunk egy új szintetikus korpuszt a párbeszédpanelek kódkeverékében, a CM-DailyDialogot, amely egy meglévő angol nyelvű párbeszédkorpuszt vegyes hindi-angol korpuszá alakít át. Ezt követően egy alapvető megközelítést javasolunk, ahol bemutatjuk az mBART használatának hatékonyságát, mint például a többnyelvű szekvencia-szekvencia transzformátorok a kódkevert párbeszéd generálásához. Legjobb teljesítményű párbeszédmodelljeink következetes beszélgetéseket folytathatnak hindi-angol vegyes nyelven, ahogy azt emberi és automatikus mutatók értékelik, új referenciaértékeket állítva fel a Kód-vegyes párbeszéd generálása feladathoz.', 'el': 'Η μικτή γλώσσα κώδικα διαδραματίζει καθοριστικό ρόλο στην επικοινωνία σε πολυγλωσσικές κοινωνίες. Αν και η πρόσφατη ανάπτυξη των χρηστών του διαδικτύου έχει ενισχύσει σημαντικά τη χρήση τέτοιων μικτών γλωσσών, η τρέχουσα γενιά των συστημάτων διαλόγου είναι κυρίως μονογλωσσικά. Αυτή η αύξηση στη χρήση της μικτής γλώσσας κώδικα έχει προκαλέσει συστήματα διαλόγου σε παρόμοια γλώσσα. Παρουσιάζουμε τη δουλειά μας στη Δημιουργία Διαλόγων Κωδικού, μια ανεξερεύνητη εργασία σε γλώσσες μικτού κώδικα, δημιουργώντας εκφράσεις σε γλώσσα μικτού κώδικα και όχι σε μία γλώσσα που είναι πιο συχνά απλά αγγλικά. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο συνθετικό σώμα σε συνδυασμό κωδικών για διαλόγους, μετατρέποντας ένα υπάρχον μόνο αγγλικό σώμα διαλόγου σε μικτό ινδικό-αγγλικό σώμα. Στη συνέχεια προτείνουμε μια βασική προσέγγιση όπου καταδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της χρήσης του όπως πολύγλωσσοι μετασχηματιστές ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας για τη δημιουργία διαλόγου μικτού κώδικα. Τα μοντέλα διαλόγου με τις καλύτερες επιδόσεις μας μπορούν να διεξάγουν συνεκτικές συζητήσεις σε ινδική-αγγλική μικτή γλώσσα, όπως αξιολογούνται από ανθρώπινες και αυτόματες μετρήσεις, θέτοντας νέα κριτήρια αναφοράς για την εργασία Δημιουργία μικτού διαλόγου κώδικα.', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური საზოგადოებში კომუნიკაციაში მნიშვნელოვანი ენაში მნიშვნელოვანი პროლია. თუმცა საბოლოო მომხმარებლის ბოლო წარმოდგენების გამოყენებას ძალიან უფრო მეტივსია, მიმდინარე დიალოგის სისტემის წარმოდგენება უფრო მნოლოენგიური. Name ჩვენ ჩვენი სამუშაო Code-Mixed Dialog Generation-ში გამოჩვენებთ, არაფერი სამუშაო სამუშაო სიტყვებში, რომელიც კოდის შემცირებული ენაში გამოყენება, არც ერთი ენაში, რომელიც უფრო მეტი ანგლი ჩვენ ახალი სინტეტიკური კორპუსს კოდიალოგების შესახებ CM-DailyDialog-ის შეცვლით, მხოლოდ ინგლისური დიალოგური კორპუსს შესაძლებელად შეცვლით ინგლისური კორპუსში. შემდეგ ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ფესტური პროგრამა, სადაც ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ მბაRT გამოყენების ეფექტიურობას, როგორც მრავალენგური პროგრამის შემდეგების ჩვენი საუკეთესო დიალოგის მოდელები შეუძლიათ გავაკეთოთ კოდენტური პარამეტრები ინგლისური სიტყვის, როგორც ადამიანის და ავტომატიკური მეტრიკის გაუმუშავებულია, როგორც ახალი ბანქმერ', 'it': "Il linguaggio misto di codici svolge un ruolo cruciale nella comunicazione nelle società multilingue. Anche se la recente crescita di utenti web ha notevolmente aumentato l'uso di tali linguaggi misti, l'attuale generazione di sistemi di dialogo è principalmente monolingue. Questo aumento nell'uso del linguaggio misto di codice ha richiesto sistemi di dialogo in una lingua simile. Presentiamo il nostro lavoro in Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, un compito inesplorato in linguaggi code-mixed, generando espressioni in linguaggio code-mixed piuttosto che in una singola lingua che più spesso è solo inglese. Presentiamo un nuovo corpus sintetico in code-mix per dialoghi, CM-DailyDialog, convertendo un corpus di dialogo esistente solo in inglese in un corpus misto hindi-inglese. Proponiamo quindi un approccio di base in cui mostriamo l'efficacia dell'utilizzo di mBART come trasformatori multilingue sequenza-sequenza per la generazione di dialoghi misti di codice. I nostri modelli di dialogo più performanti possono condurre conversazioni coerenti in lingua mista hindi-inglese valutate da metriche umane e automatiche impostando nuovi parametri di riferimento per l'attività Code-Mixed Dialog Generation.", 'ms': 'Bahasa campuran-kod bermain peran penting dalam komunikasi dalam masyarakat berbilang bahasa. Though the recent growth of web users has greatly boosted the use of such mixed languages, the current generation of dialog systems is primarily monolingual.  Peningkatan ini dalam penggunaan bahasa-campuran kod telah meminta sistem dialog dalam bahasa yang sama. Kami memperkenalkan kerja kami dalam Jenerasi Dialog Bercampuran Kod, tugas yang tidak dikenalpasti dalam bahasa-campuran kod, menghasilkan ungkapan dalam bahasa-campuran kod daripada bahasa tunggal yang lebih sering hanya bahasa Inggeris. Kami perkenalkan korpus sintetik baru dalam campuran-kod untuk dialog, CM-DailyDialog, dengan menukar korpus dialog bahasa Inggeris sahaja yang wujud ke korpus bahasa Hindi-Inggeris campuran. Kemudian kita cadangkan pendekatan asas di mana kita menunjukkan keefektivitas menggunakan mBART seperti pengubah urutan-ke-urutan berbilang bahasa untuk generasi dialog-campuran kod. Model dialog yang berkesan terbaik kami boleh menjalankan perbualan yang konsisten dalam bahasa campuran Hindi-Inggeris seperti diuji oleh metrik manusia dan automatik menetapkan tanda rujukan baru untuk tugas Jenerasi Dialog Bercampuran Kod.', 'kk': 'Код араластырылған тілдер көп тіл қоғамдарында байланыстыру үшін маңызды роль ойлады. Жуырдағы Веб пайдаланушылардың өсімі бұл түрлі тілдерді қолдануға көп көмектескен болса да, қазіргі диалог жүйелерін құру негізінде бірнеше тілі болады. Бұл код араластырылған тілді қолдануды ұқсас тілде сұралған диалог жүйелері болады. Біз жұмыстарымызды Code-Mixed Dialog жасау диалогында, код араластырылған тілдерде түсінбеген тапсырманы, код араластырылған тілде сөздерді жасап, жалғыз тілде жалғыз тілдерді жасау орнына. Біз диалог CM- DailyDialog үшін жаңа синтетикалық корпус арқылы, тек ағылшын тілінде тек диалог корпус арқылы инду- ағылшын корпус түрленгенге аударып, корпус береміз. Содан кейін, көп тілді реттеу диалогты жасау үшін көптеген диалогты түрлендірушілер секілді mBART қолданудың эффективнігін көрсетеді. Біздің ең жақсы орындалған диалог үлгілеріміз, адамдар мен автоматты метрикалық бағалау үшін жаңа диалог жасау тапсырмасының жаңа тегіс белгілерін баптау үшін инду-ағылшын тілде сәйкес сөйлес', 'ml': 'കോഡ് മിഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ പല ഭാഷകളുടെ സമൂഹത്തില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷയുണ്ട്. വെബ് ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള വൃദ്ധിയാണെങ്കിലും ഇത്തരം ഭാഷകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനെ വളരെ പ്രാധാന്യം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിച്ചി കോഡ് മിഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഇത് ഒരു പോലുള്ള ഭാഷയില്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റമുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ ജോലിയെ കോഡ്-മിക്സിഡ് ഡയലോഗ് ജനറനേഷനില്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. കോഡ് മിക്കില്ലാത്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ഒരു ജോലി ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ഒരേ ഭാഷയില്\u200d വാക് നിലവിലുള്ള ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് മാത്രമേ ഡയലോഗ് മാറ്റുന്നുള്ള ഒരു ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ മിഷ്ടപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d പ്രോഗ്രാന്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതില്\u200d MBART ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിക്കുന്നു. പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളു നമ്മുടെ മികച്ച ഡയലോഗ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഹിന്ദി- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് മിഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷയില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും. മനുഷ്യനും സ്വയമായ മെറ്റിക്കുകള്\u200d പുതിയ ബെന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Il-lingwa mħallta mal-kodiċi għandha rwol kruċjali fil-komunikazzjoni fis-soċjetajiet multilingwi. Għalkemm it-tkabbir reċenti tal-utenti tal-internet żied ħafna l-użu ta’ tali lingwi mħallta, il-ġenerazzjoni attwali ta’ sistemi ta’ djalogu hija primarjament monolingwi. Din iż-żieda fl-użu tal-lingwa mħallta bil-kodiċi wasslet għal sistemi ta’ djalogu f’lingwa simili. Aħna nippreżentaw ix-xogħol tagħna fil-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Djalogu Mħallat bil-Kodiċi, kompitu mhux esplorat fil-lingwi mħallta bil-kodiċi, li jiġġenera dikjarazzjonijiet fil-lingwa mħallta bil-kodiċi minflok lingwa waħda li ħafna drabi hija biss l-Ingliż. Aħna nippreżentaw korpus sintetiku ġdid fit-taħlita ta’ kodiċijiet għad-djalogi, CM-DailyDialog, billi nibdlu korpus eżistenti ta’ djalogu Ingliż biss f’korpus Ingliż-Indjan imħallat. Imbagħad nipproponu approċċ bażiku fejn nuru l-effettività tal-użu tal-mBART bħal trasformaturi multilingwi minn sekwenza għal sekwenza għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ djalogu mħallat b’kodiċi. Il-mudelli tagħna ta’ djalogu bl-aħjar prestazzjoni jistgħu jwettqu konverżjonijiet koerenti fil-lingwa mħallta Indja-Ingliża kif evalwati permezz ta’ metrika umana u awtomatika li tistabbilixxi punti ta’ riferiment ġodda għall-kompitu ta’ Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Djalogu Mħallta bil-Kodiċi.', 'no': 'Name Selv om den siste veksten av nettbrukarar har styrket bruk av slike blandespråk, er det gjeldande generering av dialogsystemet hovudsakelig monospråk. Denne økninga i bruk av kodefeksa språk har spurt om dialogsystemet i eit liknande språk. Vi viser arbeidet vårt i generering av dialogvindauget med kodeflikt, eit utforskar oppgåve i kodeflikt språk, og lagar uttaler i kodeflikt språk i staden for ei enkelt språk som er oftast bare engelsk. Vi presenterer eit nytt syntetisk korpus i kode-mix for dialogvindauge CM-DailyDialog ved å konvertera eit eksisterande engelsk-berre dialogkorpus til ein blandet hindisk-engelsk korpus. Vi foreslår derfor ein baseline tilnærming der vi viser effektiviteten for å bruka mBART som fleirspråk sekvens-til-sekvens-transformatorar for generering av dialogvindauget med kodeflikt. Våre beste utføringsmodular for dialogvindauget kan gjere samsvarande samtaler i hindisk-engelsk blandespråk som er evaluert av menneske og automatiske metrikar som setter nye benchmarker for oppgåva for generering av dialogvindauget.', 'mn': 'Кодын холбоотой хэл олон хэл нийгэмд холбоотой чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Веб хэрэглэгчдийн саяхан өсөлт нь ийм төвөгтэй хэлнүүдийг ашиглаж маш их дэвшүүлсэн ч одоогийн үеийн диалог систем нь анхны хэл хэлний хэл болно. Код холбогдсон хэлний хэрэглээний нэмэлт нь төстэй хэл дээр диалог системүүдийг санал болгож байна. Код-холбогдсон диалог төрөлхтний ажлыг код-холбогдсон хэл дээр тайлбарлаагүй ажил бий болгодог. Код-холбогдсон хэл дээр илүү ихэвчлэн англи хэлээс илүү олон хэл бий болгодог. Бид шинэ синтетик корпус, CM-DailyDialog-ын код-холбоотой диалог дээр оршиж буй Англи хэлний зөвхөн диалог корпус руу холбоотой хинди-Англи корпус руу шилжүүлж байна. Тэгээд бид мBART-г олон хэл дарааллын дарааллаар кодлог холбогдсон диалог бүтээгдэхүүний үр дүнг харуулахын тулд суурь шулууны арга замыг санал болгож байна. Бидний хамгийн шилдэг диалог загварууд нь Хинди-Англи хэл дээр холбоотой ярилцлага хийж чадна. Хүн болон автоматикийн метрикийн хувьд Код-Mixed Dialog Generation Task-д шинэ салбаруудыг тавьж чадна.', 'pl': 'Język mieszany kodem odgrywa kluczową rolę w komunikacji w społeczeństwach wielojęzycznych. Chociaż ostatni wzrost liczby użytkowników internetowych znacznie przyczynił się do korzystania z takich języków mieszanych, obecna generacja systemów dialogowych jest przede wszystkim jednojęzyczna. Ten wzrost użycia języka mieszanego kodem spowodował, że systemy dialogowe w podobnym języku. Przedstawiamy naszą pracę w Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, niezbadanym zadaniu w językach mieszanych kodem, generującym wypowiedzi w języku mieszanym kodem, a nie w jednym języku, który częściej jest tylko angielskim. Przedstawiamy nowy syntetyczny korpus w kodzie-mix dla dialogów, CM-DailyDialog, poprzez konwersję istniejącego korpusu dialogowego tylko angielskiego na mieszany korpus hindi-angielski. Następnie proponujemy podejście bazowe, w którym pokazujemy skuteczność wykorzystania mBART jak wielojęzyczne transformatory sekwencji-sekwencji do generowania dialogów mieszanych kodem. Nasze najlepiej wydajne modele dialogowe mogą prowadzić spójne rozmowy w języku mieszanym hindi-angielskim oceniane przez człowieka i automatyczne wskaźniki ustalające nowe punkty odniesienia dla zadania Generowanie dialogów mieszanych kodem.', 'ro': 'Limbajul mixt de coduri joacă un rol crucial în comunicarea în societățile multilingve. Deși creșterea recentă a utilizatorilor web a sporit considerabil utilizarea unor astfel de limbi mixte, generația actuală de sisteme de dialog este în principal monolingvă. Această creștere a utilizării limbajului amestecat de coduri a determinat sisteme de dialog într-o limbă similară. Vă prezentăm lucrările noastre în Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, o sarcină neexplorată în limbi amestecate de coduri, generând cuvinte în limbaj amestecat de coduri, mai degrabă decât într-o singură limbă care este mai adesea doar engleză. Prezentăm un nou corpus sintetic în mix de coduri pentru dialoguri, CM-DailyDialog, prin conversia unui corpus de dialog existent numai în limba engleză într-un corpus mixt hindi-engleză. Apoi propunem o abordare de bază în cazul în care arătăm eficiența utilizării mBART ca transformatoare secvență-secvență multilingvă pentru generarea dialogurilor mixte de cod. Modelele noastre de dialog cu cele mai bune performanțe pot purta conversații coerente în limba mixtă hindi-engleză, evaluate prin măsurători umane și automate, stabilind noi criterii de referință pentru activitatea de generare a dialogurilor mixte coduri.', 'si': 'Name වෙබ් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ගේ අන්තිම විශාලය ගොඩක් විශාලය කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, මේ වගේ භාෂාවන්ගේ භාෂාව භාවිතාව Name අපි කෝඩ් මික්ස් සංවාදයක් සිද්ධා කරනවා, කෝඩ් මික්ස් භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති වැඩක්, කෝඩ් මික්ස් භාෂාවට කෝඩ් මික්ස අපි අළුත් සංවාද කෝඩ් මික්ස් වෙනුවෙන් අලුත් සංවාද කොර්පස් එකක් පෙන්වන්නේ, CM-Daylydialog, ඉන්ග්\u200dරීසි විතරයෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සං අපි පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා කෝඩ් මික්ස් සංවාදය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ mBART භාවිතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න අපේ හොඳම සංවාදයේ සංවාදය මොඩල් එක්ක සංවාදය කරන්න පුළුවන් හින්දී ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාවේ සංවාදය කරනවා මිනිස්සු සහ ස්වයංක්\u200dරී', 'mk': 'Мешаниот јазик игра клучна улога во комуникацијата во мултијазичните општества. Though the recent growth of web users has greatly boosted the use of such mixed languages, the current generation of dialog systems is primarily monolingual.  Овој зголемување на употребата на мешаниот јазик со код предизвика дијалошки системи на сличен јазик. Ние ја претставуваме нашата работа во генерација на мешан дијалог со код, неиспитана задача на мешан јазик со код, генерајќи изрази на мешан јазик со код наместо еден јазик кој е често само англиски. Презентираме нов синтетички корпус во код- мекс за дијалози, CM- DailyDialog, со претворање на постоечкиот англиски дијалог корпус во мешан хинди- англиски корпус. Потоа предложуваме основен пристап каде што ја покажуваме ефективноста на користењето на mBART како мултијазички трансформатори од секвенца до секвенца за генерација на дијалог со мешан код. Our best performing dialog models can conduct coherent conversations in Hindi-English mixed language as evaluated by human and automatic metrics setting new benchmarks for the Code-Mixed Dialog Generation task.', 'lt': 'Kodeksų mišrioji kalba atlieka labai svarbų vaidmenį komunikacijoje daugiakalbėse visuomenėse. Though the recent growth of web users has greatly boosted the use of such mixed languages, the current generation of dialog systems is primarily monolingual.  Šis padidėjęs kodų mišrios kalbos naudojimas paskatino dialogo sistemas panašia kalba. Mes pristatome savo darbą kodų mišriojo dialogo generacijoje, neišnagrinėtoje užduotyje kodų mišriomis kalbomis, sukuriant žodžius kodų mišrioje kalboje, o ne vieną kalbą, kuri dažniau yra tik anglų kalba. Mes pristatome naują sintetinį korpusą dialog ų kodų derinyje, CM- DailyDialog, konvertuodami esamą tik anglų dialogo korpusą į mišrų anglų ir Hindi korpusą. Tuomet pasiūlysime bazinį metodą, kuriame parodysime mBART naudojimo veiksmingumą kaip daugiakalbiai sekos į seką transformatoriai kodų mišriam dialogui generuoti. Mūsų geriausiai veikiantys dialogo modeliai gali nuosekliai kalbėti Hindi ir anglų kalbomis mišriomis kalbomis, kaip vertinama žmogaus ir automatinėmis metrijomis, nustatančiomis naujus kriterijus mišriojo dialogo generavimo uždaviniui.', 'so': 'Luqada koowaad ee isku xiran ayaa qayb muhiim ah ku ciyaariya ku xiriirka bulshada luuqadaha kala duduwan. In kastoo waqtiga ugu dambeeyay koritaanka isticmaalayaasha internetka ayaa aad u kordhisay isticmaalka luuqadaha kala duduwan, qarniga soo socda ee nidaamka dialogka waa sida caadiga ah moolooyinka. Kaas ku kordhiya isticmaalka luqada kooxda isku xiran waxay sababtay nidaamka dialogka oo ku qoran luqada oo isku mid ah. Waxaannu shaqadeenna ku soo bandhignaynaa qoraalka isku qasnaan, taas oo ah shaqo a an la shaqeyn karin luuqadaha kooxaha lagu kala duwan, oo ah hadal ku qoran luuqada kooxda, taasoo ka abuuraya luuqad keliya oo af Ingiriis ka badan. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qof cusub oo ku qoran koox-mix dialog, CM-DailyDialog, marka lagu beddelo qoraalka Ingiriiska oo kaliya oo ku qoran korpus oo isku qasan Hindi-Ingiriis. Markaas waxaynu soo jeedinnaa qaab hoose ah oo aynu tusno effektada isticmaalka mBART, sida isbedelka kala duduwan xilliga kala duduwan-ilaa-xilliga u dhigida danbiyada dialog-ku-xiran. Tusaalada diyaarinta ee ugu wanaagsan ayaa ku sameyn kara luuqadaha isku qasan ee Hindi-Ingiriis, sida loo qiimeynayo dadka iyo maamul-ka-dhaqdhaqaaqa ah oo loo sameynayo kaarar cusub oo u sameynaya shaqada dhaqanka kooxda.', 'sv': 'Kodblandat språk spelar en avgörande roll i kommunikationen i flerspråkiga samhällen. Även om den senaste tidens tillväxt av webbanvändare kraftigt har ökat användningen av sådana blandade språk, är den nuvarande generationen av dialogsystem främst enspråkiga. Denna ökning av användningen av kodblandat språk har föranlett dialogsystem på ett liknande språk. Vi presenterar vårt arbete i Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, en outforskad uppgift i kodblandade språk, som genererar yttranden i kodblandat språk snarare än ett enda språk som oftast bara är engelska. Vi presenterar en ny syntetisk korpus i kodmix för dialoger, CM-DailyDialog, genom att konvertera en befintlig engelsk-engelsk korpus till en blandad hindi-engelsk korpus. Vi föreslår sedan en baslinje där vi visar effektiviteten av att använda mBART som flerspråkiga sekvens-till-sekvenstransformatorer för kodblandad dialog generering. Våra bäst presterande dialogmodeller kan föra sammanhängande konversationer på hindi-engelska blandat språk som utvärderas av mänskliga och automatiska mätvärden som sätter nya riktmärken för uppgiften Kodblandad dialoggenerering.', 'ur': "کڈ میکس زبان بہت سی زبان اجتماعوں میں اہم رغم لگا رہی ہے۔ Though web users' recent growth has greatly increased the use of such mixed languages, the current generation of dialog systems is primarily monolingual. یہ کوڈ میکسٹ زبان کے استعمال میں زیادہ بڑھتا ہے ایک جیسی زبان میں ڈالیلوگ سیسٹم کو پوچھتا ہے. ہم اپنے کام کو Code-Mixed Dialog Generation میں پیش کرتے ہیں، کوڈ میکس زبانوں میں ایک غیر منفجر کا کام، کوڈ میکس زبانوں میں کلمات پیدا کرتے ہیں، ایک زبان کے بدلے جو بہت زیادہ اکثر انگلیسی زبان ہے۔ ہم نے ایک نوی سینٹیسی کورپوس کو کڈ میکس میں ڈالیلوگوں کے لئے، CM-DailyDialog میں پیش کیا ہے، ایک موجود انگلیسی صرف ڈالیلوگو کورپوس کو ایک میکس هندی-انگلیسی کورپوس میں تبدیل کر دیا ہے. پھر ہم ایک بنسس لین طریقہ پیش کریں جہاں ہم mBART کے مطابق مثبت دکھاتے ہیں جیسے multilingual sequence-to-sequence تبدیل کرنے والے کوڈ-mixed dialog generation کے لئے. ہمارے سب سے بہترین کاربردار ڈالیلوگ موڈل ہینڈی-انگلیسی کی مختلف زبان میں مشترک باتیں کر سکتے ہیں جس طرح انسان اور اتوماتیک میٹریک کے ذریعے مطابق نو بنچم مارک بناتے ہیں", 'sr': 'Komunikacija u multijezičkim društvima ima ključnu ulogu u komunikaciji. Iako je nedavni rast korisnika interneta veoma povećao korištenje takvih mješanih jezika, trenutna generacija dijalogskih sistema je glavno monojezički. Ovaj povećanje korištenja jezika mešanog koda zahteva sisteme dijaloga na sličnom jeziku. Predstavljamo svoj rad u generaciji "Kod-Mixed Dialog", neočekivan zadatak na jezicima mešanim kodom, stvarajući reči na jeziku mešanom kodom umjesto jednog jezika koji je češće samo engleski. Predstavljamo novi sintetički korpus u kombinaciji koda za dijaloge, CM-DailyDialog, preobraćajući postojeći engleski jedini dijalogski korpus u mixed Hindi-English corpus. Onda predlažemo početni pristup u kojem pokažemo efikasnost korištenja mBART kao multijezički transformatori sekvence do sekvence za generaciju dijaloga kombinirane kod. Naši najbolji izvršni modeli dijaloga mogu voditi saslušan razgovor na Hindi-engleskom miješanom jeziku kako su procjenjivali ljudska i automatska metrika, postavljajući nove kritike za zadatak Generacije dijaloga između koda.', 'ta': 'குறியீடு கலக்கப்பட்ட மொழி பல மொழிகளில் தொடர்புகளில் ஒரு முக்கியமான பங்கை விளையாடுகிறது. இந்த கலப்பு மொழிகளின் பயன்பாட்டை மிகவும் அதிகப்படுத்தியிருக்கும் போது இது குறியீடு கலக்கப்பட்ட மொழியின் பயன்பாட்டில் அதிகரிக்கும் போன்ற மொழியில் உரையாடல் அமைப்புகளை தேவை நாங்கள் குறியீடு-கலக்கப்பட்ட உரையாடல் உருவாக்கத்தில் எங்கள் வேலையை காண்பிக்கிறோம், ஒரு குறியீடு கலக்கப்பட்ட மொழிகளில் ஒரு வார்த்தைகளை உரு நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய கூட்டிணைப்பு குறியீட்டு கலந்த உரையாடல், சிஎம்- டேயில் உரையாடல், இருக்கும் ஆங்கிலத்தில் மட்டும் உரையாடல் கோர்ப்ஸை கலந்த பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு அடிப்படைக்கோட்டின் செயல்பாட்டை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கிறோம் அதில் நாம் MBART பயன்படுத்தும் விளைவை காட்டுகிறோம் பல மொ Our best performing dialog models can conduct coherent conversations in Hindi-English mixed language as evaluated by human and automatic metrics setting new benchmarks for the Code-Mixed Dialog Generation task.', 'uz': "Kodlash mix tili multili jamiyatlarda muloqat jamiyatlarda bog'liq roli o'ylayapti. Agar web foydalanuvchilar eng yaqinda ko'proq bir qanchalik minglab tillardan foydalanishni oshirib boʻlsa, joriy muloqat tizimi tuzasi aslida monolingul. @ info Biz qanday ishimizni kodlash Dialog Generatida hozir qilamiz, ko'paytirilgan tillarda noto'ylab boʻlmagan vazifa, bir tilni qodlash tilidan qodlash tilini yaratish, bu bir tilni ko'proq ingliz tilidan yaratish. Biz muvaffaqiyatlar uchun yangi syntetik kodlash orqali qodlash uchun yangi kompyuter hosil qilamiz, CM-DailyDialog, mavjud bo'lgan ingliz tilida faqat muloqat oynasini Hindi- Inglizchaga bir qanchalik kopusga aylantirish mumkin. We then propose a baseline approach where we show the effectiveness of using mBART like multilingual sequence-to-sequence transformers for code-mixed dialog generation.  Bizning eng yuqori muloqat modellarimiz Hindi- Ingliz tilidagi bir xil muloqotlarni ishga tushirishi mumkin. Inson va avtomatik metrikalarni qiymatlashtirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Mã lẫn lộn ngôn ngữ đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong giao tiếp trong xã hội đa dạng. Mặc dù sự phát triển gần đây của người dùng web đã tăng cường khả năng sử dụng ngôn ngữ đa dạng như vậy, nhưng hệ thống hộp thoại hiện thời là độc ngôn ngữ. Sự tăng cường sử dụng ngôn ngữ hỗn hợp đã tạo ra hệ thống thoại bằng ngôn ngữ tương tự. Chúng tôi giới thiệu công việc của chúng tôi trong Thế hệ Phân phối mã, một nhiệm vụ chưa được khám phá tại các ngôn ngữ khác nhau, tạo ra những lời phát ra bằng ngôn ngữ khác nhau hơn là một ngôn ngữ đơn giản hơn. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập đoàn tổng hợp mới trong hỗn hợp mã cho các tạp chí quay số, CM-DailyDialogo, bằng cách chuyển đổi một hộp thoại chỉ ra tiếng Anh hiện có thành tập thể tiếng Hindi. Sau đó chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp cơ bản để hiển thị hiệu quả của việc sử dụng mBART như bộ chuyển hóa chuỗi-tới-trình-lập nhiều để tạo ra hộp thoại hỗn hợp mã. Các mô hình thoại trình diễn tốt nhất có thể thực hiện các cuộc trò chuyện liên quan bằng ngôn ngữ trộn tiếng Hindi, được đánh giá bởi con người và máy đo định giới hạn mới cho nhiệm vụ Thế hệ hộp thoại hoà giải mã.', 'da': 'Kodeblandet sprog spiller en afgørende rolle i kommunikationen i flersprogede samfund. Selvom den seneste vækst af webbrugere i høj grad har øget brugen af sådanne blandede sprog, er den nuværende generation af dialogsystemer primært ensprogede. Denne stigning i brugen af kodeblandet sprog har givet dialogsystemer på et lignende sprog. Vi præsenterer vores arbejde i Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, en uudforsket opgave i kodeblandede sprog, der genererer udtalelser i kodeblandede sprog snarere end et enkelt sprog, der oftere bare er engelsk. Vi præsenterer et nyt syntetisk korpus i kode-mix for dialoger, CM-DailyDialog, ved at konvertere et eksisterende engelsk-kun dialogkorpus til et blandet hindi-engelsk korpus. Vi foreslår derefter en baseline tilgang, hvor vi viser effektiviteten af at bruge mBART som flersprogede sekvens-til-sekvens transformere til kode-blandet dialog generering. Vores bedst ydende dialogmodeller kan gennemføre sammenhængende samtaler på hindi-engelsk blandet sprog som evalueret af menneskelige og automatiske målinger, der sætter nye benchmarks for opgaven Code-Mixed Dialog Generation.', 'hr': 'U komunikaciji u multijezičkim društvima imaju ključnu ulogu mešanog jezika. Iako je nedavni rast internetskih korisnika veoma povećao korištenje takvih mješanih jezika, trenutna generacija dijalogskih sustava primarno je monojezički. Ovaj povećanje korištenja jezika pomiješanog koda zahtijeva sisteme dijaloga na sličnom jeziku. Predstavljamo svoj rad u generaciji dijaloga koji je pomiješan kod, neočekivan zadatak na jezicima koji su pomiješani kod, stvarajući govore na jeziku koji je pomiješan kod umjesto jednog jezika koji je češće samo engleski. Predstavljamo novi sintetički korpus u kombinaciji koda za dijaloge, CM-DailyDialog, preobraćajući postojeći engleski jedini dijalogski korpus u pomiješan Hindi-engleski korpus. Onda predlažemo početni pristup u kojem pokazujemo učinkovitost korištenja mBART kao multijezički sekvenčni transformatori za generaciju dijaloga kombiniranog kod. Naši najbolji izvršni modeli dijaloga mogu voditi saslužene razgovore na Hindi-engleskom mješenom jeziku kako su procjenjivali ljudska i automatska metrika, postavljajući nove kriterije za zadatak Generacije dijaloga između kodova.', 'bg': 'Код-смесеният език играе решаваща роля в комуникацията в многоезичните общества. Въпреки че неотдавнашният растеж на уеб потребителите значително стимулира използването на такива смесени езици, сегашното поколение диалогови системи е предимно едноезично. Това увеличение на използването на език, смесен с кодове, подтиква диалогови системи на подобен език. Представяме нашата работа в генериране на кодово смесен диалог, неизследвана задача в кодово смесени езици, генериране на изказвания на кодово смесен език, а не на един език, който по-често е само английски. Представяме нов синтетичен корпус в кодов микс за диалози, като преобразуваме съществуващ само английски диалогов корпус в смесен хинди-английски корпус. След това предлагаме базов подход, при който показваме ефективността на използването на многоезични трансформатори последователност към последователност за генериране на диалогов диалог със смесен код. Нашите най-ефективни диалогови модели могат да провеждат съгласувани разговори на хинди-английски смесен език, оценени чрез човешки и автоматични показатели, задаващи нови показатели за задачата Създаване на смесен диалог с кодове.', 'nl': 'Codegemengde taal speelt een cruciale rol in de communicatie in meertalige samenlevingen. Hoewel de recente groei van webgebruikers het gebruik van dergelijke gemengde talen sterk heeft bevorderd, is de huidige generatie dialoogsystemen voornamelijk eentalig. Deze toename van het gebruik van code-gemengde taal heeft geleid tot dialoogsystemen in een vergelijkbare taal. We presenteren ons werk in Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, een onontdekte taak in code-gemengde talen, het genereren van uitspraken in code-gemengde taal in plaats van een enkele taal die vaker alleen Engels is. We presenteren een nieuw synthetisch corpus in code-mix voor dialogen, CM-DailyDialog, door een bestaand enkel Engels dialoogcorpus om te zetten naar een gemengd Hindi-Engels corpus. Vervolgens stellen we een basisbenadering voor waarin we de effectiviteit van het gebruik van mBART zoals meertalige sequentie-naar-sequentie transformatoren tonen voor code-gemengde dialoog generatie. Onze best presterende dialoogmodellen kunnen coherente gesprekken voeren in Hindi-Engels gemengde taal, zoals geëvalueerd door menselijke en automatische metrics, waardoor nieuwe benchmarks worden ingesteld voor de taak Code-Mixed Dialoggeneratie.', 'de': 'Code-Mixed Language spielt eine entscheidende Rolle in der Kommunikation in mehrsprachigen Gesellschaften. Obwohl das jüngste Wachstum von Web-Nutzern die Verwendung solcher gemischten Sprachen stark gefördert hat, ist die aktuelle Generation von Dialogsystemen hauptsächlich einsprachig. Diese Zunahme der Verwendung von Code-Mixed Language hat Dialogsysteme in einer ähnlichen Sprache veranlasst. Wir präsentieren unsere Arbeit in Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, einer unerforschten Aufgabe in Code-Mixed Languages, die Äußerungen in Code-Mixed Language anstatt einer einzigen Sprache erzeugt, die häufiger nur Englisch ist. Wir präsentieren ein neues synthetisches Korpus im Code-Mix für Dialoge, CM-DailyDialog, indem wir ein bestehendes Dialogkorpus nur Englisch in ein gemischtes Hindi-Englisch-Korpus umwandeln. Anschließend schlagen wir einen Basisansatz vor, bei dem wir die Effektivität der Verwendung von mBART wie mehrsprachige Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Transformatoren für die Codemixed Dialoggenerierung aufzeigen. Unsere leistungsfähigsten Dialogmodelle können kohärente Gespräche in Hindi-Englisch gemischter Sprache führen, die anhand menschlicher und automatischer Metriken ausgewertet werden und neue Maßstäbe für die Aufgabe Code-Mixed Dialog Generation setzen.', 'id': 'Bahasa campuran kode bermain peran penting dalam komunikasi di masyarakat berbilang bahasa. Meskipun pertumbuhan pengguna web baru-baru ini telah meningkatkan penggunaan bahasa campuran seperti ini, generasi semasa sistem dialog adalah utama monobahasa. Peningkatan ini dalam penggunaan bahasa campuran kode telah meminta sistem dialog dalam bahasa yang sama. Kami mempersembahkan pekerjaan kami dalam Generasi Dialog Bercampuran Kode, tugas yang tidak dikenalpasti dalam bahasa-campuran kode, menghasilkan ucapan dalam bahasa-campuran kode daripada bahasa tunggal yang lebih sering hanya bahasa Inggris. Kami mempersembahkan korpus sintetik baru dalam campuran kode untuk dialog, CM-DailyDialog, dengan mengubah korpus dialog bahasa Inggris sahaja yang ada ke korpus Hindi-Inggris campuran. Kemudian kami mengusulkan pendekatan dasar di mana kami menunjukkan efektivitas menggunakan mBART seperti transformator berbilang-bahasa untuk generasi dialog-campuran kode. Model dialog yang paling berhasil kami dapat melakukan percakapan yang konsisten dalam bahasa campuran Hindi-Inggris seperti yang diuji oleh metrik manusia dan otomatis menetapkan benchmark baru untuk tugas Generasi Dialog campuran Kode.', 'sw': 'Lugha yenye mchanganyiko wa sheria inacheza nafasi muhimu katika mawasiliano katika jamii za lugha mbalimbali. Ingawa ukuaji wa hivi karibuni wa watumiaji wa mtandao umekuzidisha matumizi ya lugha kama hizi tofauti, kizazi cha sasa cha mifumo ya mazungumzo ni lugha ya msingi. Ongezeko hili la matumizi ya lugha inayochanganyika imesababisha mfumo wa dialog kwa lugha inayofanana. Tunaweza kuweka kazi zetu katika Generation of Dialogue Mijingo, kazi isiyotengenezwa kwa lugha tofauti, kutengeneza hotuba kwa lugha tofauti ya kodi badala ya lugha moja ambayo mara nyingi ni Kiingereza tu. Tunaonyesha makampuni mpya ya ushirikiano katika mchanganyiko wa mijadala, CM-DailyDialog, kwa kuigeuza mazungumzo yanayopo na Kiingereza pekee yanayochanganyika kwa makundi ya Kiingereza-Kiingereza. Kisha tunapendekeza mbinu za msingi ambapo tunaonyesha ufanisi wa kutumia mBART kama mabadiliko ya mfululizo wa lugha mbalimbali kwa ajili ya kizazi chenye mchanganyiko wa mazungumzo. Our best performing dialog models can conduct coherent conversations in Hindi-English mixed language as evaluated by human and automatic metrics setting new benchmarks for the Code-Mixed Dialog Generation task.', 'ko': '코드 혼합 언어는 다언어 사회의 교류에서 매우 중요한 역할을 한다.비록 최근 인터넷 사용자의 증가가 이런 혼합 언어의 사용을 크게 촉진시켰지만, 현재 이 세대의 대화 시스템은 주로 단어이다.코드 혼합 언어의 사용이 증가함에 따라 대화 시스템이 유사한 언어를 사용하게 되었다.우리는 코드 혼합 대화 생성에 대한 우리의 업무를 소개했다. 이것은 탐색되지 않은 코드 혼합 언어 임무로 통상적으로 영어만 있는 단일 언어가 아닌 코드 혼합 언어로 언어를 생성하는 것이다.기존의 순수한 영어 대화 자료 라이브러리를 인디언-영어 혼합 자료 라이브러리로 전환함으로써 우리는 새로운 대화 코드 혼합 자료 라이브러리인 CM Daily Dialog를 제시했다.그 다음에 우리는 mBART와 유사한 다중 언어 서열을 사용하여 서열 변환기에 코드 혼합 대화상자를 생성하는 유효성을 보여 주는 기선 방법을 제시했다.우리의 성능이 가장 좋은 대화 모델은 인디언-영어 혼합 언어로 일관된 대화를 하고 인위적이고 자동 지표를 통해 평가하며 코드 혼합 대화 생성 임무에 새로운 기준을 설정할 수 있다.', 'tr': "Ködler karışmış diller birnäçe dil jemgyýetlerde komunikaçylykda örän möhüm roli oýnaýar. Ýakyndaky web Ullançylaryň ýetişmesi şöyle karışık dillerden ullanyşyny köpüşdirdi, häzirki döwletler sistemleri birnäçe monodildir. Bu köd karıştırılýan dillerin ullanyşynda birnäçe dilde dialog sistemleri tanyşdyrylýar. Biz işimizi Kod Karıştırılýan Dialoglarda döredip görkezip, kodlarda karıştırılýan bir gören, diňe iňlis dilinde köplenç iňlis dilinden başga sözlerimizi saýlap. Biz dialoglar üçin täze bir syntetik korpusy görkezip, CM-DailyDialog, bar bir iňlisçe diňe diňe diňe diňe bir dialog korpusu Hindi-iňlisçe korpusa çevirip görýäris Sonra mBART'i çoxly diller arasynda dizilimler üçin çykyş şeklinde üýtgetmegimizi teklip edip görkezip Biziň iň gowy edip barlag modellerimiz adam we otomatik metriklerimiz Kod-Mixed Dialog Jeniýeti görevi üçin ýerleşken çykyşlary Hindi-Iňlis dilinde çykyp biler.", 'fa': 'زبان مختلف با کد نقش مهم در ارتباط در جامعه های زیادی زبان بازی می کند. اگرچه رشد اخیر کاربران وب به شدت استفاده از چنین زبان\u200cهای مختلف افزایش داده است، نسل فعلی سیستم\u200cهای محاورش اصلاً یک زبان است. این افزایش استفاده از زبان مختلف کد سیستم\u200cهای محاورش را در زبان مشابه می\u200cکند. ما کار خودمان را در تولید مجموعه\u200cی دیalog\u200cهای پیوند کد نشان می\u200cدهیم، یک کار بی\u200cتوضیح در زبان\u200cهای پیوند کد، تولید سخنرانی در زبان پیوند کد به جای یک زبان دیگری که بیشتر فقط انگلیسی است. ما یک کورپوس سینتاتیک جدید را در پیوند کد برای گفتگو، CM-DailyDialog، با تبدیل کردن یک کورپوس انگلیسی تنها گفتگو موجود به یک کورپوس هندی-انگلیسی مختلف قرار می دهیم. سپس ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش پایه\u200cخط که نشان می\u200cدهیم فعالیت استفاده از mBART مثل تبدیل کننده\u200cهای تعداد\u200cهای زبان و تعداد\u200cهای تعداد برای نسل محاورۀ مختلف کد را نشان می\u200cدهیم. بهترین مدل\u200cهای گفتگوی ما می\u200cتوانند با زبان مختلف هندی و انگلیسی با ارزیابی توسط متریک\u200cهای انسان و اتوماتیک، صحبت\u200cهای جدید برای وظیفه تولید دیalog\u200cهای مختلف\u200cشده کد را انجام دهند.', 'hy': 'Կոդի խառնված լեզուն շատ լեզվով հասարակություններում հաղորդակցման մեջ կարևոր դեր է խաղում: Չնայած վեբ-օգտագործողների վերջին աճը մեծ ազդեցություն է տալիս նման խառնված լեզուների օգտագործման վրա, երկխոսային համակարգերի ներկայիս սերունդը հիմնականում միալեզու է: Կոդի խառնված լեզվի օգտագործման աճը նման լեզվով առաջարկեց երկխոսային համակարգերը: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր աշխատանքը կոդի խառնված հաղորդակցման ընթացքում, մի անուսումնասիրելի աշխատանք կոդի խառնված լեզուներում, ստեղծում ենք արտահայտություններ կոդի խառնված լեզուներում, ոչ թե մեկ լեզու, որը ավելի հաճախ պարզապես անգլերեն է: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր սինթետիկ կորպուս համադրման մեջ, որը կօգտագործվի խմբերի համար, ԿՄ-DailyDiլոգ, գոյություն ունեցող անգլերեն միայն խմբի կորպուսը փոխակերպելով խառնված անգլերեն կորպուսի: Այնուհետև մենք առաջարկում ենք հիմնական մոտեցում, որտեղ ցույց ենք տալիս mBAR-ի արդյունավետությունը, ինչպես օրինակ բազլեզու հաջորդականության վերափոխողները կոդի-խառնված հաղորդակցման համար: Մեր լավագույն արտադրողական երկխոսային մոդելները կարող են կատարել համապատասխան խոսակցություններ Հինդի-անգլերեն լեզվով խառնված լեզվով, ինչը գնահատվում է մարդկային և ավտոմատիկ մետրիկայի միջոցով, որոնք նոր համեմատային նշաններ են սահման', 'sq': 'Gjuha e përzier me kod luan një rol vendimtar në komunikimin në shoqëritë shumëgjuhëse. Though the recent growth of web users has greatly boosted the use of such mixed languages, the current generation of dialog systems is primarily monolingual.  Ky rritje në përdorimin e gjuhës së përzier me kode ka nxitur sisteme dialogu në një gjuhë të ngjashme. Ne paraqesim punën tonë në Gjenerimin e Dialogut të Përzier me Kod, një detyrë të pazgjidhur në gjuhët e përziera me kod, duke krijuar shprehje në gjuhën e përzier me kod në vend të një gjuhë të vetme që është më shpesh thjesht angleze. Ne paraqesim një korpus të ri sintetik në përzierjen e kodeve për dialogues, CM-DailyDialog, duke konvertuar një korpus ekzistues dialog të vetëm anglez në një korpus të përzier Hindi-English. Pastaj propozojmë një qasje bazë ku tregojmë efektshmërinë e përdorimit të mBART-it si transformuesit shumëgjuhës-në-sekuencë për gjenerimin e dialogut të përzier me kode. Modelet tona më të mirë të dialogut mund të kryejnë bisedime koherente në gjuhën e përzier Hindi-Anglisht siç vlerësohen nga metrika njerëzore dhe automatike duke vendosur pika të reja për detyrën e Gjenerimit të Dialogut të Përzier me Kod.', 'af': "Name Alhoewel die onlangse groei van webgebruikers die gebruik van sodanige gemengde tale groot versterk het, is die huidige generasie van dialoog stelsels heeltemal monotaal. Hierdie verhoog in gebruik van kode gemengde taal het gevra dialoog stelsels in 'n gelyke taal. Ons stel ons werk in Code-Mixed Dialog Genereer, 'n ongeverklare taak in kode gemengde tale, genereer uitdrukkings in kode gemengde taal eerder as 'n enkele taal wat meer dikwels net Engels is. Ons stel 'n nuwe sintetiese korpus in kode- mix vir dialoog, CM- DailyDialog deur 'n bestaande Engels- alleen dialoog korpus te omskakel na' n gemengde Hindi- Engels korpus. Ons voorstel dan 'n basisline toegang waar ons die effektiviteit van mBART gebruik word soos multilinguele volgorde-na-volgorde transformeerders vir kode gemengde dialoog generasie. Ons beste uitvoerde dialoog modele kan koherende gesprekke in Hindi-Engels gemengde taal gedoen soos geevalueer deur menslike en automatiese metries wat nuwe benchmarke stel vir die Kode-gemengde dialoog Generasie taak.", 'az': "Kod karıştırılmış dil çoxlu dil toplumlarında komunikasiya üçün çoxlu rol oynayır. İnternet istifadəçilərinin son böyük karışıq dillərin istifadəsini çox artırmasına rağmen, hökmən dijalog sistemlərinin nəsili ilk dəfə monodildir. Bu còd karıştırılmış dillərin istifadəsində çoxluğu bənzər dildə dialog sistemlərini tələb edir. Biz işlərimizi Code-Mixed Dialog Generation'da göstəririk. Kod karışıqlı dillərdə a çıq-aydın bir iş, kodla karışıq dildə sözləri yaratmaq, sadəcə İngilizə dilindən daha çox idi. Biz yeni sintetik korpusu, CM-DailyDialog üçün kodu-karıştırıq, ancaq İngilizce dilində olan dialog korpusu karıştırıq Hindi-İngilizce korpusa çeviririk. Sonra mBART istifadəsini çoxlu dil sequence-to-sequence transformers kimi çoxlu cür karıştırılmış dijalog nəzəriyyəti üçün istifadə edəcəyimiz tədbir tərzini təklif edirik. Bizim ən yaxşı müəyyən dialoq modellərimiz, insan və avtomatik metrik tarafından değerlendirilmiş Hindi-İngilizce dilində müxtəlif söhbətlər edə bilər ki, Kod-Mixed Dialog Generation Taski üçün yeni benchmarklər təyin edə bilər.", 'am': 'ቋንቋ የተለየ ቋንቋ በብዛት ቋንቋዎች ማኅበረሰቦች ውስጥ ማኅበረሰብ የሚያስፈልገውን ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የአሁኑ የድረ ገጽ ተጠቃሚዎች የዚህን የተለየ ቋንቋዎች ተጠቃሚ አካባቢ ቢሆን ግን የአሁኑ ትውልድ የጥያቄ ስርዓት በመጀመሪያው የተለመደ ቋንቋ ነው፡፡ ይህ መደጋገሚያ የኮድ-mixed ቋንቋ በተለያዩ ቋንቋ ሲስተም በመስጠት ያሳስፋል፡፡ We present our work in Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, an unexplored task in code-mixed languages, generating utterances in code-mixed language rather than a single language that is more often just English.  አዲስ የስንቲካዊ ኮርፓስ ለጥያቄዎች CM-DailyDialog በመቀላቀል እናቀርባታለን፡፡ በኋላም ምBART-ን እንደ ብዙ ቋንቋዎች የክፍለ ሥርዓት ለቆዳ-mixed dialog ትውልድ የመጠቀም ጥያቄን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ አዲስ የኮድ-Mixed Dialog አቀማመጥ ማድረግ እንዲያስተካክሉ የፊንዲ-እንግሊዘኛ በተለየ ቋንቋ እና በራሱ ማተሚያዎች አዲስ የእንቅልፍ አካላት ማድረጊያውን ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'bn': 'কোড মিশ্রিত ভাষা বহুভাষী সমাজে যোগাযোগে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা পালন করে। যদিও ওয়েব ব্যবহারকারীদের সাম্প্রতিক বৃদ্ধি এই ধরনের মিশ্র ভাষার ব্যবহারের ব্যবহার বেশী বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছে, তবে বর্তমান ডায়ালগ সিস্ট কোড মিশ্রিত ভাষার ব্যবহারের এই বৃদ্ধি একই ভাষায় ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। আমরা কোড-মিক্সেড ডায়ালগ জেনারেশনে আমাদের কাজ উপস্থাপন করছি, কোড-মিশ্রিত ভাষায় একটি অকল্প কাজ, যা কোড-মিশ্র ভাষায় ভাষায় ভাষায় ভাষা তৈরি করে, য বিদ্যমান ইংরেজি শুধুমাত্র একটি ডায়ালগ কোর্পাসের মিশ্রিত হিন্দি-ইংরেজী কোর্পাসের কাছে মিশ্রিত একটি মিশ্রিত ডায়ালগের জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন সিন্ তারপর আমরা একটি বেসেলাইন পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যেখানে আমরা এমবিআরটি ব্যবহার করার কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করি, যেমন মাল্টিভায়ুল সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন্স পর আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভালো প্রদর্শনী ডায়ালগ মডেল হিন্দি-ইংরেজী মিশ্র ভাষায় আলোচনা করতে পারে, যেমন মানুষ এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয় মেট্রিক মূল্যায়ন করে কোড-মিক্সেড ড ড', 'cs': 'Kódový smíšený jazyk hraje klíčovou roli v komunikaci v mnohojazyčných společnostech. Přestože nedávný růst uživatelů webu výrazně posílil používání těchto smíšených jazyků, současná generace dialogových systémů je primárně jednojzyčná. Tento nárůst používání jazyka smíšeného kódem vyzval dialogové systémy v podobném jazyce. Představujeme naši práci v Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, neprozkoumaném úkolu v kódově smíšených jazycích, generování výroků v kódově smíšeném jazyce spíše než v jednom jazyce, který je častěji jen angličtinou. Představujeme nový syntetický korpus v kódovém mix pro dialogy CM-DailyDialog, převodem existujícího dialogového korpusu pouze anglicky na smíšený hindsky-anglický korpus. Následně navrhujeme základní přístup, kde ukážeme efektivitu použití mBART jako vícejazyčné transformátory sekvence na sekvenci pro generování dialogů smíšených kódem. Naše nejlépe výkonné dialogové modely mohou vést soudržné konverzace v hindsky-anglickém smíšeném jazyce podle hodnocení lidských a automatických metrik, které nastavují nová měřítka pro úlohu Generování dialogů smíšených kódem.', 'et': 'Koodidega segakeel on mitmekeelsetes ühiskondades suhtlemisel otsustav roll. Kuigi veebikasutajate hiljutine kasv on oluliselt suurendanud selliste segakeelte kasutamist, on dialoogisüsteemide praegune põlvkond peamiselt ühekeelne. Koodisegukeele kasutamise suurenemine on kutsunud dialoogisüsteeme sarnases keeles. Tutvustame oma tööd koodisegadega dialoogi genereerimisel, uurimata ülesandes koodisegadega keeltes, mis tekitab väljendeid pigem koodisegadega keeles kui ühes keeles, mis on sagedamini ainult inglise keel. Esitleme dialoogide koodide kombinatsioonis uut sünteetilist korpust CM-DailyDialog, muutes olemasoleva ainult inglise keeles mõeldud dialoogikorpuse hindi-inglise keeles mõeldud korpuseks. Seejärel pakume välja lähtepõhise lähenemisviisi, kus näitame mBART-i kasutamise efektiivsust nagu mitmekeelsed jada-jada trafod koodisega dialoogi genereerimiseks. Meie kõige paremini toimivad dialoogimudelid suudavad viia läbi sidusaid vestlusi hindi-inglise segakeelses keeles, mida hinnatakse inim- ja automaatsete mõõdikute abil, seades uued võrdluskriteeriumid koodisegadedialoogi loomise ülesandele.', 'bs': 'U komunikaciji u multijezičkim društvima igra ključnu ulogu mešanog jezika. Iako je nedavni rast korisnika interneta veoma povećao korištenje takvih mješanih jezika, trenutna generacija dijalogskih sustava je glavno monojezička. Ovaj povećanje korištenja jezika pomiješanog koda zahtijeva sisteme dijaloga na sličnom jeziku. Predstavljamo svoj rad u generaciji "Kod-Mixed Dialog", neočekivan zadatak na jezicima mešanim kodom, stvarajući govore na jeziku mešanom kodom umjesto jednog jezika koji je češće samo engleski. Predstavljamo novi sintetički korpus u kombinaciji koda za dijaloge, CM-DailyDialog, preobraćajući postojeći engleski jedini dijalogski korpus u mixed Hindi-English corpus. Onda predlažemo početni pristup u kojem pokažemo učinkovitost korištenja mBART kao multijezički transformatori sekvence do sekvence za generaciju dijaloga kombiniranog kod. Naši najbolji izvršni modeli dijaloga mogu voditi saslužene razgovore na Hindi-engleskom miješanom jeziku kako su procjenjivali ljudska i automatska metrika koja postavlja nove kriterije za zadatak Generacije dijaloga između koda.', 'ca': "La llengua combinada amb codi té un paper crucial en la comunicació en societats multilingües. Encara que el creixement recent dels usuaris de la web ha incrementat molt l'ús d'aquestes llengües mixtes, la generació actual de sistemes de diàleg és principalment monolingüe. Aquest augment en l'ús de la llengua mixta de codis ha provocat sistemes de diàleg en una llengua similar. Presentam la nostra feina a la generació de diàleg mixt de codi, una tasca inexplorada en llengües mixtes de codi, generant expressions en llengües mixtes de codi en lloc d'una sola llengüe que és més sovint només anglès. We present a new synthetic corpus in code-mix for dialogs, CM-DailyDialog, by converting an existing English-only dialog corpus to a mixed Hindi-English corpus.  Llavors proposem un enfocament basal en el qual demostrem l'eficacia d'utilitzar mBART com transformadors multilingües de seqüència a seqüència per generar diàleg combinat de codis. Els nostres models de diàleg amb millor rendiment poden conduir converses coherents en idioma mixt hindí-anglès, tal com es valora amb la mètrica humana i automàtica que estableix nous punts de referència per la tasca de generació de diàleg mixt amb codi.", 'fi': 'Koodi-sekakielellä on keskeinen rooli monikielisten yhteiskuntien viestinnässä. Vaikka verkkokäyttäjien viimeaikainen kasvu on merkittävästi lisännyt tällaisten sekakielten käyttöä, nykyinen sukupolvi dialogijärjestelmiä on pääasiassa yksikielinen. Tämä koodisekoitetun kielen käyttö on lisännyt valintajärjestelmiä vastaavalla kielellä. Esittelemme työtämme Code-Mixed Dialog Generation -hankkeessa, jota ei ole tutkittu koodisekoitetuilla kielillä, jotka tuottavat lauseita koodisekoitetuilla kielillä pikemminkin kuin yhdellä kielellä, joka on useimmiten vain englantia. Esitämme uuden synteettisen korpusen dialogien koodimiksauksessa, CM-DailyDialogin, muuntamalla olemassa olevan vain englanninkielisen dialogikorpuksen hindi-englantilaiseksi korpuseksi. Tämän jälkeen ehdotamme peruslähestymistapaa, jossa näytämme, miten tehokkaasti mBART:n, kuten monikielisten sekvenssimuuntajien, käyttö koodisekoitetun dialogin luomisessa on tehokasta. Parhaiten suoriutuvat dialogimallimme voivat käydä johdonmukaisia keskusteluja hindi-englanti-sekakielellä, jota arvioidaan inhimillisten ja automaattisten mittareiden avulla asettamalla uusia vertailuarvoja Code-Mixed Dialog Generation -tehtävään.', 'jv': 'Cdromaké karo akeh langgar nganggo barang akeh bantuan kanggo komunikasi ning samopo sing luwih Nanging kethok sistem sing gak nggawe perusahaan web kudu nggawe diungutan banget, sistem sing gak perusahaan dialoog kuwi tanggal sing memperusahaan bukane. Tulung ing nggawe sistem sing paling nggo kode karo nggalakno. Awake dhéwé nglanggar aturan karo kode-Mixed Dialog Generasi, akeh gagal gak nggawe barang karo kode-Mixed Languages, ogèhku nggawe kelangan karo kode-Mixed Languages liyané sing bakal terus kanggo ingkang. Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem anyar sing dibutuhke karo kode-Mix kanggo nggo dialogs, Cdrom-DailyDialog, iki nggawe kanggo ngirim perusahaan kanggo ngilangno sistem anyar karo perusahaan kanggo ngilangno sampeyan itlanjut . Awak dhéwé ngerasakno akeh basa sing nyenengaké ning acara dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe mLPRT koyo ngono multilenguase sekèns-to-sekèns transformer kanggo ngerasakno karo hal-karo dialog Kita model sing dibenakake kanggo langgar sampeyan kanggo ngilanggar urip-ingkang pisan kelas karo hal-hal nganggep kuwi kesempatan karo nganggep sistem sing isiné karo perbudhakan lan sistem otomatik dhéwé nggawe bendhurip gawe nggo langgar-Mixed Dialog Generation task.', 'ha': "Harshen kodi da aka haɗa shi, yana da wani muhimu a cikin wasiyya a cikin jamii masu mulki. Haƙĩƙa, kuma ƙarami na farkon masu amfani da waɗanan mutane sun ƙara amfani da wannan lugha wanda aka haɗa, ko kuma babu wata na'urar zauren zauren akwatin bayani na'urar zauren ta yanzu ta zama kawai na'ura. Wannan ƙãra wa amfani da harshen kodi-da-haɗe, ya ƙãga halittar zauren akwatin magana mai daidaita. Tuna halatar da aikinmu a cikin zauren Kyauta-Mixed Dialog, wani aiki an unexplored cikin harshen kode-Mixed, yana samun magana cikin lugha-kode-Mixed kuma don wata harshe guda wanda ke da yawa kawai na Ingiriya. Ko gabatar da wata sabo na haɗi cikin kodi-blendin ga zauren akwatin bayani, CM-DailyDialog, don ka sami wata shirin akwatin bayani na Ingiriya kawai, zuwa wani shirin akwatin bayani na guda na Ingiriya. Sa'an nan kuma muna goyyade wata matsayi na ƙarƙashin, inda Muke nũna masu aikin amfani da mBRT kamar mutane da bakwai-zuwa-sequence wa zauren akwatin kodi-da-haɗe. @ action: button", 'sk': 'Kodirani jezik ima ključno vlogo pri komunikaciji v večjezičnih družbah. Čeprav je nedavna rast spletnih uporabnikov močno okrepila uporabo takšnih mešanih jezikov, je sedanja generacija sistemov dialogov predvsem enojezična. To povečanje uporabe jezika z mešanimi kodami je spodbudilo pogovorne sisteme v podobnem jeziku. Naše delo predstavljamo v Code-Mixed Dialog Generation, neraziskani nalogi v kodno mešanih jezikih, ki ustvarja izgovore v kodno mešanih jezikih in ne v enem jeziku, ki je pogosteje samo angleščina. Predstavljamo nov sintetični korpus v mešanici kod za dialoge, CM-DailyDialog, s pretvorbo obstoječega samo angleškega korpusa dialoga v mešani hindijsko-angleški korpus. Nato predlagamo osnovni pristop, kjer pokažemo učinkovitost uporabe mBART kot večjezični transformatorji zaporedja v zaporedje za generiranje pogovornih pogovorov z mešanimi kodami. Naši najboljši modeli dialogov lahko vodijo skladne pogovore v hindujsko-angleškem mešanem jeziku, ocenjene s človeškimi in avtomatskimi meritvami, ki določajo nova merila za opravilo Ustvarjanje dialoga mešanih kod.', 'he': 'שפה מעורבת בקוד משחקת תפקיד קריטי בתקשורת בחברות רבות שפות. למרות שהצמיחה האחרונה של משתמשים באינטרנט הגבירה את השימוש בשפות מעורבות כאלה, הדור הנוכחי של מערכות דיאלוג הוא בעיקר מונושפה. This increase in usage of code-mixed language has prompted dialog systems in a similar language.  אנו מציגים את העבודה שלנו ביצירת דיאלוג מעורבב קוד, משימה בלתי חוקרת בשפות מעורבות קוד, יוצרים מילים בשפה מעורבת קוד במקום שפה אחת שהיא לעתים קרובות יותר רק אנגלית. אנחנו מציגים קורפוס סינטטי חדש בתערובת קודים לדיאלוגים, CM-DailyDialog, על ידי להפוך קורפוס דיאלוגים קיים רק אנגלית לקורפוס הינדי-אנגלי מעורב. ואז אנו מציעים גישה בסיסית שבה אנו מראים את היעילות של השימוש mBART כמו משתנים רצף-לרצף רבים לדור דיאלוג מעורבב קוד. דוגמני הדיולוגים הטובים ביותר שלנו יכולים לבצע שיחות קבועות בשפה מעורבת הינדי-אנגלית כפי שהעריכה על ידי מטריקה אנושית ואוטומטית', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ནང་ལས་གཏོང་ཆེན་ཁག་ཅིག་གཏོང་བ་རེད། དྲ་བ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ སྐད་རིགས་འདིས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་མཉམ་འབྱུང་བའི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་མངོན་འཆར་བ་ཡིན་པ ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ལས་ཀ་སྦྱོར་འདྲེན་མཐུད་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏད་མེད་པའི་(code-Mixed Dialog) སྒྲིག We present a new synthetic corpus in code-mix for dialogs, CM-DailyDialog, by converting an existing English-only dialog corpus to a mixed Hindi-English corpus. འུ་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་རྨང་གཞིའི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་ཞིག་བྱས་ནས་ ང་ཚོའི་ནུས་འབྲེལ་བ་འདི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་སྣ་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་sequence-to-sequence transformers Our best performing dialog models can conduct coherent conversations in Hindi-English mixed language as evaluated by human and automatic metrics setting new benchmarks for the Code-Mixed Dialog Generation task.'}
{'en': 'Bilingual Terminology Extraction Using Neural Word Embeddings on Comparable Corpora', 'ar': 'استخراج المصطلحات ثنائية اللغة باستخدام تضمين الكلمات العصبية في Corpora المماثلة', 'pt': 'Extração de terminologia bilíngue usando incorporações de palavras neurais em corpora comparáveis', 'es': 'Extracción terminológica bilingüe mediante incrustaciones de palabras neuronales en corpus comparables', 'fr': "Extraction terminologique bilingue à l'aide de l'intégration de mots neuronaux sur des corpus comparables", 'hi': 'द्विभाषी शब्दावली निष्कर्षण तुलनीय कॉर्पोरेट पर तंत्रिका शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग कर', 'ru': 'Извлечение двуязычной терминологии с использованием вложений нейронных слов на сопоставимых телах', 'zh': '于可较语料库上用神经词嵌提取双语术语', 'ja': '同等のコーラにニューラルワード埋め込みを使用したバイリンガル用語抽出', 'ga': 'Sliocht Téarmaíochta Dátheangacha ag Úsáid Neabrú Focal ar Chorpóra Inchomparáide', 'ka': 'მეორე ტერმინოლოგიის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Kétnyelvű terminológia kivonat idegi szóbeágyazások használatával összehasonlítható Corpora', 'el': 'Διγλωσσή εξαγωγή ορολογίας χρησιμοποιώντας Ενσωματώσεις Νευρικής λέξης σε Συγκριτικό Σώμα', 'it': 'Estrazione di terminologia bilingue utilizzando incorporazioni di parole neurali su corpora comparabile', 'mk': 'Дивјазична терминолошка екстракција користејќи нервни зборови на споредлива корпора', 'lt': 'Dviejų kalbų terminologijos ekstrakcija naudojant lyginamosios korporos neurologinius žodžius', 'kk': 'Қосымша терминология тарқату', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Terminologi Bilingual menggunakan Pencampuran Kata Neural pada Korpora Berbanding', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി ബിലിങ്കുള്ള ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജി എക്സ്ട്രാക്ട്രേക്ഷന്\u200d', 'no': 'Bilinguelt terminologisk utpakking ved bruk av neirale ord- innbygging på kompatibelt korpora', 'mt': 'Bilingual Terminology Extraction Using Neural Word Embeddings on Comparable Corpora', 'mn': 'Хоёрдугаар терминологийг хадгалах нь Төрсөн Корпора дээр мэдрэлийн үг нэмж хэрэглэх', 'ro': 'Extracție de terminologie bilingvă folosind încorporări de cuvinte neurale pe corpora comparabilă', 'pl': 'Dwujęzyczna ekstrakcja terminologii przy użyciu osadzeń neuronowych na porównywalnym korpusie', 'so': 'Isticmaalka Neural Word Embeddings of Comparable Corpora', 'ta': 'Bilingual Terminology Extraction Using Neural Word Embeddings on Comparable Corpora', 'sv': 'Tvåspråkig terminologi extraktion med hjälp av Neural Word Embeddings på jämförbar Corpora', 'ur': 'دوئينگ ترمينولوژي اخراج', 'si': 'Bilingual Terminal Inology Extraction Using neuroral Word Embeading on Comparable CorPora', 'sr': 'Bilingualna terminološka ekstrakcija korištenja neuralnih reèi na komparabilnoj korpori', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Ngưng hóa giải thần kinh bằng môi trường thần kinh trên một cơ thể đối tượng.', 'bg': 'Двуезична терминология извличане чрез вграждане на неврални думи в сравним корпор', 'nl': 'Tweetalige terminologie extractie met behulp van neurale woordinsluitingen op vergelijkbaar corpora', 'da': 'Tosproget terminologi uddrag ved hjælp af Neural Word Embeddings på sammenlignelig Corpora', 'hr': 'Bilingualna terminološka izvlačenja korištenja neuralnih riječi na usporednu korporu', 'de': 'Zweisprachige Terminologieextraktion mit neuronalen Worteinbettungen auf vergleichbaren Korpora', 'ko': '비교 가능한 언어 자료 라이브러리에 기반한 신경어 삽입 이중 언어 용어 추출', 'fa': 'استفاده از انجمن کلمات عصبی در شرکت قابل مقایسه', 'sw': 'Bilingual Terminology Extraction Using Neural Word Embeddings on Comparable Corpora', 'af': 'Bilinguele Terminologie Uitpakking Gebruik Neurale Woord Inbetekening op Vergelykbare Korpora', 'sq': 'Ekstraktimi i Terminologjisë Digjuhësore duke përdorur përmbajtje fjalësh neuronale në korporën e krahasueshme', 'tr': 'Çikgi Terminologiýa Açmak Däşerlik Köpürde Neural Kelimi Açmak ullanýar', 'am': 'የቋንቋው ተርሚኖጂ አውጣ', 'hy': 'Bilingual Terminology Extraction Using Neural Word Embeddings on Comparable Corpora', 'id': 'Ekstraksi Terminologi Bilingual Menggunakan Embedding Word Neural pada Corpora yang Dibandingkan', 'bn': 'তুলনা কর্পোরায় নিউরাল শব্দ ব্যবহার করে বাইলিভায়ুল টার্মিনোলজি এক্সট্র্যাকশন', 'bs': 'Bilingualna terminološka izvlačenja korištenja neuralnih riječi na usporednoj korpori', 'ca': 'Extracció de Terminologia Bilingual Utilitzant Embeddings Neural Words on Comparable Corpora', 'cs': 'Dvoujazyčná extrakce terminologie pomocí vložení neuronových slov na srovnatelné korpusy', 'et': 'Kahekeelse terminoloogia ekstraheerimine neuraalsete sõnade manustamise abil võrreldavas korpuses', 'fi': 'Kaksikielinen terminologian purkaminen käyttämällä hermosanaupotuksia vertailukelpoisessa korpusessa', 'az': 'İkinci Terminoloji Çıqış Şərfəli Korpora Üstündə Nöral Kelimi İfadələri', 'jv': 'Bilingual Terminal inulogi', 'sk': 'Dvojezična terminologija ekstrakcija z uporabo nevronskih besedil v primerljivih korpusih', 'ha': 'Extractin Ƙaramium na ƘaramiKCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מחלקת טרמינולוגיה משולשת בשימוש בתכנית מילים נוירוליות על גופורה שווה', 'bo': 'Bilingual Terminology Extraction Using Neural Word Embeddings on Comparable Corpora'}
{'en': 'Term and glossary management are vital steps of preparation of every language specialist, and they play a very important role at the stage of education of translation professionals. The growing trend of efficient time management and constant time constraints we may observe in every job sector increases the necessity of the automatic glossary compilation. Many well-performing bilingual AET systems are based on processing parallel data, however, such parallel corpora are not always available for a specific domain or a language pair. Domain-specific, bilingual access to information and its retrieval based on comparable corpora is a very promising area of research that requires a detailed analysis of both available data sources and the possible extraction techniques. This work focuses on domain-specific automatic terminology extraction from comparable corpora for the English   Russian language pair by utilizing neural word embeddings.', 'es': 'La gestión de términos y glosarios es un paso vital de la preparación de cada especialista en idiomas y desempeña un papel muy importante en la etapa de formación de los profesionales de la traducción. La creciente tendencia a la gestión eficiente del tiempo y las constantes limitaciones de tiempo que podemos observar en todos los sectores laborales aumentan la necesidad de la compilación automática de glosarios. Muchos sistemas AET bilingües de buen rendimiento se basan en el procesamiento de datos paralelos, sin embargo, dichos corpus paralelos no siempre están disponibles para un dominio específico o una combinación de idiomas. El acceso bilingüe específico del dominio a la información y su recuperación basada en cuerpos comparables es un área de investigación muy prometedora que requiere un análisis detallado de las fuentes de datos disponibles y las posibles técnicas de extracción. Este trabajo se centra en la extracción automática de terminología específica del dominio de corpus comparables para el par de idiomas inglés — ruso mediante el uso de incrustaciones de palabras neuronales.', 'ar': 'تعد إدارة المصطلحات والمسرد خطوات حيوية لإعداد كل متخصص لغة ، ويلعبان دورًا مهمًا للغاية في مرحلة تعليم محترفي الترجمة. إن الاتجاه المتزايد للإدارة الفعالة للوقت والقيود الزمنية المستمرة التي قد نلاحظها في كل قطاع عمل يزيد من ضرورة التجميع التلقائي لقاموس المصطلحات. تعتمد العديد من أنظمة AET ثنائية اللغة جيدة الأداء على معالجة البيانات المتوازية ، ومع ذلك ، فإن مثل هذه المجموعات المتوازية ليست متاحة دائمًا لمجال معين أو زوج لغوي. يعد الوصول إلى المعلومات ثنائي اللغة والخاص بالمجال واسترجاعها استنادًا إلى مجموعات قابلة للمقارنة مجالًا واعدًا جدًا للبحث الذي يتطلب تحليلًا تفصيليًا لكل من مصادر البيانات المتاحة وتقنيات الاستخراج الممكنة. يركز هذا العمل على استخراج المصطلحات التلقائية الخاصة بالمجال من مجموعات مماثلة لزوج اللغتين الإنجليزية والروسية من خلال استخدام حفلات الزفاف العصبية.', 'fr': "La gestion des termes et du glossaire est une étape essentielle de la préparation de tout spécialiste des langues et joue un rôle très important au niveau de la formation des professionnels de la traduction. La tendance croissante à une gestion efficace du temps et à des contraintes de temps constantes que l'on peut observer dans tous les secteurs d'activité accroît la nécessité de compiler automatiquement un glossaire. De nombreux systèmes AET bilingues performants sont basés sur le traitement de données parallèles, mais ces corpus parallèles ne sont pas toujours disponibles pour un domaine spécifique ou une paire de langues. L'accès bilingue et spécifique au domaine à l'information et sa récupération sur la base de corpus comparables constituent un domaine de recherche très prometteur qui nécessite une analyse détaillée des sources de données disponibles et des techniques d'extraction possibles. Ce travail se concentre sur l'extraction automatique de terminologie spécifique à un domaine à partir de corpus comparables pour la paire de langues anglais-russe en utilisant des intégrations de mots neuronaux.", 'pt': 'A gestão de termos e glossários são etapas vitais da preparação de todo especialista em idiomas e desempenham um papel muito importante na fase de formação dos profissionais de tradução. A tendência crescente de gestão eficiente do tempo e constantes restrições de tempo que podemos observar em todos os setores de trabalho aumenta a necessidade da compilação automática de glossários. Muitos sistemas AET bilíngues de bom desempenho são baseados no processamento de dados paralelos, no entanto, esses corpora paralelos nem sempre estão disponíveis para um domínio específico ou um par de idiomas. O acesso à informação bilíngüe específico do domínio e sua recuperação com base em corpora comparáveis é uma área de pesquisa muito promissora que requer uma análise detalhada tanto das fontes de dados disponíveis quanto das possíveis técnicas de extração. Este trabalho se concentra na extração automática de terminologia específica de domínio de corpora comparáveis para o par de idiomas inglês-russo, utilizando embeddings de palavras neurais.', 'ja': '用語と用語集の管理は、すべての言語専門家の準備の重要なステップであり、翻訳専門家の教育の段階で非常に重要な役割を果たします。効率的な時間管理と、すべてのジョブセクターで見られる可能性のある一定の時間制約の増加傾向は、自動用語集のコンパイルの必要性を高めます。多くの性能の良いバイリンガルＡＥＴシステムは、並列データを処理することに基づいているが、そのような並列体は、特定のドメインまたは言語ペアに対して常に利用可能ではない。ドメイン固有の情報へのバイリンガルアクセスと、同等のコーラに基づいた情報の取得は、利用可能なデータソースと可能な抽出技術の両方の詳細な分析を必要とする、非常に有望な研究分野です。この研究は、ニューラルワード埋め込みを利用して、英語とロシア語ペアの比較可能なコーラからドメイン固有の自動用語抽出に焦点を当てています。', 'zh': '术语、词汇表者,言家之要,翻译专业人之教起着至重也。 或于工作部门观之高效时理恒限,增益自词汇表之必要性。 诸性良双语AET,皆取并行数据,然并行语料库不常施于特定域言语。 特定领域之双语获取信息,其基于语料库,甚有前途,可详细分析可数据源也。 其事侧重于因用神经词嵌,取特定于域术语于英语 - 俄语者。', 'ru': 'Управление терминологией и глоссарием - жизненно важные этапы подготовки каждого языкового специалиста, и они играют очень важную роль на этапе обучения переводчиков. Растущая тенденция к эффективному управлению временем и постоянные временные ограничения, которые мы можем наблюдать в каждом секторе работы, увеличивают необходимость автоматического составления глоссария. Многие хорошо функционирующие двуязычные системы AET основаны на обработке параллельных данных, однако такие параллельные корпуса не всегда доступны для конкретного домена или языковой пары. Доменный двуязычный доступ к информации и ее поиск на основе сопоставимых корпусов являются весьма перспективной областью исследований, которая требует подробного анализа как имеющихся источников данных, так и возможных методов извлечения. Эта работа сосредоточена на автоматическом извлечении терминологии из сопоставимых корпусов для английско-русской языковой пары с использованием вложений нейронных слов.', 'hi': 'शब्द और शब्दावली प्रबंधन प्रत्येक भाषा विशेषज्ञ की तैयारी के महत्वपूर्ण कदम हैं, और वे अनुवाद पेशेवरों की शिक्षा के चरण में एक बहुत ही महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाते हैं। कुशल समय प्रबंधन और निरंतर समय की बाधाओं की बढ़ती प्रवृत्ति जिसे हम हर नौकरी क्षेत्र में देख सकते हैं, स्वचालित शब्दावली संकलन की आवश्यकता को बढ़ाता है। कई अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन करने वाले द्विभाषी एईटी सिस्टम समानांतर डेटा को संसाधित करने पर आधारित होते हैं, हालांकि, इस तरह के समानांतर कॉर्पोरेट हमेशा एक विशिष्ट डोमेन या भाषा जोड़ी के लिए उपलब्ध नहीं होते हैं। डोमेन-विशिष्ट, सूचना तक द्विभाषी पहुंच और तुलनीय कॉर्पोरेट के आधार पर इसकी पुनर्प्राप्ति अनुसंधान का एक बहुत ही आशाजनक क्षेत्र है जिसके लिए उपलब्ध डेटा स्रोतों और संभावित निष्कर्षण तकनीकों दोनों के विस्तृत विश्लेषण की आवश्यकता होती है। यह काम तंत्रिका शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके अंग्रेजी - रूसी भाषा जोड़ी के लिए तुलनीय कॉर्पोरेट से डोमेन-विशिष्ट स्वचालित शब्दावली निष्कर्षण पर केंद्रित है।', 'ga': "Is céimeanna ríthábhachtacha ullmhúcháin gach speisialtóra teanga iad bainistíocht téarmaí agus gluais, agus tá ról an-tábhachtach acu ag céim oideachas lucht gairme an aistriúcháin. Méadaíonn an treocht atá ag dul i méid maidir le bainistíocht éifeachtach ama agus srianta ama seasta a d'fheicfimid i ngach earnáil fostaíochta an gá atá le tiomsú gluaise uathoibríoch. Tá go leor córas dátheangach AET a fheidhmíonn go maith bunaithe ar shonraí comhthreomhara a phróiseáil, ach ní bhíonn corparáidí comhthreomhara dá leithéid ar fáil i gcónaí d’fhearann nó do phéire teanga ar leith. Réimse taighde an-gheallta is ea rochtain dhátheangach shain-fhearainn ar fhaisnéis agus é a aisghabháil bunaithe ar chorpora inchomparáide a éilíonn anailís mhionsonraithe ar na foinsí sonraí atá ar fáil agus ar na teicnící asbhainte féideartha araon. Díríonn an obair seo ar eastóscadh uathoibríoch téarmaíochta a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann ó chorpas inchomparáide don phéire Béarla-Rúisis trí úsáid a bhaint as leabú focal néarach.", 'ka': 'ყველა ენის სპეციალური პროცესისტის დაეწყვება და ისინი ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი პროცესისტის განათლების სტაციაში იყო ცოტაციური ნაწილები. ყველა სამუშაო სექტრუქტური სამუშაო რედაქტირებას და მუშაო სამუშაო ზომის განმავლობაში ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ყველა სამუშაო სამუშაო სექტრუ ბევრი კარგად გავაკეთებული ორიენგური AET სისტემები პარალელური მონაცემების პროცესებაზე დაბაზიან, მაგრამ ასეთი პარალელური კოპორა არ ყოველთვის იყოს განსაზღვრული დიომინი დიომინის განსაკუთრებული, ორიენგური ინფორმაციის და მისი შესაძლებელი კოპორაზე დაბაზიან იყო მნიშვნელოვანი სოფლიო, რომელიც საჭირო დარწმუნებული ინფორმაციის და შესაძლებელი ექსტრეკციის ტე ეს სამუშაო დააყენება დიომინის განსაკუთრებული ავტომატური ტერმინოლოგიის ექსტრექციაზე, რომელიც შემდგომარებული კოპორაზე ინგლისური - პროსური ენერგიის ექსტრი', 'el': 'Η διαχείριση όρων και γλωσσαρίων είναι ζωτικά βήματα προετοιμασίας κάθε γλωσσικού ειδικού και διαδραματίζουν πολύ σημαντικό ρόλο στο στάδιο της εκπαίδευσης των μεταφραστών. Η αυξανόμενη τάση αποτελεσματικής διαχείρισης του χρόνου και οι συνεχείς χρονικοί περιορισμοί που παρατηρούμε σε κάθε τομέα εργασίας αυξάνουν την αναγκαιότητα της αυτόματης σύνταξης γλωσσαρίου. Πολλά καλά αποδοτικά δίγλωσσα συστήματα βασίζονται στην επεξεργασία παράλληλων δεδομένων, ωστόσο, τέτοια παράλληλα σώματα δεν είναι πάντα διαθέσιμα για έναν συγκεκριμένο τομέα ή ένα γλωσσικό ζεύγος. Η δίγλωσση πρόσβαση σε πληροφορίες και η ανάκτησή τους σε συγκρίσιμα σώματα αποτελεί έναν πολύ ελπιδοφόρο τομέα έρευνας που απαιτεί λεπτομερή ανάλυση τόσο των διαθέσιμων πηγών δεδομένων όσο και των πιθανών τεχνικών εξαγωγής. Αυτή η εργασία επικεντρώνεται στην αυτόματη εξαγωγή ορολογίας από συγκρίσιμα σώματα για το ζεύγος Αγγλικών-Ρωσικών γλωσσών χρησιμοποιώντας ενσωματωμένες νευρωνικές λέξεις.', 'hu': 'A kifejezések és szószedetek kezelése minden nyelvi szakember előkészítésének létfontosságú lépése, és nagyon fontos szerepet játszanak a fordítói szakemberek oktatásának szakaszában. A hatékony időgazdálkodás és az állandó időkorlátozás növekvő tendenciája, amelyet minden munkaágazatban tapasztalhatunk, növeli az automatikus szószedet összeállításának szükségességét. Számos jól teljesítő kétnyelvű AET rendszer párhuzamos adatok feldolgozásán alapul, azonban ilyen párhuzamos korpuszok nem mindig elérhetők egy adott tartományhoz vagy nyelvpárhoz. A domain specifikus, kétnyelvű információhoz való hozzáférés és azok hasonló corpora alapján történő visszakeresése nagyon ígéretes kutatási terület, amely mind a rendelkezésre álló adatforrások, mind a lehetséges extrakciós technikák részletes elemzését igényli. Ez a munka a tartomány-specifikus automatikus terminológiai kivonásra összpontosít összehasonlítható corporákból az angol-orosz nyelvpárban neurális szóbeágyazások használatával.', 'it': "La gestione dei termini e dei glossari sono passi fondamentali della preparazione di ogni specialista linguistico e svolgono un ruolo molto importante nella fase di formazione dei professionisti della traduzione. La crescente tendenza di gestione efficiente del tempo e di vincoli temporali costanti che possiamo osservare in ogni settore lavorativo aumenta la necessità della compilazione automatica del glossario. Molti sistemi AET bilingui ben performanti si basano sull'elaborazione di dati paralleli, tuttavia, tali corpi paralleli non sono sempre disponibili per un dominio specifico o una coppia di lingue. L'accesso bilingue e specifico alle informazioni e il loro recupero basato su corpora comparabili è un'area di ricerca molto promettente che richiede un'analisi dettagliata sia delle fonti di dati disponibili che delle possibili tecniche di estrazione. Questo lavoro si concentra sull'estrazione automatica della terminologia specifica del dominio da corpora comparabili per la coppia inglese-russo utilizzando incorporazioni neurali di parole.", 'lt': 'Terminų ir žodynų valdymas yra gyvybiškai svarbūs kiekvieno kalbos specialisto rengimo etapai ir jie atlieka labai svarbų vaidmenį vertimo specialist ų švietimo etape. The growing trend of efficient time management and constant time constraints we may observe in every job sector increases the necessity of the automatic glossary compilation.  Many well-performing bilingual AET systems are based on processing parallel data, however, such parallel corpora are not always available for a specific domain or a language pair.  Domain-specific, bilingual access to information and its retrieval based on comparable corpora is a very promising area of research that requires a detailed analysis of both available data sources and the possible extraction techniques.  This work focuses on domain-specific automatic terminology extraction from comparable corpora for the English - Russian language pair by utilizing neural word embeddings.', 'mk': 'Менаџментот на термините и гласарите се суштински чекори на подготовката на секој јазик специјалист, и тие играат многу важна улога во фазата на образованието на професионалците за превод. The growing trend of efficient time management and constant time constraints we may observe in every job sector increases the necessity of the automatic glossary compilation.  Многу добро функционирани двојјазични системи на AET се базирани на обработување паралелни податоци, сепак, ваквите паралелни корпора не се секогаш достапни за специфичен домен или јазички пар. Специфичниот домен, двојјазичен пристап до информациите и нивното преземање базирано на споредливи корпора е многу ветувачка област на истражување која бара детална анализа на достапните извори на податоци и можните техники за извлекување. Оваа работа се фокусира на автоматска терминолошка екстракција специфична за доменот од споредлива корпора за парот англиско-руски јазик со употреба на нервни зборови.', 'ms': 'Pengurusan terma dan glossari adalah langkah penting persiapan setiap ahli bahasa, dan mereka bermain peran yang sangat penting pada tahap pendidikan profesional terjemahan. Tenderasi semakin meningkat pengurusan masa efisien dan kekangan masa yang tetap yang kita boleh perhatikan dalam setiap sektor kerja meningkatkan keperluan kompilasi glossari automatik. Banyak sistem AET bilingual yang berkesan dengan baik berdasarkan pemprosesan data selari, bagaimanapun, korpra selari tersebut tidak sentiasa tersedia untuk domain tertentu atau pasangan bahasa. Secara domain, akses bilingual kepada maklumat dan pemulihannya berdasarkan korpra yang boleh dibandingkan adalah kawasan penyelidikan yang sangat berjanji yang memerlukan analisis terperinci kedua-dua sumber data yang tersedia dan teknik ekstraksi yang mungkin. Kerja ini fokus pada ekstraksi terminologi automatik spesifik domain dari korpra yang boleh dibandingkan untuk pasangan bahasa Inggeris - Rusia dengan menggunakan penyembedding perkataan saraf.', 'ml': 'പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട എല്ലാ ഭാഷക്കാരുടെയും വിശേഷിപ്പുകാരുടെയും തയ്യാറാക്കുന്ന പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കാലടികളാണ് അവർ പരിഭാഷപൂര്\u200dവ് എല്ലാ ജോലിക്കൂട്ടത്തിലും നമ്മള്\u200d കാണാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന സമയ മാനേജനേജന്റിന്റെയും നിലപാടുകളുടെയും കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d നിലപ വളരെ നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രണ്ടു ഭാഷ AET സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പാരാലില്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ്, എന്നാലും ഇത്തര ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, വിവരങ്ങളിലേക്കുള്ള രണ്ടു ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങളും അതിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളും തുല്യമായ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നതും വളരെ  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജി പുറത്തേക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ', 'mt': 'Il-ġestjoni tat-terminu u tal-glossarju huma passi vitali fit-tħejjija ta’ kull speċjalista tal-lingwi, u għandhom rwol importanti ħafna fl-istadju tal-edukazzjoni tal-professjonisti tat-traduzzjoni. It-tendenza dejjem tikber ta’ ġestjoni effiċjenti tal-ħin u restrizzjonijiet kostanti tal-ħin li nistgħu nħarsu f’kull settur tax-xogħol iżżid il-ħtieġa tal-kompilazzjoni awtomatika tal-glossarju. Ħafna sistemi tal-AET bilingwi bi prestazzjoni tajba huma bbażati fuq l-ipproċessar ta’ dejta parallel a, madankollu, korpra parallela bħal din mhux dejjem disponibbli għal dominju speċifiku jew par lingwistiku. L-a ċċess bilingwi għall-informazzjoni speċifiku għad-dominju u l-irkupru tagħha bbażat fuq korpura komparabbli huwa qasam promettenti ħafna ta’ riċerka li jeħtieġ analiżi dettaljata kemm tas-sorsi tad-dejta disponibbli kif ukoll tat-tekniki possibbli ta’ estrazzjoni. Din il-ħidma tiffoka fuq l-estrazzjoni awtomatika tat-terminoloġija speċifika għad-dominju minn korpura komparabbli għall-par lingwistiku Ingliż-Russu billi tuża inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem newrali.', 'pl': 'Zarządzanie terminami i słownikiem są kluczowymi etapami przygotowania każdego specjalisty językowego i odgrywają bardzo ważną rolę na etapie kształcenia specjalistów tłumaczeniowych. Rosnący trend efektywnego zarządzania czasem oraz ciągłe ograniczenia czasowe, jakie możemy obserwować w każdym sektorze pracy zwiększają konieczność automatycznego kompilacji słownika. Wiele dobrze wydajnych dwujęzycznych systemów AET opiera się na przetwarzaniu danych równoległych, jednak takie równoległe korpory nie zawsze są dostępne dla konkretnej domeny lub pary językowej. Specyficzny, dwujęzyczny dostęp do informacji i ich pozyskiwanie w oparciu o porównywalne korpusy to bardzo obiecujący obszar badań, który wymaga szczegółowej analizy zarówno dostępnych źródeł danych, jak i możliwych technik ekstrakcji. Niniejsza praca skupia się na automatycznej ekstrakcji terminologii specyficznej dla domeny z porównywalnych korpusów dla pary językowej angielsko-rosyjskiej z wykorzystaniem osadzeń słów neuronowych.', 'ro': 'Managementul termenelor și glosarelor reprezintă pași esențiali în pregătirea fiecărui specialist lingvistic și joacă un rol foarte important în stadiul educației profesioniștilor în traducere. Tendința în creștere a gestionării eficiente a timpului și constrângerile constante de timp pe care le putem observa în fiecare sector de muncă sporește necesitatea compilării automate a glosarului. Multe sisteme AET bilingve bine performante se bazează pe prelucrarea datelor paralele, cu toate acestea, astfel de corpore paralele nu sunt întotdeauna disponibile pentru un anumit domeniu sau o pereche de limbi. Accesul bilingv la informații specific domeniului și extragerea acestora bazat pe corpore comparabile reprezintă un domeniu de cercetare foarte promițător, care necesită o analiză detaliată atât a surselor de date disponibile, cât și a tehnicilor posibile de extragere. Această lucrare se concentrează pe extragerea automată a terminologiei specifice domeniului din corpore comparabile pentru perechea de limbi engleză - rusă prin utilizarea încorporărilor neurale de cuvinte.', 'mn': 'Термин болон үгийн удирдах нь хэл мэргэжилтнүүдийн бүх бэлтгэл бэлтгэлийн хамгийн чухал алхам юм. Тэд хөгжлийн мэргэжилтнүүдийн боловсрол дээр маш чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Эффектив цаг хугацааны удирдах болон тогтмол цаг хугацааны хязгаарлалтын өсөлт нь ажлын секторд автоматжуулалтын хэмжээний хэрэгцээг нэмэгдүүлж болно. Олон сайн ажилладаг хоёр хэл АET систем параллел өгөгдлийн процесс дээр байдаг. Гэхдээ ийм параллел корпора нь хэл хоёрын тулд үргэлж боломжгүй. Хоёр хэлний мэдээлэл болон харьцуулагдмал корпора дээр суурилсан хоёр хэлний ашиглах нь маш амлалтай судалгааны талбай юм. Хоёр мэдээллийн эх үүсвэр болон боломжтой гаргах техникуудын detalj шинжилгээ хэрэгтэй. Энэ ажил нь англи хэл дээр харьцуулагдах корпоратаас автоматик терминологийг автоматик хэлбэрээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Орос хэл хоёр нь мэдрэлийн үгийг нэмж ашиглаж байна.', 'no': 'Terminalhandtering og glossarshandtering er viktige steg for forberedning av kvar språk-spesialitet, og dei speler ein veldig viktig rolle på staden for utdanning av omsetjingsprografiske. Den økende trenden på effektivt tidsstyring og konstant tidsstyringar kan vi observera i kvar jobbsektor auka nødvendigheten for automatisk ordsamling. Mange godt utføringssystemer for biletmenyen er basert på å handsama parallelle data, men slike parallelle korpora er ikkje alltid tilgjengelege for ein spesifikk domene eller språkopla. Domenespesifisert, bilinguelt tilgang til informasjon og tilgang basert på sammenlignbare korpora er eit veldig veldig velkommende forskningsområde som krev ein detaljert analyse av både tilgjengelege datakjelder og dei moglege utpakkingsteknika. Dette arbeidet fokuserer på automatisk terminologisk utpakking av domenespesifisert frå sammenlignbare korpora for engelsk - russisk språk- par ved å bruka neuralordinnbygging.', 'so': "Maamulka xilliga iyo maareynta shahaadadu waa tallaabooyin muhiim ah oo u diyaarinta dhakhaatiirta luuqadaha oo dhan, waxayna qayb muhiim ah ku ciyaaraan iskuulka xirfadaha turjumaadda. Xaalada koritaanka ee maamulka wakhtiga shaqada iyo xadhka waqtiga joogtada ah ee aan ku socon karno qaybta shaqada oo dhan ayaa kordhiya baahida loo baahan yahay sameynta jiilaalka. nidaamka AET ee laba luuqadood oo aad u samaysan karto waxay ku saleysan yihiin baaritaanka lambarka ah, habase yeeshee shirkadda lambarka ah mar walba looma heli karo guri gaar ah ama labo luqad ah. Macluumaadka labada luqadood ee Domain iyo helitaanka shirkadaha isbarbarbarka ah waa dal aad u ballanqaadsan waxbarasho oo u baahan baahan yihiin baaritaanka faa'iido ah oo ku qoran labada sourceed ee macluumaadka iyo qalabka soo bixinta suurtagalka ah. Shaqodaas waxay ku cusbooneysaa soo saarashada qoraalka dabeecada ah ee ku qoran qoraalka qoraalka ee ganacsiga oo isbarbarbarka Ingiriiska- labada luqada Ruushka ee ku isticmaalaya hadalka neurada ah.", 'sv': 'Termer och ordlistor är viktiga steg i förberedelserna för varje språkspecialist, och de spelar en mycket viktig roll i utbildningsstadiet för översättare. Den växande trenden med effektiv tidshantering och ständiga tidsbegränsningar som vi kan observera inom alla branscher ökar behovet av automatisk ordlista sammanställning. Många välfungerande tvåspråkiga AET-system bygger på bearbetning av parallella data, men sådana parallella korpora är inte alltid tillgängliga för en specifik domän eller ett språkpar. Domänspecifik, tvåspråkig tillgång till information och dess hämtning baserat på jämförbara korpora är ett mycket lovande forskningsområde som kräver en detaljerad analys av både tillgängliga datakällor och möjliga extraktionstekniker. Detta arbete fokuserar på domänspecifik automatisk terminologiutvinning från jämförbara korpora för det engelska-ryska språkparet genom att använda neurala ordinbäddningar.', 'ta': 'காலம் மற்றும் பெரிய மேலாண்மை ஒவ்வொரு மொழி சிறப்பாளருக்கும் தயாரிப்பு முக்கியமான படிகள் ஆகும், மற்றும் அவர்கள் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு ப தேவையான நேர மேலாண்மை மற்றும் நிலையான நேர கட்டுப்பாடுகளை நாம் பார்க்கலாம் ஒவ்வொரு வேலை துறையிலும் தானாகவே கண்ணுபிடிக்க Many well-performing bilingual AET systems are based on processing parallel data, however, such parallel corpora are not always available for a specific domain or a language pair.  டொமைன் குறிப்பிட்ட, இரு மொழி தகவல் அணுகல் மற்றும் அதன் மீட்டெடுப்பு ஒப்பிட்ட நிறுவனத்தை அடிப்படையில் செலுத்துதல் மிகவும் வாக்களிக்கப்பட்ட ஆய இந்த வேலை தானாகவே தானியங்கி முனைய வெளியீட்டை ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு ஒப்பிடும் கோர்போரிலிருந்து வெளியீட்டை மீது கவனம் செலுத்துக', 'sr': 'Režim i režim glossara su vitalni koraci pripreme svakog jezičkog specijalista, i igraju veoma važnu ulogu na fazi obrazovanja profesionalaca prevoda. Povećavajući trend efikasnog upravljanja vremenom i konstantnih ograničenja vremena koje možemo posmatrati u svakom poslovnom sektoru povećava potrebu automatske kompilacije glossara. Mnogi dobri dvojezički AET sistemi se temelju na obradu paralelnih podataka, međutim, takva paralelna korpora nije uvek dostupna za određenu domenu ili jezički par. Domena specifični, dvojezički pristup informacijama i njegov otkup na usporednom korporaciji je veoma obećavajući području istraživanja koji zahteva detaljnu analizu i dostupnih izvora podataka i mogućih tehnika izvlačenja. Ovaj rad se fokusira na ekstrakciju automatske terminologije specifične domene iz usporednog korporacije za engleski - ruski jezički par korištenjem neuralnih reči.', 'si': 'වාර්තාව සහ ලොස්සරි ප්\u200dරධානය විශේෂයෙන් හැම භාෂා විශේෂකයෙක්ම සූදානම් කරන්න පුළුවන් පැත්තක්, ඒ වගේම ඔව ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය වෙලාව ප්\u200dරධානය සහ ස්ථායිත වෙලාව ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ස්ථායිත වෙලාවක් සීමාවක් අපි හැම වැඩක් විධානයෙන සාමාන්\u200dය දත්ත ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය කරන්න හොඳ සාමාන්\u200dය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් හැමවෙලේම සාමාන්\u200dය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ ඩෝමේන් විශේෂ, දෙවෙනි භාෂාවක් තොරතුරු වලට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් සහ එයාගේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශ මේ වැඩේ ස්වයංග්\u200dරීසිය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශේෂ විශේෂ තර්මාන්\u200dය විශේෂ ප්\u200dරකාශයෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාව සම්ප', 'ur': 'کلمات اور کلمات کی مدیریت ہر زبان مخصوص کے تیار کرنے کی ضرورت قدم ہیں، اور وہ ترجمہ پھیلانے والوں کی تعلیم کے مرحلہ میں بہت اہم رول لگا رہے ہیں. موثر زمان مدیریت اور ثابت زمان کے تنظیمات کی رشد کی ترینڈ ہم ہر کام بخش میں دیکھ سکتے ہیں کہ آٹوٹی گلسوری جمع کرنے کی ضرورت اضافہ کرتی ہے. بہت سے بہترین عملہ دو زبان AET سیستموں پر parallel data پردازی پر بنیاد ہیں، لیکن ایسی parallel corpora ہمیشہ ایک خاص ڈومین یا زبان جوڑ کے لئے موجود نہیں ہیں. ڈومین کے مطابق، دو زبان کے معلومات کی دسترسی اور اس کی پیدائش مطابق قابل کمپورا پر بنیاد ہے ایک بہت وعدہ دینے والی محیط ہے جسے دونوں موجود ڈاٹا سورج اور ممکن استخراج ٹیکنیک کی تحلیل کی ضرورت ہے. یہ کام انگلیسی کے لئے مطابق قابل ترمینلوژی اخراج کے ذریعہ ڈومین خاص طریقے سے روسی زبان جوڑے کو مطابق نورول لفظ ایمبڈینگ کے مطابق مطابق کرتا ہے.', 'kk': 'Термені және сөздерді басқару - әрбір тіл специалистіктерінің дайындау үшін маңызды қадамдары. Олар аудару профессионалдарының білімінде өте маңызды рольді орындайды. Біз әрбір жұмыс секторында қарай тәжірибелі уақытты басқару мен тәуелсіз уақытты шектеулердің тенденциясы автоматты сөздік жинақтау қажеттігін өзгерте аламыз. Көптеген екі тілі AET жүйелері параллель деректерді өңдеу негізінде негізделген, бірақ бұл параллель корпора әрқашан бір доменге немесе тіл екі үшін қол жеткізбейді. Доменге арнаулы, екі тілі мәліметке қатынау және оларды салыстыруға негізделген корпораға қатынау - бар деректер көзі мен мүмкін тарқату техникаларының тегжейлі анализ талап ететін зерттеу аумағы. Бұл жұмыс доменге автоматты терминологиялық терминологияны ағылшын тілдерінің салыстырмалы корпорасынан шығаруға - руссия тілдерінің екі невралды сөздерді ендіру арқылы көмектеседі', 'uz': "Tashqi va glossa boshqaruvi har bir tillar ekspertisi tayyorlanish muhim qadamlari, va ular tarjima taʼminlovchi taʼminlov sohasida juda muhim roli o'ynashadi. @ info Koʻp yaxshi bajarayon AET tizimi parallel maʼlumotni bajarish asosida asosida, ammo, bu parallel kompaniya davlat yoki tillar ikki necha bo'lmaydi. Domain-specific, bilingual access to information and its retrieval based on comparable corpora is a very promising area of research that requires a detailed analysis of both available data sources and the possible extraction techniques.  Bu ish domain-specific terminologni bir xillik inglizcha tildan foydalanish uchun avtomatik terminologni foydalanish uchun foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Việc quản lý chữ ký và bóng rổ là bước quan trọng để chuẩn bị cho mọi chuyên gia ngôn ngữ, và họ đóng vai trò rất quan trọng trong giai đoạn giáo dục chuyên nghiệp dịch. Sự phát triển của việc quản lý thời gian hiệu quả và hạn chế thời gian liên tục chúng ta có thể quan sát trong mỗi lĩnh vực làm việc tăng sự cần thiết của việc soạn thảo bóng loáng tự động. Rất nhiều hệ thống hoạt động hai chữ đều được dựa trên việc xử lý dữ liệu song song song, tuy nhiên, nhóm chữ này không phải luôn có mặt cho một miền cụ thể hay một cặp ngôn ngữ. Việc truy cập hai chiều nông vực cho thông tin và việc thu thập thông tin dựa trên cơ thể tương đối là một lĩnh vực rất hứa hẹn, đòi hỏi một cuộc nghiên cứu chi tiết về các nguồn dữ liệu sẵn sàng và các kỹ thuật khai thác có thể. Công trình này tập trung vào việc khai thác các thuật ngữ tự động miền đặc trưng từ đối tượng Hạ sĩ tương ứng cho cặp ngôn ngữ Anh quốc (Nga) bằng cách kết hợp các từ thần kinh.', 'bg': 'Управлението на термините и речника са жизненоважни стъпки в подготовката на всеки езиков специалист и играят много важна роля на етапа на обучение на преводачите. Нарастващата тенденция на ефективно управление на времето и постоянните времеви ограничения, които можем да наблюдаваме във всеки отрасъл на работа, увеличава необходимостта от автоматично съставяне на речника. Много добре функциониращи двуезични системи се основават на обработка на паралелни данни, но такива паралелни корпуси не винаги са налични за конкретен домейн или езикова двойка. Специфичен за домейна, двуезичен достъп до информация и нейното извличане въз основа на сравними корпуси е много обещаваща област на изследвания, която изисква подробен анализ както на наличните източници на данни, така и на възможните техники за извличане. Тази работа се фокусира върху специфичното за домейна автоматично извличане на терминология от сравними корпуси за английско-руската езикова двойка чрез използване на невронни вграждания на думи.', 'da': 'Ledelse af termer og ordlister er vigtige skridt i forberedelsen af alle sprogspecialister, og de spiller en meget vigtig rolle i uddannelsen af oversættelsespersonale. Den voksende tendens til effektiv tidsstyring og konstante tidsbegrænsninger, som vi kan observere i alle jobsektorer, øger nødvendigheden af den automatiske ordliste udarbejdelse. Mange velfungerende tosprogede AET-systemer er baseret på behandling af parallelle data, men sådanne parallelle korpora er ikke altid tilgængelige for et bestemt domæne eller et sprogpar. Domænespecifik, tosproget adgang til information og dens hentning baseret på sammenlignelige corpora er et meget lovende forskningsområde, der kræver en detaljeret analyse af både tilgængelige datakilder og mulige udvindingsteknikker. Dette arbejde fokuserer på domænespecifik automatisk terminologiudtrækning fra sammenlignelige korpora for det engelsk-russiske sprogpar ved at bruge neurale ord indlejringer.', 'hr': 'Režim i upravljanje glossarima su vitalni koraci pripreme svakog jezičkog specijalista i igraju veoma važnu ulogu na fazi obrazovanja profesionalaca prevoda. Povećavajući trend učinkovitih vremenskih upravljanja i konstantnih vremenskih ograničenja koje možemo primijetiti u svakom poslovnom sektoru povećava potrebu automatske skupljanje glossara. Mnogi dobar dvojezički AET sustavi temeljeni su na obradi paralelnih podataka, međutim, takva paralelna tijela nije uvijek dostupna za određenu domenu ili jezički par. Domena specifični, dvojezički pristup informacijama i njezin otkup na usporednom tijelu je veoma obećavajući područje istraživanja koji zahtijeva detaljnu analizu i dostupnih izvora podataka i mogućih tehnika izvlačenja. Ovaj rad se fokusira na ekstrakciju automatske terminologije specifične domene iz usporednog korporacije za engleski - ruski jezički par koristeći uključenje neuralnih riječi.', 'nl': "Termen- en woordenlijstbeheer zijn cruciale stappen bij de voorbereiding van elke taalspecialist en spelen een zeer belangrijke rol in het stadium van de opleiding van vertalers. De groeiende trend van efficiënt tijdmanagement en constante tijdsbeperkingen die we in elke sector kunnen waarnemen, verhoogt de noodzaak van de automatische verzameling van woordenlijst. Veel goed presterende tweetalige AET-systemen zijn gebaseerd op het verwerken van parallelle gegevens, maar dergelijke parallelle corpora's zijn niet altijd beschikbaar voor een specifiek domein of een taalpaar. Domeinspecifieke, tweetalige toegang tot informatie en het ophalen ervan op basis van vergelijkbare corpora's is een veelbelovend onderzoeksgebied dat een gedetailleerde analyse van zowel beschikbare gegevensbronnen als de mogelijke extractietechnieken vereist. Dit werk richt zich op domeinspecifieke automatische terminologie extractie uit vergelijkbare corpora's voor het Engels-Russische taalpaar door gebruik te maken van neurale woord embeddings.", 'id': 'Manajemen terma dan glosari adalah langkah penting persiapan setiap spesialis bahasa, dan mereka bermain peran yang sangat penting di tahap pendidikan profesional terjemahan. Tendera tumbuh dari pengurusan waktu efisien dan batas waktu konstan yang kita perhatikan di setiap sektor pekerjaan meningkatkan kebutuhan kompilasi glossar otomatis. Banyak sistem AET bilingual yang berkembang dengan baik berdasarkan proses data paralel, bagaimanapun, corpora paralel seperti itu tidak selalu tersedia untuk domain spesifik atau pasangan bahasa. Secara domain-spesifik, akses bilingual ke informasi dan penemuannya berdasarkan korpra yang dapat dibandingkan adalah area penelitian yang sangat berjanji yang membutuhkan analisis rincian dari kedua sumber data yang tersedia dan teknik ekstraksi yang mungkin. Pekerjaan ini fokus pada ekstraksi terminologi otomatis spesifik domain dari corpora yang dapat dibandingkan untuk pasangan bahasa Inggris - Rusia dengan menggunakan penyembedding kata saraf.', 'fa': 'مدیریت کلمات و کلمات مرحله های مهم آماده کردن هر متخصص زبان است و آنها نقش بسیار مهم در مرحله آموزش حرفه\u200cای از ترجمه\u200cها بازی می\u200cکنند. ترند افزایش مدیریت زمان موثرت و محدودیت زمان دائمی را می توانیم در هر بخش شغل کار نیازی جمع کردن کلاوساری خودکار را افزایش دهیم. بسیاری از سیستم\u200cهای AET دو زبانی خوب انجام می\u200cدهند بر روی پرداخت داده\u200cهای parallel، ولی این شرکت parallel همیشه برای یک دامنه خاص یا یک جفت زبان دسترسی ندارند. دسترسی دو زبان به اطلاعات و بازیابی آن بر اساس شرکت قابل مقایسه، یک منطقه بسیار قول\u200cدهنده تحقیقات است که نیاز به تحلیل detaیح از منابع داده\u200cهای موجود و تکنیک استخراج ممکن است. این کار روی استخراج ترمینالوژی خودکار ویژه\u200cای از شرکت قابل مقایسه برای انگلیسی - جفت زبان روسی با استفاده از کلمات عصبی\u200cها تمرکز می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa muda na utawala wa kusisimua ni hatua muhimu za kuandaa kwa kila mtaalam wa lugha, na wanacheza jukwaa la elimu kwa wataalamu wa tafsiri. Ukongezeko wa mwenendo wa usimamizi wa muda wa ufanisi na vikwazo vya muda wa kawaida ambavyo tunaweza kuona katika kila sekta ya kazi inaongezea uhitaji wa mkusanyiko wa sifa za kujitegemea. Mfumo wa AET unaofanya vizuri wa lugha mbili unategemea kupambana na data tofauti, hata hivyo, kampuni kama hiyo haipatikani mara zote kwa ajili ya maeneo maalum au viwili vya lugha. Huduma maalum, upatikanaji wa lugha mbili na upatikanaji wake kwa kutumia makampuni yanayofanana ni eneo la utafiti ambalo linahitaji uchambuzi wa kina wa vyanzo vya taarifa vinavyopatikana na teknolojia zinazowezekana. Kazi hii inajikita kwenye utekelezaji wa ngono maalum kutoka kwa makampuni yanayofanana na Kiingereza - wawili wa lugha ya Kirusi kwa kutumia maneno ya kisasa.', 'af': "Term en glossary bestuurder is belangrike stappe van die voorbereiding van elke taal spesialiteit, en hulle speel 'n baie belangrike rol op die stadium van opvoeding van vertaling profesionales. Die groei trend van effektief tydsbestuurder en konstante tydsbeheinings kan ons in elke werkssektor onderhou die nodigheid van die automatiese glossary kompilasie verhoog. Baie goed uitvoerde twee tongelstelsels is gebaseer op verandering parallele data, maar sodanige parallele korpora is nie altyd beskikbaar vir 'n spesifieke domein of 'n taal paar nie. Domein-spesifieke, twee tale toegang tot inligting en sy ontvang gebaseer op vergelykbare korpora is 'n baie beloftende area van ondersoek wat 'n gedetale analisie van beide beskikbare data bronne en die moontlike uitpakkingteknike benodig. Hierdie werk fokus op domein-spesifieke outomatiese terminologie uittrek van vergelykbare korpora vir die Engels - Russiese taal paar deur neurale woord inbêding te gebruik.", 'tr': 'Sözler we sözlük müdiri her dil spesialistleriniň taýýarlanmagynyň wajyp adımlarydır we olar terjime eden profesionallaryň bilimi taýýarlanmagynda örän wajyp roli bar. Her işe sektörinde gözleýän täsirli wagt yönetiminiň we daimi wagt çykarmasynyň täsirini otomatik sözleşiginiň ilatyny artýar. Köp gowy etjek iki dilli AET sistemalary parallel maglumatlary işlemege dayanýar, ýöne şol parallel korpora her zaman takyk bir domen ýa-da dil çifti üçin mejbur däl. Aýratyn hasapla, iki dil maglumaty we ol maglumaty karşılaştyrylýan korpora daýanýar, bu araştyrma bölegi örän söz berýän maglumatyň hem bolup biljek maglumatyň çeşmeleriniň we mümkin a çma teknikleriniň detaylyly analyzasyny gerek. Bu işe, iňlis dilinden karşılaştırılýan korporatdan, domena takyk awtomatik terminologiýany açmak üçin ünsüni oňladýar - Rus dil çiftleri näyral sözleri girişdirmek üçin ullanýar.', 'sq': 'Menaxhimi i termave dhe glosarit janë hapa thelbësore të përgatitjes së çdo specialisti gjuhësor dhe ato luajnë një rol shumë të rëndësishëm në fazën e arsimit të profesionistëve të përkthimit. Trendi në rritje i menaxhimit të kohës efektiv dhe kufizimeve të kohës konstante që mund të vëzhgojmë në çdo sektor pune rrit nevojën e kompilimit automatik të glosarit. Shumë sisteme AET dy-gjuhësh me rezultate të mira bazohen në procesimin e të dhënave paralele, megjithatë, korpra të tilla paralele nuk janë gjithmonë në dispozicion për një domeni të caktuar apo një çift gjuhësh. Përqasje dy-gjuhëse në informacion specifike për domenën dhe marrja e saj bazuar në korpra të krahasueshme është një fushë shumë premtuese kërkimi që kërkon një analizë të hollësishme të burimeve të të dhënave të disponueshme dhe teknikave të mundshme të nxjerrjes. Ky punë përqëndrohet në nxjerrjen automatike të terminologjisë specifike për domenin nga korpra të krahasueshme për çiftin gjuhë angleze-ruse duke përdorur përfshirjen e fjalëve nervore.', 'de': 'Term- und Glossarmanagement sind wichtige Schritte der Vorbereitung jedes Sprachspezialisten, und sie spielen eine sehr wichtige Rolle in der Ausbildung von Übersetzern. Der zunehmende Trend zu effizientem Zeitmanagement und ständigen zeitlichen Zwängen, die wir in jeder Branche beobachten können, erhöht die Notwendigkeit der automatischen Glossarerstellung. Viele leistungsfähige zweisprachige AET-Systeme basieren auf der Verarbeitung paralleler Daten, jedoch sind solche parallelen Korpora nicht immer für eine bestimmte Domäne oder ein Sprachpaar verfügbar. Der domänenspezifische, zweisprachige Zugang zu Informationen und deren Abruf auf Basis vergleichbarer Korpora ist ein sehr vielversprechendes Forschungsgebiet, das eine detaillierte Analyse sowohl der verfügbaren Datenquellen als auch der möglichen Extraktionstechniken erfordert. Diese Arbeit konzentriert sich auf domänenspezifische automatische Terminologieextraktion aus vergleichbaren Korpora für das englisch-russische Sprachpaar unter Verwendung neuronaler Worteinbettungen.', 'am': 'የቋንቋው ባለስታማዊ ሁሉ ማስታወቂያ የሚያስፈልገው የግማሽ እርምጃዎች ናቸው፡፡ The growing trend of efficient time management and constant time constraints we may observe in every job sector increases the necessity of the automatic glossary compilation.  ብዙዎች የሁለት ቋንቋዎች የAET ስርዓቶች በተለይ ዳታ በመስመር ላይ ናቸው፡፡ የዶሜን አካባቢ፣ የሁለት ቋንቋ መረጃ ማግኘት እና በተያያይነ ኮርፖራ የተመሳሳይ መግኘት የተስፋ መረጃ ነው፡፡ ይህ ሥራ ከኮርፖራ ለተስተያየው የዶሜን-የተለየ አውታደራዊ ተርሚኖሎጂ ለመግለጽ - የሩሽኛ ቋንቋ ሁለቶች በጠቅላላ ቃላትን በመጠቀም ያስተካክላል፡፡', 'ko': '용어와 어휘 관리는 모든 언어 전문가가 준비하는 중요한 절차로 번역 전문가의 교육 단계에서 매우 중요한 역할을 한다.효과적인 시간 관리와 우리가 모든 업무 분야에서 관찰할 수 있는 고정 시간 제한의 증가 추세는 자동 어휘 집성의 필요성을 증가시켰다.많은 성능이 좋은 이중 언어 AET 시스템은 병렬 데이터 처리를 바탕으로 하지만, 이러한 병렬 언어 자료 라이브러리는 특정 분야나 언어 쌍에 항상 적용되는 것은 아니다.비교 가능한 자료 라이브러리의 특정 분야를 바탕으로 하는 이중 언어 정보 획득과 검색은 매우 유망한 연구 분야로 사용 가능한 데이터 원천과 가능한 추출 기술에 대해 상세한 분석을 해야 한다.이 작업의 중점은 신경 단어를 이용하여 영어-러시아어 언어가 맞는 비교 가능한 자료 라이브러리에 삽입하여 특정 영역의 용어를 자동으로 추출하는 것이다.', 'az': 'Sözlük və sözlük yönetimi hər dil spesialistinin təmizlənməsi üçün vacib adımlardır və onlar tercümə təhsil sahiblərinin təhsil müqabilində çox möhüm rol oynayırlar. Hər iş sektöründə gözləyirik ki, təşkil vaxtı yönetiminin və sürəkli vaxtın müəyyənləşdirilməsinin artırması olar. Həqiqətən də, bu paralel korpora həmişə müəyyən bir domena və dil çift üçün müəyyən edilməz. Domain-specific, iki dil məlumatına və onun alınması müqayisədə korpora dayanan bir araştırma bölgesidir ki, faydalanıb verilən məlumat mənbələrinin və mümkün çıxarma tekniklərinin detalı analizi lazımdır. Bu işlər, İngilizce üçün qarşılaşdırılabilir korporadan avtomatik terminoloji qovmağa tərəf odaqlanır - Rus dil çift nöral sözlərini istifadə edərək.', 'hy': 'Տարբերակները և գլոսարիայի ղեկավարումը յուրաքանչյուր լեզվի մասնագետի պատրաստման կարևոր քայլեր են, և նրանք շատ կարևոր դեր են խաղում թարգմանության մասնագետների կրթության ժամանակ: Ժամանակի արդյունավետ կառավարման աճող տենդենսը և անընդհատ ժամանակային սահմանափակումները, որոնք մենք կարող ենք դիտարկել աշխատանքի յուրաքանչյուր ոլորտում, աճում է ավտոմատիկ գլոսարանի կառուցվածքի կարիքը Շատ լավ աշխատող երկլեզու ԱԵԹ համակարգեր հիմնված են զուգահեռ տվյալների վերաբերյալ, սակայն նման զուգահեռ օրգանիզմներ միշտ հասանելի չեն որոշակի բնագավառի կամ լեզվի զուգավորի համար: Դոմենին հատուկ, երկլեզու ինֆորմացիայի հասանելիությունը և դրանց վերադարձումը համեմատական մարմնի վրա հիմնված շատ խոստացնող ուսումնասիրության ոլորտ է, որը պահանջում է մանրամասն վերլուծություն երկու հասանելի տվյալների աղբյուրների և հնարավոր Այս աշխատանքը կենտրոնանում է բնագավառի կոնկրետ ավտոմատիկ տերմինոլոգիայի վերացման վրա անգլերեն-ռուս լեզվի զույգի համեմատական մարմնից օգտագործելով նյարդային բառերի ներգրավումներ:', 'bs': 'Režim i rješavanje glossara su vitalni koraci pripreme svakog jezičkog specijalista i igraju veoma važnu ulogu na fazi obrazovanja profesionalaca prevoda. Povećavajući trend učinkovitog vremenskog upravljanja i konstantnih ograničenja vremena koje bismo mogli posmatrati u svakom sektoru poslovanja povećava potrebu automatske kompilacije glossara. Mnogi dobri dvojezički AET sistemi se temeljavaju na obradi paralelnih podataka, međutim, takva paralelna korpora nije uvijek dostupna za određenu domenu ili jezički par. Domena specifični, dvojezički pristup informacijama i njegov otkup na usporednom korporaciji je veoma obećavajući područje istraživanja koji zahtijeva detaljnu analizu i dostupnih izvora podataka i mogućih tehnika izvlačenja. Ovaj rad se fokusira na ekstrakciju automatske terminologije iz usporednog korporacije za engleski - ruski jezički par korištenjem neuralnih riječi.', 'ca': "Term and glossary management are vital steps of preparation of every language specialist, and they play a very important role at the stage of education of translation professionals.  La creixent tendència de gestió eficient del temps i limitacions constants del temps que podem observar en cada sector de treball augmenta la necessitat de la compilació automàtica del glossari. Molts sistemes bilingües AET ben performants estan basats en el processament de dades paralèls, però aquests corpores paralèls no sempre estan disponibles per un domini específic o un parell de llenguatges. L'accés bilingüe a la informació, específic per domini, i la seva recuperació basada en corpores comparables és una àrea de recerca molt prometedora que requereix una anàlisi detallada de les fonts de dades disponibles i de les possibles tècniques d'extracció. Aquesta obra es centra en l'extracció automàtica de terminologia específica per domini de corpores comparables per al parell de llenguatge anglès-russo utilitzant integracions neuronals de paraules.", 'cs': 'Správa termínů a slovníku jsou zásadními kroky přípravy každého jazykového specialisty a hrají velmi důležitou roli ve fázi vzdělávání překladatelů. Rostoucí trend efektivního časového řízení a neustálé časové omezení, které můžeme pozorovat v každém odvětví práce, zvyšuje nutnost automatického sestavování slovníku. Mnoho dobře výkonných dvojjazyčných AET systémů je založeno na zpracování paralelních dat, nicméně takové paralelní korpusy nejsou vždy k dispozici pro konkrétní doménu nebo jazykový pár. Oborově specifický, dvojjazyčný přístup k informacím a jejich vyhledávání na základě srovnatelných korpusů je velmi slibnou oblastí výzkumu, která vyžaduje podrobnou analýzu dostupných zdrojů dat i možných extrakčních technik. Tato práce se zaměřuje na doménově specifickou automatickou extrakci terminologie ze srovnatelných korpusů pro anglicko-ruský jazykový pár pomocí vložení neuronových slov.', 'et': 'Terminite ja sõnastiku haldamine on iga keelespetsialisti ettevalmistamise olulised sammud ning neil on tõlketöötajate hariduse etapis väga oluline roll. Tõhusa ajajuhtimise ja pidevate ajapiirangute kasv, mida võime täheldada igas töösektoris, suurendab automaatse sõnastiku koostamise vajadust. Paljud hästi toimivad kakskeelsed AET-süsteemid põhinevad paralleelsete andmete töötlemisel, kuid sellised paralleelsed korpused ei ole alati saadaval konkreetse domeeni või keelepaari jaoks. Domeenispetsiifiline, kakskeelne juurdepääs teabele ja selle leidmine võrreldavatel korpustel on väga paljulubav uurimisvaldkond, mis nõuab nii olemasolevate andmeallikate kui ka võimalike ekstraheerimistehnikate üksikasjalikku analüüsi. Käesolev töö keskendub domeenispetsiifilisele automaatsele terminoloogia ekstraheerimisele võrreldavatest korpustest inglise ja vene keele paari jaoks, kasutades neurosõnade manustamist.', 'fi': 'Termien ja sanastojen hallinta on jokaisen kieliasiantuntijan valmistelun elintärkeä vaihe, ja niillä on erittäin tärkeä rooli käännösalan ammattilaisten koulutuksessa. Tehokkaan ajanhallinnan trendi ja jatkuvat aikarajoitukset, joita voimme havaita kaikilla toimialoilla, lisäävät automaattisen sanaston kokoamisen tarvetta. Monet hyvin toimivat kaksikieliset AET-järjestelmät perustuvat rinnakkaistietojen käsittelyyn, mutta tällaiset rinnakkaiset korpuset eivät ole aina saatavilla tietylle toimialueelle tai kieliparille. Aluekohtainen, kaksikielinen tiedonsaanti ja sen haku vertailukelpoisiin korpusiin on erittäin lupaava tutkimusalue, joka edellyttää sekä saatavilla olevien tietolähteiden että mahdollisten talteenottotekniikoiden yksityiskohtaista analysointia. Tässä työssä keskitytään verkkotunnuskohtaiseen automaattiseen terminologian poimintaan vertailukelpoisista korpusista englannin ja venäjän kieliparille käyttämällä neurosanaupotuksia.', 'bn': 'প্রত্যেক ভাষার বিশেষজ্ঞের প্রস্তুতি প্রস্তুতির গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পদক্ষেপ এবং তারা অনুবাদের শিক্ষার পর্যায়ে খুব গুরুত্বপূ প্রত্যেক কাজের ক্ষেত্রে আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে গ্লাসারী সংগঠনের প্রয়োজনীয়তা বৃদ্ধি করতে পারি। অনেক ভালো প্রদর্শনী দুই ভাষার AET সিস্টেম প্যারালেল ডাটা প্রক্রিয়ার ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তিতে রয়েছে, তবে এই ধরনের প্যারালেল কর্পোরা সবসময় একটি নি ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট, তথ্য প্রবেশের দুই ভাষা এবং তার তুলনামূলক কোর্পোরা ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে তার পুনরুদ্ধারের সুযোগ একটি প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল এলাকা, যা প This work focuses on domain-specific automatic terminology extraction from comparable corpora for the English - Russian language pair by utilizing neural word embeddings.', 'ha': "Manajan muhimmi na zaman shawara da aka yi wa tsari ga duk ma'abũcin harshe, kuma suna yin wani rabo mai muhimu a fassarar wa masu fassarar. Ana ƙara da hanyon mai amfani da manajan lokaci da tsarin lokaci da za'a iya gani a cikin kõwace rabon aikin, yana ƙara wa muhimmin adadi farat ɗaya. Akwai wasu masu yin amfani da fasalin AET-na'ura biyu ne a kan aikin bayani da data masu daidaita, kuma amma, ba za'a iya samar da shirin parallel ko don a ƙayyade kowace wa wata Domin da aka ƙayyade, ko wani nau'in harshe. @ label: listbox Wannan aikin yana fokus a kan zartar da taƙaita farat ɗaya daga makampuni da ke daidaita zuwa Ingiriya - nau'in Ruushi da za'a yi amfani da tsarin maganar neura.", 'sk': 'Upravljanje izrazov in slovarja sta ključni koraki priprave vsakega jezikovnega strokovnjaka in igrata zelo pomembno vlogo v fazi izobraževanja prevajalskih strokovnjakov. Naraščajoči trend učinkovitega časovnega upravljanja in stalne časovne omejitve, ki jih lahko opazimo v vsakem delovnem sektorju, povečuje potrebo po avtomatičnem sestavljanju slovarja. Številni dobro uspešni dvojezični sistemi AET temeljijo na obdelavi vzporednih podatkov, vendar taki vzporedni korpusi niso vedno na voljo za določeno domeno ali jezikovni par. Domensko specifičen, dvojezični dostop do informacij in njihovo iskanje na podlagi primerljivih korpusov je zelo obetavno področje raziskav, ki zahteva podrobno analizo razpoložljivih virov podatkov in možnih tehnik ekstrakcije. Delo se osredotoča na domensko specifično avtomatsko ekstrakcijo terminologije iz primerljivih korpusov za angleško-ruski jezikovni par z uporabo nevronskih besednih vdelav.', 'he': 'ניהול המילים והגלוסרי הם צעדים חיוניים של הכינוי של כל מומחה לשפה, והם משחקים תפקיד חשוב מאוד בשלב החינוך של מקצועי התרגום. המנהל הגדול של ניהול זמן יעיל ומגבלות זמן קבועים שאנחנו יכולים לצפות בכל תחום עבודה מגביר את הצורך של אסיפת גלוסריה אוטומטית. מערכות AET שתיים-לשוניות רבות מתפקדות היטב מבוססות על עיבוד נתונים מקבילים, עם זאת, גופורה מקבילה כזו לא תמיד זמינה לתחום מסוים או זוג שפה. גישה מיוחדת למשטרה, שתיים-לשונית למידע והגילוש שלה מבוסס על גופורה שווה הוא אזור מחקר מבטיח מאוד שדורש ניתוח פרטי של שני מקורות נתונים זמינים וטכניקות החילוץ האפשריות. העבודה הזאת מתמקדת בהוצאה טמינולוגיה אוטומטית ספציפית למשפחה מהגופורה שווה לזוג השפה האנגלית-רוסית על ידי השימוש בתכניות מילים עצביות.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé lan kelasmi Genjer-genjer saiki wis rampung pengaturan neng akeh lanjut ning ora bisa nguasai ora bisa nguasai ning sabên sektor obah nyimpen kanggo ngerawak dhéwé ora bisa nguasai perusahaan kelas. TODOS domain This job is centered on domain-special automatically terminal extract from komparable bodora for the Inggris - Rusian language para by use Neral word embedding.', 'bo': 'Term and glossary management are important steps of preparation of every language specialist. They play a very important role in the stage of education of professionals. The growing trend of efficient time management and constant time constraints we can observe in every job sector increases the necessity of the automatic glossary compilation. Many well-performing bilingual AET systems are based on processing parallel data, however, such parallel corpora are always available for a specific domain or a language pair. Domain-specific, bilingual access to information and its retrieval based on comparable corporation is a very promising area of research that requires a detailed analysis of both available data sources and the possible extraction techniques. This work focuses on domain-specific automatic terminology extraction from comparable corpora for the English - Russian language pair by utilizing neural word embeddings.'}
{'en': 'Web-sentiment analysis of public comments (public reviews) for languages with limited resources such as the Kazakh language', 'ar': 'تحليل المشاعر على شبكة الإنترنت للتعليقات العامة (المراجعات العامة) للغات ذات الموارد المحدودة مثل اللغة الكازاخستانية', 'fr': 'Analyse du sentiment sur le Web des commentaires publics (revues publiques) pour des langues aux ressources limitées telles que la langue kazakhe', 'pt': 'Análise do sentimento da Web de comentários públicos (revisões públicas) para idiomas com recursos limitados, como o idioma cazaque', 'es': 'Análisis de opiniones web de comentarios públicos (reseñas públicas) para idiomas con recursos limitados, como el idioma kazajo', 'ja': 'カザフ語などのリソースが限られている言語のパブリックコメント（パブリックレビュー）のWebセンチメント分析', 'hi': 'कजाख भाषा जैसे सीमित संसाधनों वाली भाषाओं के लिए सार्वजनिक टिप्पणियों (सार्वजनिक समीक्षाओं) का वेब-भावना विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'Интернет-анализ общественных комментариев (публичных обзоров) для языков с ограниченными ресурсами, таких как казахский язык', 'zh': '资源有限之言(如哈萨克语)之公议(公论)网络情析', 'ga': 'Anailís meon gréasáin ar thuairimí an phobail (léirmheasanna poiblí) do theangacha a bhfuil acmhainní teoranta acu mar an teanga Casaicis', 'ka': 'საზოგადო კომენტრების ვებ-სენტიმენტის ანალიზაცია (საზოგადო განახლებები) ენათებისთვის, როგორც კაზაკური ენათი,', 'el': 'Ανάλυση συναισθημάτων στο διαδίκτυο δημοσίων σχολίων (δημόσιες κριτικές) για γλώσσες με περιορισμένους πόρους, όπως η γλώσσα του Καζακστάν', 'hu': 'Nyilvános megjegyzések webes hangulatelemzése (nyilvános értékelések) korlátozott forrásokkal rendelkező nyelvekre, például a kazah nyelvre', 'kk': 'Қазақша тілі секілді шектелген ресурстар тілдер үшін көпшілік түсініктемелер (көпшілік қарау) талаптарының веб- сезімдік анализ', 'mk': 'Web-sentiment analysis of public comments (public reviews) for languages with limited resources such as the Kazakh language', 'it': 'Analisi web-sentiment dei commenti pubblici (recensioni pubbliche) per lingue con risorse limitate come la lingua kazaka', 'lt': 'Viešųjų pastabų internetinė analizė (viešosios peržiūros) ribotų išteklių kalboms, pvz., kazakų kalbai', 'ms': 'Analisis perasaan-sesawang ulasan awam (ulasan awam) untuk bahasa dengan sumber terbatas seperti bahasa Kazakh', 'ml': 'കാസാഖ് ഭാഷ പോലുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളുള്ള ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് (പൊതു പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200d) വെബിലെ വിചാരകങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Analiżi tas-sentimenti fuq l-internet tal-kummenti pubbliċi (reviżjonijiet pubbliċi) għal lingwi b’riżorsi limitati bħall-lingwa Każaka', 'mn': 'Казахсын хэл шиг хязгаарлагдмал баялаг хэлнүүдийн олон нийтийн сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээ', 'no': 'Internettsentimentanalyse av offentlige kommentarar (offentlige gjennomsikt) for språk med begrensede ressursar som Kazakh språk', 'pl': 'Analiza sentymentów internetowych komentarzy publicznych (recenzje publiczne) dla języków o ograniczonych zasobach, takich jak język kazachski', 'ro': 'Analiza sentimentului web al comentariilor publice (recenzii publice) pentru limbi cu resurse limitate, cum ar fi limba kazahă', 'sr': 'Analiza saosećanja mreže javnih komentara (javnih pregleda) za jezike sa ograničenim resursima poput kazahskog jezika', 'so': 'Analysis-xisaabta internetka oo ku saabsan kommentaha dadweynaha (baaritaanka dadweynaha) luqadaha lagu haysto resources xadgudban sida luqada Kazakh', 'sv': 'Webbsentimentalanalys av offentliga kommentarer (offentliga recensioner) för språk med begränsade resurser såsom det kazakiska språket', 'ta': 'பொது குறிப்பிட்ட மொழிகளுக்கான இணைய உணர்வு ஆய்வு', 'si': 'ජාතික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (ජාතික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්) භාෂාවට සීමාවිත සඳහා කාසාක් භාෂාව වගේ ජාතික විශ්', 'ur': 'جہالت کی مثالیں (عمومی رسانیوں) کی ویب-احساسات تحلیل کی زبانوں کے لئے محدود رسانیوں کے ساتھ جیسے کازاخ زبان', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trình phân tích cảm xúc về các bình luận công cộng (bình luận công cộng) cho các ngôn ngữ có giới hạn như ngôn ngữ Kazak.', 'bg': 'Уеб-сантиментален анализ на публични коментари (публични рецензии) за езици с ограничени ресурси, като например казанския език', 'nl': 'Web-sentimentanalyse van publieke commentaren (publieke beoordelingen) voor talen met beperkte middelen zoals de Kazachstaanse taal', 'hr': 'Analiza osjećanja interneta javnih komentara (javnih pregleda) za jezike s ograničenim resursima poput kazahskog jezika', 'id': 'Analisi sentimen web komentar publik (resensi publik) untuk bahasa dengan sumber daya terbatas seperti bahasa Kazakh', 'fa': 'تحلیل احساسات وب، توضیح عمومی (تحلیل عمومی) برای زبانها با منابع محدود مانند زبان Kazakh', 'ko': '카자흐어 등 자원에 한계가 있는 언어의 공공 평론(공공 평론)에 대해 인터넷 정서 분석을 실시하다', 'da': 'Web-sentiment analyse af offentlige kommentarer (offentlige anmeldelser) for sprog med begrænsede ressourcer såsom kasakhsisk sprog', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa hisia za mtandaoni wa maoni ya umma (tafiti za umma) kwa lugha zenye rasilimali mpya kama vile lugha ya Kazakh', 'af': 'Web-sentiment analiseer van publieke kommentaar (publieke hersiening) vir tale met beperkte hulpbronne soos die Kazakh taal', 'sq': 'Analiza e ndjenjave në internet e komenteve publike (përmbledhje publike) për gjuhët me burime të kufizuara të tilla si gjuha kazake', 'de': 'Web-Sentiment-Analyse öffentlicher Kommentare (öffentliche Rezensionen) für Sprachen mit begrenzten Ressourcen wie Kasachisch', 'az': 'Qazaq dili kimi sınırlı qüvvətli məlumatları olan dillər üçün halkı şəkillər analizi', 'bn': 'পাবলিক মন্তব্যের বিশ্লেষণ বিশ্লেষণ (জনগণের পর্যবেক্ষণ) ভাষার জন্যে সীমিত সম্পদ যেমন কাজাখ ভাষা', 'tr': 'Kazakh dili 첵aly 챌yky힊 챌e힊meleri 체챌in jemgy첵etli terjimeler (publika derjesi) analyzasy', 'hy': 'Համաշխարհային մոտեցումների (հանրային վերլուծումների) վեբ-զգացմունքային վերլուծությունը լեզուների համար, որոնք ունեն սահմանափակ ռեսուրսներ, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ Կազախ լեզուն', 'bs': 'Analiza osjećanja interneta javnih komentara (javnih pregleda) za jezike sa ograničenim resursima poput kazahskog jezika', 'am': 'የህዝብ አስተያየት (የህዝብ ጉዳይ) ቋንቋዎች እንደ ካዛክ ቋንቋ በሚደረጉት ቋንቋዎች ላይ የመረጃ ድምፅ አስተያየት', 'cs': 'Analýza webových sentimentů veřejných komentářů (veřejných recenzí) pro jazyky s omezenými zdroji, jako je kazaština', 'fi': 'Verkko-mielipiteiden analyysi julkisista kommenteista (julkisista arvosteluista) kielillä, joilla on rajalliset resurssit, kuten Kazakstanin kieli', 'ca': 'Anàlisi de sentiments web de comentaris públics (revisions públices) per a llengües amb recursos limitats com la llengua kazaca', 'et': 'Piiratud ressurssidega keelte, näiteks kasahi keele avalike kommentaaride (avalike ülevaadete) veebisentimentaalne analüüs', 'jv': 'Name', 'ha': "Anarari wa masu husũma na ɗabi'a (umarrai ga mutane) wa harshe da maɓallin haye kamar harshen Kazakh", 'sk': 'Spletna analiza javnih komentarjev (javnih pregledov) za jezike z omejenimi viri, kot je kazaški jezik', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་དང་ཆ་ཉུང་བའི་མང་ཆོས་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཞིབ་དཔེར་ན། Kazakh', 'he': 'ניתוח רגשות באינטרנט של תגובות ציבוריות (ביקורות ציבוריות) לשפות עם משאבים מוגבלים כמו שפת קזאק'}
{'en': 'In the pandemic period, the stay-at-home trend forced businesses to switch their activities to digital mode, for example, app-based payment methods, social distancing via social media platforms, and other digital means have become an integral part of our lives. Sentiment analysis of textual information in user comments is a topical task in emotion AI because user comments or reviews are not homogeneous, they contain sparse context behind, and are misleading both for human and computer. Barriers arise from the emotional language enriched with slang, peculiar spelling, transliteration, use of emoji and their symbolic counterparts, and code-switching. For low resource languages sentiment analysis has not been worked upon extensively, because of an absence of ready-made tools and linguistic resources for sentiment analysis. This research focuses on developing a method for aspect-based sentiment analysis for Kazakh-language reviews in Android Google Play Market.', 'es': 'En el período de la pandemia, la tendencia de quedarse en casa obligó a las empresas a cambiar sus actividades al modo digital, por ejemplo, los métodos de pago basados en aplicaciones, el distanciamiento social a través de plataformas de redes sociales y otros medios digitales se han convertido en una parte integral de nuestras vidas. El análisis de sentimientos de la información textual en los comentarios de los usuarios es una tarea de actualidad en la IA de emociones porque los comentarios o reseñas de los usuarios no son homogéneos, contienen un contexto escaso y son engañosos tanto para humanos como para computadoras. Las barreras surgen del lenguaje emocional enriquecido con la jerga, la ortografía peculiar, la transliteración, el uso de emojis y sus homólogos simbólicos y el cambio de código. Para los idiomas de bajos recursos, el análisis de sentimientos no se ha trabajado ampliamente, debido a la ausencia de herramientas preparadas y recursos lingüísticos para el análisis de sentimientos. Esta investigación se centra en el desarrollo de un método para el análisis de opiniones basado en aspectos para las reseñas en kazajo en Android Google Play Market.', 'pt': 'No período de pandemia, a tendência de ficar em casa obrigou as empresas a mudar suas atividades para o modo digital, por exemplo, métodos de pagamento baseados em aplicativos, distanciamento social por meio de plataformas de mídia social e outros meios digitais se tornaram parte integrante de nossas vidas . A análise de sentimentos de informações textuais em comentários de usuários é uma tarefa tópica na IA emocional porque os comentários ou revisões dos usuários não são homogêneos, contêm contexto esparso por trás e são enganosos tanto para humanos quanto para computadores. As barreiras surgem da linguagem emocional enriquecida com gírias, ortografia peculiar, transliteração, uso de emoji e suas contrapartes simbólicas e troca de código. Para linguagens de baixo recurso, a análise de sentimentos não foi trabalhada extensivamente, devido à ausência de ferramentas prontas e recursos linguísticos para análise de sentimentos. Esta pesquisa se concentra no desenvolvimento de um método para análise de sentimentos baseada em aspectos para avaliações em idioma cazaque no Android Google Play Market.', 'ar': 'في فترة الوباء ، أجبر اتجاه البقاء في المنزل الشركات على تبديل أنشطتها إلى الوضع الرقمي ، على سبيل المثال ، أصبحت طرق الدفع القائمة على التطبيقات ، والتباعد الاجتماعي عبر منصات التواصل الاجتماعي ، والوسائل الرقمية الأخرى جزءًا لا يتجزأ من حياتنا . يعد تحليل المشاعر للمعلومات النصية في تعليقات المستخدم مهمة موضوعية في عواطف الذكاء الاصطناعي لأن تعليقات المستخدم أو المراجعات ليست متجانسة ، فهي تحتوي على سياق متناثر ، ومضللة لكل من الإنسان والكمبيوتر. تنشأ الحواجز من اللغة العاطفية المخصبة بالعامية ، والتهجئة الغريبة ، والحروف الصوتية ، واستخدام الرموز التعبيرية ونظيراتها الرمزية ، وتبديل الشفرة. بالنسبة للغات منخفضة الموارد ، لم يتم العمل على تحليل المشاعر على نطاق واسع ، بسبب عدم وجود أدوات جاهزة وموارد لغوية لتحليل المشاعر. يركز هذا البحث على تطوير طريقة لتحليل المشاعر القائمة على الجانب لمراجعات اللغة الكازاخستانية في Android Google Play Market.', 'fr': "Pendant la période de pandémie, la tendance au maintien à la maison a forcé les entreprises à passer au mode numérique. Par exemple, les méthodes de paiement basées sur les applications, la distanciation sociale via les plateformes de médias sociaux et d'autres moyens numériques font désormais partie intégrante de nos vies. L'analyse des sentiments des informations textuelles dans les commentaires des utilisateurs est une tâche d'actualité dans l'IA émotionnelle, car les commentaires ou les avis des utilisateurs ne sont pas homogènes, ils contiennent un contexte clairsemé et sont trompeurs tant pour l'homme que pour l'ordinateur. Les obstacles découlent du langage émotionnel enrichi par l'argot, l'orthographe particulière, la translittération, l'utilisation d'emoji et de leurs équivalents symboliques, et le changement de code. Pour les langues à faibles ressources, l'analyse des sentiments n'a pas fait l'objet de travaux approfondis, en raison de l'absence d'outils prêts à l'emploi et de ressources linguistiques pour l'analyse Cette recherche se concentre sur le développement d'une méthode d'analyse des sentiments basée sur les aspects pour les avis en kazakh sur Android Google Play Market.", 'ru': 'В период пандемии тенденция пребывания на дому вынудила бизнес перейти на цифровой режим, например, методы оплаты на основе приложений, социальное дистанцирование через социальные медиа-платформы и другие цифровые средства стали неотъемлемой частью нашей жизни. Анализ настроений текстовой информации в комментариях пользователей является актуальной задачей в эмоциональном ИИ, потому что комментарии или отзывы пользователей не однородны, содержат редкий контекст позади и вводят в заблуждение как для человека, так и для компьютера. Барьеры возникают из-за эмоционального языка, обогащенного сленгом, своеобразной орфографии, транслитерации, использования эмодзи и их символических аналогов и переключения кода. Для малоресурсных языков анализ настроений не был проработан широко из-за отсутствия готовых инструментов и лингвистических ресурсов для анализа настроений. Это исследование сосредоточено на разработке метода анализа настроений на основе аспектов для казахского языка отзывов в Android Google Play Market.', 'ja': 'パンデミックの時期には、在宅勤務の傾向により、企業は活動をデジタルモードに切り替えることを余儀なくされました。たとえば、アプリベースの支払い方法、ソーシャルメディアプラットフォームを介したソーシャルディスタンス、その他のデジタル手段は、私たちの生活の不可欠な部分となっています。ユーザーのコメントやレビューは均質ではなく、後ろにまばらな文脈が含まれており、人間とコンピュータの両方にとって誤解を招くため、ユーザーコメントのテキスト情報のセンチメント分析は感情AIのトピックタスクです。障壁は、スラング、独特のスペル、音訳、絵文字とその象徴的な分身の使用、およびコードの切り替えで豊かになった感情的な言語から生じます。リソースの少ない言語では、センチメント分析のための既存のツールと言語リソースがないため、センチメント分析は広範囲にわたって取り組まれていません。本研究では、Android Google Play Marketにおけるカザフ語レビューのアスペクトベースの感情分析方法の開発に焦点を当てています。', 'zh': '大行之间,居家趋势企业切换之于数字模式,如应用程序之付款,社交媒体台之相去社交及其数已为吾生不可或缺矣。 用户论情者,情AI之热门务也,用户论非同质也,包疏之上下文,而有误导性于人计算机。 障于情言,充斥俚语,奇拼写音译,表情符号符号应物用代码切换。 其于低资源言也,情析而成器,情析而未博也。 本研重为Android Google Play市哈萨克语论发一端分析方法。', 'hi': 'महामारी की अवधि में, घर पर रहने की प्रवृत्ति ने व्यवसायों को अपनी गतिविधियों को डिजिटल मोड में बदलने के लिए मजबूर किया, उदाहरण के लिए, ऐप-आधारित भुगतान विधियों, सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफार्मों के माध्यम से सोशल डिस्टेंसिंग, और अन्य डिजिटल साधन हमारे जीवन का एक अभिन्न अंग बन गए हैं। उपयोगकर्ता टिप्पणियों में पाठ्य जानकारी का भावना विश्लेषण भावना एआई में एक सामयिक कार्य है क्योंकि उपयोगकर्ता टिप्पणियां या समीक्षाएं सजातीय नहीं हैं, उनमें पीछे विरल संदर्भ होता है, और मानव और कंप्यूटर दोनों के लिए भ्रामक हैं। बाधाएं स्लैंग, अजीब वर्तनी, लिप्यंतरण, इमोजी और उनके प्रतीकात्मक समकक्षों के उपयोग और कोड-स्विचिंग से समृद्ध भावनात्मक भाषा से उत्पन्न होती हैं। कम संसाधन भाषाओं के लिए भावना विश्लेषण पर बड़े पैमाने पर काम नहीं किया गया है, क्योंकि भावना विश्लेषण के लिए तैयार किए गए उपकरणों और भाषाई संसाधनों की अनुपस्थिति है। यह शोध एंड्रॉइड Google Play Market में कज़ाख-भाषा की समीक्षाओं के लिए पहलू-आधारित भावना विश्लेषण के लिए एक विधि विकसित करने पर केंद्रित है।', 'ga': 'Le linn na tréimhse paindéime, chuir an treocht fanacht sa bhaile iachall ar ghnólachtaí a ngníomhaíochtaí a aistriú go modh digiteach, mar shampla, tá modhanna íocaíochta bunaithe ar aipeanna, fadú sóisialta trí ardáin na meán sóisialta, agus modhanna digiteacha eile tar éis éirí mar chuid lárnach dár saol. . Is tasc tráthúla é anailís meon ar fhaisnéis téacsúil i dtuairimí úsáideoirí i mothúchán AI toisc nach bhfuil tuairimí nó léirmheasanna úsáideoirí aonchineálach, go bhfuil comhthéacs tanaí taobh thiar díobh, agus go bhfuil siad míthreorach don duine agus don ríomhaire. Eascraíonn bacainní as an teanga mhothúchánach a shaibhrítear le slang, litriú aisteach, traslitriú, úsáid emoji agus a gcomhghleacaithe siombalacha, agus cód-mhalartú. Maidir le teangacha íseal-acmhainne, ní dhearnadh mórán oibre ar anailís meoin, mar gheall ar easpa uirlisí réamhdhéanta agus acmhainní teanga le haghaidh anailíse meoin. Díríonn an taighde seo ar mhodh a fhorbairt le haghaidh anailíse bunaithe ar dhearcadh d’athbhreithnithe Kazakh-teanga ar Android Google Play Market.', 'ka': 'პონდემიკური პერიოდში, სახლის ტენდენდი დარჩენა სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო პლატატურებით და სხვა დიზიტალური სამ მომხმარებელი კომენტაქტის ტექსტულური ინფორმაციის შესახებ კომენტაქტებში მომხმარებელი ინფორმაციის შესახებ ანალიზაცია იმიტომ, რომ მომხმარებელი კომენტაქტები ან განახმარებები არ ჰ ბერიერები იქნება ემოციონალური ენაზე, რომელიც ბედნიერებული სიტყვარებით, განსხვავებული სიტყვარებით, ტრანსლიტაციით, ემოჯების გამოყენება და მათი სიმბოლოგიური კონტაპტებ პატარა რესურსისების ენაზებისთვის სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციაში არ აკეთებულია, რადგან სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის შესაძლებელი ხელსაწყობინებების და ლუნგურიკური ამ შესწავლობაში კონუქტირებულია აპექტიმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის განვითარებაზე ინდუქტირებულია ანალიზაციისთვის კაზაკური ენის რესუქტირებისთვის Android', 'hu': 'A világjárvány időszakában az otthoni tartózkodási tendencia arra kényszerítette a vállalkozásokat, hogy digitális módra váltsanak tevékenységüket, például az alkalmazásalapú fizetési módok, a közösségi média platformokon keresztül történő közösségi távolság és más digitális eszközök életünk szerves részévé váltak. A felhasználói megjegyzésekben szereplő szöveges információk érzelmi elemzése aktuális feladat az érzelmi MI-ben, mivel a felhasználói megjegyzések vagy értékelések nem homogén, ritka kontextust tartalmaznak mögöttük, és félrevezetőek mind az emberi, mind a számítógép számára. A szlenggel gazdagított érzelmi nyelvből, a különleges helyesírásból, a transzliterációból, az emoji és szimbolikus társaik használatából, valamint a kódváltásból adódnak akadályok. Az alacsony erőforrású nyelvek esetében a hangulatelemzésen nem dolgoztak széles körben, mivel nincsenek kész eszközök és nyelvi erőforrások a hangulatelemzéshez. Ez a kutatás a kazah nyelvű értékelésekhez szükséges aspektus-alapú hangulatelemzési módszer kidolgozására összpontosít az Android Google Play Market alkalmazásban.', 'el': 'Κατά την περίοδο της πανδημίας, η τάση παραμονής στο σπίτι ανάγκασε τις επιχειρήσεις να αλλάξουν τις δραστηριότητές τους σε ψηφιακή λειτουργία, για παράδειγμα, οι μέθοδοι πληρωμής που βασίζονται σε εφαρμογές, η κοινωνική απόσταση μέσω πλατφορμών κοινωνικών μέσων και άλλα ψηφιακά μέσα έχουν γίνει αναπόσπαστο μέρος της ζωής μας. Η ανάλυση συναισθημάτων των κειμένων σε σχόλια χρηστών είναι μια επίκαιρη εργασία στη συναισθηματική τεχνητή νοημοσύνη επειδή τα σχόλια ή οι κριτικές χρηστών δεν είναι ομοιογενείς, περιέχουν αραιό πλαίσιο πίσω και παραπλανούν τόσο για τον άνθρωπο όσο και για τον υπολογιστή. Τα εμπόδια προκύπτουν από τη συναισθηματική γλώσσα εμπλουτισμένη με αργκό, ιδιόμορφη ορθογραφία, μεταγραφή, χρήση και συμβολικών ομολόγων τους και αλλαγή κώδικα. Για γλώσσες χαμηλού πόρου η ανάλυση συναισθημάτων δεν έχει εργαστεί εκτενώς, λόγω έλλειψης έτοιμων εργαλείων και γλωσσικών πόρων για ανάλυση συναισθημάτων. Αυτή η έρευνα επικεντρώνεται στην ανάπτυξη μιας μεθόδου ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων βασισμένης σε πτυχές για κριτικές σε καζάκικη γλώσσα στην αγορά Android Google Play.', 'it': "Nel periodo pandemico, la tendenza del soggiorno a casa ha costretto le aziende a passare alla modalità digitale, ad esempio i metodi di pagamento basati su app, il distanziamento sociale tramite piattaforme di social media e altri mezzi digitali sono diventati parte integrante della nostra vita. L'analisi sentimentale delle informazioni testuali nei commenti degli utenti è un compito di attualità nell'intelligenza artificiale emotiva perché i commenti o le recensioni degli utenti non sono omogenei, contengono un contesto sparso dietro e sono fuorvianti sia per l'uomo che per il computer. Le barriere nascono dal linguaggio emotivo arricchito con lo slang, l'ortografia peculiare, la traslitterazione, l'uso delle emoji e delle loro controparti simboliche e il cambio di codice. Per i linguaggi a basso contenuto di risorse, l'analisi del sentiment non è stata ampiamente elaborata, a causa dell'assenza di strumenti pronti e risorse linguistiche per l'analisi del sentiment. Questa ricerca si concentra sullo sviluppo di un metodo per l'analisi del sentiment basato sugli aspetti per le recensioni in lingua kazaka in Android Google Play Market.", 'lt': 'Pandeminiu laikotarpiu buvimo namuose tendencija privertė įmones pereiti prie skaitmeninio režimo, pavyzdžiui, taikomųjų mokėjimo metodų, socialinio atstumo per socialinės žiniasklaidos platformas ir kitas skaitmenines priemones, tapo neatsiejama mūsų gyvenimo dalis. Naudotojo komentaruose pateikiamos tekstinės informacijos jautrumo analizė yra aktuali užduotis emocinio AI srityje, nes vartotojo komentarai ar peržiūros nėra vienodos, jose yra nedidelis kontekstas ir klaidina tiek žmones, tiek kompiuterius. Kliūtys kyla dėl emocinės kalbos, praturtintos slangomis, ypatinga rašyba, transliteracija, emodžių ir jų simbolinių analogų naudojimas ir kodų keitimas. Mažai išteklių turinčių kalbų jautrumo analizė nebuvo išsamiai išnagrinėta, nes nėra parengtų priemonių ir kalbinių išteklių jautrumo analizei atlikti. Šiuose tyrimuose daugiausia dėmesio skiriama aspektais pagrįstos jausmų analizės, skirtos Kazacho kalbos peržiūroms Android Google žaidimų rinkoje, kūrimui.', 'kk': 'Пандемиялық кезінде, үйде қалдыру тенденциясы бизнестердің әрекеттерін цифрлық режіміне ауыстыруға көмектеседі, мысалы, қолданбалардың бағдарламасының төлем тәсілдері, социаллық медиа платформалары арқылы социаллық ауыстыру Пайдаланушының түсініктемелерінде мәтіндік мәліметтің сезімсіздігін анализ - емоциялық AI- де нақышты тапсырмасы, себебі пайдаланушының түсініктемелері не түсініктемелері гомоген емес, олар арты Эмоциялық тілден бариерлері сәйкес, белгілі мәлімет, транслитерация, эмодж және олардың символдық қарсылықтарын қолдану және код ауысу үшін байланысты. Ресурстың төмен тілдер үшін сезімдік анализ көбірек жұмыс істемейді, сезімдік анализ үшін дайын құралдар мен лингвистикалық ресурстар жоқ. Бұл зерттеу Android Google Play Market арқылы Казахстан тілдерді қарау үшін аспекті негізделген сезімдер анализиясының тәсілін жасау арқылы көмектеседі.', 'mk': 'Во периодот на пандемијата, трендот за останување дома ги принуди бизнисите да ги префрлат своите активности во дигитален режим, на пример, платечките методи базирани на апликации, социјалното оддалечување преку платформи на социјалните медиуми и другите дигитални средства станаа Сентименталната анализа на текстуалните информации во коментарите на корисникот е точка задача во емоционалната ИИ бидејќи коментарите или рецензиите на корисникот не се хомогени, тие содржат мал контекст зад себе, и ги измамуваат луѓето и компјутерите. Пречки се појавуваат од емоционалниот јазик богат со сланг, чудно правопис, транслитерација, употреба на емоџи и нивните симболични колеги, и промена на кодови. За јазиците со ниски ресурси, анализата на сентиментите не е работена екстремно, поради отсуството на подготвени алатки и јазички ресурси за анализа на сентиментите. Овие истражувања се фокусираат на развојот на метод за анализа на сентименти базирана на аспекти за рецензии на казахски јазик на пазарот на играње на Андроид Гугл.', 'ms': 'Dalam masa pandemik, perkembangan tinggal di rumah memaksa perniagaan untuk menukar aktiviti mereka ke mod digital, misalnya, kaedah pembayaran berdasarkan aplikasi, jarak sosial melalui platform media sosial, dan kaedah digital lain telah menjadi bahagian integral dalam hidup kita. Analisis perasaan maklumat teks dalam ulasan pengguna adalah tugas topik dalam AI emosi kerana ulasan atau ulasan pengguna tidak homogen, mereka mengandungi konteks yang jarang di belakang, dan menyesatkan kedua-dua bagi manusia dan komputer. Penghalang muncul dari bahasa emosional yang diperiksa dengan slang, ejaan yang pelik, transliterasi, penggunaan emoji dan rakan-rakan simbolik mereka, dan penggantian kod. Untuk analisis penderitaan bahasa sumber rendah belum dikerjakan secara ekstensif, kerana kekurangan alat-alat siap-dibuat dan sumber-sumber bahasa untuk analisis penderitaan. Penyelidikan ini fokus pada mengembangkan kaedah untuk analisis sentimen berdasarkan aspek untuk ulasan bahasa Kazakh di Pasar Mainan Google Android.', 'mt': 'Fil-perjodu pandemiku, ix-xejra ta’ soġġorn fid-dar forzat lin-negozji biex jaqilbu l-attivitajiet tagħhom għal modalità diġitali, pereżempju metodi ta’ pagament ibbażati fuq l-applikazzjonijiet, distanza soċjali permezz ta’ pjattaformi tal-midja soċjali, u mezzi diġitali oħra saru parti integrali minn ħajjitna. Analiżi tas-sensazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni testwali fil-kummenti tal-utent hija kompitu topiku fl-AI emozzjonali minħabba li l-kummenti jew ir-reviżjonijiet tal-utent mhumiex omoġenji, fihom kuntest żgħir wara, u qed jiżgwidaw kemm għall-bniedem kif ukoll għall-kompjuter. L-ostakli joħorġu mil-lingwa emozzjonali arrikkita b’slang, ortografija speċjali, traslitterazzjoni, użu ta’ emoji u l-kontropartijiet simboliċi tagħhom, u l-bdil tal-kodiċi. Għall-lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi, l-analiżi tas-sentimenti ma ġietx imħaddma b’mod estensiv, minħabba nuqqas ta’ għodod lesti u riżorsi lingwistiċi għall-analiżi tas-sentimenti. Din ir-riċerka tiffoka fuq l-iżvilupp ta’ metodu għall-analiżi tas-sentimenti bbażata fuq aspetti għar-reviżjonijiet tal-lingwa Każaka f’Android Google Play Market.', 'ml': 'ഭീതിയുടെ കാലഘട്ടത്തില്\u200d, വീട്ടില്\u200d നില്\u200dക്കുന്ന ബിസിനസ്സുകള്\u200d ഡിജിറ്റല്\u200d മോഡിലേക്ക് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മാറ്റാന്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഉദാഹരണത്തിനാ ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളിലെ ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെ സെന്റിമെന്റ് വിശദീകരണത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയാണ്. കാരണം ഉപയോക സ്ലാങ്ക്, പ്രത്യേക വാക്കുകള്\u200d, ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ലേഷന്\u200d, ഇമോജി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതും, അവയുടെ പ്രത്യേക ഭാഷകളും കോഡ് മാറ്റുന്നതും കൊണ്ട് സ്വാഭാവികമായ കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് വിശാലമായ അനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200d വിശാലമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചിട്ടില്ല, ജീവിതത്തിന്റെ അന്വേഷണ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക് ആന്\u200dഡ്രോയിഡ് ഗൂഗിള്\u200d പ്ലേ മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റില്\u200d കാസാഖ് ഭാഷയുടെ പരിശോധനകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള ഭാഷയുടെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള', 'mn': 'Гэрлэх ухааны хугацаанд гэр бүлийн хувьд бизнесүүдийн үйл ажиллагааг дижитал режим руу шилжүүлэхийг хүсэж байлаа. Жишээлбэл, апп дээр суурилсан төлбөрийн аргыг, нийгмийн хэвлэлийн платформуудыг ашиглан нийгмийн хоорондоо холбогдох Хэрэглэгчийн тайлбар дээрх текст мэдээллийн шинжилгээ нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөл юм. Учир нь хэрэглэгчийн тайлбар Сланг, сонирхолтой бичлэг, эргүүлэлт, эможи, тэдний символ хамтрагчдын хэрэглээ, кодын өөрчлөлтүүд баян авсан сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэлээс гарч ирдэг. Бага боловсролын хэл дээр сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ маш их ашиглаагүй. Учир нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээнд бэлэн хийсэн хэрэгсэл болон хэлний боловсрол байхгүй. Энэ судалгаанд Android Google Play Market-д Казах хэлний шинжилгээний талаар үндсэн сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээний аргыг хөгжүүлэхэд анхаарна.', 'pl': 'W okresie pandemii trend pobytu w domu zmusił firmy do przejścia działalności na tryb cyfrowy, na przykład metody płatności oparte na aplikacjach, dystansowanie społecznościowe za pośrednictwem platform mediów społecznościowych i inne środki cyfrowe stały się integralną częścią naszego życia. Analiza sentymentów informacji tekstowych w komentarzach użytkowników jest aktualnym zadaniem w sztucznej inteligencji emocji, ponieważ komentarze lub recenzje użytkowników nie są jednorodne, zawierają rzadki kontekst za sobą i mylą zarówno dla człowieka, jak i komputera. Bariery wynikają z języka emocjonalnego wzbogaconego slangiem, osobliwej pisowni, transliteracji, używania emoji i ich symbolicznych odpowiedników oraz przełączania kodu. W przypadku języków niskich zasobów analiza sentymentów nie została opracowana szeroko, ze względu na brak gotowych narzędzi i zasobów językowych do analizy sentymentów. Badania te koncentrują się na opracowaniu metody analizy sentymentów opartej na aspektach dla kazachskich recenzji w Android Google Play Market.', 'ro': 'În perioada pandemică, tendința de a rămâne acasă a forțat companiile să își schimbe activitățile în modul digital, de exemplu metodele de plată bazate pe aplicații, distanțarea socială prin intermediul platformelor de social media și alte mijloace digitale au devenit parte integrantă a vieții noastre. Analiza sentimentelor informațiilor textuale din comentariile utilizatorilor este o sarcină de actualitate în IA emoțională, deoarece comentariile sau recenziile utilizatorilor nu sunt omogene, conțin contextul rar în spate și sunt înșelătoare atât pentru om, cât și pentru calculator. Barierele apar din limbajul emoțional îmbogățit cu slang, ortografie specifică, transliterare, utilizarea emoji-urilor și a omologilor lor simbolici și schimbarea codurilor. Pentru limbile cu resurse reduse, analiza sentimentului nu a fost lucrată pe scară largă, din cauza absenței instrumentelor pregătite și a resurselor lingvistice pentru analiza sentimentului. Această cercetare se concentrează pe dezvoltarea unei metode de analiză a sentimentelor bazate pe aspecte pentru recenziile în limba kazahă în Android Google Play Market.', 'sr': 'U pandemijskom periodu, trend boravka kod kuće prisilio je poduzeća da prebace svoje aktivnosti na digitalni režim, na primjer, metode plaćanja na aplikaciji, društveno udaljenje putem platformi društvenih medija, i drugi digitalni sredstvi postali su integralni deo našeg života. Sentimentna analiza tekstualnih informacija u komentarima korisnika je temeljan zadatak emocionalnog AI-a jer komentari korisnika ili pregledi nisu homogenijalni, sadrže rezervni kontekst iza sebe i misle ljudske i kompjutere. Prepreke se pojavljuju iz emocionalnog jezika bogatih slangom, neobičnim pisanjem, transliteracijom, korištenjem emoji i njihovih simboličkih kolega i zamjenom koda. Za niske jezike resursa analiza sentimenta nije radila široko, zbog nedostatka spremnih alata i jezičkih resursa za analizu sentimenta. Ova istraživanja se fokusira na razvoj metode analize sentiment a na aspektu bazirane za kazahske preglede na Android Google Play Market.', 'so': "Waqtiga cudurka ah ee guriga joogista ayaa ganacsiga lagu qasbay inuu hawshooda u beddelo qaabka digitalada, tusaale ahaan qaababka lacagta lagu bixiyo ee appka-based, bedelka bulshada ee ku socota qorshaha shabakadda bulshada iyo sidoo kale qaab kale oo digital ah waxay nololeenna u noqdeen qayb kamid ah. Fasirka qoraalka macluumaadka qoraalka ee commentarka isticmaalayaasha waa arin muhiim ah oo ku saabsan emotion AI, sababtoo ah isticmaalayaashu comments ama baaritaanka ma aheyn homogeysiis, waxay ku jiraan kooxo yar dabadiis, waxayna khiyaaneeyaan labada dadka iyo kambiyuutarka. Shirkadaha waxaa ka soo baxa luqada emotional oo lagu hodanayo bannaanka, sawiraadka aqoonta, iskuulka, isticmaalka emoji iyo isbedelka iyo isbedelka kooxaha. Sababtaas darteed wax faa'iido ah oo ku saabsan luuqadaha hoose ee rasmi ah laguma sameyn, sababtoo ah maqnaanta qalabka diyaarinta ah iyo maalmaha luuqada ah oo lagu sameyn karo baaritaanka fikrada. Baaritaankaas wuxuu ku nool yahay horumarinta qaabab loo sameynayo baaritaanka fikrada ee loo qorayo baaritaanka afka Kazakh ee Android Goolka Play.", 'si': 'පැන්ඩිමික් වෙලාවේ ඉන්න තියෙන්නේ ගෙදර ඉන්න ව්\u200dයාපාරිත්වයට ඔවුන්ගේ ව්\u200dයාපාරිත්වයක් ඩිජිටල් විදියට වෙනස් කරන්න, උදාහරණයෙන්, ඇප් අධාරිත භාවිතා කිරීමේ පරිශීලක තොරතුරු විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණයක් භාවිතාවක් AI වල භාවිතාවක විශේෂ කරනවා මොකද භාවිතා කිරීම් කිරීම් න බැරියර්ස් ස්ලෑන්, විශේෂ වර්තනය, ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ වර්තනය, භාවිතය, emoji සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සංකේතික වර්තනය, සහ කෝඩ් ස්විච්චි  අඩුම භාෂාවට අඩුම භාෂාවට විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය විස්තර කරන්න බැරි වෙලා තියෙන්නේ නැහැ, සූදානම් වි මේ පරීක්ෂණය ඇන්ඩ්\u200dරෝගුල් ප්ලේජ් මාර්ගයේ කාසාක් භාෂා විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විස්තරයක් වික', 'sv': 'Under pandemin tvingade trenden att stanna hemma företag att byta sin verksamhet till digitalt läge, till exempel app-baserade betalningsmetoder, social distansering via sociala medier och andra digitala medel har blivit en integrerad del av våra liv. Känsleanalys av textinformation i användarkommentarer är en aktuell uppgift i emotion AI eftersom användarkommentarer eller recensioner inte är homogena, de innehåller glest sammanhang bakom och är vilseledande både för människa och dator. Barriärer uppstår från det känslomässiga språket berikat med slang, märklig stavning, transliteration, användning av emoji och deras symboliska motsvarigheter och kodbyte. För lågresursspråk har sentimentalanalys inte arbetats vidare på grund av avsaknad av färdiga verktyg och språkliga resurser för sentimentalanalys. Denna forskning fokuserar på att utveckla en metod för aspektbaserad sentimentalanalys för kazakiska-språkliga recensioner i Android Google Play Market.', 'ta': 'துக்கத்தின் காலத்தில், வீட்டில் இருக்கும் வியாபாரத்தை இலக்கங்களின் செயல்பாடுகளுக்கு மாற்ற வேண்டியிருக்கிறது, உதாரணமாக, பயன்பாடு செலுத்தல் முறைமைகள், சமூக பயனர் குறிப்புகளில் உள்ள மென்சார்ந்த தகவல் விளக்கம் உணர்வு AI யில் ஒரு தலைப்பு செயல் சங்கை, வித்தியாசமான எழுத்து, மாற்றுதல், emoji மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய குறியீட்டு எதிர்பார்ப்புகள் பயன்படுத்தல், மற்றும் குறியீடு மாறுதல் உடல் உணர குறைந்த மூல மொழிகளுக்கு உணர்வு ஆய்வு விரிவாக வேலை செய்யப்படவில்லை, ஏனென்றால் தயாராக்கப்பட்ட கருவிகள் மற்றும் மொழிய மொழிகளின இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி முறைமையை உருவாக்குவதற்கு கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது ஆன்ட்ரோயிட் கூகுல் விளையாட்டு சந்தையில் காசாக்கு மொழ', 'ur': 'پانڈیمیک مدت میں، گھر میں رہنے والی ٹرنڈ نے تجارت کو ڈیجیٹل موڈ میں تبدیل کرنے کے لئے مجبور کیا ہے، مثال، اپنا کاروبار بنیاد پاداش طریقے، سوسیل میڈیا پٹروم کے ذریعے سوسیل ڈیجیٹل ڈیٹل ڈیٹل ڈیٹل ڈیٹل ڈیٹل ڈیٹ یوسٹر کی کمانٹوں میں تخصیص معلومات کی سنتامینٹ تحلیل ہے جو احساسات AI میں ایک ٹوپول کا کام ہے کیونکہ یوسٹر کی کمانٹر یا ریونٹر برابر نہیں ہیں، ان کے پیچھے چھوڑ کی کمانٹ ہے اور انسان اور کمپیوٹر کے لئے گمراہ ہیں. اسلانگ، مخصوص بات، ٹرانسلیٹر، ایموجی اور ان کی سیمولیک کنٹرپارت اور کوڈ-سوچینگ کے ذریعے ثروت والی زبان سے بوریر آتے ہیں. کم منبع زبانوں کے لئے احساسات تحلیل زیادہ پر کام نہیں کیا گیا، کیونکہ احساسات تحلیل کے لئے تیار کیے ہوئے ابزار اور زبان کے منبع نہیں ہیں. یہ تحقیق اڈروئیٹ گوگل پی مارکیٹ میں کزاک زبان کی رسانیوں کے لئے ایک طریقہ ایجاد کرنے کے لئے تمرکز کرتا ہے.', 'no': 'I pandemisk tidspunktet vart trenden på å bytte aktiviteten sine til digitalmodus, for eksempel program-baserte betalingsmetodar, sosiale avstandar via sosiale media-plattformer, og andre digitale måtar har blitt ein integral del av livet våre. Sentiment analyse av tekstinformasjon i brukarskommentarar er eit emnisk oppgåve i emosjonske AI fordi brukararkommentar eller omtaler ikkje er homogeneske, inneheld dei sparke kontekst bak og misleitar både for menneske og datamaskina. Stoppar oppstår frå emosjonsspråket røyd med slang, spesielt staving, transliterasjon, bruk av emoji og sine symbolske mottakarar og omsetjing av kodar. For låg ressursspråk er sentimentanalysen ikkje arbeidt på utvida, fordi det ikkje finst klare verktøy og språk-ressursar for sentimentanalyser. Denne forskningen fokuserer på å utvikla ein metode for aspektbasert sentimentanalyse for Kazakh-språk-oversiktar i Android Google Play Market.', 'uz': "Diqqat davomida, uy bo'lgan vazifalarning amallarini raqamli usulida o'zgartirishga qanday ishlaydi. Masalan, dastur asosiy paydo usullarini, social media platformlari orqali ajratish va boshqa raqamli narsalar hayotimizdagi bir bir qismi bo'lgan. Name Name For low resource languages sentiment analysis has not been worked upon extensively, because of an absence of ready-made tools and linguistic resources for sentiment analysis.  Bu taʼminot Android Google Play Marketida qazak tili taʼminlovchi hissiyotni aniqlash usulini yaratishga qaramadi.", 'vi': 'Trong thời đại đại bệnh dịch, xu hướng ở nhà buộc các công ty phải chuyển hoạt động sang chế độ kĩ thuật số, ví dụ, phương pháp thanh to án ứng dụng, cách xa xã hội qua các nền truyền thông xã hội, và các phương tiện kỹ thuật số khác đã trở thành một phần trong cuộc sống của chúng ta. Cảm xúc phân tích thông tin kết cấu trong các bình luận của người dùng là một nhiệm vụ hiện thời trong các AI cảm xúc bởi vì bình luận hay đánh giá của người dùng không giống nhau, chúng chứa ít bối cảnh phía sau, và bị lừa dối cả về người và máy tính. Lý do gây cản trở từ ngôn ngữ xúc cảm được làm giàu bởi tiếng nghiêng, từ chính tả kỳ lạ, chuyển nghĩa, sử dụng biểu tượng và các đối tượng tượng tượng, và chuyển đổi mã. Việc phân tích tình cảm ngôn ngữ thấp chưa được nghiên cứu kỹ, vì thiếu các dụng cụ đã sẵn sàng và các nguồn ngôn ngữ để phân tích tình cảm. Nghiên cứu này tập trung vào việc phát triển một phương pháp phân tích tình cảm dựa trên khía cạnh cho đánh giá ngôn ngữ Kazak trên chợ Google.', 'nl': 'In de pandemieperiode dwong de stay-at-home trend bedrijven om hun activiteiten over te schakelen naar digitale modus. Zo zijn app-gebaseerde betaalmethoden, social distancing via social media platforms en andere digitale middelen een integraal onderdeel van ons leven geworden. Sentiment analyse van tekstuele informatie in gebruikerscommentaren is een actuele taak in emotie AI omdat gebruikerscommentaren of recensies niet homogeen zijn, ze weinig context achter bevatten en misleidend zijn voor zowel mens als computer. Barrières ontstaan door de emotionele taal verrijkt met slang, eigenaardige spelling, transliteratie, gebruik van emoji en hun symbolische tegenhangers, en code-switching. Voor low resource talen is er niet uitgebreid gewerkt aan sentimentanalyse, omdat er geen kant-en-klare tools en taalkundige middelen voor sentimentanalyse zijn. Dit onderzoek richt zich op het ontwikkelen van een methode voor aspect-based sentiment analyse voor Kazachstaanse beoordelingen in Android Google Play Market.', 'da': 'I pandemiperioden tvang trenden til at bo hjemme virksomheder til at skifte deres aktiviteter til digital tilstand, for eksempel app-baserede betalingsmetoder, social distance via sociale medieplatforme og andre digitale midler er blevet en integreret del af vores liv. Følelsesanalyse af tekstinformation i brugerkommentarer er en aktuel opgave i følelsesanalyse, fordi brugerkommentarer eller anmeldelser ikke er homogene, de indeholder sparsom kontekst bag og er vildledende både for mennesker og computer. Barrierer opstår fra det følelsesmæssige sprog beriget med slang, ejendommelig stavning, translitteration, brug af emoji og deres symbolske modstykker og kodeskift. For sprog med lave ressourcer er sentiment analyse ikke blevet arbejdet udførligt på grund af mangel på færdige værktøjer og sproglige ressourcer til sentiment analyse. Denne forskning fokuserer på at udvikle en metode til aspektbaseret sentiment analyse til kasakhsprogede anmeldelser i Android Google Play Market.', 'de': 'In der Pandemieperiode hat der Stay-at-Home-Trend Unternehmen gezwungen, ihre Aktivitäten auf den digitalen Modus umzustellen. So sind beispielsweise App-basierte Zahlungsmethoden, Social Distancing über Social Media Plattformen und andere digitale Mittel fester Bestandteil unseres Lebens geworden. Die Sentimentanalyse von Textinformationen in Nutzerkommentaren ist eine aktuelle Aufgabe in der Emotion KI, da Nutzerkommentare oder Rezensionen nicht homogen sind, sie einen spärlichen Kontext enthalten und sowohl für Mensch als auch Computer irreführend sind. Barrieren entstehen durch die emotionale Sprache angereichert mit Slang, eigenartiger Rechtschreibung, Transliteration, Verwendung von Emoji und ihren symbolischen Gegenstücken und Code-Switching. Für ressourcenarme Sprachen wurde die Sentimentanalyse nicht ausführlich bearbeitet, da es keine vorgefertigten Werkzeuge und sprachlichen Ressourcen für die Sentimentanalyse gibt. Diese Forschung konzentriert sich auf die Entwicklung einer Methode zur aspektbasierten Stimmungsanalyse für kasachisch-sprachige Bewertungen in Android Google Play Market.', 'ko': '팬데믹 기간에 가정 트렌드는 기업으로 하여금 그들의 활동을 디지털 모델로 바꾸게 했다. 예를 들어 응용 프로그램의 결제 방식, 소셜 미디어 플랫폼을 통한 사회적 거리와 기타 디지털 수단은 이미 우리 생활에서 없어서는 안 될 일부분이 되었다.사용자 평론에서 텍스트 정보의 감정 분석은 감정 인공지능에서 인기 있는 임무이다. 사용자 평론이나 평론은 동질이 아니기 때문에 그 뒤에 희소한 상하문이 포함되어 있고 인류와 컴퓨터에 대해 오도성을 가진다.장애는 비속어로 가득 찬 감정 언어, 특수한 맞춤법, 음역, 이모티콘과 그 기호의 대응물 사용, 코드 전환에서 나온다.저자원 언어에 대해 기존의 감정 분석 도구와 언어 자원이 부족하기 때문에 감정 분석은 아직 광범위한 연구를 받지 못했다.본 연구는 Android Google Play Market의 카자흐어 리뷰를 위한 측면별 감정 분석 방법을 개발하는 데 주력하고 있습니다.', 'hr': 'U pandemijskom razdoblju, trend boravka kod kuće natjerao je poduzeća da prebace svoje aktivnosti na digitalni način, na primjer, metode plaćanja na aplikaciji, društveno udaljenje putem platformi društvenih medija, a drugi digitalni sredstvi postali su integralni dio našeg života. Sentimentna analiza tekstualnih informacija u komentarima korisnika je temeljni zadatak emocija AI-a jer komentari korisnika ili preglede nisu homogenetne, sadrže rezervni kontekst iza sebe, i pogrešavaju ljudske i računale. Prepreke se pojavljuju iz emocionalnog jezika obogaćenog slang, neobičnim pisanjem, transliteracijom, korištenjem emoji i njihovih simboličkih kolega i zamjenom koda. Za niske jezike resursa, analiza osjećanja nije radila na širokoj mjeri, zbog nedostatka spremnih alata i jezičkih resursa za analizu osjećaja. U ovom istraživanju se usredotoči na razvoj metode analize osjećaja na aspektu bazirane na kazahskom jeziku na tržištu igranja Android Google-a.', 'bg': 'В периода на пандемия тенденцията да стоим у дома принуди бизнеса да премине към дигитален режим, например методи за плащане, базирани на приложения, социално дистанциране чрез платформи за социални медии и други цифрови средства се превърнаха в неразделна част от нашия живот. Сентиментният анализ на текстовата информация в потребителските коментари е актуална задача в емоционалния интелект, защото потребителските коментари или рецензии не са хомогенни, съдържат рядък контекст зад тях и са подвеждащи както за човека, така и за компютъра. Бариери възникват от емоционалния език, обогатен с жаргон, особен правопис, транслитерация, използване на емоджи и техните символични колеги и смяна на код. За езици с нисък ресурс анализ на сантимента не е работил широко, поради липсата на готови инструменти и езикови ресурси за анализ на сантимента. Това изследване се фокусира върху разработването на метод за анализ на сентимента, базиран на аспекти, за ревюта на Казахстански език в Андроид Гугъл Плей Маркет.', 'fa': 'در مدت پاندوم، ترند جایگاه خانه\u200cها تجارت را مجبور کردند که فعالیت\u200cهایشان را به حالت دیجیتال تغییر دهند، برای مثال، روش\u200cهای پرداخت بر اساس کاربرد، فاصله\u200cهای اجتماعی با وسیله\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی، و دیگر وسیله\u200cهای دیجیتال\u200cها بخشی داخلی تحلیل احساساتی از اطلاعات متن در توضیح\u200cهای کاربر یک کار موضوع در احساسات AI است چون توضیح\u200cهای کاربر یا توضیح\u200cها همجنس نیستند، آنها در پشت سر محیط خاصی دارند و هر دو برای انسان و کامپیوتر اشتباه می\u200cکنند. بازی\u200cها از زبان احساساتی که با اسلانگ، نوشتن ویژه\u200cای، ترجمه\u200cنوشتن، استفاده از ایموجی و همکاران سیمولیک و تغییر رمز\u200cنوشتن ثروتمند می\u200cشوند. برای زبانهای کم منابع تحلیل احساسات بر روی کشادگی کار نکرده است، به دلیل absence of ready-made tools and linguistic resources for sentiment analysis. این تحقیقات روی توسعه یک روش برای تحلیل احساسات بر اساس نقطه برای تحقیقات زبان Kazakh در بازار بازی Android Google تمرکز می\u200cکند.', 'id': 'Dalam periode pandemia, trende tinggal di rumah memaksa bisnis untuk menukar aktivitas mereka ke mode digital, misalnya, metode pembayaran berdasarkan aplikasi, jarak sosial melalui platform media sosial, dan cara digital lainnya telah menjadi bagian integral dari hidup kita. Analisis sensor dari informasi teks dalam komentar pengguna adalah tugas topik dalam emosi AI karena komentar pengguna atau penelitian tidak homogen, mereka mengandung konteks kecil di belakang, dan menyesatkan baik manusia maupun komputer. Barrier muncul dari bahasa emosional yang diperiksa dengan slang, ejaan yang aneh, transliterasi, penggunaan emoji dan rekan simbolik mereka, dan penggantian kode. Untuk analisis pendengaran bahasa sumber daya rendah belum bekerja secara ekstensif, karena ketidakadaan alat-alat siap dan sumber daya bahasa untuk analisis pendengaran. Penelitian ini fokus pada mengembangkan metode untuk analisis sentimen berdasarkan aspek untuk analisis bahasa Kazakh di Android Google Play Market.', 'tr': "Pandamiýa wagtda, öýde oturmak üçin işlerini digital moda üýtgetmegine mecbur etdi, meselâ aplikaýa tabanly töleme yöntemleri, sosyal medýat platformlarynyň ýüzünden uzaklaşdyrylygyny we başga digital yöntemleri biziň durmuşymyzyň bir bölegi bolup geçirdi. Ullançy terjimelerinde metin maglumatynyň wajyplyk analyzasy duýgymlyk AI'de meňzeş zady, sebäbi ullançy terjimeleri ýa-da synanyşlar homogär däldir, olaryň arkasynda sowgat duýgymlyklary bar we hem adam we kompýuter üçin ýalňyş Duýdury dilinden daşyrýan, aýratyn ymla, terjime edip, emoji we olaryň simbolik baglaýyşlaryndan ullanýar. Aýak resurslar üçin duýgular analizi ýagdaýda işlenmedi, duýgular analizi üçin taýýar edilen aletler we dil çeşmeleri ýok. Bu araştyrma Google Haly Merkatynda Kazakh dilinde görkezilmeler üçin aspektlere tabanly duýgular analizi üçin bir yöntem geliştirmekde umyt edýär.", 'sq': 'Në periudhën pandemike, prirja e qëndrimit në shtëpi detyroi bizneset të ndërrojnë veprimtaritë e tyre në modalitetin dixhital, për shembull, metodat e pagesave bazuar në aplikacione, distancën sociale nëpërmjet platformeve të medias sociale dhe mjete dixhitale të tjera janë bërë një pjesë integrale të jetës sonë. Analiza e ndjenjave e informacionit tekstual në komentet e përdoruesve është një detyrë aktuale në emocionet AI sepse komentet apo përmbledhjet e përdoruesve nuk janë homogjene, ato përmbajnë kontekste të pakta prapa dhe janë të mashtrueshme si për njerëzit ashtu edhe për kompjuterin. Barriers arise from the emotional language enriched with slang, peculiar spelling, transliteration, use of emoji and their symbolic counterparts, and code-switching.  Për gjuhët e ulëta të burimeve, analiza e ndjenjave nuk është punuar në mënyrë të gjerë, për shkak të mungesës së mjeteve të përgatitura dhe burimeve gjuhësore për analizën e ndjenjave. This research focuses on developing a method for aspect-based sentiment analysis for Kazakh-language reviews in Android Google Play Market.', 'hy': 'In the pandemic period, the stay-at-home trend forced businesses to switch their activities to digital mode, for example, app-based payment methods, social distancing via social media platforms, and other digital means have become an integral part of our lives.  Օգտագործողների մոտեցումներում տեքստային ինֆորմացիայի զգացմունքային վերլուծությունը զգացմունքային ԱԲ-ի թեմային խնդիր է, քանի որ օգտագործողների մոտեցումները կամ վերլուծումները համասեփական չեն, դրանք պարունակում են հազվադեպ կոնտեքստ հետևում և Հարգելքներ առաջանում են սլենգով հարստացված զգայական լեզուց, տարօրինակ գրավորումներով, տրանսգրականությամբ, էմոջիի և նրանց սիմվոլիկ համախոսքերի օգտագործման և կոդի փոխման միջոցով: Նվագ ռեսուրսների լեզուների համար զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը բազմազան չի աշխատել զգացմունքների վրա, քանի որ զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար պատրաստ գործիքներ և լեզվաբանական ռեսուրսներ չունեն: Այս հետազոտությունը կենտրոնանում է Անդրոիդ Google-ի խաղի շուկայում գտնվող կարծիքների վերլուծության ասպեկտներով հիմնված մեթոդի զարգացմանը:', 'sw': 'Katika kipindi cha janga, mwenendo wa kukaa nyumbani ulilazimisha biashara zao kubadilisha shughuli zao kwenye njia ya kidijitali, kwa mfano, mbinu za kulipia kwa kutumia programu, tofauti ya kijamii kupitia majukwaa ya mitandao ya kijamii, na maana mengine ya kidijitali yamekuwa sehemu ya moja ya maisha yetu. Uchambuzi wa muda mfupi wa taarifa za maandishi katika maoni ya watumiaji ni jukumu la mada katika hisia za AI kwa sababu maoni au maoni ya watumiaji hawana ushoga, wana muktadha kidogo nyuma, na wanapoteza zote kwa ajili ya binadamu na kompyuta. Vizuizi vinatokea kutoka lugha ya hisia yenye utajiri wa wimbo, maneno ya ajabu, usambazaji, matumizi ya emoji na wapinzani wao wa alama, na kubadilishana kwa kodi. For low resource languages sentiment analysis has not been worked upon extensively, because of an absence of ready-made tools and linguistic resources for sentiment analysis.  Utafiti huu unalenga kuendeleza njia ya uchambuzi wa hisia kwa ajili ya utafiti wa lugha ya Kazakh katika soko la Google Play.', 'am': 'በጥምቀት ዘመን፣ የቤት መኖሪያ የንግድ ነጋዴዎችን ወደ ዲጂታሌ ዓይነት እንዲለውጡ አግኝቷል፤ ምሳሌ፣ በተገኘው የአገሪካ ሚዲያ መድረክ፣ ማኅበራዊ አውታር ማህበራዊ ማህበራዊ ድጋፍ እና ሌሎችም ዲጂታሌ ማህበራዊ ምሳሌ በሕይወታችን ተካባቢ ሆነዋል፡፡ በተጠቃሚ አስተያየት ውስጥ የጽሑፍ መረጃዎችን በመስማት አዲስ ስራ ነው፡፡ ግንቦች በመገረፍ፣ የግንኙነት አቋንቋ፣ የግንኙነት አቋንቋ፣ ትርጓሜ፣ የኢሜጂ እና የባሕላዊ ተቃውሞ እና የኮድ ማቀናቀል ይቆማሉ፡፡ ለትንሽ የድምፅ ቋንቋዎች አስተያየት በማሰናከል የተዘጋጀ መሣሪያና የቋንቋ ሀብት ስህተት ለማሰናከል ስላልተፈቀደ በመስመር ላይ አልተደረገም፡፡ ይህ ትምህርት በአንድሮይድ ጎግል አጫውት ውስጥ ለካዛክ ቋንቋ ድምፅ ማተሚያ የሚደረገውን የስሜት አካባቢ ማተሚያ ማድረጊያውን ያስተካክላል፡፡', 'af': "In die pandemiese tyd het die vertoef-tuis-trend verdwyn besigheids om hulle aktiviteit na digitale modus te wissel, byvoorbeeld, app-gebaseerde betalingsmetodes, sosiale afstand deur sosiale media platforme, en ander digitale betekens het 'n integraal deel van ons lewe geword. Sentiment analiseer van tekstuele inligting in gebruiker kommentaar is 'n onderwerp taak in emosie AI, omdat gebruiker kommentaar of hersienings nie homogeen is nie, bevat hulle sparse konteks agter, en verlei beide vir mense en rekenaar. Barriers staan uit die emosiele taal wat met slang, spesifieke stavering, transliterasie, gebruik van emoji en hul simboliese konnekteers en kode-wisseling. Vir lae hulpbron tale is sentimentaal analisie nie uitbreidig werk nie, omdat daar 'n absence van gereed gemaakte nutsprogramme en lingwisiese hulpbronne vir sentimentaal analisie is nie. Hierdie ondersoek fokus op die ontwikkeling van 'n metode vir aspektgebaseerde sentimentanalisie vir Kazakh-taal hersiening in Android Google Play Market.", 'bn': 'প্যান্ডেমিয়ার সময়ে বাড়িতে থাকা ব্যবসায় তাদের কার্যক্রম ডিজিটাল মোডে পরিবর্তনের জন্য বাধ্য হয়েছে, উদাহরণস্বরূপ, অ্যাপ্লিকেশন ভিত্তিক প্রতিদানের পদ্ধতি, স ব্যবহারকারীর মন্তব্যে টেক্সটুয়াল তথ্যের সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ হচ্ছে ব্যবহারকারীর মন্তব্য বা পর্যবেক্ষণ সমকামীন নয়, তাদের পেছনে স্প্যাসের প্রেক্ষাপ প্রতিষ্ঠান, বিশেষ বানান, ট্রান্সলিকেশন, ইমোজি এবং তাদের প্রতীকের প্রতীক এবং কোড পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে অনুভূতিভাষায় সমৃদ্ধ ভাষা থেকে ব্ অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষণের জন্য কম সম্পদের ভাষার অনুভূতির বিশ্লেষণ ব্যাপক কাজ করা হয়নি, কারণ প্রস্তুত টুল এবং ভাষাগত সম্পদের অনুপস্থিতির কারণে। এই গবেষণাটি অ্যান্ড্রোয়াড গুগল প্লে মার্কেটে কাজাখভাষার ভাষার প্রতিবেদনের জন্য একটি দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিক বিশ্লেষণের একটি পদ্ধত', 'bs': 'U pandemijskom periodu, trend boravka kod kuće prisilio je poduzeća da prebace svoje aktivnosti na digitalni način, na primjer, metode plaćanja na aplikaciji, društveno udaljenje putem platformi društvenih medija, a drugi digitalni sredstvi postali su integralni dio našeg života. Sentimentna analiza tekstualnih informacija u komentarima korisnika je temeljan zadatak emocionalnog AI-a jer komentari korisnika ili pregledi nisu homogenijalni, sadrže rezervni kontekst iza sebe, i pogrešavaju ljudske i kompjutere. Prepreke se pojavljuju iz emocionalnog jezika obogaćenog slanjem, neobičnim pisanjem, transliteracijom, korištenjem emoji i njihovim simboličkim kolegama i zamjenom koda. Za niske jezike resursa analiza osjećanja nije radila široko, zbog nedostatka spremnih alata i jezičkih resursa za analizu osjećaja. Ova istraživanja se fokusira na razvoj metode analize sentiment a na aspektu bazirane za kazahski jezičke preglede na tržištu Android Google Play.', 'cs': 'V období pandemie trend pobytu doma donutil firmy přepnout své aktivity do digitálního režimu, například platební metody založené na aplikacích, sociální distancace prostřednictvím platformy sociálních médií a další digitální prostředky se staly nedílnou součástí našeho života. Sentimentní analýza textových informací v uživatelských komentářích je aktuálním úkolem emoční AI, protože uživatelské komentáře nebo recenze nejsou homogenní, obsahují řídký kontext za sebou a jsou zavádějící jak pro člověka, tak pro počítač. Bariéry vznikají z emocionálního jazyka obohaceného slangem, zvláštního pravopisu, transliterace, použití emoji a jejich symbolických protějšků a přepínání kódu. U jazyků s nízkými zdroji nebyla analýza sentimentu důkladně zpracována, protože neexistují hotové nástroje a jazykové zdroje pro analýzu sentimentu. Tento výzkum se zaměřuje na vývoj metody pro aspektovou analýzu sentimentů pro kazašské recenze v Android Google Play Market.', 'ca': "En el període de pandèmia, la tendència de permanencia a casa ha for çat les empreses a canviar les seves activitats al món digital, per exemple, mètodes de pagament basats en aplicacions, distància social a través de plataformes de mitjans socials i altres mitjans digitals s'han convertit en una part integral de la nostra vida. L'anàlisi sensorial de la informació textual en els comentaris dels usuaris és una tasca tòpica en l'AI emocional perquè els comentaris o revisions dels usuaris no són homogènes, tenen un contexte escas darrere, i enganyen tant per a l'humà com per a l'ordinador. Els obstáculos surten de la llengua emocional enriquecida amb slang, ortografia peculiar, transliteració, l'ús d'emoji i els seus homologues simbòlics, i el canvi de codi. Per a les llengües amb baix recursos, l'an àlisi del sentiment no s'ha elaborat ampliament, a causa de l'absència d'eines preparates i recursos lingüístics per a l'anàlisi del sentiment. Aquesta investigació es centra en desenvolupar un mètode per a l'anàlisi de sentiments basat en aspectes per a les recensions de la llengua kazaca en Android Google Play Market.", 'az': "Pandemik müddətində, evdə oturmaq trendi işlətmələrini dijital moduna çevirmək üçün, məsələn, uyğulama tabanlı ödəmə metodları, sosyal media platformları vasitəsilə sosyal uzaqlaşdırmaq və digər dijital vasitələri bizim həyatımızdan bir parça oldular. İstifadəçilərin şəhadətlərində textual məlumatların təhsil analizi emosiyal AI'nin məsələsi məlumatıdır, çünki istifadəçilərin şəhadətləri və təhsil istifadəçiləri homogenik deyillər, onlar arxa təhsil məlumatı içindədirlər və hər ikisi də insan və kompjuter üçün yoldan çıxarır. Emosiya dilindən baxışlar, qüvvətli yazmaq, transliterasyon, emoji və simbolik qadınlarının istifadəsindən və kodu dəyişdirməkdən yayılır. Düşük ressurs dilləri üçün hisslər analizi genişliyi üzərində işlədilmədi, çünki hisslər analizi üçün hazırlanmış vasitələr və dil qaynaqları yoxdur. Bu araştırma Android Google Play Market içində Kazahlı dil analizi üçün aspekt-tabanlı sentiment analizi üçün bir metod təhsil etməyə odaqlanır.", 'fi': 'Pandemian aikana kotioloissa pysyminen pakotti yritykset siirtymään digitaaliseen tilaan, esimerkiksi sovelluspohjaiset maksutavat, sosiaalinen etääntyminen sosiaalisen median alustojen kautta ja muut digitaaliset keinot ovat tulleet erottamattomaksi osaksi elämäämme. Käyttäjän kommenttien tekstitiedon sentimenttianalyysi on ajankohtainen tehtävä tunteiden tekoälyssä, koska käyttäjien kommentit tai arvostelut eivät ole homogeenisia, ne sisältävät niukkaa kontekstia takana ja ovat harhaanjohtavia sekä ihmisille että tietokoneille. Esteitä syntyy slangilla rikastetusta tunnekielestä, erikoisesta oikeinkirjoituksesta, transliteroinnista, emojien ja niiden symbolisten vastineiden käytöstä ja koodinvaihdosta. Vähävaraisten kielten tunneanalyysiä ei ole tutkittu laajasti, koska tunneanalyysiin ei ole olemassa valmiita työkaluja ja kieliresursseja. Tämä tutkimus keskittyy kehittämään menetelmän aspektipohjaiseen tunteiden analysointiin Kazakstanin kielisille arvosteluille Android Google Play Marketissa.', 'et': 'Pandeemiaperioodil sundis ettevõtteid kodus viibimise trendi tõttu üle minema digitaalsele režiimile, näiteks rakenduspõhised maksemeetodid, sotsiaalmeedia platvormide kaudu sotsiaalne distants ja muud digitaalsed vahendid on muutunud meie elu lahutamatuks osaks. Tekstiteabe sentimentaalüüs kasutaja kommentaarides on emotsionaalses tehisintellektis aktuaalne ülesanne, sest kasutaja kommentaarid või kommentaarid ei ole homogeensed, need sisaldavad hõredat konteksti ja eksitavad nii inimese kui arvuti jaoks. Tõkked tekivad slängi rikastatud emotsionaalsest keelest, erilisest õigekirjast, transliteratsioonist, emojide ja nende sümboolsete kolleegide kasutamisest ning koodi vahetamisest. Vähese ressursiga keelte puhul ei ole sentimentaalüüsi ulatuslikult töötatud, sest sentimentaalüüsi valmisvahendid ja keelelised ressursid puuduvad. Käesolev uurimus keskendub aspektipõhise sentimentaalüüsi meetodi väljatöötamisele kasahhi keelsete ülevaadete jaoks Android Google Play Marketis.', 'sk': 'V obdobju pandemije je trend bivanja doma prisilil podjetja, da preklopijo svoje dejavnosti na digitalni način, na primer plačilne metode, ki temeljijo na aplikacijah, socialna oddaljenost prek platform socialnih medijev in druga digitalna sredstva so postala sestavni del našega življenja. Analiza čustva besedilnih informacij v uporabniških komentarjih je aktualna naloga v umetni inteligenci čustev, saj uporabniški komentarji ali ocene niso homogeni, vsebujejo redko kontekst in so zavajajoče tako za človeka kot za računalnika. Ovire nastajajo zaradi čustvenega jezika, obogatenega z slengom, posebnim črkovanjem, transliteracije, uporabe emojijev in njihovih simbolnih kolegov ter zamenjave kode. Pri jezikih z nizkimi viri analize sentimenta ni bila obsežno obravnavana zaradi pomanjkanja pripravljenih orodij in jezikovnih virov za analizo sentimenta. Ta raziskava se osredotoča na razvoj metode za analizo sentimenta, ki temelji na vidikih, za preglede kazahstanskega jezika v Android Google Play Market.', 'ha': "A cikin wani wa'adin firgita, ma'abũcin mazauni ya lazimta businessa zuwa shirin digitali, misali, zance-zane-zanen kowanta applet, masu yin sauri da jamii a kan platformoyin mitandai da jamii, kuma wasu matsayi na digitali sun kasance rabo ɗaya daga rãyuwanmu. Ana yi amfani da fassarar lãbãri na rubutu cikin shawarar mai amfani da shi, yana da wani aikin mai gaskatãwa a cikin aikin mutum da kafyuta. Suna fita daga harshen hisori wanda aka wadãtar da shi da la'ani, masu fasalin littãfi da littãfi na sha'awa, masu amfani da masu yin amfani da foji da sunayen ayuka da kuma mai musanya kodi. Ba a yi aikin anaƙatan hisãbi na lugha masu rauni ba, dõmin ba'a sami wani zance da aka yi tattalin shi da ruwan linguistic wa anaƙayyade hisãbi. Wannan littafin na fokus a kan buɗe wata hanyoyi wa analyza na baka-bakin-bakin-bakin-bakin Kazakh cikin Garet na Android Google Play.", 'jv': 'Taning kalah-kalah laning ing Pandit (cara-laning ing ing dong) Sentiment Baler Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh perusahaan kelas karo hale-hale koyok ngono nggawe barang langgar, mergane kuwi ora ono wektu nggawe alat karo akeh dilangan langgar kanggo anawisan duwé. Rasané iki dipoles nggawe maneh kanggo nggawe akeh pancen kanggo ananalisasi langgar langgar Kasakh-langgar resmi nang Google Halika.', 'he': "בתקופת הפנדמיה, הטנדרס של הישאר בבית הכריח עסקים להחליף את פעילותיהם למצב דיגיטלי, לדוגמא, שיטות תשלום מבוססת אפליקציות, מרחק חברתי דרך פלטפורמות תקשורת חברתית, ואמצעים דיגיטליים אחרים הפכו לחלק אינטגרלי בחיינו. ניתוח רגשי של מידע טקסטלי בתגובות משתמשים הוא משימה נושאית בתגובות רגשית AI כי הערות או ביקורות משתמשים אינם הומוגנים, הם מכילים קשר נדיר מאחור, והם מטרידים גם לאדם וגם למחשב. המחסומים נוצרים מהשפה הרגשית שמעשירה עם סלנג, איפוי מוזר, טרנסליטרציה, השימוש באמוג'י והשותפים הסמליים שלהם, ומחליפת קודים. עבור שפות משאבים נמוכות ניתוח רגשות לא עבד על רחב, בגלל חוסר כלים מוכנים ומשאבים שפתיים לניתוח רגשות. המחקר הזה מתמקד בפיתוח שיטה לניתוח רגשות מבוסס על אפקטים עבור ביקורות בשפה קזקאית בשוק השחקים של אנדרואיד גוגל.", 'bo': 'དུས་མཚམས་འཇོག་པའི་དུས་མཚམས་ནང་དུ་བཙོག་ཁང་གི་འཕེལ་རིམ་གནས་སྟངས་དབང་ཚོའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་བྱེད་དགོས། དཔེར་ན། Sentiment analysis of textual information in user comments is a topical task in emotion AI because user comments or reviews are not homogeneous, they contain sparse context behind, and are misleading both for human and computer. སྣང་ཚུལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་དུས་འཇལ་བརྙན་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་ཁྱད་ཆེ་བའི་དག་ཆ་དང་ transliteration, use of emoji and their symbolic counterparts, and code-switching། རང་ཉིད་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཉུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག དབྱེ་ཞིབ་འདིས་Android Google རྩིས་གཞི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་རྡེབ་སྒྲུང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཆགས་པ་དང་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་སྣེ་ཚོར་ཞིབ་བ'}
{'en': 'Compiling a specialised corpus for translation research in the environmental domain', 'ar': 'تجميع مواد متخصصة لترجمة البحوث في المجال البيئي', 'fr': "Compiler un corpus spécialisé pour la recherche en traduction dans le domaine de l'environnement", 'pt': 'Compilando um corpus especializado para pesquisa em tradução no domínio ambiental', 'es': 'Elaboración de un corpus especializado para la investigación de la traducción en el ámbito ambiental', 'ja': '環境分野における翻訳研究のための専門的なコーパスの編纂', 'zh': '译究专业语料库', 'hi': 'पर्यावरण डोमेन में अनुवाद अनुसंधान के लिए एक विशेष कॉर्पस संकलित करना', 'ru': 'Составление специализированного корпуса для исследований перевода в области окружающей среды', 'ga': 'Corpas speisialaithe a thiomsú do thaighde aistriúcháin i réimse an chomhshaoil', 'hu': 'Szakosodott korpusz összeállítása a környezetvédelmi területen folytatott fordítási kutatásokhoz', 'ka': 'კომპეციალური კორპოსს გადაწყვეტილებისთვის კომპეციალური კომპეციალური დიომინში', 'el': 'Δημιουργία εξειδικευμένου σώματος μεταφραστικής έρευνας στον τομέα του περιβάλλοντος', 'it': 'Compilare un corpus specializzato per la ricerca di traduzione in ambito ambientale', 'kk': 'Орталық доменде аудармаларды зерттеу үшін специализиялық корпус сәйкес ету', 'lt': 'Compiling a specialised corpus for translation research in the environmental domain', 'ms': 'Compiling a specialised corpus for translation research in the environmental domain', 'mt': 'Il-ġbir ta’ korpus speċjalizzat għar-riċerka dwar it-traduzzjoni fil-qasam ambjentali', 'mn': 'Байгаль орчны талаарх судалгааны хувьд', 'no': 'Kompiler eit spesialisert korpus for oversettelsesforskning i miljødomenet', 'mk': 'Компилирање специјализиран корпус за преведување истражувања во областа на животната средина', 'pl': 'Opracowanie specjalistycznego korpusu badań tłumaczeniowych w dziedzinie środowiska', 'ro': 'Elaborarea unui corpus specializat pentru cercetarea traducerii în domeniul mediului', 'ml': 'പരിസ്ഥാനത്തിലെ പരിശോധനത്തിനുള്ള പരിശോധനയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ക കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് പരിശോധിക്ക', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha baaritaanka tarjumaadka ee deegaanka', 'sr': 'Skupljanje specijalizovanog korpusa za istraživanje prevođenja u ekološkom domenu', 'si': 'විශේෂ කොර්පස් එකක් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා වාතාවික පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා', 'sv': 'Att sammanställa en specialiserad korpus för översättningsforskning inom miljöområdet', 'ta': 'Compiling a specialised corpus for translation research in the environmental domain', 'ur': 'محیط ڈومین میں ترجمہ تحقیقات کے لئے ایک مخصوص کورپوس کو جمع کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đang soạn một tập đoàn chuyên môn nghiên cứu dịch trong lĩnh vực môi trường.', 'bg': 'Изготвяне на специализиран корпус за преводачески изследвания в областта на околната среда', 'nl': 'Opstellen van een gespecialiseerd corpus voor vertaalonderzoek op milieugebied', 'da': 'Udarbejdelse af et specialiseret korpus til oversættelsesforskning på miljøområdet', 'hr': 'Osvajanje specijaliziranog korpusa za istraživanje prevoda u oblasti okoliša', 'de': 'Erstellung eines spezialisierten Korpus für Übersetzungsforschung im Umweltbereich', 'ko': '환경 분야의 번역 연구를 위해 전문 어료 라이브러리를 작성하다', 'fa': 'جمع کردن یک جسد متخصص برای تحقیقات ترجمه در دامنه محیطی', 'id': 'Mengumpulkan korpus khusus untuk penelitian terjemahan di daerah lingkungan', 'tr': 'Çarşawy domaýynda terjime etmek üçin bir köpüsi syýahat etmek', 'sq': 'Përbërja e një korpusi të specializuar për kërkime përkthimi në fushën mjedisore', 'am': 'አካባቢ አካባቢ ውይይት ውስጥ ትርጓሜን ለመፍጠር የተለየ ኮርፓስ በመጨመር', 'sw': 'Kulinganisha chombo maalum kwa ajili ya utafiti wa tafsiri katika maeneo ya mazingira', 'af': "Kompileer 'n spesialiseerde korpus vir vertaling ondersoek in die omgewing domein", 'bn': 'পরিবেশ ডোমেইনে অনুবাদ গবেষণার জন্য একটি বিশেষ কোর্পাস তুলনা করছে', 'bs': 'Skupljanje specijalizovanog korpusa za istraživanje prevoda u oblasti okoliša', 'hy': 'Բնապահպանական ոլորտում գտնվող թարգմանման հետազոտությունների մասնագիտական կորպուս կառուցելը', 'ca': 'Compilar un corpus especialitzat per a la recerca de traducció en el domini ambiental', 'cs': 'Sestavení specializovaného korpusu pro překladatelský výzkum v oblasti životního prostředí', 'az': 'T톛rc칲m톛 m톛lumat캼n캼n m톛lumat캼 칲칞칲n x칲susiyy톛tli korpusu', 'fi': 'Erityisaineiston laatiminen ympäristöalan käännöstutkimusta varten', 'et': 'Erikorpuse koostamine keskkonnavaldkonna tõlkealaste uuringute jaoks', 'jv': 'Compil a Specializated Body for translation', 'he': 'Compiling a specialised corpus for translation research in the environmental domain', 'sk': 'Priprava specializiranega korpusa za raziskave prevajanja na področju okolja', 'ha': "Yi cika wani nau'in da aka ƙayyade wa fassarar cikin muhalli", 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གཏོང་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་དབུགས'}
{'en': 'The present study is an ongoing research that aims to investigate lexico-grammatical and stylistic features of texts in the environmental domain in English, their implications for translation into Ukrainian as well as the translation of key terminological units based on a specialised parallel and comparable corpora.', 'ar': 'الدراسة الحالية هي بحث مستمر يهدف إلى التحقيق في السمات المعجمية النحوية والأسلوبية للنصوص في المجال البيئي باللغة الإنجليزية ، وآثارها على الترجمة إلى الأوكرانية وكذلك ترجمة وحدات المصطلحات الرئيسية بناءً على مجموعة متخصصة موازية وقابلة للمقارنة.', 'fr': "La présente étude est une recherche continue qui vise à étudier les caractéristiques lexico-grammaticales et stylistiques de textes dans le domaine de l'environnement en anglais, leurs implications pour la traduction en ukrainien ainsi que la traduction d'unités terminologiques clés basées sur un parallèle spécialisé et comparable corpus.", 'es': 'El presente estudio es una investigación en curso que tiene como objetivo investigar las características lexicogramaticales y estilísticas de los textos en el dominio ambiental en inglés, sus implicaciones para la traducción al ucraniano, así como la traducción de unidades terminológicas clave basadas en un paralelo especializado y comparable cuerpos.', 'pt': 'O presente estudo é uma pesquisa em andamento que visa investigar características léxico-gramaticais e estilísticas de textos no domínio ambiental em inglês, suas implicações para a tradução para o ucraniano, bem como a tradução de unidades terminológicas-chave baseadas em corpora especializados paralelos e comparáveis.', 'zh': '本研一方研究,指勘英语境域文本词汇语法文体特征,其于翻译成乌克兰语,及专业平行、可较语料库之要术语单元译。', 'ja': '本研究は、英語の環境領域におけるテキストの辞書-文法的および文体的特徴、ウクライナ語への翻訳への影響、および専門化された並行して比較可能なコーラに基づいた主要な用語単位の翻訳を調査することを目的とした継続的な研究である。', 'hi': 'वर्तमान अध्ययन एक चल रहा शोध है जिसका उद्देश्य अंग्रेजी में पर्यावरण डोमेन में ग्रंथों की लेक्सिको-व्याकरणिक और शैलीगत विशेषताओं की जांच करना है, यूक्रेनी में अनुवाद के लिए उनके निहितार्थ के साथ-साथ एक विशेष समानांतर और तुलनीय कॉर्पोरेट के आधार पर प्रमुख टर्मिनोलॉजिकल इकाइयों का अनुवाद भी है।', 'ru': 'Настоящее исследование является непрерывным исследованием, направленным на изучение лексико-грамматических и стилистических особенностей текстов в области экологии на английском языке, их последствий для перевода на украинский язык, а также перевода ключевых терминологических единиц на основе специализированных параллельных и сопоставимых корпусов.', 'ga': 'Is taighde leanúnach é an staidéar seo a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige gnéithe foclóireachta agus stíle na dtéacsanna i réimse an chomhshaoil i mBéarla a fhiosrú, a n-impleachtaí don aistriúchán go Úcráinis chomh maith le haistriú príomhaonaid téarmaíochta atá bunaithe ar shainchorparáid chomhthreomhar agus inchomparáide.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmány folyamatban lévő kutatás, melynek célja a környezetvédelmi területen angol nyelvű szövegek lexiko-grammatikai és stilisztikai jellemzőinek vizsgálata, azok ukrán fordításra gyakorolt hatásai, valamint a kulcsfontosságú terminológiai egységek fordítása egy speciális párhuzamos és összehasonlítható corpora alapján.', 'it': 'Il presente studio è una ricerca in corso che mira ad indagare le caratteristiche lessico-grammaticali e stilistiche dei testi in ambito ambientale in inglese, le loro implicazioni per la traduzione in ucraino e la traduzione di unità terminologiche chiave basate su corpora parallela e comparabile specializzata.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα μελέτη αποτελεί μια συνεχιζόμενη έρευνα που στοχεύει στη διερεύνηση λεξικών-γραμματικών και στυλιστικών χαρακτηριστικών κειμένων στον περιβαλλοντικό τομέα στα αγγλικά, τις επιπτώσεις τους στη μετάφραση στα ουκρανικά καθώς και τη μετάφραση βασικών ορολογικών μονάδων με βάση εξειδικευμένα παράλληλα και συγκρίσιμα σώματα.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე სწავლება არის წარმოდგენელი სწავლება, რომელიც მინდომა ტექსტის ლექქსიკჲ-გრამიკური და სტილისტიკური განსაზღვრებას ინგლისური დემომინში, რომელიც საკუთარი შემდეგები სკრაინურში გადაწყვება და კლავისტრმი', 'lt': 'Šis tyrimas atliekamas atliekant mokslinius tyrimus, kuriais siekiama ištirti tekstų tekstų anglų kalba aplinkosaugos srityje lexikogramatines ir stilistines savybes, jų poveikį vertimui į ukrainų kalbą ir pagrindinių terminologinių vienetų vertimui pagal specializuotą lygiagrečią ir panašią korprą.', 'ms': 'kajian ini adalah kajian yang sedang berlangsung yang bertujuan untuk menyelidiki ciri-ciri leksiko-grammatik dan stilistik teks dalam domain persekitaran dalam bahasa Inggeris, implikasi mereka untuk terjemahan ke Ukraina serta terjemahan unit terminologi kunci berdasarkan korpra paralel dan berbanding.', 'kk': 'Қолданыстағы зерттеу - текстің лексика- грамматикалық және стилистикалық мәтіндерін ағылшын тілінде зерттеу үшін, олардың Украинаға аударуға және оның арнаулы параллель және салыстырылатын корпораға негізделген кілттерминологиялық бірл', 'mk': 'Сегашната студија е тековно истражување кое има за цел истрага на лексико-граматичките и стилистичките карактеристики на текстовите во областа на животната средина на англиски јазик, нивните импликации за превод на украински, како и превод на клучните терминолошки единици базирани на специјализирана паралел', 'ml': 'ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പഠനം നടന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പഠനത്തിലാണ്. ലെക്സിക്കോ- ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d സ്റ്റൈലിസ്റ്റിക്കും ലെക്സിക്കോയിലെ പദാവലികള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഡൊമെയിനിലെ പദാവലികള', 'mn': 'Харин одоогийн судалгаа бол одоогийн судалгаа юм. Англи хэлний орчин тойроны хэмжээнд лексико-грамматик, стилист хэмжээсүүдийг судлах зорилго, Украины орнуудад орчуулах нөлөөлөл, мөн специалист параллел болон харьцуулагдмал корпора дээр суурилсан тү', 'no': 'Den gjeldande studien er ein gjeldande forskning som må forsøkja leksikogrammetiske og stylistiske funksjonar på tekstar i miljødomenet i engelsk, sine implikasjonar for omsetjing til Ukrainsk og omsetjinga av nøkkelterminologiske einingar basert på ein spesialisert parallell og sammenlignbar korpora.', 'mt': 'Dan l-istudju huwa riċerka kontinwa li għandha l-għan li tinvestiga l-karatteristiċi lexikogrammatiċi u stilistiċi tat-testi fil-qasam ambjentali bl-Ingliż, l-implikazzjonijiet tagħhom għat-traduzzjoni fl-Ukraina kif ukoll it-traduzzjoni ta’ unitajiet terminoloġiċi ewlenin ibbażati fuq korpra parallel a speċjalizzata u komparabbli.', 'sr': 'U sadašnjoj studiji je nastavljajuće istraživanje koja je cilj istraživanja leksikogramatskih i stilističkih karakteristika tekstova u oblasti okoliša na engleskom jeziku, njihovih implikacija za prevod na Ukrajinu, kao i prevod ključnih terminoloških jedinica na temelju specijalizovanog paralelnog i usporednog korporacije.', 'pl': 'Niniejsze opracowanie stanowi bieżące badania mające na celu zbadanie cech leksykogramatycznych i stylistycznych tekstów w dziedzinie środowiska w języku angielskim, ich implikacji dla tłumaczenia na język ukraiński oraz tłumaczenie kluczowych jednostek terminologicznych opartych na specjalistycznych równoległych i porównywalnych korpusach.', 'si': 'The ongoing study is an ongoing Research that seeks to investigation lexico-Gramatical and stylizic Featuries of texts in the environed domain in English, its Impact for translation to ukrainian as well as the translation of key Terminal Units based on a especia Parallel and comparing body.', 'ro': 'Prezentul studiu este o cercetare în curs de desfășurare care vizează investigarea caracteristicilor lexico-gramaticale și stilistice ale textelor din domeniul mediului în limba engleză, implicațiile acestora pentru traducerea în limba ucraineană, precum și traducerea unor unități terminologice cheie bazate pe o corporă paralelă specializată și comparabilă.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய ஆய்வு ஒரு நடந்து கொண்டிருக்கும் ஆராய்ச்சியாகும் இது சூழல் களத்தில் உள்ள உரைகளின் குணங்களை ஆங்கிலத்தில் தேடுவதற்கு, உக்ரேனியில் மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கும் மொழிபெயர்', 'so': 'Waxbarashada joogtada ah waa waxbarasho sii socda oo ku talo gala baaritaanka qoraalka ee gudaha deegaanka ee lexico-grammatika iyo isbitaalka ah ee afka Ingiriiska ku qoran, saameyaashooda turjumaadda xagga Ukraine iyo turjumidda kooxaha terminologiga ee gaarka ah oo ku saleysan isbarbaro iyo isbarbarbar.', 'ur': 'اب کی تحقیق ایک تحقیق ہے جس کا ارادہ ہے کہ انگلیسی میں متوسط ڈومین میں لکسیکو-گراماتیکی اور استیلیسٹی کے متوسط فکرات کی تحقیق کرنا چاہے، ان کے تابع اوکرینی میں ترجمہ کرنے کے لئے اور ایک مخصوص متوسط اور مصاحب قابل مقابلہ کے متوسط کلی ٹومینلوژیک یونیٹوں کی', 'sv': 'Denna studie är en pågående forskning som syftar till att undersöka lexiko-grammatiska och stilistiska drag hos texter inom miljöområdet på engelska, deras konsekvenser för översättning till ukrainska samt översättning av nyckelterminologiska enheter baserade på specialiserade parallella och jämförbara korpora.', 'uz': "Joriy o'qituvchisi, Leksika grammatika va uslublarning muhimtiyozni ingliz tilida textlarning xossalarini qidirish uchun ishlayapti, ular Ukrainchaga tarjima qilish natijalari, va tayyorlik parallel va o'xshash kompaniya asosida tugma terminologik bir tarjimalarni tarjima qilish uchun.", 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu hiện tại là một nghiên cứu đang tiến hành nghiên cứu về ngôn ngữ văn học và phong cách hóa của văn bản trong lĩnh vực môi trường ở Anh Quốc, về tác động của nó cho việc dịch sang người Ukraina cũng như bản dịch của các đơn vị ngôn ngữ học chìa khóa dựa trên một cơ thể song song và tương tự.', 'bg': 'Настоящото изследване е текущо изследване, което има за цел да изследва лексико-граматическите и стилистичните особености на текстовете в областта на околната среда на английски език, тяхното въздействие върху превода на украински език, както и превода на ключови терминологични единици въз основа на специализирани паралелни и сравними корпуси.', 'da': 'Denne undersøgelse er en igangværende forskning, der har til formål at undersøge lexiko-grammatiske og stilistiske træk ved tekster på miljøområdet på engelsk, deres konsekvenser for oversættelse til ukrainsk samt oversættelse af nøgleterminologiske enheder baseret på en specialiseret parallel og sammenlignelig korpora.', 'nl': 'Dit onderzoek is een lopend onderzoek dat gericht is op het onderzoeken van lexico-grammaticale en stilistische kenmerken van teksten in het milieudomein in het Engels, hun implicaties voor vertaling naar het Oekraïens en de vertaling van belangrijke terminologische eenheden op basis van een gespecialiseerde parallelle en vergelijkbare corpora.', 'hr': 'Sadašnje ispitivanje je nastavljajuće istraživanje koja je cilj istraživanja leksikogramatičnih i stilističkih karakteristika tekstova na engleskom domenu okoliša, njihovih implikacija za prevod na ukrajinski, kao i prevod ključnih terminoloških jedinica na temelju specijaliziranog paralelnog i usporednog tijela.', 'de': 'Die vorliegende Studie ist eine laufende Forschung, die darauf abzielt, lexikogrammatische und stilistische Merkmale von Texten im Umweltbereich im Englischen zu untersuchen, ihre Implikationen für die Übersetzung ins Ukrainische sowie die Übersetzung wichtiger terminologischer Einheiten auf der Grundlage einer spezialisierten parallelen und vergleichbaren Korpora.', 'ko': '본 연구는 영어 환경 분야의 텍스트의 어휘 문법과 문체 특징을 조사하고 이들이 우크라이나어로 번역되는 데 미친 영향, 그리고 전문적인 평행과 비교 가능한 어료 라이브러리의 관건적인 용어 단위를 바탕으로 번역하는 연구를 진행하고 있다.', 'fa': 'مطالعه در حال حاضر تحقیقاتی است که هدف دارد برای تحقیقات ویژه\u200cهای الکسیکو گراماتیک و استیلیستیک از متن\u200cها در دامنه محیطی به انگلیسی باشد، اثرات آنها برای ترجمه به اکرونیایی و ترجمه\u200cهای واحدهای کلید ترمینالوژیک بر اساس یک شرکت متفاوتی و قابل مقایسه است.', 'sw': 'Utafiti huu wa sasa ni utafiti unaoendelea kwa lengo la kuchunguza vipengele vya viungo vya viungo vya lexico na ubora katika maeneo ya mazingira kwa lugha ya Kiingereza, matatizo yao ya kutafsiri nchini Ukraine na tafsiri ya viungo muhimu vya uchunguzi kwa kutumia makampuni yanayofanana na yanayofanana.', 'sq': 'Studimi i tanishëm është një kërkim i vazhdueshëm që synon të hetojë karakteristikat lexiko-grammatike dhe stilistike të teksteve në fushën mjedisore në anglisht, pasojat e tyre për përkthimin në ukrainian si dhe përkthimin e njësive kryesore terminologjike bazuar në një korpër të specializuar paralele dhe të krahasueshme.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ትምህርት በይግሪክ አካባቢ ውይይት ውስጥ ጽሑፎችን ለመመርመርመር፣ የዩክረኒያን ትርጉም እና በተለያዩ በኮርፖራ ላይ የተመሳሳይ የቁልፍ ተርሚኖሎጂ ዩንቨሮች መግለጫ ነው፡፡', 'id': 'Studi ini adalah penelitian yang sedang berlangsung yang bertujuan untuk menyelidiki karakteristik lexiko-grammatik dan stilistik teks dalam bidang lingkungan dalam bahasa Inggris, implikasi mereka untuk terjemahan ke bahasa Ukraina serta terjemahan unit terminologi kunci berdasarkan sebuah korpora paralel dan berbanding.', 'tr': 'Häzirki araşdyrma, çevrelikçe baýramçylyklaryň leksik-gramatik we stilistik özelliklerini Iňlis dilinde terjime etmäge niýetlenýän bir araştyrma, ukraýna terjime etmäge täsirler we spesializ parallel we ýakynlaşyk korpora daşarylýan a çary terjime etmäge niýetlenýän.', 'az': 'Ňěimdiki t…ôhsil m…ôhsullarńĪ m…ôlumatlarńĪn leksiko-gramatik v…ô stilistik m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ ńįngilizce dilind…ô incitm…ôk m…ôqs…ôdil…ô s√ľr…ôkl…ôn…ôn bir araŇütńĪrma idi. OnlarńĪn Ukrayna √ßevirilm…ôsi v…ô m…ôhsullarńĪ t…ôhsil edil…ôn paralel…ô v…ô saldńĪrńĪlabilir korpora dayanan anahtar terminolojik birikl…ôrin √ßevirilm…ôsi.', 'af': "Die huidige studie is 'n voortdurende ondersoek wat doel om lexikogrammatiese en stylistiese eienskappe van teks te ondersoek in die omgewing domein in Engels, hulle inplikasies vir oorsetting in Ukraïniese en die oorsetting van sleutel terminologiese eenhede gebaseer op 'n spesialiseerde parallele en vergelykbare korpora.", 'bs': 'Sadašnje ispitivanje je nastavljajuće istraživanje koja je cilj istraživanja leksikogramatskih i stilističkih karakteristika tekstova na engleskom domenu okoliša, njihovih implikacija za prevod na ukrajinske, kao i prevod ključnih terminoloških jedinica na temelju specijaliziranog paralelnog i usporednog tijela.', 'ca': "L'estudi en curso és una investigació que busca investigar les característiques lexicogramàtiques i estilistiques dels textos en el domini ambiental en anglès, les seves implicacions per la traducció en ucranià i la traducció d'unitats terminològiques clau basades en una corpora parallel a especialitzada i comparable.", 'bn': 'বর্তমান গবেষণা হচ্ছে একটি চলমান গবেষণা যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে লেক্সিকো-গ্রামাটিক্যাল এবং স্টাইলিস্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য ইংরেজি ভাষায় টেক্সটের বৈশিষ্ট্যাল এবং তুলনা কর্পোরা ভিত্তিক একট', 'hy': 'Այս ուսումնասիրությունը շարունակական ուսումնասիրություն է, որի նպատակով է ուսումնասիրել անգլերենի շրջակա միջավայրի տեքստների լեքսիկո-գրամատիկական և ոճիլիստական առանձնահատկությունները, դրանց հետևանքները թարգմանելու համար ուկրաներեն լեզվով, ինչպես նաև գլխավոր տերմինոլո', 'cs': 'Tato studie je probíhajícím výzkumem, jehož cílem je zkoumat lexikogramatické a stylistické rysy textů v oblasti životního prostředí v angličtině, jejich implikace pro překlad do ukrajinštiny a překlad klíčových terminologických celků založených na specializovaných paralelních a srovnatelných korpusech.', 'et': 'Käesolev uuring on käimasolev uurimustöö, mille eesmärk on uurida keskkonnavaldkonna tekstide leksikogrammatilisi ja stilistilisi omadusi inglise keeles, nende mõju tõlkimisele ukraina keelde ning spetsialiseerunud paralleelsetel ja võrreldavatel korpustel põhinevate võtmeterminoloogiliste üksuste tõlkimist.', 'fi': 'Tämä tutkimus on käynnissä oleva tutkimus, jonka tavoitteena on tutkia englanninkielisten ympäristöalan tekstien sanastokielisiä ja tyylillisiä piirteitä, niiden vaikutuksia ukrainalaiseen kääntämiseen sekä keskeisten terminologisten yksiköiden kääntämistä erikoistuneisiin rinnakkaisiin ja vertailukelpoisiin korpusiin.', 'ha': "Label na yanzu, yana da wani fitina wanda yake iya tafiyar kwararin littafan littattafai na leksiko-grammatisk da misalin littattafai cikin Ingiriya, yana da muhalli wa fassarar zuwa Ukrainian da fassarar maɓallin turminogi da fassarar nau'i masu ƙayyade a saman da aka ƙayyade fasalin da sami.", 'jv': 'Hak dhéwé nggunian punika dipulungkat kanggo ngilangno nggunakake cara nggawe leksiko-gram lan stylistik karo texting ing ing dipulungkat kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo ngerwih kanggo Uwenian ate sak terjamahan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan', 'sk': 'Ta študija je tekoča raziskava, katere namen je raziskati leksikoslovnične in slogovne značilnosti besedil z okoljskega področja v angleščini, njihove posledice za prevod v ukrajino ter prevod ključnih terminoloških enot na podlagi specializiranih vzporednih in primerljivih korpusov.', 'he': 'המחקר הנוכחי הוא מחקר מתמשך שמתכוון לחקור את תכונות הלקסיקו-גרמטיות וסטיליסטיות של טקסטים בתחום הסביבתי באנגלית, השלכות שלהם לתרגום לאוקריני, כמו גם את התרגום של יחידות טרמולוגיות מפתחות מבוססות על קבורה מקצועית ומשווה.', 'bo': 'The present study is an ongoing research that aims to investigate lexico-grammatical and stylistic features of texts in the environmental domain in English, their implications for translation into Ukrainian as well as the translation of key terminological units based on a specialized parallel and comparable corpora.'}
{'en': 'Paragraph Similarity Matches for Generating Multiple-choice Test Items', 'ar': 'تطابقات تشابه الفقرة لإنشاء عناصر اختبار متعددة الاختيارات', 'fr': 'Correspondances de similarité de paragraphes pour générer des items de test à choix', 'zh': '以成多择试者段落相似性匹', 'pt': 'Correspondências de semelhança de parágrafo para geração de itens de teste de múltipla escolha', 'es': 'Coincidencias de similitud de párrafos para generar elementos de prueba de opción', 'ja': '複数選択した試験項目を生成するためのパラグラフ類似性一致', 'hi': 'एकाधिक-विकल्प परीक्षण आइटम जनरेट करने के लिए अनुच्छेद समानता मिलान', 'ru': 'Совпадение сходства абзацев для создания тестовых элементов с множественным выбором', 'ga': 'Meaitseálann Cosúlacht Alt chun Míreanna Tástála Ilroghnacha a Ghiniúint', 'hu': 'Bekezdés hasonlósági egyezések többválasztású tesztelemek generálásához', 'ka': 'პარაგრაფიკური სინამდვილეობის შესაბამისთვის მრავალური მონიშნული ტესტის ელემენტების შექმნა', 'it': 'Corrispondenza di somiglianza dei paragrafi per la generazione di elementi di prova a scelta multipla', 'lt': 'Paragrafo panašumas atitinka daugelio pasirinktų bandymų elementų kūrimą', 'mk': 'Сличноста на параграф се совпаѓа со генерирање на тестирани елементи со повеќе избори', 'el': 'Ταιριάζει ομοιομορφίας παραγράφων για τη δημιουργία στοιχείων δοκιμής πολλαπλών επιλογών', 'ms': 'Paragraph Similarity Matches for Generating Multiple-choice Test Items', 'ml': 'പല തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത പരീക്ഷ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പാരാഗ്രാപ്റ്റ് സമമാക്കുന്ന', 'mn': 'Олон сонголтын шалгалтын элементүүдийг бүтээхэд параграфын төстэй тэнцүү', 'mt': 'Paragrafu Similarity Matches for Generating Multiple-choice Test Items', 'kk': 'Бірнеше таңдалған сынақ нысандарын құру үшін бөлшектің ұқсастығы сәйкес келеді', 'pl': 'Dopasowania paragrafów do generowania elementów testowych wielokrotnego wyboru', 'ro': 'Potriviri de similitudine a paragrafului pentru generarea elementelor de testare cu alegere multiplă', 'so': 'Heshiiska isku mid ah ee la sameeyo alaabta jirrabka kala duduwan', 'no': 'Avsnittliknande treff med å laga fleire val- testelement', 'sv': 'Matchningar av styckelikhet för generering av testobjekt med flera val', 'ta': 'பலவித தேர்வு சோதனை உருவாக்குவதற்கான அளபுரு ஒற்றைப் பொருத்தம்', 'ur': 'پراگراف سیمالیٹی مطابق بہت سی انتخاب اتمات پیدا کرنے کے لئے مطابق ہے', 'sr': 'Paragraf sličnost odgovara stvaranju testova višeizbora', 'si': 'ගොඩක් තෝරාගැනීම් පරීක්ෂණ අයිති නිර්මාණය කරන්න සැකසුම් සමග', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Đối số trùng khớp với tạo ra các mục thử ra nhiều lựa chọn', 'bg': 'Съвпадения за сходство на абзац за генериране на тестови елементи с многократен избор', 'hr': 'Sličnost odstavka odgovara stvaranju testova višeizbora', 'nl': 'Alineaovereenkomsten voor het genereren van meerkeuzetestitems', 'da': 'Afsnitslighedsmatches til generering af testelementer med flere valg', 'de': 'AbsatzgleichheitsĂ¼bereinstimmungen zum Generieren von Multiple-Choice-Testelementen', 'id': 'Paragraph Similarity Matches for Generating Multiple-choice Test Items', 'ko': '여러 선택 문제의 단락 유사성 일치 생성에 사용', 'tr': 'Birden Saýlaw Hatlary Bejermek üçin Paragraf Maýyklygy Eşleýär', 'fa': 'مشابه شبیه\u200cسازی پاراگراف برای تولید عناصر آزمایش چندین انتخاب', 'sw': 'Paragraph Equalifu kwa ajili ya kutengeneza vipengele vinavyochaguliwa viwili', 'af': 'Paragraaf Likveldigheid Ooreenstemmende vir Genereer Veelvuldige Kies Toets Items', 'sq': 'Paraqitja e Paragrafit përputhet me gjenerimin e elementeve të testimit me zgjedhje të shumta', 'az': 'Bütün seçilmiş Sınama Elementlərini yaratmaq üçün Paragraf Similarlıq İşlənir', 'hy': 'Մագծի նմանությունը համապատասխանում է բազմաթիվ ընտրության փորձարկումների ստեղծման համար', 'am': 'undo-type', 'bs': 'Paragrafska sličnost odgovara stvaranju testova višeizbora', 'bn': 'বহুনির্বাচিত পরীক্ষা বস্তু তৈরি করার জন্য প্যারাগ্রাফ সমতার মিল', 'cs': 'Shody podobnosti odstavců pro generování testovacích položek s více výběrem', 'ca': 'Paràgraf Similarity Matches for Generating Multiple-choice Test Items', 'fi': 'Kappaleiden samankaltaisuusosumat monivalintaisten testikohteiden luomisessa', 'et': 'Lõike sarnasus sobib mitme valikuga katseseadmete genereerimisel', 'jv': 'Sampeyan Sampeyan Sampeyan kanggo Jejaring Perintah Pilihan', 'sk': 'Ujemanje podobnosti odstavkov za ustvarjanje preskusnih elementov z več izbirami', 'he': 'התאמות של פראגף לגורמת פריטים מבחנים בהחלטה רבה', 'bo': 'Paragraph Similarity Matches for Generating Multiple-choice Test Items', 'ha': '@ action'}
{'en': 'Multiple-choice questions (MCQs) are widely used in knowledge assessment in educational institutions, during work interviews, in entertainment quizzes and games. Although the research on the automatic or semi-automatic generation of multiple-choice test items has been conducted since the beginning of this millennium, most approaches focus on generating questions from a single sentence. In this research, a state-of-the-art method of creating questions based on multiple sentences is introduced. It was inspired by semantic similarity matches used in the translation memory component of translation management systems. The performance of two deep learning algorithms, doc2vec and SBERT, is compared for the paragraph similarity task. The experiments are performed on the ad-hoc corpus within the EU domain. For the automatic evaluation, a smaller corpus of manually selected matching paragraphs has been compiled. The results prove the good performance of Sentence Embeddings for the given task.', 'fr': "Les questions à choix multiples (QCM) sont largement utilisées dans l'évaluation des connaissances dans les établissements d'enseignement, lors d'entretiens de travail, de quiz de divertissement et de jeux. Bien que la recherche sur la génération automatique ou semi-automatique d'items de test à choix multiples ait été menée depuis le début de ce millénaire, la plupart des approches se concentrent sur la génération de questions à partir d'une seule phrase. Dans cette recherche, une méthode de pointe de création de questions basées sur plusieurs phrases est introduite. Il a été inspiré par les correspondances sémantiques de similarité utilisées dans le composant mémoire de traduction des systèmes de gestion des traductions. Les performances de deux algorithmes de deep learning, doc2vec et SBERT, sont comparées pour la tâche de similarité de paragraphes. Les expériences sont réalisées sur le corpus ad hoc au sein du domaine de l'UE. Pour l'évaluation automatique, un plus petit corpus de paragraphes correspondants sélectionnés manuellement a été compilé. Les résultats prouvent la bonne performance de Sentence Embeddings pour la tâche donnée.", 'pt': 'As perguntas de múltipla escolha (MCQs) são amplamente utilizadas na avaliação do conhecimento em instituições de ensino, em entrevistas de trabalho, em quizzes e jogos de entretenimento. Embora a pesquisa sobre a geração automática ou semiautomática de itens de teste de múltipla escolha tenha sido realizada desde o início deste milênio, a maioria das abordagens se concentra na geração de perguntas a partir de uma única frase. Nesta pesquisa, é apresentado um método de última geração de criação de perguntas com base em várias frases. Ele foi inspirado por correspondências de similaridade semântica usadas no componente de memória de tradução dos sistemas de gerenciamento de tradução. O desempenho de dois algoritmos de aprendizado profundo, doc2vec e SBERT, é comparado para a tarefa de similaridade de parágrafo. Os experimentos são realizados no corpus ad-hoc dentro do domínio da UE. Para a avaliação automática, foi compilado um corpus menor de parágrafos correspondentes selecionados manualmente. Os resultados comprovam o bom desempenho do Sentence Embeddings para a tarefa em questão.', 'es': 'Las preguntas de opción múltiple (MCQ) se utilizan ampliamente en la evaluación de conocimientos en instituciones educativas, durante entrevistas de trabajo, en concursos de entretenimiento y juegos. Aunque la investigación sobre la generación automática o semiautomática de elementos de prueba de opción múltiple se ha llevado a cabo desde principios de este milenio, la mayoría de los enfoques se centran en generar preguntas a partir de una sola oración. En esta investigación, se introduce un método de vanguardia para crear preguntas basadas en múltiples oraciones. Se inspiró en las coincidencias de similitud semántica utilizadas en el componente de memoria de traducción de los sistemas de gestión de traducciones. El rendimiento de dos algoritmos de aprendizaje profundo, doc2vec y SBERT, se compara para la tarea de similitud de párrafos. Los experimentos se realizan en el corpus ad-hoc dentro del dominio de la UE. Para la evaluación automática, se ha compilado un corpus más pequeño de párrafos coincidentes seleccionados manualmente. Los resultados demuestran el buen desempeño de las incrustaciones de oraciones para la tarea dada.', 'ar': 'تستخدم أسئلة الاختيار من متعدد (MCQs) على نطاق واسع في تقييم المعرفة في المؤسسات التعليمية ، أثناء مقابلات العمل ، في الاختبارات والألعاب الترفيهية. على الرغم من أن البحث حول التوليد التلقائي أو شبه التلقائي لعناصر اختبار الاختيار من متعدد قد تم إجراؤه منذ بداية هذه الألفية ، إلا أن معظم المناهج تركز على توليد أسئلة من جملة واحدة. في هذا البحث ، تم تقديم طريقة حديثة لإنشاء الأسئلة بناءً على جمل متعددة. لقد تم استلهامها من التطابقات الدلالية المستخدمة في مكون ذاكرة الترجمة لأنظمة إدارة الترجمة. تتم مقارنة أداء اثنين من خوارزميات التعلم العميق ، doc2vec و SBERT ، لمهمة تشابه الفقرة. يتم إجراء التجارب على مجموعة مخصصة داخل مجال الاتحاد الأوروبي. للتقييم التلقائي ، تم تجميع مجموعة أصغر من فقرات المطابقة المختارة يدويًا. تثبت النتائج الأداء الجيد لتضمينات الجمل للمهمة المحددة.', 'hi': 'बहुविकल्पीय प्रश्न (MCQs) व्यापक रूप से शैक्षिक संस्थानों में ज्ञान मूल्यांकन में, काम के साक्षात्कार के दौरान, मनोरंजन क्विज़ और खेल में उपयोग किए जाते हैं। यद्यपि बहु-विकल्प परीक्षण वस्तुओं की स्वचालित या अर्ध-स्वचालित पीढ़ी पर शोध इस सहस्राब्दी की शुरुआत के बाद से आयोजित किया गया है, अधिकांश दृष्टिकोण एक ही वाक्य से प्रश्न उत्पन्न करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। इस शोध में, कई वाक्यों के आधार पर प्रश्न बनाने का एक अत्याधुनिक तरीका पेश किया गया है। यह अनुवाद प्रबंधन प्रणालियों के अनुवाद स्मृति घटक में उपयोग किए जाने वाले शब्दार्थ समानता मैचों से प्रेरित था। दो गहरी सीखने के एल्गोरिदम, doc2vec और SBERT के प्रदर्शन, अनुच्छेद समानता कार्य के लिए तुलना की है। प्रयोगों को यूरोपीय संघ के डोमेन के भीतर तदर्थ कॉर्पस पर किया जाता है। स्वचालित मूल्यांकन के लिए, मैन्युअल रूप से चयनित मिलान पैराग्राफ का एक छोटा कॉर्पस संकलित किया गया है। परिणाम दिए गए कार्य के लिए वाक्य एम्बेडिंग के अच्छे प्रदर्शन को साबित करते हैं।', 'ja': '多肢選択式質問（ MCQ ）は、教育機関での知識評価、ワークインタビュー、エンターテイメントクイズやゲームで広く使用されています。多肢選択試験項目の自動生成または半自動生成に関する研究は、このミレニアムの初めから行われてきたが、ほとんどのアプローチは1つの文からの質問の生成に焦点を当てている。本研究では、複数の文章に基づいて質問を作成する最先端の方法を紹介した。これは、翻訳管理システムの翻訳メモリコンポーネントで使用されるセマンティック類似性マッチからインスピレーションを受けました。2つのディープラーニングアルゴリズム、doc 2 vecとSBERTのパフォーマンスは、パラグラフ類似性タスクと比較されます。実験は、EUドメイン内のアドホックコーパスで実施されます。自動評価のために、手動で選択された一致する段落のより小さなコーパスがコンパイルされました。結果は、指定されたタスクに対するSentence Embeddingsの優れたパフォーマンスを証明します。', 'ru': 'Вопросы с множественным выбором (MCQ) широко используются при оценке знаний в учебных заведениях, во время рабочих интервью, в развлекательных викторинах и играх. Хотя исследования по автоматическому или полуавтоматическому генерированию тестовых элементов с множественным выбором проводились с начала этого тысячелетия, большинство подходов сосредоточены на генерировании вопросов из одного предложения. В этом исследовании введен современный метод создания вопросов на основе нескольких предложений. Он был вдохновлен семантическими совпадениями сходства, используемыми в компоненте памяти переводов систем управления переводом. Производительность двух алгоритмов глубокого обучения, doc2vec и SBERT, сравнивается для задачи подобия абзаца. Эксперименты проводят на ad-hoc корпусе в пределах домена ЕС. Для автоматической оценки был составлен меньший набор отобранных вручную совпадающих пунктов. Результаты доказывают хорошую работу внедрений предложений для данной задачи.', 'ga': 'Úsáidtear ceisteanna ilroghnacha (MCQanna) go forleathan i measúnú eolais in institiúidí oideachais, le linn agallaimh oibre, tráth na gceist agus cluichí siamsaíochta. Cé go bhfuil an taighde ar ghiniúint uathoibríoch nó leath-uathoibríoch míreanna tástála ilroghnacha déanta ó thús na mílaoise seo, díríonn an chuid is mó de na cineálacha cur chuige ar cheisteanna a ghiniúint as abairt amháin. Sa taighde seo, tugtar isteach modh úrscothach chun ceisteanna a chruthú bunaithe ar abairtí iolracha. Bhí sé spreagtha ag meaitseanna cosúlachta shéimeantacha a úsáidtear i gcomhpháirt cuimhne aistriúcháin na gcóras bainistíochta aistriúcháin. Déantar comparáid idir feidhmíocht dhá algartam foghlama domhain, doc2vec agus SBERT, don tasc cosúlachta ailt. Déantar na turgnaimh ar an gcorpas ad hoc laistigh d’fhearann an AE. Don mheastóireacht uathoibríoch, tá corpas níos lú de mhíreanna comhoiriúnaithe a roghnaíodh de láimh curtha le chéile. Cruthaíonn na torthaí dea-fheidhmíocht Leabú Pianbhreithe don tasc a tugadh.', 'zh': '多选择题(MCQ)博于教官,面试娱乐。 虽自本世纪初以来,选择题测试项目自半自动生,多集一句。 于此论之,一基于数句之最先进者也。 其灵感自译管理系统译记库组件中所用语义相似性匹。 较二深习算法 doc2vec 与 SBERT 之性,施于段落相似性务。 实验于欧盟域内临时语料库上行之。 自料已编译小手动择匹配段落语料库。 结果证明了句子嵌在给定务中的良性。', 'hu': 'A többválasztású kérdéseket széles körben használják az oktatási intézményekben, a munkainterjúkban, a szórakoztató kvízekben és játékokban. Bár a többszörös választású tesztelemek automatikus vagy félautomata generálására irányuló kutatásokat az évezred eleje óta végezték, a legtöbb megközelítés egyetlen mondatból történő kérdések generálására összpontosít. Ebben a kutatásban egy korszerű módszert vezetünk be a több mondat alapján kérdések létrehozására. A fordításkezelő rendszerek fordítási memória összetevőjében használt szemantikai hasonlósági egyezések inspirálták. Két mélytanulási algoritmus, doc2vec és SBERT teljesítményét összehasonlítjuk a bekezdéshez hasonlósági feladathoz. A kísérleteket az EU területén belüli ad hoc korpuszon végezzük. Az automatikus értékeléshez egy kisebb, manuálisan kiválasztott, illeszkedő bekezdés került összeállításra. Az eredmények bizonyítják a Sentence Embeddings jó teljesítményét az adott feladathoz.', 'ka': 'მრავალური მონიშნული კითხვები (MCQs) უფრო დიდი გამოყენება განსწავლებული ინსტუტისტებში, სამუშაო ინტერუტისტებში, ინტერუტისტების კვიზში და თამაში. თუმცა მრავალის წლის დასაწყისგან მონიშნული ტესტის განსხვავებების ავტომატიკური ან ნახევატომატიკური განსხვავებაზე გავაკეთებულია, უფრო მეტი დახმარებები ერთი წლიდან კითხვების შექმნა. ამ შესწავლობაში, მრავალ სიტყვების განსაზღვრული კითხვების განსაზღვრული სტატის განსაზღვრული პროცემი იყენება. ეს იყო სიმენტიკური განსხვავება, რომელიც გამოიყენებული სისტემების თარგმარების მეხსიერის კომპონენტში გამოყენებულია. ორი ძალიან სწავლების ალგორიტიმს, doc2vec და SBERT-ის გამოსახულება, პრაპარაფიკას სხვადასხვა დავალებისთვის შედგენა. ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტის შორის ad-hoc corpus. ავტომატიკური განსაზღვრებისთვის მარტივი მონიშნული პარაგრაფიების მარტივი კორპუსი კომპილურია. პვჱსლრართრვ ეჲკაჱგარ ეჲბპჲრჲ ოპაგთრვლჟრგჲ ნა ჟყეყლზვნთვ ჱა ეაევნთწ პაბჲრ.', 'it': "Le domande a risposta multipla (MCQ) sono ampiamente utilizzate nella valutazione della conoscenza nelle istituzioni educative, durante interviste di lavoro, nei quiz di intrattenimento e nei giochi. Sebbene la ricerca sulla generazione automatica o semi-automatica di test a scelta multipla sia stata condotta dall'inizio di questo millennio, la maggior parte degli approcci si concentra sulla generazione di domande da una singola frase. In questa ricerca viene introdotto un metodo all'avanguardia per creare domande basate su più frasi. È stato ispirato dalle corrispondenze semantiche di somiglianza utilizzate nella componente della memoria di traduzione dei sistemi di gestione della traduzione. Le prestazioni di due algoritmi di deep learning, doc2vec e SBERT, sono confrontate per il compito di somiglianza dei paragrafi. Gli esperimenti sono effettuati sul corpus ad hoc all'interno del settore UE. Per la valutazione automatica è stato compilato un corpus più piccolo di paragrafi corrispondenti selezionati manualmente. I risultati dimostrano le buone prestazioni di Sentence Embeddings per il compito dato.", 'lt': 'Daugiapasirinktiniai klausimai (MCQ) plačiai naudojami vertinant žinias švietimo įstaigose, darbo interviu, pramoginių kvizų ir žaidimų metu. Nors nuo šio tūkstantmečio pradžios atliekami automatinės arba pusiau automatinės daugelio pasirinktų bandymų objektų gamybos tyrimai, dauguma metodų daugiausia dėmesio skiria klausimų kylimui iš vieno sakinio. Šiame tyrime įvedamas naujausias klausimų, pagrįstų keliais sakiniais, kūrimo metodas. Jis buvo įkvėptas semantiniais panašumo deriniais, naudojamais vertimo atminties komponente vertimo valdymo sistemose. Dviejų gilaus mokymosi algoritmų, doc2vec ir SBERT, rezultatai lyginami atliekant panašumo užduotį. The experiments are performed on the ad-hoc corpus within the EU domain.  Automatiniam vertinimui parengtas mažesnis rankiniu būdu atrinktų atitikties dalių rinkinys. Rezultatai rodo, kad tam tikra užduotis tinkamai atliekama įterpiant nuosprendžius.', 'mk': 'Прашањата со повеќе избори (МЦК) се широко користат за проценка на знаењето во образовните институции, за време на работните интервјуа, во забавните тестови и игрите. Иако истражувањата за автоматска или полуавтоматска генерација на тестирани предмети со повеќе избори се спроведуваат од почетокот на овој милениум, повеќето пристапи се фокусираат на генерање прашања од една реченица. Во ова истражување се воведува најнов метод за создавање прашања базирани на повеќе реченици. It was inspired by semantic similarity matches used in the translation memory component of translation management systems.  Извршувањето на двата алгоритми за длабоко учење, doc2vec и SBERT, се споредува за задачата за сличност на параграфот. Експериментите се спроведуваат на адхок корпусот во доменот на ЕУ. За автоматска евалуација е компилиран помал корпус од рачно избрани параграфи кои се совпаѓаат. Резултатите докажуваат добра извршност на Вклучувањето на Судбите за дадената задача.', 'el': 'Οι ερωτήσεις πολλαπλής επιλογής χρησιμοποιούνται ευρέως στην αξιολόγηση γνώσεων σε εκπαιδευτικά ιδρύματα, κατά τη διάρκεια συνεντεύξεων εργασίας, σε κουίζ ψυχαγωγίας και παιχνίδια. Αν και η έρευνα για την αυτόματη ή ημιαυτόματη παραγωγή δοκιμών πολλαπλών επιλογών έχει διεξαχθεί από τις αρχές αυτής της χιλιετίας, οι περισσότερες προσεγγίσεις επικεντρώνονται στη δημιουργία ερωτήσεων από μία πρόταση. Στην έρευνα αυτή εισάγεται μια σύγχρονη μέθοδος δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων βασισμένων σε πολλαπλές προτάσεις. Εμπνευσμένο από σημασιολογικές ομοιότητες που χρησιμοποιούνται στο συστατικό της μεταφραστικής μνήμης των συστημάτων διαχείρισης μετάφρασης. Η απόδοση δύο αλγορίθμων βαθιάς μάθησης, του doc2vec και του SBERT, συγκρίνεται για την εργασία ομοιότητας παραγράφου. Τα πειράματα διεξάγονται στο σώμα ad hoc εντός του τομέα της ΕΕ. Για την αυτόματη αξιολόγηση, έχει καταρτιστεί ένα μικρότερο σώμα από μη αυτόματο επιλεγμένους παράγραφους αντιστοίχισης. Τα αποτελέσματα αποδεικνύουν την καλή απόδοση των Ενσωματώσεων προτάσεων για τη δεδομένη εργασία.', 'mt': 'Multiple-choice questions (MCQs) are widely used in knowledge assessment in educational institutions, during work interviews, in entertainment quizzes and games.  Għalkemm ir-riċerka dwar il-ġenerazzjoni awtomatika jew semiawtomatika ta’ oġġetti tat-test b’għa żla multipla twettqet mill-bidu ta’ dan il-millenju, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-approċċi jiffokaw fuq il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet minn sentenza waħda. F’din ir-riċerka, huwa introdott metodu avvanzat għall-ħolqien ta’ mistoqsijiet ibbażati fuq sentenzi multipli. Kien ispirat minn tqabbil semantiku ta’ similarità użat fil-komponent tal-memorja tat-traduzzjoni tas-sistemi ta’ ġestjoni tat-traduzzjoni. Il-prestazzjoni ta’ żewġ algoritmi ta’ tagħlim profond, doc2vec u SBERT, titqabbel għall-kompitu ta’ similarità tal-paragrafu. L-esperimenti jitwettqu fuq il-korpus ad hoc fi ħdan id-dominju tal-UE. Għall-evalwazzjoni awtomatika, ġie kkompilat korpus iżgħar ta’ paragrafi ta’ tqabbil magħżula manwalment. The results prove the good performance of Sentence Embeddings for the given task.', 'kk': 'Бірнеше таңдау сұрақтары (MCQs) білім мәліметтерді бағалау үшін, жұмыс сұрақтарында, жұмыс сұрақтарында, жұмыс кызықтарында және ойындарда қолданылады. Бұл миллионның басынан кейін бірнеше таңдалған сынақтардың автоматты немесе жарты автоматты түрде жасалған зерттеулері жасалған болса да, көпшілігі бір сұрақтан сұрақтарды жасау үшін көпшілікті. Бұл зерттеулерде бірнеше сұрақтарды құру әдісі келтіріледі. Бұл аудармаларды басқару жүйелерінің аудармалардың жады компонентінде қолданылатын семантикалық ұқсас сәйкестіктерінің түсіндірілді. Екі терең оқыту алгоритма, doc2vec және SBERT алгоритма жұмысының істеуі бөлшектің ұқсас тапсырмасына салыстырылады. Тәжірибелер ЕС доменінде ad-hoc корпус орындалады. Автоматты бағалау үшін қолмен таңдалған бөлшектердің кішкентай корпус компиляцияланды. Нәтижелер келтірілген тапсырманың сөз ендірудің жақсы істеуін көрсетеді.', 'no': 'Fleire val spørsmål (MCQs) blir breidd brukt i kunnskapseljing i utdanningsstittel, under arbeidintervjuar, i entertainment quizzes og spel. Selv om forskningen om automatisk eller halvautomatisk generering av fleire val-testelement er gjennomført siden starten av denne tålinga, er dei fleste tilnærmingane fokusert på å laga spørsmål frå ei enkelt setning. I denne forskningen vert introdusert ein metode for å laga spørsmål basert på fleire setningar. Det var inspirert av semantiske liknande treff som vert brukt i omsetjingsmenyen til omsetjingssystemet. Utviklinga av to dype læringsalgoritme, doc2vec og SBERT er samanlikna med avsnittsammenhengsoppgåva. Eksperimentane er utført på ad-hoc corpus i EU-domenet. For automatisk evaluering er kompilert eit mindre korpus av manuelt valde avsnitt. Resultatet viser at det er godt utføring av setningar for oppgåva.', 'ml': 'വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d, ജോലി കാണിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, വിനോദപൂര്\u200dണ്ണത്തിന്റെയും കളികളില്\u200d ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെയും വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d  ഒരു വാക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു വാക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനു മുതല്\u200d സ്വയം സ്വയം സ്വയംതന്ത്രീകരിക്കുന്നതോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d സ്വയം തെരഞ്ഞെടു ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d പല വാക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള രീതി പരിഭാഷക മെമ്മറിയുടെ ഘടകം രണ്ട് ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളുടെയും ഡോക്ടറിക്കും SBERT-ന്റെയും പ്രദര്\u200dശനം, പാര്\u200dപ്പിന്റെ തുല്യമായ ജ ഈ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d യൂറോപ്യന്\u200d ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. സ്വയം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനായി കൈയ്യില്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ചെറിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് കൂട്ടിയിട്ടുണ്ട്. അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d തെളിയിക്കുന്നു കൊടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ജോലിക്കുള്ള ശിക്ഷ എംബിഡിങ്ങിന്റെ നല്ല പ്', 'ms': 'Soalan pilihan-berbilang (MCQ) digunakan secara luas dalam penilaian pengetahuan di institusi pendidikan, semasa temuduga kerja, dalam quizzes hiburan dan permainan. Walaupun kajian tentang generasi ujian pilihan berbilang secara automatik atau semi-automatik telah dilakukan sejak awal millenium ini, kebanyakan pendekatan fokus pada menghasilkan soalan dari satu kalimat. Dalam kajian ini, satu kaedah terbaik untuk mencipta soalan berdasarkan kalimat berbilang diperkenalkan. Ia diinspirasi oleh persamaan semantik yang digunakan dalam komponen ingatan terjemahan sistem pengurusan terjemahan. Performasi dua algoritma belajar dalam, doc2vec dan SBERT, dibandingkan untuk tugas persamaan paragraf. Eksperimen ini dilakukan pada korpus ad-hoc dalam domain EU. Untuk penilaian automatik, korpus kecil paragraf yang dipilih secara manual telah dikompil. Hasilnya membuktikan prestasi yang baik dari Penambahan Hukuman untuk tugas yang diberikan.', 'pl': 'Pytania wielokrotnego wyboru (MCQ) są szeroko stosowane w ocenie wiedzy w instytucjach edukacyjnych, podczas rozmów kwalifikacyjnych, w quizach rozrywkowych i gier. Chociaż badania nad automatycznym lub półautomatycznym generowaniem elementów testowych wielokrotnego wyboru prowadzone są od początku tego tysiąclecia, większość podejść koncentruje się na generowaniu pytań z jednego zdania. W tym badaniu wprowadzono najnowocześniejszą metodę tworzenia pytań opartych na wielu zdaniach. Zainspirowano ją semantyczne dopasowania podobieństwa stosowane w komponencie pamięci tłumaczeniowej systemów zarządzania tłumaczeniami. Porównano wydajność dwóch algorytmów głębokiego uczenia, doc2vec i SBERT, dla zadania podobieństwa akapitów. Eksperymenty przeprowadzane są na korpusie ad hoc w domenie UE. W celu automatycznej oceny zestawiono mniejszy korpus ręcznie wybranych pasujących akapitów. Wyniki potwierdzają dobrą wydajność osadzeń zdań dla danego zadania.', 'ro': 'Întrebările cu răspuns multiplu (MCQ) sunt utilizate pe scară largă în evaluarea cunoștințelor în instituțiile de învățământ, în timpul interviurilor de lucru, în chestionare de divertisment și jocuri. Deși cercetările privind generarea automată sau semi-automată a elementelor de testare cu răspuns multiple au fost efectuate de la începutul acestui mileniu, majoritatea abordărilor se concentrează pe generarea întrebărilor dintr-o singură propoziție. În această cercetare, este introdusă o metodă de ultimă generație de creare a întrebărilor bazate pe mai multe propoziții. A fost inspirat de potrivirile semantice de similitudine folosite în componenta memoriei de traducere a sistemelor de management al traducerii. Performanța a doi algoritmi de învățare profundă, doc2vec și SBERT, este comparată pentru sarcina de similitudine a paragrafelor. Experimentele sunt efectuate pe corpul ad-hoc din domeniul UE. Pentru evaluarea automată, a fost compilat un corpus mai mic de paragrafe de potrivire selectate manual. Rezultatele demonstrează performanța bună a Sentince Embeddings pentru sarcina dată.', 'sr': 'Višestruko izborno pitanje (MCQs) se široko koriste u procjeni znanja u obrazovnim institucijama, tokom radnih intervjua, u zabavnim kvizovima i igrama. Iako je istraživanje o automatskoj ili polu-automatskoj generaciji višeizbornih testova provedena od početka ove hiljade, većina pristupa se fokusira na stvaranje pitanja iz jednog rečenika. U ovom istraživanju se predstavlja nacionalna metoda umetnosti stvaranja pitanja na osnovu višestruke rečenice. To je inspirisano semantičkim sličnostima koje se koriste u komponentu memorije prevođenja sustava upravljanja prevođenjem. Izvrsnost dva algoritma dubokog učenja, doc2vec i SBERT, uspoređuje se za posao sličnosti paragrafa. Eksperimenti su provedeni na ad-hoc korpusu unutar domena EU. Za automatsku procjenu, sastavljen je manji korpus ručno odabranog odgovarajućeg paragrafa. Rezultati dokazuju dobru izvršnost sudskih uloga za određeni zadatak.', 'mn': 'Олон сонголтын асуултууд (MCQs) боловсролын байгууллагууд, ажлын ярилцлага, интернэтлэл, тоглоомууд дээр мэдлэгтэй оюутнуудад ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг. Хэдийгээр маш олон сонголтын шалгалтуудын автоматжуулалт эсвэл хагас автоматжуулалт хийсэн судалгаа нь мянга мянган жилийн эхлэхээс хойш хийгдсэн ч ихэнх арга барилга нь нэг өгүүлбэрээс асуулт гаргах талаар анхаарна. Энэ судалгаанд олон өгүүлбэрүүдийн үндсэн асуулт бий болгох урлагийн аргыг танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь орчуулах менеджментийн тусламжтайгаар хэрэглэгдсэн семантик төстэй тоглоомоос урам зориулсан. Хоёр гүн гүнзгий суралцах алгоритм doc2vec болон SBERT-ын үйл ажиллагааг харьцуулж байна. Эдгээр туршилтууд Европын холбоотой ad-hoc корпус дээр хийгдсэн. Автоматик дүгнэлтийн тулд гараар сонгогдсон жижиг хэсгүүдийн корпус цуглуулсан. Үүний үр дүнд өгөгдсөн ажлын төлөө өгүүлбэл хэвлэлийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг баталж байна.', 'sv': 'Multiple-choice questions (MCQs) används i stor utsträckning vid kunskapsbedömning i utbildningsinstitutioner, vid arbetsintervjuer, i underhållningsfrågor och spel. Även om forskningen om automatisk eller halvautomatisk generering av flervalstestobjekt har genomförts sedan början av detta årtusende, fokuserar de flesta tillvägagångssätt på att generera frågor från en enda mening. I denna forskning introduceras en state-of-the-art metod för att skapa frågor baserade på flera meningar. Den inspirerades av semantiska likhetsmatcher som används i översättningsminnets komponent i översättningshanteringssystem. Prestandan hos två djupinlärningsalgoritmer, doc2vec och SBERT, jämförs för styckelikhetsuppgiften. Experimenten utförs på ad hoc-corpus inom EU-området. För den automatiska utvärderingen har en mindre samling manuellt markerade matchande stycken sammanställts. Resultaten visar att meningsbeläggningar presterar bra för den givna uppgiften.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් තෝරාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න (MCQs) විශාල විශ්වාස ස්ථානය, වැඩ සංවේදනය, විවේදනය සහ සෙල්ලම් වලට භාවිතා වෙ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාසයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය නැත්තම් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාසයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ මේ මිලින මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, වචනය අධික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හදන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. ඒක සෙමැන්ටික් සැමැන්ටික් එක්කම් ප්\u200dරවේශය කරලා තියෙන්නේ වාර්ථාපනය පද්ධතියේ වාර්ථාපනය මත ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න අල්ගෝරිතම් දෙකක්, doc2Vec සහ SBERT, පැරැග්රාෆ් එකෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් විසින් ව ඒ පරීක්ෂණය යුරෝපියේ ඇඩ් හොක් කොර්පුස් වලට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා. ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා, පොඩි කෝර්පස් කිරීමක් අතුරුද්ධයෙන් තෝරාගෙන ඉන්න තියෙ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d', 'so': "Iskuulada waxbarashada, wareysiga shaqada, jimicsiga ciyaarta iyo ciyaarta waxaa si badan loogu isticmaalaa qiimeynta aqoonta. In kastoo la sameeyay baaritaanka ku saabsan asalka ama jimicsiga ah oo laga bilaabo baaritaanka jirrabka kala duduwan, sanadkan bilowgeeda, qaarkood oo ka badan ayaa iskuul u jeeda inay su'aalo ka soo saaraan hal eray keliya. Waxbarashadan waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa habka farshaxanta ah oo ku saleysan su'aalo badan. Waxa laguugu waxyooday isku mid ahaanshaha semantiga ee lagu isticmaalay kambarka xusuusta ee nidaamka maamulka turjumaadda. Fasaxa labada kooxooyinka waxbarashada ee mool dheer, doc2vec iyo SBERT waxaa la barbaranayaa shuqulka siman ee paragraph. Imtixaanka waxaa lagu sameeyaa baaritaanka caasimadda ee gudaha Midowga Yurub gudahooda. For the automatic evaluation, a smaller corpus of manually selected matching paragraphs has been compiled.  Arrimaha waxaa lagu caddeeyaa shaqada la siiyey sameynta qalabka daryeelka.", 'ta': 'பல தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட கேள்விகள் (MCQs) கல்வி நிறுவனங்களில், வேலை கேட்கைகளில், வியாபாரத்திற்கும் விளையாட்டுகளிலும் அறிவு மத ஆயினும் பல தேர்வு சோதனை உருப்படிகளின் தன்னியக்கமாக அல்லது பாதி தானாக உருவாக்கம் செய்யப்பட்டு இருந்தாலும் இந்த ஆயிரம் துவக்கத்தில் இருந்து, பெரும்ப இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், பல வாக்கியங்களை அடிப்படையில் கேள்விகளை உருவாக்க ஒரு நிலையில் உள்ளது. @ info இரண்டு ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் படிக்கும் வரிசைகள், doc2vec மற்றும் SBERT, செயல்பாடு பத்தின் ஒப்பிடும் பணி ஐரோப்பு டொமைனில் உள்ள ad- hoc கார்புஸ் மீது சோதனைகள் செய்யப்படுகின்றன. தானியங்கி மதிப்பீட்டிற்கு, கைமுறையாக தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட பொருத்தும் பத்திருக்களின் சிறிய கூட்டு த முடிவுகள் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பணிக்கான வாக்குப் புறங்களின் நல்ல செயல்பாட்டை நிரூபிக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'بہت سی انتخاب سوالات (MCQs) کی تعلیم کی تعلیم کے مطابق علم کی ارزیابی میں وسیع طور پر استعمال کی جاتی ہیں، کاروبار انٹوریوں میں، سرگرمی کویز اور کھیل میں۔ اگرچہ بہت سی انتخابات کی آغاز سے پہلے اس ہزار سالوں کے آغاز سے پہلے بہت سی موجودات کو ایک جماعت سے سوال جوڑنے پر تمرکز کرتی ہیں۔ اس تحقیقات میں، بہت سی جماعتوں پر بنیاد رکھنے کے سوال پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک ایٹیٹ کی روش پیش کیا جاتا ہے. اس کو سیمانٹی سیمانٹی مثالی کے ذریعے الهام کیا گیا ہے جو ترجمہ مدیریت سیسٹموں کی ترجمہ مہمانٹی میں استعمال کیا جاتا ہے۔ دو عمیق تعلیم الگوریتم، doc2vec اور SBERT کے عملکرد، پاراگراف برابری کے کام کے لئے مقایسہ کیا جاتا ہے. آزمائش اڈ-هوک کورپوس میں اڈ-هوک کورپوس پر عمل کیے جاتے ہیں۔ آٹوٹی ارزیابی کے لئے، ایک چھوٹی کورپوس مطابق مطابق پراگراف کے ذریعہ کامپیل کیا گیا ہے. نتیجے دیے گئے کام کے لئے فیصلہ ایمبڈینز کا اچھا کام ثابت کر رہے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bir nechta tanlangan savollar (MCQ) ta'lim maktablarida, ish interviewlarida, suhbat qizlari va oʻyinlarida ko'plab ishlatiladi. Agar bir necha necha tanlangan tizim elementlarining avtomatik yoki avtomatik avtomatik avtomatik avtomatik foydalanishni boshlagan boʻlsa, bu yillik boshlaridan ko'pchilik bir so'zdan savollar yaratishga foydalanadi. Bu taʼminotda, bir necha so'zlar asosida savollarni yaratish holati usulini ishga tushiriladi. @ info Ikkita o'rganish algorithining bajarishi, doktor 2vec va SBERT bajarishi, paragraph bir xil vazifasiga kamaytiriladi. Ushbu jarayonlarni Ewropa domenasidagi ad-hoc corpusda bajariladi. Avto- qiymatlash uchun qoʻlbola tanlangan paragraphning kichik koʻp qoʻlbola tanlangan. @ info", 'vi': 'Các câu hỏi có nhiều lựa chọn (MCQs) được sử dụng rất phổ biến trong đánh giá kiến thức tại các tổ chức giáo dục, trong các cuộc phỏng vấn, các câu đố giải trí và trò chơi. Mặc dù nghiên cứu về chế độ tự động hoặc bán tự động tạo các mẫu thử hàng loạt đã được tiến hành ngay từ đầu thế kỉ này, nhưng hầu hết các phương pháp tập trung vào việc tạo ra câu hỏi từ một câu. Trong nghiên cứu này, sẽ có một phương pháp tiên tiến nhất để tạo ra câu hỏi dựa trên nhiều câu. Nó được tạo cảm hứng từ sự giống nhau theo ngữ nghĩa. Được dùng trong bộ nhớ dịch của hệ thống quản lý dịch. Hai thuật toán học sâu có hiệu quả được so sánh với công việc mô phỏng đoạn. Các thí nghiệm được thực hiện trên tập đoàn đặc biệt trong lãnh vực của Châu Âu. Để đánh giá tự động, tập đoàn nhỏ hơn của những đoạn khớp tay đã chọn đã soạn thảo. Kết quả chứng minh khả năng hoạt động tốt của Sensence nhúng trong các nhiệm vụ được giao.', 'bg': 'Въпросите с многократен избор (МКК) се използват широко в оценката на знанията в образователните институции, по време на работни интервюта, в развлекателни викторини и игри. Въпреки че изследването на автоматичното или полуавтоматично генериране на тестови елементи с многократен избор се провежда от началото на това хилядолетие, повечето подходи се фокусират върху генерирането на въпроси от едно изречение. В това изследване е въведен съвременен метод за създаване на въпроси въз основа на множество изречения. Тя е вдъхновена от семантични сходства, използвани в компонента на паметта за превод на системите за управление на преводите. Ефективността на два алгоритма за дълбоко обучение, doc2vec и SBERT, се сравнява за задачата за сходство с параграфи. Експериментите се извършват върху ad hoc корпус в рамките на ЕС. За автоматичната оценка е компилиран по-малък корпус от ръчно избрани съвпадащи абзаци. Резултатите доказват доброто изпълнение на вграждането на присъди за дадената задача.', 'da': 'Multiple-choice spørgsmål (MCQs) anvendes i vid udstrækning i videnvurdering i uddannelsesinstitutioner, under arbejdsinterviews, i underholdning quizzer og spil. Selvom forskningen om automatisk eller halvautomatisk generering af flervalgte testelementer er blevet udført siden begyndelsen af dette årtusinde, fokuserer de fleste tilgange på at generere spørgsmål fra en enkelt sætning. I denne forskning introduceres en state-of-the-art metode til at skabe spørgsmål baseret på flere sætninger. Den blev inspireret af semantiske lighedsmatches, der anvendes i oversættelseshukommelseskomponenten i oversættelsesstyringssystemer. Udførelsen af to deep learning algoritmer, doc2vec og SBERT, sammenlignes for afsnitslighedsopgaven. Eksperimenterne udføres på ad hoc-korpusset inden for EU-området. Til den automatiske evaluering er der udarbejdet et mindre korpus af manuelt valgte matchende afsnit. Resultaterne viser den gode ydeevne af Sætningsindlejringer til den givne opgave.', 'nl': "Multiple-choice vragen (MCQ's) worden veel gebruikt bij kennisbeoordeling in onderwijsinstellingen, tijdens werkinterviews, in entertainmentquizzen en spelletjes. Hoewel het onderzoek naar de automatische of semi-automatische generatie van multiple-choice testitems sinds het begin van dit millennium wordt uitgevoerd, richten de meeste benaderingen zich op het genereren van vragen uit één zin. In dit onderzoek wordt een state-of-the-art methode geïntroduceerd om vragen te creëren op basis van meerdere zinnen. Het werd geïnspireerd door semantische overeenkomsten die worden gebruikt in de vertaalgeheugencomponent van vertaalbeheersystemen. De prestaties van twee deep learning algoritmes, doc2vec en SBERT, worden vergeleken voor de paragraaf gelijkenis taak. De experimenten worden uitgevoerd op het ad-hoc corpus binnen het EU domein. Voor de automatische evaluatie is een kleiner corpus van handmatig geselecteerde overeenkomende alinea's samengesteld. De resultaten bewijzen de goede prestaties van Sentence Embeddings voor de gegeven taak.", 'de': 'Multiple-Choice-Fragen (MCQs) werden häufig in der Wissensbewertung in Bildungseinrichtungen, bei Arbeitsgesprächen, in Unterhaltungsquizzen und Spielen verwendet. Obwohl die Forschung zur automatischen oder halbautomatischen Generierung von Multiple-Choice-Testobjekten seit Beginn dieses Jahrtausends durchgeführt wird, konzentrieren sich die meisten Ansätze darauf, Fragen aus einem einzigen Satz zu generieren. In dieser Forschung wird eine hochmoderne Methode vorgestellt, Fragen basierend auf mehreren Sätzen zu erstellen. Es wurde von semantischen Ähnlichkeitsmatches inspiriert, die in der Translation Memory-Komponente von Translation Management Systemen verwendet werden. Die Leistung der beiden Deep Learning Algorithmen doc2vec und SBERT wird für die Absatzähnlichkeitsaufgabe verglichen. Die Experimente werden auf dem Ad-hoc-Korpus innerhalb der EU-Domäne durchgeführt. Für die automatische Auswertung wurde ein kleinerer Korpus von manuell ausgewählten übereinstimmenden Absätzen zusammengestellt. Die Ergebnisse belegen die gute Leistung von Satzence Embeddings für die gegebene Aufgabe.', 'ko': '여러 가지 선택 문제는 교육 기관의 지식 평가, 업무 면접, 오락 테스트와 게임에 광범위하게 응용된다.비록 금세기 초부터 사람들은 자동 또는 반자동적으로 여러 가지 선택문제를 생성하는 것을 연구하기 시작했지만, 대부분의 방법은 한 문장에서 문제를 생성하는 데 중심을 두었다.본 연구는 여러 문장을 바탕으로 한 최신 질문 방법을 소개했다.그것의 영감은 번역 관리 시스템의 번역 메모리 구성 요소에서 사용하는 의미가 비슷하게 일치하는 데서 나온다.단락 유사성 작업에서 doc2vec와 SBERT 두 가지 심도 있는 학습 알고리즘의 성능을 비교하였다.실험은 유럽연합 지역 내의 특설 어료 라이브러리에서 진행되었다.자동 평가를 위해 수동으로 선택한 일치하는 단락으로 구성된 작은 자료 라이브러리를 컴파일했습니다.그 결과 주어진 임무에 문장을 삽입하는 것이 좋은 성능을 지닌 것으로 나타났다.', 'id': 'Pertanyaan pilihan berbilang (MCQ) digunakan secara luas dalam penilaian pengetahuan di institusi pendidikan, selama wawancara kerja, dalam quiz hiburan dan permainan. Meskipun penelitian tentang generasi otomatis atau semi-otomatis objek tes pilihan berbilang telah dilakukan sejak awal millenium ini, kebanyakan pendekatan fokus pada menghasilkan pertanyaan dari satu kalimat. Dalam penelitian ini, metode terbaik untuk menciptakan pertanyaan berdasarkan beberapa kalimat diperkenalkan. Ini diinspirasi oleh persamaan semantis yang digunakan dalam komponen memori terjemahan dari sistem manajemen terjemahan. Performasi dua algoritma belajar dalam, doc2vec dan SBERT, dibandingkan untuk tugas persamaan paragraf. Eksperimen ini dilakukan pada korpus ad hoc dalam daerah EU. Untuk evaluasi otomatis, korpus lebih kecil dari paragraf yang dipilih secara manual telah dikompilasi. The results prove the good performance of Sentence Embeddings for the given task.', 'sw': 'Maswali mengi ya uchaguzi (MCQs) yanatumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa katika tafiti ya maarifa katika taasisi za elimu, wakati wa mahojiano ya kazi, katika michezo na michezo ya burudani. Ingawa utafiti wa uzalishaji wa kujitegemea au wa sekondari wa vitu vinavyochaguliwa viwili vimefanyika tangu mwanzo wa miaka mingi hii, utafiti mwingi unajikita kwenye kutengeneza maswali kutoka kwenye sentensi moja. Katika utafiti huu, utaratibu wa hali ya sanaa wa kutengeneza maswali yanayohusiana na sentensi mbalimbali unaanzishwa. Ilishahamishwa na michezo yanayofanana na kimapenzi yaliyotumiwa katika sehemu ya kumbukumbu ya utafsiri ya mfumo wa utafsiri. The performance of two deep learning algorithms, doc2vec and SBERT, is compared for the paragraph similarity task.  Majaribio hayo yanafanywa kwenye viungo vya hoc ndani ya eneo la Umoja wa Ulaya. Kwa uchunguzi wa kujitegemea, viungo kidogo vya vipengele vinavyochaguliwa mkono vimekusanyika. Matokeo hayo yanaonyesha ufanisi mzuri wa Mazingira ya Sheria kwa kazi hiyo.', 'fa': 'سوالات چندین انتخاب (MCQs) در ارزیابی علمی در موسسات آموزش، در طول مصاحبه های کار، در کویز های سرگرمی و بازی استفاده می\u200cشوند. اگرچه تحقیقات روی نسل\u200cهای آزمایش\u200cهای چندین انتخاب خودکار یا نیمه\u200cاتوماتیک از آغاز این هزار ساله انجام شده است، بیشترین نزدیک\u200cها روی تولید سوالات از یک جمله تمرکز می\u200cکنند. در این تحقیقات، یک روش ایالت هنری برای ایجاد سوالات بر اساس جمله\u200cهای زیادی معرفی می\u200cشود. آن را توسط هماهنگی semantic similarity که در بخش حافظه ترجمه سیستم مدیریت ترجمه استفاده می\u200cشود الهام داده شد. عملکرد دو الگوریتم یادگیری عمیق، doc2vec و SBERT، برای کار شبیه پاراگراف مقایسه می\u200cشود. آزمایش\u200cها در شرکت ad-hoc در دامنۀ اروپا انجام می\u200cشوند. برای ارزیابی خودکار، یک کوچک کوچکتر از نقطه\u200cهای مطابق دستی برگزیده شده است. نتیجه\u200cها ثابت می\u200cکنند عملکرد خوبی از انجمن مجوز برای این کار داده است.', 'hr': 'Višeizborna pitanja (MCQs) se široko koriste u procjeni znanja u obrazovnim institucijama, tijekom radnih intervjua, u zabavnim kvizovima i igrama. Iako je istraživanje o automatskoj ili polu-automatskoj generaciji višeizbornih ispitivanja provedena od početka ovog tisućenija, većina pristupa se fokusira na stvaranje pitanja iz jednog rečenika. U ovom istraživanju se uvodi nacin umjetnosti način stvaranja pitanja na temelju višestrukih rečenica. To je inspirirano semantičkim sličnostima koje se koriste u komponentu prevodnog pamćenja sustava upravljanja prevodom. Učinnost dva algoritma dubokog učenja, doc2vec i SBERT, uspoređuje se za zadatak sličnosti paragrafa. Eksperimenti su provedeni na ad-hoc korpusu u domenu EU-a. Za automatsku procjenu, sastavljen je manji korpus ručno izabranog odgovarajućeg paragrafa. Rezultati dokazuju dobru učinku prikaza za određeni zadatak.', 'af': "Veelvuldige keuse vrae (MCQs) word heeltemal gebruik in kennis-evaluering in onderwys instellings, tydens werk intervjuis, in entertainment quizzes en speletjies. Alhoewel die ondersoek oor die outomatiese of semi-automatiese generasie van veelvuldige keuse toets items is gedoen van die begin van hierdie millenium, is die meeste toegang fokus op die genereer van vrae van 'n enkele seting. In hierdie ondersoek is 'n staat-van-kunstenmetode van die skep van vraagte gebaseer op veelvuldige setinge ingevoer. Dit was inspireer deur semantiese gelykenis ooreenstemmende ooreenstemmings wat gebruik word in die vertaling geheue komponent van vertaling bestuurderstelsels. Die prestasie van twee diep leer algoritme, doc2vec en SBERT, is vergelyk vir die paragraaflikheid taak. Die eksperimente word uitgevoer op die ad-hoc korpus binne die EU domein. Vir die outomatiese evaluering is 'n kleiner korpus van hand gekose ooreenstemmende paragraaf gekompiler. Die resultate bevestig die goeie effektuur van Sentence Embeddings vir die gegewe taak.", 'sq': 'Pyetjet me zgjedhje të shumta (MCQs) përdoren gjerësisht në vlerësimin e njohurive në institucionet arsimore, gjatë intervistave të punës, në quizzes argëtuese dhe lojra. Ndonse kërkimi mbi gjenerimin automatik apo gjysmë-automatik të objekteve të testit me zgjedhje të shumta është kryer që nga fillimi i këtij mijëvjeçari, shumica e qasjeve përqëndrohen në gjenerimin e pyetjeve nga një fjalim i vetëm. Në këtë kërkim, futet një metodë e moderne për krijimin e pyetjeve bazuar në fjalime të shumta. Ishte frymëzuar nga përputhjet semantike të ngjashme të përdorura në përbërjen e kujtesës së përkthimit të sistemeve të menaxhimit të përkthimit. Performanca e dy algoritmave të mësimit të thellë, doc2vec dhe SBERT, krahasohet për detyrën e ngjashmërisë së paragrafit. Eksperimentet kryehen në korpusin ad hoc brenda fushës së BE. For the automatic evaluation, a smaller corpus of manually selected matching paragraphs has been compiled.  Rezultatet provojnë performancën e mirë të Ndërtesave të Dënimeve për detyrën e dhënë.', 'hy': 'Multiple-choice questions (MCQs) are widely used in knowledge assessment in educational institutions, during work interviews, in entertainment quizzes and games.  Չնայած այս հազարամյակի սկզբից հետազոտությունը բազմապատկած ընտրության առարկաների ավտոմատիկ կամ կիսաավտոմատիկ սերունդների մասին է կատարվել, մեծամասնությունը կենտրոնանում է հարցերի ստեղծման վրա մեկ նախադասությունից: Այս հետազոտության մեջ ներկայացվում է ամենաբարձր մեթոդը հարցերի ստեղծման համար, հիմնված բազմաթիվ նախադասությունների վրա: Այն ոգեշնչված էր սեմանտիկ նմանություններից, որոնք օգտագործվում էին թարգմանության ղեկավարման համակարգերի թարգմանման հիշողության բաղադրիչը: Երկու խորը ուսումնասիրության ալգորիթմների, Doc2Վ և SBER, արտադրությունը համեմատում է պարագայում նմանության խնդրի համար: Փորձերը կատարվում են ԱՄՆ-ի ոլորտում գտնվող հատուկ կորպուսի վրա: Ավտոմատիկ գնահատման համար կազմակերպել է ձեռքով ընտրված համեմատական պարբերակների փոքր մարմին: Արդյունքները ապացուցում են դատաստանի ներգրավման լավ արդյունքը տվյալ խնդրի համար:', 'az': 'Çoxlu seçilmiş suallar (MCQs) təhsil qutuqlarında, iş mühbətlərində, əyləncə quizzlərində və oyunlarda elm müqabiliyyətində genişləndirilir. Müxtəlif seçim məsələlərinin otomatik və yarı-otomatik nəsili barəsindəki araştırmalar bu milyonun başlangıcından beri gerçəkləşdirilmiş olsa da, çox yaxınlıqlar tək cümlədən suallar yaratmağa odaqlanır. Bu araştırma içində, çoxlu cümlələrə dayanan suallar yaratmaq məqsədilə müəyyən edilir. Bu, tercümə müdürü sistemlərinin tercümə yaddaşları komponentində istifadə edilən semantik similaritə ilə təşkil edildi. İki derin öyrənmə algoritminin, doc2vec və SBERT performansı paragraflı similaritə işləri üçün salınır. Bu təcrübələr AB domain içində ad-hoc korpusu ilə gerçəklənir. Avtomatik değerlendirmək üçün, əllə seçilmiş paragrafların kiçik bir korpusu kompilaşdırıldı. Sonuçlar verilən işlər üçün Sözlük İfadələrinin yaxşı performansını təsdiqləyir.', 'am': 'የብዙ ምርጫ ጥያቄዎች (MCQ) በተማሪዎች አካባቢዎች፣ የስራ ግንኙነት፣ ድጋፍ እና በጫማዎች ውስጥ እውቀት ማስታወቂያው ማስታወቂያ በተሰፋ ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ከዚህ ዓመታት መጀመሪያ ጀምሮ በብዙ ምርጫ ፈተና ዕቃ ላይ የተፈጸመ ምርጫዎች ቢሆንም እንኳን ብዙዎቹ በአንድ ክፍል ጥያቄዎችን በመፍጠር ላይ ማምለስ ይደረጋሉ፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት፣ በብዙ ደንዳዎች ላይ የተመሳሳይ ጥያቄዎችን ለመፍጠር የሀገር የ-የ-የ-የ-አርጤ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ ትርጉም ማስታወሻ ክፍል በተጠቃሚ ትርጉም ማዕከላዊ ስርዓት ውስጥ በተጠቃሚ ትርጉም ማቀናጃ ክፍል የተደረገ የsemantic ብጤቶች ነው፡፡ የሁለት ጥልቅ ትምህርት መግለጫ፣ doc2vec እና SBERT ጥያቄ በጽሑፍ በሚያስተካከል ስራ ይተካከላል፡፡ ፈተናው በአውሮፓዊ ድምፅ ውስጥ በኦሮፓዊ ድምፅ ውስጥ ነው፡፡ አውቶማቲካዊ ማስታወቂያ፣ እጃቸው የተመረጠው የአካል ክሮፕስ ተቆጥሮአል፡፡ ፍጥረቱም የተሰጠው ስራ የሥርዓት አካባቢዎች የመልካም ማድረግ ያረጋግጣሉ፡፡', 'tr': 'Birnäçe saýlaw soraglary (MCQs) okuwçy gurultaýlarda, iş görüşmelerinde, eğlenç çykyşlarda we oýunlarda bilim çykyşynda köplenç ulanylýar. Ýüzleriň başyndan bäri awtomatik we ýarym-awtomatik sebäpli saýlaw zatlarynyň barlamasynda işlenýän bolsa hem, iň köp sany ýekeje sözleden soraglary döretmäge üns berir. Bu araştyrymda birnäçe sözlere daýanýar soraglary bejermek taryhy görkezildi. Name Iki derin öwrenme algoritmynyň, doc2vek we SBERT-yň başarylygy paragrafyň meňzeşliki işi üçin gurnalýar. Deneyler AB domaýynda ad-hoc korpusda işledildi. Otomatik deňlemek üçin elimden saýlanan paragraflaryň kiçi bir köpüsi döredildi. netijeler berilen zadyň üçin sözlem bilen gowy taýýarlandygyny kanıtlaýar.', 'cs': 'Otázky s více výběrem (MCQ) jsou široce používány při hodnocení znalostí ve vzdělávacích institucích, při pracovních pohovorech, v zábavních kvízech a hrách. Ačkoli výzkum automatické nebo poloautomatické generování testovacích položek s více výběrem probíhá již od začátku tohoto tisíciletí, většina přístupů se zaměřuje na generování otázek z jedné věty. V tomto výzkumu je představena nejmodernější metoda tvorby otázek založených na více větách. Byla inspirována sémantickými shodami podobností používanými v komponentě překladové paměti systémů správy překladu. Pro úlohu podobnosti odstavců je porovnána výkon dvou algoritmů hlubokého učení, doc2vec a SBERT. Experimenty jsou prováděny na ad-hoc korpusu v rámci EU domény. Pro automatické vyhodnocení byl sestaven menší korpus ručně vybraných odstavců. Výsledky dokazují dobrý výkon vět Embeddings pro daný úkol.', 'bn': 'শিক্ষা প্রতিষ্ঠান, কাজের সাক্ষাৎকারের সময়, বিনোদনের প্রশ্ন এবং খেলায় ব্যাপক ব্যবহার করা হয়। যদিও এই হাজারের শুরুর পর থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয় বা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রজন্মের উপর গবেষণা করা হয়েছে, তারপরেও বেশীরভাগ প্রশ্ন তৈরি করা হয়েছে এক বাক্য থেকে প্রশ্ন এই গবেষণায় বেশ কয়েকটি শাস্তি ভিত্তিক প্রশ্ন তৈরি করার একটি রাষ্ট্রীয়-শিল্পের পদ্ধতি পরিচালনা করা হয়েছে। অনুবাদ ব্যবস্থাপনা সিস্টেমের মেমরি অংশে ব্যবহৃত সেমেন্টিক সমতামূলক ম্যাচের দ্বারা এটি অনুপ্রাণিত করেছে। দুই গভীর শিক্ষার অ্যালগরিদম, ডক্ট২ভেক এবং এসবের্টের প্রদর্শনীর তুলনায় প্যারাফের্কের একই কাজের তুলনায়। ইউরোপিয়ান ডোমেইনের মধ্যে বিজ্ঞাপনের কোর্পাসে এই পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে। স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মূল্যায়নের জন্য, হাতে নির্বাচিত মিল্টি প্যারাফেসের একটি ছোট কোর্পাস কপিউট করা হয়েছে। এর ফলাফল প্রমাণ করে দেয়া হয়েছে শাস্তির দূর্ঘটনার ভালো প্রদর্শন।', 'bs': 'Višeizborna pitanja (MCQs) se široko koriste u procjeni znanja u obrazovnim institucijama, tijekom radnih intervjua, u zabavnim kvizovima i igrama. Iako je istraživanje o automatskoj ili polu-automatskoj generaciji višeizbornih testova provedena od početka ovog tisućenija, većina pristupa se fokusira na stvaranje pitanja iz jednog rečenika. U ovom istraživanju se predstavlja nacin umjetnosti način stvaranja pitanja na temelju višestrukih rečenica. To je inspirisano semantičkim sličnostima koje se koriste u komponentu memorije prevođenja sustava upravljanja prevođenjem. Izvrsnost dva algoritma dubokog učenja, doc2vec i SBERT, uspoređuje se za zadatak sličnosti paragrafa. Eksperimenti su provedeni na ad-hoc korpusu u domenu EU. Za automatsku procjenu, sastavljen je manji korpus ručno odabranog odgovarajućeg paragrafa. Rezultati dokazuju dobru izvršnost sudskih uloga za određeni zadatak.', 'fi': 'Monivalintakysymyksiä (MCQ) käytetään laajasti tiedon arvioinnissa oppilaitoksissa, työhaastatteluissa, viihdetietokilpailuissa ja peleissä. Vaikka tutkimusta monivalintatestien automaattisesta tai puoliautomaattisesta generoinnista on tehty tämän vuosituhannen alusta lähtien, useimmat lähestymistavat keskittyvät kysymysten tuottamiseen yhdestä lauseesta. Tässä tutkimuksessa esitellään uusin tapa luoda kysymyksiä moniin lauseisiin perustuen. Se on saanut inspiraationsa käännösten hallintajärjestelmien käännösmuistikomponentissa käytetyistä semanttisista samankaltaisuusvastaavuuksista. Kappaleiden samankaltaisuustehtävän osalta vertaillaan kahden syväoppimisen algoritmin, doc2vec ja SBERT, suorituskykyä. Kokeet tehdään ad hoc -korpusella EU:n alueella. Automaattista arviointia varten on koottu pienempi kokoelma manuaalisesti valittuja vastaavia kappaleita. Tulokset osoittavat, että Sentence Embeddings on hyvä suoritus tietyssä tehtävässä.', 'ca': "Les preguntes de múltiples opcions (MCQs) s'utilitzen ampliament en la valoració del coneixement en institucions educatives, durant entrevistes de treball, en quizzes d'entreteniment i jocs. Tot i que la recerca sobre la generació automàtica o semiautomàtica d'objectes de prova d'elecció múltiple s'ha fet des del començament d'aquest mileni, la majoria d'abords s'centren en generar preguntes d'una sola frase. En aquesta recerca s'introdueix un mètode més avançat de crear preguntes basats en múltiples frases. Va inspirar-se en comparacions semàntiques de similitud utilitzades en el component de memòria de traducció dels sistemes de gestió de traducció. El rendiment de dos algoritmes d'aprenentatge profund, doc2vec i SBERT, es compara per a la tasca de similitud del paràgraf. Els experiments es fan en el cos ad hoc dins el domini de la UE. Per a l'evaluació automàtica, s'ha compilat un corpus més petit de paràgrafs que s'ajusten manualment. The results prove the good performance of Sentence Embeddings for the given task.", 'et': 'Mitme valikuga küsimusi (MCQ) kasutatakse laialdaselt teadmiste hindamisel haridusasutustes, tööintervjuudel, meelelahutuslikes viktoriinides ja mängudes. Kuigi mitme valikuga katseseadmete automaatset või poolautomaatset genereerimist on uuritud juba aastatuhande algusest, keskendub enamik lähenemisviise küsimuste tekitamisele ühest lausest. Käesolevas uurimistöös tutvustatakse kaasaegset meetodit küsimuste loomiseks mitme lause alusel. Seda inspireerisid semantilised sarnasused, mida kasutati tõlkehaldussüsteemide tõlkemälu komponendis. Lõike sarnasuse ülesande puhul võrreldakse kahe sügavõppe algoritmi doc2vec ja SBERT jõudlust. Katsed tehakse ad hoc korpusega ELi valdkonnas. Automaatseks hindamiseks on koostatud väiksem korpus käsitsi valitud sobivatest lõikudest. Tulemused tõestavad lausepõimimiste head tulemust antud ülesande jaoks.', 'he': 'Multiple-choice questions (MCQs) are widely used in knowledge assessment in educational institutions, during work interviews, in entertainment quizzes and games.  Although the research on the automatic or semi-automatic generation of multiple-choice test items has been conducted since the beginning of this millennium, most approaches focus on generating questions from a single sentence.  במחקר הזה, הוציאה שיטה חדשה לייצור שאלות מבוססת על משפטים רבים. הוא הושפע על ידי התאמות סמנטיות שנמשכות ברכיב זיכרון התרגום של מערכות ניהול התרגום. ביצועים של שני אלגוריתמים למידה עמוקה, doc2vec וסBERT, משוואים למשימה של דמיון פראגמה. הניסויים מתבצעים על הקורפוס האדהוק בתחום האירופה. עבור הערכה האוטומטית, קבוצה קטנה יותר של פרגים מתאימים שנבחרו ידנית. התוצאות מוכיחות את ההופעה הטובה של התקנות גזרים למשימה הנתונה.', 'ha': 'Sura masu yawa masu zãɓi (MCQs) ana amfani da su widely a cikin hakarin ilmi a cikin masu shiryuwa, a lokacin muhimman aikin, a cikin masu yin bushãra da gamuwa. Haƙĩƙa, an yi karatun fitina kan ƙanshi na-farat ko farat-farat-farat ɗaya wa abubuwa masu jarraba ko-ƙari, daga fara shekarar wannan shẽkaru, masu ƙaranci masu kallo na fokus a kan ka sami masu tambayar daga wata magana guda. A cikin wannan research, an introduce wani halin-na-art na ƙiƙira masu tambayar a kan da aka bincike masu yawa. @ info: whatsthis Farawa biyu na algoritori masu ƙari da aka sani, Doc2ve da SBERT, aka daidaita zuwa aikin Paragrani daidaici. The experiments are performed on the ad-hoc corpus within the EU domain.  @ action: button Mataimakin ta gaskata mafiya kyautar aikin da aka ba da aikin da aka ba.', 'sk': 'Vprašanja z več izbirami (MCQ) se pogosto uporabljajo pri ocenjevanju znanja v izobraževalnih ustanovah, med delovnimi intervjuji, v zabavnih kvizih in igrah. Čeprav se raziskave avtomatske ali polavtomatske generije testnih elementov z več izbirami izvajajo od začetka tega tisočletja, se večina pristopov osredotoča na ustvarjanje vprašanj iz enega samega stavka. V raziskavi je predstavljena najsodobnejša metoda ustvarjanja vprašanj na podlagi več stavkov. Navdihnil ga je semantična podobnost, ki se uporablja v komponenti prevajalskega pomnilnika sistemov za upravljanje prevodov. Učinkovitost dveh algoritmov globokega učenja, doc2vec in SBERT, se primerja za nalogo podobnosti odstavkov. Poskusi se izvajajo na ad hoc korpusu znotraj področja EU. Za samodejno vrednotenje je bil sestavljen manjši korpus ročno izbranih ujemajočih se odstavkov. Rezultati dokazujejo dobro uspešnost vdelav stavkov za dano opravilo.', 'bo': "སྣ་གདམ་ཀྱི་འདྲི་ཚིག་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཤེས་ཡོན་པའི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་གྲངས་བསྐུལ་སྐབས་སུ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ། Although the research on the automatic or semi-automatic generation of multiple choice test items has been conducted since the beginning of this millennium, most approaches focus on generating questions from a single sentence. འཚོལ་ཞིབ་འདི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་ཚན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བཀག་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱུང་བ་རེད། It was inspired by semantic similarity matches used in the translation memory component of translation management systems. Doc2vec ve SBERT'ın derin öğrenme algorithmlerin performansı iki tane... ...paragraf similaritāte görevlerinde uygulanmıştır. སྒེར་ཞུང་དག་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཨུ་རིའི་ཁྱིམ་ཚང་གི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་དག་པར་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ལག་བཟོས་བདམས་ཟིན་པའི་ཚོང་ཁག་ཞིག་བསྒྲིག་ཚར་བ གནད་སྡུད་འབྲས་བ་ནི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྣམ་པ་ལྟ་སྟངས་དགའ་པོ་ཡོད་པས།", 'jv': 'Pilihan langgar-pilihan (M.CK) kang dipunangé kanggo ngerasahan kelalen karo institusi ingkang dipuwiran, nang karbot ingkang karbot, nganggo dolanan sing kelas karo dolanan sing kelas. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang barêng-barêng iki, akeh stad-of-the-arts kuwi nggawe question kang supoyo supoyatan kanggo ngerasakno. Rasané Panjenengan langgar sampeyan semantar Jejaring Dengan ujaran ono langkung wigatinipun gadoh-Hoc karo seni nggambar ning panjenengan UE For the auto-assertion Pametuné wis ngerasai kapan kelas barang kelas Sentensi kanggo nggawe task sing wis ana.'}
{'en': 'Does local pruning offer task-specific models to learn effectively?', 'ar': 'هل يقدم التقليم المحلي نماذج خاصة بالمهمة للتعلم بفعالية؟', 'es': '¿La poda local ofrece modelos específicos para cada tarea para aprender eficazmente?', 'fr': "L'élagage local propose-t-il des modèles spécifiques aux tâches pour apprendre efficacement\xa0?", 'pt': 'A poda local oferece modelos específicos de tarefas para aprender de forma eficaz?', 'ja': 'ローカル剪定は、効果的に学習するためのタスク固有のモデルを提供していますか？', 'zh': '局剪供特定于任事者,以效学乎?', 'ru': 'Предлагает ли местная обрезка конкретные модели для эффективного обучения?', 'hi': 'क्या स्थानीय छंटाई प्रभावी ढंग से सीखने के लिए कार्य-विशिष्ट मॉडल प्रदान करती है?', 'ga': 'An dtugann bearradh áitiúil múnlaí tasc-shonracha chun foghlaim go héifeachtach?', 'ka': 'ლოკალური კონფიგურაციის მოდელები ეფექტურად სწავლას?', 'el': 'Το τοπικό κλάδεμα προσφέρει ειδικά μοντέλα εργασίας για να μάθεις αποτελεσματικά;', 'hu': 'A helyi metszés feladatspecifikus modelleket kínál a hatékony tanuláshoz?', 'it': 'La potatura locale offre modelli specifici per attività per imparare in modo efficace?', 'kk': 'Жергілікті тапсырманың ерекше үлгілерін оқытуға мүмкін емес пе?', 'lt': 'Does local pruning offer task-specific models to learn effectively ?', 'mk': 'Дали локалното исцепување нуди модели специфични за задачи за ефикасно учење?', 'ms': 'Adakah pemotongan setempat menawarkan model khusus tugas untuk belajar secara efektif?', 'ml': 'പ്രാദേശിക പ്രശ്നമുള്ള ജോലിയുടെ പ്രത്യേക മോഡലുകള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ടോ?', 'mn': 'Орон нутгийн пронинг ажлын тодорхой загваруудыг үр дүнтэй суралцах боломжтой юу?', 'mt': 'Il-pruning lokali joffri mudelli speċifiċi għall-kompiti biex jitgħallmu b’mod effettiv?', 'ro': 'Tăierea locală oferă modele specifice sarcinilor pentru a învăța eficient?', 'pl': 'Czy lokalne przycinanie oferuje modele specyficzne dla konkretnych zadań, aby skutecznie uczyć się?', 'no': 'Går det lokale oppgåvespesifikke modeller å lære effektivt?', 'sr': 'Da li lokalna pružanja nudi specijalne modele da uče efikasno?', 'so': 'Ma waxyaabaha lagu barto qaab faa’iido ah?', 'ur': 'کیا محلی پرینگ کام کے مطابق سیکھنے کے لئے مطابق مشخص موڈل پیش کرتا ہے؟', 'si': 'ස්ථානික ප්\u200dරින්සින් විශේෂ විශේෂ විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන්ද?', 'sv': 'Erbjuder lokal beskärning uppgiftsspecifika modeller för att lära sig effektivt?', 'ta': 'உள்ளூர் புலங்கள் பணிக்குறிப்பிட்ட மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டுமா?', 'uz': '@ info', 'vi': 'Liệu sự cắt tỉa địa phương có thể cung cấp các mô hình đặc nhiệm?', 'nl': 'Biedt lokaal snoeien taakspecifieke modellen om effectief te leren?', 'da': 'Tilbyder lokal beskæring opgavespecifikke modeller til at lære effektivt?', 'bg': 'Предлага ли локалното подрязване специфични за задачата модели за ефективно учене?', 'hr': 'Da li lokalno pružanje ponudi određene modele za zadatak učiti efektivno?', 'id': 'Apakah pruning lokal menawarkan model spesifik tugas untuk belajar secara efektif?', 'de': 'Bietet der lokale Schnitt aufgabenspezifische Modelle, um effektiv zu lernen?', 'ko': '부분 편집은 효과적인 학습 임무의 특정 모델을 제공합니까?', 'sw': 'Je, maarifa ya ndani yanatoa mifano maalum ya kazi ili kujifunza kwa ufanisi?', 'tr': 'Ýerli akyllyk işi takyk nusgalary efekt öwrenmek üçin teklip edýärmi?', 'fa': 'آیا مدل\u200cهای مشخص کار محلی را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد تا موثرت یاد بگیرند؟', 'sq': 'A ofron pruning lokal modele specifike për detyrat për të mësuar efektivisht?', 'af': 'Doen plaaslike pruning offer task-specific models to learn effectively ?', 'am': 'የአገራዊ ማቀናጃ የሥርዓት-ምርጫዎችን በጥቅም ለመማር ያቀርባልን?', 'az': 'Məgər yerli pruning öyrənmək üçün müəyyən edilmiş modellər təklif edir ?', 'hy': 'Does local pruning offer task-specific models to learn effectively ?', 'cs': 'Nabízí lokální prořezávání modely specifické pro úkoly, aby se efektivně učili?', 'ca': 'El pruning local ofereix models específics per aprendre eficaçment?', 'bs': 'Da li lokalna pružanja nudi specijalne modele za zadatak da uče efikasno?', 'bn': 'স্থানীয় বুদ্ধিমান কি কার্যকর কাজ-নির্দিষ্ট মডেল প্রদান করে?', 'fi': 'Tarjoaako paikallinen karsinta tehtäväkohtaisia malleja tehokkaaseen oppimiseen?', 'et': 'Kas kohalik lõikamine pakub ülesandepõhiseid mudeleid tõhusaks õppimiseks?', 'sk': 'Ali lokalno obrezovanje ponuja specifične modele za učinkovito učenje?', 'jv': 'Visual', 'ha': 'Shin, taɓa wa lokacin na ƙayyade misãlai masu yin aiki da zai iya amfani da aiki mai inganci?', 'bo': 'ས་གནས་ནས་དབྱིན་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྡན་དམིགས་ཅན་གྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་དམིགས་ཡོད་སམ།', 'he': 'האם טיפול מקומי מציע דוגמנים מסויימים למשימה ללמוד באופן יעיל?'}
{'en': 'The need to deploy large-scale pre-trained models on edge devices under limited computational resources has led to substantial research to compress these large models. However, less attention has been given to compress the task-specific models. In this work, we investigate the different methods of unstructured pruning on task-specific models for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) tasks. Specifically, we analyze differences in the learning dynamics of pruned models by using the standard pruning techniques to achieve high-performing sparse networks. We develop a hypothesis to demonstrate the effectiveness of local pruning over global pruning considering a simple CNN model. Later, we utilize the hypothesis to demonstrate the efficacy of the pruned state-of-the-art model compared to the over-parameterized state-of-the-art model under two settings, the first considering the baselines for the same task used for generating the hypothesis, i.e., aspect extraction and the second considering a different task, i.e., sentiment analysis. We also provide discussion related to the generalization of the pruning hypothesis.', 'ar': 'أدت الحاجة إلى نشر نماذج مدربة مسبقًا على نطاق واسع على الأجهزة المتطورة في ظل موارد حسابية محدودة إلى إجراء بحث كبير لضغط هذه النماذج الكبيرة. ومع ذلك ، فقد تم إيلاء اهتمام أقل لضغط النماذج الخاصة بالمهمة. في هذا العمل ، نتحرى الطرق المختلفة للتقليم غير المنظم في النماذج الخاصة بالمهمة لمهام تحليل المشاعر المستندة إلى الجانب (ABSA). على وجه التحديد ، نقوم بتحليل الاختلافات في ديناميكيات التعلم للنماذج المشذبة باستخدام تقنيات التقليم القياسية لتحقيق شبكات متفرقة عالية الأداء. نقوم بتطوير فرضية لإثبات فعالية التقليم المحلي على التقليم العالمي مع الأخذ في الاعتبار نموذج CNN البسيط. في وقت لاحق ، استخدمنا الفرضية لإثبات فعالية النموذج الحديث المشذب مقارنةً بالنموذج الحديث ذي المعلمات الزائدة تحت إعدادين ، الأول يأخذ بعين الاعتبار الخطوط الأساسية لنفس المهمة المستخدمة في إنشاء الفرضية ، أي استخراج الجانب والثاني النظر في مهمة مختلفة ، أي تحليل المشاعر. كما نقدم مناقشة تتعلق بتعميم فرضية التقليم.', 'pt': 'A necessidade de implantar modelos pré-treinados em larga escala em dispositivos de borda com recursos computacionais limitados levou a pesquisas substanciais para compactar esses grandes modelos. No entanto, menos atenção tem sido dada para comprimir os modelos específicos de tarefa. Neste trabalho, investigamos os diferentes métodos de poda não estruturada em modelos específicos de tarefas para tarefas de Análise de Sentimento Baseada em Aspectos (ABSA). Especificamente, analisamos as diferenças na dinâmica de aprendizado de modelos podados usando as técnicas de poda padrão para obter redes esparsas de alto desempenho. Desenvolvemos uma hipótese para demonstrar a eficácia da poda local sobre a poda global considerando um modelo CNN simples. Posteriormente, utilizamos a hipótese para demonstrar a eficácia do modelo de última geração podado em comparação com o modelo de última geração superparametrizado em duas configurações, a primeira considerando as linhas de base para a mesma tarefa usada para gerando a hipótese, ou seja, extração de aspecto e a segunda considerando uma tarefa diferente, ou seja, análise de sentimento. Também fornecemos discussão relacionada à generalização da hipótese de poda.', 'fr': "La nécessité de déployer des modèles pré-entraînés à grande échelle sur des appareils périphériques avec des ressources informatiques limitées a conduit à des recherches approfondies pour compresser ces grands modèles. Cependant, moins d'attention a été accordée à la compression des modèles spécifiques aux tâches. Dans ce travail, nous étudions les différentes méthodes d'élagage non structuré sur des modèles spécifiques aux tâches pour les tâches ABSA (Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis). Plus précisément, nous analysons les différences dans la dynamique d'apprentissage des modèles élagués en utilisant les techniques d'élagage standard pour obtenir des réseaux épars très performants. Nous développons une hypothèse pour démontrer l'efficacité de l'élagage local par rapport à l'élagage global en utilisant un modèle CNN simple. Plus tard, nous utilisons l'hypothèse pour démontrer l'efficacité du modèle de pointe élagué par rapport au modèle de pointe surparamétré selon deux paramètres, le premier tenant compte des lignes de base pour la même tâche utilisée pour générer l'hypothèse, c'est-à-dire l'extraction d'aspect et le second envisager une tâche différente, c'est-à-dire l'analyse des sentiments. Nous discutons également de la généralisation de l'hypothèse de l'élagage.", 'es': 'La necesidad de implementar modelos preentrenados a gran escala en dispositivos perimetrales con recursos computacionales limitados ha llevado a una investigación sustancial para comprimir estos modelos de gran tamaño. Sin embargo, se ha prestado menos atención a la compresión de los modelos específicos de la tarea. En este trabajo, investigamos los diferentes métodos de poda no estructurada en modelos específicos de tareas para tareas de análisis de sentimiento basado en aspectos (ABSA). Específicamente, analizamos las diferencias en la dinámica de aprendizaje de los modelos podados mediante el uso de las técnicas de poda estándar para lograr redes dispersas de alto rendimiento. Desarrollamos una hipótesis para demostrar la eficacia de la poda local sobre la poda global considerando un modelo simple de CNN. Más adelante, utilizamos la hipótesis para demostrar la eficacia del modelo de vanguardia podado en comparación con el modelo de vanguardia sobreparametrizado en dos escenarios, el primero considerando las líneas de base para la misma tarea utilizada para generar la hipótesis, es decir, la extracción de aspecto y el segundo considerar una tarea diferente, es decir, el análisis de sentimientos. También ofrecemos una discusión relacionada con la generalización de la hipótesis de la poda.', 'ja': '限られた計算リソースの下でエッジデバイスに大規模な事前訓練済みモデルを展開する必要性は、これらの大規模モデルを圧縮するための実質的な研究につながった。 しかし、タスク固有のモデルを圧縮することにはあまり注意が払われていない。 本研究では、Aspect - based Sentiment Analysis （ ABSA ）タスクのタスク固有モデルに対する非構造化枝刈りのさまざまな方法を検討します。 具体的には、標準的な剪定技術を用いて、高性能のまばらなネットワークを実現することにより、剪定されたモデルの学習ダイナミクスの違いを分析する。 私たちは、単純なCNNモデルを考慮して、グローバル枝刈りに対するローカル枝刈りの有効性を実証するための仮説を開発します。 後に、我々は、仮説を利用して、２つの設定の下で過度にパラメータ化された最先端モデルと比較して、剪定された最先端モデルの有効性を実証し、第１の設定は、仮説の生成に使用される同じタスク、すなわち、アスペクト抽出のためのベースラインを考慮し、第２の設定は、異なるタスク、すなわち、感情分析を考慮する。 また、枝刈り仮説の一般化に関する議論も行っている。', 'hi': 'सीमित कम्प्यूटेशनल संसाधनों के तहत किनारे उपकरणों पर बड़े पैमाने पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल तैनात करने की आवश्यकता ने इन बड़े मॉडलों को संपीड़ित करने के लिए पर्याप्त शोध किया है। हालांकि, कार्य-विशिष्ट मॉडल को संपीड़ित करने के लिए कम ध्यान दिया गया है। इस काम में, हम पहलू-आधारित भावना विश्लेषण (ABSA) कार्यों के लिए कार्य-विशिष्ट मॉडल पर असंरचित छंटाई के विभिन्न तरीकों की जांच करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम उच्च प्रदर्शन विरल नेटवर्क प्राप्त करने के लिए मानक छंटाई तकनीकों का उपयोग करके छंटाई किए गए मॉडल की सीखने की गतिशीलता में अंतर का विश्लेषण करते हैं। हम एक सरल सीएनएन मॉडल पर विचार करते हुए वैश्विक छंटाई पर स्थानीय छंटाई की प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करने के लिए एक परिकल्पना विकसित करते हैं। बाद में, हम दो सेटिंग्स के तहत ओवर-पैरामीटराइज्ड स्टेट-ऑफ-द-आर्ट मॉडल की तुलना में छंटनी किए गए अत्याधुनिक मॉडल की प्रभावकारिता को प्रदर्शित करने के लिए परिकल्पना का उपयोग करते हैं, पहला परिकल्पना उत्पन्न करने के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले एक ही कार्य के लिए बेसलाइन पर विचार करता है, यानी, पहलू निष्कर्षण और दूसरा एक अलग कार्य पर विचार करते हुए, यानी, भावना विश्लेषण। हम छंटाई परिकल्पना के सामान्यीकरण से संबंधित चर्चा भी प्रदान करते हैं।', 'zh': '有限之计算资源,须于边缘上大设训练,以致大压缩。 然压缩特定于事者少。 于此之事,究情析(ABSA)务特定非结构化剪之异术也。 凡剪法析形,以成高性能疏网络。 开一假设,以证局剪相对之有效性,虑一简之CNN。 其后假设以验二者,比参数化之最新,剪之最先进者有效性,一虑生成假设之基线,即事取之,二虑不同者,情析也。 我们还给了与修剪假设的推广相关的议论。', 'ru': 'Необходимость развертывания крупномасштабных предварительно обученных моделей на периферийных устройствах при ограниченных вычислительных ресурсах привела к существенным исследованиям для сжатия этих крупных моделей. Однако меньшее внимание уделяется сжатию конкретных моделей задач. В этой работе мы исследуем различные методы неструктурированной обрезки на конкретных моделях задач для анализа настроений на основе аспектов (ABSA). В частности, мы анализируем различия в динамике обучения обрезанных моделей, используя стандартные методы обрезки для достижения высокопроизводительных разреженных сетей. Мы разрабатываем гипотезу, чтобы продемонстрировать эффективность локальной обрезки по сравнению с глобальной обрезкой с учетом простой модели CNN. Позже мы используем гипотезу, чтобы продемонстрировать эффективность обрезанной современной модели по сравнению с сверхпараметризированной современной моделью при двух настройках, первая из которых рассматривает базовые линии для той же задачи, используемой для генерации гипотезы, то есть извлечение аспекта, а вторая - другую задачу, то есть анализ настроений. Мы также приводим обсуждение, связанное с обобщением гипотезы обрезки.', 'ga': 'Mar gheall ar an ngá atá le samhlacha réamhoilte ar scála mór a imscaradh ar fheistí imeallacha faoi acmhainní teoranta ríomhaireachtúla, rinneadh taighde substaintiúil chun na samhlacha móra seo a chomhbhrú. Mar sin féin, níor tugadh aird níos lú ar na samhlacha tasc-shonracha a chomhbhrú. San obair seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar na modhanna éagsúla bearradh neamhstruchtúrtha ar mhúnlaí tasc-shonracha do thascanna Anailís Mothúchán Bunaithe ar Ghné (ABSA). Go sonrach, déanaimid anailís ar dhifríochtaí i ndinimic foghlama na múnlaí bearrtha trí úsáid a bhaint as na teicníochtaí caighdeánacha bearradh chun líonraí tearca ardfheidhmíochta a bhaint amach. Forbraímid hipitéis chun éifeachtúlacht bearradh áitiúil thar bhearradh domhanda a léiriú ag smaoineamh ar shamhail shimplí CNN. Níos déanaí, bainimid úsáid as an hipitéis chun éifeachtúlacht an mhúnla úrscothach pruned a léiriú i gcomparáid leis an tsamhail stát-de-aimseartha ró-pharaiméadair faoi dhá shuíomh, agus an chéad cheann ag smaoineamh ar na bonnlínte don tasc céanna a úsáidtear le haghaidh ag giniúint na hipitéise, i.e., eastóscadh gné agus an dara ceann ag smaoineamh ar thasc difriúil, i.e., anailís meoin. Cuirimid plé ar fáil freisin a bhaineann le ginearálú na hipitéise bearradh.', 'el': 'Η ανάγκη ανάπτυξης μεγάλης κλίμακας προ-εκπαιδευμένων μοντέλων σε συσκευές ακρής με περιορισμένους υπολογιστικούς πόρους έχει οδηγήσει σε ουσιαστική έρευνα για τη συμπίεση αυτών των μεγάλων μοντέλων. Ωστόσο, έχει δοθεί λιγότερη προσοχή στη συμπίεση των συγκεκριμένων προτύπων εργασίας. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε τις διαφορετικές μεθόδους του μη δομημένου κλαδέματος σε ειδικά μοντέλα εργασίας για εργασίες ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων με βάση την πτυχή (ABSA). Συγκεκριμένα, αναλύουμε τις διαφορές στη μαθησιακή δυναμική των κλαδευμένων μοντέλων χρησιμοποιώντας τις τυποποιημένες τεχνικές κλαδέματος για την επίτευξη υψηλών επιδόσεων αραίων δικτύων. Αναπτύσσουμε μια υπόθεση για να καταδείξουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του τοπικού κλαδέματος έναντι του παγκόσμιου κλαδέματος λαμβάνοντας υπόψη ένα απλό μοντέλο ΚΝΝ. Αργότερα, χρησιμοποιούμε την υπόθεση για να αποδείξουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του κλαδευμένου μοντέλου τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε σύγκριση με το υπερπαραμετροποιημένο μοντέλο τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε δύο ρυθμίσεις, το πρώτο εξετάζει τις γραμμές βάσης για την ίδια εργασία που χρησιμοποιείται για την παραγωγή της υπόθεσης, δηλαδή την εξαγωγή πτυχών και το δεύτερο εξετάζει μια διαφορετική εργασία, δηλαδή την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων. Επίσης, παρέχουμε συζήτηση σχετικά με τη γενίκευση της υπόθεσης κλαδέματος.', 'hu': 'A nagyméretű, előre képzett modellek élvonalbeli eszközökön történő telepítésének szükségessége korlátozott számítási erőforrások mellett jelentős kutatásokhoz vezetett e nagyméretű modellek tömörítésére. Kevesebb figyelmet fordítottak azonban a feladatspecifikus modellek tömörítésére. Ebben a munkában a strukturálatlan metszés különböző módszereit vizsgáljuk Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) feladatspecifikus modelleken. Konkrétan elemezzük a metszett modellek tanulási dinamikájának különbségeit a szabványos metszési technikák alkalmazásával a nagy teljesítményű ritka hálózatok eléréséhez. Egy egyszerű CNN modellt figyelembe véve kidolgozunk egy hipotézist, amely bemutatja a helyi metszés hatékonyságát a globális metszéssel szemben. Később a hipotézist arra használjuk fel, hogy bemutassuk a metszett korszerű modell hatékonyságát a túlparaméterizált korszerű modellhez képest két beállításban, az első a hipotézis létrehozásához használt feladat alapjait, azaz aspektextrakciót, a második pedig egy másik feladatot, azaz sentiment elemzést. A metszési hipotézis általánosításával kapcsolatos vitákat is tartunk.', 'it': "La necessità di implementare modelli pre-formati su larga scala su dispositivi edge con risorse computazionali limitate ha portato a ricerche sostanziali per comprimere questi modelli di grandi dimensioni. Tuttavia, è stata prestata meno attenzione alla compressione dei modelli specifici per attività. In questo lavoro, esaminiamo i diversi metodi di potatura non strutturata su modelli task-specific per le attività di analisi dei sentimenti basate su aspetti (ABSA). Nello specifico, analizziamo le differenze nelle dinamiche di apprendimento dei modelli potati utilizzando le tecniche di potatura standard per ottenere reti sparse ad alte prestazioni. Sviluppiamo un'ipotesi per dimostrare l'efficacia della potatura locale rispetto alla potatura globale considerando un semplice modello CNN. Successivamente, utilizziamo l'ipotesi per dimostrare l'efficacia del modello di stato dell'arte potato rispetto al modello di stato dell'arte sovraparametrizzato in due impostazioni, la prima considerando le linee di base per lo stesso compito utilizzato per generare l'ipotesi, cioè l'estrazione degli aspetti e la seconda considerando un compito diverso, cioè l'analisi del sentiment. Forniamo anche discussioni relative alla generalizzazione dell'ipotesi di potatura.", 'lt': 'Būtinybė įdiegti didelio masto išankstinio mokymo modelius krašto prietaisuose, naudojant ribotus skaičiavimo išteklius, lėmė didelius mokslinius tyrimus šiems dideliems modeliams suspausti. However, less attention has been given to compress the task-specific models.  Šiame darbe tiriame skirtingus nestruktūrizuoto apvalymo metodus, taikomus uždaviniams būdingiems modeliams, taikomiems pagal aspektus grindžiamai jautrumo analizei (ABSA) atliekamoms užduotims. Konkrečiai analizuojame susmulkintų modelių mokymosi dinamikos skirtumus naudojant standartinius susmulkinimo metodus, kad būtų sukurti aukšto lygio spartūs tinklai. We develop a hypothesis to demonstrate the effectiveness of local pruning over global pruning considering a simple CNN model.  Vėliau naudojame hipotezę, kad įrodytume, kaip veiksmingas susmulkintas moderniausias modelis, palyginti su pernelyg parametrizuotu moderniausiu modeliu dviejuose nustatymuose, pirmą kartą svarstant bazines tas pačias užduotis, naudojamas hipotezei sukurti, t. y. aspektų i štraukimui, ir antrą kartą svarstant kitą užduotį, t. y. jausmų analizę. Taip pat rengiame diskusijas, susijusias su plaukiojimo hipotezės generalizavimu.', 'kk': 'Бұл үлкен үлкен моделдерді шектелген компьютерлік ресурстардың шектелген шектеу құрылғыларының шектеу үшін үлкен өзгертілген үлкен үлгілерін түсіру керек. Бірақ тапсырманың ерекше үлгілерін сығыру үшін қызықтық болды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) тапсырмаларының құрылмаған тапсырмалар үлгілерінде құрылмаған әртүрлі әдістерді зерттеп отырмыз. Ескерілікті, біз өзгертілген моделдердің оқыту динамикасының айырмашылығын бақылаймыз. Стандартты бақылау техникаларын қолдану үшін, жоғары жұмыс желілерін жеткізу үші Біз жұмыс CNN үлгісін қарапайым көрсету үшін жергілікті бақылау әрекетін көрсету үшін гипотезасын жасаймыз. Кейін, біз гипотезаны екі баптаулар астындағы параметрлердің күйінің эффектілігін көрсету үшін, бірінші гипотезаны құру үшін қолданылатын бір тапсырманың негізгі жолдарын көрсету үшін қолданып, т.е. аспекті тарқату және екінші тапсырманы басқа тапсырманы, т.е. сезімдік анали Мұндай-ақ бұл гипотезаның жалпы жалпы түрлендірімізге қатынас бар.', 'mk': 'Потребноста да се распоредуваат големи предобучени модели на работните уреди под ограничени компјутерски ресурси доведе до значително истражување за компресирање на овие големи модели. Сепак, помалку внимание е дадено на компресирањето на моделите специфични за задачите. Во оваа работа, ги истражуваме различните методи на неструктурирано исцепување на модели специфични за задачите за аспектна анализа на чувствата (АБСА). Специфично, ги анализираме разликите во динамиката на учењето на скриени модели со користење на стандардните техники на скривање за постигнување високо-резултатни ниски мрежи. Развиваме хипотеза за да ја демонстрираме ефективноста на локалното прскање над глобалното прскање со оглед на едноставен модел на СНН. Подоцна, ја искористуваме хипотезата за да ја демонстрираме ефикасноста на моделот на најновиот модел во споредба со моделот на најновиот модел под две поставувања, првиот разгледувајќи ги основните линии за истата задача што се користи за генерирање на хипотезата, т.е., екстракција на аспектот и вториот разгледувајќи различна задача, т.е., анализа на чув Ние, исто така, обезбедуваме дискусија поврзана со генерализацијата на хипотезата за прскање.', 'ml': 'പരിശീലനിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് വലിയ വലിയ സ്കേല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലനിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കേണ്ടതാണ് ഈ വലിയ മോ എന്നാലും, ജോലി പ്രത്യേകിച്ച മോഡലുകള്\u200d ചുരുക്കുവാന്\u200d കുറച്ച് ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ആസ്പെക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സെന്റിമെന്റ് അനാലസിസ് (ABSA) ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. മോഡലുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു.  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ലോക്കല്\u200d ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയുടെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി ലോക്കല്\u200d  പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റീസിസ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ട് സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കീഴില്\u200d മാത്രം പരാമീറ്റപ്പെടുത്തിയ രാജ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിക്കുന്നതിന് വേറെയൊരു ജോലിയുടെ പ്രഭാവം  ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയുടെ ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റിയുടെ ജനറലേഷന്\u200d സംബന്ധിച്ചുള്ള സംസാരം നമ്മളും നല്\u200dകുന്നു.', 'ka': 'უნდა გამოყენება დიდი მაგალითი პროგრამეტრების წინ მოწყობინებული მოდელების გამოყენება, რომლებიც კომპუტაციალური რესურსების მიმართებულია, რომ ეს დიდი მოდელების კომ მაგრამ უფრო ცოტა აღმოჩნდება მოდელების კომპრექტირებისთვის მოდელების კომპრექტირებისთვის. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ განსხვავებული პრონტირების განსხვავებული პრონტირების განსხვავებული პრონტირების განსხვავებული მოდელები, რომელიც აპექტირებულია სენტიმენტი ანალი განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ განსხვავებულებს სწავლების დინამიკის განსხვავებაში გამოყენებით სტანდარტული სპრენტი ტექნიკების გამოყენებით, რომ გავაკეთოთ უფრო დინამიკის ქ ჩვენ განვითარებთ ჰიპოტეზა, რომელიც მსოფლიო წარმოდგენების ეფექტიურობას, რომელიც გლობალური წარმოდგენების შესახებ სუფლიო CNN მოდელზე შემდეგ, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ჰიპოტეზას, რომელიც გამოიყენება წარმოდგენილი მოდელის ეფექტიურობას, რომელიც გამოიყენებულია წარმოდგენილი მოდელის მეტი პარამეტრირებული state-of-the-art მოდელის შემდეგ, ორი პარამეტრირებული მოდელის შემდეგ, პირველი დავუყენება იგივე რაოდენობის ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთებთ განსაზღვრება, რომელიც გენერალიზაციას უნდა იყოს ჰიპოტეზის დაკავშირება.', 'no': 'Måten å utføra stor forskjellige modeller på kanteiningar under begrenset dataressursar har ført til å komprimera desse store modelane for stor forskning. Men mindre oppmerksomhet er gjeven for å komprimera oppgåvespesifikke modeller. I dette arbeidet undersøker vi dei ulike metodane for ikkje-strukturerte pruning på oppgåvespesifikke modeller for aspektbaserte Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) oppgåver. Spesielt analyserer vi forskjeller i læringsdynamikken av prøvde modeller ved å bruka standardteknikken for å oppnå høg utførande sparktnettverk. Vi utviklar ein hipotese for å demonstrere effektiviteten av lokale prøvinga over globale prøvinga ved å sjå på ein enkel CNN-modell. Sister bruker vi hypotesien for å demonstrere effekten av den prøvde modellen av kunstmodellen sammenlignet med den over-parametererte state-of-the-art-modellen under to innstillingar, den første som ser på baselinjene for det samme oppgåva som er brukt for å laga hypotesien, dvs. aspektekstraksjonen og den andre som ser på eit anna oppgåve, t.d. sentimentanalysen. Vi tilbyr også diskusjon relatert til generelliseringen av prøvingshipotesen.', 'mn': 'Хязгаарлагдсан тооцооллын хөрөнгө оруулах шаардлагатай том хэмжээний өмнө сургалтын загваруудыг тооцоолох шаардлагатай нь эдгээр том загваруудыг цуглуулахын тулд маш их судалгаа үүсгэсэн. Гэхдээ ажлын тодорхой загварыг цэвэрлэхэд бага анхаарал өгсөн. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) ажлын тухай ажлын тодорхой загваруудын бүтээгдэхүүний өөр арга загварыг судалж байна. Ялангуяа бид суралцах загварын динамикийн өөрчлөлтийг шинжилгээр өндөр дасгал сүлжээнд хүргэх стандарт пронинг техникуудыг ашиглан шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бид энгийн CNN загварыг бодохын тулд орон нутгийн гүйцэтгэлийн үр дүнг дэлхийн гүйцэтгэлийн үр дүнг харуулахын тулд таамаглал гаргадаг. Тэгээд дараа нь бид урлагийн суурь загварын үр дүнг харуулахын тулд хоёр төвшин доор харьцуулсан хэмжээний хэмжээний байр суурь загвартай харьцуулахын тулд таамаглал ашигладаг. Эхний таамаглал таамаглал гаргахын тулд хэрэглэгдсэн нэг даалгаварын суурь шулуунуудыг анхны таамаглал, яг л асуудал татах ба хоёр да Бид мөн тайлбарлалтын ерөнхийлөгчийн талаар ярилцдаг.', 'pl': 'Konieczność wdrażania wielkoskalowych, wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli na urządzeniach krawędziowych w ograniczonych zasobach obliczeniowych doprowadziła do znacznych badań nad kompresją tych dużych modeli. Jednakże mniej uwagi poświęcono kompresji modeli konkretnych zadań. W niniejszej pracy badamy różne metody niestrukturalnego przycinania na modelach specyficznych dla zadań Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA). W szczególności analizujemy różnice w dynamice uczenia się modeli przycinanych przy użyciu standardowych technik przycinania w celu uzyskania wysokiej wydajności rzadkich sieci. Opracowujemy hipotezę mającą na celu wykazanie skuteczności przycinania lokalnego w stosunku do globalnego przycinania biorąc pod uwagę prosty model CNN. Później wykorzystujemy hipotezę do wykazania skuteczności przyciętego modelu najnowocześniejszego w porównaniu z nadparametryzowanym modelem najnowocześniejszym w dwóch ustawieniach, pierwszy uwzględnia linie bazowe dla tego samego zadania używanego do generowania hipotezy, tj. ekstrakcji aspektów, a drugi rozważa inne zadanie, tj. analizę sentymentów. Zapewniamy również dyskusję związaną z uogólnieniem hipotezy przycinania.', 'ro': 'Necesitatea implementării unor modele pre-instruite la scară largă pe dispozitive de margine sub resurse computaționale limitate a condus la cercetări substanțiale pentru comprimarea acestor modele mari. Cu toate acestea, s-a acordat mai puțină atenție comprimării modelelor specifice sarcinilor. În această lucrare, investigăm diferitele metode de tăiere nestructurată pe modele specifice sarcinilor de analiză a sentimentelor bazate pe aspect (ABSA). În mod specific, analizăm diferențele în dinamica de învățare a modelelor tăiate prin utilizarea tehnicilor standard de tăiere pentru a realiza rețele rare de înaltă performanță. Dezvoltăm o ipoteză pentru a demonstra eficiența tăierii locale față de tăierea globală luând în considerare un model simplu CNN. Mai târziu, utilizăm ipoteza pentru a demonstra eficacitatea modelului tăiat de ultimă oră comparativ cu modelul supra-parametrizat de ultimă oră în două setări, primul având în vedere liniile de bază pentru aceeași sarcină utilizată pentru generarea ipotezei, adică extragerea aspectelor și al doilea având în vedere o sarcină diferită, adică analiza sentimentului. De asemenea, oferim discuții legate de generalizarea ipotezei de tăiere.', 'mt': 'Il-ħtieġa li jintużaw mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel fuq skala kbira fuq tagħmir tat-tarf taħt riżorsi komputattivi limitati wasslet għal riċerka sostanzjali biex jiġu kompressi dawn il-mudelli l-kbar. However, less attention has been given to compress the task-specific models.  In this work, we investigate the different methods of unstructured pruning on task-specific models for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) tasks.  B’mod speċifiku, nagħmlu analiżi tad-differenzi fid-dinamika tat-tagħlim ta’ mudelli pruned billi nużaw it-tekniki standard tal-pruning biex jinkisbu netwerks sparse ta’ prestazzjoni għolja. Aħna niżviluppaw ipoteżi li turi l-effikaċja tal-pruning lokali fuq il-pruning globali meta wieħed iqis mudell sempliċi CNN. Later, we utilize the hypothesis to demonstrate the efficacy of the pruned state-of-the-art model compared to the over-parameterized state-of-the-art model under two settings, the first considering the baselines for the same task used for generating the hypothesis, i.e., aspect extraction and the second considering a different task, i.e., sentiment analysis.  Aħna nipprovdu wkoll diskussjoni relatata mal-ġeneralizzazzjoni tal-ipoteżi tal-pruning.', 'ms': 'Perlu menggunakan model yang dilatih-dilatih pada skala besar pada peranti pinggir di bawah sumber komputasi terbatas telah membawa kepada kajian yang besar untuk memaksa model besar ini. However, less attention has been given to compress the task-specific models.  In this work, we investigate the different methods of unstructured pruning on task-specific models for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) tasks.  Secara khusus, kami menganalisis perbezaan dalam dinamik pembelajaran model yang dipotong dengan menggunakan teknik pemotong piawai untuk mencapai rangkaian yang berkesan tinggi. We develop a hypothesis to demonstrate the effectiveness of local pruning over global pruning considering a simple CNN model.  Kemudian, kita menggunakan hipotesis untuk menunjukkan keefektivitas model state-of-the-art yang dipotong dibandingkan dengan model state-of-the-art berlebihan berlebihan parameterisasi dibawah dua tetapan, yang pertama mempertimbangkan garis dasar untuk tugas yang sama digunakan untuk menghasilkan hipotesis, iaitu ekstraksi aspek dan yang kedua mempertimbangkan tugas yang berbeza, iaitu analisis perasaan. Kami juga memberikan perbincangan berkaitan dengan generalisasi hipotesis pruning.', 'so': 'Waa in loo baahan yahay in lagu soo dejiyo qaabab aad u weyn oo lagu tababariyey qalabka dhinacyada ka hooseeya maalmaha xisaabta ee xadidan ah, taas oo sababtay waxbarasho aad u weyn si loo koobi karo modelladan waaweyn. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, waxaa loola jeedaa in lagu koobi karo samooyin cayiman oo shaqada. Markaas waxan, waxaynu baaraynaa qaababo kala duduwan oo aan la samayn karin tusaalooyin gaar ah oo shaqo ku saabsan qaababka lagu sameynayo sanamka Sentimentaada (ABSA). Si gaar ah, waxaynu u baaraynaa kala duwanaanshaha barashada dabeecada naafada ah, si aan u gaadhno shabakadaha badbaadada. Waxaynu horumarinnaa fikrad si aan u muujinno shaqaalaha caqliga deegaanka ee caalamiga ah si aan u fiirsano model CNN oo fudud. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa tijaatarka si aan u muujinno saameynta xaalada-farshaxanta, iyadoo la barbaro wadamada-ka-farshaxanta labada dabool hoostooda, marka ugu horeysa aynu ka fiirsanaynaa aasaaska isku shaqo oo loo isticmaalay inuu sameeyo fikirito, tusaale ahaan ka soo baxo iyo ka fiirsashada shaqada kale, taas oo ah sawir kale. Sidoo kale waxaynu siinaynaa sheekeysi la xiriira horumarinta fikirka caqliga leh.', 'sv': 'Behovet av att distribuera storskaliga pre-utbildade modeller på edge-enheter under begränsade beräkningsresurser har lett till omfattande forskning för att komprimera dessa stora modeller. Mindre uppmärksamhet har dock ägnats åt att komprimera de uppgiftsspecifika modellerna. I detta arbete undersöker vi de olika metoderna för ostrukturerad beskärning på uppgiftsspecifika modeller för Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) uppgifter. Specifikt analyserar vi skillnader i lärdynamiken hos beskurna modeller genom att använda standardbeskärningstekniker för att uppnå högpresterande glesa nätverk. Vi utvecklar en hypotes för att demonstrera effektiviteten av lokal beskärning jämfört med global beskärning med en enkel CNN-modell. Senare använder vi hypotesen för att demonstrera effektiviteten av den beskurna state-of-the-art modellen jämfört med den överparametriserade state-of-the-art modellen under två inställningar, den första beaktar baselines för samma uppgift som används för att generera hypotesen, dvs aspektextraktion och den andra beaktar en annan uppgift, dvs sentimentanalys. Vi ger också diskussion om generaliseringen av beskärningshypotesen.', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை வெளியிட வேண்டிய தேவை ஆனால், பணி குறிப்பிட்ட மாதிரிகளை சுருக்க குறைவாக கவனம் கொடுக்கப்பட்டது. இந்த வேலையில், நாம் வேறு முறைகளை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கவும் அடிப்படையாக்கப்படாத செயல் குறிப்பிட்ட மாதிரிகள் மீது வேறு வித்திய முறைகள குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் ஒரு குறிப்பான சிஎன்என் மாதிரியை பார்ப்பதற்காக உள்ளூர் புரிந்து கொள்ளும் விளைவுகளை உலக புரிந்து கொள்ளு பிறகு, நாம் துப்பாக்கியத்தை பயன்படுத்தி இரண்டு அமைப்புகளுக்கு கீழ் அளபுருக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியை ஒப்பிடும் மேல் அளபுருக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி மாதிரியின் விளைவை காண்பிக்க பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, அதே பணியின் அடிப்பட நாம் புரிந்து கொள்ளும் கருத்துரையை உருவாக்குவது பற்றி விவாதத்தை வழங்குகிறோம்.', 'sr': 'Potreba razvoja velikih predobučenih modela na rubnim uređajima pod ograničenim računalnim resursima dovela je do značajnog istraživanja kako bi kompresirali ove velike modele. Međutim, manje je pažnje dao za kompresiju modela specifičnih zadataka. U ovom poslu istražujemo različite metode nestrukturiranog pružanja na zadatke specifičnim modelima Sentiment Analize na aspektu (ABSA). Posebno, analiziramo razlike u dinamiki učenja pruženih modela koristeći standardne tehnike pružanja kako bi postigli visoke izvršene rezervne mreže. Razvijamo hipotezu da pokažemo efikasnost lokalnog pružanja na globalnom pružanju s obzirom na jednostavan CNN model. Kasnije, iskoristili smo hipotezu da pokažemo efikasnost obrezanog model a stanja umjetnosti u usporedbi sa previše parametriranim modelom stanja umjetnosti pod dva postavka, prvi razmatrajući osnovne linije za isti zadatak koji se koristi za generiranje hipoteze, tj. ekstrakcije aspekta i drugi razmatrajući drugu zadatak, tj. analizu osjećaja. Takođe pružamo raspravu vezanu sa generalizacijom pružanja hipoteze.', 'si': 'ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්න ඕනේ සීමාවිත පරිගණනය සම්පූර්ණ උපකරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය කර නමුත්, වැඩක් විශේෂ විශේෂ මොඩේල් එක සංකුර්ණ කරන්න අවධානය අඩු වෙලා තියෙනවා. මේ වැඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වෙනස් විදියට අස්පෙක්ට් විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය (ABSA) වැඩේ විශේෂ විශේෂණය සඳහා විශේෂ වි විශේෂ විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරාමාණික ප්\u200dරාමාණික ප්\u200dරාමාණික විදියට විශේෂ කරනවා ප්\u200dරාමාණික ප්\u200dරාමාණික වි අපි සාමාන්\u200dය CNN මොඩල් එකක් බලන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න ස්ථානික ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් පෙන්වන්න. පස්සේ, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ස අපි සමහරවිට කතාව සම්බන්ධ කරනවා සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා.', 'ur': 'اس کی ضرورت ہے کہ ان بڑے ماڈلوں کو مضبوط کمپیوٹریشن رسورسوں کے نیچے اندھیرے دستگاه پر بہت بڑی استعمال کی موڈلوں کو ڈالو۔ لیکن، کم توجه کی گئی ہے تابع کے مطابق مطابق موڈل کو کمزور کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم اس کام میں مختلف طریقوں کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں جن کو آسپٹ-بنیاد سنٹیمینٹ تحقیق (ABSA) کے کاموں کے لئے کام-خاص موڈل پر بصیرت نہیں کی جاتی۔ خاص طور پر، ہم پرینڈ موڈل کی تعلیم دینامیک میں اختلاف تحقیق کرتے ہیں، استاندارڈ پرینڈ ٹیکنیک کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ اس طرح اچھی طرح عمل کرنے والے پرینڈ نیٹ ورک کو پہنچ سکیں۔ ہم ایک فرضی تخلیق کریں گے کہ ایک ساده سی ان کی موڈل کے مطابق محلی پرینگ کے مطابق دکھائیں۔ اس کے بعد ہم نے فرضی کا استعمال کیا ہے کہ دو تنظیم کے اندر زیادہ پارامتریزہ state-of-the-art موڈل کے مطابق دکھائے جاتے ہیں، پہلی بار فرضی کے مطابق بنسس لینوں کو وہی کام کے لئے سمجھتے ہیں جو فرضی کے جوڑنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، یعنی منظور اضافہ کرنا اور دوسری کام کے مطابق، یعنی احساس تحلیل کے مطابق. ہم نے بھی بحث کے معاملہ میں پرینگ فرضی کے معاملہ میں پیش کیا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu katta taʼminlovchi modellarni chegara uskunalarda qo'yish kerakligi bu katta modellarni kompyutlash imkoniyatlariga murakkab qiladi. Lekin, vazifa xossalari modellarini qisqartirishga kamaytirish mumkin. Bu ishda, biz tashkilotlarning tashkilotga taymaut (ABSA) vazifalarini aniqlash uchun yaratilgan boshqa usullarni qidirish. Ko'rsatilgan, biz cheksiz tarmoqni bajarish uchun andoza tugmalar yordamida o'rganish muloqatlarni aniqlamiz. We develop a hypothesis to demonstrate the effectiveness of local pruning over global pruning considering a simple CNN model.  Keyinroq, biz qo'yish hodisa bilan ikki moslamalarga o'rtacha parametrlar holatning holatining holatida o'xshash modelini ko'rsatish uchun qo'llanmalarni ishlatamiz mumkin. Bu birinchi vazifani hypotesiya yaratish uchun birinchi tugmalarni tasavvur qiling, balki eng qismni chiqarish va ikkinchi vazifani boshqa vazifani tasavvur qilish mumkin. Biz shunday qilamiz, aqlli fikrlarni yaratish haqida xabar beramiz.", 'vi': 'Cần phải áp dụng các mô hình được huấn luyện trên diện mạo trên các thiết bị cạnh bằng một nguồn tính hạn chế đã dẫn đến nghiên cứu tích cực để thu thập các mô hình lớn này. Tuy nhiên, đã bị chú ý giảm thiểu việc thu xếp các mô hình đặc biệt. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu các phương pháp cắt tỉa không xây dựng dựa trên các mô hình đặc trưng cho các công việc phân tích tình cảm. Đặc biệt, chúng ta phân tích sự khác nhau trong tính chất học của các mô hình bị cắt tỉa bằng cách dùng các kỹ thuật cắt tỉa chuẩn để đạt được các mạng cự ly cao. Chúng tôi phát triển một giả thuyết để chứng minh hiệu quả của việc cắt tỉa địa phương trên việc cắt tỉa to àn cầu xem xét một mô hình CNN đơn giản. Sau này, chúng ta sử dụng giả thuyết này để chứng minh hiệu quả của mô hình hiện đại bị cắt xén hơn so với mô hình quá đa đo nhiệt nghệ thuật dưới hai thiết lập, thứ nhất là xem xét những đường cơ bản cho cùng một nhiệm vụ để phát triển giả thuyết, đó là khai thác các khía cạnh và thứ hai xem xét một nhiệm vụ khác, ví dụ, phân tích cảm xúc. Chúng tôi cũng thảo luận về việc tổng hợp giả thuyết cắt tỉa.', 'bg': 'Необходимостта от внедряване на широкомащабни предварително обучени модели върху крайни устройства при ограничени изчислителни ресурси доведе до значителни изследвания за компресиране на тези големи модели. Въпреки това е отделено по-малко внимание на компресирането на специфичните за задачата модели. В тази работа изследваме различните методи за неструктурирано подрязване по специфични задачи модели за задачи по анализ на сентимента (АБСА). По-конкретно, анализираме разликите в учебната динамика на подрязаните модели чрез използване на стандартните техники за подрязване за постигане на високоефективни редки мрежи. Разработваме хипотеза, която да демонстрира ефективността на местното подрязване над глобалното подрязване, като се има предвид прост модел. По-късно използваме хипотезата, за да демонстрираме ефикасността на подрязания модерен модел в сравнение със свръхпараметризирания модерен модел при две настройки, като първата разглежда базовите линии за една и съща задача, използвана за генериране на хипотезата, т.е. екстракция на аспекта, а втората разглежда различна задача, т.е. анализ на сентимента. Предоставяме и дискусия, свързана с обобщаването на хипотезата за подрязване.', 'nl': 'De noodzaak om grootschalige voorgetrainde modellen te implementeren op randapparaten met beperkte rekenmiddelen heeft geleid tot substantieel onderzoek om deze grote modellen te comprimeren. Er is echter minder aandacht besteed aan het comprimeren van de taakspecifieke modellen. In dit werk onderzoeken we de verschillende methoden van ongestructureerd snoeien op taakspecifieke modellen voor Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) taken. Specifiek analyseren we verschillen in de leerdynamiek van gesnoeide modellen door gebruik te maken van de standaard snoei technieken om high-performante schaarse netwerken te bereiken. We ontwikkelen een hypothese om de effectiviteit van lokaal snoeien ten opzichte van wereldwijd snoeien aan te tonen met behulp van een eenvoudig CNN model. Later gebruiken we de hypothese om de effectiviteit van het gesnoeide state-of-the-art model aan te tonen in vergelijking met het over-geparameteriseerde state-of-the-art model onder twee instellingen, waarbij de eerste de basislijnen voor dezelfde taak die wordt gebruikt voor het genereren van de hypothese, d.w.z. aspect extractie en de tweede een andere taak, d.w.z. sentimentanalyse, beschouwt. We bieden ook discussie met betrekking tot de generalisatie van de snoeihypothese.', 'da': 'Behovet for at implementere omfattende præuddannede modeller på edge-enheder under begrænsede beregningsressourcer har ført til omfattende forskning for at komprimere disse store modeller. Der er imidlertid lagt mindre vægt på at komprimere de opgavespecifikke modeller. I dette arbejde undersøger vi de forskellige metoder til ustruktureret beskæring på opgavespecifikke modeller for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) opgaver. Specielt analyserer vi forskelle i læringsdynamikken i beskærede modeller ved hjælp af standard beskæringsteknikker til at opnå højtydende sparsomme netværk. Vi udvikler en hypotese til at demonstrere effektiviteten af lokal beskæring i forhold til global beskæring i betragtning af en simpel CNN model. Senere bruger vi hypotesen til at demonstrere effektiviteten af den beskåret state-of-the-art model sammenlignet med den overparametriserede state-of-the-art model under to indstillinger, hvor den første tager hensyn til basislinjerne for den samme opgave, der bruges til at generere hypotesen, dvs. aspekt ekstraktion og den anden tager hensyn til en anden opgave, dvs. sentiment analyse. Vi giver også diskussion relateret til generaliseringen af beskæringshypotesen.', 'hr': 'Potreba razvoja velikih predobučenih modela na rubnim uređajima pod ograničenim računalnim resursima dovela je do značajnog istraživanja kako bi kompresirali te velike modele. Međutim, manje je pažnje objavljeno za kompresiju modela specifičnih zadataka. U ovom poslu istražujemo različite metode neostrukturiranog pružanja na određenim modelima zadataka o sentimentnoj analizi na aspektu (ABSA). Posebno, analiziramo razlike u dinamiki učenja pruženih modela koristeći standardne tehnike pružanja kako bi postigli visoke izvršene rezervne mreže. Razvijamo hipotezu kako bi pokazali učinkovitost lokalnog pružanja preko globalnog pružanja s obzirom na jednostavan CNN model. Kasnije, koristimo hipotezu kako bi pokazali djelotvornost pruženog model a umjetnosti u usporedbi s nadparametriranim modelom stanja umjetnosti pod dvije postavke, prvi razmatrajući osnovne linije za isti zadatak koji se koristi za stvaranje hipoteze, tj. ekstrakcije aspekta i drugi razmatrajući drugu zadatak, tj. analizu osjećaja. Također predstavljamo raspravu vezanu sa generalizacijom pružanja hipoteze.', 'id': 'Kebutuhan untuk menggunakan model yang dilatih sebesar skala besar di perangkat pinggir di bawah sumber komputasi terbatas telah menyebabkan penelitian substansial untuk mengkompresi model besar ini. Namun, kurang perhatian telah diberikan untuk mengkompresi model spesifik tugas. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menyelidiki metode yang berbeda dari pemotongan tidak struktur pada model spesifik tugas untuk tugas Analisi Sentimen berdasarkan Aspekt (ABSA). Secara spesifik, kami menganalisis perbedaan dalam dinamika belajar dari model yang dipotong dengan menggunakan teknik pemotong standar untuk mencapai jaringan yang rendah tinggi. Kami mengembangkan hipotesis untuk menunjukkan efektivitas pemotong lokal atas pemotong global mengingat model CNN sederhana. Kemudian, kita menggunakan hipotesis untuk menunjukkan efektivitas model state-of-the-art yang dipotong dibandingkan dengan model state-of-the-art yang berlebihan parameterisasi di bawah dua pengaturan, yang pertama mempertimbangkan garis dasar untuk tugas yang sama digunakan untuk menghasilkan hipotesis, i.e., ekstraksi aspek dan yang kedua mempertimbangkan tugas yang berbeda, i.e., analisis sentimen. Kami juga memberikan diskusi berkaitan dengan generalisasi hipotesis pruning.', 'de': 'Die Notwendigkeit, große vortrainierte Modelle auf Edge-Geräten mit begrenzten Rechenressourcen bereitzustellen, hat zu umfangreichen Forschungsarbeiten zur Komprimierung dieser großen Modelle geführt. Allerdings wurde weniger Aufmerksamkeit auf die Komprimierung der aufgabenspezifischen Modelle gelegt. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir die verschiedenen Methoden des unstrukturierten Beschneidens an aufgabenspezifischen Modellen für Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA)-Aufgaben. Konkret analysieren wir Unterschiede in der Lerndynamik von beschnittenen Modellen, indem wir die Standard-Beschneidungstechniken verwenden, um leistungsfähige, sparse Netzwerke zu erreichen. Wir entwickeln eine Hypothese, um die Effektivität des lokalen Beschneidens gegenüber dem globalen Beschneiden unter Berücksichtigung eines einfachen CNN-Modells zu demonstrieren. Später verwenden wir die Hypothese, um die Wirksamkeit des beschnittenen State-of-the-Art-Modells im Vergleich zum überparametrisierten State-of-the-Art-Modell unter zwei Settings zu demonstrieren, wobei die erste die Baselines für die gleiche Aufgabe berücksichtigt, die für die Generierung der Hypothese verwendet wird, d.h. Aspektextraktion und die zweite eine andere Aufgabe, d.h. Sentiment-Analyse. Wir bieten auch Diskussion im Zusammenhang mit der Verallgemeinerung der Beschneidungshypothese.', 'sw': 'Lazima ya kutumia mifano makubwa ya mafunzo ya awali kwenye vifaa vya upande chini ya rasilimali vikubwa imesababisha utafiti mkubwa ili kufinganisha mifano haya makubwa. Hata hivyo, hatua ndogo imepewa mwangalizi wa kuelekeza mifano maalum ya kazi. Katika kazi hii, tunachunguza mbinu tofauti za kuendelewa kwa mifano maalum ya kazi kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa Wakati wa Seneti (ABSA). Kwa ujumla, tunachambua tofauti katika kujifunza dynami ya mifano yenye ubora kwa kutumia mbinu za usawa wa kawaida ili kupata mitandao ya uongo wa juu. Tunaendeleza nadharia ya kuonyesha ufanisi wa kuelewa kwa maelezo ya nchi kwa ajili ya kuelewa ulimwengu kwa kuzingatia mtindo rahisi wa CNN. Baadae, tunatumia nadharia hiyo kuonyesha ufanisi wa hali ya sanaa inayotengenezwa na hali ya juu-ya-sanaa chini ya mazingira mawili, kwanza tunafikiria msingi wa kazi hiyo kwa ajili ya kutengeneza dhana hiyo, yaani utoaji picha na ya pili ikifikiria kazi tofauti, yaani uchambuzi wa hisia. Pia tunatoa mijadala yanayohusiana na kutengeneza imani yenye akili.', 'fa': 'نیازی برای استفاده از مدلهای پیش آموزش بسیار بزرگ در دستگاه\u200cهای مرز زیر منابع محدودیت محدودیت محدودیت به تحقیقات زیادی برای تزریق این مدلهای بزرگ باعث شده است. با این حال، توجه کمتری برای فشار مدلهای مشخص کار داده شده است. در این کار، ما روش\u200cهای متفاوتی از قطع ساخته\u200cنشده بر مدل\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای برای تحلیل سنتیمتی (ABSA) بر اساس نظر تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. مخصوصاً ما تفاوت\u200cهایی در دینامیک یادگیری از مدل\u200cهای پاره\u200cشده را با استفاده از تکنیک\u200cهای پاره\u200cگیری استاندارد برای رسیدن شبکه\u200cهای پاره\u200cگیری بالا تحلیل می\u200cکنیم. ما یک فرضیه توسعه می\u200cکنیم تا نشان دهیم چقدر فعالیت پارچه\u200cهای محلی بر روی پارچه\u200cهای جهانی با توجه به یک مدل سین\u200cان ساده است. بعد از آن، ما فرضیه را استفاده می کنیم تا نشان دهیم فعالیت مدل موقعیت-هنر پاره شده در مقایسه با مدل موقعیت-پارامتریزی-از-هنر زیر دو تنظیمات، اولین بار با توجه به خطوط بنیادی برای همان کار که برای تولید فرضیه استفاده می شود، یعنی اخراج منظور و دومین بار با توجه به یک کار متفاوت، یعنی تحلیل احساسات. ما همچنین بحث و بحث را ارتباط به ژنرالیزی فرضیه\u200cای که می\u200cکند پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم.', 'ko': '유한한 계산 자원 아래 가장자리 설비에 대규모 예훈련 모델을 배치해야 하기 때문에 대량의 연구를 통해 이런 대형 모델을 압축시켰다.그러나 임무의 특정 모델에 대한 압축에 대한 관심은 비교적 적다.이 작업에서 우리는 측면에 기초한 정서분석(ABSA) 임무에서 임무의 특정 모델에 대한 서로 다른 비구조화된 편집 방법을 연구했다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 표준 가지치기 기술을 사용하여 고성능 희소 네트워크를 실현하고 가지치기 모델 학습 동태의 차이를 분석한다.간단한 CNN 모델을 감안하여, 우리는 국부 커팅이 전체 커팅에 대한 유효성을 증명하는 가설을 제기했다.이후에 우리는 이 가설을 이용하여 두 가지 설정에서 편집된 최신 모델이 과도한 매개 변수화된 최신 모델에 비해 유효성을 증명했다. 첫 번째 설정은 가설을 생성하는 동일한 임무의 기선, 즉 방면 추출을 고려했고 두 번째 설정은 서로 다른 임무, 즉 정서 분석을 고려했다.우리는 또한 가지치기 가설의 보급과 관련된 토론을 제공했다.', 'tr': 'Uly düzümlenmeli hatlary çykmak üçin uly düzümlenmeli hatlary çykarmak gereklidir. Ýöne işiň takyk nusgalaryny sykylmak üçin az üns berildi. Bu işde, Aspekt tabanly Sentiment Analizi (ABSA) uzmanlary üçin düzümlenmiş prunsiýan nusgalarynyň farklı yönlerini inceleýäris Adatça, biz ýokary ukyp taýýarlanan nusgalaryň öwrenmesi dinamikynyň üýtgeşmelerini ýokary taýýarlamak üçin standart prun teknikleri ullanýarys. Biz ýerli süýşiklikleriň etkinliğini dünýä CNN nusgasyna seretsek üçin bir hypoteýzisi geliştirdik. Soňra, biz çözümli durum-suçsuz modeliniň etkinligini 2 düzümlerden karşılaştyrmak üçin hypotetiýasyny ulanýarys, birinjisi hypotetiýa döretmäge ulanan i şiň baseçiliklerini düşünýäris, yani, aspekt çözümlenmesini we ikinjisi başga işi diýip pikir edenler. Biz hem çykyş hypoteziýasynyň döredilik bilen baglanşyklaryny berýäris.', 'am': 'በተለየ ምርጫዎች በክፍለ ሀብት ውስጥ ያሉትን ታላላቅ ምርጫዎች በኩል ተቃውሞ ሞዴላዎችን ለመውሰድ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የስራ-ቁጥጥር ዓይነቶችን ለመጨመር ጥቂት ትኩረት ተሰጥቷል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ የስሜት ሰዓት Analysis (ABSA) ስራዎችን በሚያሳየው የስራ ዓይነቶች ላይ የተለየ ልዩ ዓይነቶችን እናምርመራለን፡፡ Specifically, we analyze differences in the learning dynamics of pruned models by using the standard pruning techniques to achieve high-performing sparse networks.  ቀላል CNN ሞዴል እንደምናሳየው የአገር አካባቢ ማስታወቂያውን ለማሳየት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ፣ የክፍለ አካባቢ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-ዐርድ ሞዴል በሁለት ባሕላት በታች በሚያሳየው የክፍለ ሥርዓት ግንኙነትን እና በሁለተኛው ስራ ላይ ለመፍጠር የሚጠቀሙትን የድምፅ ደረጃዎችን በመጀመሪያ አስተያየት ነው፡፡ የብልሃተኛ ጉዳይ መፍጠር እናስፈልጋለን፡፡', 'af': "Die behoefte om groot-skaal voorafgeleerde modele te verwyder op randtoestelle onder beperkte rekenaar hulpbronne te verwyder het tot substantieel resetting om hierdie groot modele te komprimeer. Maar, minder aandag is gegee om die taak-spesifieke modele te komprimeer. In hierdie werk, ons ondersoek die verskillende metodes van onstruktureerde pruning op taak-spesifieke modele vir Aspekte-gebaseerde Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) taake. Spesifieke, ons analyseer verskille in die leer dinamike van verdrukte modele deur die standaard pruning teknike te gebruik om hoë-uitvoerde sparse netwerke te bereik. Ons ontwikkel 'n hipotese om die effektiviteit van plaaslike pruning te wys oor globale pruning met 'n eenvoudige CNN model te onderwerp. Later, ons gebruik die hipotesis om die effektiviteit van die gedrukte staat-van-die-kunstenmodel te demonstreer, vergelyk met die oor-parameteriseerde staat-van-die-kunstenmodeel onder twee instellings, die eerste aandag van die basisline vir die selfde taak gebruik word vir die genereer van die hipotesis, t.d., aspekt-uittrekking en die tweede aandag van 'n ander taak, t.d. sentimentanalisie. Ons verskaf ook diskusie verwante met die generellisering van die pruning hypotese.", 'sq': 'nevoja për të vendosur modele të shkallës së madhe të paratrajnuara në pajisje të kufizuara nën burime të kufizuara llogaritare ka çuar në kërkime thelbësore për të shtypur këto modele të mëdha. Megjithatë, është dhënë më pak vëmendje për komprimimin e modeleve specifike për detyrat. In this work, we investigate the different methods of unstructured pruning on task-specific models for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) tasks.  Veçanërisht, ne analizojmë dallimet në dinamikën e mësimit të modeleve të pjekura duke përdorur teknikat standarde të pjekurisë për të arritur rrjete të vogla me performancë të lartë. Ne zhvillojmë një hipotezë për të demonstruar efektshmërinë e rrëshqitjes lokale mbi rrëshqitjet globale duke konsideruar një model të thjeshtë CNN. Më vonë, ne përdorim hipotezën për të demonstruar efektshmërinë e modelit të rendit të artit krahasuar me modelin mbi-parametrizuar të rendit të artit nën dy rregullime, i pari duke konsideruar linjat bazë për të njëjtën detyrë të përdorur për krijimin e hipotezës, pra, nxjerrjen e aspekteve dhe i dyti duke konsideruar një detyrë të ndryshme, pra, analizën e ndjenjave. Ne gjithashtu japim diskutim lidhur me gjeneralizacionin e hipotezës së rrëshqitjes.', 'az': 'Bu böyük modelləri sıxıntılı hesap kaynaqlarının altında böyük ölçülü öyrənmiş modellərdən istifadə etmək lazımdır. Lakin, işin müəyyən etdiyi modelləri sıkıştırmaq üçün az pay verilmişdir. Bu işdə, Aspect-based Sentiment Analizi (ABSA) işlərinin müxtəlif işləri üzərində yapışmaq müxtəlif metodlarını incidirik. Özellikle, biz təmiz modellərin öyrənməsi dinamiklərində fərqli fərqli tərzlərini yüksək-təmiz fərqli ağları yetirmək üçün standart pruning tekniklərini kullanarak analiz edirik. Biz küresel pruning üzərində yerli pruning etkinliğini göstərmək üçün bir hipotezi hazırlamışıq. Daha sonra, biz hipotezi iki ayarların altındakı üstünlük-parametrizli-o-sanat model i ilə, hipotezi yaratmaq üçün istifadə edilən eyni i ş üçün ilk dəstə çətinliklərini göstərmək üçün istifadə edirik, yox. aspekt çıxartması və ikinci dəstə çətinliklərini başqa bir işə baxarmaq üçün istifadə etdik, yox. hiss analizi. Biz də həmçinin həqiqət hipotezin generalizasyonu ilə mübahisə edirik.', 'hy': 'The need to deploy large-scale pre-trained models on edge devices under limited computational resources has led to substantial research to compress these large models.  Այնուամենայնիվ, ավելի քիչ ուշադրություն է դարձել խնդիրների հատուկ մոդելների ճնշումը: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք անկառուցվածքային խզբզելու տարբեր մեթոդները, որոնք վերաբերվում են խնդիրների հատուկ մոդելներին, որոնք վերաբերվում են Ապտեկտի հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծության (ABSA) խնդի Մասնավորապես, մենք վերլուծում ենք տարբերությունները սովորողական դինամիկայի մեջ՝ օգտագործելով ստանդարտ սովորողական մեթոդներ բարձր արդյունավետություն ունեցող քիչ ցանցերի հասնելու համար: We develop a hypothesis to demonstrate the effectiveness of local pruning over global pruning considering a simple CNN model.  Ավելի ուշ, մենք օգտագործում ենք հիպոթեզը, որպեսզի ապացուցենք ամենաարդյունավետ մոդելի արդյունավետությունը համեմատելով երկու միջոցների ընթացքում չափազանց պարամետրիզացված ամենաարդյունավետ մոդելի հետ, առաջինը հաշվի առնելով հիմնական գծերը նույն խնդրի համար, որը օգտագործվում է հիպոթեզի ստեղծման համար, այսինքն, ասպեկտների վերացման և երկ Մենք նաև քննարկում ենք, որը կապված է գլխավորման հիպոթեզի հետ:', 'bn': 'পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেলের প্রয়োজনীয় সীমিত গণনা সম্পদের অধীনে সীমাবদ্ধ সংক্রান্ত বিশাল গবেষণায় এই বড় মডেলের সম্মুখীন করার কিন্তু কাজের নির্দিষ্ট মডেল সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য মনোযোগ কম দেয়া হয়েছে। এই কাজে আমরা বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের (ABSA) কাজের জন্য কাজের নির্দিষ্ট মডেলের উপর বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন উপায়ের তদন্ত কর Specifically, we analyze differences in the learning dynamics of pruned models by using the standard pruning techniques to achieve high-performing sparse networks.  সিএনএন মডেল বিবেচনা করার জন্য স্থানীয় বিশ্বব্যাপী বুদ্ধিমানের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করার জন্য আমরা একটি হাইপাইথিসেস তৈর পরবর্তীতে, আমরা এই হাইপাইটসিস ব্যবহার করি দুটি বৈশিষ্ট্যের নীচে অতিরিক্ত প্যারামিটাইমেন্ট-অফ-শিল্প মডেলের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করার জন্য, যেমন মন মনোভাব বিশ্লেষণের প্রথম বিবেচনা করা যায় একই কাজের জন্য বেসেলাইনের ম আমরা বুদ্ধিমান হিপিসের জেনারেলেশনের সাথে আলোচনা প্রদান করি।', 'ca': "La necessitat de desplegar models de gran escala pré-entrenats en dispositius de bord sota recursos computacionals limitats ha portat a recerca substancial per comprimir aquests grans models. No obstant això, s'ha prestat menys atenció a la compressió dels models específics de les tasques. En aquest treball, investigam els diferents mètodes de pruning no estructurat en models específics per a tasques d'Anàlisi de Sentiments basat en aspectes (ABSA). En concret, analitzem les diferències en la dinàmica d'aprenentatge dels models pruned utilitzant les tècniques standard de pruning per aconseguir xarxes poc performants. Desenvolvem una hipòtesi per demostrar l'eficacia de la pruning local sobre la pruning global considerant un simple model CNN. Després, utilitzem l'hipòtesi per demostrar l'eficacia del model d'estat d'última generació, comparat amb el model d'estat d'última generació sobreparametritzat sota dues configuracions, la primera considerant les línies de base de la mateixa tasca utilitzada per generar l'hipòtesi, és a dir, l'extracció d'aspectes i la segona considerant una tasca diferent, és a dir, l'anàlisi de sentiments. We also provide discussion related to the generalization of the pruning hypothesis.", 'et': 'Vajadus rakendada ääreseadmetele piiratud arvutusressursside abil ulatuslikke eelkoolitud mudeleid on viinud oluliste uuringuteni nende suurte mudelite tihendamiseks. Siiski on vähem tähelepanu pööratud ülesandepõhiste mudelite tihendamisele. Käesolevas töös uurime erinevaid struktureerimata pügamise meetodeid aspektipõhiste tunnete analüüsi (ABSA) ülesannete spetsiifilistel mudelitel. Täpsemalt analüüsime pühendatud mudelite õppedünaamika erinevusi, kasutades standardseid pügamismeetodeid, et saavutada kõrge jõudlusega hõredad võrgud. Töötame välja hüpoteesi, mis näitab kohaliku pügamise efektiivsust ülemaailmse pügamise suhtes, lähtudes lihtsast CNN mudelist. Hiljem kasutame hüpoteesi, et demonstreerida lõigatud kaasaegse mudeli efektiivsust võrreldes üleparameeritud kaasaegse mudeliga kahes seadistuses, millest esimene võtab arvesse sama ülesande lähtejooni, mida kasutati hüpoteesi genereerimiseks, st aspekti ekstraheerimiseks ja teine teist ülesannet, st sentimentaalüüsi. Samuti pakume arutelu, mis on seotud pügamise hüpoteesi üldistamisega.', 'fi': 'Tarve ottaa käyttöön laajoja esikoulutettuja malleja reunalaitteissa rajallisilla laskennallisilla resursseilla on johtanut huomattavaan tutkimukseen näiden suurten mallien pakkaamiseksi. Tehtäväkohtaisten mallien pakkaamiseen on kuitenkin kiinnitetty vähemmän huomiota. Tässä työssä tutkitaan erilaisia rakenteettoman karsinnan menetelmiä tehtäväkohtaisissa malleissa Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) -tehtävissä. Erityisesti analysoimme karsitujen mallien oppimisdynamiikan eroja käyttämällä vakiokarsintatekniikoita tehokkaiden harvojen verkkojen aikaansaamiseksi. Kehitämme hypoteesin osoittamaan paikallisen karsinnan tehokkuutta globaaliin karsintaan yksinkertaisen CNN-mallin pohjalta. Myöhemmin hyödynnämme hypoteesia osoittaaksemme karsitun state-of-the-art-mallin tehon verrattuna ylivarametrisoituun state-of-the-art-malliin kahdessa tilanteessa, joista ensimmäisessä tarkastellaan saman tehtävän lähtökohtia hypoteesin luomisessa eli aspektin uuttamista ja toisessa toista tehtävää eli tunteiden analysointia. Keskustelemme myös karsimishypoteesin yleistämisestä.', 'bs': 'Potreba razvoja velikih predobučenih modela na rubnim uređajima pod ograničenim računalnim resursima dovela je do značajnog istraživanja kako bi kompresirali te velike modele. Međutim, manje je privedeno pažnju da kompresiraju modele specifičnih zadataka. U ovom poslu istražujemo različite metode nestrukturiranog pružanja na određenim modelima zadataka o sentimentnoj analizi na aspektu (ABSA). Posebno, analiziramo razlike u dinamiki učenja pruženih modela koristeći standardne tehnike pružanja kako bi postigli visoke izvršne rezervne mreže. Razvijamo hipotezu kako bi pokazali učinkovitost lokalnog pružanja preko globalnog pružanja s obzirom na jednostavan CNN model. Kasnije, koristimo hipotezu kako bi pokazali djelotvornost pruženog model a stanja umjetnosti u usporedbi s nadparametriranim modelom stanja umjetnosti pod dvije postavke, prvi razmatrajući osnovne linije za isti zadatak koji se koristi za stvaranje hipoteze, tj. ekstrakcije aspekta i drugi razmatrajući drugu zadatak, tj. analizu osjećaja. Također predstavljamo raspravu vezanu sa generalizacijom pružanja hipoteze.', 'cs': 'Potřeba nasazení rozsáhlých předškolených modelů na hranových zařízeních s omezenými výpočetními zdroji vedla k podstatnému výzkumu komprese těchto velkých modelů. Méně pozornosti však byla věnována kompresi modelů specifických pro úkoly. V této práci zkoumáme různé metody nestrukturovaného řezání na úlohově specifických modelech pro úlohy Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA). Konkrétně analyzujeme rozdíly v dynamice učení řezaných modelů pomocí standardních technik řezání k dosažení vysoce výkonných řídkých sítí. Vyvíjíme hypotézu, která demonstruje efektivitu lokálního prořezávání oproti globálnímu prořezávání s ohledem na jednoduchý CNN model. Později používáme hypotézu k prokázání účinnosti prořezaného modelu ve srovnání s příliš parametrizovaným modelem ve dvou nastaveních, první zvažuje základní linie pro stejný úkol používaný pro generování hypotézy, tj. extrakci aspektů a druhé zvažuje jiný úkol, tj. sentimentní analýzu. Dále poskytujeme diskusi týkající se zobecnění hypotézy řezání.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness In this job, we istrage the new Methods of untructued praning on task-special modes for Aspect-supported Sentiment Test (ASS) tasks. Juara-Juara, awak dhéwé ngeralakno itédium sistem sing bisa diunting alam kuwi diangkat sing nyimpen tur angel Awak dhéwé nggunakake supoposé kanggo maneh akeh efekat anyar luwih dumateng dunya, nik kuwi sawian kuwi model sing bisa basa banget. Awak dhéwé, kéné iso nggunakake supatistik lan nambah efekasi durum-of-the-arts model sing bisalahan karo hal-parameterisé state-of-the-arts model nganggo sistem dhéwé, kuwi angka sing paling nggawe bakal dhéwé, arep kuwi perusahaan bakal sing bakal nggawe lan nggunaké supatipée, t.edé, Aspect extration lan segondi nggunakake sistem aparané, i.e. Sensitive. Awakdhéwé mengko nggawe kamulé karo Generalization kuwi kapan-kapan ning weruh kuwi.', 'ha': "Tilas ne ya ƙayyade mai shimfiɗawa masu tsohon shiryayyu masu amfani da shi a kan kãyan kwanan kwanan ƙidãya, ya ƙãga mutane research mai girma zuwa ƙarami misãlai masu girma. Amma, an ƙayyade ƙaranci wa kafin misãlai mai ƙayyade aikin. Daga wannan aikin, munã ƙidãya wasu hanyõyi masu tsari da ba'a samar da shi ba kan shiryoyin misãlai masu ƙayyade wa aikin da aka ƙayyade Aspect-based Analyze na Saukar (ABSA). A ƙayyade, Munã yin anayyar da sãɓãnin da aka sanar da kwamfyuta masu motsi da ake samu'ar da shiryoyin ayuka da aka yi taƙaita, don ka sami tsarin masu samu'ar da za'a sami taryutan sauri. Tuna buɗe wani misãlai dõmin ka nũna fikanci na lokacin da ke iya danganta a cikin duniya, a kan ka yi bincike da misali mai sauƙi na CNN. Dakata, za mu yi amfani da tumori ya nuna muhalli na-halin-sanar sammenliki da shi-mai-parametered-state-of-the-art a ƙarƙashin biyu na daidaita, kuma farko, za'a yi amfani da baƙatan babban aikin da ke amfani da shi a sami-aikin da ya ƙãga hanyoyi, misali, surori da na ƙarami da kuma a sami wani aikin daban, misali, Ana yi anadi. Tuna sami da mazaɓa masu husũma da zaɓen munafiki mai fahimta.", 'sk': 'Potreba po uvedbi obsežnih predhodno usposobljenih modelov na robnih napravah z omejenimi računalniškimi viri je privedla do obsežnih raziskav za stiskanje teh velikih modelov. Vendar pa je bilo manj pozornosti namenjeno stiskanju modelov, specifičnih za opravila. V tem delu smo raziskali različne metode nestrukturiranega obrezovanja na nalogah specifičnih modelih za naloge Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA). Natančneje analiziramo razlike v učni dinamiki obrezovanih modelov z uporabo standardnih tehnik obrezovanja za doseganje visokozmogljivih redkih omrežij. Razvijamo hipotezo za dokazovanje učinkovitosti lokalnega obrezovanja pred globalnim obrezovanjem ob upoštevanju preprostega modela CNN. Pozneje uporabimo hipotezo za dokazovanje učinkovitosti obrezanega state-of-the-art modela v primerjavi s prekomerno parametriziranim state-of-the-art modelom v dveh okoliščinah, pri čemer prvi upoštevamo osnovne črte za isto nalogo, ki je bila uporabljena za generiranje hipoteze, tj. ekstrakcijo vidikov, drugi pa upoštevamo drugačno nalogo, tj. sentimentalno analizo. Ponujamo tudi razpravo o posploševanju hipoteze obrezovanja.', 'bo': 'The need to deploy large-scale pre-trained models on edge devices under limited computational resources has led to substantial research to compress these large models. ཡིན་ནའང་། བྱ་འགུལ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་གཙང་དག་བཟོ་བ་སྤྱོད་མེད། In this work, we investigate the different methods of unstructured pruning on task-specific models for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis (ABSA) tasks. དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནང་གི་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྔོན་འཛིན་སྤྱད་པར་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་ལས་འཕགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བ་ཡིན་པ་ལ་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོ Later, we utilize the hypothesis to demonstrate the efficacy of the pruned state-of-the-art model compared to the over-parameterized state-of-the-art model under two settings, the first considering the baselines for the same task used for generating the hypothesis, i.e., aspect extraction and the second considering a different task, i.e., sentiment analysis. ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་ཆེད་དུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བ་དེ་རེད།', 'he': 'הצורך לפרסם מודלים גדולים מאומנים מראש על מכשירי קצה תחת משאבים מחשבים מוגבלים הוביל למחקר משמעותי כדי ללחוץ את המודלים הגדולים האלה. עם זאת, נותנה פחות תשומת לב ללחוץ את הדוגמנים המסופרים למשימות. בעבודה הזאת, אנו חוקרים את השיטות השוניות של שיקול לא מבושל על מודלים ספציפיים למשימות אנליזה רגשות מבוססת באפקט (ABSA). במיוחד, אנו מנתחים את ההבדלים בדינמיקה הלימודית של דוגמנים משוטטים על ידי השימוש בטכניקות השיקוי הסטנדרטיות כדי להשיג רשתות נפלאות בעלות ביצועים גבוהים. אנחנו מפתחים היפותזיה כדי להוכיח את היעילות של השקיעה מקומית על השקיעה גלובלית בהתחשב בדגם CNN פשוט. Later, we utilize the hypothesis to demonstrate the efficacy of the pruned state-of-the-art model compared to the over-parameterized state-of-the-art model under two settings, the first considering the baselines for the same task used for generating the hypothesis, i.e., aspect extraction and the second considering a different task, i.e., sentiment analysis.  אנחנו גם מספקים דיון בקשר לגנרליזציה של היפותזיה הקטנה.'}
{'en': 'A Dataset for Research on Modelling Depression Severity in Online Forum Data', 'ar': 'مجموعة بيانات للبحث في نمذجة شدة الاكتئاب في بيانات المنتدى عبر الإنترنت', 'fr': 'Un ensemble de données pour la recherche sur la modélisation de la gravité de la dépression dans les données', 'es': 'Un conjunto de datos para la investigación sobre el modelado de la gravedad de la depresión en los datos', 'pt': 'Um conjunto de dados para pesquisa sobre como modelar a gravidade da depressão em dados de fóruns online', 'ja': 'オンラインフォーラムデータにおけるうつ病重症度のモデリングに関する研究のためのデータセット', 'zh': '在线论坛数抑郁尤甚建模究其数集', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन फोरम डेटा में अवसाद गंभीरता मॉडलिंग पर अनुसंधान के लिए एक डेटासेट', 'ru': 'Набор данных для исследований по моделированию степени тяжести депрессии в данных онлайнового форума', 'ga': 'Tacar Sonraí le haghaidh Taighde ar Dhéine an Dúlagair a Shamhaltú i Sonraí an Fhóraim Ar Líne', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Adatkészlet a depresszió súlyosságának modellezésére az online fórumok adataiban', 'el': 'Ένα σύνολο δεδομένων για την έρευνα για τη μοντελοποίηση της σοβαρότητας της κατάθλιψης σε δεδομένα διαδικτυακού φόρουμ', 'it': 'Un dataset per la ricerca sulla modellazione della gravità della depressione nei dati del forum online', 'mk': 'A Dataset for Research on Modelling Depression Severity in Online Forum Data', 'lt': 'A Dataset for Research on Modelling Depression Severity in Online Forum Data', 'kk': 'Онлайн форум деректерінде үлгілеу депрессиясын зерттеу деректер бағдарламасы', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഫോറമിലെ ഡേറ്റാറ്റായില്\u200d മോഡേലിങ് ഡിപ്രഷന്\u200d കഠിനമായി പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡാറ്', 'mn': 'Онлайн форумын өгөгдлийн сангийн загварчлалын хэмжээний судалгааны өгөгдлийн сан', 'mt': 'Sett ta’ Dejta għar-Riċerka dwar il-Mudellar tas-Severità tad-Depressjoni fid-Dejta tal-Forum Online', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Un set de date pentru cercetare privind modelarea severității depresiei în datele forumului online', 'pl': 'Zestaw danych do badań nad modelowaniem ciężkości depresji w danych forum online', 'sr': 'Podaci za istraživanje o teškosti modela depresije u online forumu podacima', 'so': 'A Dataset for Research on Modelling Depression Severity in Online Forum Data', 'sv': 'Ett dataset för forskning om modellering av depressionsallvarlighet i onlineforumdata', 'ta': 'A Dataset for Research on Modelling Depression Severity in Online Forum Data', 'ur': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một bộ dữ liệu về nghiên cứu về áp suất mẫu trầm cảm nặng trên thông tin trực tuyến', 'uz': 'Name', 'nl': 'Een dataset voor onderzoek naar het modelleren van de ernst van depressie in online forumdata', 'hr': 'Datacija za istraživanje o teškosti modela depresije u podacima online foruma', 'bg': 'Набор от данни за изследване на моделирането на тежестта на депресията в онлайн форума данни', 'da': 'Et datasæt til forskning i modellering af depressionssværhedsgrad i online forum data', 'de': 'Ein Datensatz zur Modellierung der Depressionsschärfe in Online-Forendaten', 'ko': '온라인 포럼 데이터 중 우울증 심각도 모델링 연구 데이터 집합', 'id': 'A Dataset for Research on Modelling Depression Severity in Online Forum Data', 'sw': 'Taarifa ya Tafiti kwa ajili ya Kutafiti Kuhusu Kishinikizo cha Modelling', 'fa': 'Databases for Research on Modelling Depression Severity in Online Forum Data', 'af': "'n DatabaseComment", 'sq': 'Një bazë të dhënash për hulumtimin mbi modelimin e rëndësisë së depresionit në të dhënat e forumit online', 'tr': 'Online Forum Maglumaty', 'hy': 'Օնլայն ֆորմում տվյալների լուրջ դեպրեսիայի մոդելավորման հետազոտության տվյալների համակարգը', 'bn': 'অনলাইন ফোরাম তথ্যে মোডেলিং ডিপ্রেশনের কঠিন গবেষণার জন্য একটি ডাটাসেট', 'bs': 'Podaci za istraživanje o teškosti modela depresije u podacima online foruma', 'am': 'A Dataset for Research on Modelling Depression Severity in Online Forum Data', 'ca': 'Un conjunt de dades de recerca sobre la gravetat de la depressió', 'cs': 'Dataset pro výzkum modelování závažnosti deprese v online fórech', 'et': 'Depressiooni raskusastme modelleerimise andmekogum online foorumi andmetes', 'fi': 'Dataset for Research on Modelling Depression Severity in Online Forum Data', 'az': '쒰湴敲湥琠䙯牵洠噥物泉饲楮擉餠䵯摥汬즙湤楲楬즙渠䑥灲敳獩祡⁑쎼摲즙瑩⁁牡얟瓄녲浡⁍즙汵浡瓄넊', 'he': 'A Dataset for Research on Modelling Depression Severity in Online Forum Data', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Zbirka podatkov za raziskave o modeliranju resnosti depresije v podatkih spletnega foruma', 'bo': 'Online Forum Data'}
{'en': 'People utilize online forums to either look for information or to contribute it. Because of their growing popularity, certain online forums have been created specifically to provide support, assistance, and opinions for people suffering from mental illness. Depression is one of the most frequent psychological illnesses worldwide. People communicate more with online forums to find answers for their psychological disease. However, there is no mechanism to measure the severity of depression in each post and give higher importance to those who are diagnosed more severely depressed. Despite the fact that numerous researches based on online forum data and the identification of depression have been conducted, the severity of depression is rarely explored. In addition, the absence of datasets will stymie the development of novel diagnostic procedures for practitioners. From this study, we offer a dataset to support research on depression severity evaluation. The computational approach to measure an automatic process, identified severity of depression here is quite novel approach. Nonetheless, this elaborate measuring severity of depression in online forum posts is needed to ensure the measurement scales used in our research meets the expected norms of scientific research.', 'ar': 'يستخدم الأشخاص المنتديات عبر الإنترنت إما للبحث عن المعلومات أو للمساهمة فيها. نظرًا لشعبيتها المتزايدة ، تم إنشاء بعض المنتديات عبر الإنترنت خصيصًا لتقديم الدعم والمساعدة والآراء للأشخاص الذين يعانون من مرض عقلي. الاكتئاب هو أحد أكثر الأمراض النفسية انتشارًا في جميع أنحاء العالم. يتواصل الأشخاص بشكل أكبر مع المنتديات عبر الإنترنت للعثور على إجابات لمرضهم النفسي. ومع ذلك ، لا توجد آلية لقياس شدة الاكتئاب في كل منشور وإعطاء أهمية أكبر لأولئك الذين تم تشخيصهم بالاكتئاب الشديد. على الرغم من إجراء العديد من الأبحاث بناءً على بيانات المنتدى عبر الإنترنت وتحديد الاكتئاب ، إلا أنه نادرًا ما يتم استكشاف شدة الاكتئاب. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، سيؤدي عدم وجود مجموعات بيانات إلى إعاقة تطوير إجراءات تشخيصية جديدة للممارسين. من خلال هذه الدراسة ، نقدم مجموعة بيانات لدعم البحث في تقييم شدة الاكتئاب. النهج الحسابي لقياس عملية تلقائية ، وشدة الاكتئاب المحددة هنا هو نهج جديد تماما. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذا القياس الدقيق لشدة الاكتئاب في مشاركات المنتديات عبر الإنترنت ضروري للتأكد من أن مقاييس القياس المستخدمة في بحثنا تلبي المعايير المتوقعة للبحث العلمي.', 'pt': 'As pessoas utilizam fóruns on-line para procurar informações ou contribuir com elas. Devido à sua crescente popularidade, alguns fóruns online foram criados especificamente para fornecer apoio, assistência e opiniões para pessoas que sofrem de doenças mentais. A depressão é uma das doenças psicológicas mais frequentes em todo o mundo. As pessoas se comunicam mais com fóruns online para encontrar respostas para suas doenças psicológicas. No entanto, não existe um mecanismo para medir a gravidade da depressão em cada post e dar maior importância àqueles que são diagnosticados mais gravemente deprimidos. Apesar do fato de que inúmeras pesquisas baseadas em dados de fóruns online e na identificação de depressão foram realizadas, a gravidade da depressão raramente é explorada. Além disso, a ausência de conjuntos de dados impedirá o desenvolvimento de novos procedimentos de diagnóstico para os profissionais. A partir deste estudo, oferecemos um conjunto de dados para apoiar pesquisas sobre avaliação da gravidade da depressão. A abordagem computacional para medir um processo automático, a gravidade da depressão identificada aqui é uma abordagem bastante nova. No entanto, essa elaborada medição da gravidade da depressão em postagens em fóruns on-line é necessária para garantir que as escalas de medição usadas em nossa pesquisa atendam às normas esperadas da pesquisa científica.', 'es': 'Las personas utilizan los foros en línea para buscar información o para contribuir con ella. Debido a su creciente popularidad, se han creado algunos foros en línea específicamente para brindar apoyo, asistencia y opiniones a las personas que sufren enfermedades mentales. La depresión es una de las enfermedades psicológicas más frecuentes en todo el mundo. Las personas se comunican más a través de foros en línea para encontrar respuestas para su enfermedad psicológica. Sin embargo, no hay un mecanismo para medir la gravedad de la depresión en cada publicación y dar mayor importancia a aquellos a quienes se les diagnostica una depresión más grave. A pesar de que se han realizado numerosas investigaciones basadas en datos de foros en línea y la identificación de la depresión, rara vez se explora la gravedad de la depresión. Además, la ausencia de conjuntos de datos impedirá el desarrollo de procedimientos de diagnóstico novedosos para los profesionales. De este estudio, ofrecemos un conjunto de datos para apoyar la investigación sobre la evaluación de la gravedad de la depresión. El enfoque computacional para medir un proceso automático, identificó la gravedad de la depresión aquí, es un enfoque bastante novedoso. Sin embargo, esta elaborada medición de la gravedad de la depresión en publicaciones de foros en línea es necesaria para garantizar que las escalas de medición utilizadas en nuestra investigación cumplan con las normas esperadas de la investigación científica.', 'fr': "Les gens utilisent les forums en ligne pour rechercher des informations ou pour y contribuer. En raison de leur popularité croissante, certains forums en ligne ont été créés spécifiquement pour fournir un soutien, une assistance et des opinions aux personnes souffrant de maladies mentales. La dépression est l'une des maladies psychologiques les plus fréquentes dans le monde. Les gens communiquent davantage sur les forums en ligne pour trouver des réponses à leur maladie psychologique. Cependant, il n'existe aucun mécanisme permettant de mesurer la gravité de la dépression dans chaque poste et d'accorder une plus grande importance aux personnes diagnostiquées plus gravement déprimées. Malgré le fait que de nombreuses recherches basées sur les données des forums en ligne et l'identification de la dépression aient été menées, la gravité de la dépression est rarement explorée. En outre, l'absence d'ensembles de données entravera la mise au point de nouvelles procédures diagnostiques pour les praticiens. À partir de cette étude, nous proposons un ensemble de données pour soutenir la recherche sur l'évaluation de la gravité de la dépression L'approche computationnelle pour mesurer un processus automatique, la gravité identifiée de la dépression ici est une approche tout à fait nouvelle. Néanmoins, cette mesure détaillée de la gravité de la dépression dans les messages de forum en ligne est nécessaire pour garantir que les échelles de mesure utilisées dans nos recherches répondent aux normes attendues de la recherche scientifique.", 'ja': '人々はオンラインフォーラムを利用して情報を探したり、それを投稿したりします。 人気が高まっているため、特定のオンラインフォーラムは、精神疾患を患っている人々へのサポート、支援、意見を提供するために特別に作成されました。 うつ病は、世界で最も頻繁に起こる精神疾患の1つです。 人々はオンラインフォーラムとより多くのコミュニケーションをとり、彼らの心理的疾患の答えを見つけます。 しかしながら、各ポストにおけるうつの重症度を測定し、より重度のうつと診断された人をより重要視するメカニズムはない。 オンラインフォーラムのデータとうつ病の同定に基づく多数の研究が行われているにもかかわらず、うつ病の重症度はほとんど探求されていない。 さらに、データセットがないことは、開業医のための新規の診断手順の開発を妨げることになる。 この研究では、うつ病の重症度評価に関する研究をサポートするデータセットを提供しています。 ここで特定された抑うつの重症度を測定するための計算アプローチは非常に斬新なアプローチです。 それにもかかわらず、私たちの研究で使用される測定尺度が科学研究の期待される規範を満たすことを保証するために、オンラインフォーラムの投稿における抑うつの重症度を測定するこの精緻な方法が必要です。', 'zh': '人因在线论坛以求信献。 以其益受欢迎,在线论坛专主患精神疾病者,助议创立也。 抑郁症者,全球之心理疾病也。 人益与在线论坛交,以求心理疾病对。 然无机以量其抑郁症甚,而予之愈重抑郁症者愈重。 虽已多在线论坛数抑郁症之论,而抑郁症之甚者鲜矣。 此外,缺数据集将阻从业者开发新者。 以此论之,吾供一据集来抑郁症甚者论之。 量自度之数,于此定抑郁症之甚,此颇新术也。 虽然,须于网上论坛帖中详测抑郁症之甚,以保吾辈所用度中科学研究之期。', 'hi': 'लोग ऑनलाइन मंचों का उपयोग या तो जानकारी की तलाश करने या इसमें योगदान करने के लिए करते हैं। उनकी बढ़ती लोकप्रियता के कारण, कुछ ऑनलाइन मंचों को विशेष रूप से मानसिक बीमारी से पीड़ित लोगों के लिए समर्थन, सहायता और राय प्रदान करने के लिए बनाया गया है। अवसाद दुनिया भर में सबसे अधिक बार होने वाली मनोवैज्ञानिक बीमारियों में से एक है। लोग अपनी मनोवैज्ञानिक बीमारी के लिए जवाब खोजने के लिए ऑनलाइन मंचों के साथ अधिक संवाद करते हैं। हालांकि, प्रत्येक पोस्ट में अवसाद की गंभीरता को मापने और उन लोगों को उच्च महत्व देने के लिए कोई तंत्र नहीं है जो अधिक गंभीर रूप से उदास निदान किए जाते हैं। इस तथ्य के बावजूद कि ऑनलाइन फोरम डेटा और अवसाद की पहचान के आधार पर कई शोध किए गए हैं, अवसाद की गंभीरता का शायद ही कभी पता लगाया जाता है। इसके अलावा, डेटासेट की अनुपस्थिति चिकित्सकों के लिए उपन्यास नैदानिक प्रक्रियाओं के विकास को रोक देगी। इस अध्ययन से, हम अवसाद गंभीरता मूल्यांकन पर अनुसंधान का समर्थन करने के लिए एक डेटासेट प्रदान करते हैं। एक स्वचालित प्रक्रिया को मापने के लिए कम्प्यूटेशनल दृष्टिकोण, यहां अवसाद की पहचान की गंभीरता काफी उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण है। फिर भी, ऑनलाइन फोरम पदों में अवसाद की इस विस्तृत माप गंभीरता को मापने की आवश्यकता है ताकि यह सुनिश्चित किया जा सके कि हमारे शोध में उपयोग किए जाने वाले माप तराजू वैज्ञानिक अनुसंधान के अपेक्षित मानदंडों को पूरा करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Люди используют онлайн-форумы либо для поиска информации, либо для ее предоставления. Из-за их растущей популярности, некоторые онлайн-форумы были созданы специально для того, чтобы обеспечить поддержку, помощь и мнения для людей, страдающих психическими заболеваниями. Депрессия является одним из наиболее частых психических заболеваний во всем мире. Люди больше общаются с онлайн-форумами, чтобы найти ответы на свои психологические заболевания. Тем не менее, нет механизма для измерения тяжести депрессии в каждой должности и придавать большее значение тем, кто диагностируется более тяжелой депрессии. Несмотря на то, что были проведены многочисленные исследования, основанные на данных онлайн-форума и идентификации депрессии, тяжесть депрессии редко исследуется. Кроме того, отсутствие наборов данных затормозит разработку новых диагностических процедур для практикующих врачей. В этом исследовании мы предлагаем набор данных для поддержки исследований по оценке тяжести депрессии. Вычислительный подход к измерению автоматического процесса, выявленной здесь тяжести депрессии, является совершенно новым подходом. Тем не менее, эта сложная методика измерения тяжести депрессии в сообщениях онлайн-форума необходима для обеспечения того, чтобы шкалы измерений, используемые в наших исследованиях, соответствовали ожидаемым нормам научных исследований.', 'ga': 'Úsáideann daoine fóraim ar líne chun faisnéis a lorg nó chun cur leis. Mar gheall ar an méadú atá orthu, cruthaíodh fóraim áirithe ar líne go sonrach chun tacaíocht, cúnamh agus tuairimí a sholáthar do dhaoine atá ag fulaingt ó mheabhairghalar. Tá dúlagar ar cheann de na tinnis síceolaíochta is minice ar fud an domhain. Déanann daoine cumarsáid níos mó le fóraim ar líne chun freagraí a fháil ar a ngalar síceolaíochta. Mar sin féin, níl aon mheicníocht ann chun déine an dúlagar i ngach post a thomhas agus tábhacht níos airde a thabhairt dóibh siúd a ndéantar diagnóis orthu níos tromchúisí. In ainneoin go ndearnadh go leor taighde bunaithe ar shonraí fóraim ar líne agus chun dúlagar a aithint, is annamh a dhéantar iniúchadh ar dhéine an dúlagar. Ina theannta sin, cuirfidh easpa tacar sonraí bac ar fhorbairt nósanna imeachta diagnóiseacha núíosacha do chleachtóirí. Ón staidéar seo, cuirimid tacar sonraí ar fáil chun tacú le taighde ar mheastóireacht ar dhéine an dúlagair. Is cur chuige nua go leor é an cur chuige ríomhaireachtúil chun próiseas uathoibríoch a thomhas, déine an dúlagar a shainaithnítear anseo. Mar sin féin, tá gá leis an tomhas ilchasta seo ar dhéine an dúlagair i bpoist fóraim ar líne chun a chinntiú go gcomhlíonann na scálaí tomhais a úsáidtear inár dtaighde na noirm ionchais taighde eolaíoch.', 'hu': 'Az emberek online fórumokat használnak, hogy információkat keressenek vagy hozzájáruljanak hozzá. A növekvő népszerűségük miatt bizonyos online fórumokat kifejezetten azért hoztak létre, hogy támogatást, segítséget és véleményt nyújtsanak a mentális betegségben szenvedők számára. A depresszió az egyik leggyakoribb pszichológiai betegség világszerte. Az emberek többet kommunikálnak online fórumokkal, hogy válaszokat találjanak pszichológiai betegségeikre. Azonban nincs mechanizmus a depresszió súlyosságának mérésére minden posztban, és nagyobb jelentőséget tulajdonítanak azoknak, akiket súlyosabb depressziót diagnosztizálnak. Annak ellenére, hogy számos online fórumon alapuló kutatást végeztek, és a depresszió azonosítását vizsgálták, ritkán vizsgálják a depresszió súlyosságát. Ezenkívül az adatkészletek hiánya megakadályozza az új diagnosztikai eljárások kidolgozását a gyakorlók számára. Ebből a tanulmányból adatkészletet kínálunk a depresszió súlyosságának felmérésére vonatkozó kutatások támogatására. Az automatikus folyamat mérésére szolgáló számítástechnikai megközelítés, a depresszió súlyosságának azonosítása itt egészen új megközelítés. Ennek ellenére a depresszió súlyosságának az online fórumok posztjaiban történő kidolgozott mérésére szükség van annak biztosítására, hogy a kutatásunkban használt mérési skálák megfeleljenek a tudományos kutatások elvárt normáinak.', 'ka': 'ადამიანები იყენებენ ინფორმაციის შესაძლებელად, ან ინფორმაციის შესაძლებელად. მათი პოლუპულაციის გამოსახულებლად, განსაკუთრებული ინტერნეტური ფორმები იქნება სპექტიკურად, დახმარებისთვის და მისახულებისთვის ადამიანებისთვის, რომლებიც მესი დეპპრესია მსოფლიოდ სიკოლოგიური დაავადებების ერთი. ადამიანები უფრო კომუნიკაციებენ ინტერნეტიური ფორმებით, რომ საკუთარი ფსიკოლოგიური დაავადებებისთვის პასუხი იძებენ. მაგრამ, ყოველ პოსტში დეპრესციის ძალიან სიმართლე და უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი იყოს მათგანი, რომლებიც დიაგნოსტირებულიან უფრო ძალიან ევპრესტირებულია. არამედ, რამდენიმე მსგავსი პროგორმა მონაცემების და დემოპრესიის განსაცემების განსაცემების შემდეგ, დემოპრესიის ძალადობა არაფერად განსხვავებულია. დამატებით, მონაცემების არსებობა მონაცემების პროცექტურების განვითარებას. ამ სწავლიდან, ჩვენ მონაცემების სახელსაწყისთვის დემოპრესიის ძალიან გაუმუშაობის შესაძლებლობა. კომპუტაციალური პროცესი, ავტომატიური პროცესის განსაზღვრებული დეპრესიის ძალადობა აქ არის ახალი პროცესი. მაგრამ, ეს განსაზღვრებული ევპრესიის ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან უნდა იყოს ინტერნეტური ფორმის პოსტში, რომ დარწმუნოთ ჩვენი სწავლებში გამოიყენებული მარტილების სკენ უნდა იყოს მეცნიერ', 'el': 'Οι άνθρωποι χρησιμοποιούν διαδικτυακά φόρουμ είτε για να αναζητήσουν πληροφορίες είτε για να τις συνεισφέρουν. Λόγω της αυξανόμενης δημοτικότητάς τους, ορισμένα διαδικτυακά φόρουμ έχουν δημιουργηθεί ειδικά για να παρέχουν υποστήριξη, βοήθεια και απόψεις σε άτομα που πάσχουν από ψυχικές ασθένειες. Η κατάθλιψη είναι μια από τις πιο συχνές ψυχολογικές ασθένειες παγκοσμίως. Οι άνθρωποι επικοινωνούν περισσότερο με διαδικτυακά φόρουμ για να βρουν απαντήσεις για την ψυχολογική τους ασθένεια. Ωστόσο, δεν υπάρχει μηχανισμός για να μετρηθεί η σοβαρότητα της κατάθλιψης σε κάθε θέση και να δοθεί μεγαλύτερη σημασία σε όσους διαγνωστεί πιο σοβαρά κατάθλιψη. Παρά το γεγονός ότι έχουν διεξαχθεί πολυάριθμες έρευνες που βασίζονται σε διαδικτυακά δεδομένα φόρουμ και τον προσδιορισμό της κατάθλιψης, η σοβαρότητα της κατάθλιψης σπάνια διερευνάται. Επιπλέον, η απουσία συνόλων δεδομένων θα εμποδίσει την ανάπτυξη νέων διαγνωστικών διαδικασιών για τους επαγγελματίες. Από αυτή τη μελέτη, προσφέρουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων για την υποστήριξη της έρευνας σχετικά με την αξιολόγηση της σοβαρότητας της κατάθλιψης. Η υπολογιστική προσέγγιση για τη μέτρηση μιας αυτόματης διαδικασίας, που εντοπίστηκε η σοβαρότητα της κατάθλιψης εδώ είναι αρκετά νέα προσέγγιση. Ωστόσο, αυτή η λεπτομερής μέτρηση της σοβαρότητας της κατάθλιψης σε διαδικτυακά φόρουμ είναι απαραίτητη για να διασφαλιστεί ότι οι κλίμακες μέτρησης που χρησιμοποιούνται στην έρευνά μας πληρούν τους αναμενόμενους κανόνες της επιστημονικής έρευνας.', 'it': "Le persone utilizzano i forum online per cercare informazioni o per contribuire. A causa della loro crescente popolarità, alcuni forum online sono stati creati appositamente per fornire supporto, assistenza e opinioni alle persone che soffrono di malattie mentali. La depressione è una delle malattie psicologiche più frequenti al mondo. Le persone comunicano di più con i forum online per trovare risposte per la loro malattia psicologica. Tuttavia, non esiste alcun meccanismo per misurare la gravità della depressione in ogni post e dare maggiore importanza a coloro che sono diagnosticati più gravemente depressi. Nonostante siano state condotte numerose ricerche basate sui dati del forum online e sull'identificazione della depressione, la gravità della depressione è raramente esplorata. Inoltre, l'assenza di set di dati ostacolerà lo sviluppo di nuove procedure diagnostiche per i professionisti. Da questo studio, offriamo un set di dati a supporto della ricerca sulla valutazione della gravità della depressione. L'approccio computazionale per misurare un processo automatico, identificato la gravità della depressione qui è un approccio abbastanza nuovo. Tuttavia, questa complessa misura della gravità della depressione nei post del forum online è necessaria per garantire che le scale di misura utilizzate nella nostra ricerca soddisfino le norme previste dalla ricerca scientifica.", 'mk': 'Луѓето користат онлајн форуми за да бараат информации или да придонесат. Поради нивната растечка популарност, одредени онлајн форуми се создадени специфично за да обезбедат поддршка, помош и мислења за луѓето кои страдаат од ментална болест. Депресијата е една од најчестите психолошки болести во светот. Луѓето комуницираат повеќе со онлајн форуми за да најдат одговори за нивната психолошка болест. Сепак, нема механизам за мерење на сериозноста на депресијата во секој пост и да им даде поголема важност на оние кои се дијагнозирани посилно депресија. Despite the fact that numerous researches based on online forum data and the identification of depression have been conducted, the severity of depression is rarely explored.  Покрај тоа, отсуството на податоци ќе го стимулира развојот на нови дијагностички процедури за практичарите. Од оваа студија, нудиме податоци за поддршка на истражувањето за оценката на сериозноста на депресијата. Пресметачкиот пристап за мерење автоматски процес, идентификувана сериозност на депресија тука е прилично нов пристап. Сепак, оваа лабораториска мерка на сериозноста на депресијата на онлајн форумските постови е потребна за да се осигури дека мерувачките скали кои се користат во нашето истражување ги исполнуваат очекуваните норми на научно истражување.', 'lt': 'Žmonės naudojasi internetiniais forumais ieškoti informacijos arba prisidėti prie jos. Dėl didėjančio jų populiarumo buvo sukurti tam tikri internetiniai forumai, skirti paramai, pagalbai ir nuomonėms žmonėms, sergantiems psichikos ligomis. Depresija yra viena iš dažniausių psichologinių ligų pasaulyje. Žmonės labiau bendrauja su internetiniais forumais, kad rastų atsakymų į savo psichologinę ligą. Vis dėlto nėra mechanizmo kiekviename poste nustatyti depresijos sunkumą ir suteikti didesnę svarbą tiems, kuriems diagnozuota sunkesnė depresija. Despite the fact that numerous researches based on online forum data and the identification of depression have been conducted, the severity of depression is rarely explored.  Be to, duomenų rinkinių nebuvimas paskatins naujų diagnostikos procedūrų tobulinimą specialistams. From this study, we offer a dataset to support research on depression severity evaluation.  The computational approach to measure an automatic process, identified severity of depression here is quite novel approach.  Vis dėlto, norint užtikrinti, kad mūsų moksliniuose tyrimuose naudojami matavimo skalės atitiktų laukiamas mokslinių tyrimų normas, reikia išsamiai įvertinti depresijos sunkumą internetiniuose forumuose.', 'ms': 'People utilize online forums to either look for information or to contribute it.  Because of their growing popularity, certain online forums have been created specifically to provide support, assistance, and opinions for people suffering from mental illness.  Depression is one of the most frequent psychological illnesses worldwide.  People communicate more with online forums to find answers for their psychological disease.  Bagaimanapun, tiada mekanisme untuk mengukur kejahatan depresi di setiap pos dan memberikan kepentingan yang lebih besar kepada orang yang dijanjosi lebih keras depresi. Despite the fact that numerous researches based on online forum data and the identification of depression have been conducted, the severity of depression is rarely explored.  In addition, the absence of datasets will stymie the development of novel diagnostic procedures for practitioners.  From this study, we offer a dataset to support research on depression severity evaluation.  The computational approach to measure an automatic process, identified severity of depression here is quite novel approach.  Nonetheless, this elaborate measuring severity of depression in online forum posts is needed to ensure the measurement scales used in our research meets the expected norms of scientific research.', 'kk': 'Адамдар онлайн форумдарды мәліметті іздеу немесе оны қатынау үшін қолданылады. Олардың көптеген мәліметтерінің себебі, онлайн форумдары өзінің көмектесу, көмектесу және психикалық аурулардан көмектесу үшін құрылған. Депрессия әлемдегі психологиялық аурулардың ең көп бірі. Адамдар психологиялық ауруларының жауаптарын табу үшін онлайн форумлерімен көбірек байланысты. Бірақ, әрбір жолда депрессияның маңыздылығын өлшейтін механизмі жоқ және диагностикалардың маңыздылығын көбірек депрессияланған адамдардың маңыздылығын өзгертуге болмайды. Онлайн форум деректеріне негізделген көптеген зерттеулерді және депрессия идентификациясы жасалған, депрессия депрессиясының қанықтығы келмейді. Қосымша, деректер қорларының жоқ болмауы әрекеттердің романдық диагностикалық процедурлерін жасауға арналады. Бұл зерттеулерден депрессиялық қаттығын бағалау үшін деректер жиынын қолдау үшін қолданамыз. Автоматты процесті өлшеу үшін компьютерлік тәртібі, депрессияның қанықтығы осы жерде жаңа тәртібі бар. Әйтпесе, онлайн форум пошталарындағы депрессияның маңыздылығын өзгерту үшін, біздің зерттеулерімізде қолданылатын өлшемдер маңыздылығының күтпеген ғылыми зерттеулердің нормаларына сәйкес ке', 'mt': 'In-nies jużaw forums onlajn biex ifittxu jew jikkontribwixxuhom. Because of their growing popularity, certain online forums have been created specifically to provide support, assistance, and opinions for people suffering from mental illness.  Id-depressjoni hija waħda mill-mard psikoloġiku l-aktar frekwenti madwar id-dinja. People communicate more with online forums to find answers for their psychological disease.  However, there is no mechanism to measure the severity of depression in each post and give higher importance to those who are diagnosed more severely depressed.  Despite the fact that numerous researches based on online forum data and the identification of depression have been conducted, the severity of depression is rarely explored.  In addition, the absence of datasets will stymie the development of novel diagnostic procedures for practitioners.  From this study, we offer a dataset to support research on depression severity evaluation.  The computational approach to measure an automatic process, identified severity of depression here is quite novel approach.  Nonetheless, this elaborate measuring severity of depression in online forum posts is needed to ensure the measurement scales used in our research meets the expected norms of scientific research.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүс онлайн форумуудыг мэдээллийг хайж эсвэл түүнийг хайж, нэмрэх боломжтой ашигладаг. Тэдний нэр хүндрэлтэй болохоор зарим онлайн форумууд нь сэтгэл санааны өвчнөөс зовлон хүмүүст дэмжих, тусламжтай болон бодол санааг хангахад зориулагдсан. Дэлхийн хамгийн ихэвчлэн сэтгэл зүйн өвчнүүдийн нэг юм. Хүмүүс сэтгэл зүйн өвчнөөс хариултыг олохын тулд онлайн форумтай илүү холбоотой. Гэхдээ хэдий ч, хэмжээний депрессийг хэмжээнд хэмжээгээр, илүү хэмжээний депрессийг тодорхойлдог хүмүүст илүү чухал болгох механизм байхгүй. Интернет форумын өгөгдлийн үндсэн олон судалгаанууд, депрессийн тодорхойлолт хийгдсэн ч, депрессийн хэцүү хэцүү байдал ховор судалдаг. Мөн өгөгдлийн сангууд байхгүй байдал нь ажиллагчид шинэ диагностикийн процедурыг хөгжүүлэх болно. Энэ судалгаанаас бид депресс хүчирхэг үнэлгээний судалгаанд өгөгдлийн санг дэмжих боломжтой. Автоматикийн үйл явцыг хэмжих тооны арга бол энд депрессийн хүнд хэцүү байдал нь шинэ арга зам юм. Гэвч энэ онлайн форумын захиралд депрессийн хэмжээний хэмжээст хэмжээг бидний судалгаанд хэрэглэгдсэн хэмжээний хэмжээсүүд шинжлэх ухааны судалгааны хэмжээсүүдийг удирдах хэрэгтэй.', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുകയോ അതിന് ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയോ ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി ആളുകള്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഫോര്\u200dമുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗി അവരുടെ വളരെ പ്രശസ്തമായതിനാല്\u200d, ചില ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഫോര്\u200dമുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് സഹാ ഡിപ്രഷന്\u200d ലോകത്തിലെ ഏറ്റവും സൈക്കോളജിക്കല്\u200d രോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒന്നാണ്. അവരുടെ സൈക്കോളജിക്കല്\u200d രോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d ആളുകള്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഫോറമുകളോടൊപ്പം കൂടുതല്\u200d വ However, there is no mechanism to measure the severity of depression in each post and give higher importance to those who are diagnosed more severely depressed.  ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഫോറമിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി പല പഠനങ്ങളും വിപത്തിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിവും നടപ്പാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. വിപത്തിന്റെ കഠ കൂടാതെ, ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ ഇല്ലാത്തത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തകന്മാര്\u200dക്കുള്ള നോവല്\u200d ഡിയോഗിസ്റ്റ് പ്രക്രിയകളുടെ പ്രക്രിയയ ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് സജ്ജീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഡിപ്രേഷന്\u200d ഗുരുതരമായ വിലാസങ്ങളെ പ സ്വയം പ്രക്രിയയെ അളന്നുകൊടുക്കാനുള്ള കണക്കൂട്ടുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന ചെയ്യുന്നത്, വിപത്തിന്റെ ഗുരുതരമായ Nonetheless, this elaborate measuring severity of depression in online forum posts is needed to ensure the measurement scales used in our research meets the expected norms of scientific research.', 'ro': 'Oamenii folosesc forumuri online fie pentru a căuta informații, fie pentru a contribui cu ele. Datorită popularității lor tot mai mari, anumite forumuri online au fost create special pentru a oferi sprijin, asistență și opinii persoanelor care suferă de boli mintale. Depresia este una dintre cele mai frecvente boli psihologice la nivel mondial. Oamenii comunică mai mult cu forumurile online pentru a găsi răspunsuri pentru boala lor psihologică. Cu toate acestea, nu există niciun mecanism pentru a măsura severitatea depresiei în fiecare post și pentru a acorda o importanță mai mare celor care sunt diagnosticați mai grav depresie. În ciuda faptului că au fost efectuate numeroase cercetări bazate pe datele forumului online și identificarea depresiei, severitatea depresiei este rareori explorată. În plus, absența seturilor de date va împiedica dezvoltarea unor proceduri noi de diagnosticare pentru practicieni. Din acest studiu, oferim un set de date pentru a sprijini cercetarea privind evaluarea severității depresiei. Abordarea computațională pentru măsurarea unui proces automat, a severității depresiei identificate aici este o abordare destul de nouă. Cu toate acestea, această măsurare elaborată a severității depresiei în postările pe forum online este necesară pentru a se asigura că scalele de măsurare utilizate în cercetarea noastră respectă normele așteptate ale cercetării științifice.', 'sr': 'Ljudi koriste online forume da traže informacije ili doprinose. Zbog njihove rastuće popularnosti, određeni online forumi su stvoreni posebno kako bi pružili podršku, pomoć i mišljenje za ljude koji pate od mentalne bolesti. Depresija je jedna od najčešćih psiholoških bolesti na svijetu. Ljudi komuniciraju više sa online forumima da bi pronašli odgovore za njihovu psihološku bolest. Međutim, nema mehanizma za mjerenje težine depresije na svakoj postaji i pružanje veće važnosti onima koji su dijagnosticirani težim depresijom. Uprkos činjenici da je provedena brojna istraživanja bazirana na podacima o internetskom forumu i identifikaciji depresije, težina depresije retko se istražuje. Osim toga, nedostatak podataka će usmjeriti razvoj novih dijagnostičkih procedura za praktičnike. Iz ovog istraživanja nudimo set podataka za podršku istraživanja o procjeni težine depresije. Računalni pristup za mjerenje automatskog procesa, identifikovana težina depresije ovdje je prilično nov pristup. Međutim, ova razvijena mjerenja težine depresije na internetskim mestima foruma je potrebna kako bi se osigurala mjerenja koja se koristi u našim istraživanjima ispunjavala očekivane norme naučnog istraživanja.', 'no': 'Folk brukar nettforummer for å anten søkja etter informasjon eller bidra til det. På grunn av dei voksne populariteten er det oppretta nokre internetforume spesifikke for å gjera støtte, hjelp og meningar for folk som kjører av psykiske sykdommer. Depresjon er ein av dei mest ofte psihologiske sykdommane i verden. Folk kommuniserer meir med internettformar for å finna svar for sine psihologiske sykdomme. Det er imidlertid ingen mekanisme for å måle store depresjon i kvar post og gi høgare viktighet for dei som er diagnoserte meir vanskeleg. I tross av det faktum at mange forskningar baserte på internetforumdatar og identifikasjonen av depresjon er gjennomført, er det ofte utforska viktigheten av depresjon. I tillegg vil datasetingar ikkje finne, styme utviklinga av nye diagnostiske prosedyrar for praktiserar. Fra denne studien tilbyr vi ein dataset for å støtta forskning på avtrykk av avtrykk. Databasisk tilnærming for å måle eit automatisk prosess, identifisert store depresjon her er ganske novelt tilnærming. Dette er likevel nødvendig å gjera målinga av avtrykk i internetforumspostane for å sikre at målingskala bruka i forskningen vårt passar opp forventane norme for vitenskapelige forskning.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු අන්ලයින් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා තොරතුරු හොයාගන්න, නැත්තම් ඒක සද ඔවුන්ගේ වැඩිය ප්\u200dරමාණය නිසා, සමහර අන්තර්ජාත්මක විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධය, උදව්වක් සහ අදහස් කරනවා මිනිස්සු මානස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලෝකයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසික රෝගයක් එකක්. මිනිස්සු ඔවුන්ගේ මනුස්සික රෝගයේ උත්තර හොයාගන්න ඔන්ලායින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සමග තව සම්බන්ධ නමුත්, හැම පොස්ට් එක්කෙනෙක්ම විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල වෙන්නේ නැහැ ඒ වගේම විශාල විශ ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණය අන්තර්ජාත්මක තොරතුරු සහ අවස්ථාවේ පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, අවස්ථ ඒ වගේම, දත්ත සැට් නැති වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරේක්ෂකයෝ වෙනුවෙන් නිර්මාණ විද්\u200dයාපනය කරයි. මේ පරීක්ෂණයෙන්, අපි දත්ත සූදානයක් අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසයේ පරීක්ෂණය සහය කරන්න පුළුවන්. ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාවක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරවෘතිය, මෙතන ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dය නමුත්, මේ විශ්වාස කරන්නේ අන්තර්ජාතික විශ්වාස ස්ථානයේ විශ්වාස ස්ථානයේ විශ්වාස ස්ථානයේ විශ්වාස සංවේදනයේ', 'pl': 'Ludzie korzystają z forów online, aby szukać informacji lub wnieść je. Ze względu na ich rosnącą popularność, niektóre fora internetowe zostały stworzone specjalnie w celu zapewnienia wsparcia, pomocy i opinii dla osób cierpiących na choroby psychiczne. Depresja jest jedną z najczęstszych chorób psychicznych na świecie. Ludzie komunikują się bardziej z forami online, aby znaleźć odpowiedzi na ich choroby psychiczne. Nie ma jednak mechanizmu mierzenia ciężkości depresji w każdym stanie i nadawania większej wagi osobom, u których zdiagnozowano cięższą depresję. Pomimo przeprowadzenia licznych badań opartych na danych forum online i identyfikacji depresji, ciężkość depresji rzadko jest badana. Ponadto brak zbiorów danych utrudni rozwój nowych procedur diagnostycznych dla praktyków. Z tego badania oferujemy zbiór danych wspierający badania nad oceną ciężkości depresji. Podejście obliczeniowe do pomiaru automatycznego procesu, zidentyfikowanego nasilenia depresji jest dość nowatorskim podejściem. Niemniej jednak, ten szczegółowy pomiar ciężkości depresji w postach online forum jest niezbędny, aby zapewnić, że skale pomiarowe stosowane w naszych badaniach spełniają oczekiwane normy badań naukowych.', 'sv': 'Människor använder onlineforum för att antingen leta efter information eller bidra med den. På grund av deras växande popularitet har vissa onlineforum skapats specifikt för att ge stöd, hjälp och åsikter till människor som lider av psykisk ohälsa. Depression är en av de vanligaste psykologiska sjukdomarna världen över. Människor kommunicerar mer med onlineforum för att hitta svar på deras psykiska sjukdom. Det finns dock ingen mekanism för att mäta svårighetsgraden av depression i varje post och ge högre vikt till dem som diagnostiseras allvarligare depression. Trots det faktum att många undersökningar baserade på online forum data och identifiering av depression har genomförts, svårighetsgraden av depression utforskas sällan. Dessutom kommer avsaknaden av datamängder att hindra utvecklingen av nya diagnostiska förfaranden för utövare. Utifrån denna studie erbjuder vi ett dataset för att stödja forskning om depressions svårighetsgrad utvärdering. Beräkningsmetoden för att mäta en automatisk process, identifierad svårighetsgrad av depression här är ganska ny metod. Trots detta behövs denna omfattande mätning av depressionens svårighetsgrad i onlineforuminlägg för att säkerställa att mätskalorna som används i vår forskning uppfyller de förväntade normerna för vetenskaplig forskning.', 'ur': 'انسان ان ان لائن فورمز کا استعمال کرتا ہے یا اطلاعات کا تلاش کرتا ہے یا اس کی مدد کرتا ہے۔ ان کی بڑی جماعت کی وجہ سے، کچھ آنلاین فورمز مخصوصاً پیدا کیے گئے ہیں کہ ان لوگوں کے لئے مدد، مدد اور نظریں دینے کے لئے روانی بیماری کے مصیبت میں مبتلا ہیں۔ افسردگی دنیا میں سب سے زیادہ عام روانی بیماری ہے۔ لوگوں نے ان کے روانی بیماری کے جواب پانے کے لئے آنلاین فورمز کے ساتھ زیادہ ارتباط کی۔ However, there is no mechanism for measuring depression severity in each post and giving higher importance to those who are diagnosed more depressed. اگرچہ بہت سی تحقیقات آنلاین فوروم ڈاٹی پر بنیاد رکھی گئی ہیں اور افسردگی کی شناسایی کرلی گئی ہے، افسردگی کی سختی کم کم تحقیق کی جاتی ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ، ڈاٹ سٹ کے غیر موجود ہونے والے کے لئے نو ڈاٹ سٹ کی پردازیوں کی توسعہ پیدا کرے گا۔ اس مطالعہ سے ہم نے ایک ڈیٹ سٹ کو ڈیٹ سٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کمپیوٹریشن طریقہ ایک آٹوٹی پرسس اندازے کے لئے، افسردگی کی شدت پہچان دی گئی ہے یہاں بہت نئی طریقہ ہے. لیکن، یہ اندازہ اندازہ آنلاین فورمز پوسٹوں میں افسردگی کی سختی کا اندازہ کرنا ضرورت ہے کہ ہمارے تحقیقات میں استعمال ہونے والی اندازہ مقدار کو ثابت قدم رکھنے کے لئے ہمارے تحقیقات میں استعمال کیا گیا ہے، علم تحقیقات کی انتظار کی قومو', 'so': 'Dadka waxay isticmaalaan jardiinada internetka si ay macluumaad u raadsadaan ama ay u faa’iideeyaan. Dadka cudurka dhimirka ka xanuunsada waxaa la abuuray jardiinooyinka internetka qaarkood oo gaar ah, in la siiyo caawimaad, caawimaad iyo fikir. Depressu waa mid ka mid ah cudurada dhimirka ee caalamka ah. Macluumaad dheeraad ah waxaa loola xiriiraa jardiinada internetka si ay uga helaan jawaabo cudurada dhimirka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee ma jirto meymisyo ku qiyaasa daryeelka kharribka ee warqad kastaba ku jirta iyo kuwa si ka sii daran u xishoonaya. Inta kastoo la sameeyo baaritaan badan oo ku saleysan macluumaadka shabakada internetka iyo aqoonsiga xisaabta, waxaa wax yar la baadhay dhibaatada murugga. Intaas waxaa dheer in la’aanta kooxda macluumaadka la’aanta lagu sameynayo horumarinta koorasyada aqoonsiga saxda ee shaqo-bixiyayaasha. Waxbarashadan waxan ka soo bandhignaa koox macluumaad ah oo lagu kaalmeeyo baaritaanka ku saabsan qiimeynta dhibaatada deegaanka. Xaaladda xisaabta ee lagu qiyaaso baaraandegista bilowga ah, waxaa lagu caddeeyey daryeelka murugga halkan waa habka saxda ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa loo baahan yahay qiyaastii daryeelka kharribka ee warqadaha internetka looga baahan yahay in la xaqiijiyo qiyaasta lagu isticmaalo baaritaanka waxbarashadayada waxaa la kulmaa caadooyinka la rajaynayo cilmiyeed.', 'ta': 'மக்கள் தகவலை தேடுவதற்காகவோ அல்லது பங்கு செய்ய இணைய தளங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறார்கள். அவர்களின் அதிகரித்த மக்கள் காரணமாக, சில இணைய தளங்கள் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது குறிப்பாக ஆதரவு, உதவி மற்றும் கருத்துகளை வழங்குவதற்கா அழுத்தம் உலகத்தில் மிகவும் அதிகமாக மனநோய் நோய்களில் உள்ளது. மக்கள் அவர்களுடைய மனநோயிற்கு பதில்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க online forums மேலும் தொடர்பு கொள்கிறார்கள். ஆயினும், ஒவ்வொரு புதியிலும் கவலைப்படுத்தலின் கடுமையை அளக்க முறைமையில் இல்லை மற்றும் மேலும் கவலைப்படுத்தப்பட்டவர்களுக் ஆனால் ஆன்லைன் குறிப்பு தகவல் மற்றும் depression அடையாளம் அடிப்படையில் பல ஆராய்ச்சிகள் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது என்றாலும், depression கடுமையின் கடுமையான In addition, the absence of datasets will stymie the development of novel diagnostic procedures for practitioners.  இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியிலிருந்து, நாம் ஒரு தரவு அமைப்பை வழங்குகிறோம் ஆபத்திற்கு கடுமையான மதிப்பினை ஆதர தானியங்கி செயலை அளக்க கணக்கீட்டு முறையில் கணிப்பாக, depression கடுமையை கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது இங்கு நிறைய நே ஆனாலும், இந்த விளக்கம் அறிவியல் ஆராய்ச்சியின் எதிர்பார்க்கப்படும் ஆய்வுகளில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட அளபுரைகளை உறுதிப்படுத்த வேண்டும்.', 'uz': "Одамлар интернетнинг маълумотларини талаб қилиши ёки ундан фойдаланиш учун фойдаланади. Ko'rib chiqish uchun, har bir nechta online forumlar yaratildi. Menyu kasalliklargan odamlar uchun qoʻllash, yordam va fikrlarni qo'llash uchun. Ko'rinishi dunyodagi eng ko'p psykologik kasalliklarning biri. Одамлар ўз psykologik kasalliklarning javoblarini topish uchun Online forumlari bilan muloqat qiladi. Lekin, har bir postdagi o'zgarishni o'zgartirish uchun hech qanday mechanism yo'q va o'zgarishni ko'proq o'zgartirish mumkin. Online forum maʼlumoti asosida ko'pchilik o'rganishlar va o'zgarishni aniqlashni bajarildi bo'lsa, boshqarish darajasi juda kam qidiriladi. Koʻrsatilgan maʼlumot sahifalari mavjud emas, ishlatilgan vazifalar uchun novel diagnostic vazifalarni tuzib olish mumkin. Bu o'qituvdan, biz bir maʼlumot tarkibini o'rganishni o'rganishga qo'llayapmiz. Name Lekin, Online forumning postlarida harakat qilish darajasini aniqlash kerak. Ilmiy tafotimizda ishlatilgan o'zgarishni tasdiqlash kerak.", 'vi': 'Người ta sử dụng các diễn đàn online để tìm kiếm thông tin hoặc đóng góp nó. Do phổ biến của họ ngày càng nhiều, các diễn đàn trên mạng được tạo ra để hỗ trợ, hỗ trợ và ý kiến cho những người mắc bệnh tâm thần. Trầm cảm là một trong những bệnh tâm lý thường xuyên nhất trên thế giới. Người ta liên lạc nhiều hơn với các diễn đàn online để tìm câu trả lời cho bệnh tâm lý. Tuy nhiên, không có cơ chế nào để đo mức độ trầm cảm ở mỗi trạm và cho những người được chẩn đoán bị trầm cảm nặng hơn. Mặc dù đã thực hiện nhiều nghiên cứu dựa trên dữ liệu forum trực tuyến và nhận dạng trầm cảm, mức độ trầm cảm hiếm khi được khám phá. Thêm vào đó, sự vắng mặt các tập tin sẽ thúc đẩy việc phát triển các thủ tục chẩn đoán mới cho các người. Từ nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi cung cấp dữ liệu hỗ trợ nghiên cứu về mức độ trầm cảm. Tính to án để đo một quá trình tự động, mức độ trầm cảm xác định ở đây là cách tiếp cận hoàn toàn mới. Tuy nhiên, mức độ trầm cảm phức tạp trong các diễn văn trực tuyến cần thiết để đảm bảo những thang đo được sử dụng trong nghiên cứu, đáp ứng các tiêu chuẩn dự kiến của nghiên cứu khoa học.', 'bg': 'Хората използват онлайн форуми, за да търсят информация или да я допринесат. Поради нарастващата им популярност, някои онлайн форуми са създадени специално, за да предоставят подкрепа, помощ и мнения за хора, страдащи от психични заболявания. Депресията е едно от най-честите психологически заболявания в световен мащаб. Хората общуват повече с онлайн форуми, за да намерят отговори за психологическото си заболяване. Въпреки това, няма механизъм за измерване на тежестта на депресията във всеки пост и придаване на по-голямо значение на тези, които са диагностицирани по-тежко депресирани. Въпреки факта, че са проведени множество изследвания, базирани на данни от онлайн форуми и идентифициране на депресията, тежестта на депресията рядко се изследва. Освен това липсата на набори от данни ще възпрепятства разработването на нови диагностични процедури за практикуващите. От това проучване предлагаме набор от данни в подкрепа на изследванията за оценка на тежестта на депресията. Изчислителният подход за измерване на автоматичен процес, идентифицирана тежест на депресията тук е доста нов подход. Въпреки това, това сложно измерване на тежестта на депресията в онлайн форумите е необходимо, за да се гарантира, че измервателните скали, използвани в нашето изследване, отговарят на очакваните норми на научните изследвания.', 'nl': 'Mensen gebruiken online forums om informatie te zoeken of bij te dragen. Vanwege hun groeiende populariteit zijn bepaalde online forums speciaal gecreëerd om ondersteuning, hulp en meningen te bieden aan mensen die lijden aan psychische aandoeningen. Depressie is een van de meest voorkomende psychische ziekten wereldwijd. Mensen communiceren meer met online forums om antwoorden te vinden op hun psychische ziekte. Er is echter geen mechanisme om de ernst van depressie in elke post te meten en meer belang te geven aan degenen die ernstiger depressief worden gediagnosticeerd. Ondanks het feit dat tal van onderzoeken op basis van online forumdata en de identificatie van depressie zijn uitgevoerd, wordt de ernst van depressie zelden onderzocht. Bovendien zal het ontbreken van datasets de ontwikkeling van nieuwe diagnostische procedures voor beoefenaars belemmeren. Uit deze studie bieden we een dataset aan ter ondersteuning van onderzoek naar depressie ernst evaluatie. De computationele benadering om een automatisch proces te meten, geïdentificeerde ernst van depressie hier is vrij nieuwe benadering. Niettemin is deze uitgebreide meting van de ernst van depressie in online forumberichten nodig om ervoor te zorgen dat de meetschalen die in ons onderzoek worden gebruikt voldoen aan de verwachte normen van wetenschappelijk onderzoek.', 'da': 'Folk bruger online fora til enten at lede efter oplysninger eller bidrage med det. På grund af deres voksende popularitet er visse online fora blevet oprettet specielt for at yde støtte, hjælp og meninger til mennesker, der lider af psykisk sygdom. Depression er en af de hyppigste psykologiske sygdomme verden over. Folk kommunikerer mere med online fora for at finde svar på deres psykologiske sygdom. Der er dog ingen mekanisme til at måle sværhedsgraden af depression i hver post og give større betydning til dem, der diagnosticeres mere alvorligt deprimeret. På trods af at mange undersøgelser baseret på online forum data og identifikation af depression er blevet udført, sværhedsgraden af depression er sjældent undersøgt. Desuden vil manglen på datasæt hindre udviklingen af nye diagnostiske procedurer for praktiserende læger. Fra denne undersøgelse tilbyder vi et datasæt til støtte for forskning i sværhedsvurdering af depression. Den beregningsmæssige tilgang til at måle en automatisk proces, identificeret sværhedsgrad af depression her er ganske ny tilgang. Ikke desto mindre er denne omfattende måling af sværhedsgraden af depression i online forum indlæg nødvendig for at sikre, at måleskalaene anvendt i vores forskning opfylder de forventede normer for videnskabelig forskning.', 'hr': 'Ljudi koriste internetske forume kako bi tražili informacije ili doprinosili. Zbog njihove rastuće popularnosti, određeni online forumi su stvoreni posebno kako bi se pružili podršku, pomoć i mišljenja za ljude koji pate od mentalne bolesti. Depresija je jedna od najčešćih psiholoških bolesti na svijetu. Ljudi komuniciraju više s internetskim forumima kako bi pronašli odgovore za njihovu psihološku bolest. Međutim, nema mehanizma za mjerenje težine depresije na svakoj postaji i pružanje veće važnosti onima koji su dijagnosticirani teže depresivnijim. Unatoč činjenici da je provedena brojna istraživanja na temelju podataka o internetskom forumu i identifikacije depresije, rijetko se istražuje težina depresije. Osim toga, nedostatak podataka će usmjeriti razvoj novih dijagnostičkih postupaka za praktičnike. Iz ovog ispitivanja nudimo podatke za podršku istraživanja o procjeni težine depresije. Računalni pristup mjerenju automatskog procesa, identificirana težina depresije ovdje je prilično nov pristup. Ipak, potrebna je ova razvijena mjerenja težine depresije na mjestima internetskog foruma kako bi se osigurala mjerenja koja se koristi u našim istraživanjima ispunjavala očekivane norme naučnog istraživanja.', 'id': 'Orang menggunakan forum online untuk mencari informasi atau untuk memberikannya. Karena popularitas mereka meningkat, beberapa forum online telah diciptakan secara khusus untuk memberikan dukungan, bantuan, dan pendapat untuk orang-orang yang menderita penyakit mental. Depresi adalah salah satu penyakit psikologi paling sering di seluruh dunia. Orang berkomunikasi lebih banyak dengan forum online untuk menemukan jawaban untuk penyakit psikologi mereka. Namun, tidak ada mekanisme untuk mengukur keras depresi di setiap pos dan memberikan lebih penting bagi orang yang diagnosis lebih keras depresi. Meskipun fakta bahwa banyak penelitian berdasarkan data forum online dan identifikasi depresi telah dilakukan, berat depresi jarang dikeksplorasi. Selain itu, ketidakhadiran dataset akan menimbulkan perkembangan prosedur diagnostik baru untuk praktek. Dari studi ini, kami menawarkan dataset untuk mendukung penelitian tentang evaluasi serius depresi. Pendekatan komputasi untuk mengukur proses otomatis, identifikasi serius depresi di sini adalah pendekatan yang cukup baru. Namun, pengukuran keras depresi ini dalam pos forum online dibutuhkan untuk memastikan skala pengukuran yang digunakan dalam penelitian kita memenuhi norma yang diharapkan penelitian ilmiah.', 'ko': '사람들은 온라인 포럼을 이용하여 정보를 찾거나 제공한다.이들이 갈수록 인기를 끌고 있기 때문에, 일부 온라인 포럼은 정신질환을 앓고 있는 사람들에게 전문적으로 지원, 도움, 의견을 제공한다.우울증은 전 세계에서 가장 흔히 볼 수 있는 심리 질환 중의 하나다.사람들은 온라인 커뮤니티를 통해 심리적 질병에 대한 답을 더 많이 찾는다.그러나 직장마다 우울증의 심각성을 가늠하고 더 심각한 우울증으로 진단된 사람들을 더욱 중시하는 메커니즘은 아직 없다.온라인 포럼 데이터와 우울증 식별을 바탕으로 한 연구가 대량으로 진행되었지만 우울증의 심각성을 연구하는 경우는 드물다.이 밖에 데이터 집합의 부족은 종사자들의 새로운 진단 프로그램 개발을 방해할 것이다.이 연구에서 우리는 우울증의 심각도 평가를 지원하는 데이터 집합을 제공했다.계산 방법으로 자동 과정을 측정하여 우울증의 심각도를 확정하는 것은 매우 새로운 방법이다.그럼에도 불구하고 온라인 포럼 게시물에서 우울증의 심각성을 상세히 측정해 우리 연구에서 사용된 측정량표가 예상한 과학 연구 규범에 부합하도록 해야 한다.', 'fa': 'مردم برای جستجوی اطلاعات یا کمک کردنش از فورمهای آنلاین استفاده می کنند. به خاطر شهرت بزرگی آنها، برخی از فورمان\u200cهای آنلاین خاص برای حمایت، کمک و نظریه\u200cهایی برای مردم که از بیماری روانی رنج می\u200cبرند، ایجاد شده\u200cاند. Depression is one of the most frequent psychological illnesses worldwide. مردم با فرموم های آنلاین بیشتر ارتباط می کنند تا جواب بیماری روانی خود را پیدا کنند. ولی هیچ مکانیسمی برای اندازه شدت افسردگی در هر منطقه وجود ندارد و برای کسانی که تشخیص داده شده شدت افسردگی بیشتری به آنها اهمیت می دهد. با وجود اینکه تعداد زیادی از تحقیقات بر اساس اطلاعات فورمی آنلاین و شناسایی افسردگی انجام شده، سختی افسردگی کمی تحقیق می\u200cشود. در addition, absence of datasets will stylize the development of novel diagnostic procedures for practitioners. از این مطالعه، ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات را برای پشتیبانی تحقیقات شدت افسردگی پیشنهاد می کنیم. روش محاسباتی برای اندازه یک فرایند خودکار، شدت افسردگی شناسایی در اینجا کاملاً روش جدید است. با این وجود، این اندازه\u200cگیری شدت افسردگی در پوست\u200cهای فورمی آنلاین نیاز است تا مطمئن شود که مقدار اندازه\u200cگیری که در تحقیقات ما استفاده می\u200cشود در نقطه\u200cهای انتظار تحقیقات علمی را پیدا کند.', 'de': 'Menschen nutzen Online-Foren, um entweder nach Informationen zu suchen oder sie beizusteuern. Aufgrund ihrer wachsenden Popularität wurden bestimmte Online-Foren speziell eingerichtet, um Menschen mit psychischen Erkrankungen Unterstützung, Unterstützung und Meinungen zu bieten. Depressionen sind eine der häufigsten psychischen Erkrankungen weltweit. Menschen kommunizieren mehr mit Online-Foren, um Antworten auf ihre psychische Krankheit zu finden. Es gibt jedoch keinen Mechanismus, um die Schwere der Depression in jedem Posten zu messen und denjenigen, die schwerer depressiv diagnostiziert werden, eine höhere Bedeutung zu geben. Trotz der Tatsache, dass zahlreiche Forschungen auf der Grundlage von Online-Forendaten und der Identifizierung von Depressionen durchgeführt wurden, wird die Schwere der Depression selten untersucht. Darüber hinaus wird das Fehlen von Datensätzen die Entwicklung neuer diagnostischer Verfahren für Praktiker behindern. Aus dieser Studie bieten wir einen Datensatz zur Unterstützung der Erforschung des Schweregrades von Depressionen an. Der computergestützte Ansatz zur Messung eines automatischen Prozesses, identifizierter Schweregrad der Depression hier, ist ein ganz neuer Ansatz. Dennoch ist diese aufwändige Messung des Schweregrades der Depression in Online-Forenbeiträgen notwendig, um sicherzustellen, dass die Messskalen, die in unserer Forschung verwendet werden, den erwarteten Normen der wissenschaftlichen Forschung entsprechen.', 'tr': 'Adamlar online forumlary ýa-da maglumat gözlemek ýa-da kömekleşmek üçin ullanýarlar. Olaryň ösdüren meşhurlikleri sebäbi, internetde birnäçe forumlar diňe kömek, kömek we akyllaryny düşürmek üçin döredildi. Depressiýa dünýäde iň köplenç psikolojik hasaplardan biri. Adamlar psikolojik ýarawsyzlyklary üçin jogaplary tapmak üçin internetde forumlar bilen köpräk habarlaşýarlar. Ýöne, her ýerde deprimsiýasynyň çykyşlygyny ölçüp, ýokary çykyşlygyny diýmek üçin ýokary wajyp bermek üçin hiç hili mehanizmi ýok. online forum maglumatynda daýalan birnäçe barlag we depresiýasynyň kimligi çykarmasynda, depresiýasynyň çykyşlygyny az bolar. Munuň üstine, veri setirleriniň ýok bolmagy praktikantlar üçin roman diagnostik prosedürlerini geliştirmegini bejerjekdir. Bu araşdyrmadan, depresiýa çykyşlygyny barlamak üçin maglumat setirini teklip edýäris. Otomatik proses ölçüsi we depresiýasynyň çykyşlygyny bu ýerde esasy taýýarlama ýagdaýdyr. Yine de, bu internet forumlaryň ýerlerinde üýtgeşmeleri çözümlenmäge meýilleşdirýän ölçülemek üçin gerekli.', 'sw': 'Watu wanatumia majukwaa ya mtandaoni ili kutafuta taarifa au kuchangia. Kwa sababu ya umaarufu wao unaongezeka, majukwaa kadhaa ya mtandaoni yametengenezwa hasa kwa ajili ya kutoa misaada, misaada na maoni kwa watu wanaotumia ugonjwa wa akili. Kushinikiza ni moja ya magonjwa ya kisaikolojia zaidi duniani kote. Watu wanawasiliana na majukwaa ya mtandaoni ili kutafuta majibu ya ugonjwa wao wa kisaikolojia. Hata hivyo, hakuna mfumo wa kupima ukatili wa mawazo katika kila makala na kuwapa umuhimu mkubwa kwa wale wanaotambuliwa wanaoshukiwa sana. Despite the fact that numerous researches based on online forum data and the identification of depression have been conducted, the severity of depression is rarely explored.  Zaidi ya hayo, kutokuwepo kwa seti za taarifa zitatumia maendeleo ya utambulisho wa kisasa kwa watumiaji. Kutoka kwenye utafiti huu, tunatoa seti ya taarifa ili kuunga mkono utafiti wa uchunguzi wa ukali wa mawazo. Hatua ya hesabu ya kupima mchakato wa kujitegemea, imeonyesha hali ngumu ya mawazo hapa ni mbinu za kisasa. Hata hivyo, maelezo haya yanahitaji kupunguza ukatili wa mawasiliano kwenye makala za jukwaa la mtandaoni ili kuhakikisha kiwango cha upasuaji kinachotumiwa katika utafiti wetu unakutana na kanuni zinazotarajiwa ya utafiti wa kisayansi.', 'am': 'ሰዎች መረጃ ይፈልጋሉ ወይም ማጠቃለያቸውን ይፈልጋሉ፡፡ በአካባቢው ግዜ ምክንያት አንዳንዶች የኢንተርኔት ጦማሪያዎች በሐሳብ ደዌ ለሚቀበሉ ሰዎች እርዳታን፣ እርዳታ እና አስተያየት እንዲሰጡ ተፈጠሩ፡፡ ድምፅ በዓለም ሁሉ በጣም ብዙ የሲኮሎጂ ደዌዎች አንዱ ነው፡፡ People communicate more with online forums to find answers for their psychological disease.  ነገር ግን እያንዳንዱ ፖለቲካ ላይ የድፍረትን ኃይል ለመለካት እና ለሚያደነቁት አብልጠው አዋቂ ማሰናከል የለውም፡፡ ምንም እንኳን በመስመር የፎርማት ዳታ እና የመጽናት ማውቀት የተደረገ ብዙ ምርመራዎች ቢሆኑ የድህረት ኃይሉ ጥቂት ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የዳታ ሰርቨሮች የኖሮውን አካባቢ ሥርዓት ለመፈለግ የሚያስፈልጉትን ያሳያል፡፡ ከዚህ ትምህርት ጀምሮ የድምፅ ግጭት ማስታወቂያውን ለመደገፍ የዳታ ደረጃዎችን አቀረብናል፡፡ አካባቢ ፕሮግራሙን ለመለካት የቁጥጥር ሥርዓት፣ የድህነትን ኃይለኛ ወደዚህ አዲስ ቀላል ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳ፣ ይህ የኢንተርኔት ፎርፖርት የድህነትን ግጭት በመለካት የሳይንቀሳዊ ትምህርት ተቃውሞ የሚጠቅመውን ሚዛን ለማረጋገጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մարդիկ օգտագործում են առցանց ֆորմերը կամ ինֆորմացիա փնտրելու, կամ դրա աջակցության համար: Նրանց աճող բնակչության շնորհիվ որոշ առցանց ֆորմներ ստեղծվել են հատկապես հոգեկան հիվանդություններից տառապող մարդկանց աջակցության, օգնության և կարծիքների համար: Դեպրեսիան աշխարհի ամենահաճախ հոգեբանական հիվանդություններից մեկն է: Մարդիկ ավելի շատ հաղորդակցվում են առցանց ֆորմերի հետ, որպեսզի գտնեն պատասխաններ իրենց հոգեբանական հիվանդություններին: Այնուամենայնիվ, դեպրեսիայի կարևորությունը չափելու մեխանիզմ չկա յուրաքանչյուր գրասենյակում և ավելի կարևոր դարձնել նրանց համար, ովքեր ախտորոշվում են ավելի կարևոր դեպրեսիայի դեպրեսիային: Despite the fact that numerous researches based on online forum data and the identification of depression have been conducted, the severity of depression is rarely explored.  Ավելին, տվյալների բացակայությունը կխթանի փորձագետների համար նոր ախտորոշման գործընթացների զարգացումը: Այս ուսումնասիրության արդյունքում մենք տվյալներ ենք առաջարկում, որպեսզի աջակցենք դեպրեսիայի ծանրության գնահատման հետազոտությունները: The computational approach to measure an automatic process, identified severity of depression here is quite novel approach.  Այնուամենայնիվ, այս խրթին չափման դեպրեսիայի ծանրությունը առցանց ֆորմում տեղադրված տեղադրություններում անհրաժեշտ է, որպեսզի ապահովեն, որ մեր հետազոտության մեջ օգտագործվող չափման մակարդակները համապատասխանեն գիտական հետազոտության', 'bn': 'People utilize online forums to either look for information or to contribute it.  তাদের জনপ্রিয় জনপ্রিয়তার কারণে কিছু অনলাইন ফোরাম তৈরি করা হয়েছে বিশেষ করে মানসিক অসুস্থ লোকদের জন্য সমর্থন, সহায়তা এবং মতামত প ডিপ্রেশন বিশ্বের সবচেয়ে প্রায়শই মানসিক রোগ। মানুষ তাদের মানসিক রোগের উত্তর খুঁজে বের করতে অনলাইন ফোরামে আরো যোগাযোগ করে। তবে প্রতিটি পোস্টের দমনের কঠোর পরিমাপের কোন মাধ্যম নেই এবং যাদের চিন্তা করা হয় তাদের কাছে আরো বেশী দুঃখের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ অনলাইন ফোরামের তথ্য এবং দমনের চিহ্নের উপর ভিত্তিক অনেক গবেষণা করা হয়েছে সত্ত্বেও, দুঃখের কঠোর বিষয়টি খুব কম খুঁজে বের করা হয়েছে। এছাড়াও, ডাটাসেটের অনুপস্থিতি প্রযুক্তিদের জন্য নভেল ডিজিনিস্টিক প্রক্রিয়ার উন্নয়নের জন্য স্টাইমিয়ে দে এই গবেষণা থেকে আমরা একটি ডাটাসেট প্রস্তাব করেছি যাতে দুর্দশার গবেষণা নিয়ে গবেষণার প্রতি সমর্থন করি। স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে একটি প্রক্রিয়া মাপের জন্য গণনামূলক পদ্ধতি, দুর্দশার কঠোর পরিচয় প্রকাশ করা হয়েছে, এখানে নিজেদের তবে অনলাইন ফোরাম পোস্টে দমনের কঠোর পরিমাপের বিস্তারিত বিস্তারিত বিস্তারিত বিষয়টি নিশ্চিত করার জন্যে আমাদের গবেষণায় বিজ্ঞান গবেষণার', 'sq': "Njerëzit përdorin forumet online për të kërkuar informacion ose për të kontribuar atë. Për shkak të popullaritetit në rritje të tyre, disa forume në internet janë krijuar veçanërisht për të ofruar mbështetje, ndihmë dhe opinione për njerëzit që vuajnë nga sëmundje mentale. Depresioni është një nga sëmundjet më të shpeshta psikologjike në botë. Njerëzit komunikojnë më shumë me forumet online për të gjetur përgjigje për sëmundjen e tyre psikologjike. Megjithatë, nuk ka mekanizëm për të matur rëndësinë e depresionit në çdo post dhe për t'u dhënë rëndësi më të lartë atyre që janë diagnostikuar më rëndë depresion. Megjithë faktin se janë kryer kërkime të shumta bazuar në të dhënat e forumit online dhe identifikimin e depresionit, rëndësia e depresionit rrallë shqyrtohet. Përveç kësaj, mungesa e të dhënave do të stimulojë zhvillimin e procedurave të reja diagnostike për praktikantët. Nga ky studim, ne ofrojmë një grup të dhënash për të mbështetur kërkimin mbi vlerësimin e rëndësisë së depresionit. Përqasja kompjuterike për të masuar një proces automatik, identifikuar rëndësinë e depresionit këtu është mjaft e re. Megjithatë, kjo masë e komplikuar e rëndësisë së depresionit në postimet e forumit online është e nevojshme për të siguruar se shkallët e matjeve të përdorura në kërkimin tonë përmbushin normat e pritura të kërkimit shkencor.", 'af': "Mense gebruik online forums om te soek vir inligting of om dit te bydra. Omdat hulle groei populariteit, is sekere online forume geskep spesifieke om ondersteun, hulp en besonderhede te verskaf vir mense wat van mense wat die mense van menslike siekte lyk. Depresie is een van die mees dikwels psihologiese siektes wêreld. Mense kommuniseer meer met online forums om antwoordes vir hul psihologiese sykdom te vind. Maar daar is geen mekanisme om die grootheid van depresiër in elke pos te maak en hoër belang te gee aan die wat meer swaar depresiër gedagnosteer word nie. Nogtans die feit dat veelvuldige ondersoekinge gebaseer op online forum data en die identifikasie van depresiër gedoen is, word die grootheid van depresiër selfs uitgesoek. In addition, the absence of datasets will stymie the development of novel diagnostic procedures for practitioners. Van hierdie studie offer ons 'n datastel om ondersoek te ondersteun op depresiërheidsevaluering. Die rekenaarse toegang om 'n outomatiese proses te maak, geïdentifiseer grootheid van depresië hier is heeltemal nuwe toegang. Maar hierdie verduidelike maatskappy van depresiëring in online forum-pos is nodig om die maatskappe wat in ons ondersoek gebruik word te verseker, te ooreenstem die verwagte norme van wetenskaplike ondersoek.", 'ca': "La gent utilitza fòrums en línia per buscar informació o contribuir-la. Gràcies a la seva popularitat creixent, alguns fòrums on-line han estat creats específicament per proporcionar suport, assistència i opinions a la gent que pateix malalties mentals. La depressió és una de les malalties psicològiques més freqüents del món. La gent es comunica més amb fòrums on-line per trobar respostes per a la seva malaltia psicològica. No obstant això, no hi ha mecanisme per mesurar la gravetat de la depressió en cada post i donar més importància a aquells que estan diagnosticats amb depressió més grave. Malgrat que s'han fet moltes investigacions basades en dades del fòrum on-line i l'identificació de la depressió, rarament s'exploren la gravetat de la depressió. A més, l'absència de conjunts de dades estimularà el desenvolupament de nous procediments diagnòstics per als metges. Des d'aquest estudi, oferim un conjunt de dades que suporten la recerca sobre l'evaluació de la gravetat de la depressió. L'enfocament computacional per mesurar un procés automàtic, identificat aquí la gravetat de la depressió és un enfocament bastant nou. No obstant això, aquesta elaborada mesura de la severitat de la depressió en posts de fòrum on-line és necessària per assegurar que les escales de mesura utilitzades en la nostra recerca satisfen les normes esperades de la recerca científica.", 'bs': 'Ljudi koriste online forume da bi ili tražili informacije ili doprinosili. Zbog njihove rastuće popularnosti, određeni online forumi su stvoreni posebno kako bi pružili podršku, pomoć i mišljenje za ljude koji pate od mentalne bolesti. Depresija je jedna od najčešćih psiholoških bolesti na svijetu. Ljudi komuniciraju više sa internetskim forumima kako bi pronašli odgovore za njihovu psihološku bolest. Međutim, nema mehanizma za mjerenje težine depresije na svakom mjestu i pružanje veće važnosti onima koji su dijagnosticirani teško depresivniji. Uprkos činjenici da je provedena brojna istraživanja bazirana na podacima o internetskom forumu i identifikaciji depresije, težina depresije rijetko se istražuje. Osim toga, nedostatak podataka će usmjeriti razvoj novih dijagnostičkih postupaka za praktičnike. Iz ovog ispitivanja nudimo set podataka za podršku istraživanja o procjeni težine depresije. Računalni pristup mjerenju automatskog procesa, identificiranog težine depresije ovdje je prilično nov pristup. Međutim, potrebna je ova razvijena mjerenja težine depresije na mjestima internetskog foruma kako bi se osigurala mjerenja koja se koristi u našim istraživanjima ispunjavala očekivane norme naučnog istraživanja.', 'az': 'İnsanlar onlayn forumları bilgi axtarmaq üçün və ya buna kömək etmək üçün istifadə edirlər. Onların böyüklüyü üzündən, bəzi online forumların dəstək, kömək və fikirləri qəbul etmək üçün yaradılmışdır. Depresiya dünyada ən çox psikolojik xəstələrdən biridir. İnsanlar psikolojik xəstəliklərinin cavablarını tapmaq üçün onlayn forumlarla daha çox əlaqə edirlər. Lakin hər post depresiyanın ağırlığını ölçüb daha çox depresif olanlara daha yüksək mövzu vermək üçün heç bir mehanizmi yoxdur. İnternet forum veriləri və depresiyanın kimliğini təsdiqlənməsi üçün çoxlu araştırmalar istisna olmasına rağmen, depresiyanın ağırlığı az da keşfedilməz. Əksinə, verilənlərin qeyri-mümkün olmadığı məlumatların yeni diagnostik prosedürlərin inkişafını çəkəcəkdir. Bu təcrübədən depresiya şiddətli təcrübəsini dəstəkləmək üçün verilən qurğu təklif edirik. Avtomatik prosesini ölçürmək üçün hesaplama tərzi, depresiyanın şiddəti belə tanınmışdır. Halbuki, bu online forum postlarında depresiyanın çətinliklərini ölçürmək bizim araştırmalarımızda istifadə edilən ölçü ölçülərinin ehtiyacı olan bilimsel araştırmaların normalarına uymaq üçün lazımdır.', 'fi': 'Ihmiset käyttävät verkkofoorumeita joko etsiäkseen tietoa tai antaakseen sitä. Kasvavan suosion vuoksi tietyt online-foorumit on luotu erityisesti tarjoamaan tukea, apua ja mielipiteitä mielisairauksista kärsiville ihmisille. Masennus on yksi yleisimmistä psykologisista sairauksista maailmassa. Ihmiset kommunikoivat enemmän verkkofoorumeilla löytääkseen vastauksia psykologiseen sairauteensa. Ei kuitenkaan ole mekanismia mitata masennuksen vakavuutta kussakin post ja antaa suurempi merkitys niille, joilla diagnosoidaan vaikeampi masennus. Huolimatta siitä, että online-foorumin tietoihin ja masennuksen tunnistamiseen on tehty lukuisia tutkimuksia, masennuksen vakavuutta tutkitaan harvoin. Lisäksi tietoaineistojen puuttuminen vaikeuttaa uusien diagnostisten menetelmien kehittämistä lääkäreille. Tästä tutkimuksesta tarjoamme aineiston masennuksen vakavuuden arvioinnin tueksi. Laskennallinen lähestymistapa automaattisen prosessin mittaamiseen, tunnistettu masennuksen vakavuus tässä on melko uusi lähestymistapa. Tätä monimutkaista masennuksen vakavuuden mittaamista online-foorumiviesteissä tarvitaan kuitenkin varmistamaan, että tutkimuksessa käytetyt mittausasteikot täyttävät tieteellisen tutkimuksen odotetut normit.', 'cs': 'Lidé využívají online fóra buď hledat informace, nebo je přispět. Vzhledem k jejich rostoucí popularitě byla určitá online fóra vytvořena speciálně pro poskytování podpory, pomoci a názorů lidem trpícím duševním onemocněním. Deprese je jedním z nejčastějších psychologických onemocnění po celém světě. Lidé komunikují více s online fóry, aby našli odpovědi na své psychické onemocnění. Nicméně neexistuje žádný mechanismus pro měření závažnosti deprese v každém příspěvku a dává větší důležitost těm, kteří jsou diagnostikováni těžší deprese. Navzdory skutečnosti, že byly provedeny četné výzkumy založené na online fórech a identifikaci deprese, závažnost deprese je zřídka zkoumána. Absence datových sad navíc brzdí vývoj nových diagnostických postupů pro lékaře. Z této studie nabízíme datovou sadu na podporu výzkumu hodnocení závažnosti deprese. Výpočetní přístup k měření automatického procesu, identifikované závažnosti deprese zde, je zcela novým přístupem. Nicméně toto propracované měření závažnosti deprese v příspěvcích na internetových fórech je nutné zajistit, aby měřicí stupnice použité v našem výzkumu splňovaly očekávané normy vědeckého výzkumu.', 'et': 'Inimesed kasutavad online foorumeid, et otsida teavet või anda sellele panus. Nende kasvava populaarsuse tõttu on teatud veebifoorumid loodud spetsiaalselt selleks, et pakkuda tuge, abi ja arvamusi vaimuhaiguste all kannatavatele inimestele. Depressioon on üks sagedasemaid psühholoogilisi haigusi maailmas. Inimesed suhtlevad veebifoorumitega rohkem, et leida vastuseid oma psühholoogilisele haigusele. Siiski puudub mehhanism depressiooni raskusastme mõõtmiseks igas postkavas ja suurema tähtsuse andmiseks neile, kellel diagnoositakse raskem depressioon. Vaatamata asjaolule, et on läbi viidud arvukalt uuringuid, mis põhinevad online foorumi andmetel ja depressiooni tuvastamisel, uuritakse depressiooni raskust harva. Lisaks takistab andmekogumite puudumine arstide jaoks uudsete diagnostiliste protseduuride väljatöötamist. Sellest uuringust pakume andmekogumit depressiooni raskusastme hindamise uuringute toetamiseks. Arvutuslik lähenemine automaatse protsessi mõõtmiseks, tuvastatud depressiooni raskusastme siin on üsna uus lähenemine. Sellegipoolest on see põhjalik depressiooni raskusastme mõõtmine veebifoorumi postitustes vajalik tagamaks, et meie uuringutes kasutatavad mõõtmisskaalad vastaksid teadusuuringute oodatavatele normidele.', 'he': 'אנשים משתמשים בפורומים באינטרנט כדי לחפש מידע או לתרום בו. בגלל הפופולריות הגדולה שלהם, פורמים מסוימים באינטרנט נוצרו במיוחד כדי לספק תמיכה, עזרה, ודעות לאנשים שסובלים ממחלות נפשית. דיכאון הוא אחד המחלות הפסיכולוגיות הכי תדירות בכל העולם. People communicate more with online forums to find answers for their psychological disease.  בכל אופן, אין מנגנון למדוד את רצינות הדיכאון בכל תפקיד ולתת חשיבות גבוהה יותר לאלה שאבחנים בדיכאון יותר רציני. Despite the fact that numerous researches based on online forum data and the identification of depression have been conducted, the severity of depression is rarely explored.  בנוסף, הנעדרות של קבוצות נתונים יזיז את התפתחות של תהליכים אבחניים חדשים למרפאים. מהמחקר הזה, אנו מציעים קבוצת נתונים לתמוך במחקר על הערכת קשות דיכאון. The computational approach to measure an automatic process, identified severity of depression here is quite novel approach.  למרות זאת, המדידה המפורסמת הזאת של הדיכאון בתפקידים בפורום האינטרנט נזקקת כדי להבטיח שמקלי המדידה המשתמשים במחקר שלנו מתאימים לנורמות המציפים של מחקר מדעי.', 'ha': "Mutane sunã amfani da jama'a masu shawara masu shawara ko kuma sunã ƙara amfani da shi. Ga kuwa ana ƙara umarin su, an halitta wasu jama'a masu cikin mitandani don a ƙayyade mataimaki, taimako, da mawaƙo ga mutane waɗanda ke jiran jiran jiran jiran matabbaci. Lakanci yana daga mafi alƙaluman jiran aikoloji da ke cikin duniya. Mutane sunã samun mutane da jama'a masu shagala mitandani dõmin su sãmi majibu wa kasar aikin zũciya. Haƙĩƙa, bã ya da wani mekani ga iya cika nauyin wulãkanci a cikin kõwane wurãre kuma ya ƙãra muhimmada ga waɗanda ke diagnowa mafi tsananin wulãkanci. Haƙĩƙa, da yawa an sami karatun masu yawa a kan data na danne na ɗamfyuta da shaidar depression, sai an ƙididdige girgizartar depression sai kaɗan. Da wannan, da ba'a kasa tsarin database, zai yi ƙari ga developer surori masu diagnostic na node wa masu amfani da shi. Tana daga wannan lafiya, Munã sami wani takis da za'a ƙarfafã research a kan qirayi muhimu ga depression. Tilurin ƙidãyar da za'a iya cika wani jarraba farat ɗaya, na gane girmar depression, wannan yana da kyakkyawan hanyor yanzu. Haƙĩƙa, wannan bayãni yana ƙayyade girgije wa depression a cikin posten wurãren jama'a-jama'a ɗabi'a, dõmin ya sikre sikẽlin haske da aka yi amfani da shi a cikin fitina na na haɗi unƙaddarawa masu ƙayyade na takardar littafan da aka sani.", 'sk': 'Ljudje uporabljajo spletne forume, da bodisi iščejo informacije ali jih prispevajo. Zaradi naraščajoče popularnosti so bili nekateri spletni forumi ustvarjeni posebej za zagotavljanje podpore, pomoč in mnenja ljudem, ki trpijo za duševnimi boleznimi. Depresija je ena najpogostejših psiholoških bolezni na svetu. Ljudje bolj komunicirajo s spletnimi forumi, da bi našli odgovore na svojo psihološko bolezen. Vendar ni mehanizma za merjenje resnosti depresije v vsakem postopku in dajanje večjega pomena tistim, ki so diagnosticirani huje depresije. Kljub temu, da so bile izvedene številne raziskave, ki temeljijo na podatkih spletnih forumov in identifikaciji depresije, je resnost depresije redko raziskana. Poleg tega bo odsotnost naborov podatkov ovirala razvoj novih diagnostičnih postopkov za zdravnike. Iz te študije ponujamo nabor podatkov za podporo raziskavam o oceni resnosti depresije. Računalniški pristop za merjenje avtomatskega procesa, ugotovljena resnost depresije tukaj je precej nov pristop. Kljub temu je to natančno merjenje resnosti depresije v spletnih forumskih objavah potrebno za zagotovitev, da merilne lestvice, uporabljene v naših raziskavah, izpolnjujejo pričakovane norme znanstvenih raziskav.', 'jv': 'Wong wong pengguna perusahaan online kanggo ndelok informasi apa kanggo kontribusi ora. Laopo hal popularno sing gak popularno, suparno sing gak online dadi iki dipun ngomong nik nggawe supokot, suparno lan mengko perkara-perspekan kanggo masalah sing larang dhéwé. Dewekesan kabèh wong liyane karo sakjane sing pasar kelas kuwi. Wong wong liya komunikasi tambah karo perusahaan online kanggo ngilanggar ujaran kanggo sakjane luwih dumadhi. Nanging, ora ono meh dadi kapan kanggo meh kuwat seneng pisan seneng nggawe kapan banget nggawe barang langkung wigatining kanggo ingkang layakno sing susahe tuawa. Nanging kabeh, diunting akeh luwih basa nang data online perusahaan lan nambah kejahakan Nambah, ora ono dataset sing bakal nggambar nggawe dolanan perduhaan anyar nggawe dolanan ingkang dipepresan kanggo kalakno Digawe ono mulai, kita enyarno data setung kanggo tukang kanggo tukang karo severity " ing Laptop" and "Desktop Saiki, nggambar kuwi nggawe diolah kanggo kalagayaan kanggo kalagayaan kanggo diolah online', 'bo': 'མི་མང་གིས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་གནད་སྡུད་འདྲ་བ་སྤྱད་ནས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བྱེད་པའམ་ཡང་ན་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལ དེ་ཚོའི་ཆེ་ཤོས་སུ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་ཐོག་ལས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཅིག་ཁྱད་པར་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་དང་། རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་དང་། མི་ར འོད་འཛིན་ནི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་རྒྱ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་ཚིག་གང་རེད། མི་མང་གིས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་མཐོ་སྣེ་ཚོར་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྐྱེན་ཚོར་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། གནས་སྟངས་རེ་རེས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་བཟོ་བ་སྐྱེལ་མེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་མེད། དྲ་ཐོག་གི་མཐོང་སྣེ་བརྩོལ་ཞིབ་དང་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་ན། འོན་ཀྱང་། གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་དག་གི་མི་འདུག་པས་གསར་གཏོང་གི་དབྱེ་རིམ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་། ལས་ཀྱང་མཐོང་སྣེ་འདིའི་ནང་ནས་ངེད་ཚོར་སྐྱོན་བརྡན་གྱིས་ཚགས་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་སྟངས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ལས་སྦྱོར་ཚད་གཞན་པ་ལས་ངོས་འཛིན་ཡོད་པའི་མཐའ་འཁོར་སྐྱོང་ཚད་འདིར་སྤ དེ་ནའང་ཡང་། དྲ་རྒྱའི་གནས་སྟངས་ནང་དུ་འོང་བའི་གནས་སྟངས་བསྡོམས་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་བཅད་དགོས་ང་ཚོའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ནང་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཚད་རིམ་གནས་སྟངས་བསྡུར་'}
{'en': 'On the Evolution of Word Order', 'fr': "L'évolution de l'ordre des mots", 'ar': 'حول تطور ترتيب الكلمات', 'pt': 'Sobre a evolução da ordem das palavras', 'es': 'Sobre la evolución del orden de las palabras', 'ja': '言葉の秩序の進化について', 'zh': '论词序之变', 'hi': 'Word Order के Evolution पर', 'ru': 'Об эволюции порядка слов', 'ga': 'Ar Éabhlóid Ord na bhFocal', 'hu': 'A szórend fejlődéséről', 'ka': 'სიტყვების რედაქტის ევოლუციაში', 'el': 'Για την εξέλιξη της τάξης του λόγου', 'kk': 'Сөздер ретінде', 'ms': 'Pada Evolution Order Kata', 'it': "Sull'evoluzione dell'ordine delle parole", 'ml': 'വാക്ക് ക്രമീകരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d Evolution', 'mt': 'Dwar l-Evoluzzjoni tal-Ordni tal-kliem', 'lt': 'Dėl žodžių tvarkos raidos', 'mk': 'За еволуцијата на редот на зборови', 'pl': 'O ewolucji porządku słowa', 'mn': 'Үг дарааллын эволюцийн тухай', 'no': 'På ordrekkefølgja', 'ro': 'Despre evoluţia ordinii cuvintelor', 'so': 'Waxyaabaha la soo saaray', 'sr': 'U evoluciji reda reèi', 'si': 'වචන පද්ධතිය', 'sv': 'Om ordordningens utveckling', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை வரிசையில் ஏற்று', 'ur': 'ویدھی آرام پر', 'uz': 'Matn tarkibi', 'vi': '♪ On the Evolution of Word Order ♪', 'nl': 'Over de evolutie van de woordorde', 'da': 'Om udviklingen i ordrækkefølgen', 'bg': 'За еволюцията на реда на словото', 'hr': 'U evoluciji reda riječi', 'de': 'Über die Evolution der Wortordnung', 'id': 'Dalam Evolution Order Kata', 'ko': '논어순의 변천', 'fa': 'در تکامل سفارش کلمات', 'sw': 'Katika Ujumbe wa Order', 'af': 'Op die Evolution van Woordvolgorde', 'tr': 'Sözler Diňliki Görkez', 'sq': 'On the Evolution of Word Order', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'hy': 'Բառերի դասակարգի էվոլյուցիայի մասին', 'az': 'SĂ¶zlĂĽk SĂ¶zĂĽ', 'bn': 'শব্দের ক্ষেত্রে Evolution', 'bs': 'U evoluciji reda riječi', 'cs': 'O vývoji slovního řádu', 'et': 'Sõnakorra arengu kohta', 'ca': "En l'evolució de l'ordre de paraules", 'fi': 'Sanajärjestyksen kehityksestä', 'jv': 'mboxImp', 'he': 'על האבולוציה של סדר מילים', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཨི་བོ་ལུ་ཤཱན་ཡི་གོ་རིམ་ནང་དུ་', 'sk': 'O razvoju besednega reda'}
{'en': 'Most natural languages have a predominant or fixed word order. For example in English the word order is usually Subject-Verb-Object. This work attempts to explain this phenomenon as well as other typological findings regarding word order from a functional perspective. In particular, we examine whether fixed word order provides a functional advantage, explaining why these languages are prevalent. To this end, we consider an evolutionary model of language and demonstrate, both theoretically and using genetic algorithms, that a language with a fixed word order is optimal. We also show that adding information to the sentence, such as case markers and noun-verb distinction, reduces the need for fixed word order, in accordance with the typological findings.', 'ar': 'معظم اللغات الطبيعية لها ترتيب كلمات سائد أو ثابت. على سبيل المثال في اللغة الإنجليزية ، عادةً ما يكون ترتيب الكلمات هو Subject-Verb-Object. يحاول هذا العمل شرح هذه الظاهرة بالإضافة إلى النتائج النمطية الأخرى المتعلقة بترتيب الكلمات من منظور وظيفي. على وجه الخصوص ، نقوم بفحص ما إذا كان ترتيب الكلمات الثابت يوفر ميزة وظيفية ، وشرح سبب انتشار هذه اللغات. تحقيقًا لهذه الغاية ، نعتبر نموذجًا تطوريًا للغة ونثبت ، من الناحية النظرية وباستخدام الخوارزميات الجينية ، أن اللغة ذات الترتيب الثابت للكلمات هي الأمثل. نوضح أيضًا أن إضافة معلومات إلى الجملة ، مثل علامات الحالة والتمييز بين الاسم والفعل ، يقلل من الحاجة إلى ترتيب الكلمات الثابت ، وفقًا للنتائج التصنيفية.', 'es': 'La mayoría de los idiomas naturales tienen un orden de palabras predominante o fijo. Por ejemplo, en inglés el orden de las palabras suele ser Suject-Verb-Object. Este trabajo intenta explicar este fenómeno, así como otros hallazgos tipológicos relacionados con el orden de las palabras desde una perspectiva funcional. En particular, examinamos si el orden fijo de las palabras proporciona una ventaja funcional, explicando por qué prevalecen estos idiomas. Para ello, consideramos un modelo evolutivo del lenguaje y demostramos, tanto teóricamente como mediante algoritmos genéticos, que un lenguaje con un orden de palabras fijo es óptimo. También mostramos que agregar información a la oración, como marcadores de mayúsculas y minúsculas y distinción entre sustantivos y verbos, reduce la necesidad de un orden fijo de palabras, de acuerdo con los hallazgos tipológicos.', 'fr': "La plupart des langues naturelles ont un ordre prédominant ou fixe des mots. Par exemple, en anglais, l'ordre des mots est généralement Sujet-Verbe-Objet. Ce travail tente d'expliquer ce phénomène ainsi que d'autres découvertes typologiques concernant l'ordre des mots d'un point de vue fonctionnel. En particulier, nous examinons si l'ordre des mots fixe offre un avantage fonctionnel, en expliquant pourquoi ces langues sont répandues. À cette fin, nous considérons un modèle évolutif du langage et démontrons, à la fois théoriquement et à l'aide d'algorithmes génétiques, qu'un langage avec un ordre de mots fixe est optimal. Nous montrons également que l'ajout d'informations à la phrase, telles que les marqueurs de casse et la distinction nom-verbe, réduit le besoin d'un ordre fixe des mots, conformément aux conclusions typologiques.", 'pt': 'A maioria das línguas naturais tem uma ordem de palavras predominante ou fixa. Por exemplo, em inglês, a ordem das palavras geralmente é Sujeito-Verbo-Objeto. Este trabalho tenta explicar esse fenômeno, bem como outros achados tipológicos relacionados à ordem das palavras a partir de uma perspectiva funcional. Em particular, examinamos se a ordem de palavras fixa fornece uma vantagem funcional, explicando por que esses idiomas são predominantes. Para tanto, consideramos um modelo evolutivo de linguagem e demonstramos, tanto teoricamente quanto usando algoritmos genéticos, que uma linguagem com uma ordem de palavras fixa é ótima. Mostramos também que adicionar informações à frase, como marcadores de caso e distinção substantivo-verbo, reduz a necessidade de ordem fixa das palavras, de acordo com os achados tipológicos.', 'hi': 'अधिकांश प्राकृतिक भाषाओं में एक प्रमुख या निश्चित शब्द क्रम होता है। उदाहरण के लिए अंग्रेजी में शब्द क्रम आमतौर पर विषय-क्रिया-ऑब्जेक्ट होता है। यह काम इस घटना के साथ-साथ एक कार्यात्मक परिप्रेक्ष्य से शब्द क्रम के बारे में अन्य टाइपोलॉजिकल निष्कर्षों को समझाने का प्रयास करता है। विशेष रूप से, हम जांच करते हैं कि क्या निश्चित शब्द आदेश एक कार्यात्मक लाभ प्रदान करता है, यह समझाते हुए कि ये भाषाएं प्रचलित क्यों हैं। इस अंत तक, हम भाषा के एक विकासवादी मॉडल पर विचार करते हैं और सैद्धांतिक रूप से और आनुवंशिक एल्गोरिदम का उपयोग करके प्रदर्शित करते हैं, कि एक निश्चित शब्द क्रम के साथ एक भाषा इष्टतम है। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि वाक्य में जानकारी जोड़ना, जैसे कि केस मार्कर और संज्ञा-क्रिया भेद, टाइपोलॉजिकल निष्कर्षों के अनुसार, निश्चित शब्द क्रम की आवश्यकता को कम कर देता है।', 'ja': 'ほとんどの自然言語には、主にまたは固定された語順があります。たとえば英語では、語順は通常Subject - Verb - Objectである。この研究は、この現象と、機能的な観点からの語順に関する他の類型学的知見を説明しようとしている。特に、固定された語順が機能的な利点を提供するかどうかを検討し、これらの言語が普及している理由を説明します。この目的のために、私たちは言語の進化モデルを検討し、理論的にも遺伝的アルゴリズムを使用しても、固定された語順を持つ言語が最適であることを実証します。また、ケースマーカーや名詞動詞の区別などの情報を文に追加すると、類型的な知見に応じて、固定された単語順序の必要性が減少することも示されている。', 'ru': 'Большинство естественных языков имеют преобладающий или фиксированный порядок слов. Например, в английском языке порядком слов обычно является Subject-Verb-Object. В этой работе предпринята попытка объяснить это явление, а также другие типологические выводы относительно порядка слов с функциональной точки зрения. В частности, мы изучаем, дает ли фиксированный порядок слов функциональное преимущество, объясняя, почему эти языки преобладают. С этой целью мы рассматриваем эволюционную модель языка и демонстрируем, как теоретически, так и с помощью генетических алгоритмов, что язык с фиксированным порядком слов является оптимальным. Мы также показываем, что добавление информации в предложение, такой как реквизитные маркеры и существительное-глагольное различие, уменьшает необходимость фиксированного порядка слов, в соответствии с типологическими выводами.', 'zh': '大抵自然语言有大定词序。 如在英语中,词序常主语-动词-宾语。 此图从功能之说及词序之他类学见也。 论定词序功能,解释何由遍。 是以虑言之进化,验之遗算,词序言为上。 又明以类型学见,添信息于句,如大小标名 - 动词分,可减定词序之求。', 'ga': 'Tá ord na bhfocal ceannasach nó seasta ag formhór na dteangacha nádúrtha. Mar shampla i mBéarla is gnách an t-ord focal a chur i leith Subject-Verb-Object. Déanann an saothar seo iarracht an feiniméan seo a mhíniú chomh maith le torthaí tíopeolaíochta eile maidir le hord focal ó thaobh feidhme de. Go háirithe, scrúdaítear an dtugann ord seasta focal buntáiste feidhmiúil, ag míniú cén fáth a bhfuil na teangacha seo i réim. Chuige sin, déanaimid machnamh ar shamhail éabhlóideach teanga agus léirímid, go teoiriciúil agus trí úsáid a bhaint as halgartaim ghéiniteacha, go bhfuil teanga le hord seasta focal optamach. Léirímid freisin go laghdaítear an gá le hord seasta na bhfocal, de réir thorthaí na tíopeolaíochta, trí fhaisnéis a chur leis an abairt, amhail marcóirí cáis agus idirdhealú ainmfhocail.', 'ka': 'უფრო მეტი ნაირადი ენები აქვს წარმოდგენელი ან კონფიკური სიტყვების წარმოდგენა. მაგალითად, ანგლისში სიტყვების სიტყვების წევრი სამუშაოდ Subject-Verb-Object. ეს სამუშაო მოცდილობა ამ ფენომენის განახსნა და სხვა ტიპოლოგიური მონაცემების შესახებ სიტყვების შესახებ ფუნქციონალური პერსპექტიკის შე განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ ვხედავთ თუ არა კონტუნციალური სიტყვების წესები იქნება ფუნქციალური საფუნქცია, რომელიც განახსნა რატომ ეს ენები გა ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ ენის ვოლუციური მოდელი და გამოიყენებთ, ორივე ტეორეტიკურად და გენეტიკურად ალგორიტემის გამოყენება, რომ ენათი, რომელიც კონფიქურად სიტყვების წე ჩვენ ასევე გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ინფორმაციის დამატება სიტყვებზე, როგორც სიტყვების მარკერები და სიტყვების განსხვავება, გამოკლება სიტყვების განსხვავებას, როგორც ტიპოლოგიური მონაცე', 'hu': 'A legtöbb természetes nyelvnek domináns vagy rögzített szósorrendje van. Például angolul a szó sorrendje általában Subject-Verb-Object. Ez a munka megpróbálja funkcionális perspektívából magyarázni ezt a jelenséget és más tipológiai megállapításokat is. Különösen azt vizsgáljuk, hogy a rögzített szósorrend funkcionális előnyt jelent-e, magyarázva, miért vannak elterjedtek ezek a nyelvek. Ennek érdekében a nyelv evolúciós modelljét vesszük figyelembe, és elméletileg és genetikai algoritmusokkal egyaránt bebizonyítjuk, hogy egy fix szórendű nyelv optimális. Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy az információk hozzáadása a mondathoz, mint például a betűjelölők és a főnév-ige megkülönböztetés, csökkenti a fix szósorrend szükségességét, a tipológiai megállapításoknak megfelelően.', 'el': 'Οι περισσότερες φυσικές γλώσσες έχουν μια κυρίαρχη ή σταθερή σειρά λέξεων. Για παράδειγμα στα αγγλικά η σειρά λέξεων είναι συνήθως θέμα-ρήμα-αντικείμενο. Η παρούσα εργασία επιχειρεί να εξηγήσει αυτό το φαινόμενο καθώς και άλλα τυπολογικά ευρήματα σχετικά με την τάξη των λέξεων από λειτουργική σκοπιά. Ειδικότερα, εξετάζουμε αν η σταθερή σειρά λέξεων παρέχει ένα λειτουργικό πλεονέκτημα, εξηγώντας γιατί αυτές οι γλώσσες είναι διαδεδομένες. Για το σκοπό αυτό, εξετάζουμε ένα εξελικτικό μοντέλο γλώσσας και αποδεικνύουμε, τόσο θεωρητικά όσο και με γενετικούς αλγόριθμους, ότι μια γλώσσα με σταθερή σειρά λέξεων είναι βέλτιστη. Δείχνουμε επίσης ότι η προσθήκη πληροφοριών στην πρόταση, όπως δείκτες πεζών και διάκριση ουσιαστικού-ρήματος, μειώνει την ανάγκη για σταθερή σειρά λέξεων, σύμφωνα με τα τυπολογικά ευρήματα.', 'it': "La maggior parte dei linguaggi naturali hanno un ordine di parole predominante o fisso. Per esempio in inglese l'ordine delle parole è di solito Oggetto-Verbo-Oggetto. Questo lavoro cerca di spiegare questo fenomeno e altre scoperte tipologiche riguardanti l'ordine delle parole da una prospettiva funzionale. In particolare, esaminiamo se l'ordine di parole fisso fornisce un vantaggio funzionale, spiegando perché queste lingue sono prevalenti. A tal fine, consideriamo un modello evolutivo del linguaggio e dimostriamo, sia teoricamente che utilizzando algoritmi genetici, che un linguaggio con un ordine di parole fisso è ottimale. Mostriamo anche che l'aggiunta di informazioni alla frase, come marcatori maiuscoli e distinzione sostantivo-verbo, riduce la necessità di un ordine di parole fisso, in conformità con i risultati tipologici.", 'kk': 'Табиғи тілдердің көпшілігі бастапқы не тұрақты сөздер реті бар. Мысалы, ағылшын тілінде сөздер реті кәдімгі тақырыбы- Verb- Object. Бұл жұмыс сөздердің ретін функциялық перспективінен түсіндіру әрекеті мен басқа типтологиялық табуларды түсіндіру әрекеті. Әрине біз сөздердің дұрыс ретінде функциялық артықшылығын көрсетеді. Бұл тілдердің себебін түсіндіреді. Бұл үшін біз тілдің эволюциялық моделі деп ойлап, теоретикалық және генетикалық алгоритмдерді қолдану үшін, сөздер ретінде тіл оптималдық деп көрсетеді. Мұндай-ақ мәліметті сөздерге қосу, мәліметті, мәліметті белгілер мен мәліметті белгілеу сияқты, типтологиялық табуларға сәйкесті сөздердің ретінің қажетісін азайтады', 'lt': 'Dauguma natūralių kalbų turi vyraujančią arba fiksuotą žodžių tvarką. Pavyzdžiui, anglų kalba žodžio eilutė paprastai yra Subject- Verb- Object. Šiuo darbu siekiama paaiškinti šį reiškinį ir kitas tipologines išvadas, susijusias su žodžių tvarka funkciniu požiūriu. Visų pirma nagrinėjame, ar fiksuota žodžių tvarka suteikia funkcinį pranašumą, paaiškindama, kodėl šios kalbos yra paplitusios. Šiuo tikslu manome apie evoliucinį kalbos model į ir teoriškai ir naudojant genetinius algoritmus įrodome, kad kalba su fiksuota žodžių tvarka yra optimali. Taip pat rodome, kad pridėjus informaciją prie sakinio, pavyzdžiui, atvejų žymens ir žodžių pavadinimų atskyrimo, sumažėja poreikis nustatyti fiksuotą žodžių tvarką, atsižvelgiant į tipologines išvadas.', 'mk': 'Повеќето природни јазици имаат преминиран или фиксен редослед на зборови. For example in English the word order is usually Subject-Verb-Object.  Оваа работа се обидува да го објасни овој феномен, како и други типологички откритија во врска со редот на зборовите од функционална перспектива. Особено, ние испитуваме дали фиксниот редослед на зборови обезбедува функционална предност, објаснувајќи зошто овие јазици се превентивни. To this end, we consider an evolutionary model of language and demonstrate, both theoretically and using genetic algorithms, that a language with a fixed word order is optimal.  Исто така покажуваме дека додавањето на информации во реченицата, како што се маркерите на случаите и разликата на речениците, ја намалува потребата за фиксен редослед на зборови, во согласност со типологичките откритија.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷകളില്\u200d മികച്ച വാക്കുകളോ നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d വാക്ക് ക്രമീകരണം സാധാരണയായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുക ഈ സ്വഭാവം വിശദീകരിക്കാനും മറ്റു ടൈപ്പോളിക്കല്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താനും ഈ ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വാക്കിന പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിച്ച വാക്കിന്റെ ഉത്തരവ് എന്തിനാണ് ഈ ഭാഷകള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് വി ഈ അവസാനത്തിനു വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെയും പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെയും ഭാഷയുടെയും മാതൃകയാണെന്ന് വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. നിശ്ചയമായ ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ കല്\u200d We also show that adding information to the sentence, such as case markers and noun-verb distinction, reduces the need for fixed word order, in accordance with the typological findings.', 'ms': 'Kebanyakan bahasa alami mempunyai tertib perkataan yang berkuasa atau tetap. Contohnya dalam bahasa Inggeris tertib perkataan biasanya Subjek- Verb- Object. Kerja ini cuba menjelaskan fenomena ini dan penemuan tipologi lain mengenai urutan perkataan dari sudut pandang fungsi. In particular, we examine whether fixed word order provides a functional advantage, explaining why these languages are prevalent.  Untuk tujuan ini, kita mempertimbangkan model evolusi bahasa dan menunjukkan, secara teori dan menggunakan algoritma genetik, bahasa dengan tertib perkataan tetap adalah optimal. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa menambah maklumat kepada kalimat, seperti penanda kes dan perbezaan bernama-verb, mengurangkan keperluan untuk tertib perkataan tetap, sesuai dengan penemuan tipologi.', 'mt': 'Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-lingwi naturali għandhom ordni predominanti jew fissa tal-kliem. Pereżempju bl-Ingliż l-ordni tal-kelma normalment hija Suġġett-Verb-Oġġett. Dan ix-xogħol jipprova jispjega dan il-fenomenu kif ukoll sejbiet tipiċi oħra rigward l-ordni tal-kliem minn perspettiva funzjonali. In particular, we examine whether fixed word order provides a functional advantage, explaining why these languages are prevalent.  Għal dan il-għan, a ħna nikkunsidraw mudell evoluzzjonali tal-lingwa u nuru, kemm teoretikament kif ukoll bl-użu ta’ algoritmi ġenetiċi, li lingwa b’ordni fissa tal-kelma hija ottimali. Aħna nuru wkoll li ż-żieda ta’ informazzjoni mas-sentenza, bħall-markaturi tal-każijiet u d-distinzjoni bejn il-kliem u l-kliem, tnaqqas il-ħtieġa għal ordni fissa tal-kliem, skont is-sejbiet tipoloġiċi.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх байгалийн хэлнүүд илүү чухал эсвэл тодорхой үгний дарааллыг агуулдаг. Жишээлбэл Англи хэлний үгний дараа нь ихэвчлэн Subject-Verb-Object юм. Энэ үйл явдал нь функциональ харцгаанаас үгний дарааллын тухай өөр типтологик ололтуудыг тайлбарлах гэж оролдсон. Ялангуяа, бид тодорхой үгний дарааллаар функциональ ашигтай эсэхийг шалгаж, яагаад эдгээр хэлнүүд яагаад өргөн байгааг тайлбарлаж байна. Үүний тулд бид хэлний хувьсалын загвар гэж бодож, теоретик болон генетик алгоритмыг ашиглаж, тодорхой хэлний дарааллаар хэлэх нь эерэг. Бид мөн өгүүлбэрт мэдээллийг нэмэх нь, жишээ нь, нэр хэлний ялгаа, тодорхой хэлний дарааллын хэрэгцээ багасгадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Dei fleste naturlege språk har eit hovudrekkjefølgje eller fast ordrekkjefølgje. For eksempel på engelsk er ordrekkefølgja vanlegvis emne- verb- objektet. Dette arbeidet prøver å forklare denne fenomenen og andre typologiske finning om ordrekkefølgje frå ein funksjonell perspektiv. I særskilt er vi undersøk om fast ordrekkefølgje gjev ein funksjonell fordel, og forklarer hvorfor desse språka er utbredt. I denne slutten ser vi på ein evolusjonsk modell for språk og demonstrerer, både teoretisk og bruk genetiske algoritme, at ein språk med ein fast ordrekkefølgje er optimal. Vi viser også at legging til informasjon i setninga, slik som store bokstavar og substitusjonsversjon, reduserer behov for fast ordrekkefølgje, i tillegg til typologiske finningar.', 'pl': 'Większość języków naturalnych ma dominującą lub stałą kolejność słów. Na przykład w języku angielskim kolejność słów to zazwyczaj Subject-Verb-Object. W pracy podjęto próbę wyjaśnienia tego zjawiska, jak również innych typologicznych ustaleń dotyczących porządku słów z perspektywy funkcjonalnej. W szczególności badamy, czy stała kolejność słów daje zaletę funkcjonalną, wyjaśniając, dlaczego te języki są powszechne. W tym celu rozważamy ewolucyjny model języka i demonstrujemy, zarówno teoretycznie, jak i przy użyciu algorytmów genetycznych, że język o ustalonym porządku słów jest optymalny. Pokazujemy również, że dodanie informacji do zdania, takich jak znaczniki liter i rozróżnienie rzeczownika-czasownika, zmniejsza potrzebę ustalonego porządku słów, zgodnie z ustaleniami typologicznymi.', 'ro': 'Majoritatea limbilor naturale au o ordine de cuvinte predominantă sau fixă. De exemplu, în limba engleză ordinea cuvântului este de obicei Subiect-Verb-Object. Această lucrare încearcă să explice acest fenomen, precum și alte descoperiri tipologice privind ordinea cuvintelor dintr-o perspectivă funcțională. În special, examinăm dacă ordinea fixă de cuvinte oferă un avantaj funcțional, explicând de ce aceste limbi sunt predominante. În acest scop, luăm în considerare un model evolutiv al limbajului și demonstrăm, atât teoretic, cât și folosind algoritmi genetici, că un limbaj cu o ordine fixă de cuvinte este optim. De asemenea, arătăm că adăugarea de informații la propoziție, cum ar fi markerele de caz și distincția substantiv-verb, reduce necesitatea unei ordine fixă a cuvintelor, în conformitate cu constatările tipologice.', 'sr': 'Većina prirodnih jezika imaju predsjednik ili fiksan red riječi. Na primjer na engleskom, nareðenje reèi je obièno Subject-Verb-Object. Ovaj rad pokušava da objasni ovaj fenomen, kao i drugi tipološki nalazi u vezi reda riječi iz funkcionalne perspektive. Posebno, pregledavamo da li fiksni red reči pruža funkcionalnu prednost, objašnjavajući zašto su ovi jezici prevalenti. Za taj cilj razmišljamo o evolucijskom modelu jezika i pokazujemo, teoretički i koristeći genetske algoritme, da je jezik sa fiksnim riječima optimal an. Takođe pokazujemo da dodavanje informacija rečenici, kao što su znakovi slučajeva i razlika imena, smanjuje potrebu za fiksnim rečenicama u skladu sa tipološkim nalazima.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ස්වභාවික භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙනවා නැත්නම් ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙනවා. ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ උදාහරණයෙන් වචන ක්\u200dරමය සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම විදියට- විදියට- විදියට- ප්\u200dරතියෝ මේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා මේ සිද්ධ විස්තරය සහ අනිත් විස්තර සොයාගන්න පුළුවන විශේෂයෙන්, අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා සිද්ධ වචන නියෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් දෙනවා කියලා, මේ භාෂාවල් ප්\u200dරය මේ අවසානයෙන්, අපි භාෂාවේ විකෘතිය නිර්මාණයක් හා ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය කරනවා, සාධාර්ථික විදියට සහ ජානිතික ඇල්ගෝරිත අපි වචනයට තොරතුරු එක්ක එකතු කරන්න පෙන්වන්නේ වචනයට, වචනයක් සිද්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා වගේ වචනයක් වගේ අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා.', 'so': "Inta badan luqadaha dabiicadda ah waxay leeyihiin amar u gaar ah ama sax ah. Tusaale ahaan luqada Ingiriiska waxaa inta badan lagu qoraa maamul-Verb. Shaqodanku wuxuu isku dayaa in uu ka caddeeyo xaaladan iyo sidoo kale helayo wax kale oo la xiriira amar ereyga ah oo ka soo jeeda aragtida shaqada. Si gaar ah, waxaynu baaritaynaa in hagitaanka ereyga ee adag uu helo faa'iido shaqo, si aan u caddaynno sababta ay luqadahanu u kala duwan yihiin. Taas darteed waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa model bedelka ah oo luuqada ku qoran iyo waxaynu muujinnaa, labada theoretical iyo isticmaalka algorithm genetic, in luqada ku qoran amar cayiman waa mid u wanaagsan. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa in macluumaad ku daro qoraalka, tusaale ahaan markhaarada iyo kala duwan qoraalka aan qoraalka ahayn, uu u gaabiyaa baahida qoraalka saxda ah si waafaqsan heshiiska qoraalka ah.", 'sv': 'De flesta naturliga språk har en dominerande eller fast ordordning. Till exempel på engelska är ordordningen vanligtvis Subject-Verb-Object. Detta arbete försöker förklara detta fenomen samt andra typologiska fynd gällande ordordning ur ett funktionellt perspektiv. I synnerhet undersöker vi om fast ordordning ger en funktionell fördel och förklarar varför dessa språk är utbredda. För detta ändamål betraktar vi en evolutionär språkmodell och visar, både teoretiskt och med hjälp av genetiska algoritmer, att ett språk med fast ordordning är optimalt. Vi visar också att om man lägger till information i meningen, såsom skiftlägesmarkeringar och substantiv-verbåtskillnad, minskar behovet av fast ordordning, i enlighet med typologiska fynd.', 'ta': 'பெரும்பாலான இயல்பான மொழிகளுக்கு முன்னேற்ற அல்லது நிலையான வார்த்தை வரிசை உதாரணமாக ஆங்கிலத்தில் வார்த்தை வரிசை இந்த செயல்பாட்டின் செயல்பாட்டிலிருந்து வார்த்தை வரிசையை பற்றி விளக்க முயற்சிக்கிறது. குறிப்பிட்டு, நிலையான வார்த்தையின் வரிசை ஒரு செயல்பாட்டின் பயன்பாடு வழங்குகிறதா என்று நாம் சோதிக்கிற இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் மொழியின் மாதிரி மற்றும் செயல்படுத்தும் மாதிரியை கருதுகிறோம், திடீரியலில் மற்றும் மரபணு வரிசைகளை பயன்படுத்த நாம் வாக்கியத்திற்கு தகவல்களை சேர்த்து காட்டுகிறோம், கேஸ் குறிக்குறிகள் மற்றும் சொல்லாத வேறு வித்தியாசம், நிலையான வார்த', 'ur': 'اکثر طبیعی زبانوں میں ایک غلبہ یا مضبوط کلمات کا دستور ہے۔ مثال انگلیسی میں کلمات کے اوقات معمولاً Subject-Verb-Object ہے. اس کام کی کوشش کرتی ہے کہ اس فناوری کو اور ایک فناوری نظر سے کلمات کے درمیان اور دوسرے تایپولوژیکوں کی تلاش کریں. مخصوصاً ہم جانتے ہیں کہ کیا مضبوط کلمات کا دستور ایک کامل فائدہ دیتا ہے، اس کی تعریف کیوں یہ زبانیں پھیلاتے ہیں۔ یہاں تک کہ ہم زبان کی تکاملی موڈل کو سمجھتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں، نظریہ طور پر اور ژنتیکی الگوریتم کے استعمال سے، کہ ایک ثابت قدم لفظ کے ساتھ ایک زبان بہترین ہے. ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ کلمہ میں اطلاعات جمع کرنا، جیسے کیس مارکیروں اور نام-verb اختلاف، مضبوط کلمہ کے اوقات کی ضرورت کو کاٹ دیتا ہے، تایپلوژیکوں کے مطابق.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik tabiiy tilda eng muhim yoki tayyorlangan so'zlar tartibi bor. Masalan ingliz tilida so'zlar tartibi oddiy obʼekt. Bu ishni ishga tushirishni va boshqa oddiy narsalarni ishlatishga harakat qiladi. Shunday qilamiz, bu tillar nima bo'lganligini o'rganamiz deb o'rganamiz. Shuning uchun biz tilning evolyutsiyatli modelini o'ylaymiz, teoretika va genetik algoritlardan foydalanamiz, bir so'zlar tartib boʻlgan tilni optimal deb o'ylaymiz. Biz bir so'zlarni qoʻshishni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, ma'lumot yordamchilarga, ma'lumot yordamchilar va hech narsalar yordamida o'zgartirish kerakligini kamaytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Hầu hết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên có cách sắp xếp từ thường. Ví dụ bằng tiếng Anh, từ thứ tự thường là đối tượng-Verbi-đối tượng. Nhiệm vụ này nhằm giải thích hiện tượng này cũng như các nghiên cứu khác về trật tự từ từ một góc nhìn chức năng. Chúng tôi đặc biệt kiểm tra xem trật tự chữ có tạo ra lợi thế chức năng không, giải thích tại sao ngôn ngữ này phổ biến không. Với mục đích này, chúng tôi xem xét một mô hình ngôn ngữ tiến hóa và chứng minh, cả về mặt lý thuyết và sử dụng thuật toán di truyền, rằng một ngôn ngữ có trật tự từ cố định là tối ưu. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy rằng việc thêm thông tin vào câu, như đánh dấu trường hợp và phân biệt danh từ, giảm sự cần thiết của trật tự chỉ từ cố định, theo các phát hiện đánh vần.', 'da': 'De fleste natursprog har en dominerende eller fast ordrækkefølge. For eksempel på engelsk er ordrækkefølgen normalt emne-verb-objekt. Dette arbejde forsøger at forklare dette fænomen samt andre typologiske fund vedrørende ordrækkefølge fra et funktionelt perspektiv. Især undersøger vi, om den faste ordrækkefølge giver en funktionel fordel og forklarer, hvorfor disse sprog er udbredt. Til dette formål betragter vi en evolutionær sprogmodel og demonstrerer, både teoretisk og ved hjælp af genetiske algoritmer, at et sprog med en fast ordrækkefølge er optimalt. Vi viser også, at tilføjelse af information til sætningen, såsom case markører og substantiv-verb skelnen, reducerer behovet for fast ordrækkefølge i overensstemmelse med de typologiske resultater.', 'bg': 'Повечето естествени езици имат преобладаващ или фиксиран словен ред. Например на английски език реда на думите обикновено е субект-глагол-обект. Тази работа се опитва да обясни това явление, както и други типологични открития относно реда на думите от функционална гледна точка. По-специално изследваме дали фиксираният словен ред предоставя функционално предимство, обяснявайки защо тези езици са преобладаващи. За тази цел разглеждаме еволюционен модел на езика и демонстрираме, както теоретично, така и чрез генетични алгоритми, че език с фиксиран словен ред е оптимален. Показваме също, че добавянето на информация към изречението, като например маркери на букви и разграничение на съществително-глагол, намалява необходимостта от фиксиран ред на думите, в съответствие с типологичните констатации.', 'nl': 'De meeste natuurlijke talen hebben een overheersende of vaste woordvolgorde. Bijvoorbeeld in het Engels is de woordvolgorde meestal Subject-Verb-Object. Dit werk probeert dit fenomeen en andere typologische bevindingen met betrekking tot woordorde vanuit een functioneel perspectief te verklaren. In het bijzonder onderzoeken we of vaste woordvolgorde een functioneel voordeel biedt en verklaren we waarom deze talen dominant zijn. Hiervoor bekijken we een evolutionair taalmodel en tonen we aan, zowel theoretisch als met behulp van genetische algoritmes, dat een taal met een vaste woordvolgorde optimaal is. We laten ook zien dat het toevoegen van informatie aan de zin, zoals hoofdletters en zelfstandig naamwoord-werkwoord onderscheid, de noodzaak van een vaste woordvolgorde vermindert, in overeenstemming met de typologische bevindingen.', 'hr': 'Većina prirodnih jezika imaju predsjednički ili fiksni red riječi. Na primjer na engleskom, naređenje riječi obično je tema-Verb-Object. Ovaj rad pokušava objasniti ovaj fenomen, kao i drugi tipološki nalazi u vezi reda riječi iz funkcionalne perspektive. Posebno, istražujemo da li fiksni red riječi pruža funkcionalnu prednost, objašnjavajući zašto su ovi jezici prevalenti. Za taj cilj razmišljamo o evolucijskom modelu jezika i pokazujemo, teoretički i koristeći genetske algoritme, da je jezik sa fiksnim riječima optimal an. Također pokazujemo da dodavanje informacija rečenici, kao što su znakovi slučajeva i razlika imena, smanjuje potrebu za fiksnim riječima u skladu s tipološkim nalazima.', 'de': 'Die meisten natürlichen Sprachen haben eine vorherrschende oder feste Wortordnung. Zum Beispiel im Englischen ist die Wortreihenfolge normalerweise Subject-Verb-Object. Diese Arbeit versucht, dieses Phänomen sowie andere typologische Befunde zur Wortordnung aus funktionaler Perspektive zu erklären. Insbesondere untersuchen wir, ob feste Wortreihenfolge einen funktionalen Vorteil bietet und erklären, warum diese Sprachen vorherrschen. Dazu betrachten wir ein evolutionäres Sprachmodell und demonstrieren, sowohl theoretisch als auch mittels genetischer Algorithmen, dass eine Sprache mit fester Wortordnung optimal ist. Wir zeigen auch, dass das Hinzufügen von Informationen zum Satz, wie Groß- und Kleinschreibung und Substantiv-Verb-Unterscheidung, den Bedarf an einer festen Wortfolge entsprechend den typologischen Befunden reduziert.', 'ko': '대부분의 자연 언어는 주요하거나 고정된 어순이 있다.예를 들어 영어에서 어순은 통상적으로 주어 동사 목적어이다.이 작업은 이 현상과 어순에 대한 다른 유형학적 발견을 기능적인 측면에서 해석하고자 한다.특히 우리는 고정된 어순이 기능적 우위를 제공했는지 연구했고 이런 언어가 왜 보편적으로 존재하는지 설명했다.이를 위해 우리는 언어의 진화 모델을 고려했고 이론적으로 유전 알고리즘을 사용하여 고정된 어순을 가진 언어가 가장 우수하다는 것을 증명했다.또한 유형학적 발견에 따라 문장에 대소문자 표기와 명사-동사 구분 등 정보를 추가하면 고정된 어순에 대한 수요를 줄일 수 있다고 밝혔다.', 'fa': 'بیشتر زبان طبیعی یک دستور کلمه اصلی دارد. برای مثال در انگلیسی، سفارش کلمه معمولاً موضوع-کلمه-اشیاء است. این کار تلاش می\u200cکند که این پدیده را توضیح دهد، همچنین یادآوری\u200cهای نوع\u200cشناسی دیگر در مورد سفارش کلمات از یک نگاه عملی توضیح دهد. به خصوص، ما مطالعه می کنیم که آیا سفارش کلمات ثابت شده یک سودهای عملی را پیشنهاد می کند، توضیح می دهیم که چرا این زبانها فراوان هستند. برای این قسمت، ما یک مدل تکاملی از زبان را در نظر می گیریم و نشان می دهیم، هر دو نظریه و استفاده از الگوریتم ژنتیکی، که یک زبان با یک دستور کلمه ثابت شده optimal است. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که اضافه کردن اطلاعات به جمله، مثل نشان\u200cدهندگان و تفاوت زبان\u200cنامی، نیازی برای سفارش کلمات ثابت را کاهش می\u200cدهد، در مقابل پیدا کردن تایپولوژیک.', 'id': 'Kebanyakan bahasa alami memiliki perintah kata yang predominan atau tetap. Contohnya dalam bahasa Inggris perintah kata biasanya Subjek-Verb-Objek. Pekerjaan ini mencoba menjelaskan fenomena ini dan penemuan tipologi lainnya mengenai urutan kata dari perspektif fungsional. Terutama, kita memeriksa apakah urutan kata tetap memberikan keuntungan fungsional, menjelaskan mengapa bahasa-bahasa ini prevalent. Untuk tujuan ini, kita mempertimbangkan model evolusi bahasa dan menunjukkan, secara teori dan menggunakan algoritma genetik, bahasa dengan urutan kata tetap adalah optimal. We also show that adding information to the sentence, such as case markers and noun-verb distinction, reduces the need for fixed word order, in accordance with the typological findings.', 'sw': 'Lugha nyingi za asili zina amri yenye msingi au yenye ufanisi wa maneno. Kwa mfano kwa lugha ya Kiingereza, amri ya neno mara nyingi ni Ujumbe-Verb-Object. Kazi hii inajaribu kuelezea hali hii pamoja na matokeo mengine ya kawaida kuhusu amri ya neno kutoka kwenye mtazamo wa kazi. Kwa hakika, tunachunguza kama amri ya maneno madhubuti inatoa faida ya kazi, kwa kuelezea kwa nini lugha hizi hazina tofauti. Kwa mwisho huu, tunachukulia muundo wa maendeleo wa lugha na kuonyesha, kwa nadharia na kutumia algorithi za jeneti, kuwa lugha yenye order fixed ya maneno ni bora. Tunaonyesha pia kuwa kuongeza taarifa kwenye hukumu hiyo, kama vile alama za kesi na utofauti wa maneno yasiyo ya maneno, hupunguza haja ya utaratibu wa maneno madhubuti, kwa mujibu wa matokeo hayo ya kawaida.', 'sq': 'Shumica e gjuhëve natyrore kanë një rend fjalësh të mbizotërueshëm apo të fiksuar. Për shembull në anglisht fjala rendi është zakonisht Subjekt-Verb-Objekt. Ky punë përpiqet të shpjegojë këtë fenomen si dhe gjetje të tjera tipologjike lidhur me rendin e fjalëve nga një perspektivë funksionale. Në veçanti, ne shqyrtojmë nëse rendi i fiksuar i fjalëve ofron një avantazh funksional, duke shpjeguar pse këto gjuhë janë të mbizotërueshme. Për këtë qëllim, ne konsiderojmë një model evolucionar të gjuhës dhe demonstrojmë, si teorikisht ashtu edhe duke përdorur algoritmet gjenetikë, se një gjuhë me një rend të caktuar fjalësh është optimale. We also show that adding information to the sentence, such as case markers and noun-verb distinction, reduces the need for fixed word order, in accordance with the typological findings.', 'tr': 'Iň köp tebigy dilleriň üst-bellenen ýada sabitlenmiş söz düzümi bar. Iňlisçe ýaly söz terjimi adatça Subet-Verb-Objekti Bu işe bu fenomeni ve fonksiyonel perspektivden söz düzeni hakkında başka tipologik tapmaları düşünmeye çalışıyor. Adatça, biz esasy diňleýän sözleriň düzümi funksiýaly ýerdeşdirip barýandygyny soraýarys, näme üçin bu diller döwürýändigini düşündiris. Bu sebäpden, biz diliň evolusiýa nusgasyny pikir edýäris we hem teoriýa we hem genetik algoritmalaryny ulanýarys, sabit söz terjesi bolan bir dil optimaldyr. Biz hem sözlere bilgi eklemek gerektiğini gösteriyoruz, mesela kişi işaretleyici ve isim-verb farklılığı gibi, sabitlenmiş söz sıralaması gerektiğini typolojik tapılara göre azaltır.', 'am': 'ብዙዎቹ የፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋዎች ዋነኛ ወይም የተደላደለ ቃላት ናቸው፡፡ ለምሳሌ በንግግሊዝኛ ቃላት ትእዛዝ በመጠቀም ጉዳዩ-Verb-Object ነው፡፡ ይሄ ሥራ ይህንን ነገር እና ሌሎችን ትክክለኛ የቃላት ትእዛዝ ከስራ ክፍል ጋር ለማብራራት ይፈልጋል፡፡ በተለይም፣ የቁጥጥር ቃላት ትእዛዝ የሥራ ጥቅም መሆኑን እናስተውላለን፤ ይህች ቋንቋዎች ለምን ተቃውሞ እንደሆኑ እናብራራለን፡፡ To this end, we consider an evolutionary model of language and demonstrate, both theoretically and using genetic algorithms, that a language with a fixed word order is optimal.  እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'af': "Die meeste natuurlike tale het 'n voordekende of vaste woord volgorde. Byvoorbeeld in Engels is die woord volgorde gewoonlik onderwerp- Verb- Objekt. Hierdie werk probeer om hierdie fenomen te verduidelik en ander tipologiese vindings aangaande woord volgorde van 'n funksionele perspektief. In besonderhede, ons ondersoek of die vaste woord volgorde 'n funksionele voordeel verskaf, verduidelik waarom hierdie taal oorvloedig is. En tot hierdie einde, ondersoek ons 'n evolusie model van taal en wys, beide teorieese en geneetiese algoritme, dat 'n taal met 'n vaste woord volgorde optimal is. Ons wys ook dat by die byvoeg van inligting aan die seting, soos geval merkers en noun-verb-verskil, die behoefte vir vaste woord volgorde verduur, in ooreenkomstig die tipologiese vindings.", 'hy': 'Բնական լեզուների մեծ մասը ունի գերակշռող կամ հաստատուն բառերի կարգ: Օրինակ անգլերենում բառի հաջորդականությունը սովորաբար առարկան-բառ-առարկան է: Այս աշխատանքը փորձում է բացատրել այս երևույթը, ինչպես նաև այլ տիպոլոգիական հայտնաբերությունները բառի կարգը ֆունկցիոնալ տեսանկյունից: Մենք հատկապես ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե արդյոք ֆունկցիոնալ առավելություն է պարունակում, բացատրելով, թե ինչու են այս լեզուները տարածվում: Այս նպատակով մենք համարում ենք լեզվի էվոլյուցիոն մոդել և ցույց ենք տալիս, տեսականորեն և օգտագործելով գենետիկ ալգորիթմներ, որ լեզուն հաստատուն բառի կարգով օպտիմալ է: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ տեղեկատվություն ավելացնելը նախադասության մեջ, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ դեպքերի նշանները և բայերի առանձնահատուկ բայերը, նվազեցնում է հաստատուն բառերի կարիքը, ըստ տիպոլոգիական հայտնաբերությունների:', 'az': 'Təbiətli dillərin əksəriyyəti hərəkətli və ya sabit söz düzeni vardır. Məsələn İngilizce dilində söz sırası genellikle Subject-Verb-Objectdir. Bu işlər bu fenomeni və funkcional perspektivdən söz sıralaması haqqında başqa tipolojik tapıları a çıqlamağa çalışır. Özellikle, biz bu dillərin niyə böyüklüyünü a çıqlamaq üçün fikirləşdirilmiş söz sırasının fərqli faydalarını verir mi? Bu səbəbdə, biz dillərin evolusiya modelini düşünürük və, teoriki olaraq və genetik algoritmlərin istifadəsini göstərdik ki, sabit söz sırası olan dil optimaldır. Biz də göstəririk ki, cümləyə məlumat eklənmək, məlumatlar və ismi-verb fərqlənməsi kimi, tədriclənmiş sözlər düzəltməsi üçün tədriclənmiş məlumatları typolojik tapılara görə azaldırır.', 'bn': 'বেশীরভাগ প্রাকৃতিক ভাষাগুলো একটি বিজয়ী অথবা নির্ধারিত শব্দের আদেশ আছে। উদাহরণস্বরূপ ইংরেজীতে শব্দের আদেশ সাধারণত বিষয়- ভার্ব- বস্তু। এই ঘটনাটিকে ব্যাখ্যা করার চেষ্টা করছে এবং কার্যকর দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে শব্দের আদেশের ব্যাপারে অন্যান্য ধরনের সাধারণ কা বিশেষ করে, আমরা পরীক্ষা করি নির্ধারিত শব্দের আদেশ কি কার্যকর সুবিধা প্রদান করে, ব্যাখ্যা করি যে এই ভাষাগুলো কেন পূ এই পর্যন্ত আমরা ভাষার বিবর্তন মডেল বিবেচনা করি এবং বিক্ষোভ প্রদর্শন করি, তত্ত্ত্বিকভাবে এবং জেনেটিক অ্যালগরিদম ব্যবহার করে, যে একটি নির্ধারিত শ আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে এই বাক্যের সাথে তথ্য যোগ করা যায়, যেমন মামলা চিহ্ন এবং অনলাইন বিচ্ছিন্ন, স্থায়ীত শব্দের প্রয়োজন কমিয়ে দেয়', 'bs': 'Većina prirodnih jezika imaju predsjednički ili fiksni red riječi. Na primjer na engleskom, naređenje riječi obično je tema-Verb-Object. Ovaj rad pokušava objasniti ovaj fenomen, kao i drugi tipološki nalazi u vezi reda riječi iz funkcionalne perspektive. Posebno, istražujemo da li fiksni red riječi pruža funkcionalnu prednost, objašnjavajući zašto su ovi jezici prevalenti. Za taj cilj razmišljamo o evolucijskom modelu jezika i pokazujemo, teoretički i koristeći genetske algoritme, da je jezik sa fiksnim riječima optimal an. Također pokazujemo da dodanje informacija rečenici, kao što su znakovi slučajeva i razlika imena, smanjuje potrebu za fiksnim rečenicama u skladu s tipološkim nalazima.', 'ca': "La majoria de llengües naturals tenen un ordre de paraules predominant o fixe. Per exemple en anglès, l'ordre de paraules és normalment Subject-Verb-Objecte. Aquesta obra intenta explicar aquest fenomen i altres descobriments tipològics sobre l'ordre de paraules d'una perspectiva funcional. En particular, examinem si l'ordre de paraules fixes proporciona un avantatge funcional, explicant per què aquestes llengües són prevalents. Per això, considerem un model evolutiu de llenguatge i demostrem, tant teòricament com amb algoritmes genètics, que un llenguatge amb un ordre de paraules fixes és optim. We also show that adding information to the sentence, such as case markers and noun-verb distinction, reduces the need for fixed word order, in accordance with the typological findings.", 'et': 'Enamikul looduskeeltel on valdav või fikseeritud sõnajärjekord. Näiteks inglise keeles on sõna järjestus tavaliselt Subject-Verb-Object. Käesolevas töös püütakse selgitada nii seda nähtust kui ka teisi tüpoloogilisi leide sõnade järjestuse kohta funktsionaalsest vaatenurgast. Eelkõige uurime, kas fikseeritud sõnade järjestus annab funktsionaalset eelist, selgitades, miks need keeled on levinud. Selleks kaalume keele evolutsioonilist mudelit ja näitame nii teoreetiliselt kui ka geneetiliste algoritmide abil, et fikseeritud sõnajärjega keel on optimaalne. Samuti näitame, et teabe lisamine lausele, näiteks tähemärgid ja sõnasõnade eristamine, vähendab vastavalt tüpoloogilistele leidudele vajadust fikseeritud sõnade järjekorra järele.', 'cs': 'Většina přírodních jazyků má převažující nebo pevný řád slov. Například v angličtině je pořadí slov obvykle Subject-Verb-Object. Tato práce se pokouší vysvětlit tento jev i další typologické poznatky týkající se slovního řádu z funkčního hlediska. Konkrétně zkoumáme, zda pevné pořadí slov poskytuje funkční výhodu a vysvětluje, proč jsou tyto jazyky převládající. Za tímto účelem uvažujeme o evolučním modelu jazyka a demonstrujeme, jak teoreticky, tak pomocí genetických algoritmů, že jazyk s pevným slovním řádem je optimální. Dále ukazujeme, že přidání informací do věty, jako jsou značky písmen a rozlišování podstatného jména a slovesa, snižuje potřebu pevného pořadí slov v souladu s typologickými zjištěními.', 'fi': 'Useimmilla luonnollisilla kielillä on hallitseva tai kiinteä sanajärjestys. Esimerkiksi englanniksi sanajärjestys on yleensä Subject-Verb-Object. Tässä työssä pyritään selittämään tätä ilmiötä sekä muita sanajärjestystä koskevia typologisia löydöksiä toiminnallisesta näkökulmasta. Erityisesti selvitämme, onko kiinteä sanajärjestys toiminnallista etua ja selitämme, miksi nämä kielet ovat yleisiä. Tässä tarkoituksessa tarkastelemme kielen evolutionaarista mallia ja osoitamme sekä teoreettisesti että geneettisten algoritmien avulla, että kieli, jolla on kiinteä sanajärjestys, on optimaalinen. Osoitamme myös, että lauseeseen lisättäessä tietoa, kuten kirjainmerkkejä ja substantiivinen-verbien erottelua, vähennetään sanajärjestyksen tarvetta typologisten löydösten mukaisesti.', 'sk': 'Večina naravnih jezikov ima prevladujoč ali fiksni red besed. Na primer v angleščini je vrstni red besed običajno Zadeva-Glasba-Objekt. To delo poskuša pojasniti ta pojav in druge tipološke ugotovitve glede vrstnega reda besed s funkcionalnega vidika. Predvsem preučujemo, ali fiksni red besed prinaša funkcionalno prednost in pojasnimo, zakaj so ti jeziki prevladujoči. V ta namen obravnavamo evolucijski model jezika in tako teoretično kot z uporabo genetskih algoritmov dokazujemo, da je jezik s fiksnim besednim redom optimalen. Pokazali smo tudi, da dodajanje informacij stavku, kot so označevalci črk in razlikovanje samostalnikov-glagolov, zmanjšuje potrebo po fiksnem vrstnem redu besed v skladu s tipološkimi ugotovitvami.', 'he': 'Most natural languages have a predominant or fixed word order.  For example in English the word order is usually Subject-Verb-Object.  This work attempts to explain this phenomenon as well as other typological findings regarding word order from a functional perspective.  In particular, we examine whether fixed word order provides a functional advantage, explaining why these languages are prevalent.  To this end, we consider an evolutionary model of language and demonstrate, both theoretically and using genetic algorithms, that a language with a fixed word order is optimal.  אנחנו גם מראים שההוספת מידע למשפט, כמו סימני תיקים וההבדיקה של כתב-אצבע, מפחידה את הצורך לסדר מילים קבוע, בהתאם לממצאים הטיפולוגיים.', 'ha': "Most natural languages have a predominant or fixed word order.  Misali, cikin Ingiriya, tsarin maganar ta ɗabi'a, abun-Verb-abu ne. Wannan aikin yana jarraba ka bayyana wannan abu da wasu matsayi na daban-daban da aka gane wa tsarin maganar daga wani wuni mai amfani da ba. Kuma a cikin ƙayyade, Munã jarraba ko da tsarin magana mai daidaita yana da amfani mai amfani mai amfani, kuma Munã bayyana a kan mẽne ne lugha za'a gabãta. Ga wannan, munã bincike wani misali mai ƙẽtarwa na harshe kuma Muke nuna, a kan littafi da kuma a yi amfani da algoritori na jeni, da harshe wanda ke da tsarin magana mai ƙayyade, yana da amfani. Tuna nuna cewa, a ƙara bayani ga kalma, kamar alama masu haske da kuma tsãge masu nau'i-nau'i, yana ƙara muhimmin tsari ga kalma mai daidaita, da daidai ga fassaran ayuka.", 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཆེ་ཤོས་དེ་ལ་ཁ་འབྱེད་མཁན་ཡང་ན་གཏན་ཁེལ་གྱི་གོ་རིམ་ཡིན། དཔེར་ན། དབྱིན་ཡིག་ནང་ཐ་སྙད་ཀྱི་གོ་རིམ་འདི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་དངོས་པོ་དེ་ཡིན། ལས་ཀ་འདིས་བྱུང་བའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་འདི་དང་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་གཞན་དང་འབྲེལ་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་ལ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ནི་ལྟ་བུ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དམིགས་པར་བརྟན་པར་ཞིབ་འཇུག་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་གོ་རིམ་གྱིས་ལས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་ཅིག་བྱིན་མིན་ན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་ཅིག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་ཡོད། མི་གཞི་རྩིས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་དང་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་སྐད་རིགས་ ང་ཚོས་ཚིག', 'jv': 'Tulung luwih apik ing sakjane pengguna kuwi adas apakno. structural navigation Workspace Name Juara-Juara, kéné ujaran kung pawaran sistem sing wis ana perusahaan anyar perusahaan funksi, nggawe barang kuwi tindan iki sak sumelang. Saiki, kéné sawetara model evolusyon kanggo nggambar luwih lan nambah, theoretik lan gambar kelas genetik, sampeyan langgar nganggo kuwi basa sing apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntuk nambah informasi kanggo nggambar aturan, kaya peduli gadoh karo cah-cah lan kabèh-verb, ngregani soko sak bisa dianteksi kanggo awak dhéwé, mengko iso nggawe tarjamahan sing bakal terus tambah.'}
{'en': 'EmoPars : A Collection of 30 K Emotion-Annotated Persian Social Media Texts', 'ar': 'EmoPars: مجموعة من 30 ألف نصوص شاعرية على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي الفارسية', 'es': 'EMoPars: Una colección de 30 000 textos persas de medios sociales comentados con emociones', 'pt': 'EmoPars: uma coleção de 30.000 textos de mídia social persa com anotações de emoção', 'fr': 'EmoPars\xa0: une collection de 30 000 textes persans annotés sur les réseaux sociaux', 'ja': 'EmoPars ： 30,000の感情-注釈付きペルシャのソーシャルメディアテキストのコレクション', 'zh': 'EmoPars曰:30K情注波斯语社交媒体文本之会也', 'hi': 'EmoPars: 30K भावना-एनोटेटेड फारसी सामाजिक मीडिया ग्रंथों का एक संग्रह', 'ru': 'EmoPars: Коллекция аннотированных к эмоциям персидских текстов в социальных сетях объемом 30 тысяч экземпляров', 'ga': 'EmoPars: Cnuasach de théacsanna Meáin Shóisialta Peirsis 30K le Nótaí faoi Mhothúchán', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'EmoPars: 30K érzelmekkel jegyzett perzsa közösségi média szövegek gyűjteménye', 'el': 'Μια συλλογή από κείμενα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης 30Κ με σχόλια συναισθημάτων', 'mk': 'EmoPars: Колекција на персиски социјални медиуми со 30.000 емоции', 'it': 'EmoPars: una raccolta di 30K testi persiani sui social media annotati dalle emozioni', 'lt': 'EmoPars: 30K emocijų anotuotų persų socialinės žiniasklaidos tekstų rinkinys', 'kk': 'Эмопарс: 30K көңіл көңіл белгіленген персиялық социалдық медиа мәтіндерінің жинақтауыName', 'ml': 'എമോപാര്\u200dസ്: 30K ഇമോട്ടോഷന്\u200d - അറിയിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട പാര്\u200dസിയന്\u200d സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയയുടെ പദാവലികള്\u200d', 'mt': 'EmoPars: A Collection of 30K Emotion-Annotated Persian Social Media Texts', 'pl': 'EmoPars: Kolekcja 30K emocjonalnie komentowanych perskich tekstów mediów społecznościowych', 'ms': 'EmoPars: A Collection of 30K Emotion-Annotated Persian Social Media Texts', 'mn': 'EmoPars: 30K Emotion-Annotated Persian Social Media Texts Collection', 'ro': 'EmoPars: O colecție de 30.000 de texte persane pentru rețelele sociale adnotate emoțional', 'sr': 'EmoPars: Skupljanje teksta iz 30K emocija-Annotiranih persijskih socijalnih medija', 'si': 'Comment', 'so': 'EmoPars: A Collection of 30K Emotion-Annotated Persian Social Media Texts', 'sv': 'EmoPars: En samling av 30K känslomärkta persiska sociala medier texter', 'ur': 'ایموپارس: 30K ایموٹیون کی ایک جماعت', 'ta': 'EmoPars: 30K உணர்வு- Annotated Persian Social Media Text', 'no': 'Comment', 'uz': 'EmoPars: 30K Emotion-Annotated Person Social Media matnlari', 'vi': 'EmoPars: A collection of 30K Emotion-Annoned Persic Social Media Texts', 'da': 'EmoPars: En samling af 30K følelsesmæssige annoncerede persiske tekster på sociale medier', 'bg': 'Колекция от 30 хиляди емоционални текстове в персийските социални медии', 'hr': 'EmoPars: Skupljanje 30K teksta iz persijskih socijalnih medija', 'id': 'EmoPars: Sebuah Koleksi Teks Media Sosial Persia Annotasi-Emotion 30K', 'ko': 'EmoPars: 30K 감정 주석 페르시아 소셜 미디어 텍스트의 집합', 'nl': 'EmoPars: Een verzameling van 30K emotionele geanotateerde Perzische sociale media teksten', 'fa': 'EmoPars: مجموعه\u200cای از متن\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی پارسی ۳۰۰ کیلومتر احساسات', 'sw': 'EmoPars: Mkusanyiko wa maandishi ya Mitandao ya Kijamii ya Kiraia 30K yaliyotangazwa', 'de': 'EmoPars: Eine Sammlung von 30K Emotion-Annotated Persian Social Media Texten', 'tr': 'EmoPars: A Collection of 30K Emotion-Annotated Persian Social Media Texts', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'EmoPars: Një koleksion i teksteve të medias sociale persiane të anotuara me emocione 30K', 'am': 'EmoPars: A Collection of 30K Emotions-Annotated Persian Social Media Texts', 'bn': 'এমোপার্স: ৩০০০০ দূর্ঘটনার এক সংগ্রহ পার্সিয়ান সোশ্যাল মিডিয়া টেক্সট', 'ca': 'EmoPars: Una col·lecció de textos dels mitjans socials persos anotats amb emocions de 30K', 'az': 'EmoPars: 30K Emotion-Annotated Persian Social Media Texts Collection of 30K Emotion-Annotated Persian Social Media Texts', 'bs': 'EmoPars: Skupljanje teksta iz 30K emocija Annotiranih persijskih socijalnih medija', 'fi': 'EmoPars: Kokoelma 30K tunteilla varustettuja persialaisia sosiaalisen median tekstejä', 'et': 'EmoPars: 30 000 emotsioonidega seotud Pärsia sotsiaalmeedia tekstide kogumik', 'cs': 'EmoPars: Sbírka 30K emocí anotovaných perských textů sociálních médií', 'hy': 'EmoPers. 30K-ի զգացմունքներով նշումնավորված պարսիական սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների հավաքածու', 'sk': 'EmoPars: Zbirka 30K čustvenih besedil perzijskih družbenih medijev', 'he': 'EmoPars: אוסף של טקסטים של תקשורת חברתית פרסית שנותנים על רגשות של 30K', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'EmoPars: A Collection of 30K Emotion-Annotated Persian Social Media Texts', 'jv': 'EMOParas: A Gallion of 30 K emuation-Annulgated persian Digital Media Text'}
{'en': 'The wide reach of social media platforms, such as Twitter, have enabled many users to share their thoughts, opinions and emotions on various topics online. The ability to detect these emotions automatically would allow social scientists, as well as, businesses to better understand responses from nations and costumers. In this study we introduce a dataset of 30,000 Persian Tweets labeled with Ekman’s six basic emotions (Anger, Fear, Happiness, Sadness, Hatred, and Wonder). This is the first publicly available emotion dataset in the Persian language. In this paper, we explain the data collection and labeling scheme used for the creation of this dataset. We also analyze the created dataset, showing the different features and characteristics of the data. Among other things, we investigate co-occurrence of different emotions in the dataset, and the relationship between sentiment and emotion of textual instances. The dataset is publicly available at https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'pt': 'O amplo alcance das plataformas de mídia social, como o Twitter, permitiu que muitos usuários compartilhassem seus pensamentos, opiniões e emoções sobre vários tópicos online. A capacidade de detectar essas emoções automaticamente permitiria que cientistas sociais, bem como empresas, entendessem melhor as respostas de nações e clientes. Neste estudo, apresentamos um conjunto de dados de 30.000 tweets persas rotulados com as seis emoções básicas de Ekman (raiva, medo, felicidade, tristeza, ódio e admiração). Este é o primeiro conjunto de dados de emoções disponível publicamente no idioma persa. Neste artigo, explicamos o esquema de coleta e rotulagem de dados usado para a criação desse conjunto de dados. Também analisamos o conjunto de dados criado, mostrando as diferentes características e características dos dados. Entre outras coisas, investigamos a co-ocorrência de diferentes emoções no conjunto de dados e a relação entre sentimento e emoção de instâncias textuais. O conjunto de dados está disponível publicamente em https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'ar': 'مكّن الانتشار الواسع لمنصات الوسائط الاجتماعية ، مثل Twitter ، العديد من المستخدمين من مشاركة أفكارهم وآرائهم وعواطفهم حول مواضيع مختلفة عبر الإنترنت. ستسمح القدرة على اكتشاف هذه المشاعر تلقائيًا لعلماء الاجتماع ، وكذلك الشركات التجارية بفهم ردود الفعل من الدول والعملاء بشكل أفضل. نقدم في هذه الدراسة مجموعة بيانات من 30 ألف تغريدة فارسية مصنفة بمشاعر إكمان الستة الأساسية (الغضب ، والخوف ، والسعادة ، والحزن ، والكراهية ، والذهول). هذه أول مجموعة بيانات عن المشاعر متاحة للجمهور باللغة الفارسية. في هذه الورقة ، نوضح مخطط جمع البيانات ووضع العلامات المستخدم لإنشاء مجموعة البيانات هذه. نقوم أيضًا بتحليل مجموعة البيانات التي تم إنشاؤها ، مع عرض الميزات والخصائص المختلفة للبيانات. من بين أمور أخرى ، نتحرى التكرار المشترك للمشاعر المختلفة في مجموعة البيانات ، والعلاقة بين المشاعر والعواطف في الأمثلة النصية. مجموعة البيانات متاحة للجمهور على https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'es': 'El amplio alcance de las plataformas de redes sociales, como Twitter, ha permitido a muchos usuarios compartir sus pensamientos, opiniones y emociones sobre diversos temas en línea. La capacidad de detectar estas emociones automáticamente permitiría a los científicos sociales, así como a las empresas, comprender mejor las respuestas de las naciones y los clientes. En este estudio presentamos un conjunto de datos de 30 000 tuits persas etiquetados con las seis emociones básicas de Ekman (ira, miedo, felicidad, tristeza, odio y asombro). Este es el primer conjunto de datos de emociones disponible públicamente en idioma persa. En este artículo, explicamos el esquema de recopilación y etiquetado de datos utilizado para la creación de este conjunto de datos. También analizamos el conjunto de datos creado, mostrando las diferentes características y características de los datos. Entre otras cosas, investigamos la coexistencia de diferentes emociones en el conjunto de datos y la relación entre el sentimiento y la emoción de las instancias textuales. El conjunto de datos está disponible públicamente en https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'fr': "La grande portée des plateformes de médias sociaux, telles que Twitter, a permis à de nombreux utilisateurs de partager leurs réflexions, leurs opinions et leurs émotions sur divers sujets en ligne. La capacité de détecter automatiquement ces émotions permettrait aux spécialistes des sciences sociales, ainsi qu'aux entreprises, de mieux comprendre les réactions des pays et des clients. Dans cette étude, nous introduisons un ensemble de données de 30 000 Tweets persans étiquetés avec les six émotions de base d'Ekman (colère, peur, bonheur, tristesse, haine et émerveillement). Il s'agit du premier jeu de données sur les émotions accessible au public en persan. Dans cet article, nous expliquons le système de collecte de données et d'étiquetage utilisé pour la création de cet ensemble de données. Nous analysons également le jeu de données créé, en montrant les différentes caractéristiques et caractéristiques des données. Entre autres choses, nous étudions la co-occurrence de différentes émotions dans le jeu de données et la relation entre le sentiment et l'émotion d'instances textuelles. L'ensemble de données est accessible au public à l'adresse https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.", 'ja': 'Twitterなどのソーシャルメディアプラットフォームの幅広いリーチにより、多くのユーザーが様々なトピックについての考え、意見、感情をオンラインで共有することができました。 これらの感情を自動的に検出することで、社会科学者はもちろん、企業も国や顧客からの反応をよりよく理解することができます。 この研究では、エクマンの6つの基本的な感情（怒り、恐怖、幸福、悲しみ、憎しみ、不思議）がラベル付けされた30,000ペルシャ語のツイートのデータセットを紹介します。 これはペルシア語で初めて公開された感情データセットです。 本稿では，このデータセットの作成に用いられるデータ収集とラベリングスキームについて説明する． また、作成されたデータセットを分析し、データのさまざまな特徴と特徴を示します。 とりわけ、データセット内の異なる感情の共起と、テキストインスタンスの感情と感情の関係を調査します。 データセットはhttps://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detectionで一般公開されています。', 'hi': 'ट्विटर जैसे सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफार्मों की व्यापक पहुंच ने कई उपयोगकर्ताओं को विभिन्न विषयों पर अपने विचारों, विचारों और भावनाओं को ऑनलाइन साझा करने में सक्षम बनाया है। इन भावनाओं का स्वचालित रूप से पता लगाने की क्षमता सामाजिक वैज्ञानिकों के साथ-साथ व्यवसायों को राष्ट्रों और कॉस्ट्यूमर्स से प्रतिक्रियाओं को बेहतर ढंग से समझने की अनुमति देगी। इस अध्ययन में हम एकमैन की छह बुनियादी भावनाओं (क्रोध, भय, खुशी, उदासी, घृणा और आश्चर्य) के साथ लेबल किए गए 30,000 फारसी ट्वीट्स का डेटासेट पेश करते हैं। यह फारसी भाषा में पहला सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध भावना डेटासेट है। इस पेपर में, हम इस डेटासेट के निर्माण के लिए उपयोग की जाने वाली डेटा संग्रह और लेबलिंग योजना की व्याख्या करते हैं। हम बनाए गए डेटासेट का भी विश्लेषण करते हैं, जो डेटा की विभिन्न विशेषताओं और विशेषताओं को दिखाते हैं। अन्य बातों के अलावा, हम डेटासेट में विभिन्न भावनाओं की सह-घटना की जांच करते हैं, और पाठ्य उदाहरणों की भावना और भावना के बीच संबंध। डेटासेट सार्वजनिक रूप से https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection पर उपलब्ध है।', 'zh': 'Twitter等社交媒体台之广影响力使众用户得在线分其主意,意见和情。 自动检测此情力,将使社会科学家及企业益知国家客户之应。 于此论之,言一含30,000波斯推文数集,此推文标有Ekman六情(怒,恐惧,福悲,仇惊)。 此一明可用之波斯语情数集也。 在本文中,我们解释了用创该数据集的数据收标记方案。 又析创数之集,显数之异征。 自此之外,犹考数集异情之同起,及文本情性之际。 其数集 https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection 上公给之。', 'ru': 'Широкий охват социальных медиа-платформ, таких как Twitter, позволил многим пользователям делиться своими мыслями, мнениями и эмоциями по различным темам в Интернете. Способность автоматически обнаруживать эти эмоции позволила бы социологам, а также предприятиям лучше понимать реакцию стран и потребителей. В этом исследовании мы представляем набор данных из 30 000 персидских твитов, отмеченных шестью основными эмоциями Экмана (гнев, страх, счастье, печаль, ненависть и чудо). Это первый общедоступный набор данных об эмоциях на персидском языке. В этой статье мы объясняем схему сбора данных и маркировки, используемую для создания этого набора данных. Также мы анализируем созданный датасет, показывая различные особенности и характеристики данных. Среди прочего, мы исследуем совместное возникновение различных эмоций в наборе данных, а также взаимосвязь между настроениями и эмоциями текстовых экземпляров. Набор данных доступен в открытом доступе по адресу https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'ga': 'Chuir raon leathan na n-ardán meán sóisialta, ar nós Twitter, ar chumas go leor úsáideoirí a gcuid smaointe, tuairimí agus mothúcháin ar ábhair éagsúla a roinnt ar líne. Chuirfeadh an cumas na mothúcháin seo a bhrath go huathoibríoch ar chumas na n-eolaithe sóisialta, chomh maith le, gnólachtaí tuiscint níos fearr a fháil ar fhreagraí ó náisiúin agus ó lucht cultúir. Sa staidéar seo tugaimid isteach tacar sonraí de 30,000 Tweets Peirsis lipéadaithe le sé mhothúchán bhunúsacha Ekman (Fearg, Eagla, Sonas, Brón, Fuath, agus Iontas). Is é seo an chéad tacar sonraí mothúcháin atá ar fáil go poiblí sa Peirsis. Sa pháipéar seo, mínímid an scéim bailithe sonraí agus lipéadaithe a úsáideadh chun an tacar sonraí seo a chruthú. Déanaimid anailís freisin ar an tacar sonraí cruthaithe, ag taispeáint gnéithe agus tréithe éagsúla na sonraí. I measc rudaí eile, déanaimid imscrúdú ar chomhtharlú mothúcháin éagsúla sa tacar sonraí, agus ar an ngaol idir meon agus mothúcháin cásanna téacsúla. Tá an tacar sonraí ar fáil go poiblí ag https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედია პლატატურების დიდი მიღება, როგორც Twitter, უფრო მეტი მომხმარებელი შეუძლია თავის ფიქრობები, მხოლობები და ემოციები განსხვავებული ტემებზე ინტერ ამ ემოციების შესაძლებლობა ავტომატურად განვიცნოთ სოციალური მეცნიერების შესაძლებლობა, როგორც ბიზნეზების შესაძლებლობა უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო გავიგოთ სა ამ კვლევაში 30 000 პერსიანი ტივიტების მონაცემები ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ, რომელიც ეკმანის ქვსი ფუნდამეტური ემოციებისთვის (ბედნიერი, შვილი, ღედნიერება, ცოდნიერება, მყვერულ ეს არის პირველი ადამიანის მონაცემების მონაცემები პერსიანი ენაში. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ განვიხსნავთ მონაცემების კოლექცია და მართლა სქემი, რომელიც ამ მონაცემების შექმნა გამოყენებული. ჩვენ ასევე შექმნილი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის ანალიზაცია და მონაცემების განსხვავებული ფონიქციების და პროგრაციების ჩვენება. სხვა რაღაც, ჩვენ განსხვავებული ემოციების შესახებ განსხვავებული ემოციების შესახებ, და ტექსტულ ემოციების შესახებ. მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'el': 'Η ευρεία εμβέλεια των πλατφορμών κοινωνικών μέσων, όπως το Twitter, επέτρεψε σε πολλούς χρήστες να μοιραστούν τις σκέψεις, τις απόψεις και τα συναισθήματά τους για διάφορα θέματα στο διαδίκτυο. Η ικανότητα να ανιχνεύουν αυτά τα συναισθήματα αυτόματα θα επέτρεπε στους κοινωνικούς επιστήμονες, καθώς και στις επιχειρήσεις να κατανοήσουν καλύτερα τις απαντήσεις από έθνη και πελάτες. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη εισάγουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων 30.000 Περσικών Τουίτ με τα έξι βασικά συναισθήματα του Έκμαν (θυμός, φόβος, ευτυχία, θλίψη, μίσος και θαύμα). Αυτό είναι το πρώτο δημόσια διαθέσιμο σύνολο δεδομένων συναισθημάτων στην περσική γλώσσα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξηγούμε το σύστημα συλλογής και επισήμανσης δεδομένων που χρησιμοποιήθηκε για τη δημιουργία αυτού του συνόλου δεδομένων. Αναλύουμε επίσης το σύνολο δεδομένων που δημιουργήθηκε, παρουσιάζοντας τα διαφορετικά χαρακτηριστικά και χαρακτηριστικά των δεδομένων. Μεταξύ άλλων, ερευνούμε τη συνύπαρξη διαφορετικών συναισθημάτων στο σύνολο δεδομένων και τη σχέση συναισθημάτων και συναισθημάτων των κειμένων. Το σύνολο δεδομένων είναι διαθέσιμο στο κοινό: https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'it': "L'ampia portata di piattaforme di social media, come Twitter, ha permesso a molti utenti di condividere online i loro pensieri, opinioni ed emozioni su vari argomenti. La capacità di rilevare automaticamente queste emozioni consentirebbe agli scienziati sociali, così come alle aziende di comprendere meglio le risposte di nazioni e clienti. In questo studio introduciamo un dataset di 30.000 tweet persiani etichettati con le sei emozioni fondamentali di Ekman (rabbia, paura, felicità, tristezza, odio e meraviglia). Questo è il primo set di dati sulle emozioni pubblicamente disponibili in lingua persiana. In questo articolo spieghiamo lo schema di raccolta e etichettatura dei dati utilizzato per la creazione di questo set di dati. Analizziamo anche il dataset creato, mostrando le diverse caratteristiche e caratteristiche dei dati. Tra le altre cose, esaminiamo la co-occorrenza di diverse emozioni nel dataset, e la relazione tra sentimento ed emozione delle istanze testuali. Il set di dati è disponibile al pubblico all'indirizzo https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.", 'lt': 'Plati socialinės žiniasklaidos platformų, pavyzdžiui, Twitter, apimtis sudarė galimybę daugeliui naudotojų dalytis savo mintimis, nuomonėmis ir emocijomis įvairiomis temomis internete. Galimybė automatiškai nustatyti šias emocijas leistų socialiniams mokslo darbuotojams ir įmonėms geriau suprasti tautų ir vartotojų atsakymus. Šiame tyrime pristatome 30 000 persų Tweetų duomenų rinkinį, pažymėtą šešiomis Ekman pagrindinėmis emocijomis (pyktis, baimė, laimė, liūdna, neapykanta ir stebuklas). Tai pirmasis viešai prieinamas emocijų duomenų rinkinys persų kalba. Šiame dokumente paaiškiname duomenų rinkimo ir ženklinimo sistemą, naudojamą šio duomenų rinkinio kūrimui. Taip pat analizuojame sukurtą duomenų rinkinį, kuriame nurodomos skirtingos duomenų savybės ir savybės. Be kitų dalykų, mes tiriame skirtingų emocijų pasikartojimą duomenų rinkinyje ir ryšį tarp tekstinių atvejų jausmų ir emocijų. Duomenų rinkinys viešai prieinamas https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'hu': 'A közösségi média platformok széles köre, mint például a Twitter, lehetővé tette számos felhasználó számára, hogy megosszák gondolataikat, véleményeiket és érzelmeiket a különböző témákban. Az ilyen érzelmek automatikus felismerésének képessége lehetővé tenné a társadalomtudósok, valamint a vállalkozások számára, hogy jobban megértsék a nemzetek és a vevők válaszait. Ebben a tanulmányban 30.000 perzsa tweetből álló adatkészletet mutatunk be Ekman hat alapvető érzelmével (Düh, Félelem, Boldogság, Szomorúság, Gyűlölet és Csoda). Ez az első nyilvánosan elérhető érzelmi adatok perzsa nyelven. Ebben a tanulmányban ismertetjük az adatkészlet létrehozásához használt adatgyűjtési és címkézési sémát. Elemezzük a létrehozott adatkészletet is, bemutatva az adatok különböző jellemzőit és jellemzőit. Többek között vizsgáljuk a különböző érzelmek együttes előfordulását az adatkészletben, valamint a szöveges esetek érzelmei és érzelmei közötti kapcsolatot. Az adatkészlet nyilvánosan hozzáférhető a következő címen: https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'mk': 'Широкото достигнување на платформите за социјални медиуми, како што е Твитер, им овозможи на многу корисници да ги споделат своите мисли, мислења и емоции на различни теми онлајн. Способноста за автоматски да се детектираат овие емоции би им овозможила на социјалните научници, како и на бизнисите подобро да ги разберат одговорите од нациите и корисниците. Во оваа студија претставуваме податоци од 30.000 Персиски твитови означени со шест основни емоции на Екман (гнев, страв, среќа, тага, омраза и чудо). Ова е првата јавно достапна емоционална датотека на персискиот јазик. Во оваа хартија ја објаснуваме шемата за собирање и етикетирање на податоци која се користи за создавање на овој набор податоци. Ние, исто така, ги анализираме создадените податоци, покажувајќи ги различните карактеристики и карактеристики на податоците. Помеѓу другите работи, истражуваме соопштество на различни емоции во податоците, и врската помеѓу чувствата и емоциите на текстуалните случаи. Податоците се јавно достапни на https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'kk': 'Твиттер секілді социалдық медиа платформаларының көпшілігі, онлайн әртүрлі нақыштарда ойларын, ойларын және емоцияларын бөлістіруге мүмкіндік берді. Бұл емоцияларды автоматты түрде анықтау мүмкіндігі әлемдік ғылымдарға және бизнестерге елдерден және costumers жауаптарын түсінуге мүмкіндік береді. Бұл зерттеулерде біз Екмандың алты негізгі емоцияларына жазылған 30.000 персиялық tweets жиынын таңдап береміз. Бұл персиялық тілінде бірінші көпшілікті емоциялық деректер саны. Бұл қағазда, бұл деректер жинағын құру үшін қолданылатын деректер жинағын және жарлықтау сұлбасын түсіндіреміз. Мұндай-ақ құрылған деректер жиынын анализ, деректердің түрлі қасиеттерін мен қасиеттерін көрсетеді. Басқа нәрселерден біз деректер жиындағы әртүрлі емоциялардың қатынасын және мәтіндік сезімдер мен емоциялардың қатынасын зерттейміз. Деректер жинағы көпшілікті қол жеткізеді https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'mt': "Il-firxa wiesgħa ta’ pjattaformi tal-midja soċjali, bħal Twitter, ippermettew lil ħafna utenti jaqsmu l-ħsibijiet, l-opinjonijiet u l-emozzjonijiet tagħhom fuq diversi suġġetti onlajn. Il-kapaċità li dawn l-emozzjonijiet jiġu individwati awtomatikament tippermetti lix-xjenzati soċjali, kif ukoll lin-negozji jifhmu aħjar ir-risposti min-nazzjonijiet u l-konsumaturi. F'dan l-istudju nintroduċu sett ta' dejta ta' 30,000 Tweet Persjani ttikkettati bis-sitt emozzjonijiet bażiċi ta' Ekman (Anger, Fear, Happiness, Sadness, Hatred, and Wonder). Dan huwa l-ewwel sett ta’ dejta emozzjonali disponibbli pubblikament fil-lingwa Persjana. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nispjegaw l-iskema tal-ġbir u t-tikkettar tad-dejta użata għall-ħolqien ta’ dan is-sett ta’ dejta. Aħna analizzaw ukoll is-sett tad-dejta maħluq, li juri l-karatteristiċi u l-karatteristiċi differenti tad-dejta. Fost affarijiet oħra, ninvestigaw il-kookkorrenza ta’ emozzjonijiet differenti fis-sett tad-dejta, u r-relazzjoni bejn is-sentiment u l-emozzjoni ta’ każijiet testwali. Is-sett tad-dejta huwa disponibbli pubblikament fuq https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.", 'ml': 'ടൂട്ടര്\u200d പോലുള്ള സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകളുടെ വിശാലമായ എത്തിപ്പോകുന്നത് പല ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്കും അവരുടെ ചിന്ത, അഭി ഈ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള കഴിവ് സാമൂഹ്യശാസ്ത്രിമാര്\u200dക്കും സാമൂഹ്യശാസ്ത്രികള്\u200dക്കും രാജ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d 30,000 പേര്\u200dസിയന്\u200d ട്വീറ്റുകളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. എക്മാന്\u200dറെ ആറു അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വികാരങ്ങളുമായി പേരിട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഇതാണ് പാര്\u200dഷിയന്\u200d ഭാഷയിലെ ആദ്യത്തെ പ്രസിദ്ധമായ വികാരങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഈ ഡേറ്റാസറ്റ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കാനായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഡേറ്റാ സംഘത്തെയും ലേബിള്\u200d സ്ക്യൂമിനെ We also analyze the created dataset, showing the different features and characteristics of the data.  മറ്റു കാര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വികാരങ്ങളുടെ സംഭവം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിലും വ്യത്യസ്ത വികാരങ്ങളുടെയും സംഭവ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് പ്രസിദ്ധമായി ലഭ്യമല്ല https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'ms': 'Pendekatan luas platform media sosial, seperti Twitter, telah membolehkan banyak pengguna berkongsi fikiran, pendapat dan emosi mereka pada berbagai topik secara online. Kemampuan untuk mengesan emosi ini secara automatik akan membolehkan saintis sosial, serta perniagaan untuk memahami lebih baik balasan dari negara-negara dan pengguna. Dalam kajian ini kami memperkenalkan set data 30,000 Tweet Persia yang ditabel dengan enam emosi asas Ekman (Kemarahan, Takut, Kebahagiaan, Kesedihan, Kebencian, dan Keajaiban). Ini adalah set data emosi pertama yang tersedia secara awam dalam bahasa Persia. Dalam kertas ini, kami menjelaskan skema kumpulan dan label data yang digunakan untuk mencipta set data ini. We also analyze the created dataset, showing the different features and characteristics of the data.  Dalam hal lain, kami menyelidiki persamaan-persamaan emosi yang berbeza dalam set data, dan hubungan antara perasaan dan emosi kes teks. Set data tersedia secara awam pada https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'pl': 'Szeroki zasięg mediów społecznościowych, takich jak Twitter, pozwolił wielu użytkownikom dzielić się swoimi myślami, opiniami i emocjami na różne tematy online. Umiejętność automatycznego wykrywania tych emocji pozwoliłaby naukowcom społecznym, a także firmom lepiej zrozumieć reakcje narodów i klientów. W niniejszym opracowaniu przedstawiamy zbiór danych 30.000 perskich tweetów oznaczonych sześcioma podstawowymi emocjami Ekmana (gniew, strach, szczęście, smutek, nienawiść i cud). Jest to pierwszy publicznie dostępny zbiór danych dotyczących emocji w języku perskim. W niniejszym artykule wyjaśniamy schemat gromadzenia i etykietowania danych stosowany do tworzenia tego zbioru danych. Analizujemy również utworzony zbiór danych, pokazując różne cechy i cechy danych. Badamy między innymi współwystępowanie różnych emocji w zbiorze danych oraz związek między sentymentem a emocją instancji tekstowych. Zestaw danych jest publicznie dostępny na stronie internetowej https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'ro': 'Acoperirea largă a platformelor de social media, cum ar fi Twitter, a permis multor utilizatori să-și împărtășească gândurile, opiniile și emoțiile pe diferite subiecte online. Abilitatea de a detecta automat aceste emoții ar permite oamenilor de știință sociali, precum și companiilor să înțeleagă mai bine răspunsurile națiunilor și clienților. În acest studiu introducem un set de date de 30.000 de Tweeturi persane etichetate cu cele șase emoții de bază ale lui Ekman (furie, frică, fericire, tristețe, ură și minune). Acesta este primul set de date despre emoții disponibile public în limba persană. În această lucrare, explicăm schema de colectare și etichetare a datelor utilizată pentru crearea acestui set de date. De asemenea, analizăm setul de date creat, arătând diferitele caracteristici și caracteristici ale datelor. Printre altele, investigăm co-apariția diferitelor emoții în setul de date și relația dintre sentiment și emoție a instanțelor textuale. Setul de date este disponibil publicului la adresa https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'sr': 'Širom dostupku platformi društvenih medija, poput Twitter, omogućilo je mnogim korisnicima da podijele svoje misli, mišljenje i emocije na raznim temama na internetu. Sposobnost otkrivanja tih emocija automatski bi omogućila socijalne naučnike, kao i poduzeća da bolje razumeju odgovore od nacija i kostumera. U ovom proučavanju predstavljamo podatke o 30.000 persijskih Tweets označenih šest osnovnih emocija Ekman a (ljutnja, strah, sreća, tuga, mržnja i čuda). Ovo je prva javno dostupna kompleta emocija na persijskom jeziku. U ovom papiru objašnjavamo šemu kolekcije i etiketiranja podataka koji se koristi za stvaranje ovog seta podataka. Takođe analiziramo stvorenu setu podataka, pokazujući različite karakteristike i karakteristike podataka. Između ostalih stvari, istražujemo saradnju različitih emocija u setu podataka i vezu između osjećaja i emocija tekstualnih instancija. Podaci su javno dostupni na https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරවේශනය, වගේම ට්විටර් වලින්, ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ ඔවුන්ගේ හිතන්න, හිතන්න, හැඟ මේ හැඟීම් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සාමාජික විද්\u200dයාඥයෝ වගේම, ව්\u200dයාපාරයෝ ජාතියෝ වලින් ප්\u200d මේ අධ්\u200dයානයේ අපි පාර්සියානු ට්විට් 30,000 ක් තියෙන දත්ත සූදානම් කරනවා එක්මන්ගේ මූලික හැඟීමක් හතරක් තියෙනවා. මේක පාර්සියානු භාෂාවේ පළමුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ලැබෙන හැඟීමේ දත්ත සැට. මේ පැත්තේ, අපි මේ දත්ත සැට් නිර්මාණය සහ ලේබිල් ස්කම්පය පැහැදිලි කරනවා. අපි නිර්මාණය කරපු දත්ත සෙට් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා, දත්තේ වෙනස් අවශ්\u200dය සහ අවශ්\u200dය පෙන්වනවා. අනිත් දේවල් එක්ක, අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා වෙනස් හැඟීම් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් දේවල් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් දේවල් සම්බන්ධ දත්ත සෙට් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන්ම පුළුවන් https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'no': 'Den brede nøkkelen av sosiale media-plattformen, som Twitter, har slått på mange brukarar å dele tankane sine, meningar og emosjonar på ulike emner på nettet. Oppdaging av desse emosjonane vil automatisk tillata sosiale vitenskaplege, også forretningane for å forstå betre svar frå nasjonane og kostnader. I denne studien introduserer vi ein dataset med 30 000 persiske tweeter som er merket med Ekman s seks grunnleggjande følelser (Angre, frykt, lykkeleg, triste, Hatred og Wonder). Dette er det første tilgjengelege emosjonsdatasettet i persisk språk. I denne papiret forklarer vi datasamlinga og merkelapparatet brukt for oppretting av denne dataset. Vi analyserer også oppretta datasett, viser dei ulike funksjonane og karakteristikaren av data. I andre ting undersøker vi samtidig oppføring av ulike følelser i datasettet, og forholdet mellom følelser og følelser av tekstinstanser. Datasettet er tilgjengeleg offentleg på https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'mn': 'Твиттер шиг нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчид өөрсдийн бодол, бодол, сэтгэл хөдлөлийг онлайн сэдэв дээр хуваалцах боломжтой болсон. Эдгээр сэтгэл хөдлөлийг автоматаар мэдэх чадвар нийгмийн эрдэмтэд мөн бизнесүүд улс орнууд, хувьцааны хариултыг илүү ойлгох боломжтой болгодог. Энэ судалгаанд бид Экманын зургаан үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй 30 мянган Персийн Твиттэй өгөгдлийг танилцуулдаг. Энэ бол Персийн хэл дээрх сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдээллийн санааны анхны байгууллага. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өгөгдлийн санг бүтээхэд хэрэглэгдсэн өгөгдлийн цуглуулалт болон маркингийн схемийг тайлбарлаж байна. Мөн бид бүтээсэн өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийг шинжилгээд өгөгдлийн өөр өөр чанарыг харуулж байна. Бусад зүйлсийн дотор бид мэдээллийн санаанд өөр өөр сэтгэл хөдлөлийн харилцааны харилцаа, мэдрэмж болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хоорондын харилцаа судалж байна. Өгөгдлийн санг олон нийтэд https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'ur': 'سوسیلی میڈیا پٹرومٹوں کی وسیع رسی، جیسے ٹویٹر، بہت سے کارساز نے اپنے سوچ، نظریں اور احساسات مختلف موضوع آنلاین میں شریک کرنے کے لئے قادر کر دیا ہے۔ ان احساساتوں کو اپنا پہچان کرنے کے قابل ہے کہ سوسیل سائنس دانشمندوں کو اور تجارت کو بھی بہتر سمجھنے کے لئے اجازت دیں۔ اس مطالعہ میں ہم 30,000 فارسی ٹیوٹ کے ڈاٹسٹ کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جو اکمن کے چھ بنیادی احساسات سے لکھی جاتی ہیں یہ پارسی زبان میں پہلی عمومی احساسات ڈاٹ سٹ ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے اس ڈیٹسٹ کے پیدا کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا ہے ڈیٹ کالکٹ اور لابلینگ طریقے کو توضیح دیتے ہیں. ہم نے بھی پیدا کیے ہوئے ڈاٹ سٹ کو تحقیق کرلیا ہے، ڈاٹ کے مختلف ویژگی اور ویژگی دکھاتے ہیں. اور دوسری چیزوں میں، ہم ڈیٹ سٹ میں مختلف احساساتوں کی اتباع کی تحقیق کر رہے ہیں، اور پاکستال کے احساساتوں اور احساساتوں کے درمیان رابطہ کا تحقیق کررہے ہیں. ڈاٹا سٹ عمومی طور پر موجود ہے https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'ta': 'தொடர்பு போன்ற சமூக ஊடக முறைமைகளின் அகலம் தெரியும், பல பயனர்கள் தன் சிந்தனைகள், கருத்துக்கள் மற்றும் உணர்வுகளை இணையத்தில் பகிர்ந்து  இந்த உணர்வுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் சக்தி தானாகவே சமூக அறிவியலாளர்களுக்கு அனுமதிக்கும், மற்றும் தொழில்நுடைய நாடுகள் மற்றும் ச இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில் நாம் 30,000 பேர்சியன் டுவிட்டர்களை அறிவிக்கிறோம். இக்மானின் ஆறு அடிப்படையான உணர்வுகளுடன் குறிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ள தகவல் தளம் ( இது பார்ஷியன் மொழியில் முதல் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும் உணர்வு தரவு இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தகவல் தொகுப்பு மற்றும் குறியீட்டு திட்டத்தை விளக்குகிறோம் இந்த தரவு அமைப்பு உர நாம் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தரவுத்தளத்தை ஆராய்ந்து, தரவுகளின் வேறு பண்புகளையும் தன்மைகளையும் காட்டுகிறோம். Among other things, we investigate co-occurrence of different emotions in the dataset, and the relationship between sentiment and emotion of textual instances.  தகவல் அமைப்பு பொதுவாக இருக்கிறது https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'so': 'Xafiiska daryeelka shabakada bulshada, tusaale ahaan Twitterka waxaa isticmaalay isticmaalayaal badan inay ka qaybsadaan fikirradooda, fikirrada iyo fikradooda internetka oo kala duduwan. awoodka aqoonsashada fikradan waxay si automati ah u fasaxi kartaa cilmiyiinta bulshada iyo ganacsiga inay si wanaagsan u fahamaan jawaabaha quruumaha iyo kharashka. Waxbarashadan waxaan soo bandhignaa kooban 30,000 oo Farshan ah oo la xiriiray lix fikrada aasaasiga ah ee Ekman (Cadho, Cabsi, faraxsanaan, caloolxumo, Neceed iyo Woodka). Tani waa macluumaadka ugu horeeyay ee la heli karo daryeelka hissiyada ee afka Faaris. Warqadan, waxaynu ku caddaynaynaa ururka macluumaadka iyo qorshaha sawirida ee loo isticmaalay abuuridda sawiradan. Sidoo kale waxaynu baaraynaa sawirada la abuuray, waxaannu tusnaynaa tababarada kala duduwan iyo tababarada macluumaadka. Waxyaabaha kale, waxaynu ka baaraynaa iskuul ka muuqashada xisaabta kala duduwan iyo xiriirka u dhexeeya fikrada iyo xisaabta dhaqanka. Rugta macluumaadku wuxuu si bayaan ah u helaa https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'sv': 'Den breda räckvidden av sociala medieplattformar, som Twitter, har gjort det möjligt för många användare att dela sina tankar, åsikter och känslor om olika ämnen online. Förmågan att upptäcka dessa känslor automatiskt skulle göra det möjligt för samhällsforskare, liksom företag att bättre förstå svar från nationer och kunder. I denna studie introducerar vi en dataset med 30 000 persiska tweets märkta med Ekmans sex grundläggande känslor (Ilska, Rädsla, Lycka, Sorg, Hata och Underverk). Detta är det första allmänt tillgängliga känslodataset på persiska språket. I denna uppsats förklarar vi det datainsamlings- och märkningssystem som används för skapandet av denna datauppsättning. Vi analyserar också den skapade datauppsättningen och visar de olika funktionerna och egenskaperna hos data. Bland annat undersöker vi samtidig förekomst av olika känslor i datauppsättningen och relationen mellan sentiment och känsla i textinstanser. Datauppsättningen är offentligt tillgänglig på https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'vi': 'Sự phát triển rộng rãi của các nền truyền thông xã hội, như Twitter, đã giúp nhiều người dùng có thể chia sẻ suy nghĩ, ý kiến và cảm xúc về các chủ đề khác nhau trên mạng. Khả năng phát hiện cảm xúc này sẽ tự động cho phép các nhà khoa học xã hội, cũng như các công ty hiểu rõ phản ứng từ các quốc gia và khách hàng. Trong nghiên cứu này chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập tin ba mươi nghìn màu Ba Tư với s áu cảm xúc cơ bản của Ekman (tức giận, Sợ hãi, Hạnh phúc, Sadness, mũ, và Wonder). Đây là dữ liệu cảm xúc đầu tiên công khai trong ngôn ngữ Ba Tư. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giải thích bộ sưu tập và mô phỏng dữ liệu được dùng để tạo ra tập tin này. Chúng tôi cũng phân tích các dữ liệu đã tạo ra, hiển thị các tính năng và đặc trưng của dữ liệu. Trong những thứ khác, chúng tôi điều tra sự đồng tình của các cảm xúc khác nhau trong bộ dữ liệu, và mối quan hệ giữa cảm xúc và cảm xúc của các trường hợp kết cấu. Bộ dữ liệu có thể công khai https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'uz': "Twitterda kabi sosial media platformlarining ko'plami foydalanuvchilari har xil mavzu haqida o'ylab, fikrlar va hissiyalarni o'zgartirish imkoniyatini yordam beradi. The ability to detect these emotions automatically would allow social scientists, as well as, businesses to better understand responses from nations and costumers.  Bu taʼminotida biz Ekman 6 asosiy hissiyotlari bilan 30,000 Persian Twitterlarining haqida maʼlumotlar tarkibini ko'rsamiz (Aniq, Fear, Herqqat, Sadaqat, Hatroq va Hatroq va Tadbirlik). Name Bu hujjatda, bu maʼlumotlar toʻplami va taʼlumot qolipini yaratish uchun bajaramiz. Biz yaratilgan maʼlumotlar satrini analyzeriz, maʼlumotning turli xossalarini va xususiyatlarni koʻrsatish. Among other things, we investigate co-occurrence of different emotions in the dataset, and the relationship between sentiment and emotion of textual instances.  Maʼlumotlar toʻplami https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.", 'hr': 'Širom dostupku platformi društvenih medija, poput Twitter, omogućilo je mnogim korisnicima dijeliti svoje misli, mišljenje i emocije na raznim temama na internetu. Sposobnost otkrivanja tih emocija automatski bi omogućila socijalne naučnike, kao i poduzeća da bolje razumiju odgovore od nacija i kostumera. U ovom ispitivanju predstavljamo podatke o 30.000 persijskih Tweets označenih šest osnovnih emocija Ekman a (bijes, strah, sreća, tuga, mržnja i čuda). Ovo je prva javno dostupna kompleta emocija na persijskom jeziku. U ovom papiru objašnjavamo šemu prikupljanja i označavanja podataka koji se koristi za stvaranje ovog seta podataka. Također analiziramo stvorenu setu podataka, pokazujući različite karakteristike i karakteristike podataka. Između ostalih stvari, istražujemo zajedničku pojavu različitih emocija u setu podataka i odnos između osjećaja i emocija tekstualnih slučajeva. Podaci su javno dostupni na https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'da': 'Den brede rækkevidde af sociale medieplatforme, såsom Twitter, har gjort det muligt for mange brugere at dele deres tanker, meninger og følelser om forskellige emner online. Evnen til automatisk at opdage disse følelser vil gøre det muligt for socialforskere, såvel som virksomheder at bedre forstå reaktioner fra nationer og kunder. I dette studie introducerer vi et datasæt af 30.000 persiske tweets mærket med Ekmans seks grundlæggende følelser (Vrede, Frygt, Lykke, Sorg, Had og Vidunder). Dette er det første offentligt tilgængelige følelsesdata på persisk sprog. I denne artikel forklarer vi den dataindsamling og mærkning, der anvendes til oprettelsen af dette datasæt. Vi analyserer også det oprettede datasæt og viser de forskellige funktioner og karakteristika ved dataene. Blandt andet undersøger vi samtidig forekomsten af forskellige følelser i datasættet, og forholdet mellem følelse og følelse i tekstforekomster. Datasættet er offentligt tilgængeligt på https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'nl': 'Het brede bereik van social media platforms, zoals Twitter, heeft veel gebruikers in staat gesteld om hun gedachten, meningen en emoties over verschillende onderwerpen online te delen. De mogelijkheid om deze emoties automatisch te detecteren zou sociale wetenschappers en bedrijven in staat stellen om reacties van naties en klanten beter te begrijpen. In deze studie introduceren we een dataset van 30.000 Perzische Tweets gelabeld met Ekmans zes basisemoties (Woede, Angst, Geluk, Verdriet, Haat en Wonder). Dit is de eerste publiek beschikbare emotie dataset in het Perzisch. In dit artikel leggen we het gegevensverzamelings- en etiketteringsschema uit dat wordt gebruikt voor het maken van deze dataset. We analyseren ook de gecreëerde dataset en laten de verschillende kenmerken en kenmerken van de gegevens zien. We onderzoeken onder andere co-voorkomen van verschillende emoties in de dataset, en de relatie tussen sentiment en emotie van tekstuele instanties. De dataset is openbaar beschikbaar op: https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'bg': 'Широкият обхват на социалните медии, като например Туитър, даде възможност на много потребители да споделят своите мисли, мнения и емоции по различни теми онлайн. Способността за автоматично откриване на тези емоции би позволила на социалните учени, както и на бизнеса да разберат по-добре отговорите на нациите и клиентите. В това проучване представяме набор от данни от 30 000 персийски туитове, обозначени с шестте основни емоции на Екман (гняв, страх, щастие, тъга, омраза и чудо). Това е първият публично достъпен набор от данни за емоции на персийски език. В настоящата статия обясняваме схемата за събиране и етикетиране на данни, използвана за създаването на този набор от данни. Анализираме и създадения набор от данни, показвайки различните характеристики и характеристики на данните. Наред с другото, изследваме съвместното възникване на различни емоции в набора от данни и връзката между сантименталност и емоция на текстови инстанции. Наборът от данни е публично достъпен на адрес: https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'id': "Pendekatan luas platform media sosial, seperti Twitter, telah memungkinkan banyak pengguna untuk berbagi pikiran, pendapat dan emosi mereka pada berbagai topik online. Kemampuan untuk mendeteksi emosi ini secara otomatis akan memungkinkan para ilmuwan sosial, serta bisnis untuk memahami lebih baik respon dari negara-negara dan para kostum. In this study we introduce a dataset of 30,000 Persian Tweets labeled with Ekman's six basic emotions (Anger, Fear, Happiness, Sadness, Hatred, and Wonder).  Ini adalah dataset emosi pertama yang tersedia publik dalam bahasa Persia. Dalam kertas ini, kami menjelaskan skema koleksi dan label data yang digunakan untuk menciptakan set data ini. Kami juga menganalisa set data yang diciptakan, menunjukkan karakteristik dan karakteristik yang berbeda dari data. Di antara hal-hal lain, kami menyelidiki korespondensi emosi yang berbeda di dataset, dan hubungan antara perasaan dan emosi dari contoh teks. Set data tersedia publik di https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.", 'fa': 'دسترسی گسترده\u200cای از platformهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی، مثل توئیتر، به بسیاری از کاربران توانایی داده\u200cاند که فکر\u200cهایشان، نظر\u200cهایشان و احساسات در موضوع\u200cهای مختلف آنلاین به اشتراک کنند. توانایی تشخیص این احساسات به طور خودکار به دانشمندان اجتماعی اجازه می دهد، همچنین تجارت برای بهتر درک پاسخ های کشورها و لباس\u200cپوشیده\u200cها. در این مطالعه، ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات از ۳۰ هزار Tweets فارسی را معرفی می کنیم که با شش احساس بنیادی اکمن (خشم، ترس، شادی، غمگین، نفرت و عجیب) نشان داده شده است. این اولین مجموعه داده\u200cهای احساسات در زبان فارسی است. در این کاغذ، ما برنامه\u200cهای جمع داده\u200cها و برنامه\u200cگذاری برای ایجاد این مجموعه داده\u200cها را توضیح می\u200cدهیم. ما همچنین مجموعه داده\u200cهای ساخته را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم، ویژگی\u200cهای مختلف و ویژگی\u200cهای داده\u200cها را نشان می\u200cدهیم. از طریق چیزهای دیگر، ما در مورد اتفاق همکاری احساسات مختلف در مجموعه داده ها و رابطه بین احساسات و احساسات فرصت متفاوتی تحقیق می کنیم. مجموعه داده\u200cها به طور عمومی در https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'de': 'Die große Reichweite von Social Media Plattformen wie Twitter hat es vielen Nutzern ermöglicht, ihre Gedanken, Meinungen und Emotionen zu verschiedenen Themen online zu teilen. Die Fähigkeit, diese Emotionen automatisch zu erkennen, würde es Sozialwissenschaftlern und Unternehmen ermöglichen, Reaktionen von Nationen und Kunden besser zu verstehen. In dieser Studie stellen wir einen Datensatz von 30.000 persischen Tweets vor, die mit Ekmans sechs grundlegenden Emotionen gekennzeichnet sind (Wut, Angst, Glück, Traurigkeit, Hass und Wunder). Dies ist der erste öffentlich verfügbare Emotionsdatensatz in persischer Sprache. In diesem Beitrag erklären wir das Datenerfassungs- und Kennzeichnungsschema, das für die Erstellung dieses Datensatzes verwendet wird. Wir analysieren auch den erstellten Datensatz und zeigen die verschiedenen Merkmale und Eigenschaften der Daten. Unter anderem untersuchen wir das Co-Auftreten verschiedener Emotionen im Datensatz und die Beziehung zwischen Sentiment und Emotion von Textinstanzen. Der Datensatz ist öffentlich zugänglich unter https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'sw': 'Upatikanaji mkubwa wa majukwaa ya mitandao ya kijamii kama vile Twita, yamewaweza watumiaji wengi kushirikisha mawazo, maoni na hisia zao kwenye mada mbalimbali mtandaoni. Ni uwezo wa kutambua hisia hizi kwa kujitegemea kunaweza kuwaruhusu wanasayansi wa kijamii, pamoja na biashara kuelewa majibu bora kutoka nchi na watumiaji wa gharama. Katika utafiti huu tunaonyesha takwimu za Twita 30,000 za ki-Persia zinazoonyesha hisia sita za msingi za Ekman (hasira, Hofu, Herofu, Uhuzuni, Hati na Tazama). Hii ni takwimu za kwanza za za hisia zinazopatikana hadharani kwa lugha ya Kipersia. Katika gazeti hili, tunaeleza mkusanyiko wa taarifa na mpango wa maambukizi uliotumika kwa ajili ya kutengeneza seti hii ya taarifa. Pia tunachambua seti ya taarifa zilizotengenezwa, kuonyesha tabia tofauti na sifa za taarifa. Miongoni mwa mambo mengine, tunachunguza tukio la pamoja la hisia tofauti katika seti ya taarifa, na uhusiano kati ya hisia na hisia za matukio ya msingi. seti ya taarifa zinapatikana kwa uwazi katika https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'ko': '트위터 등 소셜미디어 플랫폼의 광범위한 응용은 많은 사용자들이 인터넷에서 다양한 화제에 대한 생각, 관점과 감정을 공유할 수 있게 한다.이러한 정서를 자동으로 감지하는 능력은 사회 과학자와 기업으로 하여금 각국과 소비자의 반응을 더욱 잘 이해하게 할 것이다.이 연구에서 우리는 3만 개의 페르시아 추문으로 구성된 데이터 집합을 소개했는데, 이 추문들은 에크만의 여섯 가지 기본적인 정서 (분노, 공포, 행복, 슬픔, 증오, 호기심) 를 표시했다.이것은 처음으로 공개된 페르시아어 감정 데이터 집합이다.본고에서, 우리는 이 데이터 집합을 만드는 데 사용되는 데이터 수집과 표기 방안을 설명할 것이다.우리는 또한 생성된 데이터 집합을 분석하여 데이터의 서로 다른 특징을 보여 주었다.그 밖에 우리는 데이터가 서로 다른 정서에 집중된 공현, 그리고 텍스트 실례에서 정서와 정서 간의 관계를 연구했다.이 데이터 세트는 다음 웹 사이트에서 공개적으로 확인할 수 있습니다.https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'af': "Die wyde bereik van sosiale media platforme, soos Twitter, het baie gebruikers geaktiveer om hul gedagtes, opisies en emosies op verskillende onderwerpe online te deel. Die moontlikheid om hierdie emosies outomaties te ontdek sal sosiale wetenskappers, asook, besighede om beter te verstaan antwoordes van nasies en kostumers. In hierdie studie introduseer ons 'n datastel van 30.000 persies tweets met die ses basiese emosies van Ekman (Anger, Vrees, Gelukkigheid, Sadness, Hatred en Wonder). Hierdie is die eerste publiek beskikbaar emosie datastel in die Persies taal. In hierdie papier, ons verduidelik die data versameling en etiket skema gebruik vir die skep van hierdie datastel. Ons analiseer ook die geskepte datastel en vertoon die verskillende funksies en karakteristieke van die data. Ons onder ander dinge ondersoek die saamvoorkoms van verskillende emosies in die datastel en die verhouding tussen sentiment en emosie van tekstuele voorkoms. Die datastel is openlik beskikbaar by https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.", 'sq': 'Rrjedha e gjerë e platformeve të medias sociale, të tilla si Twitter, ka mundësuar shumë përdorues të ndajnë mendimet, opinionet dhe emocionet e tyre në temat e ndryshme në internet. Aftësia për të zbuluar këto emocione automatikisht do të lejojë shkencëtarët shoqërorë si dhe bizneset të kuptojnë më mirë përgjigjet nga vendet dhe konsumatorët. Në këtë studim ne prezantojmë një grup të dhënash prej 30,000 Tweets persianë të etiketuar me gjashtë emocionet bazë të Ekmanit (Anger, Fear, Happiness, Sadness, Hatred, and Wonder). Ky është grupi i parë i emocioneve në dispozicion publik në gjuhën persiane. Në këtë letër, ne shpjegojmë skemën e mbledhjes dhe etiketave të të dhënave të përdorura për krijimin e këtij grupi të dhënash. We also analyze the created dataset, showing the different features and characteristics of the data.  Midis gjërave të tjera, ne hetojmë bashkëndodhjen e emocioneve të ndryshme në grupin e të dhënave, dhe marrëdhëniet midis ndjenjave dhe emocioneve të rasteve tekstuale. Set i të dhënave është në dispozicion publik në https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'am': 'እንደትዊተር የማኅበራዊ አውታር ሚዲያ መድረኮች ሰፊ ደረጃዎች፣ ብዙ ተጠቃሚዎች አሳባቸውን፣ አሳቡን እና እውቀታቸውን በመስመር ላይ ያጋራሉ፡፡ እነዚህን ስሕተት ማግኘት ማኅበራዊ አዋቂዎች እና ንግድ ከአሕዛብና ከድጋሜዎች መልስ በመሻል እንዲያስተውሉ ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ የኤክምማን ስድስት የጥያቄ እውቀት የተደረገውን የ30,000 የፋርስ Tweets (ቁጣ፥ ፍርሃት፥ ደስታ፥ ኀዘን፥ ጥላቻና ድንጋጤ) የሚታወቅ ዳታተር እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ይህ የፊርስ ቋንቋ የተገኘው የስህተት ዳታ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የዳታ ማሰብሰቢያ እና የድምፅ ፕሮግራሙን ለዚህ ዳታተር መፍጠር የሚጠቀሙትን እናብራራለን፡፡ We also analyze the created dataset, showing the different features and characteristics of the data.  ከሌሎች ነገሮች መካከል የልዩ ልዩ እውቀት እና የኢትዮጵያ ሁኔታዎችን እና የጽሑፍ ሁኔታዎችን መካከል ግንኙነት እና እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የዳታ ሳጥን በተገኘ ጊዜ https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'az': 'Twitter kimi sosyal media platformların geniş əlaqəsi çox istifadəçilərin düşüncələrini, fikirlərini və emosiyalarını online məsələlərində paylaşdırmağa qadir etmişdir. Bu duyguları avtomatik təşkil etməyə qadirlik də sosial bilim adamlarına və biznislərə uluslar və kostümlərdən cavab verənləri daha yaxşı anlamağa imkan verir. Bu təhsil içində, Ekman ın altı düzgün duyguları ilə etiket edilmiş 30.000 Persi Tweets verilənlərini təşkil edirik. Bu, Persiyan dilində ilk halda mövcuddur emosyon verilər qurulmasıdır. Bu kağızda, bu veri qutusu yaratmaq üçün istifadə edilən məlumat koleksiyonunu və etiketləmə taslağını açıqlayırıq. Biz də yaratdığımız verilən quruluşu analiz edirik, verilən müxtəlif xüsusiyyətləri və xüsusiyyətləri göstəririk. Başqa şeylər arasında, məlumatlarda fərqli duyguların birlikdə olmasını və məlumatların duyguları və duyguları arasındakı ilişkisini incidirik. Veri qurğuları açıq-aşkar mövcuddur https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների, ինչպիսիք են Թվիթերը, լայն տարածքը թույլ է տալիս շատ օգտագործողներին կիսել իրենց մտքերը, կարծիքները և զգացմունքները տարբեր թեմաների առցանց: Այս զգացմունքները ինքնաբերաբար հայտնաբերելու ունակությունը թույլ կտար սոցիալական գիտնականներին, ինչպես նաև բիզնեսներին ավելի լավ հասկանալ ազգերի և սպառողների արձագանքները: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք 30,000 պարսիացի թվիթերի տվյալներ, որոնք նշանված են Էքմանի վեց հիմնական զգացմունքներով (զայրույթ, վախ, երջանկություն, տխություն, ատելություն և հրաշք): Սա պարսիացի լեզվի առաջին հասանելի էմոցիոնալ տվյալների համակարգը է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք բացատրում ենք տվյալների հավաքածու և պիտակագրման ծրագիրը, որը օգտագործվում է այս տվյալների համակարգի ստեղծման համար: We also analyze the created dataset, showing the different features and characteristics of the data.  Օրինակ, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբեր զգացմունքների համապատասխանը տվյալների համակարգում և տեքստալ օրինակների զգացմունքների և զգացմունքների միջև կապը: Տվյալների համակարգը հասանելի է https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'tr': 'Twitter ýaly sosyal medýä platformlaryň ýerini, köpüsi ulananlaryň pikirlerini, düşüneklerini we duýgularyny internetde paýlaşyp bermegine rugsat berdi. Bu duýgulary otomatik aňlamak ukyplary sosyal bilim adamlary we işletmenleri milletler we kostumlaryň jogaplaryny gowy düşünmek üçin rugsat berer. Bu aramda, Ekmanyň alty duýgyny (gahary, gork, bagtlyk, gamgyzlyk, soňra) diýilip ýazylan 30,000 Persiýanyň tweetlerini tanyşdyrýarys. Bu Persiýa dilinde ilkinji gezek duýgyş maglumatlary bar. Bu kagyzda, biz bu datasetiň bejermek üçin ullanylýan maglumat koleksiýany we etiket şemasyny düşündiris Biz hem döredilen veri setirini çözümleýäris we munyň farklı özelliklerini we hatlaryny görkezip. Başga zatlaryň arasynda, munyň düýbündeki duýgularyň ýerleşýänligini we duýgularyň derejesi bardygyny maslahat edýäris. Maglumaty halkara ýerleşýär https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'bn': 'টুইটারের মতো সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্লাটফর্মের বিস্তারিত প্রসারিত হয়েছে অনেক ব্যবহারকারীরা অনলাইনে বিভিন্ন বিষয়ে তাদে এই অনুভূতি সনাক্ত করার ক্ষমতা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সামাজিক বিজ্ঞানীদের সাথে ব্যবসায়ীদের দেশ এবং খরচের কাছ থেকে উত্তর বুঝতে প এই গবেষণায় আমরা ৩০,০০০ পার্সিয়ান টুইটের একটি ডাটা সেট পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই যা ইকম্যানের ছয়টি মৌলিক অনুভূতির মাধ্যমে লেখা হয়েছে (ক্রোধ, ক্ষোভ, আনন্দ,  This is the first publicly available emotion dataset in the Persian language.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ডাটা সংগ্রহ এবং লেবেলিং পরিকল্পনা ব্যাখ্যা করি এই ডাটাসেট তৈরি করার জন্য। আমরা তথ্যের বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্য ও বিশ্লেষণ করি। অন্যান্য কিছুর মধ্যে আমরা ডাটাসেটে বিভিন্ন অনুভূতির সাথে অনুসন্ধান করি এবং টেক্সুয়াল ইনসেটসেটের অনুভূতি এবং অনুভূতির মধ্যে  ডাটাসেট প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'ca': "L'ampla gamma de plataformes de mitjans socials, com Twitter, ha permès a molts usuaris compartir els seus pensaments, opinions i emocions en diversos temas en línia. L'habilitat de detectar aquestes emocions automàticament permeteria que els científics socials i les empreses entenguessin millor les respostes de nacions i consumidors. In this study we introduce a dataset of 30,000 Persian Tweets labeled with Ekman's six basic emotions (Anger, Fear, Happiness, Sadness, Hatred, and Wonder).  Aquest és el primer conjunt de dades emocionals disponibles en el llenguatge persa. En aquest article explicem l'esquema de recollició i etiquetatge de dades utilitzat per crear aquest conjunt de dades. També analitzem el conjunt de dades creat, mostrant les diferents característiques i característiques de les dades. Entre altres coses, investigam la co-ocurrència de diferents emocions en el conjunt de dades, i la relació entre el sentiment i l'emoció de les instances textuals. El conjunt de dades està disponible al públic https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.", 'cs': 'Široký dosah platformy sociálních médií, jako je Twitter, umožnil mnoha uživatelům sdílet své myšlenky, názory a emoce na různá témata online. Schopnost automaticky detekovat tyto emoce by umožnila sociálním vědcům i firmám lépe porozumět reakcím národů a zákazníků. V této studii představujeme datovou sadu 30tisícových perských tweetů označených Ekmanovými šesti základními emocemi (vztek, strach, štěstí, smutek, nenávist a div). Jedná se o první veřejně dostupnou soubor emocí v perském jazyce. V tomto článku vysvětlíme schéma shromažďování a označování dat použité pro vytvoření tohoto datového souboru. Dále analyzujeme vytvořený datový soubor, zobrazujeme různé vlastnosti a charakteristiky dat. Mimo jiné zkoumáme koexistenci různých emocí v datové sadě a vztah mezi sentimentem a emocí textových instancí. Soubor dat je veřejně dostupný na adrese: https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'bs': 'Širom dostupku platformi društvenih medija, poput Twitter, omogućilo je mnogim korisnicima da podijele svoje misli, mišljenje i emocije na raznim temama na internetu. Sposobnost otkrivanja tih emocija automatski bi omogućila socijalne naučnike, kao i poduzeća da bolje razumiju odgovore od nacija i kostumera. U ovom istraživanju predstavljamo podatke o 30.000 persijskih Tweets označenih šest osnovnih emocija Ekman a (bijes, strah, sreća, tuga, mržnja i čuda). Ovo je prvi javno dostupni komplet emocija na persijskom jeziku. U ovom papiru objašnjavamo šemu kolekcije i etiketiranja podataka koji se koristi za stvaranje ovog seta podataka. Također analiziramo stvorenu setu podataka, pokazujući različite karakteristike i karakteristike podataka. Između ostalih stvari, istražujemo saradnju različitih emocija u setu podataka i vezu između osjećaja i emocija tekstualnih slučajeva. Podaci su javno dostupni na https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'et': 'Sotsiaalmeedia platvormide, nagu Twitter, lai ulatus on võimaldanud paljudel kasutajatel jagada oma mõtteid, arvamusi ja emotsioone erinevatel teemadel internetis. Võime neid emotsioone automaatselt tuvastada võimaldaks sotsiaalteadlastel ja ettevõtetel paremini mõista rahvaste ja klientide vastust. Selles uuringus tutvustame 30 000 Pärsia tweeti andmekogumit, mis on märgistatud Ekmani kuue põhilise emotsiooniga (viha, hirm, õnn, kurbus, vihkamine ja ime). See on esimene avalikult kättesaadav emotsioonide andmekogum Pärsia keeles. Käesolevas töös selgitame andmekogumise ja märgistamise skeemi, mida kasutatakse selle andmekogumi loomisel. Samuti analüüsime loodud andmekogumit, näidates andmete erinevaid omadusi ja omadusi. Muuhulgas uurime erinevate emotsioonide kaasesinemist andmekogumis ning tekstuaalsete instantside sentimentaalse ja emotsiooni vahelist seost. Andmekogum on avalikult kättesaadav aadressil https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'fi': 'Sosiaalisen median alustojen, kuten Twitterin, laaja ulottuvuus on antanut monille käyttäjille mahdollisuuden jakaa ajatuksiaan, mielipiteitään ja tunteitaan eri aiheista verkossa. Kyky tunnistaa nämä tunteet automaattisesti antaisi yhteiskuntatieteilijöille ja yrityksille mahdollisuuden ymmärtää paremmin kansojen ja asiakkaiden vastauksia. Tässä tutkimuksessa esittelemme 30 000 persialaisen tweetin aineiston, jotka on merkitty Ekmanin kuudella perustunteella (Viha, Pelko, Onnellisuus, Suru, Viha ja Ihme). Tämä on ensimmäinen julkisesti saatavilla oleva tunneaineisto persian kielellä. Tässä työssä selitämme aineiston luomisessa käytetyn tiedonkeruu- ja merkintäjärjestelmän. Analysoimme myös luotua aineistoa ja näytämme aineiston eri ominaisuudet ja ominaisuudet. Tutkimme muun muassa erilaisten tunteiden samanaikaista esiintymistä aineistossa sekä tunteiden ja tunteiden välistä suhdetta tekstiinstanssissa. Tiedot ovat julkisesti saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'jv': 'Punika andhador sing sampeyan karo media komunitas, kaya sistem Internet, iso ngubah akeh pengguna nêmên kanggo ngerasakno, ngrembug lan sampek-sampek kanggo ngerasakno online. Kapan kanggo kebah perusahaan langgar sampeyan iki dadi supaya sakjane sak, nik awak dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé kuwi mau ngerasahan luwih apik dhéwé lan kelompok. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné nganggep kuwi aturan dataset sing katêpakan karo 30.000 "Tuwisan persian" sing masala gambaran karo sampek sing enep iki (Anggal, Kemerdekaan, Kemerdekaan, Sadness, Kemerdekaan lan Dino). Iki iku perusahaan langkung duwé éntuk kanggo wong kuwi. Nang pegatining iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno data gatewak lan etiketing scheme nggawe dataset iki dadi nggawe Awak dhéwé njaluk dadi nggawe dataset, iso nggambar cara-cara ngono cara-cara sing daftar Nanging arah sing mengko, awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo perasaanku dislukan ning dataset, karo perusahaan karo perasaanku dislukan karo perasaanku gambaran dataset https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'sk': 'Širok doseg platform socialnih medijev, kot je Twitter, je mnogim uporabnikom omogočil, da delijo svoje misli, mnenja in čustva o različnih temah na spletu. Sposobnost samodejnega zaznavanja teh čustev bi socialnim znanstvenikom in podjetjem omogočila boljše razumevanje odzivov narodov in kupcev. V tej študiji predstavljamo nabor podatkov 30.000 perzijskih tweetov, označenih z Ekmanovimi šestimi osnovnimi čustvi (jeza, strah, sreča, žalost, sovraštvo in čudež). To je prvi javno dostopen nabor podatkov o čustvih v perzijskem jeziku. V prispevku pojasnjujemo shemo zbiranja in označevanja podatkov, uporabljeno za ustvarjanje tega nabora podatkov. Analiziramo tudi ustvarjeni nabor podatkov, prikazujemo različne značilnosti in značilnosti podatkov. Med drugim raziskujemo soobstoj različnih čustev v naboru podatkov ter razmerje med čustvom in čustvom besedilnih primerov. Zbirka podatkov je javno dostopna na spletni strani: https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'he': 'הגישה הרחבה של פלטפורמות התקשורת החברתית, כמו טוויטר, אפשרה למשתמשים רבים לחלוק מחשבות, דעות ורגשות שלהם על נושאים שונים באינטרנט. היכולת לגלות את הרגשות האלה באופן אוטומטי תאפשר למדענים חברתיים, כמו גם לעסקים להבין טוב יותר תגובות מאומות ומתנעלים. במחקר הזה אנחנו מציגים קבוצת נתונים של 30,000 טוויטים פרסיים שמתווים בשש הרגשות הבסיסיות של אקמן (כעס, פחד, שמחה, עצוב, שנאה ומפלא). זוהי קבוצת הנתונים הרגשות הראשונה שזמינה לציבור בשפה הפרסית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מסבירים את מערכת אוסף הנתונים ותיקיון המשתמשת לייצור קבוצת הנתונים הזאת. אנו גם מנתחים את קבוצת הנתונים שנוצרה, מראים את המאפיינים והאופיינים השונים של הנתונים. בין דברים אחרים, אנו חוקרים התרחשות משותפת של רגשות שונים בסט המידע, והיחסים בין רגשות לרגשות של מקרים טקסטאליים. קבוצת המידע זמינה בפומבי ב https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.', 'ha': "Kullum samun platformoyin mitandai da jamii kamar Twitter, sun yarda masu amfani da yawa su shari mawaƙa, fikanci da hisia kan masu cikin madaidaita dabam-daban. Taimar da ya gane waɗannan hisãbi farat ɗaya zai yarda masu sani na jamii da businessa su fahimta musamman daga mataifa da abincin mataimaki. A cikin wannan aikin nan, Muke ƙara da akan mutanen Twitter na 30,000 Persian wanda aka yi wa'anar da Ekiman na sakan hisori (Hazara, tsõro, Farawa, Hayi, Hati da Na'anar). Wannan yana da farkon tsari na iya samar da shirin hisãbi cikin harshen Persian. Ga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana bayani ga tãrayyar data da aka yi amfani da in ƙiƙiro wannan tsari. Tuna ƙayyade tsarin da aka halitta, kuma Muke nuna wasu tayari da sifati na danne-danne. Daga wani abu na daban, muna ƙidãya ko-bayani masu haɗi da hisoyi daban a cikin tsarin database, da danganci na tsakanin hisoyi da hisoyi na masu shiryi. The dataset is publicly available at  https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection.", 'bo': "སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱའི་གླེང་སྣེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་བསམ སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་སེམས་ཚོར་འདི་ཚོར་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་རིག་པ། དཔོན་རིག་དང་། རྒྱལ་ཁབ་དང་། རྩ་སྒྲིག་པོ་ཚོར In this study we introduce a data set of 30,000 Persian Tweets labeled with Ekman's six basic emotions (Anger, Fear, Happiness, Sadness, Hatred, and Wonder). འདི་ནི་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་དུ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སེམས་ཚོར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་པོ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་གསར་འཛུགས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཆ་མ་འདྲ་བ་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས འུ་ཅག་གིས་གནས་ཚུལ་གཞན་པ་དེ་ནང་གི་སེམས་ཚོར་མི་འདྲ་བའི་མཉམ་དུ་རྟོགས་བཞག་ཡོད་པ་དང་། སེམས་ཚོར་དང་སེམས་ཚོར་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་། སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་སྤྱད་པར་སྤྱོད་ཚར་བ https://github.com/nazaninsbr/Persian-Emotion-Detection."}
{'en': 'A Review on Document Information Extraction Approaches', 'pt': 'Uma revisão sobre abordagens de extração de informações de documentos', 'es': 'Revisión de los enfoques de extracción de información de documentos', 'ja': '文書情報抽出アプローチのレビュー', 'ar': 'مراجعة أساليب استخراج معلومات المستند', 'fr': "Un examen des approches d'extraction d'informations documentaires", 'hi': 'दस्तावेज़ जानकारी निष्कर्षण दृष्टिकोण पर एक समीक्षा', 'zh': '文献信息提取法综述', 'ru': 'Обзор подходов к извлечению информации из документов', 'ga': 'Athbhreithniú ar Chur Chuige um Eastóscadh Faisnéise Doiciméid', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αναθεώρηση των προσεγγίσεων εξαγωγής πληροφοριών εγγράφων', 'hu': 'A dokumentumokkal kapcsolatos információk kivonásáról szóló megközelítések felülvizsgálata', 'mk': 'Name', 'it': "Riesame sugli approcci per l'estrazione delle informazioni sui documenti", 'kk': 'Құжаттың мәліметті тарқату жағдайына қарау', 'lt': 'Dokumentų informacijos gavimo metodų peržiūra', 'ml': 'രേഖയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രദര്\u200dശനം', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Reviżjoni dwar Approċċi ta’ Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni dwar id-Dokumenti', 'mn': 'Документын мэдээллийн хайлтын тухай судалгаа', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Przegląd metod ekstrakcji informacji o dokumentach', 'ro': 'O revizuire a abordărilor privind extragerea informațiilor documentelor', 'sr': 'Прегледај о приступима за извуку информације документа', 'si': 'Comment', 'so': 'Ka baaraandegista macluumaadka dibadda ee dukumentiga', 'sv': 'En översyn av tillvägagångssätt för utvinning av dokumentinformation', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Xem xét về phương pháp chiết xuất thông tin', 'da': 'En gennemgang af metoderne til udvinding af dokumentoplysninger', 'nl': 'Een herziening van de benaderingen voor het extraheren van documentinformatie', 'bg': 'Преглед на подходите за извличане на информация за документи', 'id': 'Sebuah Review pada Pendekatan Ekstraksi Informasi Dokumen', 'ko': '문헌 정보 추출 방법에 대해 종합적으로 서술하다.', 'de': 'Ein Überblick über Ansätze zur Extraktion von Dokumenteninformationen', 'hr': 'Pregled priključenja izvlačenja informacija dokumenta', 'sw': 'Mapitio kuhusu Utoa wa Habari wa Hukumu', 'fa': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ሰነድ መረጃ ማውጣት', 'tr': 'Sened Maglumaty A ç Girişi', 'az': 'Vesiqə Malümatı A çırma Yaxınlıqları', 'bn': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një përmbledhje mbi përqasjet e nxjerrjes së informacionit të dokumentit', 'ca': "Una revisió sobre les aproximacions d'extracció d'informació dels documents", 'bs': 'Pregled priklada izvlačenja informacija dokumenta', 'hy': 'Comment', 'cs': 'Přezkum přístupů k extrakci informací o dokumentech', 'et': 'Dokumentide teabe väljavõtmise meetodite ülevaade', 'fi': 'Asiakirjojen tietojen keruuta koskevien lähestymistapojen tarkastelu', 'sk': 'Pregled pristopov za pridobivanje informacij o dokumentih', 'he': 'Name', 'jv': 'Ngubah perintah kanggo Kemerdekaan Informasi', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་སྐབས་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Information extraction from documents has become great use of novel natural language processing areas. Most of the entity extraction methodologies are variant in a context such as medical area, financial area, also come even limited to the given language. It is better to have one generic approach applicable for any document type to extract entity information regardless of language, context, and structure. Also, another issue in such research is structural analysis while keeping the hierarchical, semantic, and heuristic features. Another problem identified is that usually, it requires a massive training corpus. Therefore, this research focus on mitigating such barriers. Several approaches have been identifying towards building document information extractors focusing on different disciplines. This research area involves natural language processing, semantic analysis, information extraction, and conceptual modelling. This paper presents a review of the information extraction mechanism to construct a generic framework for document extraction with aim of providing a solid base for upcoming research.', 'ar': 'أصبح استخراج المعلومات من المستندات استخدامًا رائعًا لمناطق معالجة اللغة الطبيعية الجديدة. تتنوع معظم منهجيات استخراج الكيانات في سياق مثل المجال الطبي والمجال المالي ، كما أنها تقتصر حتى على اللغة المعينة. من الأفضل أن يكون لديك نهج عام واحد قابل للتطبيق على أي نوع مستند لاستخراج معلومات الكيان بغض النظر عن اللغة والسياق والهيكل. أيضًا ، هناك قضية أخرى في مثل هذا البحث وهي التحليل الهيكلي مع الحفاظ على السمات الهرمية والدلالية والإرشادية. مشكلة أخرى تم تحديدها هي أنه عادة ما يتطلب مجموعة تدريب ضخمة. لذلك ، يركز هذا البحث على التخفيف من هذه الحواجز. تم تحديد العديد من الأساليب من أجل بناء مستخلصات معلومات المستندات مع التركيز على التخصصات المختلفة. يتضمن مجال البحث هذا معالجة اللغة الطبيعية والتحليل الدلالي واستخراج المعلومات والنمذجة المفاهيمية. تقدم هذه الورقة مراجعة لآلية استخراج المعلومات لبناء إطار عام لاستخراج الوثائق بهدف توفير قاعدة صلبة للبحث القادم.', 'pt': 'A extração de informações de documentos tornou-se um grande uso de novas áreas de processamento de linguagem natural. A maioria das metodologias de extração de entidades são variantes em um contexto como área médica, área financeira, também vêm limitadas ao idioma determinado. É melhor ter uma abordagem genérica aplicável a qualquer tipo de documento para extrair informações da entidade, independentemente do idioma, contexto e estrutura. Além disso, outra questão em tal pesquisa é a análise estrutural, mantendo as características hierárquicas, semânticas e heurísticas. Outro problema identificado é que, geralmente, requer um corpus de treinamento massivo. Portanto, esta pesquisa se concentra em mitigar tais barreiras. Várias abordagens têm sido identificadas para a construção de extratores de informações documentais com foco em diferentes disciplinas. Esta área de pesquisa envolve processamento de linguagem natural, análise semântica, extração de informações e modelagem conceitual. Este artigo apresenta uma revisão do mecanismo de extração de informações para construir uma estrutura genérica para extração de documentos com o objetivo de fornecer uma base sólida para pesquisas futuras.', 'es': 'La extracción de información de los documentos se ha convertido en un gran uso de nuevas áreas de procesamiento de lenguaje natural La mayoría de las metodologías de extracción de entidades son variantes en un contexto como el área médica, el área financiera, también vienen limitadas al idioma dado. Es mejor tener un enfoque genérico aplicable a cualquier tipo de documento para extraer la información de la entidad independientemente del idioma, el contexto y la estructura. Además, otro tema en esta investigación es el análisis estructural, manteniendo las características jerárquicas, semánticas y heurísticas. Otro problema identificado es que, por lo general, requiere un corpus de capacitación masivo. Por lo tanto, esta investigación se centra en mitigar tales barreras. Se han identificado varios enfoques para la construcción de extractores de información documental centrados en diferentes disciplinas. Esta área de investigación incluye el procesamiento del lenguaje natural, el análisis semántico, la extracción de información y el modelado conceptual. Este artículo presenta una revisión del mecanismo de extracción de información para construir un marco genérico para la extracción de documentos con el objetivo de proporcionar una base sólida para futuras investigaciones.', 'fr': "L'extraction d'informations à partir de documents est devenue une grande utilisation des nouvelles zones de traitement du langage naturel. La plupart des méthodologies d'extraction d'entités sont variables dans un contexte tel que le domaine médical, le domaine financier, et sont même limitées à la langue donnée. Il est préférable d'avoir une approche générique applicable à tout type de document afin d'extraire des informations d'entité indépendamment de la langue, du contexte et de la structure. De plus, une autre question de ce type de recherche est l'analyse structurelle tout en conservant les caractéristiques hiérarchiques, sémantiques et heuristiques. Un autre problème identifié est qu'en général, cela nécessite un vaste corpus de formation. Par conséquent, cette recherche se concentre sur l'atténuation de ces obstacles. Plusieurs approches ont été identifiées pour créer des extracteurs d'informations documentaires axés sur différentes disciplines. Ce domaine de recherche comprend le traitement du langage naturel, l'analyse sémantique, l'extraction d'informations et la modélisation conceptuelle. Cet article présente une revue du mécanisme d'extraction d'informations afin de construire un cadre générique pour l'extraction de documents dans le but de fournir une base solide pour les recherches à venir.", 'hi': 'दस्तावेजों से जानकारी निष्कर्षण उपन्यास प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण क्षेत्रों का महान उपयोग बन गया है। अधिकांश इकाई निष्कर्षण पद्धतियां चिकित्सा क्षेत्र, वित्तीय क्षेत्र जैसे संदर्भ में भिन्न हैं, जो दी गई भाषा तक भी सीमित हैं। भाषा, संदर्भ और संरचना की परवाह किए बिना इकाई जानकारी निकालने के लिए किसी भी दस्तावेज़ प्रकार के लिए लागू एक सामान्य दृष्टिकोण होना बेहतर है। इसके अलावा, इस तरह के शोध में एक और मुद्दा पदानुक्रमित, शब्दार्थ और हेरिस्टिक विशेषताओं को रखते हुए संरचनात्मक विश्लेषण है। पहचानी गई एक और समस्या यह है कि आमतौर पर, इसे बड़े पैमाने पर प्रशिक्षण कॉर्पस की आवश्यकता होती है। इसलिए, यह शोध इस तरह की बाधाओं को कम करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करता है। विभिन्न विषयों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने वाले दस्तावेज़ सूचना निकालने वालों के निर्माण की दिशा में कई दृष्टिकोणों की पहचान की गई है। इस शोध क्षेत्र में प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण, शब्दार्थ विश्लेषण, सूचना निष्कर्षण और वैचारिक मॉडलिंग शामिल हैं। यह पेपर आगामी अनुसंधान के लिए एक ठोस आधार प्रदान करने के उद्देश्य से दस्तावेज़ निष्कर्षण के लिए एक सामान्य ढांचे का निर्माण करने के लिए सूचना निष्कर्षण तंत्र की समीक्षा प्रस्तुत करता है।', 'ru': 'Извлечение информации из документов стало большим использованием новых областей обработки естественного языка. Большинство методологий извлечения субъектов являются вариантными в таком контексте, как медицинская область, финансовая область, а также ограничиваются данным языком. Лучше иметь один общий подход, применимый для любого типа документа, чтобы извлечь информацию о сущности независимо от языка, контекста и структуры. Также еще одним вопросом в таких исследованиях является структурный анализ при сохранении иерархических, семантических и эвристических особенностей. Еще одна выявленная проблема заключается в том, что, как правило, для ее решения требуется огромный учебный корпус. Поэтому эти исследования сосредоточены на устранении таких барьеров. Был выявлен ряд подходов к созданию механизмов извлечения информации из документов с уделением особого внимания различным дисциплинам. Эта область исследований включает в себя обработку естественного языка, семантический анализ, извлечение информации и концептуальное моделирование. В настоящем документе представлен обзор механизма извлечения информации для создания общей основы для извлечения документов с целью обеспечения прочной основы для предстоящих исследований.', 'ga': 'Baineadh leas an-mhór as réimsí próiseála teanga nádúrtha núíosacha as faisnéis a bhaint as doiciméid. Tá an chuid is mó de na modheolaíochtaí eastósctha eintitis athraitheach i gcomhthéacs mar réimse leighis, réimse airgeadais, fiú teoranta don teanga ar leith. Is fearr cur chuige cineálach amháin a bheith infheidhme maidir le haon chineál doiciméid chun faisnéis aonáin a bhaint amach beag beann ar theanga, comhthéacs agus struchtúr. Chomh maith leis sin, saincheist eile i dtaighde den sórt sin is ea anailís struchtúrach agus na gnéithe ordlathacha, shéimeantacha agus heorastúla á gcoimeád ag an am céanna. Fadhb eile a aithnítear ná go mbíonn corpas oiliúna ollmhór ag teastáil uaidh de ghnáth. Mar sin, dírítear sa taighde seo ar bhacainní dá leithéid a mhaolú. Tá go leor cineálacha cur chuige á n-aithint chun eastóscóirí faisnéise doiciméad a thógáil ag díriú ar dhisciplíní éagsúla. Baineann an réimse taighde seo le próiseáil teanga nádúrtha, anailís shéimeantach, asbhaint faisnéise, agus samhaltú coincheapúil. Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair athbhreithniú ar an meicníocht asbhainte faisnéise chun creat cineálach a thógáil le haghaidh asbhaint doiciméad agus é mar aidhm bonn láidir a sholáthar don taighde atá le teacht.', 'ja': '文書からの情報抽出は、斬新な自然言語処理領域を大いに利用するようになりました。 ほとんどのエンティティ抽出方法論は、医療領域、財務領域などの文脈で異なり、与えられた言語にさえ限定されます。 言語、コンテキスト、構造に関わらず、エンティティ情報を抽出するために、あらゆるドキュメントタイプに適用可能な一般的なアプローチを1つ用意することをお勧めします。 また、このような研究における別の問題は、階層的、意味的、ヒューリスティックな特徴を保持したままの構造分析である。 特定されたもう1つの問題は、通常、大規模なトレーニングコーパスが必要であることです。 したがって、この研究はそのような障壁を緩和することに焦点を当てている。 さまざまな分野に焦点を当てた文書情報抽出ツールを構築するためのいくつかのアプローチが特定されています。 この研究領域には、自然言語処理、意味分析、情報抽出、および概念モデリングが含まれます。 本稿では、今後の研究のための確固たる基盤を提供することを目的として、文書抽出のための一般的なフレームワークを構築するための情報抽出メカニズムのレビューを紹介する。', 'zh': '取文档已为新颖自然语言处领大用。 大抵实体提取方法在诸如医疗领域,金融领域等上下文中皆可变,至止于给定语言。 宜用一文档之通用,以取信息,不计言语、上下文构。 此其别者,结构相持,语义启发式特征。 所见者,常须大练语料库。 故其重轻此障也。 已定数法,专注异学科者文档息提取器。 当究域及自然语言处分,语义分析,信息取建模。 本文综述信息提取机制,以构文档提取通用框架,指为将来之究坚实之基。', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή πληροφοριών από έγγραφα έχει γίνει μεγάλη χρήση νέων περιοχών επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Οι περισσότερες από τις μεθοδολογίες εξαγωγής οντοτήτων είναι παραλλαγές σε ένα πλαίσιο όπως ο ιατρικός τομέας, ο οικονομικός τομέας, επίσης περιορίζονται ακόμη και στη δεδομένη γλώσσα. Είναι καλύτερο να υπάρχει μια γενική προσέγγιση που να εφαρμόζεται σε κάθε τύπο εγγράφου για την εξαγωγή πληροφοριών οντότητας ανεξάρτητα από τη γλώσσα, το πλαίσιο και τη δομή. Επίσης, ένα άλλο θέμα σε μια τέτοια έρευνα είναι η δομική ανάλυση διατηρώντας παράλληλα τα ιεραρχικά, σημασιολογικά και heuristικά χαρακτηριστικά. Ένα άλλο πρόβλημα που εντοπίστηκε είναι ότι συνήθως απαιτεί ένα τεράστιο εκπαιδευτικό σώμα. Ως εκ τούτου, η έρευνα αυτή επικεντρώνεται στον μετριασμό τέτοιων εμποδίων. Αρκετές προσεγγίσεις έχουν εντοπιστεί για την κατασκευή συσκευών εξαγωγής πληροφοριών εγγράφων που επικεντρώνονται σε διαφορετικούς κλάδους. Αυτός ο ερευνητικός τομέας περιλαμβάνει επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας, σημασιολογική ανάλυση, εξαγωγή πληροφοριών και εννοιολογική μοντελοποίηση. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια ανασκόπηση του μηχανισμού εξαγωγής πληροφοριών για την κατασκευή ενός γενικού πλαισίου εξαγωγής εγγράφων με στόχο την παροχή μιας σταθερής βάσης για την επερχόμενη έρευνα.', 'hu': 'A dokumentumokból történő információkinyerés nagymértékben használja az új természetes nyelvfeldolgozási területeket. A legtöbb entitás kitermelési módszere változatos egy olyan kontextusban, mint az orvosi terület, a pénzügyi terület, sőt még az adott nyelvre is korlátozódik. Jobb, ha bármely dokumentumtípusra egyetlen általános megközelítést alkalmazunk az entitásadatok nyelvétől, kontextustól és struktúrájától függetlenül történő kinyerésére. Továbbá az ilyen kutatások másik kérdése a strukturális elemzés, miközben megőrzik a hierarchikus, szemantikai és heurisztikai jellemzőket. Egy másik probléma azonosított, hogy általában masszív edzési korpuszt igényel. Ezért a kutatás az ilyen akadályok enyhítésére összpontosít. A különböző tudományágakra összpontosító dokumentumok információkivonóinak kiépítésére számos megközelítést azonosítottak. Ez a kutatási terület magában foglalja a természetes nyelv feldolgozását, a szemantikai elemzést, az információkitermelést és a fogalmi modellezést. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az információkinyerési mechanizmus áttekintését annak érdekében, hogy a dokumentum kinyeréséhez általános keretet hozzon létre azzal a céllal, hogy szilárd alapot biztosítson a közelgő kutatások számára.', 'ka': 'Name უფრო დიდი ინტერტიკური ექსტრექციის მეტოდოლოგიები არიან კონტექსტში, როგორც მედიცინური ფართობა, ფინაციური ფართობა, ასევე მოდის მიუთითებული ენაზე. უფრო უკეთესია, რომ ყველა დოკუმენტის ტიპის გამოყენება ინფორმაციის ინფორმაციას ენის, კონტექსტურის და სტრუქტურის განმავლობაში ერთი საერთო განსაზღვრე ასევე, სხვა პრობლემა ამ შესწავლობაში არის სტრუქტური ანალიზი, როცა იერაქტიკური, ჟენმანტიკური და ჰეურსტიკური ფუნქციების შესახებ. სხვა პრობლემა, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული იყო, რომ ეს უმრავლედ უჭირდება მასტიური განაზღვრების კორპუსი. ამიტომ, ეს შესწავლობა იქნება ასეთი ბარივრების შემცირებაზე. რამდენიმე დახმარება იდენტიფიკაცია დოკუმენტის ინფორმაციის ექსტრექტორის შექმნა, რომლებიც განსხვავებული ეთსტიპლინტებზე დაყენებულია. ეს პასუხის საკითხები მოთავსდება თავისუფალური ენის პროცესი, სიმენტიური ანალიზი, ინფორმაციის ექსტრექცია და კონცექტური მოდელიცია. ამ დოკუმენტის შესახებ ინფორმაციის ექსტრექციის მექანიზმის შესახებ, რომელიც დოკუმენტის ექსტრექციისთვის სხვადასხვა ფრამენტის კონტრექციის შესახებ, მი', 'it': "L'estrazione di informazioni dai documenti è diventata un grande uso di nuove aree di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. La maggior parte delle metodologie di estrazione dell'entità sono varianti in un contesto come l'area medica, l'area finanziaria, anche vengono limitate al linguaggio dato. È meglio avere un approccio generico applicabile a qualsiasi tipo di documento per estrarre informazioni sull'entità indipendentemente dalla lingua, dal contesto e dalla struttura. Inoltre, un altro problema in tale ricerca è l'analisi strutturale pur mantenendo le caratteristiche gerarchiche, semantiche ed euristiche. Un altro problema identificato è che di solito, richiede un corpus di allenamento massiccio. Pertanto, questa ricerca si concentra sulla mitigazione di tali barriere. Diversi approcci sono stati individuati per costruire estrattori di informazioni documentali incentrati su diverse discipline. Questa area di ricerca coinvolge l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale, l'analisi semantica, l'estrazione di informazioni e la modellazione concettuale. Questo articolo presenta una rassegna del meccanismo di estrazione delle informazioni per costruire un framework generico per l'estrazione dei documenti con l'obiettivo di fornire una solida base per le future ricerche.", 'kk': 'Құжаттардан мәліметті тарқату романдық тіл өңдеу аумақтарының көп пайдалануы болды. Бөліктерді тарқату методологияларының көпшілігі медицина аумағында, финансовы аумағында, сондай-ақ келтірілген тіліне шектелген. Тіл, контекст және құрылғының құрылымына қарамастыру үшін кез келген құжаттың түріне бір жалпы жақсы жағдай тәртібі болу жақсы. Сонымен қатар, бұл зерттеулердің басқа мәселесі - иерархиялық, семантикалық және геуристік қасиеттерді сақтау үшін структуралық анализ. Басқа мәселе, кәдімгі, ол үлкен оқыту корпус керек. Сондықтан бұл зерттеулердің бұл бариектерді азайту арқылы көмектеседі. Құжаттың мәліметті тарқатушыларына көптеген көптеген арқылы бір түрлі дисциплиналарға назар аударып тұрады. Бұл зерттеу аумағында табиғи тілдерді өңдеу, семантикалық анализ, мәліметті тарқату және концептуалды модель болады. Бұл қағаз келесі зерттеу үшін құжатты тарқату үшін жалпы фреймін құру үшін мәліметті тарқату механизмінің қарауын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Iš dokumentų gaunama informacija tapo labai naudinga naujoms gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo vietovėms. Dauguma ūkio subjektų gavybos metodikų yra skirtingos tokiomis aplinkybėmis kaip medicinos sritis, finansų sritis, taip pat apsiriboja konkrečia kalba. It is better to have one generic approach applicable for any document type to extract entity information regardless of language, context, and structure.  Also, another issue in such research is structural analysis while keeping the hierarchical, semantic, and heuristic features.  Kita nustatyta problem a yra ta, kad paprastai jai reikia masinio mokymo korpuso. Todėl šiame tyrime daugiausia dėmesio skiriama tokių kliūčių mažinimui. Buvo nustatyti keli metodai, kuriais siekiama kurti dokumentų informacijos gavėjus, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant įvairioms sritims. Ši mokslinių tyrimų sritis apima natūralų kalbų apdorojimą, semantinę analizę, informacijos gavimą ir koncepcinį modeliavimą. Šiame dokumente pateikiama informacijos gavimo mechanizmo peržiūra siekiant sukurti bendrą dokumentų gavimo sistemą, siekiant sukurti tvirtą būsimų mokslinių tyrimų pagrindą.', 'mk': 'Изземањето информации од документите стана голема употреба на новите области за обработување на природен јазик. Повеќето методологии за екстракција на ентитетите се варијантни во контекст како што се медицинската област, финансиската област, исто така, се ограничени на дадениот јазик. It is better to have one generic approach applicable for any document type to extract entity information regardless of language, context, and structure.  Исто така, уште едно прашање во ваквото истражување е структурната анализа, истовремено задржувајќи ги хиерархичните, семантичните и хеористичките карактеристики. Друг идентификуван проблем е дека обично бара масовен тренинг корпус. Затоа, ова истражување се фокусира на олеснувањето на ваквите бариери. Неколку пристапи се идентификуваат кон изградба на екстрактори на документи кои се фокусираат на различни дисциплини. Оваа истражувачка област вклучува природно обработување јазик, семантична анализа, извлекување информации и концептуално моделирање. Овој документ претставува преглед на механизмот за извлекување информации за изградба на генерална рамка за извлекување документи со цел обезбедување цврста база за следното истражување.', 'ms': 'Pengekstraksi maklumat dari dokumen telah menjadi penggunaan besar kawasan pemprosesan bahasa alam yang baru. Kebanyakan metodologi ekstraksi entiti adalah variasi dalam konteks seperti kawasan perubatan, kawasan keuangan, juga datang walaupun terbatas kepada bahasa yang diberikan. Lebih baik mempunyai satu pendekatan generik yang berlaku untuk setiap jenis dokumen untuk mengekstrak maklumat entiti tidak kira-kira bahasa, konteks, dan struktur. Juga, satu lagi isu dalam kajian seperti ini adalah analisis struktur sementara menjaga ciri-ciri hierarkis, semantik, dan heuristik. Masalah lain yang dikenalpasti adalah bahawa biasanya, ia memerlukan korpus latihan besar. Oleh itu, kajian ini fokus pada mengurangi halangan tersebut. Beberapa pendekatan telah mengenalpasti untuk membina pengekstraktor maklumat dokumen yang fokus pada disiplin yang berbeza. Kawasan kajian ini melibatkan pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi, analisis semantik, ekstraksi maklumat, dan model konseptual. Kertas ini memperkenalkan ulasan mekanisme ekstraksi maklumat untuk membina kerangka generik untuk ekstraksi dokumen dengan tujuan menyediakan pangkalan kuat untuk kajian yang akan datang.', 'ml': 'രേഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ പ മെഡിക്കല്\u200d ഭാഗത്തിന്റെയും സാമ്പത്തിക ഭാഗത്തിന്റെയും പോലെയുള്ള സാമ്പത്തികവിദ്യയില്\u200d മിക്കവാറുള്ള ശാസ്ത്രീയ ഒരു രേഖയുടെ തരം പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു സാധാരണ നടപടിയുണ്ടാക്കുക എന്നതാണ് നല്ലത്, ഭാഷ, കെന്\u200dസ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റോള്\u200d, ഘട ഇത്തരം പഠനത്തില്\u200d മറ്റൊരു കാര്യത്തിന്റെയും കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d സ്ഥാനമായ വിശ്വാസം ഹിയാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d, സെമാന്റിക്ക്, ഹെയ മറ്റൊരു പ്രശ്നം തിരിച്ചറിയപ്പെടുന്നത് സാധാരണ, അതിന് ഒരു വലിയ പരിശീലന കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഈ പഠനത്തിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധ ഇത്തരം തടസ്സങ്ങള്\u200d മുളപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡിസ്കിപ്ലൈനുകളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന രേഖയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എക്ട്രെക്റ്ററുകള്\u200d പണിയുന്നതിന ഈ പഠനത്തിന്റെ ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രം, സെമാന്റിക്ക് അന്വേഷണം, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തുവരുത്തു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തുവരുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി ഒരു സാധാരണ ഫ്രെയിമെന്\u200dറ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പുറത്തേക്കുള്ള മെന', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni mid-dokumenti saret użu kbir minn żoni ġodda ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodoloġiji tal-estrazzjoni tal-entità huma varjanti f’kuntest bħal qasam mediku, qasam finanzjarju, huma wkoll limitati għall-lingwa partikolari. Huwa aħjar li jkun hemm approċċ ġeneriku wieħed applikabbli għal kwalunkwe tip ta’ dokument biex tiġi estratta l-informazzjoni tal-entità irrispettivament mil-lingwa, il-kuntest u l-istruttura. Also, another issue in such research is structural analysis while keeping the hierarchical, semantic, and heuristic features.  Problema oħra identifikata hija li normalment teħtieġ korpus ta’ taħriġ massiv. Għalhekk, din ir-riċerka tiffoka fuq it-tnaqqis ta’ dawn l-ostakli. Diversi approċċi kienu qed jidentifikaw lejn l-estratturi tal-informazzjoni dwar id-dokumenti li jiffokaw fuq dixxiplini differenti. Dan il-qasam tar-riċerka jinvolvi l-ipproċessar naturali tal-lingwi, l-analiżi semantika, l-estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni, u l-immudellar kunċettwali. Dan id-dokument jippreżenta reviżjoni tal-mekkaniżmu tal-estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni biex jinbena qafas ġeneriku għall-estrazzjoni tad-dokumenti bil-għan li tiġi pprovduta bażi solid a għar-riċerka li jmiss.', 'no': 'Utpakking av informasjon frå dokument er blitt stor bruk av nyttige naturspråk- handlingar. Dei fleste metodane for utpakking av einingar er variant i eit kontekst som medisinsk område, finansiell område, og også er begrenset til den oppgjevne språket. Det er bedre å ha ein generell tilnærming som er tilgjengeleg for alle dokumenttypar for å pakka ut einingsinformasjon uavhengig av språk, kontekst og struktur. Ein annan problem i slike forskning er strukturell analyse mens hierarkiske, semantiske og heuristiske funksjonar vert beholde. Ein annan problem identifisert er at det vanlegvis krev ein massiv øvingskorpus. Dette forskninga fokuserer derfor på å redusera slike barrierer. Fleire tilnærmingar har identifisert mot bygging av dokumentinformasjonsekstraktorar som fokuserer på ulike discipliner. Dette forskningsområdet involverer naturspråkshandtering, semantisk analyse, utpakking av informasjon og konseptisk modellering. Denne papiret viser ei oversikt over informasjonsekstraksjonsmekanismen for å konstruere eit generelt rammeverk for dokumentekstraksjon med mål å gi ein solid basis for framkommende forskning.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja informacji z dokumentów stała się dużym wykorzystaniem nowych obszarów przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Większość metodologii ekstrakcji podmiotów jest wariantowa w kontekście takim jak obszar medyczny, obszar finansowy, również ogranicza się nawet do danego języka. Lepiej jest mieć jedno ogólne podejście stosowane dla każdego typu dokumentu do wyodrębniania informacji o jednostce niezależnie od języka, kontekstu i struktury. Innym zagadnieniem w takich badaniach jest również analiza strukturalna przy zachowaniu cech hierarchicznych, semantycznych i heurystycznych. Kolejnym zidentyfikowanym problemem jest to, że zwykle wymaga ogromnego korpusu treningowego. Dlatego też badania te koncentrują się na łagodzeniu takich barier. Określono kilka podejść do budowy ekstraktorów informacji o dokumentach koncentrujących się na różnych dyscyplinach. Ten obszar badawczy obejmuje przetwarzanie języka naturalnego, analizę semantyczną, ekstrakcję informacji i modelowanie koncepcyjne. W artykule przedstawiono przegląd mechanizmu ekstrakcji informacji w celu stworzenia ogólnych ram ekstrakcji dokumentów w celu zapewnienia solidnej podstawy dla nadchodzących badań.', 'ro': 'Extragerea informațiilor din documente a devenit o mare utilizare a noilor domenii de prelucrare a limbajului natural. Majoritatea metodologiilor de extragere a entităților sunt variante într-un context cum ar fi domeniul medical, domeniul financiar, vin, de asemenea, limitate la limba dată. Este mai bine să avem o abordare generică aplicabilă oricărui tip de document pentru a extrage informații despre entitate indiferent de limbă, context și structură. De asemenea, o altă problemă în această cercetare este analiza structurală, păstrând în același timp caracteristicile ierarhice, semantice și euristice. O altă problemă identificată este că, de obicei, necesită un corp masiv de antrenament. Prin urmare, această cercetare se concentrează pe atenuarea acestor bariere. Au fost identificate mai multe abordări în vederea construirii de extractori de informații privind documentele axate pe diferite discipline. Acest domeniu de cercetare implică procesarea limbajului natural, analiza semantică, extragerea informațiilor și modelarea conceptuală. Această lucrare prezintă o revizuire a mecanismului de extragere a informațiilor pentru a construi un cadru generic pentru extragerea documentelor cu scopul de a oferi o bază solidă pentru cercetările viitoare.', 'mn': 'Документаас мэдээлэл гаргах нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх газрын шинэ хэрэглээ болсон. Ихэнх хүмүүсийн тархины методологиуд эмнэлгийн талбай, санхүүгийн талбай, мөн өгсөн хэл дээр ч хязгаарлагддаг. Бүх документийн төрлийн нэг ерөнхий арга хэрэгжүүлэх нь хэл, контекст, бүтэц байдлаас хамаагүй бүтэц мэдээллийг гаргах нь илүү сайн. Мөн ийм судалгаанд өөр нэг асуудал бол бүтэц шинжилгээ юм. Иерактикийн, семантик, хэмжээний харилцааны чадварыг хадгалж байдаг. Өөр нэг асуудал нь ихэвчлэн маш их сургалтын корпус хэрэгтэй. Тиймээс энэ судалгаа ийм саад баруудыг багасгах дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Зарим арга баримт өгөгдлийн мэдээллийн гаргагчдыг өөр салбарт анхаарлаа хандуулж байгаа. Энэ судалгааны талаар байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэл, semantic шинжилгээ, мэдээлэл татах, ойлголтын загвар бүрдүүлэх боломжтой. Энэ цаас баримт баримт гаргахын тулд мэдээллийн гаргах механизмын шинэчлэл гаргаж ирэх судалгааны тулд хатуу суурь өгөх зорилго зориулдаг.', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija informacija iz dokumenta postala je velika upotreba novog prirodnog jezika. Većin a metodologija ekstrakcije entiteta su varijantni u kontekstu kao što je medicinska oblast, finansijska oblast, takođe dolazi čak i ograničena na određeni jezik. Bolje je imati jedan generičan pristup primjenjivan za bilo koji tip dokumenta da izvuče informacije o entitetu bez obzira na jezik, kontekst i strukturu. Takođe, još jedno pitanje u takvim istraživanjima je strukturna analiza dok drže hijerarhičke, semantičke i heurističke karakteristike. Još jedan problem identificiran je da obično zahteva masivni trening korpus. Stoga se ova istraživanja fokusira na smanjenje takvih barijera. Nekoliko pristupa je identifikovano ka izgradnji ekstraktora informacija dokumenta koji se fokusiraju na različite discipline. Ova istraživačka oblast uključuje prirodnu obradu jezika, semantičku analizu, ekstrakciju informacija i konceptualnu modelizaciju. Ovaj papir predstavlja pregled mehanizma izvlačenja informacija za izgradnju općeg okvira izvlačenja dokumenta u cilju pružanja čvrste baze za predstojeće istraživanje.', 'si': 'ලිපිනයෙන් තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි. ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් නිර්මාණය විද්\u200dයාවක් වෙනස් වෙන්නේ වෛද්\u200dය ප්\u200dරදේශයක්, විද්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරදේශයක්, ඒවග භාෂා, සංවිධානය, සංවිධානය සහ සංවිධානයක් නැති විදිහට මුළුවන් ලොකුම් වර්ගයක් ලැබෙන එක සමාන ඒවගේම, අනිවාර්යාත්මක විශ්ලේෂණයේ විශ්ලේෂණයක් තියාගන්න වෙනුවෙන් අනිවාර්යාත්මක, සෙමැන්ටි තවත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හඳුනාගත්තා තමයි සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ඒක ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ්\u200dයයි. ඉතින්, මේ පරීක්ෂණය අවධානය අඩංගුවක් කරන්න. වෙනස් විදියට අධිකරණය වෙනුවෙන් විදියට අධිකරණය කරනවා. මේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරදේශයේ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය, සෙමැන්ටික විශ්ලේෂණය, තොරතුරු පිළිගන් මේ පත්තුව පෙන්වන්නේ තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය පද්ධතියේ පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න ලිපින්තුරු නිර්මා', 'so': 'Wixii macluumaadka looga soo saaro dukumentiyada waxay noqotay isticmaal aad u badan oo ku saabsan baaraandegista luuqada dabiicadda ah. Inta badan qaababka soo bixinta ee dhamaadka waxaa ka mid ah mid ku qoran xarumaha caafimaadka, dhinaca dhaqaalaha, sidoo kale waxay u yimaadaan xittaa luqada la siiyey. It is better to have one generic approach applicable for any document type to extract entity information regardless of language, context, and structure.  Sidoo kale arin kale oo ku saabsan baaritaankaas waa baaritaanka asalka ah marka uu haysto hierarchical, semantic iyo heuristic. Dhibaato kale oo la caddeeyey waa in sida caadiga ah loo baahan yahay iskuul waxbarasho badan. Sidaa darteed, waxbarashadan waxay ku kalsoonaan tahay in la soo wareejiyo qalcadahaas. Dhaqdhaqaaqyo badan ayaa loo aqoonsaday dhismaha macluumaadka wargeyska oo ku kalsoonayo waxbarasho kala duduwan. Halkan baaritaanka waxaa ka mid ah baaritaanka luuqada dabiicadda ah, baaritaanka semantika, soo bixinta macluumaadka iyo sameynta fikrada. Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu soo bandhigayaa baaritaanka macluumaadka soo saarashada si uu u dhiso frame geneeral ah oo ka soo baxa dukumentiyada, kaas oo loogu talo galay in lagu siiyo aasi adag oo waxbarashada soo socda.', 'sv': 'Informationsutvinning från dokument har blivit stor användning av nya naturliga språkbehandlingsområden. De flesta av entitetsutvinningsmetoderna är varianter i ett sammanhang som medicinsk område, finansiellt område, också kommer till och med begränsade till det givna språket. Det är bättre att ha ett generellt tillvägagångssätt tillämpligt för alla dokumenttyper för att extrahera entitetsinformation oavsett språk, sammanhang och struktur. En annan fråga i sådan forskning är strukturell analys samtidigt som de hierarkiska, semantiska och heuristiska dragen behålls. Ett annat problem som identifierats är att det vanligtvis kräver en massiv träningskorpus. Därför fokuserar denna forskning på att minska sådana hinder. Flera metoder har identifierats för att bygga dokumentinformationsutdrag med fokus på olika discipliner. Forskningsområdet omfattar naturspråksbehandling, semantisk analys, informationsutvinning och konceptuell modellering. Denna uppsats presenterar en genomgång av mekanismen för informationsutvinning för att konstruera ett generiskt ramverk för dokumentutvinning med syfte att ge en solid bas för kommande forskning.', 'ta': 'ஆவணங்களிலிருந்து தகவல் வெளியீடு புத்தகத்தின் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் பகுதிகளில் மிக உபயோகி பெரும்பாலான பொருள் வெளியேற்ற முறைமைகள் மருத்துவப்பு பகுதியில், நிதி பகுதியில், கொடுக்கப்பட்ட மொழிக்கு கூட வரம எந்த ஆவண வகைக்கும் பொருள் தகவலை பெற வேண்டுமானாலும் மொழி, சூழல், மற்றும் அமைப்பு இல்லாமலும் பொருள் தகவலை பெறுவதற்கு ஒர Also, another issue in such research is structural analysis while keeping the hierarchical, semantic, and heuristic features.  இன்னொரு பிரச்சனை அடையாளம் என்னவென்றால், அது ஒரு பெரிய பயிற்சி குறியீடு தேவைப்படுகிறது. ஆகையால், இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி இத்தகைய தடைகளை தடுப்பதில் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது. பல வழிகள் ஆவண தகவல் வெளியீட்டாளர்களை உருவாக்குவதற்கு தெரியும் இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி பகுதியில் இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல், பெம்பென்டிக் ஆராய்ச்சி, தகவல் வெளியீட்டு, மற்று இந்த காகிதத்தில் தகவல் பிரிப்பு முறைமையை உருவாக்குவதற்கு ஒரு பொது சட்டத்தை உருவாக்குகிறது அடுத்த ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு ஒரு உறுதியான அட', 'ur': 'سندментوں سے اطلاعات اضافہ کرنا بہت زیادہ استعمال ہوگیا ہے۔ اکثر انٹیٹیٹ کے اٹھانے کے مطالعہ میں متغیر ہیں جیسے مدینکی منطقہ، مالی منطقہ، اور بھی اس کی زبان پر محدود ہے. یہ بہتر ہے کہ کسی دکھانے کی طرح کے لئے ایک عمومی طریقہ رکھنا چاہے کہ انٹیٹ کی معلومات کو زبان, کنٹیکس اور ساختر کے بغیر کسی طرح اضافہ کرے۔ اور ایسی تحقیقات میں ایک دوسری مسئلہ بھی ساختاری تحقیقات ہے جبکہ حیراتیکی، سیمانٹی اور حیراتیکی فرضیات رکھتے ہیں. اور ایک مشکل معلوم ہوتا ہے کہ معمولاً اس کے لئے ایک بڑی تدریس کورپوس کی ضرورت ہے۔ تو یہ تحقیقات اس طرح کی بازیوں کو کمزور کرنے پر تمرکز کرتی ہے۔ بہت سی طریقے پہچان رہے ہیں کہ دفتر کی اطلاعات اضافہ کرنے والوں کو مختلف طریقوں پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے. اس تحقیقات کی منطقه میں طبیعی زبان پردازی، سیمانٹی تحقیقات، معلومات اخراج، اور منطقی موڈلینگ ہے. This paper presents a review of the information extraction mechanism to build a generic framework for document extraction with the aim of providing a solid base for future research.', 'uz': "Name Ko'pchilik qismlash usullari, huddi tibbiy maydonda, pul maydonda, huddi koʻrsatilgan tillarning chegarasi. It is better to have one generic approach applicable for any document type to extract entity information regardless of language, context, and structure.  Bu yerda boshqa muammo shunday o'rganishda, hierarchik, semantik va heuristik xususiyatlarini saqlash mumkin. Boshqa muammo aniqlangan, odatda, bu juda katta trening qobiliyati kerak. Va shunday qilib, bu ta'qituvchilar shunday o'zgarishga foydalanadi. Ko'pchilik usullar hujjat maʼlumot ekstraktorlarini boshqa disk qismiga foydalanish uchun aniqlangan edi. Bu taʼminlovchi maydonda tabiiy tilni boshqarish, semantik analyzer, maʼlumot uchrashuvi, va fikrlar modelli. Bu hujjat chiqish uchun umumiy freymni yaratish uchun maʼlumot uchrashuv mechanisini tahrirlash imkoniyatini koʻrsatiladi. Keyingi taʼminlovchi soʻzni yaratish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc trích thông tin từ tài liệu đã trở nên phổ biến trong những khu xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên mới. Hầu hết các phương pháp khai thác thực thể là biến thể trong một trường hợp như lĩnh vực y học, lĩnh vực tài chính, thậm chí còn bị giới hạn bởi ngôn ngữ cụ thể. Sẽ tốt hơn nếu có một phương pháp chung áp dụng cho bất cứ kiểu tài liệu nào để trích dẫn thông tin về thực thể bất kể ngôn ngữ, ngữ cảnh và cấu trúc. Thêm một vấn đề khác trong nghiên cứu này là phân tích cấu trúc trong khi vẫn giữ nét phân biệt cấp độ, ngữ pháp và thần kinh. Một vấn đề khác được xác định là thường thì, nó cần phải có một tập đoàn lớn. Do đó, nghiên cứu này tập trung vào việc khắc phục các rào cản. Nhiều phương pháp đã xác định về việc xây dựng nhà máy thu thập thông tin về các lĩnh vực khác nhau. Khu vực nghiên cứu này gồm việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, phân tích ngữ pháp, đào tạo thông tin và mô phỏng khái niệm. Tờ giấy này đưa ra một bản đánh giá về cơ chế đào tạo thông tin để xây dựng một cơ sở mẫu cho việc trích xuất tài liệu nhằm tạo một cơ sở vững chắc cho việc nghiên cứu sắp tới.', 'bg': 'Извличането на информация от документи се превърна в голямо използване на нови области за обработка на естествени езици. Повечето от методологиите за извличане на субекти са варианти в контекст като медицинска област, финансова област, също идват дори ограничени до даден език. По-добре е да има един общ подход, приложим за всеки тип документ за извличане на информация за субекта, независимо от езика, контекста и структурата. Също така, друг въпрос в тези изследвания е структурният анализ, като същевременно се запазват йерархичните, семантичните и евристичните характеристики. Друг идентифициран проблем е, че обикновено изисква масивен тренировъчен корпус. Ето защо настоящото изследване се фокусира върху смекчаване на тези бариери. Няколко подхода са идентифицирани за изграждане на документни извличащи информация, фокусирани върху различни дисциплини. Тази изследователска област включва обработка на естествения език, семантичен анализ, извличане на информация и концептуално моделиране. Настоящата статия представя преглед на механизма за извличане на информация за изграждане на обща рамка за извличане на документи с цел осигуряване на солидна основа за предстоящи изследвания.', 'nl': 'Informatie extractie uit documenten is een groot gebruik geworden van nieuwe natuurlijke taalverwerkingsgebieden. De meeste entiteitsextractiemethoden zijn variant in een context zoals medisch gebied, financieel gebied, komen ook beperkt tot de gegeven taal. Het is beter om één algemene benadering te hebben die toepasbaar is voor elk documenttype om entiteitsinformatie te extraheren, ongeacht taal, context en structuur. Een ander probleem in dergelijk onderzoek is structurele analyse met behoud van de hiërarchische, semantische en heuristische kenmerken. Een ander probleem is dat het meestal een enorm trainingscorpus vereist. Daarom richt dit onderzoek zich op het verminderen van dergelijke barrières. Verschillende benaderingen zijn geïdentificeerd voor het bouwen van documentinformatie extractors gericht op verschillende disciplines. Dit onderzoeksgebied omvat natuurlijke taalverwerking, semantische analyse, informatieextractie en conceptuele modellering. Dit artikel presenteert een overzicht van het informatieextractiemechanisme om een generiek raamwerk voor documentextractie te bouwen met als doel een solide basis te bieden voor toekomstig onderzoek.', 'da': 'Informationsudvinding fra dokumenter er blevet stor brug af nye natursprogbehandlingsområder. De fleste af virksomhedens ekstraktionsmetoder er varianter i en sammenhæng som medicinsk område, finansielt område, også kommer endda begrænset til det givne sprog. Det er bedre at have én generisk tilgang til enhver dokumenttype til at udtrække enhedsoplysninger uanset sprog, sammenhæng og struktur. Et andet spørgsmål i denne forskning er også strukturel analyse, samtidig med at de hierarkiske, semantiske og heuristiske træk bevares. Et andet problem identificeret er, at det normalt kræver en massiv træningskorpus. Derfor fokuserer denne forskning på at afhjælpe sådanne barrierer. Der er blevet identificeret flere tilgange til at opbygge dokumentinformationsudtrækkere med fokus på forskellige discipliner. Dette forskningsområde omfatter naturlig sprogbehandling, semantisk analyse, informationsudvinding og konceptuel modellering. Denne artikel præsenterer en gennemgang af informationsudvindingsmekanismen til at konstruere en generisk ramme for dokumentudvinding med det formål at skabe et solidt grundlag for kommende forskning.', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija informacija iz dokumenta postala je velika upotreba novog prirodnog jezika. Većin a metodologija izvlačenja entitata su varijantni u kontekstu poput medicinskog područja, financijskog područja, također dolazi čak ograničena na određeni jezik. Bolje je imati jedan generički pristup primjenjivan za bilo koji tip dokumenta da izvuče informacije o entitetu bez obzira na jezik, kontekst i strukturu. Također, još jedno pitanje u takvim istraživanjima je strukturna analiza dok drže hijerarhičke, semantičke i heurističke karakteristike. Još jedan problem identificiran je da obično zahtijeva masivni trening korpus. Stoga se ova istraživanja usredotoči na smanjenje takvih barijera. Nekoliko pristupa identificiralo se za izgradnju ekstraktora informacija o dokumentima koji se fokusiraju na različite discipline. Ova istraživačka područja uključuje prirodnu obradu jezika, semantičku analizu, ekstrakciju informacija i konceptualnu modelizaciju. Ovaj papir predstavlja pregled mehanizma izvlačenja informacija kako bi se izgradila općeni okvir izvlačenja dokumenta s ciljem pružanja čvrste baze za buduće istraživanje.', 'id': 'Ekstraksi informasi dari dokumen telah menjadi penggunaan besar dari daerah pemprosesan bahasa alam baru. Kebanyakan metodologi ekstraksi entitas adalah variasi dalam konteks seperti daerah medis, daerah keuangan, juga datang bahkan terbatas pada bahasa tertentu. It is better to have one generic approach applicable for any document type to extract entity information regardless of language, context, and structure.  Juga, masalah lain dalam penelitian seperti itu adalah analisis struktur sementara menjaga ciri-ciri hierarkis, semantis, dan heuristis. Masalah lain yang diidentifikasi adalah bahwa biasanya, itu membutuhkan tubuh latihan besar. Oleh karena itu, penelitian ini fokus pada mengurangi halangan tersebut. Beberapa pendekatan telah mengidentifikasi untuk membangun ekstraktor informasi dokumen fokus pada disiplin yang berbeda. Ruang penelitian ini melibatkan proses bahasa alam, analisis semantis, ekstraksi informasi, dan model konseptual. Kertas ini mempersembahkan penelitian dari mekanisme ekstraksi informasi untuk membangun rangka generik untuk ekstraksi dokumen dengan tujuan menyediakan dasar yang kuat untuk penelitian yang akan datang.', 'de': 'Die Extraktion von Informationen aus Dokumenten hat sich zu einer großen Nutzung neuartiger natürlicher Sprachverarbeitungsbereiche entwickelt. Die meisten Entitätenextraktionsmethoden sind in einem Kontext wie medizinischem Bereich, Finanzbereich variantenreich, sind auch auf die gegebene Sprache beschränkt. Es ist besser, für jeden Dokumenttyp einen generischen Ansatz anzuwenden, um Entitätsinformationen unabhängig von Sprache, Kontext und Struktur zu extrahieren. Ein weiteres Thema dieser Forschung ist die Strukturanalyse unter Beibehaltung der hierarchischen, semantischen und heuristischen Merkmale. Ein weiteres identifiziertes Problem ist, dass es in der Regel einen massiven Trainingskorpus erfordert. Daher konzentriert sich diese Forschung auf den Abbau solcher Barrieren. Mehrere Ansätze wurden identifiziert, um Dokumenteninformationsextraktoren zu entwickeln, die sich auf verschiedene Disziplinen konzentrieren. Dieser Forschungsbereich umfasst die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache, semantische Analyse, Informationsextraktion und konzeptionelle Modellierung. Dieser Beitrag stellt einen Überblick über den Informationsextraktionsmechanismus vor, um ein generisches Framework für die Dokumentenextraktion zu konstruieren, mit dem Ziel, eine solide Basis für kommende Forschung zu schaffen.', 'ko': '문서에서 정보를 추출하는 것은 이미 새로운 자연 언어 처리 분야의 중요한 응용이 되었다.대부분의 실체 추출 방법은 의학 분야, 금융 분야 등 환경에서 다르고 심지어 주어진 언어에 국한된다.모든 문서 유형에 적용되는 일반적인 방법으로 언어, 상하문, 구조를 고려하지 않고 실체 정보를 추출하는 것이 가장 좋다.그 밖에 이런 연구에서 또 다른 문제는 구조 분석을 하고 차원, 의미와 계발식 특징을 보존하는 것이다.또 다른 문제는 통상적으로 대량의 훈련 자료 라이브러리가 필요하다는 것이다.따라서 본 연구는 이런 장애를 완화하는 데 중심을 두었다.서로 다른 학과에 대한 문서 정보 추출기를 구축하는 몇 가지 방법이 확정되었다.이 연구 분야는 자연 언어 처리, 의미 분석, 정보 추출과 개념 모델링과 관련된다.본고는 정보 추출 메커니즘에 대해 종합적으로 서술했는데 통용되는 문서 추출 구조를 구축하여 후속 연구에 튼튼한 기초를 마련하고자 한다.', 'sw': 'Utoa wa taarifa kutoka nyaraka umekuwa matumizi makubwa ya usalama wa kitaifa wa lugha asili. mbinu nyingi za kutengeneza vifaa vinatofauti katika muktadha kama vile maeneo ya afya, eneo la kifedha, pia zinakuja mpaka kwenye lugha inayopewa. Ni bora kuwa na njia moja ya kawaida inayotumika kwa aina yoyote ya nyaraka ili kutengeneza taarifa za entity bila kujali lugha, muktadha, na ujenzi. Pia, suala jingine katika utafiti huu ni uchambuzi wa kistructuri wakati wa kuendelea vipengele vya kiutawala, semantic na vizuri. Tatizo jingine lililotambuliwa ni kwamba kawaida, inahitaji viungo vikubwa vya mafunzo. Therefore, this research focus on mitigating such barriers.  Hatua kadhaa zimekuwa zikitambua kwa ajili ya kutengeneza wapiga taarifa za nyaraka wakiwa na lengo la kuadhibiti tofauti. Sehemu hii ya utafiti inahusisha upasuaji wa lugha za asili, uchambuzi wa kimapenzi, utoaji wa habari na mifano ya dhana. Makala hii inaonyesha tafiti ya mfumo wa uteuzi wa taarifa wa kutengeneza mfumo wa msingi wa kutengeneza nyaraka kwa lengo la kutoa msingi wa utafiti ujao.', 'tr': 'Senedlerden maglumat gaýşartmak tebigat diller işleýän böleklerine örän gowy ulandyr. Birlikler a çmak methodologiýasynyň köpüsi tıbbi meýdançasynda, mali meýdançasynda hem beren dile çarpýar. Dil, kontekst we strukturda bir sened hili üçin ullanýan jeneral bir gollaşmak gowy. Ýöne bu araştyrymlarda başga bir mesele iýerarhiýaly, semantik we heuristik özellikleri tutup durýan struktur analýusidir. Beýleki mesele belli edilýän, adatça köp okuw korpusy gerek. Şol sebäpli, bu ylmy şol ýaly barrikalary azaltmak üçin ünsüni berýär. Bir näçe golaýy desktap daşaryjylary düzenlemek üçin belli edip otyrlar. Bu ylmy meýdançasynda tebigy dil işlemegi, semantik analizi, maglumatlary tapmaky we düşünjän modellerlemesi bar. Bu kagyz sened a çmak üçin ýagdaý bir çerçew düzenlemek üçin maglumatlary taýýarlyk mekanizmasyny barýar.', 'af': "Informasie uitpakking van dokumente word groot gebruik van novele natuurlike taal verwerking gebied. Die meeste van die entiteituittrekkingsmetodes is veranderlike in 'n konteks soos mediese are a, finansiële area, ook kom selfs beperk na die gegewe taal. Dit is beter om een algemene toegang te hê wat toewenbaar is vir enige dokumenttipe om entiteitinligting te uitpak ongeag van taal, konteks en struktuur. En 'n ander probleem in sodanige ondersoek is strukturele analisie terwyl die hierarkies, semantiese en heuristiese funksies hou. En 'n ander probleem geïdentifiseer is dat dit gewoonlik 'n groot onderwerp corpus nodig. Daarom, hierdie ondersoek fokus op sodanige barriers te verminder. Verskeie toeganklikhede het geïdentifiseer tot die bou van dokumentinligting uitvoerders wat op verskillende dissipels fokus word. Hierdie ondersoek omvang die natuurlike taal verwerking, semantiese analisie, inligting uittrek en konseptieële modellering. Hierdie papier stel 'n oorskou van die inligting uittrekking mekanisme om 'n algemene raamwerk vir dokument uittrekking te konstrukteer met die doel van 'n solide basis te verskaf vir opkommende ondersoek.", 'fa': 'اخراج اطلاعات از سند استفاده از منطقه\u200cهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی بسیار بزرگ شده است. بیشتر روش\u200cهای استخراج شرکت\u200cها در یک محیطی مثل منطقه پزشکی، منطقه\u200cی مالی، حتی به زبان معین محدود می\u200cشوند. بهتر است که یک دستور عمومی برای هر نوع سند برای اخراج اطلاعات اجتماعی از زبان، محیط و ساختار داشته باشد. همچنین، مسئله دیگر در این تحقیقات تحلیل ساختاری است در حالی که ویژه\u200cهای ساختاری، سیمانتیک و هوریستیک را حفظ می\u200cکند. مشکل دیگر شناسایی شده این است که معمولاً یک کورپوس آموزش بزرگی نیاز دارد. بنابراین، این تحقیقات روی کاهش کردن این بازداشتها تمرکز می کند. تعدادی از طریق\u200cها به طریق ساختن اخراج\u200cکنندگان اطلاعات سند تمرکز روی دسته\u200cهای مختلف بودند. این منطقه تحقیقات شامل پرداخت زبان طبیعی، تحلیل semantic، اخراج اطلاعات و مدل\u200cسازی مفهوم است. این کاغذ یک بررسی از مکانیسم استخراج اطلاعات را برای ساختن یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e informacionit nga dokumentet është bërë përdorim i madh i zonave të reja të përdorimit të gjuhës natyrore. Shumica e metodologjive të nxjerrjes së njësisë janë variante në një kontekst të tillë si zona mjekësore, zona financiare, gjithashtu vijnë edhe të kufizuara në gjuhën e caktuar. Është më mirë të kesh një qasje gjenerale të aplikueshme për çdo lloj dokumenti për të nxjerrë informacionin e njësisë pavarësisht nga gjuha, konteksti dhe struktura. Gjithashtu, një tjetër çështje në kërkim të tillë është analiza strukturore duke mbajtur karakteristikat hierarkike, semantike dhe heuristike. Një tjetër problem i identifikuar është se zakonisht, ajo kërkon një trup trajnimi masiv. Prandaj, ky kërkim përqëndrohet në lehtësimin e pengesave të tilla. Disa qasje janë identifikuar drejt ndërtimit të nxjerrësve të informacionit të dokumenteve duke u përqëndruar në disiplina të ndryshme. Kjo fushë kërkimi përfshin procesimin natyror të gjuhës, analizën semantike, nxjerrjen e informacionit dhe modelimin konceptual. Ky dokument paraqet një përmbledhje të mekanizmit të nxjerrjes së informacionit për të ndërtuar një kuadër gjeneral për nxjerrjen e dokumenteve me qëllim të sigurimit të një baze të fortë për kërkimet e ardhshme.', 'hy': 'Information extraction from documents has become great use of novel natural language processing areas.  Համակարգման մեթոդների մեծ մասը տարբերվում է այնպիսի կոնտեքստում, ինչպիսիք են բժշկական ոլորտը, ֆինանսական ոլորտը, նույնիսկ սահմանափակվում են տվյալ լեզուն: Ավելի լավ է ունենալ մեկ ընդհանուր մոտեցում, որը կօգտագործվի ցանկացած փաստաթղթի տեսակի համար անկախ լեզվից, կոնտեքստից և կառուցվածքից: Նման հետազոտությունների մեկ այլ խնդիր կառուցվածքային վերլուծությունն է, միաժամանակ պահպանելով հիերարխիկ, սեմանտիկ և հորիստիկ հատկությունները: Մեկ այլ հայտնաբերված խնդիր այն է, որ սովորաբար այն պահանջում է հսկայական վարժեցման մարմին: Այսպիսով, այս հետազոտությունը կենտրոնանում է նման խոչընդոտների նվազեցման վրա: Բազմաթիվ մոտեցումներ են հայտնաբերվել փաստաթղթերի ինֆորմացիայի հանողների կառուցման համար, որոնք կենտրոնացնում են տարբեր ոլորտների վրա: Այս ուսումնասիրության ոլորտը ներառում է բնական լեզվի վերամշակում, սեմանտիկ վերլուծում, տեղեկատվության վերացում և գաղափարական մոդելներ: Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է ինֆորմացիայի վերացման մեխանիզմի վերանայման, որպեսզի կառուցենք փաստաթղթերի վերացման ընդհանուր շրջանակ, որպեսզի ապագայում ուսումնասիրությունների համար հաստատուն հիմք տրամադր', 'az': 'Belgələrdən məlumat çıxarılması yeni təbiətli dil işləmə bölgelerinin böyük istifadəsi oldu. Əlbəttə, təhsil alanı, malik alanı kimi, təhsil alanın çoxu təhsil edilmiş dilə hətta sınırlandırılır. Dil, məlumatlar və strukturlar haqqında heç bir məlumat növündə istifadə edilən hər bir dökümə növü üçün istifadə edilən tərzi olmaq daha yaxşıdır. Bütün bu araştırmalarda başqa bir məsəl hiyerarşik, semantik və heuristik özellikləri saxlayarkən strukturlu analizidir. Başqa bir problem ə tanıdılmışdır ki, bu çox böyük təhsil korpusu lazımdır. Buna görə də bu araştırma bu barədləri azaltmağa odaqlanır. Bəziləri disciplinlərə odaqlanan bir neçə tərzi belə məlumat daşıyıcılarını inşa edir. Bu araştırma alanı təbiətli dil işləməsi, semantik analizi, məlumat çıxartması və konsept modelləri içəridir. Bu kağıt məlumatı çıxartma mehanizmisinin tərzini göstərir ki, gələcək araştırmalar üçün möhkəm bir üssü təyin etmək məqsədilə döküm çıxartması üçün çoxlu bir çerçive inşa edər.', 'am': 'ከሰነዶች መረጃ ማውጣት የአሁኑን የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀሚያ ቦታዎች በጠቅላላ ተጠቃሚ ሆኖአል፡፡ ብዙዎቹ አካባቢ ምርጫዎች እንደ መድኃኒት ክልል፣ የሀብት ክልል፣ በተሰጠው ቋንቋ እንኳ በተቃራኒ ነው፡፡ ቋንቋ፣ context እና መሠረት ቢሆንም አካባቢውን መረጃ ለማውጣት አንድ የgeneric approach ለመስጠት ይሻላል፡፡ እንደዚህ በተማርክ ላይ ሌላ ጉዳይ የሐራርስክሪክ፣ የsemantic እና የኦርቲክ ምርጫዎችን በመጠበቅ ላይ የተመሳሳይ ትርጉም ነው፡፡ ሌላም ጉዳይ የተታወቀው ነው፣ ብዛት የድንጋጤ ክሮፕስ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ስለዚህ ይህ ትምህርት ግንቦችን በመጠቀም ላይ ትኩረት ነው፡፡ የሰነድ መረጃ አካባቢዎች በተለየ ጥቅምቶች ላይ የሚታወቁ ብዙ ደረጃዎች ናቸው፡፡ ይህ ትምህርት ቦታ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል፣ የsemantic analysis፣ መረጃ ውጤት እና የዓይነት ምሳሌ ማሳየት ነው፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም የመረጃ ውጤት ማውጣት አካባቢዎችን ለመሥራት የሰነድ ውጤት ፍሬማርን ለመግለጽ የሚያስፈልገውን የጽኑ መረጃ መቀመጫ ለመጠቀም ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'ডকুমেন্ট থেকে তথ্য বের করা হয়েছে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার এলাকায়। বেশীরভাগ বস্তুর বিনিময়ের পদ্ধতিগুলো মেডিকেল এলাকা, অর্থনৈতিক এলাকায় বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন প্রচণ্ড, এমনকি প্রদত্ত ভাষায় ভাষা, প্রেক্ষাপট এবং কাঠামোর ব্যাপারে বৈশিষ্ট্যের তথ্য বের করার জন্য প্রয়োজনীয় কোন নথির ধরনের জন্য একটি সাধারণ উপায় এছাড়াও এই গবেষণায় আরেকটি বিষয় হচ্ছে কৌশল বিশ্লেষণ, যখন হিয়ারার্কিক, সেমেন্টিক এবং হিরিস্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য রাখে। আরেকটি সমস্যা চিহ্নিত হচ্ছে যে সাধারণত এটাকে বিশাল প্রশিক্ষণের প্রয়োজন। Therefore, this research focus on mitigating such barriers.  বেশ কিছু উপায় নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে তথ্য বিভিন্ন ডিস্কিপাইনের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়ে। এই গবেষণা এলাকায় প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া, সেম্পেন্টিক বিশ্লেষণ, তথ্য বের করা এবং ধারণায় মডেলিং আছে। এই পত্রিকা তথ্য বিনিময়ের মাধ্যমে একটি সাধারণ কার্যক্রম নির্মাণ করার জন্য তথ্য নির্বাচনের মাধ্যমে একটি পুনরাবৃত্তি প্রদান করেছে যার উদ্', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija informacija iz dokumenta postala je velika upotreba novog prirodnog jezika. Većin a metodologija izvlačenja entitata su varijantni u kontekstu poput medicinskog područja, finansijskog područja, također dolazi čak ograničena na određeni jezik. Bolje je imati jedan generičan pristup primjenjivan za bilo koji tip dokumenta da izvuče informacije o entitetu bez obzira na jezik, kontekst i strukturu. Također, još jedan problem u takvim istraživanjima je strukturna analiza dok drže hijerarhičke, semantičke i heurističke karakteristike. Još jedan problem identificiran je da obično zahtijeva masivni trening korpus. Stoga se ova istraživanja fokusira na smanjenje takvih barijera. Nekoliko pristupa identificiralo se za izgradnju ekstraktora informacija o dokumentima koji se fokusiraju na različite discipline. Ova istraživačka područja uključuje prirodnu obradu jezika, semantičku analizu, ekstrakciju informacija i konceptualnu modelizaciju. Ovaj papir predstavlja pregled mehanizma izvlačenja informacija kako bi izgradila generični okvir izvlačenja dokumenta u cilju pružanja čvrste baze za buduće istraživanje.', 'ca': "L'extracció d'informació dels documents s'ha convertit en un gran ús de les noves àrees de processament de llenguatges naturals. La majoria de les metodologies d'extracció d'entitats són variades en un context com la àrea mèdica, l'àrea financera, també es limitan fins i tot a la llengua dada. És millor tenir un enfocament genèric aplicable a qualsevol tipus de document per extrair informació de l'entitat, independentment del llenguatge, el context i l'estructura. També un altre tema en aquesta investigació és l'anàlisi estructural mantenint les característiques jeràrquiques, semàntiques i heurístiques. Another problem identified is that usually, it requires a massive training corpus.  Per tant, aquesta investigació es centra en mitigar aquestes barreres. Diversos enfocaments han estat identificant per construir extractors d'informació documental centrats en diferents disciplines. Aquesta àrea de recerca implica processament natural de llengües, anàlisi semàntica, extracció d'informació i modelació conceptual. Aquest paper presenta una revisió del mecanisme d'extracció d'informació per a construir un marc genèric per l'extracció de documents amb l'objectiu de proporcionar una base sólida per a la futura recerca.", 'cs': 'Extrakce informací z dokumentů se stala velkým využitím nových oblastí zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Většina metodik extrakce entit je variantní v kontextu, jako je medicínská oblast, finanční oblast, také jsou omezeny na daný jazyk. Je lepší mít jeden obecný přístup použitelný pro každý typ dokumentu k extrahování informací o entitě bez ohledu na jazyk, kontext a strukturu. Dalším problémem takového výzkumu je strukturální analýza při zachování hierarchických, sémantických a heuristických rysů. Dalším identifikovaným problémem je, že obvykle vyžaduje masivní tréninkový korpus. Proto se tento výzkum zaměřuje na zmírnění těchto bariér. Bylo identifikováno několik přístupů k vytváření extraktorů informací o dokumentech zaměřených na různé disciplíny. Tato oblast výzkumu zahrnuje zpracování přirozeného jazyka, sémantickou analýzu, extrakci informací a koncepční modelování. Tento článek představuje přehled mechanismu extrakce informací pro vytvoření obecného rámce pro extrakci dokumentů s cílem poskytnout pevnou základnu pro nadcházející výzkum.', 'et': 'Teabe väljavõtmine dokumentidest on muutunud uudsete looduskeelte töötlemise valdkondade suureks kasutamiseks. Enamik (majandus)üksuse ekstraheerimismeetodeid on erinevad sellises kontekstis nagu meditsiinivaldkond, finantsvaldkond, samuti piirduvad isegi antud keelega. Parem on kasutada ühte üldist lähenemisviisi, mida kohaldatakse mis tahes dokumenditüübi puhul, et ekstraheerida olemiteavet sõltumata keelest, kontekstist ja struktuurist. Samuti on selliste uuringute teine probleem struktuurianalüüs, säilitades samas hierarhilised, semantilised ja heuristilised omadused. Teine tuvastatud probleem on see, et tavaliselt nõuab see massiivset koolituskorpust. Seetõttu keskendutakse käesolevas uurimistöös selliste tõkete leevendamisele. Erinevatele valdkondadele keskenduvate dokumentide teabeväljavõtjate ehitamisele on määratletud mitu lähenemisviisi. See uurimisvaldkond hõlmab looduskeele töötlemist, semantilist analüüsi, informatsiooni kaevandamist ja kontseptuaalset modelleerimist. Käesolevas töös esitatakse ülevaade informatsiooni väljavõtmise mehhanismist üldise raamistiku loomiseks dokumentide väljavõtmiseks eesmärgiga luua tugev alus tulevastele uuringutele.', 'fi': 'Tietojen poimiminen asiakirjoista on tullut uusien luonnollisten kielten käsittelyalueiden suuri hyödyntäminen. Useimmat yksikön uuttamismenetelmät ovat muunneltuja esimerkiksi lääketieteen alalla, rahoitusalalla, ja ne myös rajoittuvat tiettyyn kieleen. On parempi käyttää yhtä yleistä lähestymistapaa, jota sovelletaan mihin tahansa asiakirjatyyppiin, jotta voidaan poimia entiteettitietoja kielestä, kontekstista ja rakenteesta riippumatta. Myös rakenteellinen analyysi pitää yllä hierarkkisten, semanttisten ja heurististen ominaisuuksien avulla. Toinen havaittu ongelma on se, että yleensä se vaatii massiivisen koulutuskokonaisuuden. Tämän vuoksi tässä tutkimuksessa keskitytään tällaisten esteiden lieventämiseen. Useita lähestymistapoja on tunnistettu eri tieteenaloihin keskittyvien dokumenttielokuvien rakentamiseen. Tutkimusalueeseen kuuluvat luonnollisen kielen käsittely, semanttinen analyysi, tiedonhankinta ja käsitteellinen mallinnus. Tässä artikkelissa esitetään katsaus tiedonhankintamekanismiin, jonka avulla voidaan rakentaa yleinen viitekehys dokumenttien uuttamiselle, jonka tavoitteena on tarjota vankka perusta tulevalle tutkimukselle.', 'jv': 'Name Banyak yang dipunangé manut sing nyebutaké kabèh ning sakdurungé, ning kana sampek, dadi, akeh dumadhi kanggo langa sing nyimpen. Léwé luwih apik sing apik saben nggo kelas telu nggawe layang dokumen kanggo kelas informasi layang, sampek lan sak structural. Mbok, sak mungkin liyo barêng-barêng saiki dadi, dadi structural sampeyan kanggo ngilangno sistêr, semanti karo akeh heuristik. Bètèng wis nong liya sing koyo ngono kuwi, dadi nyatakake tresno karo akeh podho. Kaya, granahane iki dipundok supoyo kanggo mbelaké kanggo ngilangno barang. Go didasai akèh sing sampeyan nèng nggawe winih jenis mengko nggawe Ndukutan informasi Awakdhéwé éntuk karo perusahaan anyar luwih, semanti, akeh-akeh informasi, lan kelangan kelangan kuwi nggambar. Awak iki ngewehhu urip ngembukak kanggo ngubah akeh informasi tanggal nggawe sistem Generik kanggo nggawe winih kanggo ngilangno nggawe basa sing apik kanggo ngilangno langkung sampek.', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje informacij iz dokumentov je postalo velika uporaba novih področij obdelave naravnega jezika. Večina metodologij ekstrakcije subjekta je različica v kontekstu, kot je medicinsko področje, finančno področje, so tudi omejene na določen jezik. Bolje je imeti en splošni pristop, ki se uporablja za katero koli vrsto dokumenta za pridobivanje informacij o subjektu ne glede na jezik, kontekst in strukturo. Tudi drugo vprašanje v takih raziskavah je strukturna analiza ob ohranjanju hierarhičnih, semantičnih in heurističnih značilnosti. Druga ugotovljena težava je, da običajno zahteva obsežen korpus usposabljanja. Zato se ta raziskava osredotoča na ublažitev takih ovir. Pri izdelavi informacij o dokumentih, ki se osredotočajo na različne discipline, je bilo opredeljenih več pristopov. To raziskovalno področje vključuje obdelavo naravnega jezika, semantično analizo, pridobivanje informacij in konceptualno modeliranje. V prispevku je predstavljen pregled mehanizma za pridobivanje informacij za oblikovanje generičnega okvira za pridobivanje dokumentov s ciljem zagotavljanja trdne osnove za prihajajoče raziskave.', 'ha': "Zaɓen bayani daga takardar aiki sun kasance mai amfani da zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane. Babu mafi yawan surori masu nau'i sune-daban a cikin wani muhimma kamar wurin da aka yi amfani da, wurin da aka kifisa, don haka kuma, za'a iya ƙayyade zuwa harshen da aka ba da. Shi ne mafi alhẽri a samu'in da wata matsayi na ɗabi'a wanda za'a yi amfani da wa nau'in duk nau'in takarda don ya fitar da maɓallin shaidar, ko kuma ba da wata harshe, mazaɓa ba, da kuma tsari ba. Da haka, wani abu na cikin wannan aikin littafi yana sanar da littafin rubutu a lokacin da ke tsare masu hiararchical, semantic da heuristic. An gane wani matsayi yana cẽwa, ana buƙata wata umarni mai girma. Saboda haka, wannan littafi yana muhalli wa manyan hanyõyi. Za'a gane wasu hanyoyin bayani zuwa ka samun masu motsi na takardar dokuman, da makini kan wasu disiplar daban. Wannan filin research yana da shirin zartar da harshen asiyya, Analyki na semantic, zaɓen bayani da misalin zafi. Wannan takardan na bãyar da kure na canza za za'a samun wata firam na ɗabi'a wa nuna takardar, don ya yi amfani da kuma ya sami wani bango mai tabbatacce wa research masu ƙaruwa.", 'bo': 'ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གསལ་བཤད་ནི་རང་རུང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྤྱོད་ཆས་པ་དེ་ཆགས་ཡོད། དབང་ཆ་ཕྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱིས་སྨན་གཞུང་ དངུལ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཅུག་པ་རེད། སྐད་ཡིག ཡིག་གེའི་རིགས་གང་རུང་ཞིག་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་ཁུལ Also, another issue in such research is structural analysis while keeping the hierarchical, semantic, and heuristic features. དཀའ་ངལ་གཞན་ཞིག་རྟོགས་ཚར་བ་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དེ་ལས་སྦྱོར་མཐུད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་དགོས་ཡོད། དེར་བརྟེན། འཚོལ་ཞིབ་འདིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བར་ཆད་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཞིབ་ཕྱོགས་གཞན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བཙོག་ཏུ་ཡིག་གེ་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་སྦྲེལ་བ་ཡོད། དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དེ་ནི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་པའི་ཡིག', 'he': 'Information extraction from documents has become great use of novel natural language processing areas.  Most of the entity extraction methodologies are variant in a context such as medical area, financial area, also come even limited to the given language.  It is better to have one generic approach applicable for any document type to extract entity information regardless of language, context, and structure.  Also, another issue in such research is structural analysis while keeping the hierarchical, semantic, and heuristic features.  בעיה נוספת מזהה היא שבדרך כלל, זה דורש גוף אימון מסיבי. לכן, המחקר הזה מתמקד בהקלה של מחסומים כאלה. Several approaches have been identifying towards building document information extractors focusing on different disciplines.  This research area involves natural language processing, semantic analysis, information extraction, and conceptual modelling.  הנייר הזה מציג מבחן של מנגנון ההוצאה של המידע כדי לבנות מסגרת גנרלית להוציא מסמכים במטרה לספק בסיס מוצק למחקר הבא.'}
{'en': 'Question answering in Natural Language : the Special Case of Temporal Expressions', 'ar': 'الإجابة على الأسئلة باللغة الطبيعية: الحالة الخاصة للتعبيرات الزمنية', 'es': 'Respuesta a preguntas en lenguaje natural: el caso especial de las expresiones temporales', 'pt': 'Resposta a perguntas em linguagem natural: o caso especial das expressões temporais', 'fr': 'Réponse aux questions en langage naturel\xa0: le cas particulier des expressions temporelles', 'ja': '自然言語での質問回答：時制表現の特別なケース', 'zh': '自然语言中问答:时表达式异状', 'ru': 'Ответы на вопросы на естественном языке: особый случай временных выражений', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा में प्रश्न का उत्तर: अस्थायी अभिव्यक्तियों का विशेष मामला', 'ga': 'Freagra na gCeisteanna i dTeanga Nádúrtha: Cás Speisialta na nAthanna Sealadacha', 'hu': 'Természetes nyelvű kérdésre adott válasz: a temporális kifejezések különleges esete', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Απάντηση ερωτήσεων στη Φυσική Γλώσσα: η Ειδική περίπτωση των προσωρινών εκφράσεων', 'kk': 'Табиғи тілде сұрақ жауап беру: Температолдық өрнектерінің арнаулы үлкен/ өлшемі', 'it': 'Risposta alle domande in linguaggio naturale: il caso speciale delle espressioni temporali', 'lt': 'Atsakymas į klausimą natūralia kalba: specialus laikinųjų išraiškų atvejis', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയിലെ ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യം: പ്രത്യേക കേസിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക ക കേസ്', 'ms': 'Jawapan soalan dalam bahasa semulajadi: kes khas ungkapan sementara', 'mt': 'Tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet bil-lingwa naturali: il-Każ Speċjali ta’ Espressjonijiet Temporali', 'mk': 'Одговорот на прашањата на природниот јазик: специјалниот случај на привремени изрази', 'pl': 'Odpowiedź na pytania w języku naturalnym: specjalny przypadek wyrażeń czasowych', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebare în limbajul natural: cazul special al expresiilor temporale', 'no': 'Spørsmål som svarar på naturspråk: the Special Case of Temporal Expressions', 'sr': 'Odgovor na prirodnom jeziku: specijalni slučaj Temporalnih izraza', 'so': "su'aalaha ka jawaabta afka asalka ah: Xafiiska gaarka ah ee ku saabsan hadalka degmada ah", 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාර භාෂාවයේ ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය: the custom case of Temporal Expressions', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழியில் கேள்வி பதில்:', 'sv': 'Frågasvar på naturligt språk: det speciella fallet med temporala uttryck', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл дээр хариулт өгсөн асуулт:', 'ur': 'The Special Case of Temporal Expressions', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi trong ngôn ngữ tự nhiên: Câu trả lời tạm thời', 'da': 'Spørgsmål besvarelse på naturligt sprog: det særlige tilfælde af tidsbegrænsede udtryk', 'nl': 'Vragen beantwoorden in de natuurlijke taal: het speciale geval van tijdelijke expressies', 'bg': 'Отговаряне на въпроси на естествен език: специалният случай на времевите изрази', 'de': 'Beantwortung von Fragen in natürlicher Sprache: der Sonderfall temporaler Ausdrücke', 'id': 'Pertanyaan menjawab dalam Bahasa Alami: Kasus Khusus Ekspresi Temporal', 'hr': 'Odgovor na prirodnom jeziku: Posebni slučaj Temporalnog izraza', 'ko': '자연 언어 중의 문답: 시간 표현의 특례', 'fa': 'سوال جواب در زبان طبیعی: پرونده ویژه\u200cای از عبارت معمولی', 'tr': 'Natal dilde jogap berilýan soragy: Wagtlaýyn Kiçi/beýik harplary', 'sw': 'Swali la kujibu kwa lugha ya asili: Kesi maalum ya Maelezo ya Muda', 'af': 'Fraag antwoord in Natuurlike Taal: the Special Case of Temporal Expressions', 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve në gjuhën natyrore: rasti i posaçëm i shprehjeve të përkohshme', 'am': 'ጥያቄ በአዳባዊ ቋንቋ መልስ', 'hy': 'Պատասխանը բնական լեզվով. ժամանակական արտահայտությունների հատուկ դեպքը', 'az': 'T…Щbi…Щtli Dild…Щ sual cavab verir: the Special Case of Temporal Expressions', 'bn': 'প্রশ্ন প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় উত্তর দেয়া হচ্ছে: টেম্পুরাল ভাষার বিশেষ কেস', 'bs': 'Odgovor na prirodnom jeziku: Specijalni slučaj Temporalnih izraza', 'ca': "La resposta a preguntes en llengua natural: el cas especial d'expressions temporals", 'cs': 'Odpověď na otázky v přirozeném jazyce: zvláštní případ časových výrazů', 'et': 'Küsimustele vastamine looduskeeles: ajalise väljenduse erijuhtum', 'fi': 'Kysymyksiin vastaaminen luonnollisella kielellä: ajallisten ilmaisujen erityistapaus', 'jv': 'Sugeng rawuh tanggal ning Language Normal: the special Case of Time Expressions', 'sk': 'Odgovor na vprašanja v naravnem jeziku: poseben primer časovnih izrazov', 'he': 'תשובה לשאלה בשפה טבעית: המקרה המיוחד של ביטויים זמניים', 'ha': 'Socket error code NotSupported', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་དུ་ལན་གསལ་འདྲི་བ། དམིགས་བསལ་གྱི་ཡུལ་རྣམས་ཀྱི་དམིགས་བསལ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Although general question answering has been well explored in recent years, temporal question answering is a task which has not received as much focus. Our work aims to leverage a popular approach used for general question answering, answer extraction, in order to find answers to temporal questions within a paragraph. To train our model, we propose a new dataset, inspired by SQuAD, a state-of-the-art question answering corpus, specifically tailored to provide rich temporal information by adapting the corpus WikiWars, which contains several documents on history’s greatest conflicts. Our evaluation shows that a pattern matching deep learning model, often used in general question answering, can be adapted to temporal question answering, if we accept to ask questions whose answers must be directly present within a text.', 'ar': 'على الرغم من أن الإجابة على الأسئلة العامة قد تم استكشافها جيدًا في السنوات الأخيرة ، إلا أن الإجابة على الأسئلة الزمنية هي مهمة لم تحظ بنفس القدر من التركيز. يهدف عملنا إلى الاستفادة من النهج الشائع المستخدم للإجابة على الأسئلة العامة ، واستخراج الإجابات ، من أجل العثور على إجابات للأسئلة الزمنية داخل فقرة. لتدريب نموذجنا ، نقترح مجموعة بيانات جديدة ، مستوحاة من SQuAD ، وهي مجموعة حديثة للإجابة على الأسئلة ، مصممة خصيصًا لتوفير معلومات زمنية غنية عن طريق تكييف مجموعة WikiWars ، والتي تحتوي على العديد من الوثائق حول أعظم الصراعات في التاريخ. يُظهر تقييمنا أن نموذجًا مطابقًا للتعلم العميق ، غالبًا ما يستخدم في الإجابة على الأسئلة العامة ، يمكن تكييفه للإجابة على الأسئلة الزمنية ، إذا قبلنا طرح الأسئلة التي يجب أن تكون إجاباتها موجودة مباشرة في النص.', 'es': 'Aunque la respuesta a preguntas generales se ha explorado bien en los últimos años, la respuesta temporal a preguntas es una tarea que no ha recibido tanta atención. Nuestro trabajo tiene como objetivo aprovechar un enfoque popular utilizado para responder preguntas generales y extraer respuestas a preguntas temporales dentro de un párrafo. Para entrenar nuestro modelo, proponemos un nuevo conjunto de datos, inspirado en sQuad, un corpus de respuestas a preguntas de última generación, diseñado específicamente para proporcionar información temporal rica mediante la adaptación del corpus WikiWars, que contiene varios documentos sobre los mayores conflictos de la historia. Nuestra evaluación muestra que un modelo de aprendizaje profundo de coincidencia de patrones, que se utiliza a menudo en las respuestas generales a las preguntas, se puede adaptar a la respuesta temporal a las preguntas, si aceptamos hacer preguntas cuyas respuestas deben estar presentes directamente en un texto.', 'fr': "Bien que la réponse aux questions générales ait été bien explorée ces dernières années, la réponse temporelle aux questions est une tâche qui n'a pas reçu autant d'attention. Notre travail vise à tirer parti d'une approche populaire utilisée pour répondre à des questions générales, extraire des réponses, afin de trouver des réponses à des questions temporelles dans un paragraphe. Pour entraîner notre modèle, nous proposons un nouveau jeu de données, inspiré de SQuad, un corpus de réponses aux questions de pointe, spécialement conçu pour fournir des informations temporelles riches en adaptant le corpus WikiWars, qui contient plusieurs documents sur les plus grands conflits de l'histoire. Notre évaluation montre qu'un modèle d'apprentissage profond par correspondance de modèles, souvent utilisé dans les réponses générales aux questions, peut être adapté à la réponse temporelle aux questions, si nous acceptons de poser des questions dont les réponses doivent être directement présentes dans un texte.", 'pt': 'Embora a resposta a perguntas gerais tenha sido bem explorada nos últimos anos, a resposta a perguntas temporais é uma tarefa que não tem recebido tanto foco. Nosso trabalho visa alavancar uma abordagem popular usada para responder perguntas gerais, extração de respostas, a fim de encontrar respostas para perguntas temporais dentro de um parágrafo. Para treinar nosso modelo, propomos um novo conjunto de dados, inspirado no SQuAD, um corpus de resposta a perguntas de última geração, especificamente adaptado para fornecer informações temporais ricas, adaptando o corpus WikiWars, que contém vários documentos sobre os maiores conflitos da história. Nossa avaliação mostra que um modelo de deep learning de correspondência de padrões, frequentemente usado em respostas de perguntas gerais, pode ser adaptado para respostas de perguntas temporais, se aceitarmos fazer perguntas cujas respostas devem estar diretamente presentes em um texto.', 'ja': '一般的な質問回答は近年よく探求されているが、時間的な質問回答はそれほど注目されていない課題である。私たちの研究は、パラグラフ内の時間的な質問に対する答えを見つけるために、一般的な質問の答え、答えの抽出に使用される一般的なアプローチを活用することを目的としています。私たちのモデルをトレーニングするために、私たちはSQuADからインスピレーションを得た新しいデータセットを提案します。SQuADは最先端の質問に答えるコーパスで、歴史上最大の紛争に関するいくつかの文書を含むコーパスWikiWarsを適応させることで豊富な時間情報を提供するように特別に調整されています。私たちの評価は、一般的な質問の回答でよく使用される深層学習モデルと一致するパターンは、テキスト内に直接答えが存在しなければならない質問をすることを受け入れた場合、時間的な質問の回答に適応することができることを示しています。', 'zh': '虽近年以来,多所问答,然一无所关注。 吾曹事旨在寻常问答,答案取流行之法,以便段落中寻时对案。 设一新集,感自SQuAD,此最先进之问答语料库,专以调语料库WikiWars供丰耗,其数史之大冲突者文档。 我们的评估明白,一个模式匹配深度学习模样,常施于常问答,可以应时问答,如果我们受发答案必须直在文本中。', 'hi': 'यद्यपि हाल के वर्षों में सामान्य प्रश्न उत्तर का अच्छी तरह से पता लगाया गया है, अस्थायी प्रश्न उत्तर देना एक ऐसा कार्य है जिसे उतना ध्यान नहीं मिला है। हमारे काम का उद्देश्य एक पैराग्राफ के भीतर अस्थायी प्रश्नों के उत्तर खोजने के लिए सामान्य प्रश्न उत्तर देने, उत्तर निष्कर्षण के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले एक लोकप्रिय दृष्टिकोण का लाभ उठाना है। हमारे मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए, हम एक नए डेटासेट का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो SQuAD से प्रेरित है, जो एक अत्याधुनिक प्रश्न का उत्तर देने वाला कॉर्पस है, जो विशेष रूप से कॉर्पस विकिवार्स को अनुकूलित करके समृद्ध अस्थायी जानकारी प्रदान करने के लिए तैयार किया गया है, जिसमें इतिहास के सबसे बड़े संघर्षों पर कई दस्तावेज शामिल हैं। हमारे मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि गहरे सीखने के मॉडल से मेल खाने वाला एक पैटर्न, जो अक्सर सामान्य प्रश्न उत्तर देने में उपयोग किया जाता है, को अस्थायी प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए अनुकूलित किया जा सकता है, यदि हम उन प्रश्नों को पूछने के लिए स्वीकार करते हैं जिनके उत्तर सीधे पाठ के भीतर मौजूद होने चाहिए।', 'ru': 'Хотя общие ответы на вопросы в последние годы хорошо изучены, временные ответы на вопросы - это задача, которая не получила столь пристального внимания. Наша работа направлена на использование популярного подхода, используемого для ответов на общие вопросы, извлечение ответов, чтобы найти ответы на временные вопросы внутри абзаца. Чтобы обучить нашу модель, мы предлагаем новый набор данных, вдохновленный SQuAD, современным корпусом ответов на вопросы, специально разработанным для предоставления богатой временной информации путем адаптации корпуса WikiWars, который содержит несколько документов о величайших конфликтах истории. Наша оценка показывает, что модель, соответствующая модели глубокого обучения, часто используемая в ответах на общие вопросы, может быть адаптирована к ответам на временные вопросы, если мы согласны задавать вопросы, ответы на которые должны непосредственно присутствовать в тексте.', 'ga': "Cé go ndearnadh iniúchadh maith ar fhreagraí ceisteanna ginearálta le blianta beaga anuas, is tasc é freagra na gceisteanna ama nach bhfuil an oiread céanna béime air. Tá sé mar aidhm ag ár gcuid oibre úsáid a bhaint as cur chuige coitianta a úsáidtear chun ceisteanna ginearálta a fhreagairt, asbhaint freagraí, chun freagraí a fháil ar cheisteanna ama laistigh d'alt. Chun ár múnla a oiliúint, molaimid tacar sonraí nua, arna spreagadh ag SQuAD, corpas freagartha ceisteanna úrscothach, atá saindeartha go sonrach chun faisnéis shaibhir ama a sholáthar tríd an corpas WikiWars a oiriúnú, ina bhfuil roinnt doiciméad ar na coinbhleachtaí is mó sa stair. Léiríonn ár meastóireacht gur féidir patrún a mheaitseálann múnla domhainfhoghlama, a úsáidtear go minic i bhfreagraí ginearálta ceisteanna, a chur in oiriúint do fhreagra ceisteanna ama, má ghlacaimid le ceisteanna a chur a gcaithfidh a bhfreagraí a bheith i láthair go díreach laistigh de théacs.", 'hu': 'Bár az elmúlt években jól feltárták az általános kérdések megválaszolását, az időbeli kérdések megválaszolása olyan feladat, amely nem kapott annyira hangsúlyt. Munkánk célja, hogy az általános kérdések megválaszolásához, válaszok kivonásához használt népszerű megközelítést használjunk annak érdekében, hogy időbeli kérdésekre adott válaszokat találjunk egy bekezdésen belül. Modellünk képzéséhez egy új adatkészletet javasolunk, amelyet az SQUAD ihletett, egy korszerű kérdésre válaszoló korpuszt, amely kifejezetten arra szabott, hogy gazdag időbeli információkat nyújtson a WikiWars korpusz adaptálásával, amely számos dokumentumot tartalmaz a történelem legnagyobb konfliktusairól. Értékelésünk azt mutatja, hogy az általános kérdések megválaszolásában gyakran használt mélytanulási modellnek megfelelő mintázat alkalmazható időbeli kérdésekre, ha elfogadjuk, hogy olyan kérdéseket tegyünk fel, amelyeknek a válaszai közvetlenül egy szövegben jelen kell lenniük.', 'ka': 'თუმცა საერთო კითხვის პასუხი უკეთესი წლის განსხვავებულია, რამდენიმე კითხვის პასუხი არის რაოდენობა, რომელიც არ მიიღეთ რამდენიმე ფორკუსი. ჩვენი სამუშაო მიზეზია, რომ საერთო პარაგრამის შიგნით სამუშაო კითხვებისთვის გამოყენებული პოლუბური გაგრძნობისთვის, გამოყენებასთვის, გამოყენებას ჩვენი მოდელის შესაბამისათვის, ჩვენ ახალი მონაცემების სექტი, რომელიც SQuAD-ის ინტექსურებული, სექტიკური კითხვა, რომელიც კოპუსის სახელსაწყისთვის, განსაკუთრებულად განსაკუთრებულია, რომელიც კოპუსის WikiWars-ის აე ჩვენი განსაზღვრება აჩვენებს, რომ სტრუქონი, რომელიც ძალიან სწავლებელი მოდელეში გამოყენებული საერთო კითხვის პასუხისთვის, შეიძლება დააყენება ტექსტში, თუ ჩვენ დავაკვიროთ კითხვების', 'it': "Sebbene la risposta generale alle domande sia stata ben esplorata negli ultimi anni, la risposta temporale alle domande è un compito che non ha ricevuto la stessa attenzione. Il nostro lavoro mira a sfruttare un approccio popolare utilizzato per la risposta generale alle domande, l'estrazione delle risposte, al fine di trovare risposte alle domande temporali all'interno di un paragrafo. Per formare il nostro modello, proponiamo un nuovo set di dati, ispirato a SQUAD, un corpus di risposta alle domande all'avanguardia, appositamente studiato per fornire informazioni temporali ricche adattando il corpus WikiWars, che contiene diversi documenti sui più grandi conflitti della storia. La nostra valutazione mostra che un modello che corrisponde al modello di deep learning, spesso utilizzato nella risposta generale alle domande, può essere adattato alla risposta temporale alle domande, se accettiamo di porre domande le cui risposte devono essere direttamente presenti all'interno di un testo.", 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдарда жалпы сұрақтар жауап беру жақсы зерттеулі болса да, уақытша сұрақтар жауап беру - тапсырманың көп назары алмаған тапсырмасы. Біздің жұмысамыз, кәдімгі сұрақтардың жауаптарын табу үшін, жауап тарту үшін қолданылатын көпшілік тәртібін көмектесу мақсатымыз. Өз үлгімізді оқыту үшін SQuAD жаңа деректер жиынын ұсынамыз, корпус жауап беретін сұрақ күйінің күйінде жауап беретін сұрақ, өзгертілген уақытша мәліметті келтіру үшін корпус WikiWars-ге адаптациялау үшін, журналдың ең ү Біздің оқу үлгісіміз, жалпы сұрақтар жауаптарында қолданылатын түрлі оқу үлгісіне сәйкес келетін үлгісін көрсетеді. Егер біз мәтін ішінде қайталанатын сұрақтардың жауаптарына сұрақтарын', 'el': 'Αν και η γενική απάντηση ερωτήσεων έχει διερευνηθεί καλά τα τελευταία χρόνια, η χρονική απάντηση ερωτήσεων είναι ένα έργο που δεν έχει λάβει τόσο μεγάλη έμφαση. Στόχος της εργασίας μας είναι να αξιοποιήσουμε μια δημοφιλής προσέγγιση που χρησιμοποιείται για την απάντηση γενικών ερωτήσεων, την εξαγωγή απαντήσεων, προκειμένου να βρούμε απαντήσεις σε χρονικές ερωτήσεις μέσα σε μια παράγραφο. Για να εκπαιδεύσουμε το μοντέλο μας, προτείνουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων, εμπνευσμένο από το SQuAD, ένα σύγχρονο σώμα απαντήσεων σε ερωτήσεις, ειδικά προσαρμοσμένο για να παρέχει πλούσια χρονική πληροφορία προσαρμόζοντας το σώμα WikiWars, το οποίο περιέχει διάφορα έγγραφα για τις μεγαλύτερες συγκρούσεις της ιστορίας. Η αξιολόγησή μας δείχνει ότι ένα πρότυπο που ταιριάζει με το μοντέλο βαθιάς μάθησης, που χρησιμοποιείται συχνά στην απάντηση γενικών ερωτήσεων, μπορεί να προσαρμοστεί στην απάντηση χρονικών ερωτήσεων, αν δεχτούμε να κάνουμε ερωτήσεις των οποίων οι απαντήσεις πρέπει να είναι άμεσα παρόντες μέσα σε ένα κείμενο.', 'lt': 'Nors pastaraisiais metais atsakymai į visuotinius klausimus buvo gerai išnagrinėti, atsakymai į laikinus klausimus yra užduotis, į kurią nebuvo daug dėmesio skiriama. Mūsų darbu siekiama panaudoti populiarų požiūrį į visuotinį atsakymą į klausimus, atsakymų gavimą, kad būtų rasti atsakymai į laikinus klausimus šioje dalyje. Kad mokytume savo model į, siūlome naują duomenų rinkinį, įkvėptą SQuAD, naujausią klausimą, atsakantį į korpusą, specialiai pritaikytą siekiant suteikti turtingą laiką informaciją pritaikant korpusą WikiWars, kuriame yra keletas dokumentų apie didžiausius istorijos konfliktus. Mūsų vertinimas rodo, kad modelis, atitinkantis gilaus mokymosi model į, dažnai naudojamas bendrai atsakant į klausimus, gali būti pritaikytas prie laikinų atsakymų į klausimus, jei sutinkame užduoti klausimus, kurių atsakymai turi būti tiesiogiai pateikti tekste.', 'mk': 'Иако општиот одговор на прашањата е добро испитан во последниве години, привременото одговор на прашањата е задача која не доби толку фокус. Нашата работа има за цел да го искористи популарниот пристап кој се користи за општа одговори на прашања, извлекување одговори, со цел да се најдат одговори на временски прашања во рамките на еден параграф. За да го тренираме нашиот модел, предлагаме нов податок инспириран од СКВАД, најсовремено прашање што одговара на корпусот, специфично направен за да обезбеди богати временски информации со адаптација на корпусот ВикиWars, кој содржи неколку документи за најголемите конфликти во историјата. Нашата оценка покажува дека шемата што се совпаѓа со моделот на длабоко учење, честопати користен во општите одговори на прашања, може да биде адаптирана на привременото одговорување на прашања, ако прифатиме да поставуваме прашања чии одговори мора да бидат директно присутни во тек', 'ml': 'കഴിഞ്ഞ വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d സാധാരണ ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം നല്ല പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും, സമയത്തിലെ ചോദ്യം ഉത്തര നമ്മുടെ ജോലി ഒരു പൊതുവായ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കാനും ഉത്തരം എടുക്കാനും പ്രാപ്റ്റഫില്\u200d ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റ് പ്രൊജക്കെടുക്കുന്നു. SQuAD-ല്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്നു. കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന രാജ് നമ്മുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലിനോട് പൊരുതുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയാണ്, എപ്പോഴും സാധാരണ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നത്,', 'ms': 'Walaupun jawapan soalan umum telah dieksplorasi dengan baik dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, jawapan soalan sementara adalah tugas yang tidak menerima sebanyak fokus. Kerja kami bertujuan untuk menggunakan pendekatan populer yang digunakan untuk menjawab soalan umum, pengekstrakan jawapan, untuk mencari jawapan kepada soalan sementara dalam satu paragraf. Untuk melatih model kami, kami cadangkan set data baru, diinspirasi oleh SQuAD, soalan terbaik yang menjawab corpus, khususnya disediakan untuk menyediakan maklumat sementara yang kaya dengan menyesuaikan corpus WikiWars, yang mengandungi beberapa dokumen mengenai konflik terbesar sejarah. Evaluasi kita menunjukkan corak yang sepadan dengan model belajar dalam, sering digunakan dalam jawapan soalan umum, boleh disesuaikan dengan jawapan soalan sementara, jika kita menerima untuk menanyakan soalan yang jawapannya mesti berada secara langsung dalam teks.', 'mt': "Għalkemm it-tweġiba ġenerali għall-mistoqsijiet ġiet esplorata sewwa f’dawn l-a ħħar snin, it-tweġiba temporali għall-mistoqsijiet hija kompitu li ma rċevietx l-istess enfasi. Ix-xogħol tagħna għandu l-għan li jagħti spinta lil approċċ popolari użat għat-tweġiba ġenerali għall-mistoqsijiet, l-estrazzjoni tat-tweġibiet, sabiex jinstabu tweġibiet għal mistoqsijiet temporali fi ħdan paragrafu. To train our model, we propose a new dataset, inspired by SQuAD, a state-of-the-art question answering corpus, specifically tailored to provide rich temporal information by adapting the corpus WikiWars, which contains several documents on history's greatest conflicts.  L-evalwazzjoni tagħna turi li mudell li jaqbel ma’ mudell ta’ tagħlim profond, li ta’ spiss jintuża fit-tweġibiet ġenerali għall-mistoqsijiet, jista’ jiġi adattat għat-tweġibiet temporali għall-mistoqsijiet, jekk naċċettaw li nistaqsu mistoqsijiet li t-tweġibiet tagħhom iridu jkunu preżenti direttament fi ħdan test.", 'pl': 'Chociaż ogólne odpowiedzi na pytania zostały dobrze zbadane w ostatnich latach, czasowe odpowiedzi na pytania są zadaniem, które nie zostało tak skupione. Nasza praca ma na celu wykorzystanie popularnego podejścia stosowanego do odpowiedzi na pytania ogólne, ekstrakcji odpowiedzi, w celu znalezienia odpowiedzi na pytania czasowe w akapicie. Aby wytrenować nasz model, proponujemy nowy zestaw danych, inspirowany SQuAD, nowoczesny korpus odpowiadający na pytania, specjalnie dostosowany do dostarczania bogatej informacji czasowej poprzez adaptację korpusu WikiWars, który zawiera kilka dokumentów dotyczących największych konfliktów historii. Z naszej oceny wynika, że model pasujący do wzorców głębokiego uczenia, często stosowany w ogólnych odpowiedziach na pytania, może być dostosowany do odpowiedzi na pytania czasowe, jeśli zaakceptujemy zadawanie pytań, których odpowiedzi muszą być bezpośrednio obecne w tekście.', 'ro': 'Deși răspunsul general la întrebări a fost bine explorat în ultimii ani, răspunsul temporal la întrebări este o sarcină care nu a primit atât de mult accent. Lucrarea noastră își propune să valorifice o abordare populară utilizată pentru răspunsul general la întrebări, extragerea răspunsurilor, pentru a găsi răspunsuri la întrebări temporale într-un paragraf. Pentru a ne instrui modelul, propunem un nou set de date, inspirat de SQUAD, un corpus de răspuns la întrebări de ultimă generație, adaptat special pentru a furniza informații temporale bogate prin adaptarea corpului WikiWars, care conține mai multe documente despre cele mai mari conflicte ale istoriei. Evaluarea noastră arată că un model care corespunde modelului de învățare profundă, adesea utilizat în răspunsul general la întrebări, poate fi adaptat la răspunsul temporal la întrebări, dacă acceptăm să punem întrebări ale căror răspunsuri trebuie să fie direct prezente într-un text.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилүүдэд ерөнхий асуулт хариулт сайн судалсан ч гэсэн, хугацааны асуулт хариулт нь маш их анхаарал авч чадахгүй ажил юм. Бидний ажлын зорилго нь ерөнхий асуултын хариулт, хариулт гаргах, хугацааны асуултын хариулт олохын тулд олон олон хүмүүст ашиглах арга зам юм. Бид загварыг суралцахын тулд SQuAD-ын урлагийн асуулт корпус руу урам зориулсан шинэ өгөгдлийн санал санал өгдөг. Түүний хамгийн том зөрчилдөөнд хэдэн баримт баримт бий болгож баян цагаан хугацааны мэдээллийг өгөх боломжтой. Бидний шалгалт нь гүн гүнзгий суралцах загвартай холбоотой загвар, ихэвчлэн асуулт хариултаар хэрэглэгддэг, хугацааны асуултын хариултаар адилтгаж болно. Хэрвээ бид хэний хариулт шууд текст дотор байгааг асуух ас', 'sr': 'Iako je u poslednjih godina dobro istraženo odgovor na opće pitanje, privremeno pitanje je zadatak koji nije dobio toliko koncentracije. Naš rad je cilj da utiče na popularni pristup koji se koristi za odgovor na opće pitanje, odgovor na izvlačenje, kako bi pronašli odgovore na privremena pitanja unutar paragrafa. Da bi obučili naš model, predlažemo novi set podataka, inspirisan od SQuAD, pitanje države umjetnosti koja odgovara na korpus, posebno prilagođeno da pruži bogate temporalne informacije prilagođenjem korpusa WikiWars a, koja sadrži nekoliko dokumenta o najvećim konfliktima povijesti. Naša procjena pokazuje da uzorak koji odgovara model dubokog učenja, koji se često koristi u općem odgovoru na pitanje, može biti prilagođen privremenom odgovoru na pitanje, ako prihvatimo da postavimo pitanja čija odgovora mora biti direktno predstavljena u tekstu.', 'no': 'Selv om det har blitt utforska i løpet av dei siste åra, er det ei oppgåve som ikkje har fått så mykje fokus på tidlegare spørsmål. Arbeidet vårt måtar å levera ein populært tilnærming brukt for å svara på spørsmål, svara ut, for å finna svar på tidlegare spørsmål i eit avsnitt. For å trene modellen vårt, foreslår vi ein ny dataset, inspirert av SQuAD, eit spørsmål om kunsten svarar på korpus, spesielt tilpassa til å gi rikt tidlegare informasjon ved å tilpassa korpus WikiWars, som inneheld fleire dokument om historiske største konflikt. Vårt evaluering viser at eit mønster som passar med dyp læringsmodell, ofte brukt i det generelle spørsmålet, kan tilpassast til mellombels spørsmål, dersom vi aksepterer å spørja spørsmål kva svar må vera direkte i eit tekst.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් අලුත් අවුරුද්දු වල හොඳට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, අවස අපේ වැඩේ අල්ලගන්නවා සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්න උත්තර දෙන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න, උත්තර දෙන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අතර අපේ මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න, අපි අලුත් දත්ත සැට් එකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, SQuAD එකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, කොර්පස් විකිවෝර්ස් එකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200d අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ගොඩක් ඉගෙනීම් මදුල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධයි, සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය', 'ta': 'அண்மைய ஆண்டுகளில் பொதுவான கேள்விக்கு பதில் சரியாக ஆராய்ந்திருக்கும் போது எங்கள் வேலை ஒரு பொது கேள்விக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட ஒரு பெரிய முறையில் பதில், விடை பெறுவதற்கு, ஒரு பதில் கேள்விகளுக்கு தற்காலிக எங்கள் மாதிரி பயிற்சியை பயிற்சி செய்வதற்கு, SQuAD ஆல் ஆர்வம் செய்யப்பட்ட புதிய தரவுத்தளத்தை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், ஒரு நாட்டு கலை கோர்ப்ஸ் பதில் குறிப்பிட்ட நேரம் தக எங்கள் மதிப்பு ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் மாதிரி பொருந்தும் வடிவம், பொதுவான கேள்விக்கு பதில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, தற்காலிக விடையில் கேள்வி பதி', 'so': "In kastoo jawaabta su'aalaha guud ee sanadkii ugu dambeeyey si wanaagsan loo baahan yahay, jawaabta su'aalka waqtiga ku meelgaarka ah waa shaqada aan la helin focus. Our work aims to leverage a popular approach used for general question answering, answer extraction, in order to find answers to temporal questions within a paragraph.  Tusaale ahaan baaraandegista, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa sawir cusub oo SQuAD, kaas oo ah su'aalo ay ka jawaabayso wadamada farshaxanta, si gaar ah u qoran in lagu siiyo macluumaad ku saabsan wakhtiga ku meelgaarka ah, si loo beddelo warqada korpus WikiWars, kaas oo ku jira dokumooyin badan oo ku saabsan dagaalladaha taariikhda ugu weyn. Qiimeyntayada ayaa tusaale ahaan u eg tusaale waxbarasho mool dheer, inta badan la isticmaalo jawaabta su'aalaha ku saabsan, waxaa loo beddeli karaa in loo jawaabo jawaabta su'aalaha waqtiga ah, haddii aynu aqbalno su'aalaha ay u waajib tahay inay si toos ah u soo jeedaan qoraalka.", 'sv': 'Även om det allmänna frågesvaret har utforskats väl under de senaste åren är tidssvaret en uppgift som inte har fått lika mycket fokus. Vårt arbete syftar till att utnyttja ett populärt tillvägagångssätt som används för generellt frågesvar, svar utvinning, för att hitta svar på tidsmässiga frågor inom ett stycke. För att träna vår modell föreslår vi ett nytt dataset, inspirerat av SQUAD, en toppmodern frågesvarskorpus, speciellt anpassad för att ge rik tidsinformation genom att anpassa korpusen WikiWars, som innehåller flera dokument om historiens största konflikter. Vår utvärdering visar att ett mönster som matchar djupinlärningsmodellen, ofta används vid generellt frågesvar, kan anpassas till tidsmässigt frågesvar, om vi accepterar att ställa frågor vars svar måste finnas direkt i en text.', 'ur': 'اگرچہ اگلے سالوں میں معمولی سوال جواب اچھی طرح اچھی طرح اچھی طرح اچھی طرح اچھی طرح اچھی طرح اچھی طرح اچھی طرح اچھی طرح اچھی طرح اچھی طرح اچھی طرح اچھی طرح ا ہمارے کام کا ارادہ ہے کہ ایک پاراگراف کے اندر موقت سؤال کے جواب اور جواب دینے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے ایک جماعت طریقہ کے ذریعہ سے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہمارے مدل کی تعلیم کے لئے، ہم نے ایک نئی ڈیٹ سٹ کی پیشنهاد کریں، جو SQuAD کے ذریعہ الهام کی جاتی ہے، ایک ایسی ایستی سؤال جو کورپوس کے سوال جواب دیتی ہے، مخصوصاً تیموں معلومات کے ساتھ پورا سامان معلومات دینے کے لئے تدبیر کی گئی ہے، جو تاریخ کے سب سے بڑے کنфلک کے بار ہمارا ارزیابی دکھاتا ہے کہ ایک پٹرن جو عمیق تعلیم مدل کے مطابق مطابق ہوتا ہے، بہت سی وقت سوال جواب میں استعمال ہوتا ہے، موقت سوال جواب کے مطابق مطابق ہوسکتا ہے، اگر ہم سوال پوچھتے ہیں کہ کس کی جواب سیدھی ایک متن میں حاضر', 'vi': 'Mặc dù trả lời câu hỏi chung đã được nghiên cứu kỹ trong những năm gần đây, nhưng trả lời tạm thời là một nhiệm vụ chưa được chú ý nhiều. Công việc của chúng tôi nhằm hướng tới một phương pháp phổ biến dùng để trả lời các câu hỏi chung, giải đáp các câu hỏi, để tìm câu trả lời cho các câu hỏi thời gian trong một đoạn. Để huấn luyện mô hình, chúng tôi đề xuất một bộ dữ liệu mới, được tạo ra bởi SQurad, một câu hỏi đang rất nóng bỏng, đang trả lời cho tập đoàn, được may ra để cung cấp những thông tin thời gian giàu có, bằng cách s ửa đổi tập đoàn WikiLWars, chứa nhiều tài liệu về các xung đột lớn nhất lịch sử. Bài đánh giá của chúng tôi cho thấy mô hình khớp với mô hình học sâu, thường được dùng trong câu trả lời câu hỏi chung, có thể thích nghi với câu trả lời theo thời gian, nếu chúng tôi chấp nhận đặt câu hỏi mà câu trả lời phải có trực tiếp trong một văn bản.', 'uz': "Yaqinda ko'pchilik yillarda umumiy savol javob topildi, vaqt javob berilgan vazifa juda fokus qabul qilmagan vazifa. Vaqtinchalik muammolarni qoʻllash uchun umumiy savol javob berish, javob chiqarish uchun javoblarni topish uchun ishlaydi. Biz modelimizni o'rganish uchun SQuAD tomonidan imzolangan yangi maʼlumot satrini tahlil qilamiz, bu hodisa qoʻshimcha javob beruvchi vaqt maʼlumotini qo'shish uchun hodisa yordam beradi. Bu tarixining eng katta murakkablarida bir necha hujjatlar mavjud. Bizning qiymatlarimizni ko'rsatish mumkin, ko'pincha o'rganish modeliga oʻxshash modeli, oddiy savol javob beradi, vaqt savol javob berish mumkin, agar biz matnning javoblari butunlay kelishi kerak bo'lgan savollarni qabul qila olamiz.", 'bg': 'Въпреки че общото отговаряне на въпроси е добре проучено през последните години, временното отговаряне на въпроси е задача, която не е получила толкова голям фокус. Нашата работа има за цел да използва популярен подход, използван за общ отговор на въпроси, извличане на отговори, за да се намерят отговори на времеви въпроси в рамките на един абзац. За да обучим нашия модел, предлагаме нов набор от данни, вдъхновен от съвременен корпус за отговор на въпроси, специално пригоден за предоставяне на богата времева информация чрез адаптиране на корпуса Уикивойни, който съдържа няколко документа за най-големите конфликти в историята. Нашата оценка показва, че моделът, който съвпада с модела на дълбоко учене, често използван в общото отговаряне на въпроси, може да бъде адаптиран към временното отговаряне на въпроси, ако приемем да задаваме въпроси, чиито отговори трябва да присъстват пряко в текста.', 'hr': 'Iako je u posljednjih godina dobro ispitivan odgovor na opće pitanje, odgovor na privremeno pitanje je zadatak koji nije dobio toliko koncentracije. Naš rad je cilj utjecati na popularni pristup koji se koristi za odgovor na opće pitanje, odgovor na izvlačenje, kako bi pronašli odgovore na privremena pitanja unutar odstavka. Za treniranje našeg model a predlažemo novu kompletu podataka inspiriranu od SQuAD-a, pitanje države umjetnosti koja odgovara na korpus, posebno prilagođeno pružati bogate temporalne informacije prilagođenjem korpusa WikiWarsa, koja sadrži nekoliko dokumenta o najvećim sukobima povijesti. Naša procjena pokazuje da uzorak koji odgovara dubokom modelu učenja, često se koristi na odgovoru na pitanje, može se prilagoditi privremenom odgovoru na pitanje, ako prihvatimo postaviti pitanja čija odgovora mora biti direktno predstavljena u tekstu.', 'nl': 'Hoewel het beantwoorden van algemene vragen de afgelopen jaren goed is onderzocht, is het beantwoorden van tijdelijke vragen een taak die niet zoveel aandacht heeft gekregen. Ons werk beoogt gebruik te maken van een populaire benadering voor algemene vragen beantwoorden, antwoorden extractie, om antwoorden te vinden op tijdelijke vragen binnen een alinea. Om ons model te trainen, stellen we een nieuwe dataset voor, geïnspireerd op SQuAD, een state-of-the-art vragenantwoord corpus, speciaal aangepast om rijke temporele informatie te verstrekken door het corpus WikiWars aan te passen, dat verschillende documenten bevat over de grootste conflicten in de geschiedenis. Uit onze evaluatie blijkt dat een patroon matching deep learning model, vaak gebruikt in algemene vragen beantwoorden, aangepast kan worden aan tijdelijke vragen beantwoorden, als we accepteren vragen te stellen waarvan de antwoorden direct aanwezig moeten zijn in een tekst.', 'da': 'Selv om generel spørgsmålsbesvarelse er blevet udforsket godt i de seneste år, er tidssvarende spørgsmål en opgave, der ikke har fået så meget fokus. Vores arbejde har til formål at udnytte en populær tilgang, der anvendes til generel spørgsmål besvarelse, svar udtrækning, for at finde svar på tidsmæssige spørgsmål inden for et afsnit. For at træne vores model foreslår vi et nyt datasæt, inspireret af SQUAD, et topmoderne spørgsmål besvarende korpus, specielt skræddersyet til at give rig tidsinformation ved at tilpasse korpus WikiWars, som indeholder flere dokumenter om historiens største konflikter. Vores evaluering viser, at et mønster, der matcher dyb læring model, ofte anvendes i generel spørgsmål besvarelse, kan tilpasses tidsmæssigt spørgsmål besvarelse, hvis vi accepterer at stille spørgsmål, hvis svar skal være direkte til stede i en tekst.', 'id': 'Meskipun jawaban pertanyaan umum telah dieksplorasi dengan baik di tahun-tahun terakhir, jawaban pertanyaan sementara adalah tugas yang belum menerima fokus sebanyak itu. Pekerjaan kami bertujuan untuk menggunakan pendekatan populer yang digunakan untuk menjawab pertanyaan umum, menjawab ekstraksi, untuk menemukan jawaban untuk pertanyaan sementara dalam sebuah paragraf. Untuk melatih model kami, kami mengusulkan dataset baru, diinspirasi oleh SQuAD, sebuah pertanyaan terbaik yang menjawab corpus, khususnya disesuaikan untuk menyediakan informasi temporal kaya dengan menyesuaikan corpus WikiWars, yang mengandung beberapa dokumen tentang konflik terbesar sejarah. Evaluasi kami menunjukkan bahwa pola yang cocok dengan model belajar dalam, sering digunakan dalam menjawab pertanyaan umum, dapat diadaptasi dengan menjawab pertanyaan sementara, jika kita menerima untuk menanyakan pertanyaan yang jawabannya harus langsung hadir dalam teks.', 'de': 'Obwohl die allgemeine Beantwortung von Fragen in den letzten Jahren gut erforscht wurde, ist die zeitliche Beantwortung von Fragen eine Aufgabe, die nicht so viel Aufmerksamkeit erhalten hat. Unsere Arbeit zielt darauf ab, einen populären Ansatz für die allgemeine Beantwortung von Fragen und die Extraktion von Antworten zu nutzen, um Antworten auf zeitliche Fragen innerhalb eines Absatzes zu finden. Um unser Modell zu trainieren, schlagen wir einen neuen Datensatz vor, inspiriert von SQuAD, einem hochmodernen Fragebeantworter Korpus, der speziell darauf zugeschnitten ist, reiche zeitliche Informationen bereitzustellen, indem er das Korpus WikiWars anpasst, das mehrere Dokumente über die größten Konflikte der Geschichte enthält. Unsere Auswertung zeigt, dass ein Muster-Matching-Deep-Learning-Modell, das häufig in der allgemeinen Beantwortung von Fragen verwendet wird, an die zeitliche Beantwortung von Fragen angepasst werden kann, wenn wir akzeptieren, Fragen zu stellen, deren Antworten direkt in einem Text vorhanden sein müssen.', 'ko': '일반적인 질문에 대한 대답은 최근 몇 년 동안 좋은 탐색을 얻었지만 시간적인 질문에 대한 대답은 그렇게 많은 관심을 받지 못한 임무였다.우리의 업무는 일반적인 문제, 즉 답안 추출에 유행하는 방법을 이용하여 한 단락에서 시간 문제의 답안을 찾을 수 있도록 하는 데 목적을 두고 있다.우리의 모델을 훈련시키기 위해 우리는 새로운 데이터 집합을 제시했다. 이 데이터 집합의 영감은 가장 선진적인 문답 자료 라이브러리 SQuad에서 비롯되었다. 이 자료 라이브러리는 자료 라이브러리 WikiWars를 수정함으로써 풍부한 시간 정보를 제공하기 위해 맞춤형으로 제작되었다. 그 중에서 역사상 가장 큰 충돌에 관한 몇 개의 문서가 포함되어 있다.우리의 평가에 의하면 만약에 우리가 답안을 받아들여 텍스트에 직접 나타나야 하는 문제를 받아들인다면 일반적인 문답 모델에 사용되는 깊이 있는 학습 모델은 시간 문답에 적용될 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Ingawa jibu la swali la jumla limekuwa likizunguzwa vizuri katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, jibu la muda wa muda ni jukumu ambalo halijapata lengo kubwa. Our work aims to leverage a popular approach used for general question answering, answer extraction, in order to find answers to temporal questions within a paragraph.  Ili kufundisha mifano yetu, tunapendekeza seti mpya ya taarifa, inayohamasishwa na SQuAD, swali la hali ya sanaa linalojibu makampuni, hususani kwa ajili ya kutoa taarifa za muda kwa kubadilisha makampuni ya WikiWars, ambazo ina dokumentari kadhaa kuhusu mgogoro mkubwa wa historia. Utafiti wetu unaonyesha kuwa mtindo unaofanana na mfumo wa kujifunza kwa kina, mara nyingi unatumiwa kwa ujumla wa kujibu maswali, unaweza kubadilishwa na majibu ya muda, kama tutakubali kuuliza maswali ni nani ambaye ni lazima a we moja kwa moja katika ujumbe wa maandishi.', 'af': "Alhoewel die algemene vraag antwoord in onlangse jaar is goed uitgevoer, is tydelike vraag antwoord 'n taak wat nie so baie fokus ontvang het nie. Ons werk is doel om 'n populêre toegang te verwys wat gebruik word vir algemene vraag antwoord, antwoord uitvoer, om antwoorde te vind na tydelike vraag binne 'n paragraaf. Om on s model te oefen, voorstel ons 'n nuwe datastel, inspireer deur SQuAD, 'n staat-van-die-kunste vraag wat antwoord korpus, spesifieke versterk om ryk tydelike inligting te verskaf deur die korpus WikiWars te adapteer, wat bevat verskeie dokumente op die grootste konflikte van geskiedenis. Ons evaluering vertoon dat 'n patroon wat ooreenstemmende diep leer model, dikwels gebruik word in algemene vraag antwoord, kan aanpas word na tydelike vraag antwoord, as ons aanvaar om vrae te vra wie se antwoorde direk in 'n teks voorsien moet word.", 'sq': 'Megjithëse përgjigjet e përgjigjes së përgjithshme të pyetjeve janë eksploruar mirë në vitet e fundit, përgjigjet e pyetjeve të përkohshme janë një detyrë që nuk ka marrë aq shumë fokus. Puna jonë synon të nxisë një qasje popullore të përdorur për përgjigjen e përgjigjeve të përgjigjeve të përgjigjeve, për të gjetur përgjigje për pyetjet e përkohshme brenda një paragrafi. Për të trajnuar modelin tonë, propozojmë një set të ri të dhënash, të frymëzuar nga SQuAD, një pyetje më të lartë që përgjigjet korpusit, specifikisht të përshtatur për të ofruar informacion të pasur përkohor duke përshtatur korpusin WikiWars, i cili përmban disa dokumente mbi konfliktet më të mëdha të historisë. Vlerësimi ynë tregon se një model që përputhet me model in e mësimit të thellë, shpesh përdorur në përgjigjen e përgjigjeve të përgjigjeve të përgjigjeve të përgjigjeve të përgjigjeve të përkohshme, nëse pranojmë të bëjmë pyetje përgjigjet e të cilave duhet të jenë të pranishme drejtpërdrejt brenda një teksti.', 'tr': 'Soňky ýyllar içinde umumy soraglaryň jogabaty gowy gözleýän bolsa hem wagt soraglaryň jogabaty gaty fokus edilmedik zada däldir. Biziň işimiz umumy soraglaryň jogabaty, a çylygyň jogabatyny tapmak üçin meşhur ýagdaýy etmäge maksat edýär. Modelimizi öwretmek üçin SQuAD tarapyndan esinlenen täze sanat setigini korpusa jogap bermek üçin täze sanat setigini teklip edip görýäris. Taryhdaky iň uly çaganlarda birnäçe senedi bar. Biziň deňleşmerimiz derin öwrenmek nusgasyna uygun çykyş nusgasyny görkezýär. Köplenç soraglaryň jogabynda ulanylýar, wagt soraglaryň jogabyna uyum saýlayabiler. Eger biz soraglaryň jogabynyň metin içine düz bolmalydygyny kabul etsek', 'am': 'ባለፈው ዓመታት የጠያቂው ጥያቄ መልስ መልካም ሆኖ ቢመረምር፣ የጊዜው ጥያቄ መልስ ትክክለኛ ስራ ነው፡፡ ሥራችን የጠቅላላ ጥያቄ መልስ፣ መልስ ውጤት ለማግኘት በጊዜው ጥያቄዎችን ለማግኘት የሚጠይቁትን አካባቢ ጥያቄን ለመስጠት ነው፡፡ ሞዴልናችንን ለማስተምር፣ SQuAD የተመረጠውን አዲስ ዳታተር ማሰናከል እናስጀጋለን፤ በተለየ የኮርፓስ ትልቁ ግጭት ላይ ባለ ጠግነት መረጃዎችን በመቀበል፣ የኮርፓስ WikiWars በመጠቀም፣ ታሪክ ትልቁ ግጭት ላይ ብዙ ሰነዶች ያላቸውን፡፡ ማስታወቂያችን የጥልቅ ትምህርት ምሳሌ፣ ብዙ ጊዜ በተጠያየቁ ጥያቄ መልስ የሚጠይቅ ምሳሌ፣ በጥያቄ ጥያቄ መልስ ለመቀበል ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': "Չնայած վերջին տարիների ընդհանուր հարցերի պատասխանը լավ ուսումնասիրել է, ժամանակական հարցերի պատասխանը մի խնդիր է, որն այնքան էլ կենտրոնացված չէ: Մեր աշխատանքը նպատակն է օգտագործել հանրային մոտեցումը, որը օգտագործվում է ընդհանուր հարցերի պատասխանելու, պատասխանների հանելու համար, որպեսզի պարբերակում պատասխաններ գտնենք ժամանակական հարցերին: To train our model, we propose a new dataset, inspired by SQuAD, a state-of-the-art question answering corpus, specifically tailored to provide rich temporal information by adapting the corpus WikiWars, which contains several documents on history's greatest conflicts.  Մեր գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ խորը ուսումնասիրության մոդելը, որը հաճախ օգտագործվում է ընդհանուր հարցերի պատասխաններում, կարող է հարմարվել ժամանակական հարցերի պատասխաններին, եթե մենք ընդունենք հարցեր տալ, որոնց պատասխանները պետք է անմիջապես գտնվեն տեքստում:", 'az': 'Əgər son illərdə genel sual cavabı yaxşı keşif edilsə də, zamanlı sual cavabı çox fərqli olmayan bir işdir. Bizim işimiz, bir parçanın içində müddətli suallara cavab vermək, cəzalandırmaq üçün istifadə edilən qüvvətli tərzdə istifadə etmək istəyir. Modelimizi təhsil etmək üçün, SQuAD tarafından ilham verilmiş yeni verilən qurbanı təklif edirik. Bu qurbanın ən böyük konfliktlərində çoxlu məlumatlar barəsində, korpus WikiWars-a uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün müəyyən vaxtlı məlumatlar təklif edilmişdir. Bizim değerlendirmələrimiz göstərir ki, çox zaman ünlü sual cavabı ilə istifadə edilən bir modellə çəkilmək modellərə uyğunlaşdırıla bilər, əgər biz məktub içində hansı cavab vermək lazımdır soruşmağa qəbul etsək, müddətli suallara uyğunlaşdırıla bilər.', 'bn': 'যদিও সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে সাধারণ প্রশ্নের উত্তর ভালোভাবে খুঁজে বের করা হয়েছে, তবে সাময়িক প্রশ্নের উত্তর হচ্ছে একটি কাজ যা এ Our work aims to leverage a popular approach used for general question answering, answer extraction, in order to find answers to temporal questions within a paragraph.  আমাদের মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট প্রস্তাব করি, যা এসকুয়েড-এর অনুপ্রাণিত, একটি রাষ্ট্র-অফ শিল্প প প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়, বিশেষ করে কোর্পাস উইকিওয়ার্সের সাথে সমৃ আমাদের মূল্যবোধ দেখা যাচ্ছে যে গভীর শিক্ষা মডেলের সাথে যুক্ত একটি প্যাটেম, প্রায়শই সাধারণ প্রশ্নের উত্তরে ব্যবহার করা হয়, সাময়িক প্রশ্নের উত্তরে ম', 'bs': 'Iako je u poslednjih godina dobro istraženo općem odgovoru na pitanje, odgovor na privremeno pitanje je zadatak koji nije dobio toliko koncentracije. Naš rad je cilj da utiče na popularni pristup koji se koristi za odgovor na opće pitanje, odgovor na izvlačenje, kako bi pronašli odgovore na privremena pitanja unutar odstavka. Da bi obučili naš model, predlažemo novi set podataka, inspirisan od SQuAD, pitanje države umjetnosti koja odgovara na korpus, posebno prilagođeno da pruži bogate temporalne informacije prilagođenjem korpusa WikiWars a, koja sadrži nekoliko dokumenta o najvećim sukobima povijesti. Naša procjena pokazuje da uzorak koji odgovara model dubokog učenja, koji se često koristi u općem odgovoru na pitanje, može biti prilagođen privremenom odgovoru na pitanje, ako prihvatimo da postavimo pitanja čija odgovora mora biti direktno predstavljena u tekstu.', 'fa': 'اگرچه جواب سوال عمومی در سالهای اخیر خوب تحقیق شده است، جواب سوال موقتی یک کار است که به اندازه بسیار تمرکز نداشته است. کار ما هدف دارد که یک روش محبوب را برای جواب سوال عمومی، جواب استخراج، برای پیدا کردن جواب به سوال های موقتی در یک پاراگراف استفاده کنیم. برای آموزش مدل ما، ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که توسط SQuAD الهام می\u200cدهد، یک سوال ایالت هنری که جواب می\u200cدهد به کورپوس، ویژه\u200cاش برای اطلاعات موقتی ثروتمندی به عنوان تغییر دادن کورپوس ویکیوارز، که تعدادی از مدارک\u200cهای بزرگترین مبارزه\u200c ارزیابی ما نشان می دهد که یک الگو با مدل یادگیری عمیق، معمولاً در جواب سوال عمومی استفاده می شود، می تواند به جواب سوال موقتی adapt شود، اگر ما قبول می کنیم از سوالات بپرسیم که جواب هایی مستقیماً در یک متن حاضر است.', 'ca': "Encara que les respostes generals a preguntes han estat ben explorades en els últims anys, la resposta temporal a preguntes és una tasca que no ha rebut tanta atenció. La nostra feina mira a aprofitar un enfocament popular utilitzat per respondre a preguntes generals, extrair respostes, per trobar respostes a preguntes temporals dins un paràgraf. Per treinar el nostre model, proposem un nou conjunt de dades, inspirat per SQuAD, un corpus de resposta a preguntes més avançades, específicament adaptat per proporcionar informació temporal rica adaptant el corpus WikiWars, que conté molts documents sobre els grans conflictes de la història. La nostra evaluació mostra que un patró que coincideix amb un model d'aprenentatge profund, sovint utilitzat en resposta general a preguntes, pot ser adaptat a resposta temporal a preguntes, si acceptem fer preguntes les respostes de les quals han de estar presents directament dins un text.", 'cs': 'Přestože obecné odpovědi na otázky byly v posledních letech dobře prozkoumány, časové odpovědi na otázky je úkolem, který se nezaměřil tolik. Naše práce si klade za cíl využít populární přístup používaný pro obecné odpovědi na otázky, extrakci odpovědí, k nalezení odpovědí na časové otázky v rámci odstavce. Pro trénink našeho modelu navrhujeme nový datový soubor inspirovaný SQuAD, nejmodernější korpus odpovídající na otázky, speciálně přizpůsobený k poskytování bohatých časových informací přizpůsobením korpusu WikiWars, který obsahuje několik dokumentů o největších konfliktech historie. Naše hodnocení ukazuje, že model odpovídající hlubokému učení, často používaný v obecné odpovědi na otázky, lze přizpůsobit časovému odpovědi na otázky, pokud přijmeme klást otázky, jejichž odpovědi musí být přímo v textu.', 'et': 'Kuigi üldist küsimustele vastamist on viimastel aastatel hästi uuritud, on ajaline küsimustele vastamine ülesanne, millele ei ole nii palju tähelepanu pööratud. Meie töö eesmärk on kasutada populaarset lähenemisviisi, mida kasutatakse üldistele küsimustele vastamiseks, vastuste väljavõtmiseks, et leida vastused ajalistele küsimustele lõigus. Meie mudeli koolitamiseks pakume välja uue andmekogumi, mis on inspireeritud SQuAD-ist, kaasaegse küsimustele vastamise korpuse, mis on spetsiaalselt kohandatud andma rikkalikku ajalist informatsiooni, kohandades korpust WikiWars, mis sisaldab mitmeid dokumente ajaloo suurimate konfliktide kohta. Meie hinnang näitab, et sügavõppe mudelit, mida sageli kasutatakse üldises küsimustele vastamises, saab kohandada ajalisele küsimustele vastamisele, kui nõustume esitama küsimusi, mille vastused peavad olema otseselt tekstis.', 'fi': 'Vaikka yleisiä kysymyksiä on tutkittu viime vuosina hyvin, ajallinen kysymyksiin vastaaminen on tehtävä, johon ei ole kiinnitetty yhtä paljon huomiota. Työssämme pyritään hyödyntämään yleistä vastausta, vastausten poimintaa koskevaa lähestymistapaa, jotta löydetään vastauksia ajallisiin kysymyksiin kappaleen sisällä. Mallimme kouluttamiseksi ehdotamme uutta SQuAD:n innoittamaa datajoukkoa, joka on uusinta tekniikkaa edustava kysymysvastauskorpus, joka on räätälöity tarjoamaan runsaasti aikatietoa muokkaamalla WikiWars-korpusta, joka sisältää useita dokumentteja historian suurimmista konflikteista. Arviointi osoittaa, että usein yleiseen kysymykseen vastaamiseen käytetty malli sopii ajalliseen kysymykseen vastaamiseen, jos suostumme esittämään kysymyksiä, joiden vastausten on oltava suoraan tekstissä.', 'sk': 'Čeprav je bilo v zadnjih letih splošno odgovarjanje na vprašanja dobro raziskano, je časovno odgovarjanje na vprašanja naloga, ki ni dobila toliko osredotočenosti. Naše delo je namenjeno izkoristiti priljubljen pristop, ki se uporablja za splošno odgovarjanje na vprašanja, ekstrakcijo odgovorov, da bi našli odgovore na časovna vprašanja znotraj odstavka. Za usposabljanje modela predlagamo nov nabor podatkov, ki ga navdihuje SQuAD, najsodobnejši korpus za odgovore na vprašanja, ki je posebej prilagojen za zagotavljanje bogatih časovnih informacij s prilagoditvijo korpusa WikiWars, ki vsebuje več dokumentov o največjih konfliktih v zgodovini. Naša ocena kaže, da je model globokega učenja, ki se pogosto uporablja pri splošnem odgovarjanju na vprašanja, mogoče prilagoditi časovnemu odgovarjanju na vprašanja, če sprejmemo postavljanje vprašanj, katerih odgovori morajo biti neposredno prisotni v besedilu.', 'he': 'למרות שענות על שאלות כלליות נחקרו היטב בשנים האחרונות, עונות על שאלות זמניות היא משימה שלא קיבלה הרבה מרכז. העבודה שלנו מתכוונת לנצל גישה פופולרית שמשתמשת לענות לשאלות כלליות, לחלץ תשובות, כדי למצוא תשובות לשאלות זמניות בתוך פרק. כדי לאמן את הדוגמא שלנו, אנו מציעים קבוצת נתונים חדשה, שמושרפת על ידי SQuAD, שאלה מוקדמת עונה לקורפוס, במיוחד מתוכננת כדי לספק מידע זמני עשיר על ידי ההתאמה של הקורפוס WikiWars, אשר מכילה מספר מסמכים על הקונפלקטים הגדולים ביותר בהיסטוריה. הערכה שלנו מראה שדפוס מתאים לדוגמא למידה עמוקה, שימש לעתים קרובות בתשובה כללית לשאלות, יכול להתאים לענות לשאלות זמניות, אם אנחנו מקבלים לשאול שאלות שאותיהן חייבות להיות נוכחות ישירות בתוך טקסט.', 'ha': "Ingawa an samu'in mai tambaya jumla a baya cikin shekara na farko, sai mai tambaya wa lokaci ya zama wani aikin da ba ya motsa faniki. Our work aims to leverage a popular approach used for general question answering, answer extraction, in order to find answers to temporal questions within a paragraph.  To, dõmin ya sanar da shirin ayukanmu, za mu buɗa wani tsarin da aka yi wahayi da SQuAD, wata halin-muhimman tambayar-sanar ta karɓa wa makarubin, yana da ƙayyadadde zuwa ga ya bãyar da bayani masu riki ga lokacin mutane da za'a daidaita kowacin WikiWars, wanda ke ƙunsa da wasu takardun takardar masu ƙarancin bayani. Bayaniyarmu yana nũna cẽwa wani misali wanda ya yi kamid da misali da aka sanar da inuwanta, wanda ake amfani da shi a gaba ɗaya, za'a iya daidaita wa mai karɓar wa tambayi masu lokaci, idan mun yarda in tambayi su tambayi masu tambayar su ne wanda za'a iya halarce da su a cikin wani matsayi.", 'bo': "ཉེ་ཆར་ཡོད་པའི་ལོ་ངོས་པར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་དྲི་ཚིག་གིས་ལན་གསལ ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྤྱད་ནས་ཡོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ལན་གསལ་དང་ཕུན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་خلاུ གས་གཙ To train our model, we propose a new dataset, inspired by SQuAD, a state-of-the-art question answering corpus, specifically tailored to provide rich temporal information by adapting the corpus WikiWars, which contains several documents on history's greatest conflicts. ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་གིས་མཐུན་པའི་གཟུགས་རིས་དཔྱད་པར་མཐུན་པ་ཁག་ཅིག་ཡིན་པས། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་དྲི་བ་ལན་གསལ་ལྟར་བྱེད་སྟངས་པར་བཟོ་བཅུག", 'jv': 'Nanging, akeh werong respon sing paling ngganti kapan dumadhi iki, akeh dumadhi kapan kanggo sampek kapan kawok sinau. Awakdhéwé jajal sing beraksi kanggo nganggo populer dianggap kanggo ngono werong, gampang Rasané awakdhéwé model sing beraksi perusahaan dataset sing bagian, nambah sing alêter ter ter nggawe dataset nggawe dataset sing paling dhéwé, suku tanggal perusahaan-perusahaan langkung sampeyan winih dhéwé, lan akeh perusahaan langkung sampeyan winih dhéwé Isopo awak dhéwé menehi ngomong nik sampeyan model sing nggawe aturan luwih dumaten, sapa kang dipun ciptaaken werong, iso dianggap kanggo ngubah persian sing isine, meh awak dhéwé aksi kanggo ngeratan winih sing bisa cecaturan dhéwé'}
{'en': 'Building A Corporate Corpus For Threads Constitution', 'ar': 'بناء مجموعة مؤسسية لدستور الخيوط', 'pt': 'Construindo um Corpus Corporativo para Constituição de Threads', 'es': 'Construyendo un corpus corporativo para la constitución de hilos', 'fr': 'Construire un corpus corporatif pour les fils', 'ja': 'スレッドのためのコーポレートコーパスの構築', 'hi': 'थ्रेड्स संविधान के लिए एक कॉर्पोरेट कॉर्पस का निर्माण', 'zh': '为线程构企业语料库章程', 'ru': 'Построение корпоративного корпуса для нитей Конституции', 'ga': 'Bunreacht Corpas Corparáideach do Shnáitheanna a Thógáil', 'ka': 'კომპორაციის კონსტრუქცია', 'hu': 'Egy vállalati testület kialakítása a fonalak számára', 'el': 'Κατασκευή ενός εταιρικού σώματος για τα νήματα Σύνταγμα', 'it': 'Costruire un corpus aziendale per la costituzione dei fili', 'lt': 'Įmonių korpuso, skirto siūlų konstitucijai, kūrimas', 'kk': 'Ілеспелердің құрылымы үшін корпус құру', 'mk': 'Building A Corporate Corpus For Threads Constitution', 'ms': 'Bina Korporasi untuk Konstitusi Benang', 'mn': 'Хугацааны Хамгийн газрын хууль бүтээмж', 'mt': 'Il-Bini ta’ Korporazzjoni Korporattiva għall-Ħjut', 'ml': 'ത്രൂഡുകളുടെ സംവിധാനത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പറേറ്റ് കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് പണിയുന്നു', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Budowanie korpusu korporacyjnego dla konstytucji wątków', 'ro': 'Constituirea unui Corpus corporativ pentru fire Constituție', 'sr': 'Izgradnja korporativnog korpusa za ustav Threads', 'so': 'Building A Corpus for Threads Constitution', 'si': 'නිර්මාණය සඳහා කොර්පෝර්ටර් කොර්පුස් හදන්න', 'sv': 'Bygga en företagskår för trådar konstitution', 'ta': 'நூல்கள் கட்டுப்பாட்டிற்கான ஒரு நிறுவனம் கார்ப்ஸ் கட்டமைப்பு', 'ur': 'تریڈز قانون کے لئے ایک شرکت کورپوس بنانا', 'uz': 'Xabarlar daftarini yaratish', 'vi': 'Tòa nhà A Corporate Corpus for Thread Constitution', 'nl': 'Een corporate corpus opbouwen voor de Grondwet van Threads', 'da': 'Opbygning af et Corporate Corpus For Threads Constitution', 'bg': 'Изграждане на корпоративен корпус за нишки Конституция', 'hr': 'Izgradnja korporativnog korpusa za ustav prijetnji', 'id': 'Membangun Korporasi Korporasi Untuk Konstitusi Benda', 'de': 'Aufbau eines Corporate Corpus für Threads Constitution', 'fa': 'ساختن یک شرکت برای قانون خطوط', 'ko': '기업 헌법 자료 라이브러리 구축', 'tr': 'Hatlaryň Konstitusiýasy üçin Kopret Körpüsi Gurama', 'sw': 'Kujenga makampuni kwa ajili ya Katiba ya matangazo', 'sq': 'Ndërtimi i një korpuse korporatore për kushtetutën e fytyrave', 'af': "Bou 'n Korporasie Korpus vir Threads Constitution", 'am': 'የኮርፖሬት ኮርፓስ ለThreads Constitution', 'az': 'Üçək Konstitüsü üçün Korporatlı Korpus inşaat', 'hy': 'Building A Corporate Corpus For Threads Constitution', 'bn': 'ত্রিড সংবিধানের জন্য একটি কর্পোরেট কোর্পাস নির্মাণ করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Construir un Corpus Corporate For Threads Constitution', 'cs': 'Budování korporátního sboru pro ústavu vláken', 'et': 'Äriühingukorpuse loomine lõimede jaoks', 'bs': 'Izgradnja korporativnog korpusa za ustav Threads', 'fi': 'Yritysjohtojen muodostaminen', 'ha': 'Builning A CorCorpo for Threads Action', 'jv': 'Gak-nggawe Kapan Côngkat kanggo Ketokan Itungan kanggo Kemerdekaan Winih', 'sk': 'Ustava korporativnega korpusa za niti', 'bo': 'སྡེར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རྩ་ཁྲིམས་ཆེན་མཁན་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ་ཡིན།', 'he': 'בניית גוף תאגידים לחוקה'}
{'en': 'In this paper we describe the process of build-ing a corporate corpus that will be used as a ref-erence for modelling and computing threadsfrom conversations generated using commu-nication and collaboration tools. The overallgoal of the reconstruction of threads is to beable to provide value to the collorator in var-ious use cases, such as higlighting the impor-tant parts of a running discussion, reviewingthe upcoming commitments or deadlines, etc. Since, to our knowledge, there is no avail-able corporate corpus for the French languagewhich could allow us to address this prob-lem of thread constitution, we present here amethod for building such corpora includingdifferent aspects and steps which allowed thecreation of a pipeline to pseudo-anonymisedata. Such a pipeline is a response to theconstraints induced by the General Data Pro-tection Regulation GDPR in Europe and thecompliance to the secrecy of correspondence.', 'es': 'En este artículo describimos el proceso de creación de un corpus corporativo que se utilizará como referencia para modelar y calcular los hilos de las conversaciones generadas mediante herramientas de comunicación y colaboración. El objetivo general de la reconstrucción de hilos es poder proporcionar valor al coloreador en varios casos de uso, como resaltar las partes importantes de una discusión en curso, revisar los próximos compromisos o plazos, etc. Dado que, hasta donde sabemos, no hay un corpus corporativo disponible para el En francés, que podría permitirnos abordar este problema de la constitución del hilo, presentamos aquí un método para construir tales corpus que incluye diferentes aspectos y pasos que permitieron la creación de una canalización para datos pseudoanónimos. Tal canalización es una respuesta a las restricciones inducidas por el Reglamento General de Protección de Datos GDPR en Europa y el cumplimiento del secreto de la correspondencia.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons le processus de création d'un corpus corporatif qui servira de référence pour la modélisation et le calcul des fils de discussion à partir de conversations générées à l'aide d'outils de communication et de collaboration. L'objectif global de la reconstruction des threads est de pouvoir apporter de la valeur au collaborateur dans divers cas d'utilisation, tels que la mise en évidence des parties importantes d'une discussion en cours, la révision des engagements ou des échéances à venir, etc. Étant donné qu'à notre connaissance, il n'existe pas de corpus corporatif disponible pour le En langue française qui pourrait nous permettre de résoudre ce problème de constitution de fils, nous présentons ici une méthode de construction de tels corpus incluant différents aspects et étapes qui ont permis la création d'un pipeline vers des données pseudoanonymisées. Un tel pipeline répond aux contraintes induites par le règlement général sur la protection des données (RGPD) en Europe et au respect du secret de la correspondance.", 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف عملية بناء هيكل الشركة الذي سيتم استخدامه كمرجع لنمذجة وحوسبة سلاسل المحادثات التي تم إنشاؤها باستخدام أدوات التواصل والتعاون. الهدف العام من إعادة بناء الخيوط هو توفير قيمة للموظف في حالات الاستخدام المتنوعة ، مثل تسليط الضوء على الأجزاء المهمة من مناقشة جارية ، ومراجعة الالتزامات أو المواعيد النهائية القادمة ، وما إلى ذلك ، منذ ذلك الحين ، على حد علمنا ، لا توجد مجموعة مواد متاحة للغة الفرنسية والتي يمكن أن تسمح لنا بمعالجة مشكلة تكوين الخيط ، نقدم هنا طريقة لبناء مثل هذه الهيئات بما في ذلك الجوانب والخطوات المختلفة التي سمحت بإنشاء خط أنابيب إلى مجهول الهوية. يمثل خط الأنابيب هذا استجابة للقيود التي يسببها اللائحة العامة لحماية البيانات (GDPR) في أوروبا والامتثال لسرية المراسلات.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo descrevemos o processo de construção de um corpus corporativo que será utilizado como referência para modelagem e computação de threads a partir de conversas geradas por meio de ferramentas de comunicação e colaboração. O objetivo geral da reconstrução de threads é ser capaz de fornecer valor ao colorador em vários casos de uso, como destacar as partes importantes de uma discussão em andamento, revisar os próximos compromissos ou prazos, etc. não existe um corpus corporativo disponível para a língua francesa que nos permita abordar este problema de constituição de threads, apresentamos aqui um método para a construção de tais corpora incluindo diferentes aspectos e etapas que permitiram a criação de um pipeline para dados pseudo-anônimos. Tal pipeline é uma resposta às restrições induzidas pelo Regulamento Geral de Proteção de Dados GDPR na Europa e ao cumprimento do sigilo da correspondência.', 'ja': 'この論文では、コミュニケーションとコラボレーションツールを使用して生成された会話からのスレッドをモデリングおよびコンピューティングするための参照として使用される企業コーパスを構築するプロセスについて説明します。スレッドの再構築の全体的な目標は、実行中のディスカッションの重要な部分のハイライト、今後のコミットメントまたは締め切りの見直しなど、さまざまなユースケースでコロレーターに価値を提供することができます。私たちの知る限り、このスレッド体質のプロブレムに対処することを可能にするフランス政府にとって有用なコーポレートコーポレートは存在しないため、私たちはここで、擬似匿名化されたデータへのパイプラインの作成を可能にするさまざまな側面とステップを含む、そのようなコーポラを構築するためのアメコードを提示します。このようなパイプラインは、ヨーロッパの一般データ保護規則GDPRによって誘発された制約と、通信の機密性への準拠に対する対応です。', 'zh': '本文述构企业语料库之事,当语料库将以建模计线程之参-通信协器之会话。 线程重建者总体目标给直于可变用例,如隐正议要,审将来诺止日等。 以吾所知,法语无可用之企业语料库可以决线程之理,建此语料库之法,异端步骤,许创管道于匿名之ata。 此管道通用数据保护条例GDPR约束及通信保密性守之应也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम एक कॉर्पोरेट कॉर्पस बनाने की प्रक्रिया का वर्णन करते हैं जिसका उपयोग कॉम्मू-निकेशन और सहयोग उपकरणों का उपयोग करके उत्पन्न वार्तालापों से मॉडलिंग और कंप्यूटिंग थ्रेड्स के लिए रेफरी-रेंस के रूप में किया जाएगा। धागे के पुनर्निर्माण का समग्र लक्ष्य वार-ईस उपयोग के मामलों में कोलोरेटर को मूल्य प्रदान करने के लिए योग्य है, जैसे कि चल रही चर्चा के impor-tant भागों को हाइगलाइट करना, आगामी प्रतिबद्धताओं या समय सीमा की समीक्षा करना, आदि। चूंकि, हमारे ज्ञान के लिए, फ्रांसीसी भाषा के लिए कोई लाभ-योग्य कॉर्पोरेट कॉर्पस नहीं है जो हमें थ्रेड संविधान के इस प्रोब-लेम को संबोधित करने की अनुमति दे सकता है, इसलिए हम यहां विभिन्न पहलुओं और चरणों सहित इस तरह के कॉर्पोरेट के निर्माण के लिए एक विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो छद्म-अनामीकृता के लिए एक पाइपलाइन के निर्माण की अनुमति देते हैं। इस तरह की पाइपलाइन यूरोप में जनरल डेटा प्रो-टेक्शन विनियमन जीडीपीआर द्वारा प्रेरित प्रतिबंधों की प्रतिक्रिया है और पत्राचार की गोपनीयता का अनुपालन है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем процесс построения корпоративного корпуса, который будет использоваться в качестве эталона для моделирования и вычисления потоков из разговоров, сгенерированных с помощью инструментов связи и совместной работы. Общая цель реконструкции потоков должна быть в состоянии обеспечить ценность для коллоратора в различных случаях использования, таких как освещение важных частей текущего обсуждения, обзор предстоящих обязательств или сроков и т. д. Поскольку, насколько нам известно, нет доступного корпоративного корпуса для французской стороны, который мог бы позволить нам решить эту проблему нити конституции, мы представляем здесьметод для построения таких корпусов, включая различные аспекты и шаги, которые позволили создать трубопровод для псевдо-анонимных данных. Такой трубопровод является ответом на ограничения, вызванные Общим регламентом по защите данных GDPR в Европе исоблюдением тайны переписки.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid cur síos ar an bpróiseas chun corpas corparáideach a thógáil a úsáidfear mar thagairt do shamhaltú agus ríomh snáitheanna ó chomhráite a ghintear trí úsáid a bhaint as uirlisí cumarsáide agus comhoibrithe. Is é an príomhsprioc atá le hathchruthú snáitheanna ná a bheith in ann luach a sholáthar don choilitheoir i gcásanna úsáide éagsúla, mar shampla na codanna tábhachtacha de phlé reatha a aibhsiú, athbhreithniú a dhéanamh ar na gealltanais nó na spriocdhátaí atá le teacht, etc. Ós rud é, go bhfios dúinn, níl aon chorpas corparáideach ar fáil don Fhraincis a d’fhéadfadh ligean dúinn dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb seo maidir le bunreacht snáitheanna, cuirimid i láthair anseo modh chun corpas den sórt sin a thógáil lena n-áirítear gnéithe agus céimeanna éagsúla a cheadaigh cruthú píblíne chuig sonraí gan ainm. Is freagairt é píblíne den sórt sin ar na srianta a chothaítear leis an Rialachán Ginearálta um Chosaint Sonraí GDPR san Eoraip agus ar chomhlíonadh rúndachta an chomhfhreagrais.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ აღწერეთ კოპორატური კოპპორატის შექმნა პროცესი, რომელიც მოდელირება და კომპუტერება სიტყვების გამოყენებაში გამოყენებული კოპორატური კოპორატის შექმნა, რომელიც სამყარო მიზეზი, სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო გამოყენებაში კოლორორატორის მნიშვნელობა, როგორც სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო გამოყენებაში, როგორც სამყარო დისუქციის იმპორტური ნაწილეები, შესახებ მომდინარებული სამყარო ან სამყარო დროების განსახებ ჩვენ აქ ვამხსენებთ, რომელსაც ასეთი კორპორაზე გავაკეთებთ განსხვავებული აპექტიკები და ნაწილები, რომელიც გავამხსენებთ ფესოდიო ანონიმიზაციის შექმნა. რაღაც უფრო ფეხლინი არის განახლება საზოგადოება, რომლებიც გენერალური მონაცემების პროტექტიკური რეგილეგი GDPR-ს ვგოპაში და შესაძლებლობა კონპორექციის დარწმუნება.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban bemutatjuk egy olyan vállalati korpusz kialakításának folyamatát, amelyet a kommunikációs és együttműködési eszközökkel generált beszélgetések modellezéséhez és számításához használunk. A szálak rekonstrukciójának általános célja, hogy értéket nyújtson a kollátor számára különböző használati esetekben, mint például egy folyamatban lévő viták fontos részeinek kiemelése, a közelgő kötelezettségvállalások vagy határidők áttekintése stb. Mivel tudomásunk szerint a francia nyelv számára nincs elérhető vállalati korpusz, amely lehetővé tenné számunkra a szálalkotás e problémájának megoldását, Itt bemutatjuk a különböző szempontokat és lépéseket, amelyek lehetővé tették egy pszeudo-anonimizált vezeték létrehozását. Ez a csővezeték válasz az európai általános adatvédelmi rendelet által okozott korlátokra, valamint a levelezés titkosságának betartására.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία περιγράφεται η διαδικασία δημιουργίας ενός εταιρικού σώματος που θα χρησιμοποιηθεί ως αναφορά για την μοντελοποίηση και τον υπολογισμό νημάτων από συνομιλίες που δημιουργούνται χρησιμοποιώντας εργαλεία επικοινωνίας και συνεργασίας. Ο γενικός στόχος της ανασυγκρότησης των νημάτων είναι να είναι σε θέση να προσφέρει αξία στον συνεργάτη σε διάφορες περιπτώσεις χρήσης, όπως η ανάδειξη των σημαντικών τμημάτων μιας τρέχουσας συζήτησης, η αναθεώρηση των επερχόμενων δεσμεύσεων ή προθεσμιών κλπ. Δεδομένου ότι, από όσο γνωρίζουμε, δεν υπάρχει διαθέσιμο εταιρικό σώμα για τη γαλλική γλώσσα που θα μπορούσε να μας επιτρέψει να αντιμετωπίσουμε αυτό το πρόβλημα της συγκρότησης νημάτων, Παρουσιάζουμε εδώ μια μέθοδο για την οικοδόμηση τέτοιων σωμάτων που περιλαμβάνει διαφορετικές πτυχές και βήματα που επέτρεψαν τη δημιουργία ενός αγωγού για ψευδο-ανωνυμία. Ένας τέτοιος αγωγός είναι μια απάντηση στους περιορισμούς που προκαλούνται από τον γενικό κανονισμό προστασίας δεδομένων GDPR στην Ευρώπη και τη συμμόρφωση προς το απόρρητο της αλληλογραφίας.', 'it': "In questo articolo descriviamo il processo di costruzione di un corpus aziendale che sarà utilizzato come riferimento per la modellazione e l'elaborazione di thread da conversazioni generate utilizzando strumenti di comunicazione e collaborazione. L'obiettivo generale della ricostruzione dei fili è quello di fornire valore al colloratore in vari casi d'uso, come highlighting delle parti importanti di una discussione in corso, revisione degli impegni o delle scadenze imminenti, ecc. Poiché, a nostra conoscenza, non esiste un corpus aziendale disponibile per la lingua francese che possa permetterci di affrontare questo problema della costituzione dei fili, Vi presentiamo qui un metodo per la costruzione di tali corpi comprendendo diversi aspetti e passaggi che hanno permesso la creazione di una pipeline per pseudo-anonimizzare. Tale pipeline risponde ai vincoli indotti dal regolamento generale sulla protezione dei dati GDPR in Europa e al rispetto della segretezza della corrispondenza.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз комуникациялық және жұмыс істеу құрылғылармен жасалған сұрақтарды модель және есептеу үшін қолданатын корпорациялық корпорациялық құрылғының процесін таңдадық. Ілеспелерді қайта құру мақсатының көпшілігі - қолданыстағы жұмыс істеу, келесі комитеттерді не уақыттарды тексеру және т. б. білімізге, француз тілігіне қолдануға мүмкіндік беретін корпорациялық корпорациялық корпус жоқ. Бұл ілеспелердің конституциясының мақсатын өзгертуге мүмкіндік бер Біз осы корпораға айырмашылық аспекттер мен қадамдарды құру үшін мәліметті таңдаймыз. Бұл жерде оны псевдо-анонимизациялауға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл құрылғы - Еуропадағы GDPR жалпы деректердің протектециялау ережесінің шектеріне жауап береді.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник го опишуваме процесот на изградба на корпоративен корпус кој ќе биде употребен како референција за моделирање и компјутерирање низи од разговорите генерирани користејќи алатки за комуникација и соработка. Генералната цел на реконструкцијата на жиците е да се обезбеди вредност за колораторот во различни случаи на употреба, како што е осветлувањето на важните делови од тековната дискусија, прегледот на следните обврски или крајни рокови итн. Бидејќи, според нашето знаење, нема корпоративен корпус за францускиот јазик кој би можел да ни овозможи да го решиме овој проблем на уставот на жиците, Тука го претставуваме методот за изградба на такви тела вклучувајќи различни аспекти и чекори кои овозможија создавање на гасовод за псевдо-анонимизедата. Таков гасовод претставува одговор на ограничувањата предизвикани од Генералната регулатива за заштита на податоците ГДПР во Европа и на согласноста со тајноста на кореспонденцијата.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdiname korpuso kūrimo procesą, kuris bus naudojamas kaip atskaitos taškas modeliavimui ir skaičiavimui iš pokalbių, sukurtų naudojant ryšių ir bendradarbiavimo priemones. Bendrasis siūlų atstatymo tikslas – suteikti koloratoriui vertę įvairiais naudojimo atvejais, pavyzdžiui, išryškinti svarbias vykstančių diskusijų dalis, peržiūrėti būsimus įsipareigojimus ar terminus ir t. t. Kadangi, mūsų žiniomis, prancūzų kalbai nėra naudingo korpuso, kuris leistų mums spręsti šį siūlų konstitucijos prob lem ą, Čia pristatome metodą tokios korporacijos kūrimui, įskaitant įvairius aspektus ir žingsnius, kurie leido kurti vamzdyną pseudoanonimisedata. Such a pipeline is a response to theconstraints induced by the General Data Pro-tection Regulation GDPR in Europe and thecompliance to the secrecy of correspondence.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menggambarkan proses membina korpus syarikat yang akan digunakan sebagai rujukan untuk model dan komputer benang dari perbualan yang dijana menggunakan alat komunikasi dan kerjasama. Tujuan keseluruhan pembinaan semula benang adalah untuk menyediakan nilai kepada kolerator dalam kes-kes penggunaan berbagai-bagai, seperti pencahayaan bahagian-bahagian yang penting dalam perbincangan yang sedang berlari, meninjau perjanjian atau tanggal masa yang akan datang, dll. Kami memperkenalkan di sini metode untuk membina korpra seperti ini termasuk aspek dan langkah yang berbeza yang membolehkan penciptaan saluran paip untuk pseudo-anonim sedata. Talian paip seperti ini merupakan balasan terhadap keterangan yang disebabkan oleh Peraturan Perlindungan Data Umum GDPR di Eropah dan keperluan kepada rahsia korespondensi.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument niddeskrivu l-proċess ta’ bini ta’ korpus korporattiv li se jintuża bħala referenza għall-immudellar u l-komputar ta’ ħjut minn konverżjonijiet iġġenerati bl-użu ta’ għodod ta’ komunikazzjoni u kollaborazzjoni. L-għan ġenerali tar-rikostruzzjoni tal-ħjut huwa li jkun possibbli li jiġi pprovdut valur lill-koloratur f’każijiet ta’ użu varji, bħall-illuminazzjoni għolja tal-partijiet importanti ta’ diskussjoni li għaddejja, ir-reviżjoni tal-impenji jew l-iskadenzi li ġejjin, eċċ. F’dan ir-rigward, qed nippreżentaw metodu għall-bini ta’ korpi bħal dawn li jinkludi aspetti u passi differenti li ppermettew il-ħolqien ta’ pipeline għall-psewdoanimisedata. Tali pipeline huwa reazzjoni għar-restrizzjonijiet indotti mir-Regolament Ġenerali dwar il-Protezzjoni tad-Dejta GDPR fl-Ewropa u l-konformità mas-segretezza tal-korrispondenza.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид холбоотой болон хамтран ажиллах хэрэгсэл ашиглах корпоратын үйлдвэрлэлийн үйлдвэрлэлийн үйлдвэрлэлийг тодорхойлдог. Бидний мэдэхдээ Французын хэл дээр хэрэглэх боломжтой корпус байхгүй. Энэ дасгал бүхий л зүйлсийг бидэнд зориулж чадна. Бид энд хоолойн шугам бүтээхэд өөр хэсэг болон алхам байгуулахын тулд үүнийг нэрлэж байна. Ийм хоолойн шугам бол Европын ДНПР-ын ерөнхий өгөгдлийн протектикийн шийдвэр болон харилцааны нууцлын харилцаа юм.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi prosessen for bygging av eit korporativ korporus som vert brukt som refleksjon for modellering og rekning av trådar frå samtaler laga med kommunikasjonsverktøy og samarbeidsverktøy. Gjennomsiktig mål på rekonstruksjonen av trådar er å gje verdien til koloratoren i var ious bruk-tilfeller, slik som hjelp av imporstante deler av ein køyrande diskusjon, gjennomsikt av framkommende kommunikasjonar eller avslutningar osv. Siden, i vårt kjenning, er det ingen tilgjengeleg korporasjon for den franske språket som kan tillata oss å handtera denne probløysinga av trådskonstitusjonen, Vi presenterer her namnet for å bygge slike korpora med forskjellige aspektar og steg som tillatt opprettinga av ei røyrline til pseudoanonymiseringsdata. Denne røyrlinja er ein svar på begrensningar som er indusert av den generelle dataproteksjonsreglane GDPR i Europa og oppfyller sammeligheten.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പറേറ്റ് കോര്\u200dപ്പറേറ്റ് പണിയുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രക്രിയയെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അത് മോഡലിലേക്കുള്ള പ്രക്രിയയായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സംസാരത്തില്\u200d കോള്\u200dക്രട്ടറിന്റെ മൂല്യം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മൂല്യം കൊടുക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നതാണ്. ഒരു ചര്\u200dച്ച ചര്\u200dച്ച ച ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രാധാന്യമായ ഭാഗങ്ങളിലേക്ക്, വരുന്ന പ്രതിജ്ഞകളെയ ഇത്തരം കോർപ്പോർണയുടെ പണിയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങൾ ഇവിടെ വന്നിരിക്കുന്നത് വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളും ചേര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത്  ഇങ്ങനെയൊരു പൈപ്പെലൈന്\u200d ആണ് ജൂറോപ്പിലെ ജനറല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ പ്രോട്ടെക്കേഷന്\u200d നിയന്ത്രണത്തിന്റെ നിയന്ത്രണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകിയിരിക്ക', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano proces budowy korpusu korporacyjnego, który będzie wykorzystywany jako referencja do modelowania i obliczania wątków z rozmów generowanych za pomocą narzędzi komunikacji i współpracy. Ogólnym celem rekonstrukcji nici jest możliwość zapewnienia wartości koloratorowi w różnych przypadkach użytkowania, takich jak podkreślenie ważnych części bieżącej dyskusji, przegląd nadchodzących zobowiązań lub terminów itp. Ponieważ, według naszej wiedzy, nie istnieje korpus korporacyjny dla języka francuskiego, który pozwoliłby nam rozwiązać ten problem konstytucji nici, Przedstawiamy tutaj metodę budowy takich korpusów uwzględniającą różne aspekty i kroki, które pozwoliły na stworzenie rurociągu do pseudo-anonimizacji. Taki rurociąg jest odpowiedzią na ograniczenia wynikające z ogólnego rozporządzenia o ochronie danych RODO w Europie oraz przestrzegania tajemnicy korespondencji.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo proces izgradnji korporacijskog korporacija koji će biti korišteni kao reverencija za modeliranje i računalizanje praznika razgovora iz razgovora proizvođenih korištenjem alata komunikacije i saradnje. Generalni cilj rekonstrukcije trgovina je da pružimo vrijednost koleratoru u slučajevima korištenja varijskih slučajeva, kao što je uključivanje neprijateljskih dijelova trčanog diskusije, pregledavanje predstojećih obaveza ili rokova itd. Pošto, po našem znanju, nema korporacijskog korporacija korporacije za francuski jezik koji bi nam omogućio da riješimo ovu verovatnoj liniju ustava trgovina, Ovde predstavljamo amethod za izgradnju takvog tela uključujući različite aspekte i korake koje omogućavaju stvaranje cijevina pseudoanonimizovati podatke. Takva kanalizacija je odgovor na ograničenja koje je izazvala Generalna Uredba o protekciji podataka GDPR u Evropi i ispunjavanje tajne dopisnosti.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare descriem procesul de construire a unui corpus corporativ care va fi folosit ca referinţă pentru modelarea şi calcularea firelor din conversaţiile generate folosind instrumente de comunicare şi colaborare. Obiectivul general al reconstrucţiei firelor este de a oferi valoare colaboratorului în diferite cazuri de utilizare, cum ar fi highlighting părţile importante ale unei discuţii derulate, revizuirea angajamentelor sau termenelor viitoare etc. Deoarece, din câte ştim, nu există un corpus corporativ disponibil pentru limba franceză care să ne permită să abordăm această problemă de constituire a firelor, Vă prezentăm aici un mod pentru construirea unor astfel de corporaţii incluzând diferite aspecte şi paşi care au permis crearea unei conducte de pseudo-anonimizare. O astfel de conductă reprezintă un răspuns la constrângerile induse de Regulamentul general privind protecţia datelor GDPR în Europa şi la respectarea secretului corespondenţei.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි විස්තර කරනවා කොමුනිකේෂණය සහ සමාගම් උපකරණය සඳහා නිර්මාණය කරපු වාර්තාවක් නිර්මාණය කරපු ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාවක් නිර්මාණය කරපු  The overall object of the re-Strructction of threads is to beable to grant VAR-ious use cases, as hilighting the impor-quant Parts of a runner talk, Reviingthe UpComing commitment or deadlines, etc. If, to our Knowness, there is no avail-ble Cororate Corpus for the French language uage that could let us address this challenge-lemof thread constitution, අපි මෙතන පිළිගන්නවා වගේ කොර්පෝරා නිර්මාණය කරනවා වෙනස් පැත්තුවක් සහ පැත්තුවක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ඒකෙන් පායිප්ලින්  මෙච්චර පායිප්ලින් එකක් තමයි යුරෝපයේ සාමාන්\u200dය දත්ත ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක නියෝජිත GDPR වල ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200d', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi processen att bygga upp en företagskorpus som ska användas som referens för modellering och beräkning av trådar från konversationer genererade med hjälp av kommunikations- och samarbetsverktyg. Det övergripande målet med rekonstruktionen av trådar är att kunna ge kollektorn värde i olika användningsfall, såsom att highlighta de viktigaste delarna av en pågående diskussion, se över kommande åtaganden eller tidsfrister osv. Eftersom vi vet att det inte finns någon tillgänglig företagskorps för det franska språket som skulle kunna göra det möjligt för oss att ta itu med detta problem med trådkonstitutionen, Vi presenterar här en metod för att bygga sådana korpora inklusive olika aspekter och steg som möjliggjorde skapandet av en pipeline till pseudo-anonymiserad seda. En sådan pipeline är ett svar på de begränsningar som följer av den allmänna dataskyddsförordningen GDPR i Europa och efterlevnaden av sekretessen för korrespondens.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa baaritaanka dhisidda shirkad, kaas oo loo isticmaali karo qalabka sameynta sameynta iyo xisaabinta qoraalka sameynta iyo isticmaalka qalabka shaqada. Ujeedada kooxaha la soo dhisayo waa in aad qiimo u siiso qofka iskuulka ah oo ay ku isticmaali lahaayeen xaaladaha kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan in la fududeeyo qaybaha ka baahan sheekeysiga, ka fiirinayo ballanqaadka soo socda ama waqtiyada soo socda, tusaale ahaan aqoontayada, ma jirto shirkad wax faa'iido leh ee afka Faraansiinta, taas oo inagu ogolaan karta in aynu kala sheekeysan karno qeybta ka mid ah qoraalka saddexaad ee katibada, Halkan waxaynu ku qornaa dhisidda shirkadaha oo kale, taasoo ku jirta dhinacyo kala duduwan iyo tallaabooyin, taasoo u fasaxay abuurista baabuur oo la sameynayo pseudo-anomisedata. Kaas oo kale waa jawaab ka soo jeeda qasabkaas uu soo saaray qoraalka GDPR ee Yurub ka soo baxay ee qarsoodiga warqadaha.", 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஒரு நிறுவனத்தை உருவாக்கும் செயலை விவரிக்கிறோம். அது மாதிரிக்க மற்றும் மாதிரிக்கும் மற்றும் மூன்று பேச்சுகளை கணக்கிடும் மூ மொத்த நூலங்களை மீண்டும் உருவாக்குவதற்கு மதிப்பை வழங்குவதற்காக இருக்கும் முழுமையாக இருக்கும், இது போன்ற இயங்கும் விவாதத்தின் முக்கியமான பகுதிகளை உயர்த்தி, வரும் வாக்குறுதிகள் அல்லது காலத்திற்கு முன்னோக்கும் நி இந்த நிறுவனத்தை உருவாக்குவதற்கு நாங்கள் இங்கே குறிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளோம் பல்வேறு விஷயங்கள் மற்றும் படிகள் உள்ளன. இது ஒரு பைப்பிளின் உர இவ்வாறு ஒரு குறிக்கோள் என்பது ஐரோப்பில் உள்ள பொது தரவு தொழில்நுட்ப விதிமுறைகள் தொடங்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் செய்திகளின் இரகசியத்திற்க', 'ur': 'ہم نے اس کاغذ میں ایک کمپیٹریس کورپوس بنانے کی پروسس کی تعریف کی ہے جو مدل اور کمپیٹرینگ کے استعمال کے لئے استعمال کیا جائے گا۔ تیریڈ کی اصلاح کا مقصد یہ ہے کہ ہم جانتے ہیں کہ فرانسوی زبان کے لئے کوئی فائدہ اٹھانے والی شرکت کورپوس نہیں ہے جو ہمیں اس تیریڈ قانون کے معاملہ میں اجازت دے سکتا ہے۔ ہم یہاں ایسی کوپرا بنانے کے لئے پیش کیے گئے ہیں جن میں مختلف اندازے اور نقطے شامل ہوتے ہیں جو ایک پائپ لین کی پیدائش کی اجازت دے رہے ہیں یہ پائپ لین یورپ میں جرائل ڈاٹ پروٹیکशन قانون GDPR کے ذریعے پیدا ہونے والی محدودیتوں کے جواب دیتا ہے', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả quy trình xây dựng một tập đoàn mà sẽ được dùng làm liên hoàn cho việc mô hình và tính toán từ các cuộc đối thoại từ các công cụ liên hiệp và phối hợp. Mục tiêu chung của việc phục hồi các mối là có thể cung cấp giá trị cho cuộc hẹn trong nhiều trường hợp có ích, như việc tăng cường các phần quan trọng của một cuộc thảo luận đang chạy, xem xét những cam kết sắp tới hay các hạn chót, v.v. vì, theo chúng tôi biết, không có tập đoàn hữu dụng cho ngôn ngữ Pháp mà có thể cho phép chúng tôi giải quyết vấn đề này trong hiến pháp sợi. Chúng tôi giới thiệu ở đây có những phương pháp xây dựng thế giới như vậy bao gồm các khía cạnh và bước tiến khác nhau cho phép thiết lập đường ống dẫn đến giả danh. Một đường ống như vậy là phản ứng với yêu cầu do Bộ tư lệnh bảo vệ dữ liệu chung tại GDR ở Châu Âu và sự tuân thủ bí mật của thư từ.', 'uz': "In this paper we describe the process of build-ing a corporate corpus that will be used as a ref-erence for modelling and computing threadsfrom conversations generated using commu-nication and collaboration tools.  Uchrashuvning umumiy maqsadi cheksiz foydalanuvchi holatlariga qiymatni qo'shish mumkin, masalan, ishlayotgan disk qismlarni ko'rib chiqarish, keladigan vazifalarni ko'rib chiqarish va davomida ko'rib chiqarish mumkin. Chunki bizning bilganimizda, Fransuzcha tillariga foydali kompaniya yordam bo'lmagan, bu uchinchi tizimning tashkilotlarini boshqarish mumkin, Biz bu yerda shunday kompaniya yaratish uchun boshqa shakllar va qatlamlar bor. Pipelining yaratishga ruxsat beradi. Bu yerda maʼlumotlar Protoksiya boshqaruvchisi yevropa GDPR boshqaruvchiga ishga tushirilgan tartiblarga javob beradi va xavfsizlikga qaramasdan imkoniyat qiladi.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме процеса на изграждане на корпоративен корпус, който ще бъде използван като референция за моделиране и изчисляване на нишки от разговори, генерирани с помощта на инструменти за комуникация и сътрудничество. Общата цел на реконструкцията на нишките е да се даде стойност на колетора в различни случаи на употреба, като например да се обърнат внимание на важните части от текущата дискусия, да се преразгледат предстоящите ангажименти или срокове и т.н. Представяме методика за изграждане на такива корпуси, включващ различни аспекти и стъпки, които позволяват създаването на тръбопровод за псевдо-анонимизация. Такъв тръбопровод е отговор на ограниченията, породени от Общия регламент за защита на данните в Европа и спазването на тайната на кореспонденцията.', 'nl': "In dit artikel beschrijven we het proces van het bouwen van een corporate corpus dat zal worden gebruikt als referentie voor het modelleren en berekenen van threads uit gesprekken gegenereerd met behulp van commu-nicatie- en samenwerkingstools. Het algemene doel van de reconstructie van draden is om waarde te kunnen bieden aan de collorator in verschillende gebruiksgevallen, zoals het belichten van de belangrijke onderdelen van een lopende discussie, het beoordelen van de aanstaande verplichtingen of deadlines, enz. Aangezien er voor ons geen beschikbaar corporate corpus voor de Franse taal is dat ons in staat zou kunnen stellen dit probleem van de draadsamenstelling aan te pakken, We presenteren hier een methode voor het bouwen van dergelijke corpora's met verschillende aspecten en stappen die het mogelijk maakteen pijplijn te creëren voor pseudo-anonimisering. Een dergelijke pijplijn is een antwoord op de beperkingen die voortvloeien uit de Algemene Verordening Gegevensbescherming GDPR in Europa en de naleving van het correspondentiegeheim.", 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi processen med at opbygge et virksomhedskorpus, der skal bruges som reference til modellering og beregning af tråde fra samtaler genereret ved hjælp af kommunikations- og samarbejdsværktøjer. Det overordnede mål med rekonstruktionen af tråde er at kunne give kollektoren værdi i forskellige anvendelsestilfælde, såsom at highlighte de vigtigste dele af en igangværende diskussion, gennemgå de kommende forpligtelser eller frister osv. Da vi ved, at der ikke findes nogen tilgængelig virksomhedskorpus for det franske sprog, som kunne gøre det muligt for os at tage fat på dette problem med trådforfatningen, Vi præsenterer her en metode til opbygning af sådanne korpora, herunder forskellige aspekter og trin, der gjorde det muligt at oprette en rørledning til pseudo-anonymiserede. En sådan rørledning er et svar på begrænsningerne i forbindelse med den generelle databeskyttelsesforordning GDPR i Europa og overholdelsen af korrespondancehemmeligholdelsen.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir den Prozess des Aufbaus eines Korpus, das als Referenz für die Modellierung und Berechnung von Threads aus Gesprächen verwendet wird, die mit Hilfe von Kommunikations- und Kollaborationstools generiert werden. Das übergeordnete Ziel der Rekonstruktion von Fäden besteht darin, dem Kollorator in verschiedenen Anwendungsfällen einen Mehrwert bieten zu können, wie z.B. das Aufzeigen der wichtigen Teile einer laufenden Diskussion, die Überprüfung der anstehenden Verpflichtungen oder Fristen usw. Da es unseres Wissens kein korporatives Korpus für die französische Sprache gibt, das uns ermöglichen könnte, dieses Problem der Fadenkonstruktion anzugehen, Wir präsentieren hier eine Methode zum Aufbau solcher Korpora, die verschiedene Aspekte und Schritte einschließt, die die Schaffung einer Pipeline zur Pseudo-Anonymisierung ermöglichten. Eine solche Pipeline ist eine Antwort auf die Einschränkungen, die durch die Datenschutz-Grundverordnung DSGVO in Europa und die Einhaltung des Korrespondenzgeheimnisses verursacht werden.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menggambarkan proses pembangunan korpus perusahaan yang akan digunakan sebagai referensi untuk model dan komputer benang dari konversasi yang dihasilkan menggunakan alat komunikasi dan kollaborasi. Tujuan keseluruhan dari rekonstruksi benang adalah untuk menyediakan nilai bagi kolorator dalam kasus penggunaan yang berbeda, seperti pencahayaan bagian-bagian yang penting dari diskusi yang sedang berlari, meninjau komitmen atau batas waktu yang akan datang, dll. Karena, menurut pengetahuan kita, tidak ada korpus perusahaan yang berguna untuk bahasa Perancis yang bisa memungkinkan kita untuk mengatasi masalah konstitusi benang ini, Kami mempersembahkan di sini metode untuk membangun korpra seperti ini termasuk aspek dan langkah yang berbeda yang memungkinkan pembuatan pipa untuk pseudo-anonymisedata. Pipeline seperti ini adalah respon terhadap keterangan-keterangan yang disebabkan oleh Peraturan Perlindungan Data Umum GDPR di Eropa dan persetujuan untuk rahasia korespondensi.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 기업 자료 라이브러리를 구축하는 과정을 묘사했다. 이 자료 라이브러리는 참고로 통신과 협업 도구를 사용하여 생성된 대화에서 모델링과 계산 라인을 만드는 데 사용될 것이다.스레드 재건의 총체적 목표는 서로 다른 용례에서 협업자에게 가치를 제공하는 것이다. 예를 들어 진행 중인 토론의 중요한 부분을 돋보이게 하고 다가오는 약속이나 마감일을 되돌아보는 것이다. 왜냐하면 우리가 아는 바에 의하면 스레드로 구성된 이 문제를 해결할 수 있는 프랑스어 회사 어료 라이브러리가 없기 때문이다.우리는 위조 익명 데이터 파이프를 만들 수 있는 다양한 측면과 절차를 포함하여 이러한 자료 라이브러리를 구축하는 방법을 소개했다.이러한 파이프라인은 GDPR 및 유럽 공통 데이터 보호 규정 및 통신 기밀 유지 요구 사항에 대한 대응입니다.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili tunaelezea mchakato wa kutengeneza makampuni ambayo utatumiwa kama mkutano wa mpya kwa ajili ya kutengeneza mijadala na kuhesabu mitatu ya mazungumzo yaliyotengenezwa kwa kutumia zana za usambazaji na ushirikiano wa jamii. Lengo la jumla la la kujenga mistari ni kuwapa thamani kwa mkusanyiko katika kesi zilizo na matumizi mengi, kama vile kuonyesha sehemu muhimu ya mjadala unaoendelea, kuangalia makubaliano yanayofuata au miadi ya vifo vyetu, kadhalika, kwa ufahamu wetu, hakuna makampuni yanayofaa kwa lugha ya Kifaransa ambayo inaweza kuturuhusu kuzungumzia mkataba huu wa katiba tatu, Kwa sasa tunajipatia hapa kwa ajili ya kujenga kampuni hiyo ikiwa ni pamoja na mambo tofauti na hatua ambazo ziliruhusu kutengeneza pipeline kwa ajili ya kuingia piudo-anomisedata. Pili hiyo ni majibu ya vikwazo vinavyoanzishwa na Utawala wa Utawala wa Data Pro-Teknolojia nchini Ulaya na kuibaliana na siri ya mawasiliano.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz komenikasiýa we işbirliği aletleri ulanan sohbetlerden çykyş we hesaplamak üçin ullanýan korporaty guralýan prosesini tassyklaýarys. Işdeleriň täzeden in şa etmek maksady bolsa, sözleşigiň wajyp davalarynda, edil soňky zadyny ýa-da soňky wagtlary barlamak bolýar. Bilýänimize görä Fransuz dilinde hiç hili korporaty ulanyp biljek däldir. Bu çykyş kanunasy çykyp çykyp bilmegimize mümkin edip biler. Biz bu ýerde "corpora" üýtgetmek üçin beýleki aspektler we adımlar inşa etmek üçin bu ýerde bir pipeliniň pseudo-anonymizasynyň döredilmesine rugsat berdik. Bu pipet Ewropadaky Umumy Maglumat Pro-tektizme regulasy GDPR tarapyndan gelen çykyşlara jogap berýär.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما فرایند ساختن یک شرکت شرکتی را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که به عنوان تغییر تغییر برای مدل کردن و محاسبات درباره\u200cی مکالمات تولید شده با ابزارهای کمون\u200cنیکاسی و همکاری استفاده می\u200cشود. هدف عمومی از بازسازی نقطه\u200cها این است که ارزش را برای همکاران در مورد استفاده\u200cهای مختلف، مثل تغییر دادن قسمت\u200cهای ناپسندیده\u200cای از یک بحث اجتناب می\u200cکند، تحقیق پیمان\u200cهای پیشینیان یا مدت\u200cهای دیگر، و غیر از این است. از آنجا که، به دانش ما، شرکتی که برای زبان فرانسوی قابل استفاده\u200cای نیست، برای ما اجازه می\u200cدهد که این قسمت\u200cهای احتمال قانونی\u200c ما در اینجا به عنوان ساختن چنین شرکت به عنوان نقطه\u200cهای متفاوتی و قدم\u200cهایی نشان می\u200cدهیم که اجازه می\u200cدهد ایجاد خط لوله به داده\u200cهای pseudo-anonymize. این لوله پاسخ بر محدودیت\u200cهایی است که توسط قانون تحقیق داده\u200cهای عمومی GDPR در اروپا توسط قانون تحقیق داده\u200cهای اروپا می\u200cشود و اتفاق مخفی پیوند است.', 'sq': "Në këtë letër ne përshkruajmë procesin e ndërtimit të një korpuse korporatore që do të përdoret si një referencë për modelimin dhe llogaritjen e threads nga bisedimet e gjeneruara duke përdorur mjete komunikimi dhe bashkëpunimi. Qëllimi i përgjithshëm i rindërtimit të fijeve është të jetë i mundur t'i japë vlerë koleratorit në raste të ndryshme përdorimi, të tilla si nxitja e pjesëve të rëndësishme të një diskutimi në vazhdim, shqyrtimi i angazhimeve apo afateve të ardhshme, etj. Meqë, sipas dijes sonë, nuk ka korpus korporator të dobishëm për gjuhën franceze që mund të na lejojë të trajtojmë këtë prob lem të kushtetutës së fijeve, Këtu prezantojmë një metodë për ndërtimin e korprave të tilla duke përfshirë aspekte dhe hapa të ndryshme që lejuan krijimin e tubacionit për pseudo-anonimisedata. Such a pipeline is a response to theconstraints induced by the General Data Pro-tection Regulation GDPR in Europe and thecompliance to the secrecy of correspondence.", 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም የኮርፖሬት ኮርፖርት መሥራት የሚደረገውን የኮርፖሬት ኮርፓስ ማነሳትን እና የኮምፒዩተር ማነሳያ እና የኮምፒዩተር ማነሳሰብ የተደረገውን የድምፅ ውይይት እና የኮምፒዩተር መሣሪያን በመጠቀም የሚጠቀሙትን የድምፅ ውይይይት እና ትክ የድምፅ አካባቢ ጉዳይ፣ እንደነዚህ የውይይት ውይይት የሚደረገውን ውይይት፣ የመጨረሻውን መቀናቀል ወይም የጊዜውን መቆጣጠር፣ የፍሪሳውያን ቋንቋ የሚጠቅመው የኮርፖርቲካ ኮርፖስቲካ የፍሪካ ቋንቋ ማድረግ አይችልም፡፡ እንደነዚህ ኮርፖርት ለመሥራት እና የተለየ ደረጃዎች እና እርምጃዎችን ለመፍጠር ይቻላል፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉ ጥያቄ የዳታ ፕሮጀክት ፕሮጀክት ሥርዓት በዩሮፓ ውስጥ የGDPR ጥያቄዎችን ለመቀበል እና የደብዳቤውን ስብሰባ ለመጠበቅ ነው፡፡', 'af': "In hierdie papier beskrywe ons die proses van bou van 'n korporasie korporasie wat sal gebruik word as 'n herverwerking vir modellering en berekening draaghoute van gespreksies wat genereer word deur kommunikasie en samarbeid nutsprogramme. Die oorspronklike doel van die herkonstruksie van gedragte is om waarde te verskaf aan die kolorator in var-ious gebruik gevalle, soos die onverwagte dele van 'n loopende diskusie, die opkomstige verpligtighede of deadline, etc. Omdat, tot ons kennis, daar is geen beskikbaar korporasie vir die Franse taal wat ons kan toelaat om hierdie probleem-lemme van gedragte konstitusie te adres nie, Ons het hier opgestel om sodanige korpora te bou met verskillende aspekte en stappe wat die skepping van 'n pipelyn toegelaat het om pseudo-anonymiseerdata te bou. So 'n pipeline is 'n antwoord op die beheininge wat deur die Algemene Data Pro-Tekening-Regel GDPR in Europa aangedoen is en die ooreenkomstigheid tot die geheim van ooreenkomstigheid.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি কর্পোরেট কোর্পাস তৈরি করার প্রক্রিয়া বর্ণনা করি যা মডেলিং এবং ত্রিডফ্রোমের কথোপকথন হিসেবে ব্যবহার করা হবে যা কমু নিক্ষেপ এবং সহযোগিতা ট The overallgoal of the reconstruction of threads is to beable to provide value to the collorator in var-ious use cases, such as higlighting the impor-tant parts of a running discussion, reviewingthe upcoming commitments or deadlines, etc. Since, to our knowledge, there is no avail-able corporate corpus for the French languagewhich could allow us to address this prob-lem of thread constitution, আমরা এখানে উপস্থিত হলাম এই ধরনের কোর্পোরা তৈরি করার জন্য যার মধ্যে রয়েছে বিভিন্ন দিক এবং পদক্ষেপ যার মধ্যে একটি পাইপেলাইন তৈরি করা হয়েছে প ইউরোপের জেনারেল ডাটা প্রযুক্তি নিয়ন্ত্রণ জিডিপিআর-এর প্রতিক্রিয়া এবং সংবাদপত্রের গোপনীয় গোপনীয়তার প্রতি সমর্থন করে।', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo proces izgradnji korporacijskog korporacija koji će biti korišteni kao refinans za modeliranje i računovođenje praznika razgovora iz razgovora proizvođenih korištenjem alata komunikacije i suradnje. Općeniti cilj rekonstrukcije trgovina je pružiti vrijednost koleneratoru u varioznim slučajevima korištenja, kao što bi nam omogućilo rješavanje ovog vjerojatnog prob lem a ustava trgovina, pregledavanje predstojećih obaveza ili rokova itd. Predstavljamo ovdje amethod za izgradnju takvog tijela uključujući različite aspekte i korake koje omogućavaju stvaranje cijevina pseudoanonimizirati podatke. Takva cijevina je odgovor na ograničenja uzrokovane općem Uredbom o proturjeđivanju podataka GDPR-a u Europi i ispunjavanje tajnosti dopisnosti.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda biz bir korpus inşaatının işlətməsi üçün modelləşdirmək və hesaplamaq üçün istifadə ediləcəyi korporatya və işbirləşdirmək vasitələrindən yaratdığı sohbətlərdən istifadə edirik. İçərilərin yenidən in şallaşdırmasının ən böyük məqsədi, hərəkət edən müzakirə və ya müddətlərə baxmayaraq, Fransız dilində heç bir korpus faydalanmayaraq faydalanır, çünki bizim biliyimizə görə Fransız dilində bu sıxıntının əlamətini çəkməyə imkan verə bilər. Biz burada bu korpora müxtəlif aspektlər və adımlar inşa etmək üçün göstərdik ki, bir bor çizgisini pseudo-anonimizovlaşdırmağa izin verir. Bütün bunlar Avropadakı General Data Pro tection Regulation GDPR ilə tətbiq edilmiş hədəqələrə cavab verir.', 'hy': 'In this paper we describe the process of build-ing a corporate corpus that will be used as a ref-erence for modelling and computing threadsfrom conversations generated using commu-nication and collaboration tools.  Գործերի վերակառուցման ընդհանուր նպատակն այն է, որ հնարավոր է արժեք տալ կոլորատորին տարբեր օգտագործման դեպքերում, ինչպիսիք են բարձրացնում ընթացքում գտնվող քննարկության կարևոր մասերը, վերանայելով գալիք պայմաններն ու ժամկետերը, և այլն, քանի որ, ըստ մեր գիտելիքների, ֆրանսիական լեզուների համար չկա օգտակար կորպորատիվ կորպորատիվ, որը կարող է մեզ Այստեղ մենք ներկայացնում ենք այսպիսի մարմնի կառուցման մեթոդը, ներառյալ տարբեր ասպեկտներ և քայլեր, որոնք թույլ տվեցին խողովակաշարի ստեղծել կեղծ անանումիսադատ: Այսպիսի խողովակաշար արձագանքն է այն սահմանափակումներին, որոնք առաջացել են Գլխավոր տվյալների պաշտպանության կանոնի ՀՆԱ-ի Եվրոպայում և համաձայնության գաղտնիքի համապատասխանությունը:', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo proces izgradnji korporacijskog korporacija koji će biti korišteni kao refinans za modeliranje i računalizanje praznika razgovora iz razgovora proizvođenih korištenjem alata komunikacije i saradnje. Generalni cilj rekonstrukcije trgovina je pružiti vrijednost koleneratoru u varijskim slučajevima korištenja, kao što bi nam omogućilo da riješimo ovu verovatnu ulogu ustava trgovine, pregledamo predstojeće obaveze ili rokove itd. Ovdje predstavljamo amethod za izgradnju takvog korpora uključujući različite aspekte i korake koje omogućavaju stvaranje cijevina pseudoanonimizovati podatke. Takva cijevina je odgovor na ograničenja uzrokovane od Uredbe o protekciji generalnih podataka GDPR u Evropi i ispunjavanje tajne dopisnosti.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme proces tvorby korporátního korpusu, který bude použit jako reference pro modelování a výpočet vláken z konverzací generovaných pomocí komunikačních a spolupráčních nástrojů. Celkovým cílem rekonstrukce nití je schopnost poskytnout hodnotu koloratorovi v různých případech použití, jako je například upozornění na důležité části běžící diskuse, přezkoumání nadcházejících závazků či termínů apod. Protože podle našeho vědomí neexistuje žádný korporátní korpus pro francouzský jazyk, který by nám mohl umožnit řešit tento problém konstituce nití, Představujeme zde postup pro budování těchto korpusů zahrnující různé aspekty a kroky, které umožnily vytvoření potrubí k pseudoanonymizaci. Takový potrubí je reakcí na omezení vyvolaná obecným nařízením o ochraně údajů GDPR v Evropě a dodržovánítajemství korespondence.', 'ca': "En aquest article descrivim el procés de construcció d'un corpus corporatiu que serà utilitzat com a referència per modelar i computar fils de converses generades usant eines de comunicació i col·laboració. L'objectiu general de la reconstrucció dels fils és poder proporcionar valor al col·lorador en diversos casos d'utilització, com el realçament de les parts importants d'una discussió en curs, la revisió dels futurs compromisos o terminis, etc. Com que, a nostre coneixement, no hi ha cap corpus corporatiu disponible per a la llengua francesa que ens podria permetre abordar aquest problema de la constitució dels fils, presentem aquí un mètode per construir aquests corporesincloent diferents aspectes i passos que van permetre crear un tub per a pseudoanònims. Aquest gasoducte és una resposta a les restriccions induïdes pel Reglement general de protecció de dades DPRG a Europa i al respecte al segret de la correspondència.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvaillaan yrityskorpuksen rakentamisprosessia, jota käytetään viitekehyksenä kommunikaatio- ja yhteistyötyökaluilla syntyneiden keskustelujen mallintamiseen ja laskentaan. Kierteiden jälleenrakentamisen yleisenä tavoitteena on antaa kollaboraattorille arvoa erilaisissa käyttötapauksissa, kuten meneillään olevan keskustelun tärkeiden osien huomioonottamisessa, tulevien sitoumusten tai määräaikojen tarkistamisessa jne. Tässä esitellään menetelmä tällaisten korpusten rakentamiseksi, joka sisältää erilaisia näkökohtia ja vaiheita, jotka mahdollistivat putkiston luomisen pseudonimettömäksi. Tällainen putkisto on vastaus yleisen tietosuoja-asetuksen (GDPR) aiheuttamiin rajoituksiin Euroopassa ja kirjeenvaihdon salassapitovelvollisuuden noudattamiseen.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldame korporatiivse korpuse loomise protsessi, mida kasutatakse viitena kommunikatsiooni ja koostöö vahenditega loodud vestluste modelleerimisel ja arvutamisel. Niitide rekonstrueerimise üldine eesmärk on anda kolloraatorile väärtust mitmesugustel kasutusjuhtudel, näiteks käimasoleva arutelu oluliste osade rõhutamine, eelseisvate kohustuste või tähtaegade läbivaatamine jne. Kuna meie teadaolevalt puudub prantsuse keele jaoks kasutatav korporatiivne korpus, mis võiks võimaldada meil käsitleda seda niitide koostamise probleemi, Esitleme siin selliste korpuste ehitamise metoodikat, mis hõlmab erinevaid aspekte ja samme, mis võimaldasid luua torujuhtme pseudoanonüümseks. Selline juhtmestik on vastus Euroopa andmekaitse üldmäärusest tulenevatele piirangutele ja kirjavahetuse saladuse järgimisele.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו מתארים את התהליך של בניית קורפוס תאגידי שימשמש כרמז לדוגמאות ולמחשב חוטים משיחות שנוצרות באמצעות כלי שיתוף פעולה. המטרה העיקרית של בניית החטים היא לספק ערך לחובר במקרים משימושים רבים, כמו להדליק את החלקים החשובים של דיון ברוץ, לבדוק את התחייבויות הקרובות או מועד המועד, וכו"כ. אנחנו מציגים כאן אמתוד לבניין גופורה כזו כולל היבטים והצעדים שונים שאפשרו ליצור צינור לסאודו-אנונימידה. Such a pipeline is a response to theconstraints induced by the General Data Pro-tection Regulation GDPR in Europe and thecompliance to the secrecy of correspondence.', 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujemo proces oblikovanja korporacijskega korpusa, ki bo uporabljen kot referenca za modeliranje in računalništvo niti iz pogovorov, ustvarjenih z orodji komunikacije in sodelovanja. Splošni cilj rekonstrukcije niti je zagotoviti vrednost koloratorju v različnih primerih uporabe, kot so osvetlitev pomembnih delov tekoče razprave, pregled prihajajočih zavez ali rokov itd. Ker po našem znanju ni na voljo nobenega korpusa za francoski jezik, ki bi nam omogočil reševanje tega problema sestave niti, Tukaj predstavljamo metodo za gradnjo takšnih korpusov, ki vključuje različne vidike in korake, ki so omogočili ustvarjanje cevovoda za psevdo-anonimno sedo. Tak plinovod je odgovor na omejitve, ki jih povzroča Splošna uredba o varstvu podatkov GDPR v Evropi, in skladnost s skrivnostjo korespondence.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྣེ་བཟོ་བརྩིས་ཀྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ལས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ལ་སྒྲིག་ཆས་པ་ཞིག་ལས་རྩིས་འཁོར་ག དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་བསྐྱར་བཟོ་བྱས་ཡོད་པའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཚོང་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ཕན་ཚུན་འབྲེལ་མེད་པའི་སྐབས་འགའ་ཞིག་དང་། We present here amethod for building such corpora including different aspects and steps which allowed thecreation of a pipeline to pseudo-anonymisedata. རྒྱུད་དུང་འདི་ནི་ཡོངས་ཁྱབ་པར་མཐུན་སྣེ་གསལ་མཁན་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་གིས་སྤྲོད་ཡོད།', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana mafariyar samun ka samun wata makampuni da za'a yi amfani da shi kamar wata ref-erence wa masu motsari da kuma ke lissafa mazaɓa na tsohon saurar da aka ƙãga ta da amfani da zanen ƙarami da shirin komu. Ganin da ake bincike na ƙidãya na hanyarwa na zama mai amfani da matsayin faransa wanda ke iya amfani da shi a cikin wasu al'ummomi masu yin amfani da shi, misãlin ya kiyaye rabon-bakin rabon magana mai tafiya, kuma suna bincike alkawarin da ke ƙara ko cire-daidai. Daga da sani, bã za a iya amfani da makampuni na lugha Faransa, wanda zai iya yarda mu yi magana da wannan rubutun katiban uku,  we present here amethod for building such corpora includingdifferent aspects and steps which allowed thecreation of a pipeline to pseudo-anonymisedata.  Wannan pipiflen ne da ake karɓa wa kanuni wanda aka ƙãga na General Data Pro-Technical Regulation GDDR a EURopa kuma suna yarda da gaibin addression.", 'jv': 'Nang pepul iki kita diowasi perusahaan nggawe kno usaha tanggal nggawe perusahaan karo nguasakno dumateng lan aturan karo perangkat nggawe nguasakno Awak dhéwé nggawe aturan nggawe petani sing beraksi kanggo ngilangno kebebasan kelas karo perusahaan winih, kaya ngono nggawe barang-rungu sing beraksi perusahaan winih, iso nglangno nglangno nggawe gerakan, winih dhéwé, iso nglangno dianggap tarjamahan karo perusahaan winih. bisa awak dhéwé, iso nglangno babagan barang-wong liyané perusahaan kanggo ngilangno Franês kuwi wis berarti sing beraksi iki luwih dumadhi Anyone Nanging awak dhéwé sistem sing arep bantayan kanggo nggawe nguasai kang Regulé Pro-Teks Algem nang Yuroti iki bakal dumadhi kanggo ngerasai kapan ingkang dipune sakjane'}
{'en': 'Toward Discourse-Aware Models for Multilingual Fake News Detection', 'fr': 'Vers des modèles sensibles au discours pour la détection des fausses nouvelles multilingues', 'pt': 'Em direção a modelos com reconhecimento de discurso para detecção multilíngue de notícias falsas', 'ar': 'نحو نماذج مدركة للخطاب للكشف عن الأخبار الوهمية متعددة اللغات', 'ja': '多言語フェイクニュース検出のためのディスコース意識モデルに向けて', 'es': 'Hacia modelos que tengan en cuenta el discurso para la detección de noticias falsas multilingües', 'zh': '迈向多言假新闻检语感模形', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी नकली समाचार का पता लगाने के लिए प्रवचन-जागरूक मॉडल की ओर', 'ga': 'I dtreo Múnlaí Feasacha Dioscúrsa le haghaidh Braite Ilteangacha Nuachta Bréige', 'ru': 'К дискурсно-ориентированным моделям для многоязычного обнаружения фейковых новостей', 'el': 'Προς τα μοντέλα που γνωρίζουν τη συζήτηση για την πολύγλωσση ανίχνευση πλαστών ειδήσεων', 'hu': 'A beszédtudatos modellek felé a többnyelvű hamis hírek felismeréséhez', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური ძალიან გახსნა მოდელების მიხედვით', 'it': 'Verso modelli consapevoli del discorso per il rilevamento multilingue di notizie false', 'ms': 'Ke arah Model Awas-Perlakangan untuk Pengesanan Berita Salah Berbahasa', 'kk': 'Көптілік жаңалықтарды табу үлгілеріне қарсы сөйлесу- аудару үлгілеріне қарсы', 'mk': 'Toward Discourse-Aware Models for Multilingual Fake News Detection', 'ml': 'മുകളിലേക്ക് ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ്- അറിയുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'lt': 'Kelių kalbų suklastotų naujienų aptikimo diskurso supratimo modelių link', 'pl': 'W kierunku modeli świadomych dyskusji dla wielojęzycznego wykrywania fałszywych wiadomości', 'ro': 'Către modele conștiente de discurs pentru detectarea știrilor false multilingve', 'mt': "Lejn Mudelli ta' Konxjenza dwar id-Diskors għal Sejbien ta' Aħbarijiet Falsi Multilingwi", 'no': 'Gå mot diskurs-vekk-modeller for fleirspråk falske informasjon', 'mn': 'Олон хэлний хуурамч мэдээллийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийн тухай ярилцлага-мэдээллийн загвар руу', 'sr': 'Prema modelima otkrivanja multijezičkih lažnih vijesti', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාවික බොරු වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න විශ්වාස-අනතුරු මොඩේල්ස්', 'sv': 'Mot diskursmedvetna modeller för flerspråkig detektering av falska nyheter', 'so': 'Toward Discourse-aware Models for Finnish News of Fake in badan', 'ur': 'Multilingual Fake News Detection کے لئے Discourse-Aware Models کی طرف', 'ta': 'பல்மொழி பொய் செய்திகளை கண்டுபிடி', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ tháo chạy kênh phát hiện tin giả đa ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Към модели, осъзнаващи дискурса, за откриване на многоезични фалшиви новини', 'da': 'På vej mod diskursbevidste modeller til flersprogede falske nyheder detektering', 'hr': 'Prema modelima otkrivanja multijezičkih lažnih vijesti', 'id': 'Towards Discourse-Aware Models for Multilingual Fake News Detection', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu diskursbewussten Modellen für mehrsprachige Fake News Detection', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Kufahamika kwa ajili ya Kugundua Habari za Udanganyiko wa lugha nyingi', 'nl': 'Naar discourse-aware modellen voor meertalige vals nieuws detectie', 'ko': '다국어 허위 뉴스 검측을 위한 언어 감지 모델', 'tr': 'Çoklu dilli ýalňyş Haýry Aňlamak üçin Gürüş-duýdurma Modelleri', 'af': 'Gaan na Discourse-Aware Models vir Multilingual Fake News Detection', 'fa': 'به سمت مدل\u200cهای آگاهی سخنرانی برای شناسایی اخبار خیلی زبان\u200cها', 'sq': 'Në drejtim të modeleve për zbulimin e lajmeve të rreme me shumëgjuhë', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Prema modelima otkrivanja multijezičkih lažnih vijesti', 'bn': 'বহুভাষী ফ্যাক সংবাদ সনাক্তের জন্য উপরের ডিসার্স- সচেতন মডেল', 'ca': 'A Models de Discurse Aware per la Detecció de Noticies Falses Multilingües', 'cs': 'Směrem k diskurzním modelům pro vícejazyčné detekci falešných zpráv', 'et': 'Diskursusteadlike mudelite suunas mitmekeelsete võltsitud uudiste tuvastamiseks', 'hy': 'Դա բազմալեզու կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերման մոդելներ է,', 'az': 'Çoxlu dil sahtekar xəbərləri keşfetməsi üçün Discourse-Aware Modellərinə', 'fi': 'Kohti diskurssitietoisia malleja monikielisten väärien uutisten havaitsemiseksi', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': "Mawat 'Diskurse-Awave model' kanggo Ketoken Multilanggar Fake Haji", 'sk': 'Proti modelom, ki se ozaveščajo o diskurzu, za večjezično odkrivanje ponarejenih novic', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ཆེ་བ་མཚོན་པའི་བརྡ་སྟོན་བཤེར་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་', 'he': 'Toward Discourse-Aware Models for Multilingual Fake News Detection'}
{'en': 'Statements that are intentionally misstated (or manipulated) are of considerable interest to researchers, government, security, and financial systems. According to deception literature, there are reliable cues for detecting deception and the belief that liars give off cues that may indicate their deception is near-universal. Therefore, given that deceiving actions require advanced cognitive development that honesty simply does not require, as well as people’s cognitive mechanisms have promising guidance for deception detection, in this Ph.D. ongoing research, we propose to examine discourse structure patterns in multilingual deceptive news corpora using the Rhetorical Structure Theory framework. Considering that our work is the first to exploit multilingual discourse-aware strategies for fake news detection, the research community currently lacks multilingual deceptive annotated corpora. Accordingly, this paper describes the current progress in this thesis, including (i) the construction of the first multilingual deceptive corpus, which was annotated by specialists according to the Rhetorical Structure Theory framework, and (ii) the introduction of two new proposed rhetorical relations : INTERJECTION and IMPERATIVE, which we assume to be relevant for the fake news detection task.', 'es': 'Las declaraciones mal formuladas (o manipuladas) intencionalmente son de considerable interés para los investigadores, el gobierno, la seguridad y los sistemas financieros. Según la literatura sobre el engaño, existen señales confiables para detectar el engaño y la creencia de que los mentirosos emiten señales que pueden indicar que su engaño es casi universal. Por lo tanto, dado que las acciones engañosas requieren un desarrollo cognitivo avanzado que la honestidad simplemente no requiere, y que los mecanismos cognitivos de las personas tienen una orientación prometedora para la detección del engaño, en esta investigación en curso de doctorado, proponemos examinar los patrones de estructura del discurso en multilingüe cuerpos de noticias engañosos que utilizan el marco de la teoría de la estructura retórica. Teniendo en cuenta que nuestro trabajo es el primero en explotar estrategias multilingües conscientes del discurso para la detección de noticias falsas, la comunidad investigadora actualmente carece de corpus multilingües con anotaciones engañosas. En consecuencia, este artículo describe el progreso actual de esta tesis, incluyendo (i) la construcción del primer corpus engañoso multilingüe, que fue anotado por especialistas de acuerdo con el marco de la Teoría de la Estructura Retórica, y (ii) la introducción de dos nuevas relaciones retóricas propuestas: INTERJECTION e IMPERATIVE, que suponemos que son relevantes para la tarea de detección de noticias falsas.', 'ar': 'البيانات التي يتم تحريفها عمدًا (أو التلاعب بها) ذات أهمية كبيرة للباحثين والحكومة والأمن والأنظمة المالية. وفقًا لأدبيات الخداع ، هناك إشارات موثوقة للكشف عن الخداع والاعتقاد بأن الكاذبين يبعثون بإشارات قد تشير إلى خداعهم شبه الشامل. لذلك ، نظرًا لأن أعمال الخداع تتطلب تطويرًا إدراكيًا متقدمًا لا تتطلبه الصدق ببساطة ، كما أن الآليات المعرفية للناس لديها إرشادات واعدة للكشف عن الخداع ، في هذه الدكتوراه. البحث المستمر ، نقترح فحص أنماط بنية الخطاب في مجموعات الأخبار الخادعة متعددة اللغات باستخدام إطار نظرية البنية البلاغية. بالنظر إلى أن عملنا هو أول من يستغل استراتيجيات الوعي بالخطاب متعدد اللغات للكشف عن الأخبار المزيفة ، فإن مجتمع البحث يفتقر حاليًا إلى مجموعات توضيحية مضللة متعددة اللغات. وفقًا لذلك ، تصف هذه الورقة التقدم الحالي في هذه الأطروحة ، بما في ذلك (1) بناء أول مجموعة مخادعة متعددة اللغات ، والتي تم شرحها من قبل المتخصصين وفقًا لإطار نظرية البنية البلاغية ، و (2) إدخال علاقتين بلاغيتين جديدتين مقترحتين : InterJECTION و IMPERATIVE ، والتي نفترض أنها ذات صلة بمهمة الكشف عن الأخبار المزيفة.', 'pt': 'Declarações que são intencionalmente distorcidas (ou manipuladas) são de considerável interesse para pesquisadores, governo, segurança e sistemas financeiros. De acordo com a literatura sobre o engano, existem pistas confiáveis para detectar o engano e a crença de que os mentirosos emitem pistas que podem indicar que seu engano é quase universal. Portanto, dado que as ações enganosas requerem um desenvolvimento cognitivo avançado que a honestidade simplesmente não requer, assim como os mecanismos cognitivos das pessoas têm orientações promissoras para a detecção de enganos, neste Ph.D. pesquisa em andamento, propomos examinar os padrões de estrutura do discurso em corpora de notícias enganosas multilíngues usando a estrutura da Teoria da Estrutura Retórica. Considerando que nosso trabalho é o primeiro a explorar estratégias multilíngues de reconhecimento de discurso para detecção de notícias falsas, a comunidade de pesquisa atualmente carece de corpora anotados enganosos multilíngues. Nesse sentido, este artigo descreve o progresso atual desta tese, incluindo (i) a construção do primeiro corpus enganoso multilíngue, que foi anotado por especialistas de acordo com a estrutura da Teoria da Estrutura Retórica, e (ii) a introdução de duas novas relações retóricas propostas : INTERJEÇÃO e IMPERATIVO, que assumimos serem relevantes para a tarefa de detecção de notícias falsas.', 'fr': "Les déclarations délibérément erronées (ou manipulées) présentent un intérêt considérable pour les chercheurs, le gouvernement, la sécurité et les systèmes financiers. Selon la littérature sur la tromperie, il existe des indices fiables pour détecter la tromperie et la croyance que les menteurs émettent des indices qui peuvent indiquer leur tromperie est presque universelle. Par conséquent, étant donné que les actions trompeuses nécessitent un développement cognitif avancé que l'honnêteté n'exige tout simplement pas, et que les mécanismes cognitifs des personnes ont des orientations prometteuses pour la détection de la tromperie, dans cette recherche en cours de doctorat, nous proposons d'examiner les modèles de structure du discours dans des corpus de nouvelles trompeuses utilisant le framework Rhetorical Structure Theory. Étant donné que notre travail est le premier à exploiter des stratégies multilingues tenant compte du discours pour la détection des fausses nouvelles, la communauté de recherche manque actuellement de corpus annotés trompeurs multilingues. En conséquence, cet article décrit les progrès actuels de cette thèse, y compris (i) la construction du premier corpus trompeur multilingue, qui a été annoté par des spécialistes selon le cadre de la théorie de la structure rhétorique, et (ii) l'introduction de deux nouvelles relations rhétoriques proposées\xa0: INTERJECTION et IMPÉRATIF, que nous supposons pertinents pour la tâche de détection des fausses nouvelles.", 'zh': '故谬陈(操纵)其陈于治人、政府、安危、金融系统甚欢。 以欺文献,有可检之可检,而信说谎者之可明其欺几遍也。 故鉴欺行须信本不须高识,及人知机有冀于欺检,在博士方究,臣等议用修辞理框架以究多言欺骗性新闻语料库语结构模式。 念臣等首用多语言意识之策假新闻检测之事,究界目前阙多语言欺骗性注语料库。 故本文述本论文之进,(i)构首多言欺骗性语料库,专家据修辞理框架注,及(ii)引入两新拟议修辞:INTERJECTION、IMPERATIVE,假与假新闻检。', 'ga': "Is díol spéise do thaighdeoirí, don rialtas, do shlándáil agus do chórais airgeadais ráitis atá míshonraithe d'aon ghnó (nó a láimhseáiltear). De réir na litríochta ar mheabhlaireacht, tá leideanna iontaofa ann chun an mheabhlaireacht a bhrath agus is beagnach uile-uilíoch é an tuairim go dtugann liars leideanna a d'fhéadfadh a mheabhlaireacht a léiriú. Dá bhrí sin, ós rud é go n-éilíonn gníomhartha meabhlaireachta forbairt chognaíoch chun cinn nach bhfuil ag teastáil ó macántacht, chomh maith le meicníochtaí cognaíocha daoine a bhfuil treoir dhúshlánach maidir le mealladh a bhrath, sa Ph.D. taighde leanúnach, tá sé beartaithe againn scrúdú a dhéanamh ar phatrúin struchtúir dioscúrsa i gcorpora nuachta mealltach ilteangach ag baint úsáide as an gcreat Teoirice Struchtúr Reitriciúil. Ag cur san áireamh gurb é ár gcuid oibre an chéad cheann a bhain leas as straitéisí ilteangacha feasach ar dhioscúrsa chun nuacht bhréige a bhrath, níl corpóra ilteangach anótáilte mealltach ag an bpobal taighde faoi láthair. Dá réir sin, déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an dul chun cinn reatha sa tráchtas seo, lena n-áirítear (i) tógáil an chéad chorpais mheabhlaireachta ilteangach, a bhí anótáilte ag speisialtóirí de réir chreat Teoirice an Struchtúr Reitriciúil, agus (ii) tabhairt isteach dhá chaidreamh reitriciúil molta nua. : INTERJECTION and IMPERATIVE, a measaimid a bheith ábhartha don tasc braite nuachta bréige.", 'ja': '意図的に誤って記載されている（または操作されている）記述は、研究者、政府、セキュリティ、および金融システムにかなりの関心を寄せています。 欺瞞文献によれば、欺瞞を検出するための信頼できる手がかりがあり、嘘つきが欺瞞を示す可能性のある手がかりを発信するという信念はほぼ普遍的である。 したがって、欺瞞行為には誠実さを必要としない高度な認知発達が必要であり、人々の認知メカニズムには欺瞞検出の有望なガイダンスがあることを考慮して、本Ph.D.の継続的な研究では、修辞構造理論の枠組みを使用して、多言語欺瞞ニュース団体における言説構造パターンを検討することを提案する。 私たちの研究は、フェイクニュース検出のための多言語を意識した戦略を利用した最初のものであることを考慮すると、研究コミュニティは現在、多言語の誤解を招く注釈付きのコーパスを欠いています。 したがって、本稿では、(i)修辞構造理論の枠組みに従って専門家によって注釈された最初の多言語欺瞞的コーパスの構築、(ii)フェイクニュース検出タスクに関連すると仮定した2つの新たな修辞関係の導入、すなわちインターセプトと必須性について述べる。', 'ru': 'Заявления, которые намеренно искажаются (или манипулируются), представляют значительный интерес для исследователей, правительства, безопасности и финансовых систем. Согласно литературе обмана, существуют надежные сигналы для обнаружения обмана и вера в то, что лжецы дают сигналы, которые могут указывать на то, что их обман почти универсален. Поэтому, учитывая, что обманчивые действия требуют продвинутого когнитивного развития, которого честность просто не требует, а также то, что когнитивные механизмы людей имеют многообещающие ориентиры для обнаружения обмана, в этом текущем исследовании Ph.D., мы предлагаем изучить модели структуры дискурса в многоязычных обманчивых новостных корпусах, используя теорию риторической структуры. Учитывая, что наша работа является первой, использующей многоязычные стратегии для обнаружения фейковых новостей, научное сообщество в настоящее время не имеет многоязычных обманчивых аннотированных тел. Соответственно, в настоящей работе описывается текущий прогресс в этом тезисе, включая (i) построение первого многоязычного обманчивого корпуса, который был аннотирован специалистами в соответствии с теорией риторической структуры, и (ii) введение двух новых предложенных риторических отношений: междометия и ИМПЕРАТИВ, которые, как мы полагаем, имеют отношение к задаче обнаружения фейковых новостей.', 'hi': 'बयान जो जानबूझकर गलत तरीके से (या हेरफेर) किए जाते हैं, शोधकर्ताओं, सरकार, सुरक्षा और वित्तीय प्रणालियों के लिए काफी रुचि रखते हैं। धोखे के साहित्य के अनुसार, धोखे का पता लगाने के लिए विश्वसनीय संकेत हैं और यह विश्वास है कि झूठे ऐसे संकेत देते हैं जो संकेत दे सकते हैं कि उनका धोखा निकट-सार्वभौमिक है। इसलिए, यह देखते हुए कि धोखा देने वाले कार्यों को उन्नत संज्ञानात्मक विकास की आवश्यकता होती है, जिसकी ईमानदारी को बस आवश्यकता नहीं होती है, साथ ही साथ लोगों के संज्ञानात्मक तंत्र में धोखे का पता लगाने के लिए आशाजनक मार्गदर्शन होता है, इस पीएचडी चल रहे शोध में, हम अलंकारिक संरचना सिद्धांत ढांचे का उपयोग करके बहुभाषी भ्रामक समाचार निगम में प्रवचन संरचना पैटर्न की जांच करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। यह देखते हुए कि हमारा काम नकली समाचार का पता लगाने के लिए बहुभाषी प्रवचन-जागरूक रणनीतियों का शोषण करने वाला पहला काम है, अनुसंधान समुदाय में वर्तमान में बहुभाषी भ्रामक एनोटेटेड कॉर्पोरेट का अभाव है। तदनुसार, यह पेपर इस थीसिस में वर्तमान प्रगति का वर्णन करता है, जिसमें (i) पहले बहुभाषी भ्रामक कॉर्पस का निर्माण शामिल है, जिसे अलंकारिक संरचना सिद्धांत ढांचे के अनुसार विशेषज्ञों द्वारा एनोटेट किया गया था, और (ii) दो नए प्रस्तावित बयानबाजी संबंधों की शुरूआत: INTERJECTION और IMPERATIVE, जिसे हम नकली समाचार का पता लगाने के कार्य के लिए प्रासंगिक मानते हैं।', 'hu': 'Azok a kijelentések, amelyek szándékosan rosszul állítottak (vagy manipuláltak) jelentős érdeklődést jelentenek a kutatók, a kormány, a biztonság és a pénzügyi rendszerek számára. A megtévesztési irodalom szerint megbízható jelek vannak a megtévesztés észlelésére, és a meggyőződés, hogy a hazugok olyan jeleket adnak, amelyek arra utalnak, hogy megtévesztésük majdnem univerzális. Ezért mivel a megtévesztő tevékenységek olyan fejlett kognitív fejlődést igényelnek, amelyet az őszinteség egyszerűen nem igényel, valamint az emberek kognitív mechanizmusai ígéretes iránymutatással rendelkeznek a megtévesztés felismeréséhez, ebben a PhD-ben folyamatban lévő kutatásban azt javasoljuk, hogy a többnyelvű megtévesztő hírcsoportok diskurzusszerkezetének mintázatait vizsgáljuk a retorikai struktúra elméleti keretrendszer segítségével. Tekintettel arra, hogy munkánk elsőként használja ki a többnyelvű diskurzus-tudatos stratégiákat a hamis hírek felismerésére, a kutatóközösség jelenleg hiányzik a többnyelvű megtévesztő jegyzetelt corpora. Ennek megfelelően a tanulmány bemutatja a dolgozat jelenlegi előrehaladását, beleértve (i) az első többnyelvű megtévesztő korpusz felépítését, amelyet szakemberek jegyzeteltek meg a Rhetorical Structure Theory keretrendszer szerint, és (ii) két új javasolt retorikai kapcsolat bevezetését: INTERJECTION és IMPERATIVE, amelyek feltételezésünk szerint relevánsnak bizonyulnak a hamis hírek felismeréséhez.', 'el': 'Οι δηλώσεις που είναι εσκεμμένα λανθασμένες (ή χειραγωγημένες) παρουσιάζουν σημαντικό ενδιαφέρον για τους ερευνητές, την κυβέρνηση, την ασφάλεια και τα χρηματοπιστωτικά συστήματα. Σύμφωνα με τη λογοτεχνία εξαπάτησης, υπάρχουν αξιόπιστες ενδείξεις για την ανίχνευση εξαπάτησης και η πεποίθηση ότι οι ψεύτες εκπέμπουν ενδείξεις που μπορεί να υποδεικνύουν ότι η εξαπάτησή τους είναι σχεδόν καθολική. Ως εκ τούτου, δεδομένου ότι οι παραπλανητικές ενέργειες απαιτούν προηγμένη γνωστική ανάπτυξη που απλά δεν απαιτεί η ειλικρίνεια, καθώς και οι γνωστικοί μηχανισμοί των ανθρώπων έχουν ελπιδοφόρα καθοδήγηση για την ανίχνευση εξαπάτησης, σε αυτή τη συνεχιζόμενη έρευνα, προτείνουμε να εξετάσουμε τα μοτίβα δομής λόγου σε πολύγλωσσα παραπλανητικά νέα σώματα χρησιμοποιώντας το πλαίσιο της Θεωρίας Ρητολογικής Δομής. Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη ότι η εργασία μας είναι η πρώτη που εκμεταλλεύεται πολυγλωσσικές στρατηγικές για την ανίχνευση ψεύτικων ειδήσεων, η ερευνητική κοινότητα αυτή τη στιγμή στερείται πολύγλωσσων παραπλανητικών σχολίων. Ως εκ τούτου, η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την τρέχουσα πρόοδο στην παρούσα διατριβή, συμπεριλαμβανομένης (i) της κατασκευής του πρώτου πολύγλωσσου παραπλανητικού σώματος, το οποίο σχολιάστηκαν από ειδικούς σύμφωνα με το πλαίσιο της Θεωρίας της Ρητορικής Δομής, και (ii) της εισαγωγής δύο νέων προτεινόμενων ρητορικών σχέσεων: της παρεμβολής και της IMPERATIVE, οι οποίες υποθέτουμε ότι είναι σχετικές για το έργο ανίχνευσης ψεύτικων ειδήσεων.', 'it': "Le dichiarazioni intenzionalmente errate (o manipolate) sono di notevole interesse per i ricercatori, il governo, la sicurezza e i sistemi finanziari. Secondo la letteratura sull'inganno, ci sono indizi affidabili per rilevare l'inganno e la convinzione che i bugiardi emettano indizi che possono indicare che il loro inganno è quasi universale. Pertanto, dato che le azioni ingannevoli richiedono uno sviluppo cognitivo avanzato che l'onestà semplicemente non richiede, così come i meccanismi cognitivi delle persone hanno una guida promettente per il rilevamento dell'inganno, in questa ricerca in corso di dottorato, proponiamo di esaminare i modelli di struttura del discorso nei corpi di notizie ingannevoli multilingue utilizzando il framework Retorical Structure Theory. Considerando che il nostro lavoro è il primo a sfruttare strategie multilingue consapevoli del discorso per il rilevamento delle fake news, la comunità di ricerca attualmente manca di corpora annotati ingannevoli multilingue. Di conseguenza, questo articolo descrive i progressi attuali in questa tesi, tra cui (i) la costruzione del primo corpus ingannevole multilingue, annotato da specialisti secondo il framework Retorical Structure Theory, e (ii) l'introduzione di due nuove relazioni retoriche proposte: INTERJECTION e IMPERATIVE, che presumiamo essere rilevanti per il compito di rilevamento delle fake news.", 'ka': 'ამოცანები, რომლებიც ცნობიერად შეცდომა (ან მანიპულაციული) იყოს მნიშვნელოვანი ინტერესტი მსგავსი მსგავსიერებისთვის, სამყარო, დარწმუნება და ფი მარცხოვრების ლიტერიტურაზე, არსებობს დარწმუნებელი სინაცემები, რომელიც მარცხოვრები უნდა გააკეთოთ სინაცემები, რომელიც შეიძლება იგივე, რომ მარცხოვრები უნდა ამიტომ, მაშინ, რომ შეცდომა მოქმედება უნდა გავაკეთოთ კონციგური განვითარება, რომელიც საკონციგური მექანიზები არ უნდა მოჭირდება, და ადამიანების კონციგური მექანიზები უნდა გავაკეთოთ მოცდომა განვითარებას, ამ პროგრამეტში პროგრამის განვითარებაში, ჩ ჩვენი სამუშაო არის პირველი, რომელიც მრავალენგური დისკურსების სტრატიგიების გამოყენებას, რომელიც ტალქტური ინფორმაციის განახლებისთვის, მსგავსი სამუშაო სამუშაო კოპორა ამიტომ, ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერს მიმდინარე პროგრესი ამ ტეზეში, რომელიც i) პირველი მრავალური განმავლილებელი კორპუსის შექმნა, რომელიც პოვციალური სტრუქტურის ტეორიის ფრამიკის მიხედვით აღწერა, და ii) ორი ახალი პროგრესის შესახებ: INTERJECTION და IMPERATIVE, რომელიც ჩვენ ვფიქ', 'kk': 'Бұл мәліметтер мақсатты (немесе манипуляцияланған) зерттеушілер, үкіметтер, қауіпсіздік және қауіпсіздік жүйелер үшін көп қызықты. Адамдылық литературасына сәйкес келгенде, жалғастырушылардың жақын әлемдік деп белгілегенін анықтау үшін сенімді белгілер бар. Сондықтан, тұтас әрекеттерінің қажеттілігі қажет емес, және адамдардың конификациялық механизмтерінің қажеттілігін табу үшін, доктордың оқиғандағы зерттеулерінде, реториялық структура теориясын қолдану арқылы көптілікті жаңалық корпоратындағы дискурс құрылымының қ Біздің жұмысымыз - бірінші тілдік дискурстарды білмейтін бағдарламаларды жалғыз жаңалықтарды анықтау стратегияларын қолдануға арналған, зерттеу коммуникалығында көп тілдік жалғыз корпора жоқ. Сондықтан бұл қағаз осы тезиядағы назардағы жағдайды таңдайды, сондай-ақ i) бірінші көптілік қалқымалы корпус құрылуын, реторикалық структура теориясының рамкасына сәйкес келген специалисттер бойынша, және ii) екі жаңа келтірілген реторикалық қатынастарын келтіру: ИНТЕРЕКТИЯ мен И', 'ms': 'Statements that are intentionally misstated (or manipulated) are of considerable interest to researchers, government, security, and financial systems.  Menurut literatur penipuan, terdapat tanda-tanda yang dipercayai untuk mengesan penipuan dan kepercayaan bahawa pembohong memberikan tanda-tanda yang mungkin menunjukkan penipuan mereka adalah hampir universal. Oleh itu, kerana tindakan penipuan memerlukan pembangunan kognitif yang lebih lanjut yang jujur tidak memerlukan, serta mekanisme kognitif manusia mempunyai panduan yang berjanji untuk pengesan penipuan, dalam penelitian berlangsung doktor ini, kami cadangkan untuk memeriksa corak struktur diskursus dalam korpora berita penipuan berbilang bahasa menggunakan kerangka Teori Struktur Rhetorical. Considering that our work is the first to exploit multilingual discourse-aware strategies for fake news detection, the research community currently lacks multilingual deceptive annotated corpora.  Oleh sebab itu, kertas in i menggambarkan kemajuan semasa dalam tesis ini, termasuk (i) pembangunan korpus penipu berbilang bahasa pertama, yang dicatat oleh ahli khusus menurut kerangka Teori Struktur Rhetorical, dan (ii) perkenalan dua hubungan retorik yang diusulkan baru: INTERJECTION dan IMPERATIVE, yang kami anggap relevan untuk tugas pengesan berita palsu.', 'mk': 'Изјавите кои се намерно погрешно напишани (или манипулирани) се од значителен интерес за истражувачите, владата, безбедноста и финансиските системи. Според литературата за измама, постојат доверливи знаци за откривање на измама и верувањето дека лажговците даваат знаци кои можат да покажат дека нивната измама е скоро универзална. Затоа, со оглед на тоа што лажните дејства бараат напредниот когнитивен развој кој искреноста едноставно не го бара, како и когнитивните механизми на луѓето имаат ветувачки упатства за детекција на лажностите, во тековното истражување на докторот, предложуваме да ги испитаме дискурсните структурни шеми во мултијазичните лажни вести корпора користејќи ја реторич Со оглед на тоа што нашата работа е прва за искористување на мултијазични стратегии на свесност за дискурс за лажно детекција на вести, истражувачката заедница моментално недостасува мултијазична лажна анотирана корпора. Според тоа, овој весник го опишува сегашниот напредок во оваа теза, вклучувајќи ги и (i) изградбата на првиот мултијазичен лажлив корпус, кој беше анотиран од специјалците според реторичката теорија на структурата, и (ii) воведувањето на две нови предложени реторички односи: ИНТЕРИЕКЦИЈА и ИМПЕРАТИВА, кои ние сметаме дека се релевантни за задач', 'ml': 'ആഗ്രഹിക്കപ്പെട്ട (അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഭ്രാന്തിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന) വാക്കുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക്, സര്\u200dക്കാര്\u200d, സുരക്ഷിതാവ്,  വഞ്ചിക്കുന്ന സാഹിത്യത്തിന്റെ അനുസരിച്ച്, വഞ്ചനയെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d വിശ്വസ്തനായ കുരങ്ങളുണ്ട്. കള്ളം പറയുന്നവര്\u200d വിശ്വാസികള്\u200d കു അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഈ വഞ്ചിക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമില്ലാത്ത മുന്\u200dഗണന വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്, പിന്നെ ജനങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d വഞ്ചിക്കുന്ന മെക്നിജിനുകള്\u200dക്കും പ്രത്യേക വഴികാട്ടുകളുണ്ട്, ഈ പിഎച്ചി കള്ള വാര്\u200dത്ത കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന് ഞങ്ങളുടെ പണിയാണെന്ന് തോന്നുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ ആദ്യമാണെന്നാണ് പല ഭാഷക്കുകള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരം  Accordingly, this paper describes the current progress in this thesis, including (i) the construction of the first multilingual deceptive corpus, which was annotated by specialists according to the Rhetorical Structure Theory framework, and (ii) the introduction of two new proposed rhetorical relations: INTERJECTION and IMPERATIVE, which we assume to be relevant for the fake news detection task.', 'mt': 'Dikjarazzjonijiet li huma intenzjonalment misstatati (jew manipulati) huma ta’ interess konsiderevoli għar-riċerkaturi, il-gvern, is-sigurtà, u s-sistemi finanzjarji. Skont il-letteratura tal-inganna, hemm sinjali affidabbli biex jinstabu l-inganna u t-twemmin li l-qarrieqa jagħtu sinjali li jistgħu jindikaw li l-inganna tagħhom hija kważi universali. Għalhekk, minħabba li azzjonijiet ingannanti jeħtieġu żvilupp konjittiv avvanzat li l-onestà sempliċement ma teħtieġx, kif ukoll il-mekkaniżmi konjittivi tan-nies għandhom gwida promettenti għall-individwazzjoni ta’ ingannamenti, f’din ir-riċerka li għaddejja fil-Ph.D., qed nipproponu li jeżaminaw xejriet ta’ struttura ta’ diskors f’korpura multilingwi ta’ aħbarijiet ingannanti bl-użu tal-qafas tat-Teorja tal-Istruttura Retorika. Meta wieħed iqis li l-ħidma tagħna hija l-ewwel waħda li tisfrutta strateġiji multilingwi ta’ għarfien tad-diskors għall-individwazzjoni ta’ aħbarijiet foloz, il-komunità tar-riċerka bħalissa m’għandhiex korpora anotata multilingwi deċettiva. Accordingly, this paper describes the current progress in this thesis, including (i) the construction of the first multilingual deceptive corpus, which was annotated by specialists according to the Rhetorical Structure Theory framework, and (ii) the introduction of two new proposed rhetorical relations: INTERJECTION and IMPERATIVE, which we assume to be relevant for the fake news detection task.', 'no': 'Statementar som er vilkårleg misspelt (eller manipulert) er av stor interesse for forskere, regjeringen, tryggleikn og finansielle systemar. Følgjande deklarasjon er det tiltrudde merknader for å oppdaga vilkårleg og tro at lågare gjev av deklarasjon som kan indisera at vilkårleg deres er nær universell. Det er derfor, given at deltakar-handlingar krev avansert kognitiv utvikling som godkjennighet ikkje krev, og folks kognitiv-mekanisme har promiserende retningar for oppdaging av deltakar, i denne doktoren D. som gjeldande forskning, foreslår vi å undersøke diskursstrukturemønsterelement i fleirspråkskorpora med retorisk struktureteorierammeverket. Etter at arbeidet vårt er det første som eksploderer fleirspråksforskjellige strategier for falske nyhetsinformasjon, manglar forskningssamfunnet i tidspunktet fleirspråksforskjellige oppmerking av korpora. Denne papiret beskriver derfor den gjeldande framdringen i denne temaen, inkludert i) konstruksjonen av den første fleirspråkelige deceptive korpusen, som ble notata av spesialistar etter retoriske struktureteorierammeverket, og ii) innføring av to nye foreslåde retoriske forhold: INTERJECTION og IMPERATIVE, som vi antar er relevante for den falske informasjonsoppgåva.', 'lt': 'Mokslininkams, vyriausybėms, saugumui ir finansų sistemoms labai svarbios sąmoningai neteisingos (arba manipuliuojamos) deklaracijos. Remiantis apgaulės literatūra, yra patikimų įrodymų apgaulės aptikimui ir įsitikinimui, kad melagis duoda įrodymų, kurie gali rodyti, kad jų apgaulė yra beveik universali. Todėl, atsižvelgiant į tai, kad apgaulės veiksmai reikalauja pažangios pažangios pažangios pažangios plėtros, kurios tiesiog nereikalauja s ąžiningumo, taip pat žmonių pažangios mechanizmai turi pažangias apgaulės aptikimo gaires, šiame doktorate atliekamuose moksliniuose tyrimuose siūlome išnagrinėti diskurso struktūros modelius daugiakalbėje apgaulės naujienų korporoje naudojant Retorinės struktūros teorijos sistemą. Atsižvelgiant į tai, kad mūsų darbas yra pirmasis, naudojantis daugiakalbėmis diskursų suvokimo strategijomis, skirtomis suklastotų naujienų aptikimui, mokslinių tyrimų bendruomenei šiuo metu trūksta daugiakalbių apgaulingų anotuotų korporų. Todėl šiame dokumente aprašoma dabartinė pažanga šioje teorijoje, įskaitant i) pirmojo daugiakalbio apgaulingo korpuso kūrimą, kurį specialistai pažymėjo pagal Retorinės struktūros teorijos sistemą, ir ii) dviejų naujų siūlomų retorinių santykių įvedimą: INTERJECTION ir IMPERATIVE, kurie, mūsų manymu, yra svarbūs suklastotų žin i ų aptikimo uždaviniams.', 'mn': 'Харин судлаачид, засгийн газрын, аюулгүй байдал, санхүүгийн системийн тухай үнэхээр их сонирхолтой байдаг. Өөрийгөө хуурамжлах уран зохиолын хувьд, худлаачид хуурамжлалт нь ойролцоогоор универсал байдаг гэдэгт итгэх итгэлтэй байдаг. Тиймээс, хуурамч үйл явцууд нь зөвхөн шударга байдал хэрэггүй гэдгийг мэдэх ухааны хөгжлийн хөгжлийн шаардлагатай учраас, мөн хүмүүсийн мэдэх механизмүүд хуурамч байдлын олон хэлний шинжлэх ухааны хэлбэрээр Риторикийн Структур Теорийг ашиглан ярианы бүтэц загваруудыг судалдаг. Бидний ажил бол худлаа мэдээллийг олох олон хэлний яриаг мэдэх стратегийг ашиглах анхны ажил, судалгааны нийгэмд одоо олон хэлний худлаа бууруулсан корпора байхгүй. Тиймээс энэ цаас энэ тезийн орчин үеийн хөгжлийг тайлбарладаг. i) хэлний анхны хуурамч хэлний корпус бүтээгдэхүүнд бөгөөд эрдэмтэд Риторикийн Структур Теорийн хэлбэрээр сонсогдсон мэргэжилтэн хоёр шинэ тайлбарлалтын харилцааны хөгжлийг тайлбарладаг.', 'pl': 'Oświadczenia, które są celowo fałszywe (lub manipulowane) są istotne dla naukowców, rządu, bezpieczeństwa i systemów finansowych. Według literatury oszustwa istnieją wiarygodne wskazówki do wykrywania oszustwa i przekonanie, że kłamcy wydają sygnały, które mogą wskazywać, że ich oszustwo jest prawie uniwersalne. Dlatego też biorąc pod uwagę, że zwodnicze działania wymagają zaawansowanego rozwoju poznawczego, którego uczciwość po prostu nie wymaga, a także mechanizmy poznawcze ludzi mają obiecujące wskazówki dla wykrywania oszustw, w tym prowadzonym badaniu doktoranckim proponujemy zbadanie wzorców struktury dyskursu w wielojęzycznych zwodniczych korpusach informacyjnych przy użyciu ram teorii struktury retorycznej. Biorąc pod uwagę, że nasza praca jest pierwszą, która wykorzystuje wielojęzyczne strategie dyskursu do wykrywania fałszywych wiadomości, środowisko badawcze obecnie brakuje wielojęzycznych, zwodniczych korpusów adnotacyjnych. W związku z tym niniejszy artykuł opisuje aktualne postępy w tej pracy, w tym (i) budowę pierwszego wielojęzycznego zwodniczego korpusu, który został adnotacjonowany przez specjalistów zgodnie z ramami teorii struktury retorycznej oraz (ii) wprowadzenie dwóch nowych proponowanych relacji retorycznych: INTERJECTION i IMPERATIVE, które zakładamy za istotne dla zadania wykrywania fake news.', 'sr': 'Izjave koje su namerno pogrešno izjavljene (ili manipulisane) imaju značajan interes za istraživače, vlade, sigurnost i finansijske sisteme. Prema literaturi prevare, postoje pouzdani znakovi za otkrivanje prevare i verovanje da lažljivci daju znakove koje mogu ukazati na njihovu prevaru je blizu univerzalno. Stoga, s obzirom na to da prevarantska akcija zahteva napredni kognitivni razvoj koji iskrenost jednostavno ne zahteva, kao i kognitivni mehanizmi ljudi imaju obećavajuće upute za otkrivanje prevare, u ovom istraživanju doktora D. predlažemo da pregledamo strukturu diskursa u multijezičkom prevarantnom vestskom korporaciji koristeći okvir retoričke strukture teorije. S obzirom na to da je naš rad prvi koji iskoristi mnogijezičke diskursne strategije za lažno otkrivanje vijesti, istraživačka zajednica trenutno nedostaje multijezički prevarantni korpora. Stoga, ovaj papir opisuje trenutni napredak u ovoj tezi, uključujući i) izgradnju prvog multijezičkog deceptivnog korpusa, koji je navodio specijalisti u skladu s okvirom retoričke strukture teorije, i ii) uvođenje dva novih predloženih retoričkih odnosa: INTERJEKTIJA i IMPERATIVA, koje smatramo relevantnim za lažni zadatak otkrivanja vesti.', 'ro': 'Declarațiile care sunt în mod intenționat eronate (sau manipulate) sunt de interes considerabil pentru cercetători, guvern, securitate și sistemele financiare. Conform literaturii de înșelăciune, există indicii fiabile pentru detectarea înșelăciunii și credința că mincinoșii dau indicii care pot indica că înșelăciunea lor este aproape universală. Prin urmare, având în vedere faptul că acțiunile înșelătoare necesită dezvoltare cognitivă avansată pe care onestitatea pur și simplu nu o necesită, precum și mecanismele cognitive ale oamenilor au îndrumare promițătoare pentru detectarea înșelăciunii, în această cercetare în curs de doctorat, propunem examinarea modelelor structurii discursului în corpore de știri înșelătoare multilingve folosind cadrul Teoriei Structurii Retorice. Având în vedere că activitatea noastră este prima care exploatează strategiile multilingve conștiente de discurs pentru detectarea știrilor false, comunitatea de cercetare în prezent lipsește corpore adnotate multilingve. În consecință, lucrarea descrie progresul actual în această teză, inclusiv (i) construirea primului corpus înșelător multilingv, care a fost adnotat de specialiști conform cadrului Teoria Structurii Retorice, și (ii) introducerea a două noi relații retorice propuse: INTERJECTION și IMPERATIV, care presupunem că sunt relevante pentru sarcina de detectare a știrilor false.', 'sv': 'Uttalanden som är avsiktligt felaktiga (eller manipulerade) är av stort intresse för forskare, myndigheter, säkerhet och finansiella system. Enligt bedrägerilitteratur finns det tillförlitliga ledtrådar för att upptäcka bedrägeri och tron att lögnare ger ledtrådar som kan indikera att deras bedrägeri är nästan universell. Därför, med tanke på att vilseledande handlingar kräver avancerad kognitiv utveckling som ärlighet helt enkelt inte kräver, liksom människors kognitiva mekanismer har lovande vägledning för vilseledande upptäckt, föreslår vi i denna doktorand pågående forskning att undersöka diskursstrukturens mönster i flerspråkiga vilseledande nyhetscorpora med hjälp av Retorical Structure Theory ramverket. Med tanke på att vårt arbete är det första som utnyttjar flerspråkiga diskursmedvetna strategier för detektering av falska nyheter saknar forskarsamhället för närvarande flerspråkiga bedrägliga kommenterade corpora. Därför beskriver denna uppsats de aktuella framstegen i denna avhandling, inklusive (i) byggandet av den första flerspråkiga vilseledande korpusen, som kommenterades av specialister enligt Retorical Structure Theory framework, och (ii) införandet av två nya föreslagna retoriska relationer: INTERJEKTION och IMPERATIVE, som vi antar vara relevanta för detekteringsuppgiften för fake news.', 'so': 'Hadalkii ay si qasdi ah u baahan yihiin (ama la mani karo) waa kuwa aad u xiisooda baarayaasha, dowladda, ammaanka iyo nidaamka dhaqaalaha. Sida Qorniinka khiyaanada lagu qoro, waxaa ku jira cudur aamin ah in khiyaano lagu garto iyo in rumaysadka beenaalayaashu ay cudur daajiyaan, taasoo muujin kara in khiyaanadoodu ay dhow tahay. Sidaa darteed, sababtoo ah falimahaas khiyaano ayaa loo baahan yahay horumarinta aqoonta oo aan u baahnayn si rasmi ah, iyo in kale meymisyada aqoonta dadku ay leeyihiin hagitaan khiyaanada, waxbarashadan ku socota Ph.D., waxaan ku talo galaynaa in aan baarayno qaababka muuqashada hadalka ee shirkadda warqadaha khiyaanada badan oo kala duduwan ku qoran oo isticmaalaya dhismaha dhismaha dhismaha ee Rhetorical. Sida loo fiiriyo in shaqadayadu waa kan ugu horreeya in loo isticmaalo qorshaha hadalka luuqadaha kala duduwan oo loo ogaado warqada been ah, ururka waxbarashadu haatan ma baahna shirkado khiyaano badan oo luuqado kala gedisan. Sidaa darteed warqaddan ayaa ku qoraya horumarinta joogitaanka ee arimahan, kuwaas oo ku qoran (i) dhisidda koobka ugu horreeya khiyaanada luuqadaha kala duduwan, kaas oo ay ku dhibaatayso dhakhtarrada si waafaqsan dhismaha dhismaha ee Rhetorical dhismaha iyo (ii) soo saarista laba xiriir oo cusub oo la soo jeeday: INTERJECTION iyo IMPERATIVE, kaas oo aynu u u malaynaynaa inay muhiim u tahay shaqada baaritaanka warka beenta ah.', 'si': 'විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ අනිවාර්යයෙන් වැරැද්ද (නැත්නම් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්න) පරීක්ෂක, රජය, ආරක්ෂක, ආ විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන ඉතින්, ඒ වගේම, අනිවාර්ය ව්\u200dයාපෘතික විශ්වාසය අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න ඕනේ විශ්වාසය සමහර විශ්වාසය නොහැකි විශ්වාස කරන්න, ඒ වගේම මිනිස්සුන්ගේ අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dර අපේ වැඩේ පළමුවෙන් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා හිතන්නේ බොරු වාර්තාවක් හොයාගන්න බොරු වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න, විශ්වාස සමාජයේ අවස්ථා Accordically, this papers Description the ongoing progress in this Theses, included (i) the building of the first Multilanguage Desptive Corpus, that is annuted by the especia ologists by the Rhetorical Struktural Theorie rameworks, and (i) the Intro of Two new preached rhtoric ties: INTERJECTION and IMPERATIVE, that we assume to be appropriate for the fax news Detection job.', 'ur': 'مطلب جو مطلب غلط بات کی جاتی ہیں (یا منظور کی جاتی ہیں) پھیرنے والوں, حکومت, امنیت اور مالی سیستموں کے لئے بہت زیادہ علاقہ ہے۔ فریب کی ادبیات کے مطابق، فریب کا اظہار کرنے کے لئے یقین رکھنے والی نشانیاں ہیں اور یہ کہ جھوٹے لوگ ان کی فریب کا اظہار کریں کہ ان کی فریب قریب ہی ہے لہٰذا، یہ دھوکہ کے اقدامات کی ضرورت ہے کہ صادق صرف اس کی ضرورت نہیں ہے، اور لوگوں کی جہالت کی مکانیزوں کے لئے دھوکہ کا اظہار کرنا ہے، اس دکتر ڈ.ڈ. کی تحقیقات میں، ہم نے بہت سی زبانوں کی دھوکہ کے مطابق مکانیزوں میں دھوکہ کی طرح کی طرح کی تحقیق کرنے کی پیشنهاد کی ہے کہ بہت سی زبانوں کی دھو ہمارا کام پہلا ہے جو بہت سی زبان کی گفتگو جاننے والی استراتژیکوں کو فساد پہنچانے کے لئے استراتژیکوں کا استعمال کرتا ہے، اس تحقیق کمونٹی کو اکھلا بہت سی زبان کی دھوکہ دینے والی کمونٹی کے لائق نہیں ہے۔ اسی وجہ سے یہ کاغذ اس تئسس میں موجود پیشرفت کی توصیح کرتا ہے، جیسے i) پہلی بہت سی زبان کی دھوکے کی کورپوس کی بنائی ہوئی ہے، جو ریٹروریک ساختاری تئوری فرم کے مطابق مخصوص کرنے والوں کے ذریعہ اظہار کی گئی تھی، اور ii) دو نو پیشنهادہ تئوری رابطہ کی توصیح کرتی ہے: INTERJECTION اور IMPERATIVE، جسے ہم خیانت کرتے', 'ta': 'ஆராய்ச்சிகள், அரசாங்கி, பாதுகாப்பு மற்றும் நிதி அமைப்புகளுக்கு தகுதியான ஆர்வம் உள்ளது. ஏமாற்று எழுத்துக்கள் போன்று, சதி கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு நம்பிக்கையான துண்டுகள் உள்ளன மற்றும் பொய் மற்றும் நம்பிக்கை என்று பொய் சொ ஆகையால், அந்த ஏமாற்றும் செயல்களுக்கு மேம்பட்ட அறிவிப்பு உருவாக்க வேண்டும் என்று உண்மையாக தேவைப்படும், மற்றும் மக்களின் அறிவிப்பு முறைமைகளுக்கும் ஏமாற்றல் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு வாக்களிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளத பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான பல மொழி பேச்சு எச்சரிக்கையான திட்டங்களை பயன்படுத்த முதல் என்று நம் வேலை என்று நினைக்கிறது, இப்போது ஆராய்ச்ச ஆகையால், இந்த காகிதத்தில் தற்போதைய முன்னேற்றத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, முதல் பல மொழி மயக்கூடிய கூட்டத்தை உருவாக்கும், அது ரெட்டோரிக் கட்டுப்பாடு திட்டம் சட்டத்தைப் பொருத்தமாக அறிவிக்கப்பட்டது, மற்றும் (i i) இரண்டு புதிய பரிந்துர', 'uz': "Tayyorlar (yoki boshqarishni) ta'minlovchi tashkilotlar, ҳукумат, xavfsizlik ва молия tizimlar uchun juda qiziqarli qiziqarli. Ko'rsatish haqida, o'sha narsalarni o'rganish uchun ishonch narsalarni o'rganish uchun ishonch keladigan xuddi o'ylab, o'ylab, yolg'on qo'llanmalarni o'zgartirib chiqarishi mumkin. Шундай қилиб, бу орқали амал қилишга тажовузкорлик лозим бўлган, аммо оддий ҳукумат лозим эмас, аммо одамларнинг маълумотлари хиёнат қилишга тажовуз қилувчи манфаатлар мавжуд, бу Ph.D. доимий тажовузкорликда турли махсус хабар компонентарида, Реторикча текст таркибида фойдаланиб туриладиган маълумотлар таркибидасини тафаккур қилишни тақдим этамиз. Bizning ishimizning birinchi tilda o'zgarishni o'rganish o'zgartirish uchun birinchi xil tilda o'zgarishni o'rganish strategiyani o'rganish mumkin, hozirda o'rganish jamoasi bir necha tilda o'zgaruvchi kompaniya yo'q. Шундай қилиб, бу ҳужжат манзилга ҳозирги равишни айтиб беради, у(i) Реторий сохта таркибида маълумотлар ва (ii) иккита тарзда маълумотларни кўриб чиқиш вазифасига нисбатан мувофиқ бўлиши керак, деб ҳисоблаймиз.", 'vi': 'Những lời phát biểu có chủ đích sai (hoặc bị thao túng) rất thú vị với nhà nghiên cứu, chính phủ, an ninh và hệ thống tài chính. Theo văn học lừa lọc, có những manh mối đáng tin cậy để phát hiện sự lừa dối và niềm tin rằng những kẻ dối trá cung cấp thông tin cho thấy sự lừa dối của họ gần như phổ biến. Vì vậy, khi những hành động lừa dối đòi hỏi phát triển nhận thức tiên tiến mà chân thật đơn giản không cần, cũng như các cơ quan nhận thức của con người có hướng dẫn hứa hẹn để phát hiện lừa dối, trong tiến s ĩ tiến sĩ nghiên cứu đang tiến hành, chúng tôi đề nghị kiểm tra các mô hình cấu trúc ngôn ngữ trong các tin dối trá đa dạng, bằng cơ sở lý cấu trúc tư pháp. Xét thấy rằng công việc của chúng ta là việc đầu tiên khai thác các chiến lược ngôn ngữ đa dạng để phát hiện tin giả tạo, cộng đồng nghiên cứu hiện không có chức năng ngôn ngữ dối trá. Do đó, bài báo này mô tả tiến trình hiện tại của luận án này, bao gồm cả chương trình xây dựng tập đoàn ảo giác đa dạng đầu tiên, được các chuyên gia ghi nhận theo bộ lý thuyết cấu trúc Hồi giáo, và cả việc giới thiệu hai mối quan hệ tu từ mới, đề xuất: Cuộc phỏng vấn và phỏng đoán phỏng vấn, mà chúng tôi cho là liên quan đến nhiệm vụ khám phá tin giả tạo.', 'hr': 'Izjave koje su namjerno pogrešno zabranjene (ili manipulirane) imaju značajan interes za istraživače, vlade, sigurnost i financijske sustave. Prema literaturi prevare, postoje pouzdani znakovi za otkrivanje prevare i vjerovanje da lažljivci daju znakove koje mogu ukazati na njihovu prevaru je blizu univerzalno. Stoga, s obzirom na to da prevarantske akcije zahtijevaju napredni kognitivni razvoj koji iskrenost jednostavno ne zahtijeva, kao i kognitivni mehanizmi ljudi imaju obećavajuće upute za otkrivanje prevare u ovom istraživanju doktorata, predlažemo pregledati obrazac strukture diskursa u multijezičkom korporaciji za fakultet novosti koristeći okvir retoričke strukture teorije. S obzirom na to da je naš rad prvi koji iskorištava strategije za lažno otkrivanje vijesti, istraživačka zajednica trenutno nedostaje višejezički prevarantni korpora. Stoga, ovaj papir opisuje trenutni napredak u toj tezi, uključujući i) izgradnju prvog multijezičkog deceptivnog korpusa, koji je navodio specijalisti u skladu s okvirom retoričke strukture teorije, i ii) uvođenje dva novih predloženih retoričkih odnosa: INTERJECTION i IMPERATIVE, koje smatramo relevantnim za lažni zadatak otkrivanja vijesti.', 'bg': 'Изявленията, които са умишлено погрешни (или манипулирани), представляват значителен интерес за изследователите, правителството, сигурността и финансовите системи. Според литературата за измама има надеждни подсказки за откриване на измама и вярването, че лъжците дават подсказки, които могат да показват, че измамата им е почти универсална. Ето защо, като се има предвид, че измамните действия изискват напреднало познавателно развитие, което честността просто не изисква, както и когнитивните механизми на хората имат обещаващи насоки за откриване на измама, в това докторско изследване предлагаме да се изследват моделите на структурата на дискурса в многоезични измамни информационни корпуси, използвайки рамката на теорията на реторичната структура. Като се има предвид, че нашата работа е първата, която използва многоезични дискурсни стратегии за откриване на фалшиви новини, изследователската общност в момента не разполага с многоезични измамни анотирани корпори. Съответно, настоящата статия описва текущия напредък в тази дисертация, включително (i) изграждането на първия многоезичен измамен корпус, който е анотиран от специалисти съгласно рамката на теорията на реториката на структурата, и (ii) въвеждането на две нови предложени реторични отношения: ИНТЕРЖЕКЦИЯ и IMPERATIVE, които приемаме за подходящи за задачата за откриване на фалшиви новини.', 'nl': "Verklaringen die opzettelijk verkeerd zijn geformuleerd (of gemanipuleerd) zijn van groot belang voor onderzoekers, overheid, veiligheid en financiële systemen. Volgens misleidingsliteratuur zijn er betrouwbare aanwijzingen voor het opsporen van misleiding en het geloof dat leugenaars aanwijzingen afgeven die erop kunnen wijzen dat hun misleiding bijna universeel is. Daarom, gezien het feit dat misleidende acties geavanceerde cognitieve ontwikkeling vereisen die eerlijkheid eenvoudigweg niet vereist, en de cognitieve mechanismen van mensen veelbelovende begeleiding hebben voor het detecteren van misleiding, stellen we voor om in dit Ph.D. lopende onderzoek discoursstructuurpatronen in meertalige misleidende nieuwscorpora te onderzoeken met behulp van het kader van de Rhetorische Structuurtheorie. Aangezien ons werk het eerste is dat meertalige discoursbewuste strategieën exploiteert voor fake news detectie, ontbreekt het de onderzoeksgemeenschap momenteel aan meertalige misleidende geannoteerde corpora's. Dienovereenkomstig beschrijft deze paper de huidige vooruitgang in dit proefschrift, waaronder (i) de bouw van het eerste meertalige misleidende corpus, dat door specialisten werd geannoteerd volgens het kader van de Rhetorische Structuurtheorie, en (ii) de introductie van twee nieuwe voorgestelde retorische relaties: INTERJECTIE en IMPERATIVE, die we veronderstellen relevant te zijn voor de detectie van fake news.", 'da': 'Erklæringer, der er bevidst forkerte (eller manipuleret) er af stor interesse for forskere, regeringer, sikkerhed og finansielle systemer. Ifølge bedrageri litteratur er der pålidelige spor til at opdage bedrag og tro på, at løgnere afgiver spor, der kan indikere deres bedrag, er næsten universel. I betragtning af at bedrageriske handlinger kræver avanceret kognitiv udvikling, som ærlighed simpelthen ikke kræver, såvel som folks kognitive mekanismer har lovende vejledning til bedrageri detektion, foreslår vi i denne ph.d. igangværende forskning at undersøge diskursstruktur mønstre i flersprogede bedrageriske nyhedskorpora ved hjælp af Retorical Structure Theory rammen. I betragtning af at vores arbejde er det første til at udnytte flersprogede diskursbevidste strategier til opdagelse af fake news, mangler forskningsfællesskabet i øjeblikket flersprogede vildledende annoterede corpora. Derfor beskriver denne artikel de aktuelle fremskridt i denne afhandling, herunder (i) opførelsen af det første flersprogede vildledende korpus, som blev kommenteret af specialister i henhold til Retorical Structure Theory framework, og (ii) introduktionen af to nye forslag til retoriske relationer: INTERJEKTION og IMPERATIVE, som vi antager at være relevante for opgaven med detektering af fake news.', 'ko': '연구원, 정부, 안전, 금융 시스템은 고의로 오보(또는 조종)한 보고서에 대해 매우 흥미를 느낀다.사기 문헌에 따르면 사기를 검출하는 믿을 만한 단서가 존재하고 거짓말쟁이가 보낸 단서는 그들의 사기가 보편에 가깝다는 것을 나타낼 수 있다고 믿는다.따라서 사기 행위는 고급 인지 발전이 필요하고 성실은 고급 인지 발전이 필요하지 않으며 사람들의 인지 메커니즘이 사기 검측에 좋은 지도적 의미를 가진다는 것을 감안하여 이 박사가 진행하고 있는 연구에서 우리는 수사 구조 이론 구조를 이용하여 다국어 사기성 뉴스 자료 라이브러리의 언어 구조 모델을 연구할 것을 제안한다.우리의 업무가 처음으로 다국어 언어 감지 전략을 이용하여 가짜 뉴스를 검출하는 것을 감안하면 연구계에는 현재 다국어 사기성 주석 자료 라이브러리가 부족하다.따라서 본고는 본 논문의 최신 진전을 묘사하고자 한다. (i)는 전문가가 수사 구조 이론 구조에 따라 주석한 첫 번째 다국어 사기성 자료 라이브러리를 구축하고 (ii)는 두 가지 새로운 수사 관계인 탄사와 기도문을 도입했다. 우리는 이 두 가지 관계가 가짜 뉴스 검출 임무와 관련이 있다고 가정한다.', 'fa': 'اعلام\u200cهایی که به قصد اشتباه کردند (یا تغییر داده شده) برای محققان، دولت، امنیت و سیستم\u200cهای مالی، علاقه\u200cای بزرگ دارند. طبق ادبیات فریب، نشانه\u200cهای قابل اطمینان برای شناسایی فریب و باوری وجود دارد که دروغگویان نشانه\u200cهایی را می\u200cدهند که می\u200cتوانند نشان دهند فریبشان نزدیک جهانی است. بنابراین، با وجود اینکه کارهای فریب کردن نیاز به توسعه شناسی پیشرفت دارند که صادقانه به سادگی نیازی ندارد، همچنین مکانیسم شناسی مردم راهنمایی برای شناسایی فریب دارند، در این تحقیقات دکتر دانشگاه، ما پیشنهاد می کنیم که الگوهای ساختار صحبت را در شرکت خبرهای متفریب چند زبان با استفاده از چهارچهارچهارچهارچ با توجه به اینکه کارمون اولین نفر است که استراتژی\u200cهای آگاهی از گفتگوهای زیادی برای شناسایی اخبار دروغ استفاده می\u200cکند، جامعه تحقیقات در حال حاضر کم است جامعه\u200cای که در حال تحقیقات به زبان\u200cهای دروغگویی از شرکت\u200cهای مت بنابراین، این کاغذ پیشرفت فعلی در این تئیس را توصیف می\u200cکند، شامل i) ساختن اولین کورپوس متفرق زبان\u200cهای متفرق، که توسط متخصص\u200cگران بر اساس چهارچوب تئوری ساختار ریتوریک توضیح داده شده، و ii) معرفی دو رابطه\u200cهای تئوری جدید پیشنهاد می\u200cکند: INTERJECTION و IMPERATIVE، که ما می\u200cپنداریم برای کار شناسایی', 'tr': 'Araştyranlar, hökümet, howpsuzlyk we mali sistemalar üçin meýdança gabat edilen aýdymlar (ýa-da manipul edilen) uly gyzyklanýar. Adalat edebiýatyna görä, aldançylygy tanamak üçin ynamly bahallar bar we yalançylar öz aldançylygyny uniwersal ýanynda tanamak üçin garaşyp berenler barada ynamly bahallar bar. Şol sebäpli, aldatmak emelleriniň gelişmegi isleýän bilgili gelişmegi ýöne dogruçylyk ýok diýip, adamlaryň bilgili mekanismeleri hem bu Dr.D. tarapynda aldatmak üçin s öz bermegi üçin aldatmak üçin önüne getirilýän yol açmagy maslahat berýäris. Çalışmalarymyz ýalňyş haberler tapmak üçin multi dillerden habarlaşyp bilýän strategiýalaryny ulanan ilkinji gezek diýip pikir edeniňiz, araştyrma jemgyýetiň şu wagt multi dillerden boýunça alçak korporasy ýok. Şol sebäpli bu kagyz häzirki ösümligini bu tesisleýän taýýarlandyrýar (i) ilkinji multi dilli deceptive korpusyň in şawlarynda (specialistler) tarapyndan retorik strukturyň teoriýasyna görä duýýarlandyrylýar, we (ii) iki täze täze teklip eden retorik baglaşyklaryň girişi: INTERJECTION we IMPERATIVE, biz bu täzelikler ýalňyş tapylmagyň üç', 'sw': "Tamko ambazo zimepotelewa kwa makusudi (au kuchukuliwa) ni la kuvutiwa sana kwa watafiti, serikali, usalama na mfumo wa kifedha. Kwa mujibu wa fasihi ya udanganyifu, kuna mikono yenye kuaminika kwa kutafuta udanganyifu na imani kwamba waongo hutoa misaada ambayo inaweza kuonyesha udanganyifu wao ni karibu na ulimwengu. Therefore, given that deceiving actions require advanced cognitive development that honesty simply does not require, as well as people's cognitive mechanisms have promising guidance for deception detection, in this Ph.D. ongoing research, we propose to examine discourse structure patterns in multilingual deceptive news corpora using the Rhetorical Structure Theory framework.  Kwa kuzingatia kwamba kazi yetu ni ya kwanza kutumia mbinu za mazungumzo yanayofahamika kwa lugha mbalimbali kwa ajili ya kutambua habari potofu, jamii ya utafiti kwa sasa inakosa kampuni ya kudanganya lugha mbalimbali inayoudhi. Kwa hiyo, gazeti hili linaelezea maendeleo ya sasa katika nadharia hii, ikiwa ni pamoja na (i) kujengwa kwa makampuni ya kwanza ya udanganyifu wa lugha mbalimbali, ambayo yaliudhibishwa na wataalam kwa mujibu wa mfumo wa Tafiti ya Miundombi ya Kihetorical, na (ii) kuanzishwa kwa mahusiano mapendekezo mawili ya kitaifa: INTERJECTION na IMPERATIVE, ambayo tunadhani ni muhimu kwa kazi ya uchunguzi wa habari potofu.", 'id': 'Pernyataan yang sengaja salah dikatat (atau dimanipulasi) sangat menarik bagi peneliti, pemerintah, keamanan, dan sistem keuangan. Menurut literatur penipuan, ada tanda-tanda yang dipercaya untuk mendeteksi penipuan dan keyakinan bahwa pembohong memberikan tanda-tanda yang mungkin menunjukkan penipuan mereka hampir universal. Oleh karena itu, mengingat tindakan penipuan membutuhkan pengembangan kognitif maju yang jujur tidak membutuhkan, serta mekanisme kognitif orang-orang memiliki petunjuk yang berjanji untuk deteksi penipuan, dalam penelitian yang sedang berlangsung di doktor ini, kami mengusulkan untuk memeriksa pola struktur diskors dalam korpora berita penipuan berbilang bahasa menggunakan struktur teori Rhetorical. Mengingat bahwa pekerjaan kita adalah yang pertama untuk mengeksploitasi strategi multibahasa yang menyadari pembicaraan untuk deteksi berita palsu, komunitas penelitian saat ini kekurangan korpora penipu multibahasa yang dicatat. Oleh sebab itu, kertas in i menjelaskan kemajuan saat ini dalam tesis ini, termasuk (i) konstruksi corpus penipu berbilang bahasa pertama, yang dicatat oleh spesialis menurut cadangan teori struktur Rhetorical, dan (ii) perkenalan dua hubungan retorik yang diusulkan baru: INTERJECTION dan IMPERATIVE, yang kami anggap relevan untuk tugas deteksi berita palsu.', 'de': 'Aussagen, die absichtlich falsch formuliert (oder manipuliert) werden, sind von großem Interesse für Forscher, Regierung, Sicherheit und Finanzsysteme. Laut Täuschungsliteratur gibt es zuverlässige Hinweise zur Erkennung von Täuschung und der Glaube, dass Lügner Hinweise geben, die darauf hinweisen könnten, dass ihre Täuschung nahezu universell ist. Angesichts der Tatsache, dass trügerische Handlungen eine fortgeschrittene kognitive Entwicklung erfordern, die Ehrlichkeit einfach nicht erfordert, und dass die kognitiven Mechanismen der Menschen vielversprechende Hinweise für die Erkennung von Täuschungen haben, schlagen wir in dieser Doktorarbeit vor, Diskursstrukturmuster in mehrsprachigen irreführenden Nachrichtenkorpora unter Verwendung des Frameworks der Rhetorical Structural Theory zu untersuchen. Angesichts der Tatsache, dass unsere Arbeit die erste ist, die mehrsprachige diskursbewusste Strategien zur Erkennung von Fake News nutzt, fehlt es der Forschungsgemeinschaft derzeit an mehrsprachigen irreführenden annotierten Korpora. Dementsprechend beschreibt dieser Beitrag den aktuellen Fortschritt in dieser Arbeit, einschließlich (i) der Konstruktion des ersten mehrsprachigen Täuschungskorpus, der von Spezialisten nach dem Rahmen der Rhetorischen Strukturtheorie annotiert wurde, und (ii) der Einführung von zwei neuen vorgeschlagenen rhetorischen Beziehungen: INTERJECTION und IMPERATIVE, von denen wir annehmen, dass sie für die Erkennung von Fake News relevant sind.', 'hy': 'Նպատակաբար սխալված (կամ մանիպուլյացված) հայտարարությունները շատ հետաքրքիր են հետազոտողների, կառավարության, անվտանգության և ֆինանսական համակարգերի համար: According to deception literature, there are reliable cues for detecting deception and the belief that liars give off cues that may indicate their deception is near-universal.  Այսպիսով, հաշվի առնելով այն, որ խաբեցող գործողությունները պահանջում են զարգացած ճանաչողական զարգացում, որը անկեղծ լինելը պարզապես չի պահանջում, ինչպես նաև մարդկանց ճանաչողական մեխանիզմները խոստացող ուղղություններ են ունենում խաբեցման հայտնաբերման համար, այս բժշկական ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք քննարկել խոսակցային կառու Եթե հաշվի առնենք, որ մեր աշխատանքը առաջինն է, որ օգտագործում է բազմալեզու խոսքի գիտակցական ռազմավարությունները կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերման համար, հետազոտությունների համայնքին ներկայումս բացակայում է բազմալեզու խաբեցնող նշումներ ունեցող Հետևաբար, այս թղթին նկարագրում է այս թեզի ներկայիս առաջընթացը, ներառյալ i) առաջին բազմալեզու խաբեցող կորպոսի կառուցվածքը, որը մասնագետների կողմից գրված է Ռետորիկական կառուցվածքի տեսության շրջանակներում, և i) երկու նոր առաջարկած ռետորիկական հարաբերությունների ներկայացումը՝ INTERJerJerctive և ImprATive, որոնք մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ կարև', 'sq': 'Deklaratat që janë qëllimisht të gabuara (apo manipuluara) janë me interes të konsiderueshëm për kërkuesit, qeverinë, sigurinë dhe sistemet financiare. According to deception literature, there are reliable cues for detecting deception and the belief that liars give off cues that may indicate their deception is near-universal.  Prandaj, duke marrë parasysh se veprimet mashtruese kërkojnë zhvillim të avancuar kognitiv që sinqeriteti thjesht nuk kërkon, si dhe mekanizmat kognitive të njerëzve kanë udhëzime premtuese për zbulimin e mashtrimit, në këtë studim në vazhdim të doktorantit, ne propozojmë të shqyrtojmë modelet e strukturës diskursore në korporatën multigjuhësore të lajmeve mashtruese duke përdorur kuadrin teorik të strukturës retorike. Duke konsideruar se puna jonë është e para për të shfrytëzuar strategjitë shumëgjuhëse të ndërgjegjëshme për zbulimin e lajmeve të rreme, komunitetit kërkimor aktualisht i mungon korpra mashtruese shumëgjuhëse të anotuar. Sipas kësaj, ky dokument përshkruan përparimin aktual në këtë tezë, duke përfshirë (i) ndërtimin e korpusit të parë mashtrues shumëgjuhës, i cili u shënua nga specialistët sipas kuadrit të Teorisë së Strukturës Retorike dhe (ii) futjen e dy marrëdhënieve të reja retorike të propozuara: INTERJECTION dhe IMPERATIVE, të cilat ne mendojmë se janë të rëndësishme për detyrën e zbulimit të lajmeve të rreme.', 'az': 'Yaxşı işlədilən (ya da manipul edilən) ifadələr araştırmacılara, hökumətinə, təhlükəsizlik və mali sistemlərə çox maraqlıdır. Sahib edebiyatına görə, yalançılar yalançıların yalançılıqlarını göstərmək üçün təvəkkül edirlər və yalançıların yalançılıqlarının yaxınlığını göstərmək üçün təvəkkül edirlər. Beləliklə, aldatma eylemlərinin sadəcə olaraq ehtiyacı olmayan öyrənməli kognitiv gelişməsi lazımdır. İnsanların kognitiv mehanizmiləri də rotorik Structure Theory framework ünü istifadə edərək, bu Dr.D. təhsil edilən araştırmalarında, çoxlu dildə yalançı xəbər korporasında danışmaq üçün vəd verirlər. Bizim işimiz sahte xəbərləri keşfetmək üçün çoxlu dil danışmaq bilən stratejikləri istifadə etmək ilk dəfə idi, araştırma toplumundan artıq çoxlu dil aldatıcı korporası yoxdur. Beləliklə, bu kağıt, bu tezdə ilk çoxlu dil aldatıcı korpus in şallarını daxil edir ki, Rhetorical Structure Theory framework ına görə specialist tarafından xəbərdar edilmişdir, və i i) iki yeni təklif edilmiş retorik ilişkisinin təşkil edilmişdir: INTERJECTION və IMPERATIVE, ki, sahte xəbərlər keşfetməsi üçün əlaqəsiz olduğunu iddia edirik.', 'af': 'Opdragte wat intensionaal misspesifiseer (of manipuleer) is, is van betekende belang vir ondersoekers, regering, sekuriteit en finansiële stelsels. Volgens verleiding literature, is daar betroubaar tekens vir verleiding en die geloof dat leuenaars die tekens uitgee wat hulle verleiding kan indiek is naby-universele. Daarom, gegee dat verleiding aksies avanserte kognitiewe ontwikkeling nodig dat eerheid eenvoudig nie nodig nie, en ook die kognitiewe mekanisme van mense se kognitiewe mekanisme het beloftende gids vir verleiding opdekking, in hierdie doktorat D. wat voortgaan ondersoek, voorstel ons om diskursie strukturepatrone in multilinglike verleiding nuuskorpora te ondersoek deur die retoriese struktureteorie raamwerk te gebruik Omdat ons werk die eerste is om multitaalske diskurse-bewyse strategies te gebruik vir falske nuusbeskrywing, is die reseksgemeenskap wat huidiglik multitaalske bedrog gekom het. Daarom beskrywe hierdie papier die huidige vordering in hierdie tesis, insluitend (i) die konstruksie van die eerste multitaalse verleiding korpus, wat deur spesialistes aangeteken is volgens die retoriese struktureteoriee raamwerk, en (ii) die inligting van twee nuwe voorgestelde retoriese verhoudings: INTERJECTION en IMPERATIVE, wat ons aanneem is relevant vir die false nuusbeskrywing taak.', 'am': 'በአስፈለጋቸው የተሳቱ (ወይም የተጨማሪው) የተጠቃሚዎች፣ መንግሥት፣ ደህንነት እና የሀብት ስርዓቶች ለመጠቀም በጣም ያማረ ጉዳይ ናቸው፡፡ እንደሚያታልል መጻሕፍት፣ ሽንገላን ለማግኘት የሚታመነ ክፍሎች አሉ፤ ሐሰተኞችም ስሕተታቸውን አቀረበ ዓለማዊ ነው ብለው የሚያስታውቁ ማመን ነው። ስለዚህም የሽንገላ ተግባሮች እውነተኞች ማግኘት የማይፈልገውን አዋቂ ግንኙነት ያስፈልጋል፣ እናም የህዝቦች አካባቢዎች ለሽንገላ ማግኘት ተስፋ የሚያደርጉት መሪ አለባቸው፡፡ በሐሰት ዜና ማግኘት የብዙ ቋንቋዎች የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች እና ማስታወቂያዎችን ለመፍጠር መጀመሪያ እንደሆነ፣ ምርምርመራ ማኅበረሰብ አሁን የብዙ ቋንቋዎች የሚያሳስቱ ኮርፖርተር አለበት፡፡ Accordingly, this paper describes the current progress in this thesis, including (i) the construction of the first multilingual deceptive corpus, which was annotated by specialists according to the Rhetorical Structure Theory framework, and (ii) the introduction of two new proposed rhetorical relations: INTERJECTION and IMPERATIVE, which we assume to be relevant for the fake news detection task.', 'bn': 'গবেষক, সরকার, নিরাপত্তা এবং অর্থনৈতিক ব্যবস্থার প্রতি বিশেষ আগ্রহীয় বিবৃতি যা ইচ্ছায় ভুলে যাচ্ছে (অথবা ম্যানিপালেশন)  বিভ্রান্ত সাহিত্য অনুসারে, প্রতারণা খুঁজে বের করার জন্য বিশ্বাসীন কাজ রয়েছে এবং বিশ্বাস করা হচ্ছে যে মিথ্যাবাদীরা কিউকে ছেড় তাই এই প্রতারণাকারী কাজের কারণে উন্নত উন্নয়নের প্রয়োজন যে সত্যিকারের কোন প্রয়োজন নেই, এছাড়াও মানুষের প্রত্যেক জ্ঞানীয় বিষয়গুলো প্রতারণার প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল পরিচালনার জন্য প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল পরিচালন Considering that our work is the first to exploit multilingual discourse-aware strategies for fake news detection, the research community currently lacks multilingual deceptive annotated corpora.  তাই এই কাগজটি এই বিষয়টির বর্তমান অগ্রগতি বর্ণনা করেছে, যার মধ্যে আছে (i) প্রথম বহুভাষী প্রতারণাকারী কোর্পাস নির্মাণ, যা রেটোরিক্যাল ক্ষেত্রের তথ্যচিত্র অনুসারে বিশেষজ্ঞ বিশেষজ্ঞরা বিবেচনা করেছেন এবং (২) প্রস্তাবিত দ', 'bs': 'Izjave koje su namjerno pogrešno izjavljene (ili manipulirane) imaju značajan interes za istraživače, vlade, sigurnost i finansijske sisteme. Prema literaturi prevare, postoje pouzdani znakovi za otkrivanje prevare i vjerovanje da lažljivci daju znakove koje mogu ukazati na njihovu prevaru je blizu univerzalno. Stoga, s obzirom na to da prevarantske akcije zahtijevaju napredni kognitivni razvoj koji iskrenost jednostavno ne zahtijeva, kao i kognitivni mehanizmi ljudi imaju obećavajuće upute za otkrivanje prevare, u ovom istraživanju doktora D. predlažemo da pregledamo strukture diskursa u multijezičkom korporaciji za fakultet, koristeći okvir retoričke strukture teorije. S obzirom na to da je naš rad prvi koji iskoristi mnogijezičke diskursne strategije za lažno otkrivanje vijesti, istraživačka zajednica trenutno nedostaje multijezička prevarantna korpora. Stoga, ovaj papir opisuje trenutni napredak u toj tezi, uključujući i) izgradnju prvog multijezičkog deceptivnog korpusa, koji je navodio specijalisti u skladu s okvirom retoričke strukture teorije, i ii) uvođenje dvije nove predložene retoričke odnose: INTERJECTION i IMPERATIVE, koje smatramo relevantnim za lažni zadatak otkrivanja vijesti.', 'ca': "Les declaracions que són deliberadament falsificades (o manipulades) tenen un interès considerable per als investigadors, el govern, la seguretat i els sistemes financers. Segons la literatura d'engany, hi ha indicis fiables per detectar engany i la creença que els mentidors donen indicis que la seva enganya és gairebé universal. Per tant, tenint en compte que les accions enganyades requereixen un desenvolupament cognitiu avançat que la honestet simplement no requereix, així com els mecanismes cognitius de la gent tenen orientació prometedora per la detecció del engany, en aquesta investigació en curso del doctorat, proposem examinar patrons d'estructura discursiva en la corpora multilingüe de not ícies enganyades utilitzant el marc de la Teoria de l'Estructura Retòrica. Considerant que la nostra feina és la primera a explotar estratègies multilingües conscients del discurs per la detecció de notícies falses, a la comunitat de recerca actualment falta corpora enganyada multilingüe anotata. En conseqüència, aquest paper descriu el progrès actual en aquesta tesi, incloent (i) la construcció del primer corpus multilingüe enganyat, anotat per especialistes segons el marc de la Teoria de l'Estructura Retòrica, i (ii) la introducció de dues noves relacions retòricas proposades: INTERJECTION i IMPERATIVE, que suposem ser rellevants per la tasca de detecció falsa de notícies.", 'et': 'Tahtlikult valesti öeldud (või manipuleeritud) avaldused pakuvad teadlastele, valitsusele, julgeolekule ja finantssüsteemidele märkimisväärset huvi. Pettuskirjanduse kohaselt on olemas usaldusväärseid vihjeid pettuse avastamiseks ja usk, et valetajad annavad vihjeid, mis võivad näidata, et nende pettus on peaaegu universaalne. Seetõttu, arvestades, et petlikud tegevused nõuavad arenenud kognitiivset arengut, mida ausus lihtsalt ei nõua, ning inimeste kognitiivsed mehhanismid on paljutõotavad juhised pettuse tuvastamiseks, teeme käimasolevas doktorikraadis ettepaneku uurida diskursuse struktuuri mustreid mitmekeelsetes petlikes uudistekorporates retoorilise struktuuri teooria raamistikus. Arvestades, et meie töö on esimene, kes kasutab mitmekeelseid diskursusteadlikke strateegiaid valeuudiste tuvastamiseks, puuduvad teadusringkonnas praegu mitmekeelsed petlikud märgitud korpused. Sellest tulenevalt kirjeldatakse käesolevas töös käesoleva doktoritöö praegust arengut, sealhulgas (i) esimese mitmekeelse petliku korpuse ehitamist, mille spetsialistid retoorilise struktuuri teooria raamistiku kohaselt märkisid, ja (ii) kahe uue kavandatud retoorilise suhte kasutuselevõttu: INTERJEKTSION ja IMPERATIVE, mis on meie arvates olulised valeuudiste avastamise ülesande jaoks.', 'cs': 'Prohlášení, která jsou záměrně nesprávně vyjádřena (nebo manipulována), mají značný zájem pro výzkumné pracovníky, vládu, bezpečnostní a finanční systémy. Podle literatury o klamu existují spolehlivé návody k detekci klamu a přesvědčení, že lháři vydávají návody, které mohou naznačovat, že jejich klam je téměř univerzální. Proto vzhledem k tomu, že klamavé akce vyžadují pokročilý kognitivní vývoj, který upřímnost jednoduše nevyžaduje, a kognitivní mechanismy lidí mají slibné pokyny pro detekci klamů, v tomto Ph.D. probíhajícím výzkumu navrhujeme zkoumat struktury diskurzu v mnohojazyčných klamných zpravodajských korpusech s využitím rámce teorie rétorické struktury. Vzhledem k tomu, že naše práce je první, kdo využívá vícejazyčné diskurzní strategie pro detekci falešných zpráv, výzkumná komunita v současné době postrádá vícejazyčné klamavé anotované korpusy. Tento článek tedy popisuje současný pokrok v této diplomové práci, včetně (i) konstrukce prvního vícejazyčného klamavého korpusu, který byl anotován odborníky podle rámce teorie rétorické struktury, a (ii) zavedení dvou nově navržených rétorických vztahů: INTERJECTION a IMPERATIVE, které jsou relevantní pro úlohu detekce falešných zpráv.', 'fi': 'Tahdollisesti virheelliset (tai manipuloidut) lausunnot kiinnostavat tutkijoita, hallitusta, turvallisuutta ja rahoitusjärjestelmiä. Petokseen liittyvän kirjallisuuden mukaan on olemassa luotettavia vihjeitä petoksen havaitsemiseksi ja usko, että valehtelijat antavat vihjeitä, jotka voivat osoittaa, että heidän petoksensa on lähes yleismaailmallinen. Koska petolliset toimet edellyttävät kehittynyttä kognitiivista kehitystä, jota rehellisyys ei yksinkertaisesti vaadi, ja ihmisten kognitiivisilla mekanismeilla on lupaavaa opastusta petoksen havaitsemiseen, ehdotamme tässä käynnissä olevassa väitöstutkimuksessa diskurssirakenteen malleja monikielisissä petollisissa uutiskorpussa retorisen rakenneteorian puitteissa. Koska työmme on ensimmäinen, joka hyödyntää monikielisiä diskurssitietoisia strategioita valeuutisten havaitsemiseksi, tutkimusyhteisöltä puuttuu tällä hetkellä monikielisiä harhaanjohtavia annotoituja korpusia. Tämän vuoksi tässä työssä kuvataan tämän opinnäytetyön tämänhetkistä edistymistä, mukaan lukien (i) ensimmäisen monikielisen harhaanjohtavan korpusen rakentaminen, jonka asiantuntijat antoivat huomautuksia retorisen rakenneteorian viitekehyksen mukaisesti, ja (ii) kahden uuden ehdotetun retorisen suhteen käyttöönotto: INTERJECTION ja IMPERATIVE, joiden oletamme olevan merkityksellisiä fake news detection -tehtävän kannalta.', 'jv': 'structural navigation Tulung ning kelas piye basa, sing ana perusahaan kanggo kebebasan pangan lan nglanggar barang bakal kelas barang mangan winih dhéwé kuwi tindakan bakal kelas dhéwé ngerasakno bakal kelas teka-universal. Awak dhéwé, mengko aksi diangluhaan aksi diangluhaan ngerasakno sing bisa dianggap kanggo ngilangno kuwi kesempatan, lan mekanipakan kowisiyé awak dhèwèké kesempatan kanggo kebebasan pangan, ning acara doktor D. sing bisalakno nungsaken winih, kéné ngerasakno kanggo ujian sisalakno dumadhi nggawe kno multi-lenguangbar obah-ewong liyane Inga sampeyan nganggo barêng-barêng kuwi kamulèh sing perusahaan kanggo nguasai perusahaan langkung sampeyan kanggo kebebasan wartané sing gak bukane, kedoka perusahaan resmi sing ngendalikno akeh lan ora oleh dumateng. Kaya, kartu iki rambarang nggawe perusahaan kanggo masara iki ning tès, gambar (i) nggawe geranggap karo perusahaan populasye multilengkang dipepot, sing dinopakan karo perusahaan karo perusahaan sing isinculos akra Rontokir structural theorem, lan (i i) nggawe barang langgar sampeyan gawe uwis sistem sing dibenalke perusahaan: INTIRjESTITIVE karo IHAPPARTIVE, sing isih alam kanggo kelas lanjut perusahaan kanggo langgar obah sing', 'sk': 'Izjave, ki so namerno napačne (ali manipulirane), so zelo zanimive za raziskovalce, vlado, varnostne in finančne sisteme. Glede na prevaro literaturo obstajajo zanesljivi namigi za odkrivanje prevare in prepričanje, da lažnivci dajejo namige, ki lahko kažejo, da je njihova prevara skoraj univerzalna. Glede na to, da zavajajoča dejanja zahtevajo napreden kognitivni razvoj, ki ga poštenost preprosto ne zahteva, in imajo kognitivni mehanizmi ljudi obetavne smernice za odkrivanje prevare, v tem doktorskem raziskovanju predlagamo preučitev vzorcev strukture diskurza v večjezičnih zavajajočih novičarskih korpusih z uporabo okvira retorične strukture. Glede na to, da je naše delo prvo, ki izkorišča večjezične diskurzivne strategije za odkrivanje lažnih novic, raziskovalni skupnosti trenutno primanjkuje večjezičnih zavajajočih korpusov z oznakami. V skladu s tem prispevek opisuje trenutni napredek v tej diplomski nalogi, vključno z (i) gradnjo prvega večjezičnega zavajajočega korpusa, ki so ga strokovnjaki označili v skladu z okvirom retorične teorije strukture, in (ii) uvedbo dveh novih predlaganih retoričnih odnosov: INTERJECIJA in IMPERATIVA, za katera domnevamo, da sta pomembna za nalogo odkrivanja lažnih novic.', 'he': 'הצהרות שטעויות בכוונה (או מניפולציות) הן מעניינות משמעותיות למחקרים, ממשלה, ביטחון ומערכות פיננסיות. לפי ספרות הונאה, יש סימנים אמינים לגלות הונאה והאמונה ששקרנים נותנים סימנים שיכולים להצביע שההונאה שלהם היא כמעט אוניברסלית. לכן, בהתחשב בפעולות הונאות דורשות פיתוח קוגניטיבי מתקדם שהכנות פשוט לא דורשת, כמו גם למנגניזמים קוגניטיביים של אנשים יש מדריך מבטיח לגילוי הונאה, במחקר הממשיך של דוקטורט זה, אנו מציעים לבדוק דפוסי מבנה דיבור בתוכנית חדשות הונאות רבות-שפותית בשימוש בתיאוריית מבנה רטורית. בהתחשב בעבודתנו היא הראשונה לנצל אסטרטגיות מודעות לדיבורים רבות שפויות לגילוי חדשות מזויפות, לקהילת המחקר כרגע חסרת גופרה משוגעת רבות שפות. לכן, העיתון הזה מתאר את ההתקדמות הנוכחית בתזיה הזו, כולל (i) בניית הקורפוס המטען המורבי-שפתי הראשון, אשר הוכתב על ידי מומחים לפי המסגרת תיאורית המבנה הרטורית, ו (ii) הכניסה של שני מערכות היחסים הרטוריות הציעות חדשות: INTERJECTION ומPERATIVE, שאנחנו מניחים להיות רלוונטיות למשימת גילוי החדשות המזויפת.', 'ha': "Statements that are intentionally misstated (or manipulated) are of considerable interest to researchers, government, security, and financial systems.  Ina faɗin littãfin nan, there are wasu misãlai mãsu amintarwa dõmin su gane yaudara da ĩmãni kuwa maƙaryata suna yanke ƙazanta daga wurãren zuwa ga kashẽwarsu. D õmin haka, da dai aikin waɗannan da suke yaudarwa sun taƙaita mafiya ƙaranci kognitive wanda ba ta buƙata ba ga gaskiya kawai, da kuma mutane na kognitive sun yi wa'adi da shiryarwa wa kudangan zura, a cikin wannan Ph.D. da ke tafiya, tuna buƙata misalin mazaɓa a cikin firam na bushãra na mulki-birai da ke amfani da firam na Retaorical Teori. Aka gane da aikinmu na farkon kuɓutar da takwai masu fahimta cikin mulki-harshen, wa'anar zance-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane ƙarya, jamii na ƙidãya yanzu na da marubuci masu bakwai. Kamar wannan, takardan na faɗa abin da ke kai yanzu a cikin wannan zato, ikin (i) ya gina na farkon korbas na bakin mulki-tumanni, wanda aka yi wa cũtarwa na masu ƙayyade da masu ƙayyade da bakwai na Retorical Babu-Firmamori, da (ii) na ƙarfafa da danganta biyu masu sãbuwa na bakwai-raye: INTARJEctIyon da IMPArraTIV, da za'a yi amfani da wa aikin fake na lãbãri.", 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནི་ཕལ་མེད་གཏོང་བ་དང་། ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་སྐོར་ཚུལ་གཞུང་དང་། བདེ་འཇལ་ཁྲིད། དངུལ་སྐྱེན་མ་ལག་ལ་ཚོར་བསམ མཁན་མི་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བརྗོད་ན། མི་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། རྫུན་མི་ཞིག་གིས་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་པའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཡིད་ཆ་ཡོད་ དེར་བརྟེན། བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱ་འགུལ་དགོས་པ་དེ་དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་མེད་དགོས་པའི་འཕེལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཉེན་མཁན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཁས་མཐུན་བཤེར་མཁན་མཐུན་མཁན་གྱི་ཡིག ང་ཚོའི་ལས་འགན་བྱ་ཚིག་ནི་སྔོན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཆ་རྩལ་བ་དང་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཡིན་པ་དང་། དེར་བརྟེན། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ད་ལྟོའི་གོ་སྐབས་འདིའི་ནང་གི་འཕེལ་རིམ་འདི་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ལས་(i) བཟོ་བརྩོན་གྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་གཟུགས་འབྲེལ་དང་པོ་ལྟར་བཤད་པ་ཚོའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་དང་།'}
